BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.22.335 and 1995 c 280 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout RCW 43.22.340 through 43.22.420.

(1)
"Recreational park trailer" means a park trailer as defined in
the American National Standards Institute A119.5 standard for recreational
park trailers.

(2)
"Recreational vehicle" means ((a vehicular-type unit primarily
designed for recreational camping or travel use that has its own motive power
or is mounted on or towed by another vehicle. The units include travel
trailers, fifth-wheel trailers, folding camping trailers, truck campers, and
motor homes)) recreational vehicle as defined in the American National
Standards Institute A119.2 standard for recreational vehicles.

(3)
"Commercial coach" means a structure or unit that is used for
temporary commercial purposes. It is transportable in one or more sections and
the frame is an integral part of the structure. Commercial coaches include,
but are not limited to, structures or units designed and constructed as a
commercial coach, conversions of a vehicle to a commercial coach, and vendor
units.

(4)(a)
"Manufactured home" means a single-family dwelling built according to
the department of housing and urban development manufactured home construction
and safety standards act, which is a national, preemptive building code.

(b)
"Mobile home" means a factory-built dwelling built prior to June 15,
1976, to standards other than the national code, and acceptable under
applicable Washington state codes in effect at the time of construction or
introduction of the home into the state.

(c)
For the purpose of applying the national building code standards, unless
otherwise noted, the phrases manufactured home and mobile home are synonymous.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.22.340 and 1995 c 280 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director of labor and industries shall ((prescribe)) adopt and
enforce rules ((and regulations)) governing safety of body and frame
design, and the installation of plumbing, heating, and electrical equipment in altered
manufactured or mobile homes, commercial coaches, recreational vehicles,
and/or recreational park trailers: PROVIDED, That the director shall
not prescribe or enforce rules ((and regulations)) governing the body
and frame design of recreational vehicles and recreational park trailers
until after the American National Standards Institute shall have published
standards and specifications upon this subject. ((Such)) These
rules ((and regulations)) shall be reasonably consistent with recognized
and accepted principles of safety for body and frame design and plumbing,
heating, and electrical installations, in order to protect the health and
safety of the people of this state from dangers inherent in the use of
substandard and unsafe body and frame design, construction, plumbing, heating,
electrical, and other equipment and systems and shall correlate with
and, so far as practicable, conform to the then current standards and
specifications of the American National Standards Institute standards ((A119.1
for mobile homes and commercial coaches,)) A119.2 for recreational
vehicles, ((and)) A119.5 for recreational park trailers, and
the state building codes, chapters 19.27 and 19.27A RCW, and the state
electrical code, chapter 19.28 RCW, for commercial coaches. It shall be
unlawful for any person to lease, sell or offer for sale, within this state,
any manufactured or mobile homes, commercial coaches, recreational
vehicles, and/or recreational park trailers manufactured after January
1, 1968, containing plumbing, heating, electrical, or other equipment or
systems, and after July 1, 1970, body and frame design or
construction unless such equipment meets the requirements of the rules ((and
regulations)) provided for ((herein)) in this section.

Sec.
3. RCW
43.22.350 and 1995 c 280 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In compliance with any applicable provisions of this chapter, the director of
the department of labor and industries shall establish a schedule of fees,
whether on the basis of plan approval and/or inspection, for the
issuance of an insigne which indicates that the altered manufactured or
mobile home, commercial coach, recreational vehicle, and/or recreational
park trailer complies with the provisions of RCW 43.22.340 through 43.22.410 or
for any other purpose specifically authorized by any applicable provision of
this chapter.

(2) Insignia are not required on ((mobile homes,))
commercial coaches, recreational vehicles, and/or recreational park
trailers manufactured within this state for sale outside this state which are
sold to persons outside this state.

Sec.
4. RCW
43.22.355 and 1995 c 280 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director or the director's authorized representative may allow qualifying
recreational vehicle and/or recreational park trailer manufacturers to
be self-certified as to compliance with the American National Standards
Institute A119.2 standard for recreational vehicles and the American National
Standards Institute A119.5 standard for recreational park trailers.
Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a manufacturer approved
for the department's self-certification is exempt from the requirements under
RCW 43.22.434 and 43.22.360. The director shall adopt rules to implement the
self-certification program. The director may establish fees at a sufficient
level to cover the costs of administering this program.

(1)
Before a manufacturer becomes self-certified, the department shall make an
initial audit of the manufacturer making self-certification application. The
audit must review and report on the following:

(a)
The manufacturer's quality control program;

(b)
The manufacturer's demonstrated ability to manufacture products in conformance
with either or both of the American National Standards Institute standards
A119.2 and A119.5; and

(c)
The availability on site of comprehensive plans for each model being
manufactured.

(2)
At the sole discretion of the director, a manufacturer currently being audited
by the department that is deemed to meet the criteria for an initial
self-certification audit may become a self-certified manufacturer without an
additional self-certification audit.

(3)
If the department denies an application to allow a manufacturer to be
self-certified, the manufacturer shall be notified in writing including the
reasons for denial. A copy of the initial self-certification audit shall be
provided to the manufacturer. A manufacturer who is denied self-certification
may appeal the denial under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(4)
If the department has reason to believe that the manufacturer is no longer
meeting the criteria established in subsection (1) of this section, the
department may make an audit of the manufacturer. For purposes of enforcement
of this subsection, the department retains inspection and investigation
authority under RCW 43.22.434. At the conclusion of this audit, the director
or the director's authorized representative may continue the manufacturer's
self-certification or require the manufacturer to meet all of the requirements
of this chapter from which the manufacturer was once exempted.

(5)
The manufacturer to whom the authorization is given shall pay all of the costs
of the initial self-certification audit and any subsequent audit that the
department has the authority to perform.

(6)
The department shall conduct a performance audit of additional industry
association quality control programs utilized by self-certified manufacturers
at least once every two years.

Sec.
5. RCW
43.22.360 and 1995 c 289 s 1 and 1995 c 280 s 7 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
Plans and specifications of each model or production prototype of a ((mobile
home,)) commercial coach, recreational vehicle, and/or recreational
park trailer showing body and frame design, construction, plumbing, heating and
electrical specifications and data shall be submitted to the department of
labor and industries for approval and recommendations with respect to
compliance with the ((regulations)) rules and standards of ((each
of such agencies)) the department. When plans have been submitted
and approved as ((aforesaid)) required, no changes or alterations
shall be made to body and frame design, construction, plumbing, heating,
or electrical installations or specifications shown thereon in any manufactured
or mobile home, commercial coach, recreational vehicle, or recreational
park trailer without prior written approval of the department of labor and
industries.

(2)
The director may adopt rules that provide for approval of a plan that is
certified as meeting state requirements or the equivalent by a professional who
is licensed or certified in a state whose licensure or certification
requirements meet or exceed Washington requirements.

Sec.
6. RCW
43.22.370 and 1995 c 280 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
manufactured or mobile home, commercial coach, recreational vehicle,
and/or recreational park trailer leased or sold in Washington and
manufactured prior to July 1, 1968, which has not been inspected prior to its
sale and which does not meet the requirements prescribed will not be required
to comply with ((said)) those requirements except for alterations
or installations referred to in RCW 43.22.360.

Sec.
7. RCW
43.22.380 and 1995 c 280 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

Used
mobile homes, commercial coaches, recreational vehicles, and/or recreational
park trailers manufactured for use outside this state which do not meet the
requirements prescribed and have been used for six months or more will not be
required to comply with ((said)) those requirements except for
alterations or installations referred to in RCW 43.22.360.

Sec.
8. RCW
43.22.390 and 1995 c 280 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

Manufactured
or mobile homes, commercial coaches, recreational vehicles, and/or recreational
park trailers subject to the provisions of RCW 43.22.340 through 43.22.410, and
manufactured or mobile homes, commercial coaches, recreational vehicles,
and/or recreational park trailers upon which alterations of body and
frame design, construction or installations of plumbing, heating, or
electrical equipment referred to in RCW 43.22.360 are made after July 1, 1968,
shall have affixed thereto such insigne of approval.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. A
new section is added to chapter 43.22 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
All construction and/or installations of plumbing, heating, or electrical
equipment on used manufactured or mobile housing, commercial coaches,
recreational vehicles, and/or recreational park trailers requires the obtaining
of an alteration permit and insignia from the department.

(2)
An application for insignia shall specify the construction and/or equipment
installations planned. The department as part of the approval process may
inspect all construction and/or equipment installations on manufactured or
mobile homes, commercial coaches, recreational vehicles, and/or recreational
park trailers. The department's approval for issuance of an alteration
insignia, as required by RCW 43.22.360, is limited to the scope of construction
or components being installed. The department may set by rule the fees
necessary to cover the cost of the alteration approval process.

(3)
Alteration insignia issued by the department shall be affixed to the
manufactured or mobile home, commercial coach, recreational vehicle, and/or
recreational park trailer, as required by RCW 43.22.390.

Sec.
10. RCW
43.22.400 and 1995 c 280 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

If
the director of the department of labor and industries, or his or her
designee, determines that the standards for body and frame design,
construction and the plumbing, heating and electrical equipment installed in ((mobile
homes, commercial coaches,)) recreational vehicles((,)) and/or recreational
park trailers by the statutes or rules and regulations of other states are at
least equal to the standards prescribed by this state, ((he)) the
director, or his or her designee, may so provide by ((regulation)) rule.
Any ((mobile home, commercial coach,)) recreational vehicle((,))
and/or recreational park trailer which a state listed in such
regulations has approved as meeting its standards for body and frame design,
construction and plumbing, heating, and electrical equipment shall be
deemed to meet the standards of the director of the department of labor and
industries, or his or her designee, if ((he)) the director, or
his or her designee, determines that the standards of such state are
actually being enforced.

Sec.
11. RCW
43.22.410 and 1995 c 280 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
manufactured or mobile home, commercial coach, recreational vehicle,
and/or recreational park trailer that meets the requirements prescribed
under RCW 43.22.340 shall not be required to comply with any ordinances of a
city or county prescribing requirements for body and frame design, construction
or plumbing, heating and electrical equipment installed in manufactured or
mobile homes, commercial coaches, recreational vehicles, and/or recreational
park trailers.

Sec.
12. RCW
43.22.420 and 1995 c 280 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

There
is hereby created a factory assembled structures advisory board consisting of
nine members to be appointed by the director of labor and industries. It shall
be the purpose and function of the board to advise the director on all matters
pertaining to the enforcement of this chapter including but not limited to
standards of body and frame design, construction and plumbing, heating and
electrical installations, minimum inspection procedures, the adoption of rules
((and regulations)) pertaining to the manufacture of factory assembled
structures, manufactured or mobile homes, commercial coaches,
recreational vehicles, and recreational park trailers and the
alterations of manufactured or mobile homes. The advisory board shall
periodically review the rules promulgated under RCW ((43.22.450)) 43.22.335
through 43.22.490 and shall recommend changes of such rules to the department
if it deems changes advisable.

The
members of the advisory board shall be representative of consumers, the
regulated industries, and allied professionals. The term of each member shall
be four years. ((However, the director may appoint the initial members of
the advisory board to staggered terms not exceeding four years.))

The
chief inspector or any person acting as chief inspector for the factory
assembled structures, manufactured or mobile home, commercial coach,
recreational vehicle, and recreational park trailer section shall serve
as secretary of the board during his or her tenure as chief. Meetings
of the board shall be called at the discretion of the director of labor and
industries, but at least quarterly. Each member of the board shall be paid
travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 ((as now
existing or hereafter amended)) which shall be paid out of the
appropriation to the department of labor and industries, upon vouchers approved
by the director of labor and industries or his or her designee.

Sec.
13. RCW
43.22.431 and 1977 ex.s. c 21 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director of the department of labor and industries may enforce manufactured
or mobile home safety and construction standards adopted by the secretary
of housing and urban development under the National ((Mobile)) Manufactured
Home Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974 (800 Stat. 700; 42 U.S.C.
Secs. 5401-5426). Furthermore, the director may make agreements with the
United States government and private inspection organizations to implement the
development and enforcement of applicable provisions of this chapter and the
National ((Mobile)) Manufactured Home Construction and Safety
Standards Act of 1974 (800 Stat. 700; 42 U.S.C. Secs. 5401-5426).

Sec.
14. RCW
43.22.432 and 1977 ex.s. c 21 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The department may adopt all standards and regulations adopted by
the secretary under the National ((Mobile)) Manufactured Home
Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974 (800 Stat. 700; 42 U.S.C. Secs.
5401-5426) for manufactured or mobile home ((construction and safety
standards)) alterations. If any deletions or amendments to the
federal standards or regulations are thereafter made and notice thereof is
given to the department, the standards or regulations shall be considered
automatically adopted by the state under this chapter after the expiration of
thirty days from publication in the federal register of a final order
describing the deletions or amendments unless within that thirty day period the
department objects to the deletion or amendment. In case of objection, the
department shall proceed under the rule making procedure of chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec.
15. RCW
43.22.434 and 1995 c 280 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The director or the director's authorized representative may conduct such
inspections and investigations as may be necessary to ((promulgate)) adopt
or enforce manufactured or mobile home, commercial coach, recreational
vehicle, recreational park trailer, factory built housing, and factory
built commercial structure rules adopted under the authority of this chapter or
to carry out the director's duties under this chapter.

(2)
For purposes of enforcement of this chapter, persons duly designated by the director
upon presenting appropriate credentials to the owner, operator, or agent in
charge may:

(a)
At reasonable times and without advance notice enter any factory, warehouse, or
establishment in which manufactured or mobile homes, commercial coaches,
recreational vehicles, recreational park trailers, factory built
housing, and factory built commercial structures are manufactured, stored, or
held for sale; ((and))

(b)
At reasonable times, within reasonable limits, and in a reasonable manner
inspect any factory, warehouse, or establishment as required to comply with the
standards adopted by the secretary of housing and urban development under the
National ((Mobile)) Manufactured Home Construction and Safety
Standards Act of 1974. Each inspection shall be commenced and completed with
reasonable promptness; and

(c)
As requested by an owner of a manufactured or mobile home, commercial coach,
recreational vehicle, recreational park trailer, factory built housing, or
factory built commercial structure, inspect an alteration.

(3) ((In carrying out the inspections authorized by this section
the director may establish, by rule, and impose on mobile home manufacturers,
distributors, and dealers such reasonable fees as may be necessary to offset
the expenses incurred by the director in conducting the inspections.)) The
department shall set a schedule of fees by rule which will cover the costs
incurred by the department in the administration of RCW 43.22.335 through
43.22.490.

Sec.
16. RCW
43.22.440 and 1988 c 239 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature finds that inspections of manufactured or mobile home
installation are not done on a consistent basis. Manufactured or mobile
homes provide housing for many people in the state, and improperly installed manufactured
or mobile homes are a serious health and safety risk. Where possible and
practical, manufactured or mobile homes should be treated the same as
any housing inhabited or to be inhabited by persons in this state, including
housing built according to the state building code.

(2)
In consultation with the factory assembled structures advisory board for manufactured
or mobile homes, the director of labor and industries shall by rule
establish uniform standards for the performance and workmanship of installation
service and warranty service by persons or entities engaged in performing the
services within this state for all manufactured or mobile homes, as
defined in RCW 46.04.302. The standards shall conform, where applicable, with
statutes, rules, and recommendations established under the federal national ((mobile))
manufactured home construction and safety standards act of 1974 (42
U.S.C. Sec. 5401 et seq.). These rules regarding the installation of ((mobile))
manufactured homes shall be enforced and fees charged by the counties
and cities in the same manner the state building code is enforced under RCW
19.27.050.

(3)
In addition to and in conjunction with the remedies provided in this chapter,
failure to remedy any breach of the standards and rules so established, upon
adequate notice and within a reasonable time, is a violation of the consumer
protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW and subject to the remedies provided in that
chapter.

Sec.
17. RCW
43.22.442 and 1980 c 153 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

A
manufacturer of manufactured or mobile homes who designates a
representative within this state to provide consumers with warranty service for
manufactured or mobile homes on behalf of the manufacturer shall make
reasonable and timely compensation to the representative for performance of the
warranty service.

Sec.
18. RCW
43.22.450 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 22 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever
used in RCW 43.22.450 through 43.22.490:

(1)
"Department" means the Washington state department of labor and
industries;

(2)
"Approved" means approved by the department;

(3)
"Factory built housing" means any structure designed primarily for
human occupancy other than a mobile home the structure or any room of which is
either entirely or substantially prefabricated or assembled at a place other
than a building site;

(4)
"Install" means the assembly of factory built housing or factory
built commercial structures at a building site;

(5)
"Building site" means any tract, parcel or subdivision of land upon
which factory built housing or a factory built commercial structure is
installed or is to be installed;

(6)
"Local enforcement agency" means any agency of the governing body of
any city or county which enforces laws or ordinances governing the construction
of buildings;

(7)
"Commercial structure" means a structure designed or used for human
habitation, or human occupancy for industrial, educational, assembly,
professional, or commercial purposes. Structures for which all
service, repair, or maintenance is accomplished by standing outside of the
structure are not commercial structures for purposes of this chapter.

Sec.
19. RCW
43.22.480 and 1998 c 37 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall adopt and enforce rules that protect the health, safety,
and property of the people of this state by assuring that all factory built
housing or factory built commercial structures are structurally sound and that
the plumbing, heating, electrical, and other components thereof are reasonably
safe. The rules shall be reasonably consistent with recognized and accepted
principles of safety and structural soundness, and in adopting the rules the
department shall consider, so far as practicable, the standards and
specifications contained in the uniform building, plumbing, and mechanical
codes, including the ((barrier free)) Washington state ventilation
and indoor air quality code as adopted by the state building code
council pursuant to chapter 19.27 RCW and the Washington energy code as
adopted by the state building code council pursuant to chapter 19.27A RCW, and
the ((national)) electrical code, including the state rules as adopted
pursuant to chapter 19.28 RCW ((and published by the national fire
protection association)) or, when applicable, the temporary worker building
code adopted under RCW 70.114A.081.

(2)
The department shall set a schedule of fees which will cover the costs incurred
by the department in the administration and enforcement of RCW 43.22.450
through 43.22.490.

(3)
The director may adopt rules that provide for approval of a plan that is
certified as meeting state requirements or the equivalent by a professional who
is licensed or certified in a state whose licensure or certification
requirements meet or exceed Washington requirements.

Sec.
20. RCW
43.22.485 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 22 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

If
the director of the department determines that the standards for factory built
housing or factory built commercial structures prescribed by statute, rule,
or regulation of another state are at least equal to the regulations prescribed
under RCW 43.22.450 through 43.22.490, and that such standards are actually
enforced by such other state, ((he)) the director may provide by
((regulation)) rule that factory built housing or factory built
commercial structures approved by such other state shall be deemed to have been
approved by the department. The department has the authority to enter into
reciprocal agreements delegating all or part of its inspections to another
state or a local enforcement agency in another state. Before entering into a
reciprocal agreement, the department shall determine that the standards of
inspection of the reciprocal state or local enforcement agency are equal to or
greater than the standards prescribed by this state. All factory built housing
and factory built commercial structures inspected and approved by another state
or local enforcement agency shall meet the requirements in RCW 43.22.455.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21. RCW 43.22.495 and
1995 c 399 s 69 & 1990 c 176 s 1 are each repealed.

---
END ---