BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the placement of adults in state-operated or
state-funded boarding homes must be done in such a manner as to protect persons
who are vulnerable to sexual victimization from adults who are sexually
aggressive. To achieve this purpose, the legislature intends that the
department of social and health services develop a policy for assessing sexual
aggressiveness and vulnerability to sexual victimization of persons who are
placed in state-operated or state-funded boarding homes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The department of social and health services shall implement a policy for
protecting persons placed in state-operated or state-funded boarding homes who
are vulnerable to sexual victimization by other adults placed in those
facilities who are sexually aggressive. The policy shall include, at a
minimum, the following elements:

(a)
Development and use of an assessment process for identifying adults, prior to
placement, who present a moderate or high risk of sexually aggressive behavior
for the purposes of this section. The assessment process need not require that
every person who is adjudicated or convicted of a sex offense as defined in RCW
9.94A.030 be determined to be sexually aggressive, nor shall a sex offense
adjudication or conviction be required in order to determine that a person is
sexually aggressive. Instead, the assessment process shall consider the
individual circumstances of the person, including his or her age, physical
size, sexual abuse history, mental and emotional condition, and other factors
relevant to sexual aggressiveness;

(b)
Development and use of an assessment process for identifying persons, prior to
placement, who may be vulnerable to victimization by adults identified under (a)
of this subsection as presenting a moderate or high risk of sexually aggressive
behavior. The assessment process shall consider the individual circumstances
of the person, including his or her age, physical size, sexual abuse history,
mental and emotional condition, and other factors relevant to vulnerability;

(c)
Development and use of placement criteria to avoid assigning adults who present
a moderate or high risk of sexually aggressive behavior to the same sleeping
quarters as persons assessed as vulnerable to sexual victimization, except that
they may be assigned to the same multiple-person sleeping quarters if those
sleeping quarters are regularly monitored by visual surveillance equipment or
staff checks;

(d)
Development and use of procedures for minimizing, within available funds,
unsupervised contact in state-operated or state-funded boarding homes between
adults presenting moderate to high risk of sexually aggressive behavior and
persons assessed as vulnerable to sexual victimization. The procedures shall
include taking reasonable steps to prohibit any person placed in a
state-operated or state-funded boarding home who presents a moderate to high
risk of sexually aggressive behavior from entering any sleeping quarters other
than the one to which the person is assigned, unless accompanied by an
authorized adult, and increased twenty-four hour supervision of sexually
aggressive adults.

(2)
For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following
meanings:

(a)
"Sleeping quarters" means the bedrooms or other rooms within a
boarding home designated for sleeping.

(b)
"Unsupervised contact" means contact occurring outside the sight or
hearing of a responsible adult for more than a reasonable period of time under
the circumstances.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
department of social and health services shall report to the legislature by
December 1, 1999, on the following: (1) Development of the assessment process
for identifying adults who present a moderate to high risk of sexually
aggressive behavior for the purposes of sections 1 through 6 of this act; (2)
development of the assessment process for determining when a person may be
vulnerable to victimization by an adult who presents a moderate to high risk of
sexually aggressive behavior for the purposes of sections 1 through 6 of this
act; and (3) development of the placement criteria and procedures required
under section 2 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
policy developed under section 2 of this act shall be implemented within the
department of social and health services by January 1, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
department of social and health services shall provide an evaluation of the
implementation of sections 1 through 6 of this act to the legislature by
December 1, 2000. The evaluation shall identify: (1) The number of adults
assessed as presenting a moderate to high risk of sexually aggressive behavior;
(2) the number of adults assessed as being vulnerable to victimization; (3) the
effectiveness of avoiding assigning adults who present a moderate or high risk
of sexually aggressive behavior to the same sleeping quarters as adults
assessed as being vulnerable to sexual victimization by utilizing the
assessment and placement process set forth in section 2 of this act; (4) the
effectiveness of minimizing, within available funds, unsupervised contact
between adults who present a moderate or high risk of sexually aggressive
behavior and adults assessed as being vulnerable to sexual victimization
utilizing the procedures set forth in section 2 of this act; and (5) the number
of adults identified as moderate to high risk of sexually aggressive behavior
who were placed in state-operated or state-funded boarding homes with an adult
who has been identified as sexually vulnerable. The department shall identify
the resources necessary to provide separate placements for persons identified
in this subsection and shall identify alternative administrative processes for
managing the placement of these persons.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. For
each person placed in a state-operated or state-funded boarding home the
secretary of social and health services or the secretary's designee shall:

(1)
Conduct assessments to determine the risk of: (a) Sexually aggressive behavior
as provided in section 2 of this act; and (b) vulnerability to sexually
aggressive behavior as provided in section 2 of this act;

(2)
Develop placement criteria to avoid assigning persons who present a moderate or
high risk of sexually aggressive behavior to the same sleeping quarters as
persons assessed as vulnerable to sexual victimization.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
policy developed under section 6 of this act shall be implemented by July 1,
2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---