BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the parent, guardian, or foster parent of a child who
may be the victim of abuse or neglect may become involved in the investigation
of the abuse or neglect. The parent, guardian, or foster parent may also be
made a party to later court proceedings and be subject to a court-ordered examination
by a physician, psychologist, or psychiatrist. It is the intent of the
legislature to avoid actual or perceived conflicts of interest that may occur
when the parent, guardian, or foster parent is also a law enforcement officer
and is assigned to conduct the investigation of alleged abuse or neglect
concerning the child.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 26.44 RCW to read as follows:

A law enforcement agency shall not allow a law enforcement officer
to participate as an investigator in the investigation of alleged abuse or
neglect concerning a child for whom the law enforcement officer is, or within
the preceding six months has been, a parent, guardian, or foster parent. This
section is not intended to limit the authority or duty of a law enforcement
officer to report, testify, or be examined as authorized or required by this
chapter, or to perform other official duties as a law enforcement officer.

---
END ---