BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the statutory law governing the elements of adverse
possession should be explicitly stated in the statute in order to allow people
to more clearly understand property rights in this state. Section 2 of this
act sets forth the common law elements presently required in Washington before a
claim for adverse possession of real property will be granted. The legislature
intends to add the element of "honest belief" to the common law
elements of adverse possession, which are: Actual, open, notorious, exclusive,
hostile, and continuous possession. The legislature intends that prior to
taking property from the true owner, the adverse possessor must hold an honest
belief that he or she is the true owner of the property in question.

The
provisions of this section are not intended to change any of the statutory law
or common law elements of adverse possession relating to colorable title or
payment of taxes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) A
person may acquire title to real property by adverse possession only if:

(a)
The person has maintained actual, open, notorious, exclusive, hostile, and
continuous possession of the property for the period set forth in RCW 4.16.020;

(b)
At the time the person claiming by adverse possession first entered into
possession of the property, the person entering into possession had the honest
belief that he or she was the actual owner of the property and that belief:

(i)
By the person continued throughout the vesting period;

(ii)
Had an objective basis; and

(iii)
Was reasonable under the particular circumstances; and

(c)
The person proves each of the elements set forth in this section by clear and
convincing evidence.

(2)
A person maintains hostile possession of property if the possession is adverse
to that of the true owner.

(3)
The adverse possessor obtains the same interest in the property that the person
who owned the present possessory estate held when the adverse possession began.

(4)
If a person is claiming property under this section by utilizing the interests
of a predecessor in interest, that predecessor in interest must also have met
the requirements of subsection (1)(a), (b), and (c) of this section.

(5)
This section applies to civil actions filed on or after July 1, 1999.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3.
Sections 1 and 2 of this act are each added to chapter 7.28 RCW.

---
END ---