BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
49.60.010 and 1997 c 271 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

This
chapter shall be known as the "law against discrimination". It is an
exercise of the police power of the state for the protection of the public
welfare, health, and peace of the people of this state, and in fulfillment of
the provisions of the Constitution of this state concerning civil rights. The
legislature hereby finds and declares that practices of discrimination against
any of its inhabitants because of race, creed, color, national origin, families
with children, sex, marital status, age, or the presence of any sensory,
mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service
animal by a disabled person are a matter of state concern, that such
discrimination threatens not only the rights and proper privileges of its
inhabitants but menaces the institutions and foundation of a free democratic
state. A state agency is herein created with powers with respect to
elimination and prevention of discrimination in employment, in credit and
insurance transactions, in places of public resort, accommodation, or
amusement, and in real property transactions because of race, creed, color,
national origin, families with children, sex, marital status, age, or the
presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained
dog guide or service animal by a disabled person; and the commission
established hereunder is hereby given general jurisdiction and power for such
purposes.

Creating
and maintaining employment environments that are free of discrimination is of
vital concern to the people of this state. The legislature finds and declares
that all employees are entitled to a workplace that is free from
discrimination. The legislature finds there are significant economic and
social costs resulting from employment discrimination. The legislature finds
that a workplace free from discrimination is of significant benefit to
employers and that educating and training employers and employees about the
types of actions that constitute discrimination continues to be important.

Sec.
2. RCW
49.60.040 and 1997 c 271 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"Person" includes one or more individuals, partnerships,
associations, organizations, corporations, cooperatives, legal representatives,
trustees and receivers, or any group of persons; it includes any owner, lessee,
proprietor, manager, agent, or employee, whether one or more natural persons;
and further includes any political or civil subdivisions of the state and any
agency or instrumentality of the state or of any political or civil subdivision
thereof;

(2)
"Commission" means the Washington state human rights commission;

(3)
"Employer" includes any person acting in the interest of an employer,
directly or indirectly, who employs ((eight)) one or more
persons, and does not include any religious ((or sectarian organization not
organized for private profit)) corporation, association, educational
institution, or society only with respect to the employment of individuals of a
particular religion to perform work connected with the carrying on by such
corporation, association, educational institution, or society of its activities;

(4)
"Employee" does not include any individual employed by his or her
parents, spouse, or child, or in the domestic service of any person;

(5)
"Labor organization" includes any organization which exists for the
purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing with employers concerning grievances
or terms or conditions of employment, or for other mutual aid or protection in
connection with employment;

(6)
"Employment agency" includes any person undertaking with or without
compensation to recruit, procure, refer, or place employees for an employer;

(7)
"Marital status" means the legal status of being married, single,
separated, divorced, or widowed;

(8)
"National origin" includes "ancestry";

(9)
"Full enjoyment of" includes the right to purchase any service,
commodity, or article of personal property offered or sold on, or by, any
establishment to the public, and the admission of any person to accommodations,
advantages, facilities, or privileges of any place of public resort,
accommodation, assemblage, or amusement, without acts directly or indirectly
causing persons of any particular race, creed, color, sex, national origin, or
with any sensory, mental, or physical disability, or the use of a trained dog
guide or service animal by a disabled person, to be treated as not welcome,
accepted, desired, or solicited;

(10)
"Any place of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement"
includes, but is not limited to, any place, licensed or unlicensed, kept for
gain, hire, or reward, or where charges are made for admission, service,
occupancy, or use of any property or facilities, whether conducted for the
entertainment, housing, or lodging of transient guests, or for the benefit,
use, or accommodation of those seeking health, recreation, or rest, or for the
burial or other disposition of human remains, or for the sale of goods,
merchandise, services, or personal property, or for the rendering of personal
services, or for public conveyance or transportation on land, water, or in the
air, including the stations and terminals thereof and the garaging of vehicles,
or where food or beverages of any kind are sold for consumption on the
premises, or where public amusement, entertainment, sports, or recreation of
any kind is offered with or without charge, or where medical service or care is
made available, or where the public gathers, congregates, or assembles for
amusement, recreation, or public purposes, or public halls, public elevators,
and public washrooms of buildings and structures occupied by two or more
tenants, or by the owner and one or more tenants, or any public library or
educational institution, or schools of special instruction, or nursery schools,
or day care centers or children's camps: PROVIDED, That nothing contained in
this definition shall be construed to include or apply to any institute, bona
fide club, or place of accommodation, which is by its nature distinctly
private, including fraternal organizations, though where public use is
permitted that use shall be covered by this chapter; nor shall anything
contained in this definition apply to any educational facility, columbarium,
crematory, mausoleum, or cemetery operated or maintained by a bona fide
religious or sectarian institution;

(11)
"Real property" includes buildings, structures, dwellings, real
estate, lands, tenements, leaseholds, interests in real estate cooperatives,
condominiums, and hereditaments, corporeal and incorporeal, or any interest
therein;

(12)
"Real estate transaction" includes the sale, appraisal, brokering,
exchange, purchase, rental, or lease of real property, transacting or applying
for a real estate loan, or the provision of brokerage services;

(13)
"Dwelling" means any building, structure, or portion thereof that is
occupied as, or designed or intended for occupancy as, a residence by one or
more families, and any vacant land that is offered for sale or lease for the
construction or location thereon of any such building, structure, or portion
thereof;

(14)
"Sex" means gender;

(15)
"Aggrieved person" means any person who: (a) Claims to have been
injured by an unfair practice in a real estate transaction; or (b) believes that
he or she will be injured by an unfair practice in a real estate transaction
that is about to occur;

(16)
"Complainant" means the person who files a complaint in a real estate
transaction;

(17)
"Respondent" means any person accused in a complaint or amended
complaint of an unfair practice in a real estate transaction;

(18)
"Credit transaction" includes any open or closed end credit
transaction, whether in the nature of a loan, retail installment transaction,
credit card issue or charge, or otherwise, and whether for personal or for
business purposes, in which a service, finance, or interest charge is imposed,
or which provides for repayment in scheduled payments, when such credit is
extended in the regular course of any trade or commerce, including but not
limited to transactions by banks, savings and loan associations or other
financial lending institutions of whatever nature, stock brokers, or by a
merchant or mercantile establishment which as part of its ordinary business
permits or provides that payment for purchases of property or service therefrom
may be deferred;

(19)
"Families with children status" means one or more individuals who
have not attained the age of eighteen years being domiciled with a parent or
another person having legal custody of such individual or individuals, or with
the designee of such parent or other person having such legal custody, with the
written permission of such parent or other person. Families with children
status also applies to any person who is pregnant or is in the process of
securing legal custody of any individual who has not attained the age of
eighteen years;

(20)
"Covered multifamily dwelling" means: (a) Buildings consisting of
four or more dwelling units if such buildings have one or more elevators; and
(b) ground floor dwelling units in other buildings consisting of four or more
dwelling units;

(21)
"Premises" means the interior or exterior spaces, parts, components,
or elements of a building, including individual dwelling units and the public
and common use areas of a building;

(22)
"Dog guide" means a dog that is trained for the purpose of guiding
blind persons or a dog that is trained for the purpose of assisting hearing
impaired persons;

(23)
"Service animal" means an animal that is trained for the purpose of
assisting or accommodating a disabled person's sensory, mental, or physical
disability.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 49.60 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The commission shall make available an informational brochure designed to help
employers engage in employment without discrimination. The commission may
utilize existing informational materials with any changes necessary to reflect
the policies embodied in chapter . . ., Laws of 1999 (this
act). The commission is encouraged to consult with representatives of small
business to ensure that the brochure is useful and practical to employers of
seven or fewer employees.

(2)
The commission shall hold educational seminars throughout the state to explain
to interested employers how to engage in employment without discrimination.

(3)
The commission may charge fees to participants for the services required to be
provided under this section. The fees shall be sufficient to cover the costs
of the programs and materials offered.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---