BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 74.15 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Every licensed child day-care center and family day-care provider shall, at the
time of licensure or renewal and at any inspection, provide to the department
proof that the licensee has day-care insurance as defined in RCW 48.88.020 or
for day-care centers, is self-insured pursuant to chapter 48.90 RCW. Liability
limits under this section shall be the same as set forth in RCW 48.88.050.

(2)
The licensee shall notify the department when coverage has been terminated.
The licensee shall post at the day care, in a manner likely to be observed by
patrons, notice that coverage has lapsed or been terminated. Within thirty
days of lapse or termination, the licensee shall obtain from the parent an
affidavit or declaration signed by him or her that states he or she has been
informed coverage has lapsed or terminated.

(3)
The department may take action as provided in RCW 74.15.130 if the licensee
fails to maintain in full force and effect the insurance required by this
section.

(4)
This section applies to child day-care centers and family day-care providers
holding licenses, initial licenses, and probationary licenses under this
chapter.

(5)
A child day-care center or family day-care provider holding a license under
this chapter on the effective date of this act is not required to be in
compliance with this section until the time of renewal of the license or until
January 1, 2000, whichever is sooner.

(6)
In lieu of day-care insurance, family day-care providers shall maintain a file
of affidavits or declarations signed by each parent with a child enrolled in
family day care. The affidavit or declaration shall state that the parent has
been informed that the family day-care provider does not carry day-care
insurance and that the parent has been informed that the day-care insurance, if
any, of the owner of the property or the homeowners' association, as
appropriate, may not provide coverage for losses arising out of, or in
connection with, the operation of the family day-care provider, except to the
extent that the losses are caused by, or result from, an action or omission by
the owner of the property or the homeowners' association, for which the owner
of the property or the homeowners' association would otherwise be liable under
the law. These affidavits or declarations shall be on a form provided by the
department and shall be reviewed at each licensing inspection.

(7)
Noncompliance or compliance with the provisions of this section shall not
constitute evidence of liability or nonliability in any injury litigation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act takes effect January 1, 2000.

---
END ---