BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that consumers of child care services have a legitimate
interest in receiving timely information about child care service providers in
order to make meaningful choices regarding the facilities and people who
provide care for their children.

The
legislature finds that parents often do not receive timely information about
enforcement actions when complaints are made alleging serious issues affecting
the health or safety of children. The legislature intends to utilize the
state's improved ability to collect and manage information about child care
service providers by requiring that all relevant licensing actions and
enforcement actions be reported to appropriate individuals and organizations in
a timely manner.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 74.15 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Every child day-care center and family day-care provider shall prominently post
the following items, clearly visible to parents and staff:

(a)
The license issued under this chapter;

(b)
The notice of any pending enforcement action. The notice must be posted
immediately upon receipt. The notice must be posted for at least two weeks or
until the violation causing the enforcement action is corrected, whichever is
longer;

(c)
A notice that inspection reports and any notices of enforcement actions for the
previous three years are available from the licensee and the department; and

(d)
Any other information required by the department.

(2)
The department shall disclose, upon request, the receipt, general nature, and
resolution or current status of all complaints on record with the department
after the effective date of this act against a child day-care center or family
day-care provider that result in an enforcement action.

This
section shall not be construed to require the disclosure of any information that
is exempt from public disclosure under chapter 42.17 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 74.15 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Every child day-care center and family day-care provider shall have readily
available for review by the department, parents, and the public a copy of each
inspection report and notice of enforcement action received by the center or
provider from the department for the past three years. This subsection only
applies to reports and notices received on or after the effective date of this
act.

(2)
The department shall make available to the public during business hours all
inspection reports and notices of enforcement actions involving child day-care
centers and family day-care providers consistent with chapter 42.17 RCW. The
department shall include in the inspection report a statement of the corrective
measures taken by the center or provider.

Sec.
4. RCW
74.15.130 and 1998 c 314 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
An agency may be denied a license, or any license issued pursuant to chapter
74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031 may be suspended, revoked, modified, or not renewed
by the secretary upon proof (a) that the agency has failed or refused to comply
with the provisions of chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031 or the requirements
promulgated pursuant to the provisions of chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031;
or (b) that the conditions required for the issuance of a license under chapter
74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031 have ceased to exist with respect to such
licenses. RCW 43.20A.205 governs notice of a license denial, revocation,
suspension, or modification and provides the right to an adjudicative
proceeding.

(2)
In any adjudicative proceeding regarding the denial, modification, suspension,
or revocation of a foster family home license, the department's decision shall
be upheld if there is reasonable cause to believe that:

(a)
The applicant or licensee lacks the character, suitability, or competence to
care for children placed in out-of-home care, however, no unfounded report of
child abuse or neglect may be used to deny employment or a license;

(b)
The applicant or licensee has failed or refused to comply with any provision of
chapter 74.15 RCW, RCW 74.13.031, or the requirements adopted pursuant to such
provisions; or

(c)
The conditions required for issuance of a license under chapter 74.15 RCW and
RCW 74.13.031 have ceased to exist with respect to such licenses.

(3)
In any adjudicative proceeding regarding the denial, modification, suspension,
or revocation of any license under this chapter, other than a foster family
home license, the department's decision shall be upheld if it is supported by a
preponderance of the evidence.

(4)
The department may assess civil monetary penalties upon proof that an agency
has failed or refused to comply with the rules adopted under the provisions of
this chapter and RCW 74.13.031 or that an agency subject to licensing under
this chapter and RCW 74.13.031 is operating without a license except that civil
monetary penalties shall not be levied against a licensed foster home.
Monetary penalties levied against unlicensed agencies that submit an
application for licensure within thirty days of notification and subsequently
become licensed will be forgiven. These penalties may be assessed in addition
to or in lieu of other disciplinary actions. Civil monetary penalties, if
imposed, may be assessed and collected, with interest, for each day an agency
is or was out of compliance. Civil monetary penalties shall not exceed
seventy-five dollars per violation for a family day-care home and two hundred
fifty dollars per violation for group homes, child day-care centers, and
child-placing agencies. Each day upon which the same or substantially similar
action occurs is a separate violation subject to the assessment of a separate
penalty. The department shall provide a notification period before a monetary
penalty is effective and may forgive the penalty levied if the agency comes
into compliance during this period. The department may suspend, revoke, or not
renew a license for failure to pay a civil monetary penalty it has assessed
pursuant to this chapter within ten days after such assessment becomes final.
Chapter 43.20A RCW governs notice of a civil monetary penalty and provides the
right of an adjudicative proceeding. The preponderance of evidence standard
shall apply in adjudicative proceedings related to assessment of civil monetary
penalties.

(5)(a)
The department may place a child day-care center or family day-care provider on
nonreferral status or stop placement status if the center or provider has
failed or refused to comply with this chapter or rules adopted under this
chapter and an enforcement action has been taken. The nonreferral status or
stop placement status may continue until the department determines that: (i)
No enforcement action is appropriate; (ii) a complaint is not founded or valid;
or (iii) a corrective action plan has been successfully concluded. The
department shall then remove the center or provider from nonreferral status and
provide appropriate notice to the public and private child care resource and
referral agencies.

(b)
The department shall notify appropriate public and private child care resource
and referral agencies of the department's decision to take an enforcement
action against the center or provider.

(6)
Whenever an enforcement action is taken, the department shall notify the agency
subject to the action in writing by certified mail within two business days.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 74.15 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall compile an annual report summarizing all enforcement
actions for the previous fiscal year relating to children in the care of child
day-care centers and family day-care providers. The report must be provided to
the legislature, the child care coordinating committee, and child care resource
and referral agencies by August 1st of each year beginning in 2000.

(2)
The report must include, at a minimum: (a) An analysis of the volume and
general nature of all reports and disclosures made by the department as required
or authorized under section 2 of this act; (b) an analysis of the volume and
general nature of the enforcement actions, pending complaint investigations,
and ongoing corrective action plans for which the department placed centers and
providers on nonreferral or stop placement status under section 3 of this act;
(c) an analysis of the volume and general nature of complaints determined to be
invalid, inconclusive, or unfounded; and (d) information about the average
length of time required by the department to complete investigations determined
to be (i) founded or valid, (ii) inconclusive, and (iii) invalid or unfounded.

Sec.
6. RCW
74.15.020 and 1999 c 267 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

For
the purpose of chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031, and unless otherwise
clearly indicated by the context thereof, the following terms shall mean:

(1)
"Adverse licensing action" means a denial, suspension, revocation,
modification, or nonrenewal of a license pursuant to RCW 74.15.130, or issuance
of a probationary license pursuant to RCW 74.15.125.

(2)
"Agency" means any person, firm, partnership, association,
corporation, or facility which receives children, expectant mothers, or persons
with developmental disabilities for control, care, or maintenance outside their
own homes, or which places, arranges the placement of, or assists in the
placement of children, expectant mothers, or persons with developmental
disabilities for foster care or placement of children for adoption, and shall
include the following irrespective of whether there is compensation to the
agency or to the children, expectant mothers or persons with developmental
disabilities for services rendered:

(a)
"Child day-care center" means an agency which regularly provides care
for a group of children for periods of less than twenty-four hours;

(b)
"Child-placing agency" means an agency which places a child or
children for temporary care, continued care, or for adoption;

(c)
"Community facility" means a group care facility operated for the
care of juveniles committed to the department under RCW 13.40.185. A county
detention facility that houses juveniles committed to the department under RCW
13.40.185 pursuant to a contract with the department is not a community facility;

(d)
"Crisis residential center" means an agency which is a temporary
protective residential facility operated to perform the duties specified in
chapter 13.32A RCW, in the manner provided in RCW 74.13.032 through 74.13.036;

(e)
"Family day-care provider" means a child day-care provider who
regularly provides child day care for not more than twelve children in the
provider's home in the family living quarters;

(f)
"Foster-family home" means an agency which regularly provides care on
a twenty-four hour basis to one or more children, expectant mothers, or persons
with developmental disabilities in the family abode of the person or persons
under whose direct care and supervision the child, expectant mother, or person
with a developmental disability is placed;

(g)
"Group-care facility" means an agency, other than a foster-family
home, which is maintained and operated for the care of a group of children on a
twenty-four hour basis;

(h)
"HOPE center" means an agency licensed by the secretary to provide temporary
residential placement and other services to street youth. A street youth may
remain in a HOPE center for thirty days while services are arranged and
permanent placement is coordinated. No street youth may stay longer than
thirty days unless approved by the department and any additional days approved
by the department must be based on the unavailability of a long-term placement
option. A street youth whose parent wants him or her returned to home may
remain in a HOPE center until his or her parent arranges return of the youth,
not longer. All other street youth must have court approval under chapter
13.34 or 13.32A RCW to remain in a HOPE center up to thirty days;

(i)
"Maternity service" means an agency which provides or arranges for
care or services to expectant mothers, before or during confinement, or which
provides care as needed to mothers and their infants after confinement;

(j)
"Responsible living skills program" means an agency licensed by the
secretary that provides residential and transitional living services to persons
ages sixteen to eighteen who are dependent under chapter 13.34 RCW and who have
been unable to live in his or her legally authorized residence and, as a
result, the minor lived outdoors or in another unsafe location not intended for
occupancy by the minor. Dependent minors ages fourteen and fifteen may be
eligible if no other placement alternative is available and the department
approves the placement;

(k)
"Service provider" means the entity that operates a community facility.

(((2)))
(3) "Agency" shall not include the following:

(a)
Persons related to the child, expectant mother, or person with developmental
disability in the following ways:

(i)
Any blood relative, including those of half-blood, and including first cousins,
nephews or nieces, and persons of preceding generations as denoted by prefixes
of grand, great, or great-great;

(ii)
Stepfather, stepmother, stepbrother, and stepsister;

(iii)
A person who legally adopts a child or the child's parent as well as the
natural and other legally adopted children of such persons, and other relatives
of the adoptive parents in accordance with state law;

(iv)
Spouses of any persons named in (i), (ii), or (iii) of this subsection (2)(a),
even after the marriage is terminated; or

(v)
Extended family members, as defined by the law or custom of the Indian child's
tribe or, in the absence of such law or custom, a person who has reached the
age of eighteen and who is the Indian child's grandparent, aunt or uncle,
brother or sister, brother-in-law or sister-in-law, niece or nephew, first or
second cousin, or stepparent who provides care in the family abode on a
twenty-four-hour basis to an Indian child as defined in 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1903(4);

(b)
Persons who are legal guardians of the child, expectant mother, or persons with
developmental disabilities;

(c)
Persons who care for a neighbor's or friend's child or children, with or
without compensation, where: (i) The person providing care for periods of less
than twenty-four hours does not conduct such activity on an ongoing, regularly
scheduled basis for the purpose of engaging in business, which includes, but is
not limited to, advertising such care; or (ii) the parent and person providing
care on a twenty-four-hour basis have agreed to the placement in writing and
the state is not providing any payment for the care;

(d)
Parents on a mutually cooperative basis exchange care of one another's
children;

(e)
A person, partnership, corporation, or other entity that provides placement or
similar services to exchange students or international student exchange
visitors or persons who have the care of an exchange student in their home;

(f)
Nursery schools or kindergartens which are engaged primarily in educational
work with preschool children and in which no child is enrolled on a regular
basis for more than four hours per day;

(g)
Schools, including boarding schools, which are engaged primarily in education,
operate on a definite school year schedule, follow a stated academic
curriculum, accept only school-age children and do not accept custody of
children;

(h)
Seasonal camps of three months' or less duration engaged primarily in
recreational or educational activities;

(i)
Hospitals licensed pursuant to chapter 70.41 RCW when performing functions
defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, nursing homes licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW
and boarding homes licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW;

(j)
Licensed physicians or lawyers;

(k)
Facilities providing care to children for periods of less than twenty-four
hours whose parents remain on the premises to participate in activities other
than employment;

(l)
Facilities approved and certified under chapter 71A.22 RCW;

(m)
Any agency having been in operation in this state ten years prior to June 8,
1967, and not seeking or accepting moneys or assistance from any state or
federal agency, and is supported in part by an endowment or trust fund;

(n)
Persons who have a child in their home for purposes of adoption, if the child
was placed in such home by a licensed child-placing agency, an authorized
public or tribal agency or court or if a replacement report has been filed
under chapter 26.33 RCW and the placement has been approved by the court;

(o)
An agency operated by any unit of local, state, or federal government or an
agency, located within the boundaries of a federally recognized Indian
reservation, licensed by the Indian tribe;

(p)
An agency located on a federal military reservation, except where the military
authorities request that such agency be subject to the licensing requirements
of this chapter.

(((3)))
(4) "Department" means the state department of social and
health services.

(((4)))
(5) "Enforcement action" means any disciplinary action taken by
the department including:

(a)
An adverse licensing action;

(b)
Issuance of a deficiency statement, notification of a violation, or licensing
compliance plan;

(c)
A protective action including removal of a child or initiation of court
proceedings; or

(d)
Imposition of a civil penalty.

(6)
"Probationary license" means a license issued as a disciplinary
measure to an agency that has previously been issued a full license but is out
of compliance with licensing standards.

(7)
"Referent" means a person or agency who brings to the attention of
the department a complaint or information resulting in an investigation or
enforcement action.

(8)
"Juvenile" means a person under the age of twenty-one who has been
sentenced to a term of confinement under the supervision of the department
under RCW 13.40.185.

(((5)
"Probationary license" means a license issued as a disciplinary
measure to an agency that has previously been issued a full license but is out
of compliance with licensing standards.

(6))) (9)
"Requirement" means any rule, regulation, or standard of care to be
maintained by an agency.

(((7)))
(10) "Secretary" means the secretary of social and health
services.

(((8)))
(11) "Street youth" means a person under the age of eighteen
who lives outdoors or in another unsafe location not intended for occupancy by
the minor and who is not residing with his or her parent or at his or her
legally authorized residence.

(((9)))
(12) "Transitional living services" means at a minimum, to the
extent funds are available, the following:

(a)
Educational services, including basic literacy and computational skills
training, either in local alternative or public high schools or in a high
school equivalency program that leads to obtaining a high school equivalency
degree;

(b)
Assistance and counseling related to obtaining vocational training or higher
education, job readiness, job search assistance, and placement programs;

(c)
Counseling and instruction in life skills such as money management, home
management, consumer skills, parenting, health care, access to community
resources, and transportation and housing options;

(d)
Individual and group counseling; and

(e)
Establishing networks with federal agencies and state and local organizations
such as the United States department of labor, employment and training
administration programs including the job training partnership act which
administers private industry councils and the job corps; vocational
rehabilitation; and volunteer programs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
department of social and health services shall adopt rules as necessary to
implement sections 2 through 5 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
new section is added to chapter 74.15 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall establish and maintain a toll-free telephone number, and
an electronic on-line system for communication of information regarding child
day-care centers and family day-care providers. This number shall be available
during standard business hours and during nonbusiness hours callers shall be
able to leave messages. The number shall be published in reasonably available
printed and electronic media. The number shall be easily identifiable as a
number for communication of information as set forth in this section.

(2)
All licensed child day-care centers and family day-care providers shall post in
a place and manner clearly visible to patrons and visitors the department's
toll-free telephone number. Parents or guardians must be given the
department's toll-free telephone number by employees or operators of the child
day-care centers and family day-care providers.

(3)(a)
The department shall make a preliminary review of the complaint and investigate
any complaint within its authority unless the department determines that: (i)
The complaint is intended to willfully harass a licensee or employee of a
licensee; or (ii) there is no reasonable basis for investigation; or (iii)
corrective action has been taken as determined by the department.

(b)
The department shall refer complaints to the appropriate state agencies, law
enforcement agencies, the attorney general, or other entities if the department
lacks authority to investigate or if its investigation reveals that a follow-up
referral to one or more of these entities is appropriate.

(4)
For the purposes of this section, "communication of information"
means callers may: (a) Determine whether a day care is licensed; (b) determine
whether a day care is in good standing regarding licensing requirements; (c)
determine the general nature of enforcement against the providers; (d) obtain
information on how to report suspected or observed noncompliance with licensing
requirements; (e) obtain information on how to report alleged abuse or neglect
in a day care; (f) obtain information on how to report health, safety, and
welfare concerns in a day care; (g) receive follow-up assistance, including
information on the office of the family and children's ombudsman; and (h)
receive referral information on other agencies or entities that may be of
further assistance to the caller.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. A
new section is added to chapter 74.15 RCW to read as follows:

If a family day-care provider does not have day care insurance as
defined in RCW 48.88.020, the provider shall maintain a file of affidavits or
declarations signed by each parent with a child enrolled in family day care.
The affidavit or declaration shall state that the parent has been informed that
the family day-care provider does not carry day-care insurance and that the
parent has been informed that the day-care insurance, if any, of the owner of
the property or the homeowners' association, as appropriate, may not provide
coverage for losses arising out of, or in connection with, the operation of the
family day-care provider, except to the extent that the losses are caused by,
or result from, an action or omission by the owner of the property or the
homeowners' association, for which the owner of the property or the homeowners'
association would otherwise be liable under the law.

---
END ---