BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
77.16.360 and 1997 c 1 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 77.12.240 ((and 77.12.265)) or
other provisions of law, it is unlawful to take, hunt, or attract black bear
with the aid of bait.

(a)
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the killing of black
bear with the aid of bait by employees or agents of county, state, or federal
agencies while acting in their official capacities for the purpose of
protecting livestock, domestic animals, private property, or the public safety.

(b)
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prevent the establishment and
operation of feeding stations for black bear in order to prevent damage to
commercial timberland.

(c)
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the director from
issuing a permit or memorandum of understanding to a public agency, university,
or scientific or educational institution for the use of bait to attract black
bear for scientific purposes.

(d)
As used in this subsection, "bait" means a substance placed, exposed,
deposited, distributed, scattered, or otherwise used for the purpose of
attracting black bears to an area where one or more persons hunt or intend to
hunt them.

(2)
Notwithstanding RCW 77.12.240 or any other provisions of law, it is unlawful to
hunt or pursue black bear, cougar, bobcat, or lynx with the aid of a dog or
dogs.

(a)
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the killing of black
bear, cougar, bobcat, or lynx with the aid of a dog or dogs by employees or
agents of county, state, or federal agencies while acting in their official
capacities for the purpose of protecting livestock, domestic animals, private
property, or the public safety. ((A dog or dogs may be used by the owner or
tenant of real property consistent with a permit issued and conditioned by the
director under RCW 77.12.265.))

(b)
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the director from
issuing a permit or memorandum of understanding to a public agency, university,
or scientific or educational institution for the use of a dog or dogs for the
pursuit of black bear, cougar, bobcat, or lynx for scientific purposes.

(c)
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit a county legislative
authority from authorizing or allowing a person to hunt cougar with dogs on
real property located within the county. Prior to adopting such an ordinance,
the county legislative authority must provide full legal notice of a public
meeting, and hold a public hearing to take testimony from interested persons
concerning the proposed ordinance.

(3) A person who violates subsection (1) or (2) of this section is
guilty of a gross misdemeanor. In addition to appropriate criminal penalties,
the director shall revoke the hunting license of a person who violates
subsection (1) or (2) of this section and a hunting license shall not be issued
for a period of five years following the revocation. Following a subsequent
violation of subsection (1) or (2) of this section by the same person, a
hunting license shall not be issued to the person at any time.

---
END ---