BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
7.43.080 and 1988 c 141 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, if the existence of the
nuisance is established in the action, an order of abatement shall be entered
as part of the final judgment in the case. Plaintiff's costs in the action,
including those of abatement, are a lien upon the building or unit within a
building. The lien is enforceable and collectible by execution issued by order
of the court.

(2) If the court finds and concludes that the owner of the building
or unit within a building: (a) Had no knowledge of the existence of the
nuisance or has been making reasonable efforts to abate the nuisance, (b) has
not been guilty of any contempt of court in the proceedings, and (c) will
immediately abate any such nuisance that may exist at the building or unit within
a building ((and prevent it from being a nuisance within a period of one
year thereafter)), the court shall, if satisfied of the owner's good faith,
order the building or unit within a building to be delivered to the owner, and
no order of abatement shall be entered. If an order of abatement has been
entered and the owner subsequently meets the requirements of this subsection,
the order of abatement shall be canceled.

---
END ---