BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART
I

GENERAL PROVISIONS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 101.
INTENT. It is the intent of the legislature in adopting this
act to provide the necessary revenues for the support of health care for
citizens of this state.

PART
II

DEFINITIONS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 201.
INTRODUCTORY. The definitions in this chapter apply throughout this
title unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 202.
ADJUSTED GROSS INCOME. "Adjusted gross income" means adjusted gross
income as determined under the internal revenue code.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 203.
DEPARTMENT. "Department" means the state department of revenue.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 204.
DIRECTOR. "Director" means the director of revenue.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 205.
FEDERAL BASE INCOME. "Federal base income" means adjusted gross
income.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 206.
INDIVIDUAL. "Individual" means a natural person.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 207.
INTERNAL REVENUE CODE. "Internal revenue code" means the federal
internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, as existing on January 1, 1999.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 208.
PERSON. "Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 209.
RESIDENT. "Resident" includes an individual who:

(1)
Has resided in this state for the entire tax year;

(2)
Is domiciled in this state unless the individual:

(a)
Does not maintain a permanent place of abode in this state;

(b)
Does not maintain a permanent place of abode elsewhere;

(c)
Spends in the aggregate not more than thirty days in the tax year in this
state;

(3)
Is not domiciled in this state, but maintains a permanent place of abode in
this state and spends in the aggregate more than one hundred eighty-three days
of the tax year in this state unless the individual proves that the individual
is in the state only for temporary or transitory purposes; or

(4)
Claims the state of Washington as the individual's tax home for federal income
tax purposes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 210.
TAXABLE INCOME. "Taxable income" means federal base income as
modified under sections 401 through 408 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 211.
TAXABLE YEAR. "Taxable year" means the taxpayer's taxable year as
defined under the internal revenue code.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 212.
TAXPAYER. "Taxpayer" means a person receiving income subject to tax
under this title.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 213.
DEFINITION OF TERMS GENERALLY. Except as provided in this chapter, any term
used in this title has the same meaning as when used in a comparable context in
the internal revenue code.

PART
III

DETERMINATION
OF TAX

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 301. TAX
IMPOSED‑-RATE. A tax is imposed at the rate of 1.0 percent on all
taxable income of each person for each taxable year. The state treasurer, upon
receipt of any payments of tax, penalty, interest, or fees collected under this
title, shall deposit them to the credit of the health services account created
under RCW 43.72.900.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 302.
CREDIT FOR INCOME TAXES DUE ANOTHER JURISDICTION. (1) A resident individual is
allowed a credit against the tax imposed under this title for the amount of any
income tax imposed by another state, foreign country, or political subdivision
thereof on income taxed under this title, subject to the following conditions:

(a)
The credit is allowed only for taxes imposed by the other jurisdiction on net
income from sources within that jurisdiction; and

(b)
The amount of the credit may not exceed the smaller of:

(i)
The amount of tax paid to the other jurisdiction on net income from sources
within the other jurisdiction; or

(ii)
The amount of tax due under this title multiplied by a fraction. The numerator
of the fraction is the portion of the taxpayer's adjusted gross income subject
to tax in the other jurisdiction. The denominator of the fraction is the
taxpayer's taxable income. The fraction may not be greater than one.

(2)
If, in lieu of a credit similar to the credit allowed under subsection (1) of
this section, the laws of the taxpayer's place of residence contain a provision
exempting a resident of this state from liability for the payment of income
taxes on income earned for personal services performed in that place, then the
director may enter into a reciprocal agreement with that place providing a
similar tax exemption for its residents on income earned for personal services
performed in this state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 303. DUAL
RESIDENCE. If an individual is regarded as a resident both of this state and
another jurisdiction for personal income tax purposes, the department shall
reduce the tax on that portion of the taxpayer's income that is subjected to
tax in both jurisdictions solely by virtue of dual residence, if the other
taxing jurisdiction allows a similar reduction. The reduction must equal the
lower of the two taxes applicable to the income taxed twice multiplied by a
fraction. The numerator of the fraction is the tax imposed by this state on
the income taxed twice. The denominator of the fraction is the tax imposed by
both jurisdictions on the income taxed twice. The fraction may not be greater
than one.

PART
IV

TAXABLE
INCOME MODIFICATIONS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 401.
INTRODUCTORY. In computing taxable income, modifications must be made to the
taxpayer's adjusted gross income as required under this chapter and chapter
82A.‑- RCW (sections 501 and 502 of this act), unless the modification
has the effect of duplicating an item of income or deduction.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 402. STATE
AND LOCAL BONDS. To adjusted gross income, add income that has been excluded
under section 103 of the internal revenue code in computing adjusted gross
income, except interest on obligations of the state of Washington or political
subdivisions of the state of Washington.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 403. STATE
AND LOCAL INCOME TAXES‑-BUSINESS AND OCCUPATION, PUBLIC UTILITY TAXES‑-NET
OPERATING LOSS. To adjusted gross income, add:

(1)
Taxes on or measured by net income that have been deducted under the internal
revenue code in computing federal base income; and

(2)
The amount of taxes paid that are deductible for federal purposes, but for
which a business and occupation tax credit or public utility tax credit, or
both, is allowed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 404.
PERSONAL DEDUCTION. There is allowed as a deduction from federal base income a
personal deduction equal to one hundred thousand dollars.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 405. NET
OPERATING LOSS. There is allowed as a deduction from federal base income the
amount of net operating loss as allowed in section 172 of the internal revenue
code. The calculation of the loss amount may reflect the modifications to
federal base income as provided in this title and a net operating loss
deduction may include a loss carried forward to the tax year but may not
include a loss carried back from a future year.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 406.
CARRYOVERS. To adjusted gross income, add amounts that have been deducted in
computing adjusted gross income to the extent the amounts have been carried
over from taxable years ending before the effective date of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 407. FEDERAL
BONDS. From adjusted gross income, deduct, to the extent included in adjusted
gross income, income derived from obligations of the United States that this
state is prohibited by federal law from subjecting to a net income tax.
However, the amount deducted under this section must be reduced by any expense,
including amortizable bond premium, incurred in the production of the income to
the extent the expense has been deducted in calculating adjusted gross income.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 408. TAX
RETURNS FOR FRACTIONAL YEAR. If the first taxable year of a taxpayer with
respect to which a tax is imposed by this title ends before December 31, 1999,
referred to in this section as a "fractional taxable year," the taxable
income for the fractional taxable year must be the taxpayer's taxable income
for the entire taxable year, adjusted by one of the following methods, at the
taxpayer's election:

(1)
The taxable income must be multiplied by a fraction. The numerator of the
fraction is the number of days in the fractional taxable year. The denominator
of the fraction is the number of days in the entire taxable year; or

(2)
The taxable income must be adjusted, in accordance with rules adopted by the
department, so as to include only such income and be reduced only by such
deductions as can be clearly determined from the permanent records of the
taxpayer to be attributable to the fractional taxable year.

PART
V

DIVISION OF INCOME,
MODIFICATIONS, AND CREDITS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 501.
APPORTIONMENT AND ALLOCATION OF INCOME. (1) For resident individuals, all
income must be apportioned and allocated to this state.

(2)
For nonresident individuals, income derived from sources within this state must
be apportioned and allocated to this state. For the purposes of this title:

(a)
The adjusted gross income of a nonresident derived from sources within this
state is the net amount of income, gain, loss, and deduction of the
nonresident's federal adjusted gross income that are derived from or connected
with sources in this state including any distributive share of partnership
income and deductions, and share of estate or trust income and deductions,
including any unrelated business income of an otherwise tax exempt trust or
organization;

(b)
Items of income, gain, loss, and deductions derived from or connected with
sources within this state are those items attributable to the ownership or
disposition of any interest in real or tangible personal property in this
state, and a business, trade, profession, or occupation carried on within this
state. The department shall adopt rules to provide consistency of this section
with the excise tax provisions;

(c)
Deduction with respect to expenses, capital losses, and net operating losses
must be based solely on income, gains, losses, and deductions derived from or
connected with sources in this state but must otherwise be determined in the
same manner as the corresponding federal deduction except as provided in this
title;

(d)
Income from intangible personal property, including annuities, dividends,
interest, and gains from the disposition of intangible personal property,
constitutes income derived from sources within the state of Washington only to
the extent the income is from property employed in a business, trade,
profession, or occupation carried on within this state. However, distributed
and undistributed income of electing S corporations for federal tax purposes
derived from or connected with sources within this state is income derived from
sources within this state for a nonresident shareholder. A net operating loss
of the corporation does constitute a loss or deduction connected with sources
within this state for a nonresident shareholder;

(e)
Compensation paid by the United States for service in the armed forces of the
United States performed in this state by a nonresident does not constitute
income derived from sources within this state; and

(f)
If a business, trade, profession, or occupation is carried on partly within and
partly without this state, the determination of net income derived or connected
with sources within this state as provided in this section, must be made by
apportionment and allocation of chapter 82.56 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 502.
PARTNERSHIPS, S CORPORATIONS, AND LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANIES. (1) A
partnership is not subject to tax under this title. Partners are subject to
tax in their separate or individual capacities. The taxable incomes of
partners must be computed by including a share of the modifications under
sections 402 through 407 of this act and the credits allowed under sections 302
and 303 of this act, if the modification or credit relates to the income of the
partnership. A partner's share of a modification or credit is the amount of
modification or credit multiplied by a fraction. The numerator of the fraction
is the partner's distributive share of partnership income. The denominator of
the fraction is the total partnership income. The fraction may not be greater
than one.

(2)
An S corporation is not subject to tax under this title. Shareholders of S
corporations are subject to tax in their separate or individual capacities.
The taxable income of a shareholder of S corporations must be computed by
including a share of the modifications under sections 402 through 407 of this
act and the credits allowed under sections 302 and 303 of this act, if the
modification or credit relates to the income of the S corporation. A
shareholder's share of a modification or credit is the amount of modification
or credit multiplied by a fraction. The numerator of the fraction is the
shareholder's pro rata share of S corporation income. The denominator of the
fraction is the total S corporation income. The fraction may not be greater
than one.

(3)
A limited liability company is not subject to tax under this title. Members of
a limited liability company are subject to tax in their separate or individual
capacities. The taxable incomes of a member of a limited liability company
must be computed by including a share of the modifications under sections 402
through 407 of this act and the credits allowed under sections 302 and 303 of
this act, if the modification or credit relates to the income of the limited
liability company. A member's share of a modification or credit is the amount
of modification or credit multiplied by a fraction. The numerator of the
fraction is the member's distributive share of limited liability company. The
denominator of the fraction is the total limited liability company income. The
fraction may not be greater than one.

(4)
As used in this section:

(a)
"Pro rata share" means pro rata share as determined under section 1366(a)
of the internal revenue code;

(b)
"S corporation income" includes both distributed and undistributed
federal taxable income of the S corporation; and

(c)
"Shareholder" means a shareholder of an S corporation.

PART
VI

INCOME TAX‑-WITHHOLDING‑-ESTIMATED
TAX

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 601.
EMPLOYER WITHHOLDING‑-REQUIREMENTS. (1) An employer making a payment of
wages or salaries earned in this state, regardless of the place where the
payment is made, and who is required by the internal revenue code to withhold
taxes, shall deduct and withhold a tax as prescribed by rules adopted by the
department. The rules must reasonably reflect the annual tax liability of the
employee under this title. An employer making the deduction and withholding
shall furnish to the employee a record of the amount of tax deducted and
withheld from the employee on forms provided by the department.

(2)
If the employee is a resident of this state and earns income from personal
services entirely performed in another state that imposes an income tax on the
income, and the employer withholds income taxes under the laws of the state in
which the income is earned, the employer is not required to withhold tax
imposed by this title on the income if the laws of the state in which the
income is earned allow a similar exemption for its residents who earn income in
this state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 602.
LIABILITY OF EMPLOYER FOR TAX WITHHELD. A person required to deduct and
withhold the tax imposed by this title is liable for the payment of the amount
deducted and withheld to the department, and is not liable to any other person
for the amount of tax deducted and withheld under this title. The amount of
tax so deducted and withheld must be held to be a special fund in trust for
this state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 603.
WITHHOLDING BY GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY. If the employer is the United States, a
foreign country, or this state or any political subdivision thereof, or an
agency or instrumentality of any combination of the United States, a foreign
country, or this state or any political subdivision thereof, then the return of
the amount deducted and withheld upon wages or salaries may be made by an
officer of the employer having control of the payment of the wages and salaries
or appropriately designated for that purpose.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 604.
CREDIT FOR TAX WITHHELD‑-HOW CLAIMED. The amount deducted and withheld
as tax under sections 601 through 603 of this act during any taxable year is
allowed as a credit against the tax imposed for the taxable year by this
title. If the tax liability of an individual for taxes, interest, penalties,
or other amounts due the state of Washington is less than the total amount of
the credit that the individual is entitled under this section, the individual
is entitled to a refund in the amount of the excess of the credit over the tax
otherwise due. If an individual entitled to claim a credit under this section
is not otherwise required by this title to file a return, a refund may be
obtained in the amount of the credit by filing a return, with applicable
sections completed, to claim the refund. A credit or refund is not allowed
under this section unless the credit or refund is claimed on a return filed for
the taxable year for which the amount was deducted and withheld.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 605.
WITHHOLDING‑-FAILURE TO PAY OR COLLECT‑-PENALTIES. (1) The tax
required to be collected under this chapter by the employer is deemed to be
held in trust by the employer until paid to the department.

(2)
If an employer, or responsible person within the meaning of section 6672 of the
internal revenue code, fails to collect the tax imposed under this chapter or,
having collected the tax, fails to pay it to the department, the employer or
responsible person is nevertheless personally liable to the state for the
amount of the tax. The interest and penalty provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW
apply to this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 606.
ESTIMATED TAX IMPOSED‑-DUE DATE OF ESTIMATED TAXES‑-AMOUNT OF
ESTIMATED TAX‑-UNDERPAYMENT PENALTY. (1)

An
individual subject to taxation under this title who is required by the internal
revenue code to make payment of estimated taxes shall pay to the department on
forms prescribed by the department the estimated taxes due under this title.

(2)
The provisions of the internal revenue code relating to the determination of
reporting periods and due dates of payments of estimated tax apply to the
estimated tax payments due under this section.

(3)
The amount of the estimated tax is the annualized tax divided by the number of
months in the reporting period. An estimated tax is not due if the annualized
tax is less than five hundred dollars. RCW 82.32.050 and 82.32.090 apply to
underpayments of estimated tax, but do not apply to underpayments, as defined by
the internal revenue code, if the tax remitted to the department is either
ninety percent of the tax shown on the return or one hundred percent of the tax
shown on the previous year's tax return.

(4)
For the purposes of this section, "annualized tax" is the taxpayer's
projected tax liability for the tax year as computed under section 6654 of the
internal revenue code and the regulations thereunder.

PART
VII

CRIMES

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 701.
CRIMES. (1) A person who knowingly attempts to evade or defeat the tax imposed
under this title or payment of the tax is guilty of a class C felony as
provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(2)
A person required to collect tax imposed under this title who knowingly fails
to collect, truthfully account for, or pay over the tax is guilty of a class C
felony as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(3)
A person who knowingly fails to pay tax, pay estimated tax, make returns, keep
records, or supply information, as required under this title, is guilty of a
gross misdemeanor as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

PART
VIII

ADMINISTRATIVE
PROVISIONS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 801.
METHOD OF ACCOUNTING. (1) A taxpayer's method of accounting for purposes of
the tax imposed under this title must be the same as the taxpayer's method of
accounting for federal income tax purposes. If a method of accounting has not
been regularly used by a taxpayer for federal income tax purposes, tax due
under this title must be computed by a method of accounting that in the opinion
of the department fairly reflects income.

(2)
If a person's method of accounting is changed for federal income tax purposes,
it must be similarly changed for purposes of this title.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 802.
PERSONS REQUIRED TO FILE RETURNS. (1) A taxpayer shall file with the
department, on forms prescribed by the department, an income tax return for
each tax year. A person required to file a return under this title shall,
without assessment, notice, or demand, pay tax due under this title, to the
department on or before the date fixed for filing the return.

(2)
The department may adopt rules that require that certain taxpayers file, on
forms prescribed by the department, informational returns for any period. A
person required by rule to file an informational return shall, without
assessment, notice, or demand, pay any tax due under this title, to the
department on or before the date fixed for filing of the informational return.

(3)
In the event an adjustment to a taxpayer's federal return is made by the
taxpayer or the federal internal revenue service, the taxpayer shall, within
ninety days of the final determination of the adjustment by the federal
internal revenue service or within thirty days of the filing of a federal
return adjusted by the taxpayer, file a corrected return reflecting the
adjustments as finally determined or returned. The taxpayer shall pay
additional tax resulting from the finally determined internal revenue service
adjustment or a taxpayer adjustment without notice and assessment.
Notwithstanding any provision of this title or any other title to the contrary,
the period of limitations for the correction of an additional tax, interest,
and penalty due as a result of an adjustment by a taxpayer or a finally
determined internal revenue service adjustment begins at the later of thirty
days following the final determination of the adjustment or the date of the
filing of the corrected return.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 803. DUE
DATE FOR FILING A RETURN‑-EXTENSIONS‑-INTEREST AND PENALTIES. The
due date of a return required to be filed with the department is the due date
of the federal income tax return or informational return for federal income tax
purposes. The department may grant extensions of times by which a return
required to be filed by this title may be submitted. The department may also
grant extensions of time to pay tax with regard to taxes imposed by this
title. Interest at the rate specified in RCW 82.32.050 accrues during an
extension period and the interest and penalty provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW
apply to late payments and deficiencies. Notwithstanding the limitation of RCW
82.32.090, for a late filing of an informational return, there must be imposed
a penalty the amount of which shall be established in rules adopted by the
department. The penalty may not exceed fifty dollars per month for a maximum
of ten months. RCW 82.32.105 applies to this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 804. JOINT
RETURN. (1) If the federal income tax liabilities of both spouses are
determined on a joint federal return for the taxable year, the spouses shall
file a joint return under this title unless one spouse is a resident and the
other is a nonresident.

(2)
If neither spouse is required to file a federal income tax return for the
taxable year, the spouses may file a joint return under this title under the
same conditions under which a joint return may be filed for purposes of the
federal income tax.

(3)
If the federal income tax liability of either spouse is determined on a
separate federal return for the taxable year, the spouses shall file separate
returns under this title.

(4)
If one spouse is a resident and the other is a nonresident, the spouses shall
file separate returns under this title, unless they elect to determine their
tax liabilities under this title on a joint return as if they were both
residents and:

(a)
Their federal tax liability for the taxable year was determined on a joint
federal return; or

(b)
Neither spouse has filed a federal income tax return for the taxable year and
they would be permitted to file a joint federal return for the taxable year.

(5)
If a joint return is filed under this section, the liability of the husband and
wife is joint and several, unless the spouse is relieved of liability under
section 6013 of the internal revenue code.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 805.
RECORDS‑-RETURNS. (1) Every taxpayer, and every person, required to
deduct and withhold the tax imposed under this title shall keep records, render
statements, make returns, file reports, and perform other acts, as the
department requires by rule. A return must be made under penalty of perjury
and on forms prescribed by the department. The department may require that
other statements and reports be made under penalty of perjury and on forms
prescribed by the department. The department may require a taxpayer, and a
person, required to deduct and withhold the tax imposed under this title to
furnish to the department a correct copy of any return or document that the
taxpayer or person has filed with the internal revenue service or received from
the internal revenue service.

(2)
All books and records and other papers and documents required to be kept under
this title are subject to inspection by the department at all times during
business hours of the day.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 806.
ESTIMATION AGREEMENTS. The department may reasonably estimate the items of
business or nonbusiness income of a taxpayer having an office within the state
and one or more other states or foreign countries that may be apportioned or
allocated to the state and may enter into an estimation agreement with a
taxpayer for the determination of the taxpayer's liability for the tax imposed
by this title.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 807.
PROVISIONS OF INTERNAL REVENUE CODE CONTROL. (1) To the extent possible
without being inconsistent with this title, all of the internal revenue code
that relates to the following subjects apply to the taxes imposed under this
title:

(a)
Time and manner of payment of tax imposed under this title, including tax
withheld under sections 601 through 603 of this act;

(b)
Liability of transferees; and

(c)
Time and manner of making returns, extensions of time for filing returns,
verification of returns, and the time when a return is deemed filed.

(2)
The department, by rule, may provide modifications and exceptions to subsection
(1) of this section if reasonably necessary to facilitate the prompt,
efficient, and equitable collection of tax under this title.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 808.
REFUNDS OF OVERPAYMENTS‑-OTHER ADMINISTRATIVE PROVISIONS. (1) The
department shall refund all taxes improperly paid or collected.

(2)
RCW 82.32.020, 82.32.050, 82.32.060, 82.32.070, 82.32.090, 82.32.100,
82.32.105, 82.32.110, 82.32.120, 82.32.130, 82.32.140, 82.32.150, 82.32.160,
82.32.170, 82.32.180, 82.32.190, 82.32.200, 82.32.210, 82.32.220, 82.32.230,
82.32.235, 82.32.237, 82.32.240, 82.32.245, 82.32.265, 82.32.300, 82.32.310,
82.32.320, 82.32.330, 82.32.340, 82.32.350, and 82.32.360 apply to the
administrative of taxes imposed under this title.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 809.
RULES. The department may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW for the
administration and enforcement of this title. The rules, to the extent
possible without being inconsistent with this title, must follow the internal
revenue code, and the regulations and rulings of the United States treasury
department with respect to the federal income tax. The department may adopt as
a part of these rules portions of the internal revenue code and treasury
department regulations and rulings, in whole or in part.

PART
IX

APPEALS

Sec.
901. RCW
82.03.130 and 1998 c 54 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The board shall have jurisdiction to decide the following types of appeals:

(a)
Appeals taken pursuant to RCW 82.03.190.

(b)
Appeals from a county board of equalization pursuant to RCW 84.08.130.

(c)
Appeals by an assessor or landowner from an order of the director of revenue
made pursuant to RCW 84.08.010 and 84.08.060, if filed with the board of tax
appeals within thirty days after the mailing of the order, the right to such an
appeal being hereby established.

(d)
Appeals by an assessor or owner of an intercounty public utility or private car
company from determinations by the director of revenue of equalized assessed
valuation of property and the apportionment thereof to a county made pursuant
to chapter 84.12 and 84.16 RCW, if filed with the board of tax appeals within
thirty days after mailing of the determination, the right to such appeal being
hereby established.

(e)
Appeals by an assessor, landowner, or owner of an intercounty public utility or
private car company from a determination of any county indicated ratio for such
county compiled by the department of revenue pursuant to RCW 84.48.075:
PROVIDED, That

(i)
Said appeal be filed after review of the ratio under RCW 84.48.075(3) and not
later than fifteen days after the mailing of the certification; and

(ii)
The hearing before the board shall be expeditiously held in accordance with
rules prescribed by the board and shall take precedence over all matters of the
same character.

(f)
Appeals from the decisions of sale price of second class shorelands on
navigable lakes by the department of natural resources pursuant to RCW
79.94.210.

(g)
Appeals from urban redevelopment property tax apportionment district proposals
established by governmental ordinances pursuant to RCW 39.88.060.

(h)
Appeals from interest rates as determined by the department of revenue for use
in valuing farmland under current use assessment pursuant to RCW 84.34.065.

(i)
Appeals from revisions to stumpage value tables used to determine value by the
department of revenue pursuant to RCW 84.33.091.

(j)
Appeals from denial of tax exemption application by the department of revenue
pursuant to RCW 84.36.850.

(k)
Appeals pursuant to RCW 84.40.038(3).

(l)
Appeals relating to income tax deficiencies and refunds including penalties and
interest under Title 82A RCW (sections 101 through 809 of this act).

(2)
Except as otherwise specifically provided by law hereafter, the provisions of
RCW 1.12.070 shall apply to all notices of appeal filed with the board of tax
appeals.

Sec.
902. RCW
82.03.140 and 1988 c 222 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

In
all appeals over which the board has jurisdiction under RCW 82.03.130, a party
taking an appeal may elect either a formal or an informal hearing, such
election to be made according to rules of practice and procedure to be promulgated
by the board: PROVIDED, That nothing shall prevent the assessor or taxpayer,
as a party to an appeal pursuant to RCW 84.08.130, within twenty days from the
date of the receipt of the notice of appeal, from filing with the clerk of the
board notice of intention that the hearing be a formal one: PROVIDED, HOWEVER,
That nothing herein shall be construed to modify the provisions of RCW
82.03.190: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That upon an appeal under RCW 82.03.130 (((5)))
(1) (e) or (f), the director of revenue may, within ten days from the
date of its receipt of the notice of appeal, file with the clerk of the board
notice of its ((intention that the hearing be held pursuant to chapter 34.05
RCW)) election of a formal hearing. In the event that appeals are
taken from the same decision, order, or determination, as the case may be, by
different parties and only one of such parties elects a formal hearing, a
formal hearing shall be granted.

PART
X

BUSINESS
AND OCCUPATION TAX

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1001. RCW
48.14.0201 and 1998 c 323 s 1, 1997 c 154 s 1, 1993 sp.s. c 25 s
601, & 1993 c 492 s 301 are each repealed.

Sec.
1002. RCW
48.14.080 and 1998 c 312 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As
to insurers, other than title insurers and taxpayers under RCW 48.14.0201, the
taxes imposed by this title shall be in lieu of all other taxes, except taxes
on real and tangible personal property((,)) and excise taxes on
the sale, purchase, or use of such property((, and the tax imposed in
RCW 82.04.260(12))).

Sec.
1003. RCW
82.04.260 and 1998 c 312 s 5 and 1998 c 311 s 2 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing:

(a)
Wheat into flour, barley into pearl barley, soybeans into soybean oil, canola
into canola oil, canola meal, or canola byproducts, or sunflower seeds into
sunflower oil; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such
business shall be equal to the value of the flour, pearl barley, oil, canola
meal, or canola byproduct manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138
percent;

(b)
Seafood products which remain in a raw, raw frozen, or raw salted state at the
completion of the manufacturing by that person; as to such persons the amount
of tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the value of the
products manufactured, multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent; and

(c)
By canning, preserving, freezing, processing, or dehydrating fresh fruits and
vegetables, or selling at wholesale fresh fruits and vegetables canned,
preserved, frozen, processed, or dehydrated by the seller and sold to
purchasers who transport in the ordinary course of business the goods out of
this state; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business
shall be equal to the value of the products canned, preserved, frozen,
processed, or dehydrated multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent. As proof of
sale to a person who transports in the ordinary course of business goods out of
this state, the seller shall annually provide a statement in a form prescribed
by the department and retain the statement as a business record.

(2)
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of splitting or
processing dried peas; as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to
such business shall be equal to the value of the peas split or processed,
multiplied by the rate of 0.138 percent.

(3)
Upon every nonprofit corporation and nonprofit association engaging within this
state in research and development, as to such corporations and associations,
the amount of tax with respect to such activities shall be equal to the gross
income derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.484 percent.

(4)
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of slaughtering,
breaking and/or processing perishable meat products and/or selling the same at
wholesale only and not at retail; as to such persons the tax imposed shall be
equal to the gross proceeds derived from such sales multiplied by the rate of
0.138 percent.

(5)
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of making sales,
at retail or wholesale, of nuclear fuel assemblies manufactured by that person,
as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to such business shall be
equal to the gross proceeds of sales of the assemblies multiplied by the rate
of 0.275 percent.

(6)
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of manufacturing
nuclear fuel assemblies, as to such persons the amount of tax with respect to
such business shall be equal to the value of the products manufactured
multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.

(7)
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of acting as a
travel agent or tour operator; as to such persons the amount of the tax with
respect to such activities shall be equal to the gross income derived from such
activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.

(8)
Upon every person engaging within this state in business as an international
steamship agent, international customs house broker, international freight
forwarder, vessel and/or cargo charter broker in foreign commerce, and/or
international air cargo agent; as to such persons the amount of the tax with
respect to only international activities shall be equal to the gross income
derived from such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent.

(9)
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of stevedoring and
associated activities pertinent to the movement of goods and commodities in
waterborne interstate or foreign commerce; as to such persons the amount of tax
with respect to such business shall be equal to the gross proceeds derived from
such activities multiplied by the rate of 0.275 percent. ((Persons subject
to taxation under this subsection shall be exempt from payment of taxes imposed
by chapter 82.16 RCW for that portion of their business subject to taxation
under this subsection.)) Stevedoring and associated activities pertinent
to the conduct of goods and commodities in waterborne interstate or foreign
commerce are defined as all activities of a labor, service or transportation
nature whereby cargo may be loaded or unloaded to or from vessels or barges,
passing over, onto or under a wharf, pier, or similar structure; cargo may be
moved to a warehouse or similar holding or storage yard or area to await
further movement in import or export or may move to a consolidation freight
station and be stuffed, unstuffed, containerized, separated or otherwise
segregated or aggregated for delivery or loaded on any mode of transportation
for delivery to its consignee. Specific activities included in this definition
are: Wharfage, handling, loading, unloading, moving of cargo to a convenient
place of delivery to the consignee or a convenient place for further movement
to export mode; documentation services in connection with the receipt,
delivery, checking, care, custody and control of cargo required in the transfer
of cargo; imported automobile handling prior to delivery to consignee; terminal
stevedoring and incidental vessel services, including but not limited to
plugging and unplugging refrigerator service to containers, trailers, and other
refrigerated cargo receptacles, and securing ship hatch covers.

(10)
Upon every person engaging within this state in the business of disposing of
low-level waste, as defined in RCW 43.145.010; as to such persons the amount of
the tax with respect to such business shall be equal to the gross income of the
business, excluding any fees imposed under chapter 43.200 RCW, multiplied by
the rate of 3.3 percent.

((If
the gross income of the taxpayer is attributable to activities both within and
without this state, the gross income attributable to this state shall be
determined in accordance with the methods of apportionment required under RCW
82.04.460.))

(11)
Upon every person engaging within this state as an insurance agent, insurance
broker, or insurance solicitor licensed under chapter 48.17 RCW; as to such
persons, the amount of the tax with respect to such licensed activities shall
be equal to the gross income of such business multiplied by the rate of 0.484
percent.

(((12)
Upon every person engaging within this state in business as a hospital, as
defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a nonprofit corporation or by
the state or any of its political subdivisions, as to such persons, the amount
of tax with respect to such activities shall be equal to the gross income of
the business multiplied by the rate of 0.75 percent through June 30, 1995, and
1.5 percent thereafter. The moneys collected under this subsection shall be
deposited in the health services account created under RCW 43.72.900.))

Sec.
1004. RCW
82.04.4289 and 1998 c 325 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

This
chapter does not apply to amounts derived as compensation for services rendered
to patients or from sales of prescription drugs as defined in RCW 82.08.0281
furnished as an integral part of services rendered to patients by a
hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, that is operated as a nonprofit
corporation, a kidney dialysis facility operated as a nonprofit
corporation, whether or not operated in connection with a hospital, a
nonprofit hospice agency licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, and nursing homes
and homes for unwed mothers operated as religious or charitable organizations,
but only if no part of the net earnings received by such an institution inures
directly or indirectly, to any person other than the institution entitled to
deduction ((hereunder)) under this section. The deduction is not
allowed unless the hospital building is entitled to exemption from taxation
under the property tax laws of this state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1005. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

This
chapter does not apply to amounts derived as compensation for services rendered
or to be rendered to patients or from sales of prescription drugs as defined in
RCW 82.08.0281 furnished as an integral part of services rendered to patients
by a hospital, as defined in chapter 70.41 RCW, devoted to the care of human
beings with respect to the prevention or treatment of disease, sickness, or
suffering, when such hospital is operated by the United States or any of its
instrumentalities, or by the state, or any of its political subdivisions.

PART
XI

TAX
ON BEER

Sec.
1101. RCW
66.24.290 and 1997 c 451 s 1 and 1997 c 321 s 16 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any microbrewer or domestic brewery or beer distributor licensed under this
title may sell and deliver beer to holders of authorized licenses direct, but
to no other person, other than the board; and every such brewery or beer
distributor shall report all sales to the board monthly, pursuant to the
regulations, and shall pay to the board as an added tax for the privilege of
manufacturing and selling the beer within the state a tax of one dollar and
thirty cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons on sales to licensees within the
state and on sales to licensees within the state of bottled and canned beer
shall pay a tax computed in gallons at the rate of one dollar and thirty cents
per barrel of thirty-one gallons. Any brewery or beer distributor whose applicable
tax payment is not postmarked by the twentieth day following the month of sale
will be assessed a penalty at the rate of two percent per month or fraction
thereof. Beer shall be sold by breweries and distributors in sealed barrels or
packages. The moneys collected under this subsection shall be distributed as
follows: (a) Three-tenths of a percent shall be distributed to border areas
under RCW 66.08.195; and (b) of the remaining moneys: (i) Twenty percent shall
be distributed to counties in the same manner as under RCW 66.08.200; and (ii)
eighty percent shall be distributed to incorporated cities and towns in the
same manner as under RCW 66.08.210.

(2)
An additional tax is imposed on all beer subject to tax under subsection (1) of
this section. The additional tax is equal to two dollars per barrel of
thirty-one gallons. All revenues collected during any month from this
additional tax shall be deposited in the violence reduction and drug
enforcement account under RCW 69.50.520 by the twenty-fifth day of the
following month.

(3)(((a)
An additional tax is imposed on all beer subject to tax under subsection (1) of
this section. The additional tax is equal to ninety-six cents per barrel of
thirty-one gallons through June 30, 1995, two dollars and thirty-nine cents per
barrel of thirty-one gallons for the period July 1, 1995, through June 30,
1997, and four dollars and seventy-eight cents per barrel of thirty-one gallons
thereafter.

(b)
The additional tax imposed under this subsection does not apply to the sale of
the first sixty thousand barrels of beer each year by breweries that are
entitled to a reduced rate of tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 5051, as existing on
July 1, 1993, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the board by rule
consistent with the purposes of this exemption.

(c)
All revenues collected from the additional tax imposed under this subsection
(3) shall be deposited in the health services account under RCW 43.72.900.

(4))) An
additional tax is imposed on all beer that is subject to tax under subsection
(1) of this section that is in the first sixty thousand barrels of beer by
breweries that are entitled to a reduced rate of tax under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 5051,
as existing on July 1, 1993, or such subsequent date as may be provided by the
board by rule consistent with the purposes of ((the)) this
exemption ((under subsection (3)(b) of this section)). The additional
tax is equal to one dollar and forty-eight and two-tenths cents per barrel of
thirty-one gallons. By the twenty-fifth day of the following month, three
percent of the revenues collected from this additional tax shall be distributed
to border areas under RCW 66.08.195 and the remaining moneys shall be
transferred to the state general fund.

(((5)))
(4) The tax imposed under this section shall not apply to "strong
beer" as defined in this title.

PART
XII

TAX
ON SPIRITS

Sec.
1201. RCW
82.08.150 and 1998 c 126 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is levied and shall be collected a tax upon each retail sale of spirits,
or strong beer in the original package at the rate of fifteen percent of the
selling price. The tax imposed in this subsection shall apply to all such
sales including sales by the Washington state liquor stores and agencies, but
excluding sales to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees.

(2)
There is levied and shall be collected a tax upon each sale of spirits, or
strong beer in the original package at the rate of ten percent of the selling
price on sales by Washington state liquor stores and agencies to spirits, beer,
and wine restaurant licensees.

(3)
There is levied and shall be collected an additional tax upon each retail sale
of spirits in the original package at the rate of one dollar and seventy-two
cents per liter. The additional tax imposed in this subsection shall apply to
all such sales including sales by Washington state liquor stores and agencies,
and including sales to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees.

(4)
An additional tax is imposed equal to fourteen percent multiplied by the taxes
payable under subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section.

(5)
An additional tax is imposed upon each retail sale of spirits in the original
package at the rate of seven cents per liter. The additional tax imposed in
this subsection shall apply to all such sales including sales by Washington
state liquor stores and agencies, and including sales to spirits, beer, and
wine restaurant licensees. All revenues collected during any month from this
additional tax shall be deposited in the violence reduction and drug
enforcement account under RCW 69.50.520 by the twenty-fifth day of the
following month.

(6)(((a)
An additional tax is imposed upon retail sale of spirits in the original
package at the rate of one and seven-tenths percent of the selling price
through June 30, 1995, two and six-tenths percent of the selling price for the
period July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1997, and three and four-tenths of the
selling price thereafter. This additional tax applies to all such sales
including sales by Washington state liquor stores and agencies, but excluding
sales to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees.

(b)
An additional tax is imposed upon retail sale of spirits in the original
package at the rate of one and one-tenth percent of the selling price through
June 30, 1995, one and seven-tenths percent of the selling price for the period
July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1997, and two and three-tenths of the selling
price thereafter. This additional tax applies to all such sales to spirits,
beer, and wine restaurant licensees.

(c)
An additional tax is imposed upon each retail sale of spirits in the original
package at the rate of twenty cents per liter through June 30, 1995, thirty
cents per liter for the period July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1997, and
forty-one cents per liter thereafter. This additional tax applies to all such
sales including sales by Washington state liquor stores and agencies, and
including sales to spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees.

(d)
All revenues collected during any month from additional taxes under this
subsection shall be deposited in the health services account created under RCW
43.72.900 by the twenty-fifth day of the following month.

(7))) The
tax imposed in RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of spirits or strong beer
in the original package.

(((8)))
(7) The taxes imposed in this section shall be paid by the buyer to the
seller, and each seller shall collect from the buyer the full amount of the tax
payable in respect to each taxable sale under this section. The taxes required
by this section to be collected by the seller shall be stated separately from
the selling price and for purposes of determining the tax due from the buyer to
the seller, it shall be conclusively presumed that the selling price quoted in
any price list does not include the taxes imposed by this section.

(((9)))
(8) As used in this section, the terms, "spirits,"
"strong beer," and "package" shall have the meaning
ascribed to them in chapter 66.04 RCW.

PART
XIII

BUSINESS AND
OCCUPATION TAXES REPEALED

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1301. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
82.04.220 and 1961 c 15 s 82.04.220;

(2) RCW
82.04.2201 and 1996 c 112 s 4, 1995 c 229 s 2, 1994 sp.s. c 10 s
1, & 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 204;

(3) RCW
82.04.230 and 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 101, 1971 ex.s. c 281 s 2, 1969
ex.s. c 262 s 33, 1967 ex.s. c 149 s 7, & 1961 c 15 s 82.04.230;

(4) RCW
82.04.240 and 1998 c 312 s 3, 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 102, 1981 c 172 s
1, 1979 ex.s. c 196 s 1, 1971 ex.s. c 281 s 3, 1969 ex.s. c 262 s 34, 1967
ex.s. c 149 s 8, 1965 ex.s. c 173 s 5, & 1961 c 15 s 82.04.240;

(5) RCW
82.04.2403 and 1994 c 167 s 1;

(6) RCW
82.04.250 and 1998 c 343 s 5, 1998 c 312 s 4, 1993 sp.s. c 25 s
103, 1981 c 172 s 2, 1971 ex.s. c 281 s 4, 1971 ex.s. c 186 s 2, 1969 ex.s. c
262 s 35, 1967 ex.s. c 149 s 9, & 1961 c 15 s 82.04.250;

(7) RCW
82.04.255 and 1997 c 7 s 1, 1996 c 1 s 1, 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 202, 1985
c 32 s 2, 1983 2nd ex.s. c 3 s 1, 1983 c 9 s 1, & 1970 ex.s. c 65 s 3;

(8) RCW
82.04.270 and 1998 c 343 s 2, 1998 c 329 s 1, 1998 c 312 s 6,
1994 c 124 s 2, 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 105, 1981 c 172 s 4, 1971 ex.s. c 281 s 6,
1971 ex.s. c 186 s 4, 1969 ex.s. c 262 s 37, 1967 ex.s. c 149 s 11, & 1961
c 15 s 82.04.270;

(9) RCW
82.04.280 and 1994 c 112 s 1, 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 303, 1993 sp.s. c
25 s 106, 1986 c 226 s 2, 1983 c 132 s 1, 1975 1st ex.s. c 90 s 3, 1971 ex.s. c
299 s 5, 1971 ex.s. c 281 s 7, & 1970 ex.s. c 8 s 2;

(10) RCW
82.04.290 and 1998 c 343 s 4, 1998 c 343 s 3, 1998 c 331 s 2,
1998 c 312 s 8, 1998 c 308 s 5, 1998 c 308 s 4, 1997 c 7 s 2, 1996 c 1 s 2,
1995 c 229 s 3, 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 203, 1985 c 32 s 3, 1983 2nd ex.s. c 3 s 2,
1983 c 9 s 2, 1983 c 3 s 212, 1971 ex.s. c 281 s 8, 1970 ex.s. c 65 s 4, 1969
ex.s. c 262 s 39, 1967 ex.s. c 149 s 14, 1963 ex.s. c 28 s 2, & 1961 c 15 s
82.04.290;

(11) RCW
82.04.293 and 1997 c 7 s 3 & 1995 c 229 s 1;

(12) RCW
82.04.297 and 1997 c 304 s 4;

(13) RCW
82.04.310 and 1989 c 302 s 202 & 1961 c 15 s 82.04.310;

(14) RCW
82.04.312 and 1998 c 316 s 1 & 1997 c 407 s 2;

(15) RCW
82.04.315 and 1982 c 95 s 7;

(16) RCW
82.04.317 and 1997 c 4 s 1;

(17) RCW
82.04.320 and 1961 c 15 s 82.04.320;

(18) RCW
82.04.322 and 1993 c 492 s 303;

(19) RCW
82.04.324 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 3;

(20) RCW
82.04.327 and 1987 1st ex.s. c 4 s 1;

(21) RCW
82.04.330 and 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 305, 1988 c 253 s 2, & 1987 c
23 s 4;

(22) RCW
82.04.333 and 1990 c 141 s 1;

(23) RCW
82.04.335 and 1965 ex.s. c 145 s 1;

(24) RCW
82.04.337 and 1987 c 495 s 1;

(25) RCW
82.04.339 and 1992 c 81 s 1;

(26) RCW
82.04.3395 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 11 s 3;

(27) RCW
82.04.340 and 1988 c 19 s 4 & 1961 c 15 s 82.04.340;

(28) RCW
82.04.350 and 1961 c 15 s 82.04.350;

(29) RCW
82.04.355 and 1979 c 111 s 17;

(30) RCW
82.04.360 and 1991 c 324 s 19, 1991 c 275 s 2, & 1961 c 15 s
82.04.360;

(31) RCW
82.04.363 and 1997 c 388 s 1;

(32) RCW
82.04.367 and 1998 c 324 s 1 & 1987 c 433 s 1;

(33) RCW
82.04.368 and 1993 c 390 s 1;

(34) RCW
82.04.370 and 1961 c 293 s 4 & 1961 c 15 s 82.04.370;

(35) RCW
82.04.380 and 1961 c 15 s 82.04.380;

(36) RCW
82.04.385 and 1988 c 176 s 915, 1988 c 13 s 1, 1972 ex.s. c 134 s
1, & 1970 ex.s. c 81 s 3;

(37) RCW
82.04.390 and 1961 c 15 s 82.04.390;

(38) RCW
82.04.392 and 1998 c 311 s 3 & 1997 c 106 s 21;

(39) RCW
82.04.395 and 1979 ex.s. c 196 s 12;

(40) RCW
82.04.397 and 1979 ex.s. c 196 s 14;

(41) RCW
82.04.399 and 1996 c 272 s 1;

(42) RCW
82.04.405 and 1998 c 311 s 4 & 1970 ex.s. c 101 s 3;

(43) RCW
82.04.408 and 1983 c 161 s 25;

(44) RCW
82.04.410 and 1967 ex.s. c 149 s 15 & 1961 c 15 s 82.04.410;

(45) RCW
82.04.415 and 1965 ex.s. c 173 s 10;

(46) RCW
82.04.418 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 66 s 2;

(47) RCW
82.04.419 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 66 s 3;

(48) RCW
82.04.421 and 1997 c 408 s 1;

(49) RCW
82.04.423 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 66 s 5;

(50) RCW
82.04.425 and 1980 c 37 s 78, 1965 ex.s. c 173 s 9, & 1961 c
15 s 82.04.425;

(51) RCW
82.04.4271 and 1981 c 74 s 1;

(52) RCW
82.04.4281 and 1980 c 37 s 2;

(53) RCW
82.04.4282 and 1994 c 124 s 3, 1989 c 392 s 1, & 1980 c 37 s
3;

(54) RCW
82.04.4283 and 1980 c 37 s 4;

(55) RCW
82.04.4284 and 1980 c 37 s 5;

(56) RCW
82.04.4285 and 1998 c 176 s 3 & 1980 c 37 s 6;

(57) RCW
82.04.4286 and 1980 c 37 s 7;

(58) RCW
82.04.4287 and 1980 c 37 s 8;

(59) RCW
82.04.4291 and 1980 c 37 s 11;

(60) RCW
82.04.4292 and 1980 c 37 s 12;

(61) RCW
82.04.4293 and 1980 c 37 s 13;

(62) RCW
82.04.4294 and 1980 c 37 s 14;

(63) RCW
82.04.4295 and 1980 c 37 s 15;

(64) RCW
82.04.4296 and 1980 c 37 s 16;

(65) RCW
82.04.4297 and 1988 c 67 s 1 & 1980 c 37 s 17;

(66) RCW
82.04.4298 and 1980 c 37 s 18;

(67) RCW
82.04.431 and 1986 c 261 s 6, 1985 c 431 s 3, 1983 1st ex.s. c 66
s 1, 1980 c 37 s 80, & 1979 ex.s. c 196 s 6;

(68) RCW
82.04.432 and 1967 ex.s. c 149 s 17;

(69) RCW
82.04.4322 and 1981 c 140 s 1;

(70) RCW
82.04.4324 and 1981 c 140 s 2;

(71) RCW
82.04.4326 and 1981 c 140 s 3;

(72) RCW
82.04.4327 and 1985 c 471 s 6;

(73) RCW
82.04.4329 and 1987 c 431 s 24;

(74) RCW
82.04.433 and 1985 c 471 s 16;

(75) RCW
82.04.4331 and 1988 c 107 s 33;

(76) RCW
82.04.4333 and 1996 c 1 s 4;

(77) RCW
82.04.434 and 1991 c 13 s 1;

(78) RCW
82.04.435 and 1971 ex.s. c 299 s 6, 1969 ex.s. c 257 s 1, 1967
ex.s. c 89 s 1, & 1965 ex.s. c 173 s 26;

(79) RCW
82.04.440 and 1998 c 312 s 9, 1994 c 124 s 4, 1987 2nd ex.s. c 3
s 2, 1985 c 190 s 1, 1981 c 172 s 5, 1967 ex.s. c 149 s 16, 1965 ex.s. c 173 s
12, & 1961 c 15 s 82.04.440;

(80) RCW
82.04.4451 and 1997 c 238 s 2 & 1994 sp.s. c 2 s 1;

(81) RCW
82.04.4452 and 1997 c 7 s 4 & 1994 sp.s. c 5 s 2;

(82) RCW
82.04.4453 and 1996 c 128 s 1 & 1994 c 270 s 2;

(83) RCW
82.04.4454 and 1996 c 128 s 2 & 1994 c 270 s 3;

(84) RCW
82.04.4455 and 1996 c 128 s 5;

(85) RCW
82.04.460 and 1985 c 7 s 154, 1983 2nd ex.s. c 3 s 28, 1975 1st
ex.s. c 291 s 9, & 1961 c 15 s 82.04.460;

(86) RCW
82.04.480 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 44 & 1961 c 15 s
82.04.480;

(87) RCW
82.04.500 and 1961 c 15 s 82.04.500;

(88) RCW
82.04.510 and 1961 c 15 s 82.04.510;

(89) RCW
82.04.600 and 1979 ex.s. c 266 s 8;

(90) RCW
82.04.900 and 1961 c 15 s 82.04.900;

(91) RCW
82.04.331 and 1998 c 170 s 2;

(92) RCW
82.04.332 and 1998 c 312 s 2;

(93) RCW
82.04.3651 and 1998 c 336 s 2;

(94) RCW
82.04.394 and 1998 c 338 s 2;

(95) RCW
82.04.416 and 1998 c 179 s 3; and

(96) RCW
82.04.44525 and 1998 c 313 s 2.

Sec.
1302. RCW
82.04.4328 and 1985 c 471 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
For the purposes of RCW ((82.04.4322, 82.04.4324, 82.04.4326, 82.04.4327,))
82.08.031((,)) and 82.12.031, the term "artistic or cultural
organization" means an organization which is organized and operated
exclusively for the purpose of providing artistic or cultural exhibitions, presentations,
or performances or cultural or art education programs, as defined in subsection
(2) of this section, for viewing or attendance by the general public. The
organization must be a not-for-profit corporation under chapter 24.03 RCW and
managed by a governing board of not less than eight individuals none of whom is
a paid employee of the organization or by a corporation sole under chapter
24.12 RCW. In addition, to qualify for deduction or exemption from taxation
under RCW ((82.04.4322, 82.04.4324, 82.04.4326, 82.04.4327,))
82.08.031((,)) and 82.12.031, the corporation shall satisfy the
following conditions:

(a)
No part of its income may be paid directly or indirectly to its members,
stockholders, officers, directors, or trustees except in the form of services
rendered by the corporation in accordance with its purposes and bylaws;

(b)
Salary or compensation paid to its officers and executives must be only for
actual services rendered, and at levels comparable to the salary or
compensation of like positions within the state;

(c)
Assets of the corporation must be irrevocably dedicated to the activities for
which the exemption is granted and, on the liquidation, dissolution, or
abandonment by the corporation, may not inure directly or indirectly to the
benefit of any member or individual except a nonprofit organization,
association, or corporation which also would be entitled to the exemption;

(d)
The corporation must be duly licensed or certified when licensing or
certification is required by law or regulation;

(e)
The amounts received that qualify for exemption must be used for the activities
for which the exemption is granted;

(f)
Services must be available regardless of race, color, national origin, or
ancestry; and

(g)
The director of revenue shall have access to its books in order to determine
whether the corporation is exempt from taxes.

(2)
The term "artistic or cultural exhibitions, presentations, or performances
or cultural or art education programs" includes and is limited to:

(a)
An exhibition or presentation of works of art or objects of cultural or
historical significance, such as those commonly displayed in art or history
museums;

(b)
A musical or dramatic performance or series of performances; or

(c)
An educational seminar or program, or series of such programs, offered by the
organization to the general public on an artistic, cultural, or historical
subject.

PART
XIV

PUBLIC
UTILITY TAXES REPEALED

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1401. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
82.16.010 and 1996 c 150 s 1, 1994 c 163 s 4, 1991 c 272 s 14,
& 1989 c 302 s 203;

(2) RCW
82.16.020 and 1996 c 150 s 2, 1989 c 302 s 204, 1986 c 282 s 14,
1985 c 471 s 10, 1983 2nd ex.s. c 3 s 13, 1982 2nd ex.s. c 5 s 1, 1982 1st
ex.s. c 35 s 5, 1971 ex.s. c 299 s 12, 1967 ex.s. c 149 s 24, 1965 ex.s. c 173
s 21, 1961 c 293 s 13, & 1961 c 15 s 82.16.020;

(3) RCW
82.16.030 and 1989 c 302 s 205, 1982 1st ex.s. c 35 s 6, &
1961 c 15 s 82.16.030;

(4) RCW
82.16.040 and 1996 c 111 s 4 & 1961 c 15 s 82.16.040;

(5) RCW
82.16.042 and 1998 c 316 s 2 & 1997 c 407 s 3;

(6) RCW
82.16.047 and 1979 c 111 s 18;

(7) RCW
82.16.048 and 1996 c 128 s 3 & 1994 c 270 s 4;

(8) RCW
82.16.049 and 1996 c 128 s 4 & 1994 c 270 s 5;

(9) RCW
82.16.050 and 1994 c 124 s 12, 1989 c 302 s 103, 1987 c 207 s 1,
1982 2nd ex.s. c 9 s 3, 1977 ex.s. c 368 s 1, 1967 ex.s. c 149 s 25, 1965 ex.s.
c 173 s 22, & 1961 c 15 s 82.16.050;

(10) RCW
82.16.053 and 1996 c 145 s 1 & 1994 c 236 s 1;

(11) RCW
82.16.055 and 1980 c 149 s 3;

(12) RCW
82.16.060 and 1961 c 15 s 82.16.060;

(13) RCW
82.16.080 and 1961 c 15 s 82.16.080;

(14) RCW
82.16.090 and 1988 c 228 s 1; and

(15) RCW
82.16.046 and 1998 c 179 s 5.

PART
XV

CONSTRUCTION‑-CODIFICATION‑-EFFECTIVE
DATE

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1501.
SAVINGS. This act does not terminate, or in any way modify, any
obligation or any liability, civil or criminal, that was already in existence
on the effective date of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1502.
SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or
circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of
the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1503. CODIFICATION.
(1) Sections 101 through 809 of this act constitute a new title in the Revised
Code of Washington, to be codified as Title 82A RCW.

(2)
Section 101 of this act constitutes a new chapter in Title 82A RCW (sections
101 through 809 of this act).

(3)
Sections 201 through 213 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 82A RCW
(sections 101 through 809 of this act).

(4)
Sections 301 through 303 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 82A RCW
(sections 101 through 809 of this act).

(5)
Sections 401 through 408 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 82A RCW
(sections 101 through 809 of this act).

(6)
Sections 501 and 502 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 82A RCW
(sections 101 through 809 of this act).

(7)
Sections 601 through 606 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 82A RCW
(sections 101 through 809 of this act).

(8)
Section 701 of this act constitutes a new chapter in Title 82A RCW (sections
101 through 809 of this act).

(9)
Sections 801 through 809 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 82A RCW
(sections 101 through 809 of this act).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1504. PART
HEADINGS AND CAPTIONS. Part headings and captions used in this act are not any
part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1505.
EFFECTIVE DATE. This act takes effect January 1, 2000.

---
END ---