BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
51.52.050 and 1987 c 151 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever the department has made any order, decision, or award, it shall
promptly serve the worker, beneficiary, employer, or other person affected
thereby, with a copy thereof by mail, which shall be addressed to such person
at his or her last known address as shown by the records of the department.
The copy, in case the same is a final order, decision, or award, shall bear on
the same side of the same page on which is found the amount of the award, a
statement, set in black faced type of at least ten point body or size, that
such final order, decision, or award shall become final within sixty days from the
date the order is communicated to the parties unless a written request for
reconsideration is filed with the department of labor and industries, Olympia,
or an appeal is filed with the board of industrial insurance appeals, Olympia((:
PROVIDED, That)), as provided in subsection (2) of this section. A
department order or decision making demand, whether with or without penalty,
for repayment of sums paid to a provider of medical, dental, vocational, or
other health services rendered to an industrially injured worker, shall state
that such order or decision shall become final within twenty days from the date
the order or decision is communicated to the parties unless a written request
for reconsideration is filed with the department of labor and industries,
Olympia, or an appeal is filed with the board of industrial insurance appeals,
Olympia, as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2)
Whenever the department has taken any action or made any decision relating to
any phase of the administration of this title, the worker, beneficiary,
employer, or other person aggrieved thereby may request reconsideration of the
department, or may appeal to the board, except as provided in RCW 51.32.095.
In an appeal before the board, the appellant shall have the burden of
proceeding with the evidence to establish a prima facie case for the relief
sought in such appeal: PROVIDED, That in an appeal from an order of the
department that alleges fraud, the department or self-insured employer shall
initially introduce all evidence in its case in chief. Any ((such))
person aggrieved by the decision and order of the board may thereafter appeal
to the superior court, as prescribed in this chapter.

Sec.
2. RCW
51.32.095 and 1996 c 151 s 1 and 1996 c 59 s 1 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
One of the primary purposes of this title is to enable the injured worker to
become employable at gainful employment. To this end, the department or
self-insurers shall utilize the services of individuals and organizations,
public or private, whose experience, training, and interests in vocational
rehabilitation and retraining qualify them to lend expert assistance to the
supervisor of industrial insurance in such programs of vocational rehabilitation
as may be reasonable to make the worker employable consistent with his or her
physical and mental status. Where, after evaluation and recommendation by such
individuals or organizations and prior to final evaluation of the worker's
permanent disability and in the sole opinion of the supervisor or supervisor's
designee, whether or not medical treatment has been concluded, vocational
rehabilitation is both necessary and likely to enable the injured worker to
become employable at gainful employment, the supervisor or supervisor's
designee may, in his or her sole discretion, pay or, if the employer is a
self-insurer, direct the self-insurer to pay the cost as provided in subsection
(3) of this section.

(2)
When in the sole discretion of the supervisor or the supervisor's designee
vocational rehabilitation is both necessary and likely to make the worker
employable at gainful employment, then the following order of priorities shall
be used:

(a)
Return to the previous job with the same employer;

(b)
Modification of the previous job with the same employer including transitional
return to work;

(c)
A new job with the same employer in keeping with any limitations or
restrictions;

(d)
Modification of a new job with the same employer including transitional return
to work;

(e)
Modification of the previous job with a new employer;

(f)
A new job with a new employer or self-employment based upon transferable
skills;

(g)
Modification of a new job with a new employer;

(h)
A new job with a new employer or self-employment involving on-the-job training;

(i)
Short-term retraining and job placement.

(3)
Costs for vocational rehabilitation benefits allowed by the supervisor or
supervisor's designee under subsection (1) of this section may include the cost
of books, tuition, fees, supplies, equipment, transportation, child or
dependent care, and other necessary expenses for any such worker in an amount
not to exceed three thousand dollars in any fifty-two week period except as
authorized by RCW 51.60.060, and the cost of continuing the temporary total
disability compensation under RCW 51.32.090 while the worker is actively and
successfully undergoing a formal program of vocational rehabilitation. Such
expenses may include training fees for on-the-job training and the cost of
furnishing tools and other equipment necessary for self-employment or
reemployment: PROVIDED, That such compensation or payment of retraining with
job placement expenses may not be authorized for a period of more than
fifty-two weeks: PROVIDED FURTHER, That such period may, in the sole
discretion of the supervisor after his or her review, be extended for an
additional fifty-two weeks or portion thereof by written order of the
supervisor.

In
cases where the worker is required to reside away from his or her customary
residence, the reasonable cost of board and lodging shall also be paid. Said
costs shall be chargeable to the employer's cost experience or shall be paid by
the self-insurer as the case may be.

(4)
In addition to the vocational rehabilitation expenditures provided for under
subsection (3) of this section, an additional five thousand dollars may, upon
authorization of the supervisor or the supervisor's designee, be expended for:
(a) Accommodations for an injured worker that are medically necessary for the
worker to participate in an approved retraining plan; and (b) accommodations
necessary to perform the essential functions of an occupation in which an
injured worker is seeking employment, consistent with the retraining plan or
the recommendations of a vocational evaluation. The injured worker's attending
physician must verify the necessity of the modifications or accommodations.
The total expenditures authorized in this subsection and the expenditures
authorized under RCW 51.32.250 shall not exceed five thousand dollars.

(5)
The department shall establish criteria to monitor the quality and
effectiveness of rehabilitation services provided by the individuals and
organizations used under subsection (1) of this section. The state fund shall
make referrals for vocational rehabilitation services based on these
performance criteria. Vendors of vocational rehabilitation services may not
appeal to the board of industrial insurance appeals those decisions or actions
the department takes regarding such referrals for services.

(6)
The department shall engage in, where feasible and cost-effective, a
cooperative program with the state employment security department to provide
job placement services under this section.

(7)
The benefits in this section shall be provided for the injured workers of
self-insured employers. Self-insurers shall report both benefits provided and
benefits denied under this section in the manner prescribed by the department
by rule adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW. The director may, in his or her sole
discretion and upon his or her own initiative or at any time that a dispute
arises under this section, promptly make such inquiries as circumstances
require and take such other action as he or she considers will properly
determine the matter and protect the rights of the parties.

(8) The benefits provided for in this section are available to any
otherwise eligible worker regardless of the date of industrial injury.
However, claims shall not be reopened solely for vocational rehabilitation
purposes.

---
END ---