BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.83.040 and 1991 c 3 s 350 are each amended to read as follows:

When
notified of positive screening tests, the state department of health shall
offer the use of its services and facilities, designed to prevent mental retardation
or physical defects in such children, to the attending physician, or the
parents of the newborn child if no attending physician can be identified.

The
services and facilities of the department, and other state and local agencies
cooperating with the department in carrying out programs of detection and
prevention of mental retardation and physical defects shall be made available
to the family and physician to the extent required in order to carry out the
intent of this chapter and within the availability of funds. The department
has the authority to collect a reasonable fee, from the parents or other
responsible party of each infant screened to fund specialty clinics that
provide treatment services for hemoglobin diseases, phenylketonuria, congenital
adrenal hyperplasia, and congenital hypothyroidism. The fee may be collected
through the facility where the screening specimen is obtained.

---
END ---