BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
(1)(a) Upon approval under subsection (2) of this section, a city with a
population of over one hundred fifty thousand and that is not in a metropolitan
park district may:

(i)
Levy or cause to be levied a general tax on all the property located in the
city each year not to exceed fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value
of the property in the city; and

(ii)
In addition, levy or cause to be levied a general tax on all property located
in the city each year not to exceed twenty-five cents per thousand dollars of
assessed valuation.

(b)
Although cities are authorized to impose two separate regular property tax
levies under this subsection, the levies shall be considered to be a single levy
for purposes of the limitation provided for in chapter 84.55 RCW.

(2)
A city with a population of over one hundred fifty thousand and that is not in
a metropolitan park district may call a special election for the purpose of
submitting to the qualified voters of the city a proposition to levy taxes
under subsection (1) of this section for the purposes of zoos, aquariums, and
other recreational, civic, cultural, and interpretive facilities, including
administrative and support facilities, upon approval of a simple majority of
the voters voting in the special election.

(3)
The city may levy a general tax in excess of its regular property tax levy or
levies under subsection (1) of this section when authorized so to do at a
special election conducted in accordance with and subject to all the
requirements of the Constitution and laws of the state now in force or
hereafter enacted governing the limitation of tax levies. The city may call a
special election for the purpose of submitting to the qualified voters of the
city a proposition to levy a tax in excess of the seventy-five cents per
thousand dollars of assessed value specifically authorized in subsection (1) of
this section.

(4)
The levies under this section shall be certified to the proper county officials
for collection the same as other general taxes and when collected, the general
tax shall be placed in a separate fund in the office of the county treasurer to
be known as the "civic, cultural, and recreational fund" and paid out
on warrants.

(5)
Taxes under this section shall be treated in the same manner as junior taxing
district levies under RCW 84.52.043 and have the equivalent status as levies of
metropolitan park districts for all other purposes.

(6)
The city may contract with any entity, public and private, for all of its
operations and services to carry out the purposes of this section.

Sec.
2. RCW
84.52.010 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as is permitted under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes shall be levied or voted in
specific amounts.

The
rate percent of all taxes for state and county purposes, and purposes of taxing
districts coextensive with the county, shall be determined, calculated and
fixed by the county assessors of the respective counties, within the
limitations provided by law, upon the assessed valuation of the property of the
county, as shown by the completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent
of all taxes levied for purposes of taxing districts within any county shall be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the respective
counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the assessed valuation
of the property of the taxing districts respectively.

When
a county assessor finds that the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property,
that is subject to the limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.043 or 84.52.050,
exceeds the limitations provided in either of these sections, the assessor
shall recompute and establish a consolidated levy in the following manner:

(1)
The full certified rates of tax levy for state, county, county road district,
and city or town purposes shall be extended on the tax rolls in amounts not
exceeding the limitations established by law; however any state levy shall take
precedence over all other levies and shall not be reduced for any purpose other
than that required by RCW 84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed
under RCW 84.52.069, 84.34.230, the portion of the levy by a metropolitan park
district that was protected under RCW 84.52.120, and 84.52.105, the combined
rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent
limitation exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then
these levies shall be reduced as follows: (a) The portion of the levy by a
metropolitan park district that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 shall be
reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and
fair value of any property or shall be eliminated; (b) if the combined rate
of regular property tax levies subject to the one percent limitation in a
county containing a city that imposes a tax under section 1 of this act still
exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then the
remaining levy for the city shall be reduced until the combined rate no longer
exceeds one percent; (c) if the combined rate of regular property tax
levies that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent
of the true and fair value of any property, then the levies imposed under RCW
84.34.230, 84.52.105, and any portion of the levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069
that is in excess of thirty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value, shall
be reduced on a pro rata basis until the combined rate no longer exceeds one
percent of the true and fair value of any property or shall be eliminated; and
(((c))) (d) if the combined rate of regular property tax levies
that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, then the thirty cents per thousand dollars
of assessed value of tax levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 shall be reduced
until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair
value of any property or eliminated.

(2)
The certified rates of tax levy subject to these limitations by all junior
taxing districts imposing taxes on such property shall be reduced or eliminated
as follows to bring the consolidated levy of taxes on such property within the
provisions of these limitations:

(a)
First, the certified property tax levy rates of those junior taxing districts
authorized under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, and 67.38.130 shall be reduced on a
pro rata basis or eliminated;

(b)
Second, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the
certified property tax levy rates of flood control zone districts shall be
reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;

(c)
Third, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the
certified property tax levy rates of all other junior taxing districts, other
than fire protection districts, library districts, the first fifty cent per
thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park districts, the
first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for taxes
levied under section 1 of this act, and the first fifty cent per thousand
dollars of assessed valuation levies for public hospital districts, shall be
reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;

(d)
Fourth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the
certified property tax levy rates authorized to fire protection districts under
RCW 52.16.140 and 52.16.160 shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
and

(e)
Fifth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the
certified property tax levy rates authorized for fire protection districts
under RCW 52.16.130, library districts, metropolitan park districts under their
first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, taxes
levied under section 1 of this act under the first fifty cent per thousand
dollars of assessed valuation levy, and public hospital districts under
their first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, shall
be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated.

In
determining whether the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property, that is
subject to the limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations
provided in that section, the assessor shall use the hypothetical state levy,
as apportioned to the county under RCW 84.48.080, that was computed under RCW
84.48.080 without regard to the reduction under RCW 84.55.012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3.
Section 1 of this act constitutes a new chapter in Title 35 RCW.

---
END ---