BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
8.26.075 and 1988 c 90 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If a program or project undertaken by a displacing agency cannot proceed on a
timely basis because comparable replacement dwellings are not available, and
the head of the displacing agency determines that the dwellings cannot
otherwise be made available, the head of the displacing agency may take such
action as is necessary or appropriate to provide the dwellings by use of funds
authorized for the project. The displacing agency may use this section to
exceed the maximum amounts that may be paid under RCW 8.26.045 and 8.26.055 on
a case-by-case basis for good cause as determined in accordance with rules
adopted by the lead agency.

(2)
No person may be required to move from a dwelling on account of any program or
project undertaken by a displacing agency unless ((the displacing agency is
satisfied that)) comparable replacement housing is available to the person.

(3)
The displacing agency shall assure that a person shall not be required to move
from a dwelling unless the person has had a reasonable opportunity to relocate
to a comparable replacement dwelling, except in the case of the following:

(a)
A major disaster as defined in section 102(2) of the Federal Disaster Relief
Act of 1974;

(b)
A national emergency declared by the president; or

(c) Any other emergency that requires the person to move
immediately from the dwelling because continued occupancy of the dwelling by
the person constitutes a substantial danger to the health or safety of the
person.

---
END ---