BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
8.26.010 and 1988 c 90 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The purposes of this chapter are:

(a)
To establish a uniform policy for the fair and equitable treatment of persons
displaced as a direct result of public works programs of the state and local
governments in order that such persons shall not suffer disproportionate injuries
as a result of programs designed for the benefit of the public as a whole and
to minimize the hardship of displacement on such persons;

(b)
To encourage and expedite the acquisition of real property for public works
programs by agreements with owners, to reduce litigation and relieve congestion
in the courts, to assure consistent treatment for owners affected by state and
local programs, and to promote public confidence in state and local land
acquisition practices.

(2)
Notwithstanding the provisions and limitations of this chapter requiring a
local public agency to comply with the provisions of this chapter, the
governing body of any local public agency may elect not to comply with the
provisions of RCW 8.26.035 through 8.26.115 in connection with a program or
project not receiving federal financial assistance. Any person who has the
authority to acquire property by eminent domain under state law may elect not
to comply with RCW 8.26.180 through 8.26.200 in connection with a program or
project not receiving federal financial assistance.

(3)
Any determination by the head of a state agency or local public agency
administering a program or project as to payments under this chapter is subject
to review pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW; otherwise, no provision of this
chapter may be construed to give any person a cause of action in any court. For
such review the administrative head of the displacing agency shall request the
appointment of an administrative law judge under Title 34 RCW. The
administrative law judge shall be the presiding officer of the adjudicative
proceeding held under Title 34 RCW.

(4)
If the displaced person is the prevailing party at the adjudicative
proceeding, then he or she shall receive reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.

(5) Nothing in this chapter may be construed as creating in
any condemnation proceedings brought under the power of eminent domain, any
element of value or of damage not in existence immediately before March 16,
1988.

---
END ---