BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
8.25.070 and 1984 c 129 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, if a trial is
held for the fixing of the amount of compensation to be awarded to the owner or
party having an interest in the property being condemned, the court shall award
the condemnee reasonable attorney(('s))s' fees and reasonable
expert witness fees in the event of any of the following:

(a)
If condemnor fails to make any written offer in settlement to condemnee at
least thirty days prior to commencement of said trial; or

(b)
If the judgment awarded as a result of the trial exceeds by ten percent or more
the highest written offer in settlement submitted to those condemnees appearing
in the action by condemnor in effect thirty days before the trial.

(2)
The attorney general or other attorney representing a condemnor in effecting a
settlement of an eminent domain proceeding may allow to the condemnee
reasonable attorneys' fees.

(3)
Reasonable attorneys' fees and reasonable expert witness fees authorized
by this section shall be awarded only if the condemnee stipulates, if requested
to do so in writing by the condemnor, to an order of immediate possession and
use of the property being condemned within thirty days after receipt of the
written request, or within fifteen days after the entry of an order
adjudicating public use whichever is later and thereafter delivers possession
of the property to the condemnor upon the deposit in court of a warrant
sufficient to pay the amount offered as provided by law. In the event,
however, the condemnor does not request the condemnee to stipulate to an order
of immediate possession and use prior to trial, the condemnee shall be entitled
to an award of reasonable attorneys' fees and reasonable expert witness
fees as authorized by subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

(4)
Reasonable attorneys' fees as authorized in this section shall not
exceed the general trial rate, per day customarily charged for general trial
work by the condemnee's attorney for actual trial time and his or her hourly
rate for preparation including attorneys' fees incurred prior to the
condemnor's filing of the petition. Reasonable expert witness fees as
authorized in this section shall not exceed the customary rates obtaining in
the county by the hour for investigation and research and by the day or half
day for trial attendance.

(5) In no event may any offer in settlement be referred to or used
during the trial for any purpose in determining the amount of compensation to
be paid for the property.

---
END ---