BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
8.26.180 and 1988 c 90 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
acquiring agency shall, to the greatest extent practicable, be guided by the
following policies:

(1)
Every reasonable effort shall be made to acquire expeditiously real property by
negotiation.

(2)
Real property shall be appraised before the initiation of negotiations, and the
owner or his designated representative shall be given an opportunity to
accompany at least one appraiser of the acquiring agency during his inspection
of the property, except that the lead agency may prescribe a procedure to waive
the appraisal in cases involving the acquisition of property with a low fair
market value.

(3)
Before the initiation of negotiations for real property, the acquiring agency
shall establish an amount which it believes to be just compensation therefor,
and shall make a prompt offer to acquire the property for the full amount so
established. In no event shall such amount be less than the agency's approved
appraisal of the fair market value of such property. Any decrease or increase
in the fair market value of the real property to be acquired prior to the date
of valuation caused by the public improvement for which such property is
acquired, or by the likelihood that the property would be acquired for such
improvement, other than that due to physical deterioration within the
reasonable control of the owner, will be disregarded in determining the
compensation for the property. The acquiring agency shall provide the owner of
real property to be acquired with a written statement of, and summary of the
basis for, the amount it established as just compensation. Where appropriate
the just compensation for the real property acquired, for damages to remaining
real property, and for benefits to remaining real property shall be separately
stated.

(4)
No owner shall be required to surrender possession of real property before the
agreed purchase price is paid or deposited with a court having jurisdiction of
condemnation of such property, in accordance with applicable law, for the
benefit of the owner an amount not less than the acquiring agency's approved
appraisal of the fair market value of such property, or the amount of the award
of compensation in the condemnation proceeding of such property.

(5)
The construction or development of a public improvement shall be so scheduled
that, to the greatest extent practicable, no person lawfully occupying real
property shall be required to move from a dwelling or to move his business or
farm operation without at least ninety days written notice of the date by which
such move is required. The acquiring agency shall not give this ninety-day
written notice to move until after it has control of the property by possession
agreement, stipulation, or judgment.

(6)
If an owner or tenant is permitted to occupy the real property acquired on a
rental basis for a short term or for a period subject to termination on short
notice, the amount of rent required shall not exceed the fair rental value of
the property to a short-term occupier.

(7)
In no event shall the time of condemnation be advanced, on negotiations or
condemnation and the deposit of funds in court for the use of the owner be
deferred, or any other coercive action be taken to compel an agreement on the
price to be paid for the property.

(8)
If an interest in real property is to be acquired by exercise of the power of
eminent domain, formal condemnation proceedings shall be instituted. The
acquiring agency shall not intentionally make it necessary for an owner to
institute legal proceedings to prove the fact of the taking of his real
property.

(9)
If the acquisition of only a portion of a property would leave the owner with
an uneconomic remnant, the head of the agency concerned shall offer to acquire
that remnant. For the purposes of this chapter, an uneconomic remnant is a
parcel of real property in which the owner is left with an interest after the
partial acquisition of the owner's property and that the head of the agency
concerned has determined has little or no value or utility.

(10) A person whose real property is being acquired in accordance
with this chapter may, after the person has been fully informed of his right to
receive just compensation for the property, donate the property, any part thereof,
any interest therein, or any compensation paid for it to any agency as the
person may determine.

---
END ---