BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
90.60.010 and 1995 c 347 s 601 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature hereby finds and declares:

(1)
Washington's environmental protection programs have established strict
standards to reduce pollution and protect the public health and safety and the
environment. The single-purpose programs instituted to achieve these standards
have been successful in many respects, and have produced significant gains in
protecting Washington's environment in the face of substantial population
growth.

(2)
Continued progress to achieve the environmental standards in the face of
continued population growth will require greater coordination between the
single-purpose environmental programs and more efficient operation of these
programs overall. Pollution must be prevented and controlled and not simply
transferred to another media or another place. This goal can only be achieved
by maintaining the current environmental protection standards and by greater
integration of the existing programs.

(3)
As the number of environmental laws and regulations have grown in Washington,
so have the number of permits required of business and government. This
regulatory burden has significantly added to the cost and time needed to obtain
essential permits in Washington. The increasing number of individual permits
and permit authorities has generated the continuing potential for conflict,
overlap, and duplication between the various state, local, and federal permits.

(4)
The purpose of this chapter is to institute new, efficient procedures that will
assist businesses and public agencies in complying with the environmental
quality laws in an expedited fashion, without reducing protection of public
health and safety and the environment.

(5)
Those procedures need to provide a permit process that promotes effective
dialogue and ensures ease in the transfer and clarification of technical information,
while preventing duplication. It is necessary that the procedures establish a
process for preliminary and ongoing meetings between the applicant, the
coordinating permit agency, and the participating permit agencies, but do not
preclude the applicant or participating permit agencies from individually
coordinating with each other.

(6)
It is necessary, to the maximum extent practicable, that the procedures
established in this chapter ensure that the coordinated permit agency process
and applicable permit requirements and criteria are integrated and run
concurrently, rather than consecutively.

(7)
It is necessary to provide a reliable and consolidated source of information
concerning federal, state, and local environmental and land use laws and procedures
that apply to any given proposal.

(8)
It is the intent of this chapter to provide an optional process by which a
project proponent may obtain active coordination of all applicable regulatory
and land-use permitting procedures. This process is not to replace individual
laws, or diminish the substantive decision-making role of individual
jurisdictions. Rather it is to provide predictability, administrative
consolidation, and, where possible, consolidation of appeal processes.

(9)
It is also the intent of this chapter ((to provide)) that by
providing an optional coordinated permit process, measures are taken by the
parties that promote the public's trust and confidence in the underlying permit
process, including providing consolidated, effective, and easier
opportunities for members of the public to receive information and present
their views about proposed projects.

Sec.
2. RCW
90.60.020 and 1995 c 347 s 602 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Center" means the permit assistance center established in the ((commission
[department])) department by RCW 90.60.030.

(2)
"Coordinating permit agency" means the permit agency that has the
greatest overall jurisdiction over a project.

(3)
"Department" means the department of ecology.

(4)
"Participating permit agency" means a permit agency, other than the
coordinating permit agency, that is responsible for the issuance of a permit
for a project.

(5)
"Parties" collectively means the coordinating permit agency,
permit agency, and participating permit agency.

(6)
"Permit" means any license, certificate, registration, permit, or
other form of authorization required by a permit agency to engage in a
particular activity.

(((6)))
(7) "Permit agency" means:

(a)
The department of ecology, an air pollution control authority, the department
of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife, and the department
of health; and

(b)
Any other state or federal agency or county, city, or town that participates at
the request of the permit applicant and upon the agency's agreement to be
subject to this chapter.

(((7)))
(8) "Project" means an activity, the conduct of which requires
permits from one or more permit agencies.

(9)
"Small project" means a project for which the applicants do not enter
into a cost reimbursement agreement as authorized by RCW 90.60.100, and the project:

(a)
Will require fewer than five permits from the state permit agencies;

(b)
Will employ fewer than twenty-five persons; or

(c)
Estimates a completed assessed value of less than five hundred thousand
dollars.

Sec.
3. RCW
90.60.030 and 1997 c 429 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The permit assistance center is established within the department. The center
shall:

(((1)))
(a) Publish and keep current one or more handbooks containing lists and
explanations of all permit laws. To the extent possible, the handbook shall
include relevant federal and tribal laws. A state agency or local government
shall provide a reasonable number of copies of application forms, statutes,
ordinances, rules, handbooks, and other informational material requested by the
center and shall otherwise fully cooperate with the center. The center shall
seek the cooperation of relevant federal agencies and tribal governments;

(((2)))
(b) Establish, and make known, a point of contact for distribution of
the handbook and advice to the public as to its interpretation in any given
case;

(((3)))
(c) Work closely and cooperatively with the business license center in
providing efficient and nonduplicative service to the public;

(((4)))
(d) Seek the assignment of employees from the permit agencies ((listed
under RCW 90.60.020(6)(a))) as defined in this chapter to serve on a
rotating basis in staffing the center;

(((5)))
(e) Collect and disseminate information to public and private entities
on federal, state, local, and tribal government programs that rely on private
professional expertise to assist governmental agencies in project permit
review; and

(((6)))
(f) Provide ((an annual)) a biennial report to the
legislature ((on potential conflicts and perceived inconsistencies among
existing statutes. The first report shall be submitted to the appropriate
standing committees of the house of representatives and senate by December 1,
1996.)) that includes:

(i)
Statutory and other recommendations for streamlining and coordinating
environmental permitting in Washington;

(ii)
Summarizes the results of the center's efforts to measure performance and
outcomes over time;

(iii)
Summarizes, evaluates, and makes statutory and other recommendations for
improving the center's and permitting agencies' efforts to provide public
notice efficiently and for promoting effective public participation in
permitting processes;

(iv)
Details efforts on the part of the center, the department, and the parties to
promote the public's trust and confidence in the permitting process. Examples
of such efforts include, but are not limited to, the development of statutory
and other policies and procedures, guidance, roles, and responsibilities; and

(v)
Shows revenues generated by the center's services, and the center's budget and
expenditures.

(2) The department shall prioritize the expenditure of general
fund moneys allotted to the center to provide a set of services to the
applicants of small projects.

Sec.
4. RCW
90.60.100 and 1995 c 347 s 610 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The ((coordinating permit agency)) parties may enter into a
written cost-reimbursement agreement with the applicant to recover from
the applicant the reasonable costs incurred by the ((coordinating permit
agency)) parties in carrying out the requirements of this chapter,
as well as the requirements of other relevant laws, as they relate to permit
coordination, environmental review, application review, technical studies, and
permit processing.

(2)
The ((coordinating permit agency may recover only the costs of performing
those coordinated permit services and)) written cost-reimbursement agreement
shall be negotiated with the permit applicant ((in)) following
the meeting required pursuant to RCW 90.60.070. Permit agencies may assign
work to current staff, temporary staff, or technical consultants in order to
carry out the work covered by the written cost-reimbursement agreement or the
work remaining for the permit agency as a result of the coordinated permit
process. The billing process shall provide for accurate time and cost
accounting and may include a billing cycle that provides for progress payments.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
43.131.387 (Permit assistance center--Termination) and 1995 c 347
s 617; and

(2) RCW
43.131.388 (Permit assistance center--Repeal) and 1995 c 347 s
618.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6.
Section 5 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing
public institutions, and takes effect June 29, 1999.

---
END ---