BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
36.32.050 and 1963 c 4 s 36.32.050 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided under subsection (2) of this section, county
commissioners shall be elected by the ((qualified)) registered
voters of the entire county and the person receiving the highest number
of votes for the office of commissioner for the district in which he or she
resides shall be declared duly elected from that district.

(2)
In a noncharter county, a ballot proposition authorizing the election of each
county commissioner by the voters of a separate county commissioner district,
instead of the voters of the entire county, shall be submitted to the county
voters if the board of county commissioners adopts a resolution proposing the
change or if a petition proposing the change is filed with the county auditor
signed by county voters equal in number to at least ten percent of the number
of voters residing in the county. The auditor shall certify the sufficiency of
the signatures on the petition. A ballot proposition authorizing the election
of each county commissioner by the voters of a separate commissioner district
shall be submitted to county voters at the next special election date specified
under RCW 29.13.010 occurring sixty or more days after the date the resolution
is adopted or the petition with sufficient valid signatures was submitted.

If
the ballot proposition is approved by a simple majority vote of the voters
voting on the proposition, each county commissioner shall be elected by the
voters of his or her county commissioner district commencing at the next
general election.

Sec.
2. RCW
36.32.0556 and 1990 c 252 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The commissioners in a five-member board of county commissioners
shall be elected to four-year staggered terms. Each commissioner shall reside
in a separate commissioner district. Each commissioner shall be nominated from
a separate commissioner district by the voters of that district. Each shall be
elected by the voters of the entire county except as provided under RCW
36.32.050(2). Three members of a five-member board of commissioners shall
constitute a quorum to do business.

---
END ---