BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
3.66.040 and 1988 c 71 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
An action arising under RCW 3.66.020 (1), (2) except for the recovery of
possession of personal property, (4), (6), (7), and (9) may be brought in any
district in which ((the defendant, or, if there be more than one defendant,
where some)) one or more of the defendants((,)) resides at
the time the complaint is filed or in which ((the defendant, or if there be
more than one defendant, where some)) one or more of the defendants
may be served with the notice and complaint in which latter case, however, the
district where the defendant or defendants is or are served must be within the
county in which the ((said)) defendant or defendants reside; provided
that an action upon the unlawful issuance of a check or draft may be brought in
any division of the judicial district in which the check or draft was issued or
presented as payment. If the residence of the defendant is not ascertained
by reasonable efforts, the action may be brought in the district in which the
defendant's place of actual physical employment is located.

(2)
An action arising under RCW 3.66.020(2) for the recovery of possession of
personal property and RCW 3.66.020(8) shall be brought in the district in which
the subject matter of the action or some part thereof is situated.

(3)
An action arising under RCW 3.66.020 (3) and (5) shall be brought in the
district in which the cause of action, or some part thereof arose.

(4)
An action arising under RCW 3.66.020(2) for the recovery of damages for
injuries to the person or for injury to personal property arising from a motor
vehicle accident may be brought, at the plaintiff's option, either in the
district in which the cause of action, or some part thereof, arose, or in the
district in which the defendant, or, if there be more than one defendant, where
some one of the defendants, resides at the time the complaint is filed.

(5)
An action against a nonresident of this state may be brought in any district
where service of process may be had, or in which the cause of action or some
part thereof arose, or in which the plaintiff or one of them resides.

(6)
For the purposes of chapters 3.30 through 3.74 RCW, the residence of a
corporation defendant shall be deemed to be in any district where the
corporation transacts business or has an office for the transaction of business
or transacted business at the time the cause of action arose or where any
person resides upon whom process may be served upon the corporation, unless
herein otherwise provided.

Sec.
2. RCW
4.12.025 and 1998 c 56 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
An action may be brought in any county in which the defendant resides, or, if
there be more than one defendant, where some one of the defendants resides at
the time of the commencement of the action. For the purpose of this section,
the residence of a corporation defendant shall be deemed to be in any county
where the corporation: (a) Transacts business; (b) has an office for the
transaction of business; (c) transacted business at the time the cause of action
arose; or (d) where any person resides upon whom process may be served upon the
corporation.

(2)
An action upon the unlawful issuance of a check or draft may be brought in any
county in which the defendant resides or may be brought in any division of the
judicial district in which the check or draft was issued or presented as
payment.

(3)
The venue of any action brought against a corporation, at the option of the
plaintiff, shall be: (a) In the county where the tort was committed; (b) in
the county where the work was performed for ((said)) the
corporation; (c) in the county where the agreement entered into with the
corporation was made; or (d) in the county where the corporation has its
residence.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 19.16 RCW to read as follows:

For purposes of the fair debt collection practices act (15 U.S.C.
Sec. 1692 et seq.), the state shall be considered a single judicial district
whether an action is brought in superior, district, or small claims court.

---
END ---