BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 64.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
An electric utility is immune from liability under RCW 64.12.030, 64.12.040,
and 4.24.630 and any claims for general or special damages, including claims of
emotional distress, when it cuts or removes vegetation located on or
originating from land or property adjacent to electric facilities and that:

(a)
Has come in contact with or caused damage to electric facilities;

(b)
Poses a hazard to the general public health, safety, or welfare and the
electric utility makes a reasonable effort as soon as practicable to notify and
secure agreement from the affected property owner of record, or the resident of
the affected property, regarding the disposition of the vegetation that has
been cut or removed by the utility; or

(c)
Poses a potential threat to damage electric facilities and the electric utility
attempts written notice by mail to the last known address of record indicating
the intent to act or remove vegetation and secures agreement from the affected
property owner of record for the cutting, removing, and disposition of the
vegetation. If the affected property owner fails to respond to a notice from
the electric utility within two weeks of the date the electric utility provided
notice, the electric utility may secure agreement from a resident of the
affected property for the cutting, removing, and disposition of vegetation.

(2)(a)
A hazard to the general public health, safety, or welfare is deemed to exist
when:

(i)
Vegetation has encroached upon electric facilities by overhanging, or growing
in such close proximity to overhead electric facilities that it constitutes an
electrical hazard under applicable electrical construction codes or state and
federal health and safety regulations governing persons who are employed or
retained by, or on behalf of, an electric utility to construct, maintain,
inspect, and repair electric facilities or to trim or remove vegetation; or

(ii)
Vegetation is visibly diseased, dead, or dying and has been determined by a
qualified forester or certified arborist employed or retained by, or on behalf
of, an electric utility to be of such proximity to electric facilities that
trimming or removal of the vegetation is necessary to avoid contact between the
vegetation and electric facilities.

(b)
The factors to be considered in determining the extent of trimming required to
remove a hazard to the general public health, safety, or welfare may include
normal tree growth, the combined movement of trees and conductors under adverse
weather conditions, voltage, and sagging of conductors at elevated
temperatures.

(3)
A potential threat to damage electric facilities exists when vegetation is of
such size, condition, and proximity to electric facilities that it can be
reasonably expected to cause damage to electric facilities and, based upon this
standard, the vegetation has been determined to pose a potential threat by a
qualified forester or certified arborist employed or retained by or on behalf
of an electric utility.

(4)
For the purposes of this section:

(a)
"Electric facilities" means lines, conduits, ducts, poles, wires,
pipes, conductors, cables, cross-arms, receivers, transmitters, transformers,
instruments, machines, appliances, instrumentalities, real estate, easements
acquired by title or implied consent, property, and routes used, operated,
owned, maintained, or controlled under agreement, written or implied, and all
devices and apparatus used, operated, owned, or controlled by an electric
utility, for the purposes of manufacturing, transforming, transmitting,
distributing, selling, or furnishing electricity.

(b)
"Electric utility" means an electrical company, as defined under RCW
80.04.010, a municipal electric utility formed under Title 35 RCW, a public
utility district formed under Title 54 RCW, an irrigation district formed under
chapter 87.03 RCW, a cooperative formed under chapter 23.86 RCW, and a mutual
corporation or association formed under chapter 24.06 RCW, that is engaged in
the business of distributing electricity in the state.

(c)
"Vegetation" means trees, timber, or shrubs.

Sec.
2. RCW
4.24.630 and 1994 c 280 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Every person who goes onto the land of another and who removes timber, crops,
minerals, or other similar valuable property from the land, or wrongfully
causes waste or injury to the land, or wrongfully injures personal property or
improvements to real estate on the land, is liable to the injured party for
treble the amount of the damages caused by the removal, waste, or injury. For
purposes of this section, a person acts "wrongfully" if the person
intentionally and unreasonably commits the act or acts while knowing, or having
reason to know, that he or she lacks authorization to so act. Damages recoverable
under this section include, but are not limited to, damages for the market
value of the property removed or injured, and for injury to the land, including
the costs of restoration. In addition, the person is liable for reimbursing
the injured party for the party's reasonable costs, including but not limited
to investigative costs and reasonable attorneys' fees and other
litigation-related costs.

(2)
This section does not apply in any case where liability for damages is provided
under RCW 64.12.030, 79.01.756, 79.01.760, or 79.40.070.

(3)
This section does not apply to an electric utility under section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---