BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
74.08A.120 and 1997 c 57 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department may establish a food assistance program for ((persons whose
immigrant status meets the eligibility requirements of the federal food stamp
program, but who are no longer eligible solely due to their immigrant status
under P.L. 104-193)) legal immigrants who are ineligible for the federal
food stamp program.

(2)
The rules for the state food assistance program shall follow exactly the rules
of the federal food stamp program except for the provisions pertaining to
immigrant status ((under P.L. 104-193)).

(3)
The benefit under the state food assistance program shall be established by the
legislature in the biennial operating budget.

(4)
The department may enter into a contract with the United States department of
agriculture to use the existing federal food stamp program coupon system for
the purposes of administering the state food assistance program.

(5) In the event the department is unable to enter into a contract
with the United States department of agriculture, the department may issue
vouchers to eligible households for the purchase of eligible foods at
participating retailers.

---
END ---