BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
community scholarship partnership program is established. The board shall
administer the program. The purpose of the program is to encourage the
development of local organizations dedicated to help students achieve a higher
education.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Affiliate scholarship foundation" is an affiliate of the qualified
organization that receives funding from the qualified organization to provide
scholarships under this chapter.

(2)
"Board" means the higher education coordinating board.

(3)
"Local scholarship foundation" means an organization that:

(a)
Is either a nonprofit organization under section 501(c)(3) of the internal
revenue code, 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3), and is exempt from taxation under
section 501(a) of the internal revenue code or is affiliated with a state,
regional, or national organization that meets this criteria;

(b)
Is formed to provide scholarships for students to attend institutions of higher
education. The foundation may provide academic support for residents of the
community served by the foundation;

(c)
Has broad-based community support;

(d)
Represents the community where it is located including volunteers
representative of the community;

(e)
Has a board of directors that includes both leaders from community
organizations and residents of the community;

(f)
Awards scholarships to students to attend institutions of higher education
without regard to a recipient's age, sex, marital status, race, creed, color,
religion, national origin, or disability; and

(g)
Meets other criteria established by the board.

(4)
"Qualified local foundation" means a local scholarship foundation designated
to receive grants under this chapter.

(5)
"Qualified organization" means the state-wide community scholarship
organization that is designated to receive a grant under this chapter.

(6)
"State-wide community scholarship organization" means an organization
that:

(a)
Operates in fifty or more communities throughout the state;

(b)
Helps create and support affiliate scholarship foundations and provides
training and other support programs to affiliate scholarship foundations;

(c)
Is a nonprofit organization under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue
code, 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3), and is exempt from taxation under section
501(a) of the internal revenue code;

(d)
Is a publicly supported organization under section 170(b)(1)(a)(vi) of the
internal revenue code;

(e)
Certifies each affiliate local scholarship foundation as meeting the criteria
for participation under this chapter;

(f)
Has a program for and experience in cooperating with secondary and higher
education institutions in carrying out the organization's scholarship and
academic support activities; and

(g)
Meets other criteria established by the board.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
board shall:

(1)
Solicit and analyze competitive proposals from state-wide community
organizations seeking to be designated as the qualified organization and select
one state-wide community organization as the qualified organization. Only one
state-wide community organization may be designated as a qualified organization
at a time, however the board may adopt rules regarding changes in designation;

(2)
Beginning July 1, 2000, distribute funds, to the extent funds are available, to
the qualified organization. The board may distribute funds in whole or in part
whenever the qualified organization has raised a portion equal to one hundred
thousand dollars or more of the required qualifying match;

(3)
Designate local scholarship foundations that meet the criteria under this
chapter as qualified foundations;

(4)
Beginning July 1, 2000, make grants to qualified local foundations from money
appropriated to the board for these grants; and

(5)
Adopt rules as necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
qualified organization or a qualified local foundation receiving a grant under
this chapter shall:

(1)
Match the grant on a dollar-for-dollar basis with money raised from private
sources within the state;

(2)
Use the funds to either:

(a)
Establish a permanent endowment fund and place both the private funds and the
funds from the state grant in the fund and use the interest and income received
from the investment of the permanent endowment fund under this section to
support the purposes and general operations of the qualified organization or a
qualified local foundation; or

(b)
Use the fund to provide scholarships.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
qualified organization or a qualified local foundation receiving funds under
this chapter to be placed in a permanent endowment fund shall return the money
received under this chapter to the state general fund if it:

(1)
Loses its status as a public charitable organization;

(2)
Is liquidated; or

(3)
Violates a provision of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6.
Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

---
END ---