BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.600.385 and 1998 c 63 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
School districts in Washington and community colleges in Oregon and Idaho may
enter into cooperative agreements under chapter 39.34 RCW for the purpose of
allowing eleventh and twelfth grade students who are enrolled in the school
districts to earn high school and college credit concurrently.

(2)
Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, if a school district
exercises the authority granted in subsection (1) of this section, the
provisions of RCW 28A.600.310 through 28A.600.360 and 28A.600.380 through
28A.600.400 shall apply to the agreements.

(3)
A school district may enter an agreement in which the community college agrees
to accept an amount less than the state-wide uniform rate under RCW
28A.600.310(2) if the community college does not charge participating students
tuition and fees. A school district may not pay a per-credit rate in excess of
the state-wide uniform rate under RCW 28A.600.310(2) for students enrolled
in Washington community colleges. For students enrolled in community colleges
in Oregon or Idaho, a school district may not pay a per-credit rate in excess
of the state-wide uniform rate under RCW 28A.600.310(2) or the college's
out-of-state tuition rate plus ten percent, whichever is lower.

(4)
To the extent feasible, the agreements shall permit participating students to
attend the community college without paying any tuition and fees. The
agreements shall not permit the community college to charge participating
students nonresident tuition and fee rates.

(5) The agreements shall ensure that participating students are
permitted to enroll only in courses that are transferable to one or more
institutions of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016.

---
END ---