BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 39.33 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
An agency as defined in RCW 42.52.010 may donate to any food bank surplus
computers and computer-related equipment.

(2)
The department of general administration shall, by September 1, 1999, develop a
list of food banks requesting surplus computers, indicating specific needs, if
any. The department is not responsible for soliciting information from food
banks, but shall develop and maintain the list as information is received from
food banks.

(3)
The department of general administration shall make the list in subsection (2)
of this section available to state and local government agencies that have
surplus computers they wish to donate to food banks.

(4)
As used in this section, "food bank" means a local private or public
nonprofit food program that collects, warehouses, and distributes unprepared
food items on a regular basis without charge to the public.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.19.1919 and 1997 c 264 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as provided in RCW 28A.335.180 ((and)), 43.19.1920, and
section 1 of this act, the division of purchasing shall sell or exchange
personal property belonging to the state for which the agency, office,
department, or educational institution having custody thereof has no further
use, at public or private sale, and cause the moneys realized from the sale of
any such property to be paid into the fund from which such property was
purchased or, if such fund no longer exists, into the state general fund:
PROVIDED, Sales of capital assets may be made by the division of purchasing and
a credit established in central stores for future purchases of capital items as
provided for in RCW 43.19.190 through 43.19.1939, as now or hereafter amended:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That personal property, excess to a state agency, including
educational institutions, shall not be sold or disposed of prior to reasonable
efforts by the division of purchasing to determine if other state agencies have
a requirement for such personal property. Such determination shall follow
sufficient notice to all state agencies to allow adequate time for them to make
their needs known. Surplus items may be disposed of without prior notification
to state agencies if it is determined by the director of general administration
to be in the best interest of the state. The division of purchasing shall
maintain a record of disposed surplus property, including date and method of
disposal, identity of any recipient, and approximate value of the property:
PROVIDED, FURTHER, That this section shall not apply to personal property
acquired by a state organization under federal grants and contracts if in
conflict with special title provisions contained in such grants or contracts.

This section does not apply to property under RCW 27.53.045.

---
END ---