BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Vehicles registered to food banks making twelve or more one-way crossings per
month qualify for a twenty percent discount from the regular ferry tolls.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "food bank" means a
local private or public nonprofit food program that collects, warehouses, and
distributes unprepared food items on a regular basis without charge.

---
END ---