BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
74.08A.270 and 1997 c 58 s 314 are each amended to read as follows:

Good cause reasons for failure to participate in
WorkFirst program components include: (1) Situations where the recipient is a
parent or other relative personally providing care for a child under the age of
six years, and formal or informal child care, or day care for an incapacitated
individual living in the same home as a dependent child, is necessary for an
individual to participate or continue participation in the program or accept
employment, and such care is not available, and the department fails to provide
such care; or (2) until June 30, ((1999)) 2001, if the recipient
is a parent with a child under the age of one year. A parent may only receive
this exemption for a total of twelve months, which may be consecutive or
nonconsecutive; or (3) after June 30, ((1999)) 2001, if the
recipient is a parent with a child under three months of age.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 74.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
DSHS shall report to the legislature by December 1, 2000 on the implementation
of the child care training program authorized for TANF recipients as part of
the WorkFirst program, including the number of recipients trained and the
number working in child care and early childhood education after completion of
the training.

(2)
DSHS shall report to the legislature by December 1, 2000 and each year
thereafter a comparison of the market rate for infant care and the state rate
paid to providers of infant care statewide and by region.

(3) DSHS shall report to the legislature by December 1, 2000 on the
availability, affordability and accessability of child care for infants
statewide and by region.

---
END ---