BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
intent of this act is to provide property tax relief by limiting property tax
valuation increases to six percent per year until the ownership of the property
changes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
As used in section 3 of this act, "change of ownership" means a
transfer of a present interest in real property, including a transfer of the
beneficial use of real property.

(2)
"Change of ownership" includes, except as provided in subsections (3)
and (4) of this section, the following:

(a)
Contracting to convey the title to or ownership of real property upon the
fulfillment of one or more stated conditions where the right to possession of
the property is transferred currently.

(b)
The creation, transfer, or termination of a joint tenancy interest.

(c)
The creation, transfer, or termination of a tenancy-in-common interest.

(d)
The vesting of a right of possession or enjoyment of a remainder or
reversionary interest that occurs upon the termination of a life estate or
other similar precedent property interest.

(e)
An interest that vests in persons other than the trustor where a revocable
trust becomes irrevocable.

(f)
The transfer of stock of a cooperative housing corporation, vested with legal
title to real property, that conveys to the transferee the exclusive right to
occupancy and possession of such property, or a portion of the property.

(3)
"Change of ownership" does not include:

(a)
A transfer between co-owners that results in a change in the method of holding
title to the real property transferred without changing the proportional
interests of the co-owners in the real property, such as a partition of a
tenancy-in-common.

(b)
A transfer for the purpose of merely perfecting title to the real property.

(c)
The creation, assignment, termination, or reconveyance of a security interest
in real property; or the substitution of a trustee under a security
instrument.

(d)
A transfer of real property by the trustor, or by the trustor's spouse, or by
both, into a trust for so long as the transferor is the sole present
beneficiary of the trust, or the trust is revocable; or any transfer of real
property by a trustee of such trust back to the trustor.

(e)
A transfer of real property by an instrument whose terms reserve to the
transferor an estate for years or an estate for life. However, the termination
of such an estate for years or life estate shall constitute a change of
ownership.

(f)
A transfer of real property between or among the same parties for the purpose
of correcting or reforming a deed to express the true intention of the parties,
if the original relationship between the grantor and grantee is not changed.

(4)
"Change of ownership" also does not include an interspousal transfer
of real property, including, but not limited to:

(a)
Transfers to a trustee for the beneficial use of a spouse, or the surviving
spouse of a deceased transferor, or by a trustee of such trust to the spouse of
the trustor;

(b)
Transfers that take effect upon the death of a spouse;

(c)
Transfers to a spouse or former spouse in connection with a property settlement
agreement or decree of dissolution of marriage or legal separation; and

(d)
The creation, transfer, or termination, solely between spouses, of any
co-owner's interest.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The assessed value of real property for which there has been a change of
ownership since the previous assessment shall be equal to true and fair value
as determined under RCW 84.40.030.

(2)
The assessed value of real property that is not assessed under subsection (1)
of this section, shall be equal to the lesser of the following values at the
time of valuation:

(a)
True and fair market value as established by the county assessor in accordance
with applicable law; or

(b)
The most recent assessed value of the property increased on January 1 each year
thereafter by the lesser of the rate of inflation or two percent, compounded
annually, plus the portion of the true and fair market value attributable to
any construction or alteration not included in the previous assessment, other
than improvements exempt under RCW 84.36.400 for the assessment year.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
Sections 2 and 3 of this act are each added to chapter 84.40 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This
act shall take effect January 1, 2000, if the proposed amendment to the state
Constitution authorizing limitation of taxation in the manner provided by
section 3 of this act is validly submitted to and is approved and ratified by
the voters at a general election held in November 1999. If the proposed
amendment is not so approved and ratified, this act is void in its entirety.

---
END ---