BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature acknowledges the challenge facing fish and wildlife commission
members as these part-time commissioners strive to understand all of the
different fish and wildlife issues around the state. Within each region of the
state there are people with an understanding of the fish and wildlife issues in
that region and with a willingness to share their time and expertise to assist
the commission in the sound management of the state's fish and wildlife
resources. The legislature finds that the creation of regional advisory
councils will allow the commission to take advantage of this local expertise
and will provide an efficient way for the part-time commission to better
understand the effects of fish and wildlife policy proposals on different
regions of the state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 77.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A fish and wildlife regional advisory council shall be established in each
administrative region of the department.

(2)
Each regional advisory council shall be comprised of five members who are
residents of the region and who are knowledgeable about fish and wildlife
issues in that region.

(3)
To select regional advisory council members, the county legislative authority
in each county within the administrative region shall designate one person as
the county's representative on a selection committee for the region. If a
county is in more than one administrative region, the county shall choose one
region in which to participate. The selection committee shall solicit
qualified nominees for the regional advisory council for that region from
either (a) organized groups representing sportfishers, commercial fishers,
hunters, private landowners, and environmentalists, or (b) organized groups
representing a mix of interests more tailored to fish and wildlife interests in
that particular region as determined by the selection committee, provided that
the commission has approved the alternative list of interests prior to the
selection committee's solicitation of nominations. The selection committee
shall consider the nominees submitted and shall select a regional advisory council
representing a balance of interests in the region. The selection committee
shall submit its chosen panel to the respective county legislative authorities
for confirmation.

(4)
Three of the initial members of each regional advisory council shall serve
two-year terms, and two shall serve four-year terms. The selection committees
shall determine which initial members serve two-year and four-year terms.
Thereafter each member shall serve a four-year term. After a person has served
a four-year term, four years must elapse before that person is eligible to
serve another term.

(5)
Regional advisory council members shall not be compensated but are eligible to
receive reimbursement for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060. Members may decline to receive reimbursement for travel expenses.

(6)
The chair of an advisory council may remove a member from that council if the
member has missed three consecutive meetings without having the absence excused
in advance by the chair.

(7)
The county legislative authorities in a region may reconvene a selection
committee to fill a vacancy on an advisory council. The person selected to
fill the vacancy shall serve the unexpired term.

(8)
Each regional advisory council shall select from its members a chair and a
vice-chair. A majority of members constitutes a quorum. Regional advisory
councils shall conduct open public meetings in accordance with chapter 42.30
RCW. Each council shall determine meeting times, meeting places, and other
procedural matters necessary to fulfill its duties.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 77.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The fish and wildlife regional advisory councils have the following duties and
responsibilities:

(a)
When the commission is considering proposals to set hunting or fishing seasons,
bag limits, or other policy proposals that would affect fish and wildlife
resources in the administrative region, the commission shall forward these
proposals to the regional advisory council with enough time in advance for each
council to solicit input on the proposals from within the region. Each council
shall solicit testimony from the general public and from experts in the region
on the possible impacts of the policy proposals to the region. Each council
shall also gather relevant information on the policies and views of federal
agencies and federally recognized Indian tribes in the region. Each council
shall synthesize the information collected and shall provide a regional
perspective on the policy proposals to the commission. A regional advisory
council may also make specific recommendations to the commission about the
policy proposals.

(b)
Each regional advisory council shall keep the commission informed on fish and
wildlife issues emerging in or important to the region and may make
recommendations to the commission on policies that the advisory council
believes the commission should consider.

(c)
Other duties as agreed to by the commission and the regional advisory councils.

(2) The commission shall consider input from and recommendations
made by the regional advisory councils. If the commission rejects a specific
recommendation made by a regional advisory council, the commission shall
provide a written explanation for the rejection to the council.

---
END ---