BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that there are still areas of the state that have very high
levels of unemployment despite strong state-wide economic growth.

The
legislature also finds that additional incentives are needed to promote
economic stimulation and new employment opportunities in these distressed
areas, and that these incentives are essential to increase economic growth in
distressed areas.

The
legislature intends to accomplish this by providing a sales and use tax
exemption on machinery and equipment and buildings used by businesses that
establish call centers in distressed areas of the state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales or lease to a business,
located in an eligible area, of machinery and equipment used directly in a call
center operation, or to sales of or charges made for labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving
the machinery and equipment, but only if the purchaser provides the seller with
an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department by
rule, and the purchaser provides the department with a duplicate of the
certificate or a summary of exempt as the department may require. The seller
or lessor shall retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.

(2)
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to construction or improvement
of buildings, or sales of or charges made for labor and services rendered in
respect to construction or improvement of buildings, located in eligible areas,
that are used directly as a call center, but only if the purchaser provides the
seller with an exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the
department by rule, and the purchaser provides the department with a duplicate
of the certificate or a summary of exempt sales as the department may require.
The seller shall retain a copy of the certificate for the seller's files.

(3)
To be eligible for the exemption under this section and section 3 of this act,
the business must make an investment of at least two hundred thousand dollars
in buildings or machinery and equipment used directly in the call center
operation.

(4)
For purposes of this section and section 3 of this act:

(a)
"Buildings" mean only those structures used directly in a call center
operation. If a building is used partly for a call center operation and partly
for other purposes, the applicable tax exemption shall be determined by
apportionment of the costs of construction under rules adopted by the
department. The term "buildings" also includes machinery and
equipment that is permanently affixed to and becomes a physical part of a
building, such as utility systems for heating, ventilation, air conditioning,
plumbing, phones, or electrical;

(b)
"Call centers" mean an independent business operation, leased
facility, or division of an existing business with fifty or more employees, who
are engaged in telecommunications business activities involving financial
transactions, technical support operations, and customer services;

(c)
"Eligible area" means a distressed area as defined in RCW 43.165.010,
a rural natural resources impact area as defined in RCW 43.31.601, a designated
community empowerment zone approved under RCW 43.63A.700, and a militarily
impacted area as designated by the governor under RCW 43.06.115; and

(d)(i)
"Machinery and equipment" means commercial fixtures, devices, and
support facilities, and tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient
or component thereof, including repair parts and replacement parts.
"Machinery and equipment" includes electronic communications
equipment, communications systems infrastructure components, computer software,
computer hardware, associated support equipment that is necessary to maintain
the communications operations of a call center, and office furniture; and

(ii)
"Machinery and equipment" does not include:

(A)
Hand tools; and

(B)
Property with a useful life of less than one year.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use by a
business, located within an eligible area, of machinery and equipment used
directly in a call center, or sales of or charges made for labor and services
rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving
the machinery and equipment.

(2)
The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the new construction
or improvement of a building, located within an eligible area, that is used
directly as a call center, or sales of or charges made for labor and services
rendered in respect to the construction or repair of a building.

(3)
To be eligible for the exemption under this section and section 2 of this act,
the business must make an investment of at least two hundred thousand dollars
in buildings or machinery and equipment used directly in the call center
operation.

(4)
The exemption under this section is available only if the user provides the
department with:

(a)
An exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department
before the construction or improvement of the building;

(b)
An exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department
within sixty days of the first use of the machinery and equipment in this
state;

(c)
An annual summary listing the machinery and equipment by January 31st of the
year following the calendar year in which the machinery and equipment is first
used in this state.

(5) The definitions in section 2 of this act apply to this section.

---
END ---