BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.08.820 and 1997 c 450 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Wholesalers or third-party warehousers who own or operate warehouses or grain
elevators and retailers who own or operate distribution centers, and who have
paid the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 on:

(a)
Material-handling and racking equipment, and labor and services rendered in
respect to installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the
equipment; or

(b)
Construction of a warehouse or grain elevator, including materials, and
including service and labor costs,

are
eligible for an exemption in the form of a remittance. The amount of the
remittance is computed under subsection (3) of this section and is based on the
state share of sales tax.

(2)
For purposes of this section and RCW 82.12.820:

(a)
"Agricultural products" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.213;

(b)
"Construction" means the actual construction of a warehouse or grain
elevator that did not exist before the construction began.
"Construction" includes expansion if the expansion adds at least two
hundred thousand square feet of additional space to an existing warehouse or
additional storage capacity of at least one million bushels to an existing
grain elevator. "Construction" does not include renovation,
remodeling, or repair;

(c)
"Department" means the department of revenue;

(d)
"Distribution center" means a warehouse that is used exclusively by a
retailer solely for the storage and distribution of finished goods to retail
outlets of the retailer. "Distribution center" does not include a
warehouse at which retail sales occur;

(e)
"Finished goods" means tangible personal property intended for sale
by a retailer or wholesaler. "Finished goods" does not include
agricultural products stored by wholesalers, third-party warehouses, or
retailers if the storage takes place on the land of the person who produced the
agricultural product. "Finished goods" does not include logs,
minerals, petroleum, gas, or other extracted products stored as raw materials
or in bulk;

(f)
"Grain elevator" means a structure used for storage and handling of
grain in bulk;

(g)
"Material-handling equipment and racking equipment" means equipment
in a warehouse or grain elevator that is primarily used to handle, store,
organize, convey, package, or repackage finished goods. The term includes
tangible personal property with a useful life of one year or more that becomes
an ingredient or component of the equipment, including repair and replacement
parts. The term does not include equipment in offices, lunchrooms, restrooms,
and other like space, within a warehouse or grain elevator, or equipment used
for nonwarehousing purposes. "Material-handling equipment" includes
but is not limited to: Conveyers, carousels, lifts, positioners,
pick-up-and-place units, cranes, hoists, mechanical arms, and robots;
mechanized systems, including containers that are an integral part of the
system, whose purpose is to lift or move tangible personal property; and
automated handling, storage, and retrieval systems, including computers that
control them, whose purpose is to lift or move tangible personal property; and
forklifts and other off-the-road vehicles that are used to lift or move
tangible personal property and that cannot be operated legally on roads and
streets. "Racking equipment" includes, but is not limited to,
conveying systems, chutes, shelves, racks, bins, drawers, pallets, and other
containers and storage devices that form a necessary part of the storage
system;

(h)
"Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030;

(i)
"Retailer" means a person who makes "sales at retail" as
defined in chapter 82.04 RCW of tangible personal property;

(j)
"Square footage" means the product of the two horizontal dimensions
of each floor of a specific warehouse. The entire footprint of the warehouse
shall be measured in calculating the square footage, including space that juts
out from the building profile such as loading docks. "Square
footage" does not mean the aggregate of the square footage of more than
one warehouse at a location or the aggregate of the square footage of
warehouses at more than one location;

(k)
"Third-party warehouser" means a person taxable under RCW
82.04.280(4);

(l)
"Warehouse" means an enclosed building or structure in which finished
goods are stored. A warehouse building or structure may have more than one
storage room and more than one floor. Office space, lunchrooms, restrooms, and
other space within the warehouse and necessary for the operation of the
warehouse are considered part of the warehouse as are loading docks and other
such space attached to the building and used for handling of finished goods.
Landscaping and parking lots are not considered part of the warehouse. A
storage yard is not a warehouse, nor is a building in which manufacturing takes
place; and

(m)
"Wholesaler" means a person who makes "sales at wholesale"
as defined in chapter 82.04 RCW of tangible personal property, but
"wholesaler" does not include a person who makes sales exempt under
82.04.330.

(3)(a)
A person claiming an exemption from state tax in the form of a remittance under
this section must pay the tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020. The buyer may then
apply to the department for remittance of all or part of the tax paid under RCW
82.08.020. For grain elevators with bushel capacity of one million but less
than two million, the remittance is equal to fifty percent of the amount of tax
paid. For warehouses with square footage of two hundred thousand or more and
for grain elevators with bushel capacity of two million or more, the remittance
is equal to one hundred percent of the amount of tax paid for qualifying
construction, materials, service, and labor, and fifty percent of the amount of
tax paid for qualifying material-handling equipment and racking equipment, and
labor and services rendered in respect to installing, repairing, cleaning,
altering, or improving the equipment.

(b)
This subsection (3)(b) applies to persons located in an eligible area as
defined in RCW 82.60.020. For warehouses with square footage of one hundred
thousand, the remittance is equal to one hundred percent of the amount of tax
paid for qualifying construction, materials, service, and labor, and fifty
percent of the amount of tax paid for qualifying material-handling equipment
and racking equipment, and labor and services rendered in respect to
installing, repairing, cleaning, altering, or improving the equipment.

(c)
The department shall determine eligibility under this section based on
information provided by the buyer and through audit and other administrative
records. The buyer shall on a quarterly basis submit an information sheet, in
a form and manner as required by the department by rule, specifying the amount
of exempted tax claimed and the qualifying purchases or acquisitions for which
the exemption is claimed. The buyer shall retain, in adequate detail to enable
the department to determine whether the equipment or construction meets the
criteria under this section: Invoices; proof of tax paid; documents describing
the material-handling equipment and racking equipment; location and size of
warehouses and grain elevators; and construction invoices and documents.

(((c)))
(d) The department shall on a quarterly basis remit exempted amounts to
qualifying persons who submitted applications during the previous quarter.

(4)
Warehouses, grain elevators, and material-handling equipment and racking
equipment for which an exemption, credit, or deferral has been or is being
received under chapter 82.60, 82.61, 82.62, or 82.63 RCW or RCW 82.08.02565 or
82.12.02565 are not eligible for any remittance under this section. Warehouses
and grain elevators upon which construction was initiated before May 20, 1997,
are not eligible for a remittance under this section.

(5)
The lessor or owner of a warehouse or grain elevator is not eligible for a
remittance under this section unless the underlying ownership of the warehouse
or grain elevator and the material-handling equipment and racking equipment
vests exclusively in the same person, or unless the lessor by written contract
agrees to pass the economic benefit of the remittance to the lessee in the form
of reduced rent payments.

Sec.
2. RCW
82.12.820 and 1997 c 450 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Wholesalers or third-party warehousers who own or operate warehouses or grain
elevators, and retailers who own or operate distribution centers, and who have
paid the tax levied under RCW 82.12.020 on:

(a)
Material-handling equipment and racking equipment; or

(b)
Materials incorporated in the construction of a warehouse or grain elevator,

are
eligible for an exemption on tax paid in the form of a remittance or credit
against tax owned. The amount of the remittance or credit is computed under
subsection (2) of this section and is based on the state share of use tax.

(2)(a)
A person claiming an exemption from state tax in the form of a remittance under
this section must pay the tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020 to the department. The
person may then apply to the department for remittance of all or part of the
tax paid under RCW 82.12.020. For grain elevators with bushel capacity of one
million but less than two million, the remittance is equal to fifty percent of
the amount of tax paid. For warehouses with square footage of two hundred
thousand and for grain elevators with bushel capacity of two million or more,
the remittance is equal to one hundred percent of the amount of tax paid for
qualifying construction materials, and fifty percent of the amount of tax paid
for qualifying material-handling equipment and racking equipment.

(b)
This subsection (2)(b) applies to persons located in an eligible area as
defined in RCW 82.60.020. For warehouses with square footage of one hundred
thousand, the remittance is equal to one hundred percent of the amount of tax
paid for qualifying construction materials, and fifty percent of the amount of
tax paid for qualifying material-handling equipment and racking equipment.

(c)
The department shall determine eligibility under this section based on
information provided by the buyer and through audit and other administrative
records. The buyer shall on a quarterly basis submit an information sheet, in
a form and manner as required by the department by rule, specifying the amount
of exempted tax claimed and the qualifying purchases or acquisitions for which
the exemption is claimed. The buyer shall retain, in adequate detail to enable
the department to determine whether the equipment or construction meets the
criteria under this section: Invoices; proof of tax paid; documents describing
the material-handling equipment and racking equipment; location and size of
warehouses, if applicable; and construction invoices and documents.

(((c)))
(d) The department shall on a quarterly basis remit or credit exempted
amounts to qualifying persons who submitted applications during the previous
quarter.

(3)
Warehouse, grain elevators, and material-handling equipment and racking
equipment for which an exemption, credit, or deferral has been or is being
received under chapter 82.60, 82.61, 82.62, or 82.63 RCW or RCW 82.08.02565 or
82.12.02565 are not eligible for any remittance under this section. Materials
incorporated in warehouses and grain elevators upon which construction was
initiated prior to May 20, 1997, are not eligible for a remittance under this
section.

(4)
The lessor or owner of the warehouse or grain elevator is not eligible for a remittance
or credit under this section unless the underlying ownership of the warehouse
or grain elevator and material‑handling equipment and racking equipment
vests exclusively in the same person, or unless the lessor by written contract
agrees to pass the economic benefit of the exemption to the lessee in the form
of reduced rent payments.

(5)
The definitions in RCW 82.08.820 apply to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act takes effect August 1, 1999.

---
END ---