BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The board of directors may change the name of the school district if:

(a)
Either ten percent of the registered voters of the district file a petition
requesting that the name of the school district be changed and submit the
proposed new name with the request to the board or the board passes a motion to
hold a hearing to change the school district name;

(b)
After receiving the petition or adopting the motion, the board holds a hearing
within one month after the petition was submitted to the board. The board
shall publish notice of the hearing and the proposed new name once a week for
three consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation within the school
district. At the hearing, other names may be proposed and considered by the
board without additional notice requirements; and

(c)
A majority of the board votes to adopt the new name.

(2)
If the board adopts the new name, the new name shall be recorded in the school
district office and with the educational service district superintendent, the
superintendent of public instruction, the state board of education, and the
secretary of state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
28A.315.690 and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.600;

(2) RCW
28A.315.700 and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.601;

(3) RCW
28A.315.710 and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.602; and

(4) RCW
28A.315.720 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 114, 1971 c 48 s 32, &
1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.603.

---
END ---