BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.24.340 and 1997 c 345 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Local health departments authorized under this chapter shall conduct or cause
to be conducted pretest counseling, HIV testing, and posttest counseling of all
persons:

(a)
Convicted of a sexual offense under chapter 9A.44 RCW;

(b)
Convicted of prostitution or offenses relating to prostitution under chapter
9A.88 RCW; ((or))

(c)
Convicted of drug offenses under chapter 69.50 RCW if the court determines at
the time of conviction that the related drug offense is one associated with the
use of hypodermic needles; or

(d)
Who are offenders or arrested or detained persons and who have subjected a law
enforcement officer, fire fighter, health care provider, health care facility
staff person, department of corrections staff person, jail staff person, or
other category of employee, as determined by the board, to substantial exposure
to their bodily fluids upon their consent or pursuant to subsection (5) of this
section. Persons tested under this subsection (1)(d) shall also be tested for
hepatitis B and hepatitis C.

(2)
((Such)) Testing of persons convicted under subsection (1)(a)
through (c) of this section shall be conducted as soon as possible after
sentencing and shall be so ordered by the sentencing judge. Testing of
persons causing a substantial exposure under subsection (1)(d) of this section
shall be conducted as soon as possible, but not later than forty-eight hours,
excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, after the exposure.

(3)
((This section)) Subsection (1)(a) through (c) of this section
applies only to offenses committed after March 23, 1988, and subsection
(1)(d) of this section applies only to exposures occurring on or after the
effective date of this act.

(4)(a)
A law enforcement officer, fire fighter, health care provider, health care
facility staff person, department of corrections' staff person, jail staff
person, or other categories of employment determined by the board in rule to be
at risk of substantial exposure to HIV, who has experienced a substantial
exposure to ((another person's)) the bodily fluids of a person
not covered under subsection (1)(d) of this section in the course of his or
her employment, may request a state or local public health officer to order
pretest counseling, HIV testing, and posttest counseling for the person whose
bodily fluids he or she has been exposed to. If the state or local public
health officer refuses to order counseling and testing under this subsection or
subsection (1)(d) of this section, the person who ((made the request))
experienced the substantial exposure may petition the superior court for
a hearing to determine whether an order shall be issued. The hearing on the
petition shall be held within seventy-two hours of filing the petition,
exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. The standard of review to
determine whether the public health officer shall be required to issue the
order is whether substantial exposure occurred and whether that exposure
presents a possible risk of transmission of the HIV virus as defined by the
board by rule. Upon conclusion of the hearing, the court shall issue the
appropriate order.

(b)
If the person who is subject to the state or local public health officer's
order to receive counseling and testing is not being tested under subsection
(1) of this section, the person shall be given written notice of the order
promptly, personally, and confidentially, stating the grounds and provisions of
the order, including the factual basis therefor. If the person who is subject
to the order is not being tested under subsection (1) of this section and
refuses to comply, the state or local public health officer may petition the
superior court for a hearing. The hearing on the petition shall be held within
seventy-two hours of filing the petition, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays, and
holidays. The standard of review for the order is whether substantial exposure
occurred and whether that exposure presents a possible risk of transmission of
the HIV virus as defined by the board by rule. Upon conclusion of the hearing,
the court shall issue the appropriate order.

(c)
The state or local public health officer shall perform counseling and testing
under this subsection if he or she finds that the exposure was substantial and
presents a possible risk as defined by the board of health by rule or if he or
she is ordered to do so by a court.

(d)
The counseling and testing required under this subsection shall be completed as
soon as possible after the substantial exposure or after an order is issued by
a court, but shall begin not later than seventy-two hours after the substantial
exposure or an order is issued by the court.

(5)(a)
Any employee identified in subsection (1)(d) of this section, who has
experienced a substantial exposure to the bodily fluids of an offender,
arrested person, or detained person covered under subsection (1)(d) of this
section, may seek the consent of the person to whose bodily fluids he or she
was exposed for HIV and hepatitis testing. If the person consents to be
tested, he or she shall consent to disclosure of the results of the test by the
public health official to the person exposed by the fluids and as otherwise
required by law.

If
the person does not consent to testing or is released prior to a request for
consent, the officer or identified employee may petition the court for an order
that the local health department shall conduct or cause to be conducted pretest
counseling, testing for HIV, hepatitis B, and hepatitis C, and posttest
counseling for the person to whose bodily fluids they were substantially
exposed, within forty-eight hours after exposure. The court shall enter a
written order granting or denying the petition. The court shall include in its
order a statement that if a test is conducted on the person for whom the order
is sought, a result that indicates no HIV antibodies are present should not be
construed as a determination that HIV is not present.

(b)
Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section and (a) of this subsection,
where the officer or other employee is unaware of the substantial exposure, or
is unable to seek consent or file a timely petition with the court, the time
shall be tolled until forty-eight hours after the person should reasonably
become aware of the exposure or is reasonably able to seek consent and file a petition
for testing.

(c)
The forty-eight hour periods specified in this section shall be computed by
excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays.

(6) Consent of the persons tested under this section is not
required.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.24.360 and 1988 c 206 s 706 are each amended to read as follows:

Jail
administrators, ((with the approval of)) after consultation with and
receiving written recommendations from the local public health officer, may
order pretest counseling, HIV testing, and posttest counseling for persons
detained in the jail if the ((local public health officer)) jail
administrator determines that actual or threatened behavior presents a
possible risk to the staff, general public, or other persons. ((Approval of
the local public health officer shall be based on RCW 70.24.024(3) and may be
contested through RCW 70.24.024(4).)) The jail administrator shall
establish, pursuant to RCW 70.48.071, a procedure to document the possible risk
((which)) that is the basis for the HIV testing. "Possible
risk," as used in this section, shall be defined by the jail
administrator after consultation with the board ((in rule)). Possible
risk, as used in the documentation of the behavior, or threat thereof,
shall be reviewed with the person ((to try to assure that the person
understands the basis for testing)).

Sec.
3. RCW
70.24.024 and 1988 c 206 s 909 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to the provisions of this chapter, the state and local public health
officers or their authorized representatives may examine and counsel or cause
to be examined and counseled persons reasonably believed to be infected with or
to have been exposed to a sexually transmitted disease.

(2)
Orders or restrictive measures directed to persons with a sexually transmitted
disease shall be used as the last resort when other measures to protect the
public health have failed, including reasonable efforts, which shall be
documented, to obtain the voluntary cooperation of the person who may be
subject to such an order. The orders and measures shall be applied serially
with the least intrusive measures used first. The burden of proof shall be on
the state or local public health officer to show that specified grounds exist
for the issuance of the orders or restrictive measures and that the terms and
conditions imposed are no more restrictive than necessary to protect the public
health.

(3)
When the state or local public health officer within his or her respective jurisdiction
knows or has reason to believe, because of direct medical knowledge or reliable
testimony of others in a position to have direct knowledge of a person's
behavior, that a person has a sexually transmitted disease and is engaging in
specified conduct, as determined by the board by rule based upon generally
accepted standards of medical and public health science, that endangers the
public health, he or she shall conduct an investigation in accordance with
procedures prescribed by the board to evaluate the specific facts alleged, if
any, and the reliability and credibility of the person or persons providing
such information and, if satisfied that the allegations are true, he or she may
issue an order according to the following priority to:

(a)
Order a person to submit to a medical examination or testing, seek counseling,
or obtain medical treatment for curable diseases, or any combination of these,
within a period of time determined by the public health officer, not to exceed
fourteen days.

(b)
Order a person to immediately cease and desist from specified conduct ((which))
that endangers the health of others by imposing such restrictions upon
the person as are necessary to prevent the specified conduct that endangers the
health of others only if the public health officer has determined that clear
and convincing evidence exists to believe that such person has been ordered to
report for counseling as provided in (a) of this subsection and continues to
demonstrate behavior ((which)) that endangers the health of
others. Any restriction shall be in writing, setting forth the name of the
person to be restricted and the initial period of time, not to exceed three
months, during which the order shall remain effective, the terms of the restrictions,
and such other conditions as may be necessary to protect the public health.
Restrictions shall be imposed in the least-restrictive manner necessary to
protect the public health.

(4)(a)
Upon the issuance of any order by the state or local public health officer or
an authorized representative pursuant to subsection (3) of this section or RCW
70.24.340(4) to a person who is not being tested under RCW 70.24.340(1),
such public health officer shall give written notice promptly, personally, and
confidentially to the person who is the subject of the order stating the
grounds and provisions of the order, including the factual bases therefor, the
evidence relied upon for proof of infection and dangerous behavior, and the
likelihood of repetition of such behaviors in the absence of such an order, and
notifying the person who is the subject of the order that, if he or she
contests the order, he or she may appear at a judicial hearing on the
enforceability of the order, to be held in superior court. He or she may have
an attorney appear on his or her behalf in the hearing at public expense, if
necessary. The hearing shall be held within seventy-two hours of receipt of
the notice, unless the person subject to the order agrees to comply. If the
person contests the order, no invasive medical procedures shall be carried out
prior to a hearing being held pursuant to this subsection. If the person does
not contest the order within seventy-two hours of receiving it, and the person
does not comply with the order within the time period specified for compliance
with the order, the state or local public health officer may request a warrant
be issued by the superior court to insure appearance at the hearing. The
hearing shall be within seventy-two hours of the expiration date of the time
specified for compliance with the original order. The burden of proof shall be
on the public health officer to show by clear and convincing evidence that the
specified grounds exist for the issuance of the order and for the need for compliance
and that the terms and conditions imposed therein are no more restrictive than
necessary to protect the public health. Upon conclusion of the hearing, the
court shall issue appropriate orders affirming, modifying, or dismissing the
order.

(b)
If the superior court dismisses the order of the public health officer, the
fact that the order was issued shall be expunged from the records of the
department or local department of health.

(5) Any hearing conducted pursuant to this section shall be closed
and confidential unless a public hearing is requested by the person who is the
subject of the order, in which case the hearing will be conducted in open
court. Unless in open hearing, any transcripts or records relating thereto
shall also be confidential and may be sealed by the order of the court.

---
END ---