BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the population of the Puget Sound region will grow by
more than one million by the year 2010, and that current and new residents will
seek greater opportunities for outdoor recreation within a reasonable distance
from their homes. Changing demographics, healthier and more active lifestyles,
and improvements in recreation technology will all lead to growing public
demand for areas and facilities in which to recreate. The western slope
Cascade foothills from the international border south through Thurston county
provides a wealth of existing and potential outdoor recreation areas that are
close to the great majority of the urbanized areas of Puget Sound. Within this
area are many public lands, including state park units, that may provide the
nucleus for a network of lands accessible for dispersed recreational uses by
people of all ages, physical capacities, and recreational preferences.

The
legislature further finds that the Cascade foothills are home to many permanent
residents who benefit from the natural resource and lifestyle amenities of the
foothills, and that expanding recreational opportunities in the foothills must
be consistent with the long-term sustainability of the local economies. The
west slope foothills also are an integral part of the "mountains to
sound" region and provide significant benefits to the entire region,
including watershed protection, wildlife habitat, flood damage reduction, and
scenic values. A review of outdoor recreational needs and opportunities in the
foothills should include consideration of these benefits and the need for
protection of these functions and values.

This
act has two purposes. The first is to recognize the significant outdoor
recreation potential of this area by designating the Cascade foothills
recreation area as an area of state-wide importance for its recreational,
scenic, natural, and cultural values. The second is to create the Cascade
foothills task force to study and make recommendations for creating greater
recreational opportunities on public lands within this area, and to promote
greater intergovernmental and public and private coordination among managers of
outdoor recreation lands and facilities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout sections 3 through 5 of this act
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Cascade foothills" means generally the nonurbanized within the
Cascade range and drainages lying between three hundred and three thousand feet
above mean sea level, and located within the counties of Whatcom, Skagit,
Snohomish, King, Pierce, and Thurston. Lands lying at lower elevations that
are in the immediate vicinity of the foothills area, such as lower drainages,
are also included within this term. These lands include public lands that are
devoted to developed, nonrecreational uses. This definition is provided solely
to guide the Cascade foothills task force in the geographic definition of its
study responsibilities and confers no authority upon any entity other than the
task force for the study purposes of this chapter.

(2)
"Task force" means the Cascade foothills task force.

(3)
"Counties" includes the counties of Whatcom, Skagit, Snohomish, King,
Pierce, and Thurston.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
legislature designates the "Cascade foothills recreation area," which
shall encompass generally the nonurbanized, nondeveloped lands lying within the
Cascade foothills. The area is designated solely to guide the study
responsibilities of the Cascade foothills task force.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
There is created the Cascade foothills task force. The task force shall be
composed of nineteen members as follows:

(a)
A total of six members, one being appointed by each of the governing bodies of
the six counties comprising the conservation area;

(b)
The chair of the Washington parks and recreation commission, serving ex
officio;

(c)
The commissioner of public lands, or the commissioner's designee, serving ex
officio;

(d)
The chair of the fish and wildlife commission, serving ex officio;

(e)
The supervisor of the Mt. Baker/Snoqualmie national forest, or such other
representative of federal land managing agencies within the foothills area
designated by such agencies;

(f)
Two members of the senate, one from each major caucus, appointed by the
president of the senate;

(g)
Two members of the house of representatives, one from each major caucus,
appointed by the co-speakers; and

(h)
Six members appointed by the governor from the public at large, to provide the
task force with a diversity of experience and views regarding recreational uses
of public lands in the Cascade foothills.

(2)
The task force shall review and make recommendations on the existing and future
outdoor recreational needs and opportunities in the Cascade foothills,
recognizing the important functions and values that are provided by these
lands. This shall include wildlife habitat, watershed protection, flood damage
protection, scenic enjoyment, and economic uses, as well as the means by which
more effective use of existing public lands in the foothills, assisted by
willing private providers of outdoor recreation facilities, may serve to meet
these needs. To this end the study should include:

(a)
An assessment of the existing and the twenty-year growth projection for
recreational demand of the population residing within one-hour driving time
from the Cascade foothills. This assessment shall include the types of
recreational uses anticipated, demographic projects of recreational users, and
developed facilities needed to serve such uses;

(b)
An inventory of existing facilities and lands accessible for recreational use
within the Cascade foothills;

(c)
A review of existing local, regional, state, federal, private, and
nongovernmental nonprofit entities providing outdoor recreation facilities
within the Cascade foothills and their coordination in meeting public outdoor
recreation demand, as well as the role of public education of recreational
users to avoid land damage;

(d)
A review of state lands within the Cascade foothills that may be managed
principally or in part for outdoor recreation uses as a unit of a Cascade
foothills state park, and recommendations for transitioning to such management;

(e)
An assessment of existing wildlife and conservation functions and values to use
in evaluating the potential compatibility of proposed recreational uses and
activities, and planning techniques to avoid land damage in developing and
using recreational facilities;

(f)
Recommendations for a regional entity to promote expanded outdoor recreation
opportunities within the Cascade foothills, in coordination with an expanded
state park system within the Cascade foothills; and

(g)
Methods to fund local, regional, and state outdoor recreation programs and
facilities within the Cascade foothills.

(3)
The governor, in consultation with the counties, shall provide for initial
staffing for the task force, and the task force shall address ongoing staff and
funding needs in the work plan and budget required under section 5 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
In conducting the study in section 4 of this act, the task force shall consult
with the governing bodies of the counties and cities within the Cascade
foothills area. The task force shall hold its meetings within or in the
immediate vicinity of the Cascade foothills. Such meetings shall be open to
the public and provide maximum opportunity for public participation.

(2) The commission's initial emphasis shall be upon scheduling its
work and compiling the information needed to conduct the assessments and
reviews specified in section 4 of this act. The task force shall provide an
initial work plan and budget to the fiscal and parks committees of the senate
and house of representatives by November 1, 1999. A final report and
recommendations shall be provided no later than December 15, 2001.

---
END ---