BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW 82.08.0283
and 1998 c 168 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of:

(1)
Insulin;

(2)
Prosthetic devices and the components thereof;

(3)
Dental appliances, devices, restorations, and substitutes, and the
components thereof, including but not limited to full and partial dentures,
crowns, inlays, fillings, braces, and retainers;

(4)
Orthotic devices prescribed for an individual by a person licensed under
chapters 18.25, 18.57, or 18.71 RCW;

(5)
Hearing instruments dispensed or fitted by a person licensed or certified
under chapter 18.35 RCW, and the components thereof;

(6)
Medicines of mineral, animal, and botanical origin prescribed, administered,
dispensed, or used in the treatment of an individual by a person licensed under
chapter 18.36A RCW;

(7)
Ostomic items;

(8)
Durable medical equipment, including, but not limited to, wheelchairs, hospital
beds, standing aids, walking aids, lifting chairs connected and used in
conjunction with a lifting device, modifications to motor vehicles to enable a
person of disability to operate or be transported, and parts and accessories of
all such durable medical equipment; and

(9)
Medically prescribed oxygen, including, but not limited to, oxygen
concentrator systems, oxygen enricher systems, liquid oxygen systems, and
gaseous, bottled oxygen systems prescribed for an individual by a person
licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW for use in the medical treatment of
that individual.

In
addition, the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to charges made for
labor and services rendered in respect to the repairing, cleaning, altering, or
improving of any of the items exempted under this section.

Sec.
2. RCW
82.12.0277 and 1998 c 168 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to:

(1)
The use of insulin;

(2)
Prosthetic devices and the components thereof;

(3)
Dental appliances, devices, restorations, and substitutes, and the
components thereof, including but not limited to full and partial dentures,
crowns, inlays, fillings, braces, and retainers;

(4)
Orthotic devices prescribed for an individual by a person licensed under
chapters 18.25, 18.57, or 18.71 RCW;

(5)
Hearing instruments dispensed or fitted by a person licensed or certified
under chapter 18.35 RCW, and the components thereof;

(6)
Medicines of mineral, animal, and botanical origin prescribed, administered,
dispensed, or used in the treatment of an individual by a person licensed under
chapter 18.36A RCW;

(7)
Ostomic items;

(8)
Durable medical equipment, including, but not limited to, wheelchairs, hospital
beds, standing aids, walking aids, lifting chairs connected and used in
conjunction with a lifting device, modifications to motor vehicles to enable a
person of disability to operate or be transported, and parts and accessories of
all such durable medical equipment; and

(9)
Medically prescribed oxygen, including, but not limited to, oxygen
concentrator systems, oxygen enricher systems, liquid oxygen systems, and
gaseous, bottled oxygen systems prescribed for an individual by a person
licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW for use in the medical treatment of
that individual.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act takes effect August 1, 1999.

---
END ---