BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 39.33 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
An agency as defined in subsection (3) of this section may donate to any school
district or educational service district surplus computers and computer-related
equipment.

(2)
The office of superintendent of public instruction and the department of
general administration shall jointly, by September 1, 1999, develop guidelines
and distribution standards for the purpose of implementing subsection (1) of
this section. The guidelines and distribution standards shall include
considerations for quality, school-district need, and accountability.

(3)
"Agency" means any state board, commission, bureau, committee,
department, institution, division, or tribunal in the executive or judicial
branch of state government, including those institutions of higher education
created and supported by the state government, and those courts that are parts
of state government.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.19.1919 and 1997 c 264 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as provided in RCW 28A.335.180 ((and)), 43.19.1920, and
section 1 of this act, the division of purchasing shall sell or exchange
personal property belonging to the state for which the agency, office,
department, or educational institution having custody thereof has no further
use, at public or private sale, and cause the moneys realized from the sale of
any such property to be paid into the fund from which such property was
purchased or, if such fund no longer exists, into the state general fund:
PROVIDED, Sales of capital assets may be made by the division of purchasing and
a credit established in central stores for future purchases of capital items as
provided for in RCW 43.19.190 through 43.19.1939, as now or hereafter amended:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That personal property, excess to a state agency, including
educational institutions, shall not be sold or disposed of prior to reasonable
efforts by the division of purchasing to determine if other state agencies have
a requirement for such personal property. Such determination shall follow
sufficient notice to all state agencies to allow adequate time for them to make
their needs known. Surplus items may be disposed of without prior notification
to state agencies if it is determined by the director of general administration
to be in the best interest of the state. The division of purchasing shall
maintain a record of disposed surplus property, including date and method of
disposal, identity of any recipient, and approximate value of the property:
PROVIDED, FURTHER, That this section shall not apply to personal property
acquired by a state organization under federal grants and contracts if in
conflict with special title provisions contained in such grants or contracts.

This
section does not apply to property under RCW 27.53.045.

Sec.
3. RCW
28A.335.180 and 1997 c 264 s 1 and 1997 c 104 s 1 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:

(1)
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, school districts, educational
service districts, or any other state or local governmental agency concerned
with education, when declaring texts and other books, equipment, materials or
relocatable facilities as surplus, shall, prior to other disposal thereof,
serve notice in writing in a newspaper of general circulation in the school
district and to any public school district or private school in Washington
state annually requesting such a notice, that the same is available for sale,
rent, or lease to public school districts or approved private schools, at
depreciated cost or fair market value, whichever is greater: PROVIDED, That
students wishing to purchase texts pursuant to RCW 28A.320.230(2) shall have
priority as to such texts. The notice requirement in this section does not
apply to the sale or transfer of assistive devices under RCW 28A.335.205 or
chapter 72.40 RCW. Such districts or agencies shall not otherwise sell, rent
or lease such surplus property to any person, firm, organization, or
nongovernmental agency for at least thirty days following publication of notice
in a newspaper of general circulation in the school district.

(2)
In lieu of complying with subsection (1) of this section, school districts and
educational service districts may elect to grant surplus personal property to a
federal, state, or local governmental entity, or to indigent persons, at no
cost on the condition the property be used for preschool through twelfth grade
educational purposes, or elect to loan surplus personal property to a
nonreligious, nonsectarian private entity on the condition the property be used
for the preschool through twelfth grade education of members of the public on a
nondiscriminatory basis.

(3) The office of superintendent of public instruction may
donate surplus computers in accordance with section 1 of this act.

---
END ---