BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
41.32.570 and 1997 c 254 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
If a retiree enters employment with an employer sooner than one calendar month
after his or her accrual date, the retiree's monthly retirement allowance will
be reduced by five and one-half percent for every seven hours worked during
that month. This reduction will be applied each month until the retiree
remains absent from employment with an employer for one full calendar month.

(b)
The benefit reduction provided in (a) of this subsection will accrue for a
maximum of one hundred forty hours per month. Any monthly benefit reduction
over one hundred percent will be applied to the benefit the retiree is eligible
to receive in subsequent months.

(2)
Any retired teacher or retired administrator who enters service in any public
educational institution in Washington state and who has satisfied the break in
employment requirement of subsection (1) of this section shall cease to receive
pension payments while engaged in such service: PROVIDED, That service may be
rendered up to five hundred twenty-five hours per school year without reduction
of pension.

(3)
In addition to the five hundred twenty-five hours of service permitted under
subsection (2) of this section, a retired teacher or retired administrator may
also serve only as a substitute teacher for up to an additional ((one
hundred five)) three hundred fifteen hours per school year without
reduction of pension if:

(a)
A school district, which is not a member of a multidistrict substitute
cooperative, determines that it has exhausted or can reasonably anticipate that
it will exhaust its list of qualified and available substitutes and the school
board of the district adopts a resolution to make its substitute teachers who
are retired teachers or retired administrators eligible for the ((additional
one hundred five hours of)) extended service once the list of qualified and
available substitutes has been exhausted. The resolution by the school
district shall state that the services of retired teachers and retired
administrators are necessary to address the shortage of qualified and available
substitutes. The resolution shall be valid only for the school year in which it
is adopted. The district shall forward a copy of the resolution with a list of
retired teachers and retired administrators who have been employed as
substitute teachers to the department and may notify the retired teachers and
retired administrators included on the list of their right to take advantage of
the provisions of this subsection; or

(b)
A multidistrict substitute cooperative determines that the school districts
have exhausted or can reasonably anticipate that they will exhaust their list
of qualified and available substitutes and each of the school boards adopts a
resolution to make their substitute teachers who are retired teachers or
retired administrators eligible for the extended service once the list of
qualified and available substitutes has been exhausted. The resolutions by
each of the school districts shall state that the services of retired teachers
and retired administrators are necessary to address the shortage of qualified
and available substitutes. The resolutions shall be valid only for the school
year in which they are adopted. The cooperative shall forward a copy of the
resolutions with a list of retired teachers and retired administrators who have
been employed as substitute teachers to the department and may notify the retired
teachers and retired administrators included on the list of their right to take
advantage of the provisions of this subsection.

(4)
In addition to the five hundred twenty-five hours of service permitted under
subsection (2) of this section, a retired administrator or retired teacher may
also serve as a substitute administrator up to an additional one hundred five
hours per school year without reduction of pension if a school district board
of directors adopts a resolution declaring that the services of a retired
administrator or retired teacher are necessary because it cannot find a
replacement administrator to fill a vacancy. The resolution shall be valid
only for the school year in which it is adopted. The district shall forward a
copy of the resolution with the name of the retired administrator or retired
teacher who has been employed as a substitute administrator to the department.
((However, a retired administrator or retired teacher may not serve more
than a total of one hundred five additional hours per school year pursuant to
subsections (3) and (4) of this section.))

(5)
In addition to the five hundred twenty-five hours of service permitted under
subsection (2) of this section and the one hundred five hours permitted under
subsection (4) of this section, a retired principal may also serve as a
substitute principal up to an additional two hundred ten hours per school year
without a reduction of pension if a school district board of directors adopts a
resolution declaring that the services of a retired principal are necessary
because it cannot find a replacement principal to fill a vacancy. The
resolution shall be valid only for the school year in which it is adopted. The
district shall forward a copy of the resolution with the name of the retired
principal who has been employed as a substitute principal to the department.

(6)
Subsection (2) of this section shall apply to all persons governed by the
provisions of plan I, regardless of the date of their retirement, but shall
apply only to benefits payable after June 11, 1986.

(((6))) (7) Subsection (3) of this section shall
apply to all persons governed by the provisions of plan I, regardless of the
date of their retirement, but shall only apply to benefits payable after
September 1, 1994.

---
END ---