BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.165.030 and 1990 c 33 s 148 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly indicates otherwise the definitions in this section apply
throughout RCW 28A.165.010 through 28A.165.090.

(1)
"Basic skills" means reading, mathematics, and language arts as well
as readiness activities associated with such skills.

(2)
"Placement testing" means the administration of objective measures by
a school district for the purposes of diagnosing the basic skills achievement
levels, determining the basic skills areas of greatest need, and establishing
the learning assistance needs of individual students in conformance with
instructions established by the superintendent of public instruction for such
purposes.

(3)
"Approved program" means a program conducted pursuant to a plan
submitted by a district and approved by the superintendent of public
instruction under RCW 28A.165.040.

(4)
"Participating student" means a student in kindergarten through grade
nine who scores below grade level in basic skills, as determined by placement
testing, and who is identified under RCW 28A.165.050 to receive additional
services or support under an approved program.

(5)
"Basic skills tests" means state-wide tests at the ((fourth and
eighth)) third grade level((s)) established pursuant to RCW
28A.230.190 and eighth grade level established pursuant to RCW 28A.230.230.

Sec.
2. RCW
28A.300.295 and 1996 c 273 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The superintendent of public instruction shall establish a grant
program to provide incentives for teachers, schools, and school districts to
use the identified programs on the approved list in grades kindergarten through
four. Schools, school districts, and educational service districts may apply for
grants. Funds for the grants shall be used for in‑service training and
instructional materials. Grants shall be awarded and funds distributed not
later than June 30, 1997, for programs in the 1996-97 and 1997-98 school
years. Priority shall be given to grant applications involving schools and
school districts with the lowest mean percentile scores on the state-wide ((fourth))
third grade ((assessment)) test required under RCW
28A.230.190 among grant applicants.

---
END ---