BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART I

DEFINITIONS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 101. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this title unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Commission" means the state parks and recreation commission.

(2)
"Chair" means the member of the commission elected pursuant to RCW
43.51.030 (as recodified by this act).

(3)
"Director" and "director of the state parks and recreation
commission" mean the director of parks and recreation or the director's
designee.

(4)
"Recreation" means those activities of a voluntary and leisure time
nature that aid in promoting entertainment, pleasure, play, relaxation, or
instruction.

(5)
"Natural forest" means a forest that faithfully represents, or is
meant to become representative of, its unaltered state.

PART II

GENERAL POLICIES

Sec.
201. RCW
43.51.030 and 1965 c 8 s 43.51.030 are each amended to read as follows:

The
commission shall elect one of its members as ((chairman)) chair.
The commission may be convened at such times as the ((chairman)) chair
deems necessary, and a majority shall constitute a quorum for the transaction
of business.

PART III

DUTIES AND POWERS OF THE COMMISSION

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 301. In
addition to whatever other duties may exist in law or be imposed in the future,
it is the duty of the commission to:

(1)
Implement integrated pest management practices and regulate pests as required
by RCW 17.15.020;

(2)
Take steps necessary to control spartina and purple loosestrife as required by
RCW 17.26.020;

(3)
Participate in the implementation of chapter 19.02 RCW;

(4)
Coordinate planning and provide staffing and administrative assistance to the
Lewis and Clark trail committee as required by RCW 27.34.340;

(5)
Administer those portions of chapter 46.10 RCW not dealing with registration
and licensing of snowmobiles as required by RCW 46.10.210;

(6)
Consult and participate in the scenic and recreational highway system as
required by chapter 47.39 RCW; and

(7)
Develop, prepare, and distribute information relating to marine oil recycling
tanks and sewage holding tank pumping stations, in cooperation with other
departments, as required by chapter 88.02 RCW.

The
commission has the power reasonably necessary to carry out these duties.

Sec.
302. RCW
43.51.040 and 1989 c 175 s 106 are each amended to read as follows:

The
commission shall:

(1)
Have the care, charge, control, and supervision of all parks and parkways acquired
or set aside by the state for park or parkway purposes.

(2)
Adopt policies, ((promulgate)) and adopt, issue, and
enforce rules pertaining to the use, care, and administration of state parks
and parkways. The commission shall cause a copy of the rules to be kept posted
in a conspicuous place in every state park to which they are applicable, but
failure to post or keep any rule posted shall be no defense to any prosecution
for the violation thereof.

(3)
Permit the use of state parks and parkways by the public under such rules as
shall be adopted.

(4)
Clear, drain, grade, seed, and otherwise improve or beautify parks and
parkways, and erect structures, buildings, fireplaces, and comfort stations and
build and maintain paths, trails, and roadways through or on parks and
parkways.

(5)
Grant concessions or leases in state parks and parkways, upon such rentals,
fees, or percentage of income or profits and for such terms, in no event longer
than forty years, and upon such conditions as shall be approved by the
commission: PROVIDED, That leases exceeding a twenty-year term shall require a
unanimous vote of the commission: PROVIDED FURTHER, That if, during the term
of any concession or lease, it is the opinion of the commission that it would
be in the best interest of the state, the commission may, with the consent of
the concessionaire or lessee, alter and amend the terms and conditions of such
concession or lease: PROVIDED FURTHER, That television station leases shall be
subject to the provisions of RCW 43.51.063 (as recodified by this act),
only: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the rates of such concessions or leases shall be
renegotiated at five-year intervals. No concession shall be granted which will
prevent the public from having free access to the scenic attractions of any
park or parkway.

(6)
Employ such assistance as it deems necessary.

(7)
By majority vote of its authorized membership select and purchase or obtain
options upon, lease, or otherwise acquire for and in the name of the state such
tracts of land, including shore and tide lands, for park and parkway purposes
as it deems proper. If the commission cannot acquire any tract at a price it
deems reasonable, it may, by majority vote of its authorized membership, obtain
title thereto, or any part thereof, by condemnation proceedings conducted by
the attorney general as provided for the condemnation of rights of way for
state highways. Option agreements executed under authority of this subdivision
shall be valid only if:

(a)
The cost of the option agreement does not exceed one dollar; and

(b)
Moneys used for the purchase of the option agreement are from (i) funds
appropriated therefor, or (ii) funds appropriated for undesignated land
acquisitions, or (iii) funds deemed by the commission to be in excess of the
amount necessary for the purposes for which they were appropriated; and

(c)
The maximum amount payable for the property upon exercise of the option does
not exceed the appraised value of the property.

(8)
Cooperate with the United States, or any county or city of this state, in any
matter pertaining to the acquisition, development, redevelopment, renovation,
care, control, or supervision of any park or parkway, and enter into contracts
in writing to that end. All parks or parkways, to which the state contributed
or in whose care, control, or supervision the state participated pursuant to
the provisions of this section, shall be governed by the provisions hereof.

Sec.
303. RCW
43.51.045 and 1984 c 82 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The commission shall:

(a)
Manage timber and land under its jurisdiction to maintain and enhance aesthetic
and recreational values;

(b)
Apply modern conservation practices to maintain and enhance aesthetic,
recreational, and ecological resources; and

(c)
Designate and preserve certain forest areas throughout the state as natural
forests or natural areas for interpretation, study, and preservation purposes.

(2)
Trees may be removed from state parks:

(a)
When hazardous to persons, property, or facilities;

(b)
As part of a park maintenance or development project, or conservation practice;

(c)
As part of a road or utility easement; or

(d)
When damaged by a catastrophic forest event.

(3)
Tree removal under subsection (2) of this section shall be done by commission
personnel, unless the personnel lack necessary expertise. Except in
emergencies and when feasible, significant trees shall be removed only after
they have been marked or appraised by a professional forester. The removal of
significant trees from a natural forest may take place only after a public hearing
has been held, except in emergencies.

(4)
When feasible, felled timber shall be left on the ground for natural purposes
or used for park purposes including, but not limited to, building projects,
trail mulching, and firewood. In natural forest areas, first consideration
shall be given to leaving timber on the ground for natural purposes.

(5)
The commission may issue permits to individuals under RCW 4.24.210 and
43.51.065 (as recodified by this act) for the removal of wood debris
from state parks for personal firewood use.

(6)
Only timber that qualifies for cutting or removal under subsection (2) of this
section may be sold. Timber shall be sold only when surplus to the needs of
the park.

(7)
Net revenue derived from timber sales shall be deposited in the state parks
renewal and stewardship account created in RCW 43.51.275 (as recodified by this
act).

Sec.
304. RCW
43.51.046 and 1991 c 11 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
((By July 1, 1992,)) The ((state parks and recreation))
commission shall provide waste reduction and recycling information in each
state park campground and day-use area.

(2)
((By July 1, 1993,)) The commission shall provide recycling
receptacles in the day-use and campground areas of at least ((fifteen)) forty
state parks. The receptacles shall be clearly marked for the disposal of at
least two of the following recyclable materials: Aluminum, glass, newspaper,
plastic, and tin. The commission shall endeavor to provide recycling
receptacles in parks that are near urban centers or in heavily used parks.

(3)
The commission shall provide daily maintenance of such receptacles from April
through September of each year.

(4)
((Beginning July 1, 1993, the commission shall provide recycling receptacles
in at least five additional state parks per biennium until the total number of
state parks having recycling receptacles reaches forty.

(5))) The
commission is authorized to enter into agreements with any person, company, or
nonprofit organization to provide for the collection and transport of
recyclable materials and related activities under this section.

Sec.
305. RCW
43.51.061 and 1969 ex.s. c 31 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

((Notwithstanding
any other provisions of this chapter or of other laws)) No provision of
law relating to the commission((,)) shall prevent the
commission ((may delegate)) from delegating to the director ((of
parks and recreation)) such powers and duties of the commission as they may
deem proper.

Sec.
306. RCW
43.51.060 and 1995 c 211 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
commission may:

(1)
Make rules and regulations for the proper administration of its duties;

(2)
Accept any grants of funds made with or without a matching requirement by the
United States, or any agency thereof, for purposes in keeping with the purposes
of this chapter; accept gifts, bequests, devises and endowments for purposes in
keeping with such purposes; enter into cooperative agreements with and provide
for private nonprofit groups to use state park property and facilities to raise
money to contribute gifts, grants, and support to the commission for the purposes
of this chapter. The commission may assist the nonprofit group in a
cooperative effort by providing necessary agency personnel and services, if
available. However, none of the moneys raised may inure to the benefit of the
nonprofit group, except in furtherance of its purposes to benefit the
commission as provided in this chapter. The agency and the private nonprofit
group shall agree on the nature of any project to be supported by such gift or
grant prior to the use of any agency property or facilities for raising money.
Any such gifts may be in the form of recreational facilities developed or built
in part or in whole for public use on agency property, provided that the
facility is consistent with the purposes of the agency;

(3)
Require certification by the commission of all parks and recreation workers
employed in state aided or state controlled programs;

(4)
Act jointly, when advisable, with the United States, any other state agencies,
institutions, departments, boards, or commissions in order to carry out the
objectives and responsibilities of this chapter;

(5)
Grant franchises and easements for any legitimate purpose on parks or parkways,
for such terms and subject to such conditions and considerations as the
commission shall specify;

(6)
Charge such fees for services, utilities, and use of facilities as the
commission shall deem proper;

(7)
Enter into agreements whereby individuals or companies may rent undeveloped
parks or parkway land for grazing, agricultural, or mineral development purposes
upon such terms and conditions as the commission shall deem proper, for a term
not to exceed ten years;

(8)
Determine the qualifications of and employ a director of parks and recreation
who shall receive a salary as fixed by the governor in accordance with the
provisions of RCW 43.03.040((, and upon his recommendation, a supervisor of
recreation,)) and determine the qualifications and salary of and employ
such other persons as may be needed to carry out the provisions hereof; and

(9)
Without being limited to the powers hereinbefore enumerated, the commission
shall have such other powers as in the judgment of a majority of its members
are deemed necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter: PROVIDED,
That the commission shall not have power to supervise directly any local park
or recreation district, and no funds shall be made available for such purpose.

PART IV

DUTIES OF THE DIRECTOR

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 401. In
addition to other duties the commission may from time to time impose, it is the
duty of the director to:

(1)
Ensure the control of weeds in parks to the extent required by RCW 17.04.160
and 17.10.205; and

(2)
Participate in the operations of the environmental enhancement and job creation
task force under chapter 43.21J RCW.

The
director has the power reasonably necessary to carry out these duties.

Sec.
402. RCW
43.51.052 and 1997 c 137 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The parks improvement account is hereby established in the state treasury.

(2)
The ((parks and recreation)) commission shall deposit all moneys
received from the sale of interpretive, recreational, and historical literature
and materials in this account. Moneys in the account may be spent only for
development, production, and distribution costs associated with literature and
materials.

(3)
Disbursements from the account shall be on the authority of the director ((of
the parks and recreation commission)), or the director's designee. The
account is subject to the allotment procedure provided under chapter 43.88
RCW. No appropriation is required for disbursement of moneys to be used for
support of further production of materials provided for in RCW 43.51.050(2) (as
recodified by this act). The director may transfer a portion of the moneys
in this account to the state parks renewal and stewardship account and may
expend moneys so transferred for any purpose provided for in RCW 43.51.275 (as
recodified by this act).

PART V

PROHIBITED ACTS AND PENALTIES

Sec.
501. RCW
46.61.587 and 1984 c 258 s 329 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
violation of RCW 43.51.320 (as recodified by this act) or 46.61.585 or
any rule ((promulgated)) adopted by the parks and recreation
commission to enforce the provisions thereof ((shall be punished by a fine
of not more than twenty-five dollars)) is a civil infraction as provided
in chapter 7.84 RCW.

Sec.
502. RCW
7.84.010 and 1993 c 244 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature declares that decriminalizing certain offenses
contained in Titles 75, 76, 77, ((and)) 79, and 79A RCW and
chapters 43.30((, 43.51,)) and 88.12 RCW and any rules adopted pursuant
to those titles and chapters would promote the more efficient administration of
those titles and chapters. The purpose of this chapter is to provide a just,
uniform, and efficient procedure for adjudicating those violations which, in
any of these titles and chapters or rules adopted under these chapters or
titles, are declared not to be criminal offenses. The legislature respectfully
requests the supreme court to prescribe any rules of procedure necessary to
implement this chapter.

Sec.
503. RCW
7.84.020 and 1993 c 244 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definition in this section applies
throughout this chapter.

"Infraction"
means an offense which, by the terms of Title 75, 76, 77, ((or)) 79,
or 79A RCW or chapter 43.30((, 43.51,)) or 88.12 RCW and rules
adopted under these titles and chapters, is declared not to be a criminal
offense and is subject to the provisions of this chapter.

PART VI

PROCEDURES FOR DISPOSAL OF PARK LAND

Sec.
601. RCW
43.51.210 and 1998 c 42 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever
the ((state parks and recreation)) commission finds that any land under
its control cannot advantageously be used for park purposes, it is authorized
to dispose of such land by the method provided in this section or by the
method provided in RCW 43.51.200 (as recodified by this act). If such
lands are school or other grant lands, control thereof shall be relinquished by
resolution of the commission to the proper state officials. If such lands were
acquired under restrictive conveyances by which the state may hold them only so
long as they are used for park purposes, they may be returned to the donor or
grantors by the commission. All other such lands may be either sold by the
commission to the highest bidder or exchanged for other lands of equal value by
the commission, and all conveyance documents shall be executed by the
governor. All such exchanges shall be accompanied by a transfer fee, to be set
by the commission and paid by the other party to the transfer; such fee shall
be paid into the parkland acquisition account established under RCW 43.51.200 as
recodified by this act). Sealed bids on all sales shall be solicited at
least twenty days in advance of the sale date by an advertisement appearing at
least in three consecutive issues of a newspaper of general circulation in the
county in which the land to be sold is located. If the commission feels that
no bid received adequately reflects the fair value of the land to be sold, it
may reject all bids, and may call for new bids. All proceeds derived from the
sale of such park property shall be paid into the park land acquisition
account. All land considered for exchange shall be evaluated by the commission
to determine its adaptability to park usage. The equal value of all lands
exchanged shall first be determined by the appraisals to the satisfaction of
the commission: PROVIDED, That no sale or exchange of state park lands shall
be made without the unanimous consent of the commission.

PART VII

VOLUNTEERS

NEW SECTION. Sec. 701. The
commission shall cooperate in implementing and operating the conservation corps
as required by chapter 43.220 RCW.

Sec.
702. RCW
43.220.160 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 40 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is established a conservation corps within the state parks and recreation
commission.

(2)
Specific work project areas of the state parks and recreation conservation
corps may include the following:

(a)
Restoration or development of park facilities;

(b)
Trail construction and maintenance;

(c)
Litter control;

(d)
Park and land rehabilitation;

(e)
Fire suppression;

(f)
Road repair; and

(g)
Other projects as the state parks and recreation commission may determine. If
((appropriation)) appropriate facilities are available, the state
parks and recreation commission may authorize carrying out projects which
involve overnight stays.

PART VIII

SCENIC RIVER SYSTEM

Sec.
801. RCW
79.72.020 and 1994 c 264 s 64 are each amended to read as follows:

The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this
chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
(("Department")) "Commission" means the state
parks and recreation commission.

(2)
"Committee of participating agencies" or "committee" means
a committee composed of the executive head, or the executive's designee, of
each of the state departments of ecology, fish and wildlife, natural resources,
and transportation, the state parks and recreation commission, the interagency
committee for outdoor recreation, the Washington state association of counties,
and the association of Washington cities. In addition, the governor shall
appoint two public members of the committee. Public members of the committee
shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.220 and shall receive
reimbursement for their travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.

When
a specific river or river segment of the state's scenic river system is being
considered by the committee, a representative of each participating local
government associated with that river or river segment shall serve as a member
of the committee.

(3)
"Participating local government" means the legislative authority of
any city or county, a portion of whose territorial jurisdiction is bounded by
or includes a river or river segment of the state's scenic river system.

(4)
"River" means a flowing body of water or a section, segment, or
portion thereof.

(5)
"River area" means a river and the land area in its immediate
environs as established by the participating agencies not exceeding a width of
one-quarter mile landward from the streamway on either side of the river.

(6)
"Scenic easement" means the negotiated right to control the use of
land, including the air space above the land, for the purpose of protecting the
scenic view throughout the visual corridor.

(7)
"Streamway" means that stream-dependent corridor of single or
multiple, wet or dry, channel or channels within which the usual seasonal or
stormwater run-off peaks are contained, and within which environment the flora,
fauna, soil, and topography is dependent on or influenced by the height and
velocity of the fluctuating river currents.

(8)
"System" means all the rivers and river areas in the state designated
by the legislature for inclusion as scenic rivers but does not include
tributaries of a designated river unless specifically included by the
legislature. The inclusion of a river in the system does not mean that other
rivers or tributaries in a drainage basin shall be required to be part of the
management program developed for the system unless the rivers and tributaries
within the drainage basin are specifically designated for inclusion by the
legislature.

(9) "Visual corridor" means that area which can be seen
in a normal summer month by a person of normal vision walking either bank of a
river included in the system. The visual corridor shall not exceed the river
area.

Sec.
802. RCW
79.72.030 and 1977 ex.s. c 161 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The ((department)) commission shall develop and adopt management
policies for publicly owned or leased land on the rivers designated by the
legislature as being a part of the state's scenic river system and within the
associated river areas. The ((department)) commission may adopt
((regulations)) rules identifying river classifications which
reflect the characteristics common to various segments of scenic rivers and may
adopt management policies consistent with local government's shoreline
management master plans appropriate for each such river classification. All
such policies shall be subject to review by the committee of participating
agencies. Once such a policy has been approved by a majority vote of the
committee members, it shall be adopted by the ((department)) commission
in accordance with the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, as now or hereafter
amended. Any variance with such a policy by any public agency shall be
authorized only by the approval of the committee of participating agencies by
majority vote, and shall be made only to alleviate unusual hardships unique to
a given segment of the system.

(2)
Any policies developed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall include
management plans for protecting ecological, economic, recreational, aesthetic,
botanical, scenic, geological, hydrological, fish and wildlife, historical,
cultural, archaeological, and scientific features of the rivers designated as
being in the system. Such policies shall also include management plans to
encourage any nonprofit group, organization, association, person, or
corporation to develop and adopt programs for the purpose of increasing fish
propagation.

(3)
The committee of participating agencies shall, by two-thirds majority vote,
identify on a river by river basis any publicly owned or leased lands which could
be included in a river area of the system but which are developed in a manner
unsuitable for land to be managed as part of the system. The ((department))
commission shall exclude lands so identified from the provisions of any
management policies implementing the provisions of this chapter.

(4)
The committee of participating agencies, by majority vote, shall determine the
boundaries which shall define the river area associated with any included
river. With respect to the rivers named in RCW 79.72.080 (as recodified by
this act), the committee shall make such determination, and those
determinations authorized by subsection (3) of this section, within one year of
September 21, 1977.

(5)
Before making a decision regarding the river area to be included in the system,
a variance in policy, or the excluding of land from the provisions of the
management policies, the committee shall hold hearings in accord with chapter
34.05 RCW, with at least one public hearing to be held in the general locale of
the river under consideration. The ((department)) commission
shall cause to be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the area
which includes the river or rivers to be considered, a description, including a
map showing such river or rivers, of the material to be considered at the
public hearing. Such notice shall appear at least twice in the time period
between two and four weeks prior to the public hearing.

(6)
Meetings of the committee shall be called by the ((department)) commission
or by written petition signed by five or more of the committee members. The ((chairman))
chair of the ((parks and recreation)) commission or the ((chairman's))
chair's designee shall serve as the ((chairman)) chair of
any meetings of the committee held to implement the provisions of this chapter.

The
committee shall seek and receive comments from the public regarding potential
additions to the system, shall initiate studies, and may, through the ((department))
commission, submit to any session of the legislature proposals for
additions to the state scenic river system. These proposals shall be
accompanied by a detailed report on the factors which, in the committee's
judgment, make an area a worthy addition to the system.

Sec.
803. RCW 79.72.040
and 1989 c 175 s 169 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The management program for the system shall be administered by the ((department))
commission. The ((department)) commission shall have the
responsibility for coordinating the development of the program between affected
state agencies and participating local governments, and shall develop and adopt
rules, in accord with chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure Act, for
each portion of the system, which shall implement the management policies. In
developing rules for a specific river in the system, the ((department)) commission
shall hold at least one public hearing in the general locale of the river under
consideration. The hearing may constitute the hearing required by chapter
34.05 RCW. The ((department)) commission shall cause a brief
summary of the proposed rules to be published twice in a newspaper of general
circulation in the area that includes the river to be considered in the period
of time between two and four weeks prior to the public hearing. In addition to
the foregoing required publication, the ((department)) commission
shall also provide notice of the hearings, rules, and decisions of the ((department))
commission to radio and television stations and major local newspapers
in the areas that include the river to be considered.

(2)
In addition to any other powers granted to carry out the intent of this
chapter, the ((department)) commission is authorized, subject to
approval by majority vote of the members of the committee, to: (a) Purchase,
within the river area, real property in fee or any lesser right or interest in
real property including, but not limited to scenic easements and future
development rights, visual corridors, wildlife habitats, unique ecological areas,
historical sites, camping and picnic areas, boat launching sites, and/or
easements abutting the river for the purpose of preserving or enhancing the
river or facilitating the use of the river by the public for fishing, boating
and other water related activities; and (b) purchase, outside of a river area,
public access to the river area.

The
right of eminent domain shall not be utilized in any purchase made pursuant to
this section.

(3)
The ((department)) commission is further authorized to: (a)
Acquire by gift, devise, grant, or dedication the fee, an option to purchase, a
right of first refusal or any other lesser right or interest in real property
and upon acquisition such real property shall be held and managed within the
scenic river system; and (b) accept grants, contributions, or funds from any
agency, public or private, or individual for the purposes of this chapter.

(4) The ((department)) commission is hereby vested
with the power to obtain injunctions and other appropriate relief against
violations of any provisions of this chapter and any rules adopted under this
section or agreements made under the provisions of this chapter.

Sec.
804. RCW
79.72.050 and 1977 ex.s. c 161 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All state government agencies and local governments are hereby directed to
pursue policies with regard to their respective activities, functions, powers,
and duties which are designed to conserve and enhance the conditions of rivers
which have been included in the system, in accordance with the management
policies and the rules ((and regulations)) adopted by the ((department))
commission for such rivers. Local agencies are directed to pursue such
policies with respect to all lands in the river area owned or leased by such
local agencies. Nothing in this chapter shall authorize the modification of a
shoreline management plan adopted by a local government and approved by the
state pursuant to chapter 90.58 RCW without the approval of the department of
ecology and local government. The policies adopted pursuant to this chapter
shall be integrated, as fully as possible, with those of the shoreline
management act of 1971.

(2)
Nothing in this chapter shall grant to the committee of participating agencies
or the ((department)) commission the power to restrict the use of
private land without either the specific written consent of the owner thereof
or the acquisition of rights in real property authorized by RCW 79.72.040 (as
recodified by this act).

(3)
Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit the department of natural resources from
exercising its full responsibilities and obligations for the management of
state trust lands.

PART IX

ACQUIRING AND DEVELOPING PARK HOLDINGS

Sec.
901. RCW
43.51.070 and 1965 c 8 s 43.51.070 are each amended to read as follows:

The
commission may receive and accept donations of lands for state park purposes,
and shall ((have)) be responsible for the management and control
of all lands so acquired. It may from time to time recommend to the
legislature the acquisition of lands for park purposes by purchase or
condemnation.

Sec.
902. RCW
43.51.080 and 1965 c 8 s 43.51.080 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever
any tract of land not exceeding one hundred acres in area considered as a whole
regardless of ownership, ((situated in a county composed entirely of islands
and)) bounded on two or more sides by an established state park, shall in
the judgment of the commission be desirable for state park purposes, the
commission may lease, purchase, or condemn said tract for park purposes and
incorporate it within the adjoining established park: PROVIDED, That nothing
in ((this act [1925 ex.s. c 92])) chapter 92, Laws of 1925 ex. sess.
shall in any manner abridge the full effect of any existing powers heretofore
granted to the ((state parks and recreation)) commission.

Sec.
903. RCW
43.51.110 and 1965 c 8 s 43.51.110 are each amended to read as follows:

The
commissioner of public lands may, upon his or her own motion, and shall,
when directed so to do by the ((state parks and recreation)) commission,
withdraw from sale any land held by the state and not acquired directly from
the United States with reservations as to the manner of sale thereof and the
purposes for which it may be sold, and certify to the commission that such land
is withheld from sale pursuant to the terms of this section.

All
such land shall be under the care, charge, control, and supervision of the ((state
parks and recreation)) commission, and after appraisal in such manner as
the commission directs may be exchanged for land of equal value ((abutting
upon a public highway)), and to this end the ((chairman)) chair
and secretary of the commission may execute deeds of conveyance in the name of
the state.

Sec.
904. RCW
43.51.140 and 1982 c 156 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
such individual, group, organization, agency, club, or association desiring to
obtain such permit shall make application therefor in writing to the
commission, describing the lands proposed to be improved and stating the nature
of the proposed improvement. Prior to granting a permit, the commission shall
determine that the applicants are ((persons of good standing in the
community in which they reside)) likely to actually improve the park,
parkway, or land subject to the application.

Sec.
905. RCW
43.51.220 and 1965 c 8 s 43.51.220 are each amended to read as follows:

To
encourage the development of the Puget Sound country as a recreational boating
area, the commission is authorized to establish landing, launch ramp,
and other facilities for small pleasure boats at places on Puget Sound
frequented by such boats and where the commission shall find such facilities
will be of greatest advantage to the users of pleasure boats. The commission
is authorized to acquire land or to make use of lands belonging to the state
for such purposes, and to construct the necessary floats, launch ramp,
and other desirable structures and to make such further development of any area
used in connection therewith as in the judgment of the commission is best
calculated to facilitate the public enjoyment thereof.

Sec.
906. RCW
43.51.237 and 1997 c 150 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The commission shall develop a cost-effective plan to identify historic
archaeological resources in at least one state park containing a military fort
located in Puget Sound. The plan shall include the use of a professional
archaeologist and volunteer citizens. ((By December 1, 1997, the commission
shall submit a brief report to the appropriate standing committees of the
legislature on how the plan will be implemented and the cost of the plan.))

(2)
Any park land that is made available for use by recreational metal detectors
under this section shall count toward the requirements established in RCW
43.51.235 (as recodified by this act).

Sec.
907. RCW
43.51.270 and 1995 c 211 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of natural resources and the ((state parks and recreation))
commission shall have authority to negotiate ((a)) sales to the
((state parks and recreation)) commission, for park and outdoor
recreation purposes, of trust lands at fair market value.

(2)
The department of natural resources and the ((state parks and recreation))
commission shall negotiate a sale to the ((state parks and recreation))
commission of the lands and timber thereon identified in the joint study under
section 4, chapter 163, Laws of 1985, and commonly referred to as the Point
Lawrence trust property, San Juan county C on the
extreme east point of Orcas Island. Timber conservation and management
practices provided for in RCW 43.51.045 and 43.51.395 (as recodified by this
act) shall govern the management of land and timber transferred under this
subsection as of the effective date of the transfer, upon payment for the
property, and nothing in this chapter shall be construed as restricting or
otherwise modifying the department of natural resources' management, control,
or use of such land and timber until such date.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 908. The
commission is authorized to evaluate and acquire land under RCW 79.01.612 in
cooperation with the department of natural resources.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 909. The
commission may select land held by the department of natural resources for
acquisition under RCW 79.08.102 (as recodified by this act) et seq.

PART X

SPECIAL PARKS‑-YAKIMA RIVER CONSERVATION AREA

Sec.
1001. RCW
43.51.948 and 1977 ex.s. c 75 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

For
the purposes of RCW 43.51.946 through 43.51.956, the Yakima river conservation
area is to contain no more than the area delineated in appendix D on pages D-3,
D-4, D-6, D-7, D-9, and D-10 of the report entitled "The Yakima River
Regional Greenway" which resulted from the Yakima river study authorized
in section 170, chapter 269, Laws of 1975, first extraordinary session. This
area is also defined as sections 12 and 17, township 13 north, range 18 east totaling
approximately 18.0 acres, sections 7, 17, 18, 20, 21, 28, 29, 32, 33, township
13 north, range 19 east totaling approximately 936.0 acres, and sections 4, 5,
8, 9, 17, township 12 north, range 19 east totaling approximately 793.7 acres.

PART XI

SPECIAL PARKS‑-SEASHORE CONSERVATION AREA

Sec.
1101. RCW
43.51.720 and 1988 c 75 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Recreation
management plans shall not prohibit or restrict public vehicles operated in the
performance of official duties ((or)), vehicles responding to an
emergency, or vehicles specially authorized by the director or the
director's designee.

Sec.
1102. RCW
43.51.730 and 1988 c 75 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

In
preparing, adopting, or approving a recreation management plan, local
jurisdictions and the commission shall consult with the ((department of
fisheries, the)) department of fish and wildlife and the United
States fish and wildlife service.

Sec.
1103. RCW
43.51.750 and 1988 c 75 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
individual, partnership, corporation, association, organization, cooperative,
local government, or state agency aggrieved by a decision of the commission under
((RCW 43.51.695 through 43.51.765)) this chapter may appeal under
chapter 34.05 RCW.

PART XII

YOUTH DEVELOPMENT AND CONSERVATION CORPS

Sec.
1201. RCW
43.51.510 and 1965 c 8 s 43.51.510 are each amended to read as follows:

There
is hereby created and established a youth development and conservation division
within the ((state parks and recreation)) commission (((hereafter
referred to as the "commission"))). The commission shall appoint
such supervisory personnel as necessary to carry out the purposes of RCW
43.51.500 through 43.51.570 (as recodified by this act).

Sec.
1202. RCW
43.51.540 and 1982 c 70 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The minimum compensation shall be at the rate of twenty-five dollars per week,
except that up to the minimum state wage may be paid on the basis of assigned
leadership responsibilities or special skills.

(2)
Enrollees shall be furnished quarters, subsistence, medical and hospital
services, transportation, equipment, as the commission may deem necessary and
appropriate for their needs. Such quarters, subsistence, and equipment may be
furnished by any governmental or public agency.

(3)
The compensation of enrollees of any program under this chapter may be paid
biweekly.

PART XIII

UNDERWATER PARKS

Sec.
1301. RCW
43.51.432 and 1994 c 264 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

The
((state parks and recreation)) commission may establish a system of
underwater parks to provide for diverse recreational diving opportunities and
to conserve and protect unique marine resources of the state of Washington. In
establishing and maintaining an underwater park system, the commission may:

(1)
Plan, construct, and maintain underwater parks;

(2)
Acquire property and enter management agreements with other units of state
government for the management of lands, tidelands, and bedlands as underwater parks;

(3)
Construct artificial reefs and other underwater features to enhance marine life
and recreational uses of an underwater park;

(4)
Accept gifts and donations for the benefit of underwater parks;

(5)
Facilitate private efforts to construct artificial reefs and underwater parks;

(6)
Work with the federal government, local governments and other appropriate
agencies of state government, including but not limited to: The department of
natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife and the natural heritage
council to carry out the purposes of ((RCW 43.51.430 through 43.51.438))
this chapter; and

(7)
Contract with other state agencies or local governments for the management of
an underwater park unit.

PART XIV

SPECIAL PARKS‑-WINTER RECREATION AREAS

Sec.
1401. RCW
43.51.290 and 1990 c 136 s 2 and 1990 c 49 s 2 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

In
addition to its other powers, duties, and functions the ((state parks and
recreation)) commission may:

(1)
Plan, construct, and maintain suitable facilities for winter recreational
activities on lands administered or acquired by the commission or as authorized
on lands administered by other public agencies or private landowners by agreement;

(2)
Provide and issue upon payment of the proper fee, under RCW 43.51.300 (as
recodified by this act), 43.51.320 (as recodified by this act), and 46.61.585,
with the assistance of such authorized agents as may be necessary for the
convenience of the public, special permits to park in designated winter
recreational area parking spaces;

(3)
Administer the snow removal operations for all designated winter recreational
area parking spaces; and

(4)
Compile, publish, and distribute maps indicating such parking spaces, adjacent
trails, and areas and facilities suitable for winter recreational activities.

The
commission may contract with any public or private agency for the actual
conduct of such duties, but shall remain responsible for the proper administration
thereof. The commission is not liable for unintentional injuries to users of
lands administered for winter recreation purposes under this section or under
RCW 46.10.210, whether the lands are administered by the commission, by other
public agencies, or by private landowners through agreement with the
commission. Nothing in this section prevents the liability of the commission
for injuries sustained by a user by reason of a known dangerous artificial
latent condition for which warning signs have not been conspicuously posted. A
road covered with snow and groomed for the purposes of winter recreation
consistent with this chapter and chapter 46.10 RCW shall not be presumed to be
a known dangerous artificial latent condition for the purposes of this chapter.

PART XV

RECREATIONAL VESSELS

Sec.
1501. RCW
88.12.015 and 1993 c 244 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
((It is a misdemeanor, punishable under RCW 9.92.030, for any person to
commit)) A violation of this chapter designated as an
infraction ((under this chapter)) is a misdemeanor, punishable under
RCW 9.92.030, if ((during a period of three hundred sixty-five days the
person has previously committed two infractions for violating the same
provision under this chapter and if the violation is also committed during such
period and is of the same provision as the previous violations)) the
current violation is the person's third violation of the same provision of this
chapter during the past three hundred sixty-five days.

(2) A violation designated in this chapter as a civil infraction
shall constitute a ((misdemeanor until the violation is included in a civil
infraction monetary schedule adopted by rule by the state supreme court)) civil
infraction pursuant to chapter 7.84 RCW.

Sec.
1502. RCW
88.12.195 and 1993 c 244 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

Such notice as is required by RCW 88.12.185 (as recodified by
this act) shall be given personally, or in writing; if in writing, it shall
be served upon the owner, or may be sent by mail to the post office where such
owner usually receives his or her letters. Such notice shall inform the party
where the vessel was taken up, and where it may be found, and what amount the
taker-up or finder demands for his or her charges.

Sec.
1503. RCW
88.12.205 and 1993 c 244 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In all cases where the notice required by RCW 88.12.185 (as
recodified by this act) is not given personally, it shall be the duty of
the taker-up to post up at the post office nearest the place where such vessel
may be taken up, a written notice of the taking up of such vessel((, which)).
The written notice shall contain a description of the ((same)) vessel,
with the name, if any is painted thereon, also the place where taken up, the
place where the property may be found, and the charge for taking the same up.

(2)
If the taker-up is traveling upon waters of the state, such notice shall additionally
be posted up at the first post office he or she shall pass after the taking
up((; and)).

(3) In all cases, ((he or she)) the person who
took up the vessel shall at the time when, and place where, he or she posts
up such notice, also mail a copy of such notice, directed to the postmaster of
each post office on waters of the state, and within fifty miles of the place
where such vessel is taken up.

Sec.
1504. RCW
88.12.365 and 1993 c 244 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

The
commission shall, in consultation with interested parties, review progress on
installation of sewage pumpout and dump units, the boater environmental
education program, and the boating safety program. ((The commission shall
report its findings to the legislature by December 1994.))

PART XVI

RECODIFICATION

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1601. The
following sections are recodified as a new title in the Revised Code of
Washington to be codified as Title 79A RCW:

RCW
43.51.020

RCW
43.51.030

RCW
43.51.040

RCW
43.51.045

RCW
43.51.046

RCW
43.51.048

RCW
43.51.050

RCW
43.51.052

RCW
43.51.055

RCW
43.51.060

RCW
43.51.061

RCW
43.51.062

RCW
43.51.063

RCW
43.51.065

RCW
43.51.070

RCW
43.51.080

RCW
43.51.090

RCW
43.51.100

RCW
43.51.110

RCW
43.51.112

RCW
43.51.1121

RCW
43.51.113

RCW
43.51.114

RCW
43.51.130

RCW
43.51.140

RCW
43.51.150

RCW
43.51.160

RCW
43.51.170

RCW
43.51.180

RCW
43.51.200

RCW
43.51.210

RCW
43.51.215

RCW
43.51.220

RCW
43.51.235

RCW
43.51.237

RCW
43.51.240

RCW
43.51.250

RCW
43.51.270

RCW
43.51.275

RCW
43.51.285

RCW
43.51.290

RCW
43.51.300

RCW
43.51.310

RCW
43.51.320

RCW
43.51.321

RCW
43.51.330

RCW
43.51.340

RCW
43.51.350

RCW
43.51.360

RCW
43.51.365

RCW
43.51.370

RCW
43.51.375

RCW
43.51.380

RCW
43.51.385

RCW
43.51.395

RCW
43.51.400

RCW
43.51.405

RCW
43.51.407

RCW
43.51.409

RCW
43.51.411

RCW
43.51.415

RCW
43.51.417

RCW
43.51.419

RCW
43.51.420

RCW
43.51.430

RCW
43.51.432

RCW
43.51.434

RCW
43.51.436

RCW
43.51.438

RCW
43.51.440

RCW
43.51.442

RCW
43.51.444

RCW
43.51.446

RCW
43.51.448

RCW
43.51.450

RCW
43.51.452

RCW
43.51.454

RCW
43.51.456

RCW
43.51.500

RCW
43.51.510

RCW
43.51.530

RCW
43.51.540

RCW
43.51.550

RCW
43.51.560

RCW
43.51.570

RCW
43.51.580

RCW
43.51.590

RCW
43.51.650

RCW
43.51.655

RCW
43.51.660

RCW
43.51.665

RCW
43.51.670

RCW
43.51.675

RCW
43.51.685

RCW
43.51.695

RCW
43.51.700

RCW
43.51.705

RCW
43.51.710

RCW
43.51.715

RCW
43.51.720

RCW
43.51.725

RCW
43.51.730

RCW
43.51.735

RCW
43.51.740

RCW
43.51.745

RCW
43.51.750

RCW
43.51.755

RCW
43.51.760

RCW
43.51.765

RCW
43.51.900

RCW
43.51.910

RCW
43.51.920

RCW
43.51.930

RCW
43.51.940

RCW
43.51.942

RCW
43.51.943

RCW
43.51.944

RCW
43.51.945

RCW
43.51.946

RCW
43.51.947

RCW
43.51.948

RCW
43.51.949

RCW
43.51.950

RCW
43.51.951

RCW
43.51.952

RCW
43.51.953

RCW
43.51.954

RCW
43.51.955

RCW
43.51.956

RCW
43.98.010

RCW
43.98.020

RCW
43.98.030

RCW
43.98.040

RCW
43.98.050

RCW
43.98.060

RCW
43.98.070

RCW
43.98.080

RCW
43.98.090

RCW
43.98A.005

RCW
43.98A.010

RCW
43.98A.020

RCW
43.98A.030

RCW
43.98A.040

RCW
43.98A.050

RCW
43.98A.060

RCW
43.98A.070

RCW
43.98A.080

RCW
43.98A.090

RCW
43.98A.100

RCW
43.98A.900

RCW
43.98B.005

RCW
43.98B.010

RCW
43.98B.020

RCW
43.98B.030

RCW
43.98B.900

RCW
43.98B.910

RCW
43.98B.920

RCW
43.99.010

RCW
43.99.020

RCW
43.99.025

RCW
43.99.030

RCW
43.99.040

RCW
43.99.050

RCW
43.99.060

RCW
43.99.070

RCW
43.99.080

RCW
43.99.095

RCW
43.99.100

RCW
43.99.110

RCW
43.99.120

RCW
43.99.124

RCW
43.99.126

RCW
43.99.130

RCW
43.99.135

RCW
43.99.142

RCW
43.99.146

RCW
43.99.150

RCW
43.99.170

RCW
43.99.800

RCW
43.99.810

RCW
43.99.820

RCW
43.99.830

RCW
43.99.900

RCW
43.99.910

RCW
67.18.005

RCW
67.18.010

RCW
67.18.020

RCW
67.18.030

RCW
67.18.040

RCW
67.18.050

RCW
67.18.900

RCW
67.32.010

RCW
67.32.020

RCW
67.32.030

RCW
67.32.040

RCW
67.32.050

RCW
67.32.060

RCW
67.32.070

RCW
67.32.080

RCW
67.32.090

RCW
67.32.100

RCW
67.32.110

RCW
67.32.130

RCW
67.32.140

RCW
70.88.010

RCW
70.88.020

RCW
70.88.030

RCW
70.88.040

RCW
70.88.050

RCW
70.88.060

RCW
70.88.070

RCW
70.88.080

RCW
70.88.090

RCW
70.88.100

RCW
70.117.010

RCW
70.117.015

RCW
70.117.020

RCW
70.117.025

RCW
70.117.030

RCW
70.117.040

RCW
77.12.720

RCW
77.12.730

RCW
77.12.740

RCW
79.08.102

RCW
79.08.104

RCW
79.08.106

RCW
79.08.1062

RCW
79.08.1064

RCW
79.08.1066

RCW
79.08.1069

RCW
79.08.1072

RCW
79.08.1074

RCW
79.08.1078

RCW
79.08.109

RCW
79.72.010

RCW
79.72.020

RCW
79.72.030

RCW
79.72.040

RCW
79.72.050

RCW
79.72.060

RCW
79.72.070

RCW
79.72.080

RCW
79.72.090

RCW
79.72.100

RCW
79.72.900

RCW
88.12.010

RCW
88.12.015

RCW
88.12.020

RCW
88.12.025

RCW
88.12.029

RCW
88.12.032

RCW
88.12.033

RCW
88.12.035

RCW
88.12.045

RCW
88.12.055

RCW
88.12.065

RCW
88.12.075

RCW
88.12.085

RCW
88.12.095

RCW
88.12.105

RCW
88.12.115

RCW
88.12.125

RCW
88.12.135

RCW
88.12.145

RCW
88.12.155

RCW
88.12.165

RCW
88.12.175

RCW
88.12.185

RCW
88.12.195

RCW
88.12.205

RCW
88.12.215

RCW
88.12.218

RCW
88.12.222

RCW
88.12.225

RCW
88.12.227

RCW
88.12.230

RCW
88.12.232

RCW
88.12.235

RCW
88.12.245

RCW
88.12.250

RCW
88.12.255

RCW
88.12.260

RCW
88.12.265

RCW
88.12.275

RCW
88.12.276

RCW
88.12.278

RCW
88.12.279

RCW
88.12.285

RCW
88.12.295

RCW
88.12.305

RCW
88.12.315

RCW
88.12.325

RCW
88.12.335

RCW
88.12.345

RCW
88.12.355

RCW
88.12.365

RCW
88.12.375

RCW
88.12.385

RCW
88.12.395

RCW
88.12.500

RCW
88.12.505

RCW
88.27.010

RCW
88.27.020

RCW
88.27.030

RCW
88.27.040

RCW
88.27.050

RCW
88.27.900

RCW
90.56.090

PART XVII

REPEALED SECTIONS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1701. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
43.51.010 and 1965 c 8 s 43.51.010;

(2) RCW
79.08.108 and 1988 c 128 s 61 & 1953 c 96 s 1;

(3) RCW
43.51.047 and 1995 c 211 s 2 & 1984 c 82 s 3;

(4) RCW
43.51.545 and 1965 ex.s. c 48 s 3;

(5) RCW
43.51.260 and 1969 c 41 s 1 & 1965 c 146 s 2;

(6) RCW
43.51.355 and 1977 ex.s. c 266 s 2; and

(7) RCW
43.51.230 and 1965 c 8 s 43.51.230.

PART XVIII

CODIFICATION DIRECTIVE

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1801.
Sections 101, 301, 401, 701, 908, and 909 of this act are each added to Title
79A RCW, created in section 1601 of this act.

PART XIX

SEVERABILITY

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1901. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---