BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) A
budget is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in the
following sections, the several amounts specified in parts I through VIII of
this act, or so much thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes
designated, are hereby appropriated and authorized to be incurred for salaries,
wages, and other expenses of the agencies and offices of the state and for
other specified purposes for the fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 1999, and
ending June 30, 2001, except as otherwise provided, out of the several funds of
the state hereinafter named.

(2)
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section
apply throughout this act.

(a)
"Fiscal year 2000" or "FY 2000" means the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2000.

(b)
"Fiscal year 2001" or "FY 2001" means the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2001.

(c)
"FTE" means full time equivalent.

(d)
"Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an
unappropriated status.

(e)
"Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only for
the specified purpose. Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this act,
any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified purpose which is
unnecessary to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.

PART
I

GENERAL
GOVERNMENT

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 101. FOR
THE HOUSE
OF REPRESENTATIVES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 24,853,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 26,061,000

Department
of Retirement Systems Expense Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 25,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 50,939,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$25,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 is
provided solely for allocation to Project Citizen, a program of the national
conference of state legislatures to promote student civic involvement.

(2)
$394,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided to support
the legislature's participation in the redistricting process in conjunction
with the redistricting commission.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 102. FOR
THE SENATE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 19,749,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 21,525,000

Department
of Retirement Systems Expense Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 25,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 41,299,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$50,000 from the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
is provided to contract for a study of policies and practices for setting
information services rates paid by state agencies. The study shall include an
analysis of the effect of current and alternative depreciation policies and
schedules on rates and revolving fund balances.

(2)
$25,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 is
provided solely for allocation to Project Citizen, a program of the national
conference of state legislatures to promote student civic involvement.

(3)
$394,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided to support
the legislature's participation in the redistricting process in conjunction
with the redistricting commission.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 103. FOR
THE JOINT
LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 1,539,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 1,596,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 3,135,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: $150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is
provided for conducting a study of the mental health system. The study shall
include, but not be limited to:

(1)
An analysis of the roles and responsibilities of the division of mental health
in the department of social and health services, with regard to regional
support networks (RSNs) and community mental health providers;

(2)
An analysis of the funding of the RSNs through contracts let by the division of
mental health, including the basis for per capita payment rates paid to the
regional support networks and any federal requirements related to the federal
medicaid waiver under which the current mental health system operates;

(3)
An analysis of actual and contractual service levels, outcomes, and costs for
RSNs, including the types and hours of services provided, costs of services
provided, trends in per client service expenditures, and client outcomes;

(4)
An analysis of RSN and subcontractor service and administrative costs, fund
balances, contracting practices, client demographics, and outcomes over time;

(5)
An analysis of contracts between RSNs and community mental health providers,
with emphasis on costs, services, performance, and client outcomes, including
any accountability standards, performance measures, data requirements, and
sanctions and incentives currently in the contract between the regional support
networks and the mental health division; and

(6)
Recommendations for modifying the basis on which RSNs and community mental
health providers are funded, including a funding formula that will result in a
greater relationship of the funding distribution formula to the prevalence of
mental illness in each RSN service area, to efficiency as demonstrated by
performance measures and to effectiveness as demonstrated by patient outcome.

The
joint legislative audit and review committee may contract for consulting
services in conducting the study.

The
study shall be submitted to the fiscal committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 104. FOR
THE LEGISLATIVE
EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 1,225,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 1,307,000

Public
Works Assistance Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 405,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 2,937,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 105. FOR
THE OFFICE
OF THE STATE ACTUARY

Department
of Retirement Systems Expense Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 1,967,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$150,000 is provided solely for an actuarial study of local government
liabilities for law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system
medical benefits.

(2)
The office of the state actuary shall conduct a review of the higher education
retirement plans that have been established pursuant to RCW 28B.10.400. The
review shall include: (a) An actuarial study pursuant to RCW 28B.10.423 of the
level of retirement income which is projected to result from the current level
of employer and employee contributions to such plans; and (b) a review of the
fiscal and policy implications of expanding part-time faculty eligibility for
supplemental retirement allowances. By January 15, 2000, the state actuary
shall report his findings to the appropriate committees of the legislature,
including recommendations for adjusting contribution rates to meet the
requirements of RCW 28B.10.423 and for recommended modifications to the
supplemental retirement allowance statutes to address part-time faculty issues.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 106. FOR
THE JOINT
LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS COMMITTEE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 5,847,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 5,847,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 11,694,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 107. FOR
THE STATUTE
LAW COMMITTEE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 3,508,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 3,730,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 7,238,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 108. FOR
THE SUPREME
COURT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 4,837,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 5,027,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 9,864,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 109. FOR
THE LAW
LIBRARY

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 1,834,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 1,851,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 3,685,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 110. FOR
THE COURT
OF APPEALS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 10,946,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 11,415,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 22,361,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$338,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5037 (Pierce county
court of appeals). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2)
$150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for providing compensation adjustments to nonjudicial
staff of the court of appeals. Within the funds provided in this subsection,
the court of appeals shall determine the specific positions to receive
compensation adjustments based on recruitment and retention difficulties, new
duties or responsibilities assigned, and salary inversion or compression within
the court of appeals.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 111. FOR
THE COMMISSION
ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 904,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 852,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 1,756,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 112. FOR
THE ADMINISTRATOR
FOR THE COURTS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 12,114,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 12,280,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 24,981,000

Judicial
Information Systems Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 17,617,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 66,992,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Funding provided in the judicial information systems account appropriation
shall be used for the operations and maintenance of technology systems that
improve services provided by the supreme court, the court of appeals, the
office of public defense, and the administrator for the courts.

(2)
No moneys appropriated in this section may be expended by the administrator for
the courts for payments in excess of fifty percent of the employer contribution
on behalf of superior court judges for insurance and health care plans and
federal social security and medicare and medical aid benefits. Consistent with
Article IV, section 13 of the state Constitution and 1996 Attorney General's
Opinion No. 2, it is the intent of the legislature that the costs of these
employer contributions shall be shared equally between the state and county or
counties in which the judges serve. The administrator for the courts shall
continue to implement procedures for the collection and disbursement of these
employer contributions.

(3)
$223,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for the gender and justice commission.

(4)
$308,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for the minority and justice commission.

(5)
$278,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$285,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $263,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation are
provided solely for the workload associated with tax warrants and other state
cases filed in Thurston county.

(6)
$200,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for a unified family court pilot program. Of this amount, $150,000 is
provided for the costs of establishing the program and $50,000 is provided for
costs associated with evaluating the efficacy of the program. The pilot
program grant is limited to the 1999-01 biennium. After this time, it is
assumed that funding for continuation of the unified family court or expansion
to other counties would be provided by local jurisdictions based on the results
of the evaluation of the program.

(7)
$130,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $130,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the new judicial positions authorized by Engrossed
Senate Bill No. 5036 (superior court judges).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 113. FOR
THE OFFICE
OF PUBLIC DEFENSE

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 12,440,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$558,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely to increase the reimbursement for private attorneys providing
constitutionally mandated indigent defense in nondeath penalty cases.

(2)
$51,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 1599 (court funding). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

(3)
Amounts provided in this section include funding for investigative services in
death penalty personal restraint petitions.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 114. FOR
THE OFFICE
OF THE GOVERNOR

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 5,762,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 5,720,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $ 674,000

Water
Quality Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 700,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 12,856,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$1,612,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$1,588,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
$700,000 of the water quality account appropriation, and $209,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for the implementation
of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action items PSAT-01 through PSAT-05.

(2)
$465,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation and $200,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation are provided solely for the salmon
recovery office to meet its responsibilities for the state-wide salmon
recovery strategy. Of this amount: (a) $200,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation is provided for the operation of the independent science panel;
and (b) $465,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided
for the salmon recovery office staff to support local salmon recovery planning
efforts. $232,500 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation in this
subsection may be expended in each fiscal year of the biennium only if the
state receives greater than $25,000,000 from the federal government for salmon
recovery activities in that fiscal year. Funds authorized for expenditure in
fiscal year 2000 may be expended in fiscal year 2001.

(3)
$62,000 of the fiscal year 2000 general fund‑-state appropriation and
$63,000 of the fiscal year 2001 general fund‑-state appropriation are
provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5595 or
Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2079, establishing the salmon recovery
funding board in the office of the governor. If legislation establishing the
board is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 115. FOR
THE LIEUTENANT
GOVERNOR

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 333,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 332,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $ 160,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 825,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 116. FOR
THE PUBLIC
DISCLOSURE COMMISSION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 1,724,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 1,496,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 3,220,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: $328,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2000 and $86,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5931 (electronic filing and public access). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided shall lapse.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 117. FOR
THE SECRETARY
OF STATE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 14,063,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 8,371,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 120,000

Archives
and Records Management Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,401,000

Archives
and Records Management Account‑-Private/

Local
Appropriation........................ $ 2,581,000

Department
of Personnel Service Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 681,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 31,217,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$2,355,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's share of primary and
general election costs and the costs of conducting mandatory recounts on state
measures.

(2)
$3,780,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's share of presidential
preference primary election costs.

(3)
$2,106,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $2,663,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the verification of initiative and referendum
petitions, maintenance of related voter registration records, and the
publication and distribution of the voters and candidates pamphlet.

(4)
$125,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $125,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for legal advertising of state measures under RCW
29.27.072.

(5)(a)
$1,870,350 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,907,757 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for continuing the contract with a nonprofit
organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television coverage of state government
deliberations and other events of state-wide significance during the 1999-2001
biennium.

(b)
The funding level for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount
provided in this subsection and adjusted to reflect the implicit price deflator
for the previous year. The nonprofit organization shall be required to raise
contributions or commitments to make contributions, in cash or in kind, in an
amount equal to forty percent of the state contribution. The office of the
secretary of state may make full or partial payment once all criteria in (a)
and (b) of this subsection have been satisfactorily documented.

(c)
The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent audit, an annual
financial statement, and an annual report, including benchmarks that measure
the success of the nonprofit organization in meeting the intent of the program.

(d)
No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection may be used,
directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:

(i)
Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the
legislature of the state of Washington, by any county, city, town, or other
political subdivision of the state of Washington, or by the congress, or the
adoption or rejection of any rule, standard, rate, or other legislative
enactment of any state agency;

(ii)
Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or

(iii)
Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel, lodging, meals, or
entertainment to a public officer or employee.

(6)
$867,000 of the archives and records management account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for operation of the central microfilming
bureau under RCW 40.14.020(8).

(7)
$120,000 of the general fund‑-private/local appropriation is provided
solely for the Washington quality awards council.

(8)
$20,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 is
provided solely for the operations of the task force on archaeology and
historic preservation. The task force shall develop a single recommendation
for consideration by the legislature and the governor on the issue of the
location of the office of archaeology and historic preservation within state
government. The recommended location shall maximize the office of archaeology
and historic preservation's stature, visibility, accessibility, and delivery of
service state-wide in the context of its critical role as an important link
among downtown and neighborhood revitalization efforts, the cultural tourism
movement, rural economic development initiatives, and the preservation of the
structures and sites that still remain as the legacy of Washington's rich and
diverse heritage. The task force shall consider and include in its
recommendation how best both to realize the potential of the office of
archaeology and historic preservation to generate revenue from services it
could provide in international, national, state, local, and private venues and
also how best to achieve adequate funding from all funding sources to assure
that the office of archaeology and historic preservation can provide the best
possible service to the citizens of the state. There shall be eleven members
of the task force as follows: One member shall be the state historic
preservation officer or his or her designee; two members shall be
representatives of state agencies; two members shall be representatives of
local governments; there shall be one representative each from the Washington
state historical society, the eastern Washington state historical society, the
Washington trust for historic preservation, and Indian tribes; and two members
shall be representatives of the private sector who have experience in
preservation of historic buildings or archaeological sites or who have
particular interest in the issue of preservation of historic buildings and
archaeological sites. The state historic preservation officer shall be the
chair of the task force. The task force shall report to appropriate committees
of the legislature and the governor by January 1, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 118. FOR
THE GOVERNOR'S
OFFICE OF INDIAN AFFAIRS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 259,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 261,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 520,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 119. FOR
THE COMMISSION
ON ASIAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 215,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 215,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 430,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 120. FOR
THE STATE
TREASURER

State
Treasurer's Service Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 13,487,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 121. FOR
THE REDISTRICTING
COMMISSION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 496,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 122. FOR
THE STATE
AUDITOR

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 1,079,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 1,077,000

State
Auditing Services Revolving Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 12,728,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 14,884,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 123. FOR
THE CITIZENS'
COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 32,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 118,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 150,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and are sufficient for the commission to: (1) Carry out
statutorily required public hearings; (2) enter into an agreement with the
department of personnel to provide data sharing, research support, and training
for commission members and staff; (3) employ part-time staff in fiscal year
2000 to respond to requests for information; and (4) begin full-time staffing
in September 2000 to allow for orientation and training for commission members
prior to the next salary setting cycle. The commission shall work with the
department of general administration to reduce its operating costs by
colocating with another state agency, and shall report back to the fiscal
committees of the legislature by December 15, 1999.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 124. FOR
THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 3,906,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 3,889,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 2,291,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,338,000

New
Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account‑-State

Appropriation............ ................. $ 1,109,000

Legal
Services Revolving Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 117,287,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 129,820,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual legal services
expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for each agency receiving
legal services. The report shall be submitted to the office of financial
management and the fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives
no later than ninety days after the end of each fiscal year.

(2)
The attorney general and the office of financial management shall modify the
attorney general billing system to meet the needs of user agencies for greater
predictability, timeliness, and explanation of how legal services are being
used by the agency. The attorney general shall provide the following
information each month to agencies receiving legal services: (a) The full-time
equivalent attorney services provided for the month; (b) the full-time
equivalent investigator services provided for the month; (c) the full-time
equivalent paralegal services provided for the month; and (d) direct legal
costs, such as filing and docket fees, charged to the agency for the month.

(3)
The attorney general shall conduct a review of the policies, practices, and
guidelines employed by the department of ecology in researching, analyzing, and
issuing a certification under the authority of section 401 of the federal water
pollution control act amendments of 1972, 22 U.S.C. Sec. 1341 for the proposed
regional landfill in Pierce county. The attorney general shall report the
findings of the review by December 1, 1999, to the appropriate standing
committees of the house of representatives and the senate.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 125. FOR
THE CASELOAD
FORECAST COUNCIL

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 406,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 404,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 810,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 126. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS

Securities Regulation Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 6,982,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 127. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 72,469,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 71,387,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 153,575,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 6,918,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 8,793,000

Public
Works Assistance Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,344,000

Building
Code Council Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,375,000

Administrative
Contingency Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,776,000

Low-Income
Weatherization Assistance Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,289,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 6,051,000

Manufactured
Home Installation Training Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 252,000

Washington
Housing Trust Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,685,000

Public
Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 522,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 333,436,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$2,962,500 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $3,602,500 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for a contract with the Washington technology center.
For work essential to the mission of the Washington technology center and
conducted in partnership with universities, the center shall not pay any
increased indirect rate nor increases in other indirect charges above the
absolute amount paid during the 1995-97 biennium.

(2)
$61,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$62,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency
action item DCTED-01.

(3)
$11,893,320 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided solely
for the drug control and system improvement formula grant program, to be
distributed in state fiscal year 2000 as follows:

(a)
$3,603,250 to local units of government to continue multijurisdictional
narcotics task forces;

(b)
$620,000 to the department to continue the drug prosecution assistance program
in support of multijurisdictional narcotics task forces;

(c)
$1,552,800 to the Washington state patrol for coordination, investigative, and
supervisory support to the multijurisdictional narcotics task forces and for
methamphetamine education and response;

(d)
$240,000 to the department for grants to support tribal law enforcement needs;

(e)
$991,000 to the department of social and health services, division of alcohol
and substance abuse, for drug courts in eastern and western Washington for the
implementation of sections 7 through 10 of Engrossed Second Substitute House
Bill No. 1006 (drug offender sentencing);

(f)
$312,551 to the department for training and technical assistance of public
defenders representing clients with special needs;

(g)
$200,000 to the department to continue a substance-abuse treatment in jails
program, to test the effect of treatment on future criminal behavior;

(h)
$667,075 to the department to continue domestic violence legal advocacy;

(i)
$903,000 to the department of social and health services, juvenile
rehabilitation administration, to continue youth violence prevention and
intervention projects;

(j)
$91,000 to the department to continue the governor's council on substance
abuse;

(k)
$99,000 to the department to continue evaluation of Byrne formula grant
programs;

(l)
$1,519,244 to the office of financial management for criminal history records
improvement;

(m)
$804,400 to the department for required grant administration, monitoring, and
reporting on Byrne formula grant programs;

(n)
$290,000 to the Washington state patrol solely for costs associated with the
supervision, coordination, and reimbursement for local law enforcement
officers' participation in the task force on missing and exploited children
established by Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5108 (missing/exploited
children). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

These
amounts represent the maximum Byrne grant expenditure authority for each
program. No program may expend Byrne grant funds in excess of the amounts
provided in this subsection. If moneys in excess of those appropriated in this
subsection become available, whether from prior or current fiscal year Byrne
grant distributions, the department shall hold these moneys in reserve and may
not expend them without specific appropriation. These moneys shall be carried
forward and applied to the pool of moneys available for appropriation for
programs and projects in the succeeding fiscal year. As part of its budget
request for the succeeding year, the department shall estimate and request
authority to spend any funds remaining in reserve as a result of this
subsection.

(4)
$500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the tourism office to increase rural tourism
development, consumer marketing, and international marketing.

(5)
$500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for a grant program to help communities design and
carry out rural economic development projects.

(6)
$1,250,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
and $1,250,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for grants to operate, repair, and staff shelters for
homeless families with children.

(7)
$2,500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $2,500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for grants to operate transitional housing for
homeless families with children. The grants may also be used to make partial
payments for rental assistance.

(8)
$1,250,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,250,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for consolidated emergency assistance to homeless
families with children.

(9)
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 is
provided solely to develop a plan for a system for collecting reliable and
accurate data on homeless persons. The plan shall provide at least two
approaches based on a range of possible budgets. The plan shall be provided to
the governor's office and the legislative fiscal committees no later than
November 1, 1999.

(10)
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided to the department solely for providing technical assistance to
developers of housing for farmworkers.

(11)
$160,000 of the public works assistance account appropriation is solely for
providing technical assistance to local communities that are developing the
infrastructure needed to support the development of housing for farmworkers.

(12)
$205,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $205,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for grants to Washington Columbia river gorge counties
to implement their responsibilities under the national scenic area management
plan. Of this amount, $390,000 is provided for Skamania county, and $20,000 is
provided for Clark county.

(13)
$500,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2000 appropriation and
$500,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2001 appropriation are
provided solely for grants to Grays Harbor county as lead agency to support
local coastal erosion activities and partnership with state and federal
agencies in the southwest Washington coastal erosion study.

(14)
$1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for grants to food banks and food distribution
centers. At least $65,000 of the amount provided in each fiscal year shall be
utilized for a contract with a food distribution program for communities in the
southwestern portion of the state and for workers impacted by timber and salmon
fishing closures and reductions. The department may not charge administrative
overhead or expenses to the funds provided in this subsection.

(15)
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for the establishment of state trade office activity in South
Korea.

(16)
$698,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$698,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $1,101,000 of the administrative contingency account appropriation are
provided solely for contracting with associate development organizations.

(17)
$220,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $90,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5693
(developmental disabilities endowment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
1999, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(18)
$970,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 is
provided solely as a grant to the Washington council on international trade as
partial support for the 1999 world trade organization meeting.

(19)
$500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 is
provided solely for a grant to Pierce county to construct a joint state/county
recreation facility on state property in the South Hill area near Puyallup.
The grant provided in this subsection is contingent upon an agreement that the
county will assume full maintenance and operation of the facility.

(20)
$22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$22,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for the department's role in implementing Engrossed Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1493 (homeless children and families). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(21)
$250,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 is
provided solely to support the spirit 2000 millennium celebration project.

(22)
$20,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 is
provided solely to assist the Tri-Cities cultural arts center to develop a plan
to bring the arts to eastern Washington.

(23)
$125,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $125,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to increase the number of trained volunteer long-term
care ombudsmen available to serve elderly or disabled residents living in
licensed boarding homes and adult family homes.

(24)
$150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 is
provided solely as a grant to preserve the Mukai farm and garden.

(25)
$21,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 is
provided solely as a matching grant to support the Washington state senior
games. State funding shall be matched with at least an equal amount of private
or local government funds.

(26)
$500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to increase the number of children served by a
court-appointed special volunteer advocate guardian ad litem in dependency
proceedings. The funds shall be distributed by the department to local and
state court-appointed special advocate programs based on the number of children
without volunteer court-appointed special advocate representation.

(27)
$1,125,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,125,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for King county for the purpose of local public
health. The amounts in this subsection shall be deposited into the county
public health account.

(28)
$1,157,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,723,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the Spokane intercollegiate research and
technology institute.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 128. FOR
THE ECONOMIC
AND REVENUE FORECAST COUNCIL

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 471,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 476,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 947,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 129. FOR
THE OFFICE
OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 12,791,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 11,855,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 23,340,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 500,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 48,486,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 is
provided solely to evaluate and promote the use by state and local agencies of
the training facilities at the Hanford reservation.

(2)
Funding in this section provides for a feasibility study to collect Washington
enrollment data on distance learning programs sponsored by in-state and
out-of-state private institutions in cooperation with the higher education
coordinating board and the state board for community and technical colleges.
Findings shall be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
January 2000.

(3)
$75,000 of the fiscal year 2000 general fund‑-state appropriation and
$75,000 of the fiscal year 2001 general fund‑-state appropriation are
provided solely to track and administer state and federal funding for salmon
recovery allocated by the salmon recovery funding board established under
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5595 or Engrossed Substitute House Bill No.
2079.

(4)
The office of financial management, in collaboration with the institutions of
higher education, the higher education coordinating board, and the state board
for community and technical colleges, shall modify state information systems in
order to provide consistent data on students engaged in distance learning. Higher
education institutions shall provide enrollment information in support of this
effort. Reporting on the numbers and categories of students enrolled in
distance learning by class level and institutions shall begin by fall term,
2000. Washington independent institutions of higher education are encouraged
to participate in this process and to provide distance learner enrollment data.

(5)
$1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation and $500,000 of the
general fund‑-private/local appropriation are provided solely for the
commission on early learning. One-half of the amount provided from the general
fund‑-state shall not be expended unless matched by an equal amount from
private sources.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 130. FOR
THE OFFICE
OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS

Administrative
Hearings Revolving Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 20,749,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 131. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF PERSONNEL

Department
of Personnel Service Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 16,999,000

Higher
Education Personnel Services Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,640,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 18,639,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The department shall reduce its charge for personnel services to the lowest
rate possible.

(2)
The department of personnel service account appropriation contains sufficient
funds to continue the employee exchange program with the Hyogo prefecture in
Japan.

(3)
$515,000 of the department of personnel service account appropriation is
provided solely for the development and implementation of a new employment
application processing system to: Provide for electronic applications via the
internet, provide continuous application acceptance, provide increased public
access to job openings, allow for single applications for multiple jobs, and
provide for scanning of larger applicant databases as job openings arise.

(4)
$190,000 of the department of personnel service account appropriation is
provided solely for the expansion of the executive fellowship program.

(5)
$108,000 of the department of personnel service account appropriation is
provided solely for increased funding of the administrative expenses of the
combined fund drive.

(6)
$52,000 of the department of personnel service account appropriation is
provided solely to implement House Bill No. 5432 (retiree charitable
deductions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided
in this subsection shall lapse.

(7)
The department of personnel has the authority to charge agencies for expenses
associated with converting its payroll/personnel computer system to accommodate
the year 2000 date change. Funding to cover these expenses shall be realized
from the agency FICA savings associated with the pretax benefits contributions
plan.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 132. FOR
THE WASHINGTON
STATE LOTTERY

Lottery
Administrative Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 21,127,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 133. FOR
THE COMMISSION
ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 216,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 225,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 441,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 134. FOR
THE COMMISSION
ON AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 190,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 188,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 378,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 135. FOR
THE PERSONNEL
APPEALS BOARD

Department
of Personnel Service Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,602,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 136. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS‑-OPERATIONS

Dependent
Care Administrative Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 361,000

Department
of Retirement Systems Expense Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 41,182,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 41,543,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$92,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account appropriation
is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5030 (Washington
state patrol surviving spouse retirement). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 1999, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2)
$259,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account appropriation
is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1024 (retirement
system option). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3)
$55,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account appropriation
is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 6012 (investment
board fund values). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4)
$22,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account appropriation
is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5432 (PERS retiree charitable
deductions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided
in this subsection shall lapse.

(5)
$50,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account appropriation
is provided solely for the department to prepare and distribute to state employees
information about options under the federal tax code for tax-advantaged
retirement savings.

(6)
$3,731,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely for the information systems project known as
the electronic document image management system. Authority to expend this
amount is conditioned on compliance with section 902 of this act.

(7)
The department shall adjust the retirement systems administrative rate during
the 1999-2001 biennium as necessary to provide for law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' retirement system employer funding for a study of LEOFF plan
1 medical liabilities by the office of the state actuary.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 137. FOR
THE STATE
INVESTMENT BOARD

State
Investment Board Expense Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 10,519,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 138. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF REVENUE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 69,998,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 68,171,000

Timber
Tax Distribution Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,893,000

Waste
Education/Recycling/Litter Control‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 101,000

State
Toxics Control Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 67,000

Oil
Spill Administration Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 14,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 143,244,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The department of revenue shall conduct a study and prepare a
report of current state and local taxation of the electricity industry and
options for changes to avoid revenue loss, promote competitive neutrality, and
encourage economic development within the electricity industry. The study
shall include an analysis of the following: (1) Current state and local
taxation of the wholesale and retail electricity industry, including tax
incidence, rate, base, collection, and allocation of taxes; (2) trends in the
wholesale and retail electricity markets affecting current and future revenue
streams, including power imports and exports by in-state and out-of-state
suppliers; (3) The extent to which existing state and local tax laws may be
insufficient to protect revenue streams in light of identifiable wholesale and
retail market changes; and (4) whether the tax code is adequate to fairly tax
new participants in the market such as brokers, marketers, aggregators, and
traders. The department shall conduct the study with support from the
utilities and transportation commission, the energy division of the department
of community, trade, and economic development, and the state auditor. The
department shall consult with energy utilities, retail electric customers,
local governments, independent power producers, brokers, marketers, traders,
other interested parties, and the chairs and ranking minority members of the
committees of the senate and the house of representatives with jurisdiction
over electricity issues periodically throughout the course of the study, and
shall submit its report to the legislature and the governor by December 1,
1999.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 139. FOR
THE BOARD
OF TAX APPEALS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 920,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 936,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 1,856,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 140. FOR
THE MUNICIPAL
RESEARCH COUNCIL

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 1,766,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 1,822,000

County
Research Services Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 681,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 4,269,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 141. FOR
THE OFFICE
OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES

OMWBE
Enterprises Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,546,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 142. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 279,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 279,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 2,116,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 417,000

Air
Pollution Control Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 379,000

General
Administration Service Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 43,976,000

Energy
Efficiency Services Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 199,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 47,645,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The department shall develop an allocation method for tort
defense costs with the office of the attorney general and selected agency
representatives. A report shall be submitted to the office of financial
management and the fiscal committees of the house of representatives and the
senate by June 30, 2000, on how the agencies will be billed for their tort
defense services from the liability account. If Substitute House Bill No. 2111
(consolidates tort activities) is not enacted by June 30, 1999, this subsection
shall lapse.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 143. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF INFORMATION SERVICES

Data Processing
Revolving Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,605,000

K-20
Technology Account‑-State Appropriation... $ 7,400,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 11,005,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: $7,400,000 of the K-20 technology account appropriation is
provided solely for the completion of the K-20 network development plan through
phase 2.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 144. FOR
THE INSURANCE
COMMISSIONER

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $ 304,000

Insurance
Commissioners Regulatory Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 24,738,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 25,042,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$500,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account appropriation is
provided solely for funding agreements with insurance companies, to counsel
policyholders and administer the liquidation of insurance companies.

(2)
$730,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account appropriation is
provided solely for performing market conduct exams on life and annuity
policies.

(3)
$306,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account appropriation is
provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5509 (Holocaust
insurance enforcement). Expenditures from this amount shall not exceed
regulatory revenues received under the bill. If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 145. FOR
THE BOARD
OF ACCOUNTANCY

Certified
Public Accountants' Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,119,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 146. FOR
THE FORENSIC
INVESTIGATION COUNCIL

Death
Investigations Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 272,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations: $250,000 of the death investigation account appropriation is
provided solely for providing financial assistance to local jurisdictions in
multiple death investigations. The forensic investigation council shall
develop criteria for awarding these funds for multiple death investigations
involving an unanticipated, extraordinary, and catastrophic event or those
involving multiple jurisdictions.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 147. FOR
THE HORSE
RACING COMMISSION

Horse
Racing Commission Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,579,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 148. FOR
THE LIQUOR
CONTROL BOARD

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 1,293,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 1,284,000

Liquor
Control Board Construction and Maintenance

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 8,013,000

Liquor
Revolving Account‑-State Appropriation... $........................................... 129,361,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 139,951,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$2,804,000 of the liquor revolving account appropriation is provided solely for
the agency information technology upgrade. This amount provided in this
subsection is conditioned upon satisfying the requirements of section 902 of
this act.

(2)
$105,000 of the liquor revolving account appropriation is provided solely for
the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5712 (motel liquor
licenses). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

(3)
$300,000 of the liquor revolving account appropriation is provided solely for the
board to develop a business plan. The board shall provide copies of the plan
to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the
legislature by September 30, 1999.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 149. FOR
THE UTILITIES
AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION

Public
Service Revolving Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 25,966,000

Public
Service Revolving Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 652,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 26,618,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: $48,000 of the public service revolving account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for a study of costs incurred by electric,
natural gas, telecommunications, and water utilities and railroads, except
railroads owned and operated by the state and municipal corporations, for the
placement of new and existing utilities facilities within railroad
rights-of-way. The commission shall: (1) Identify all expenses that are
directly incurred by railroads to permit the safe construction and maintenance
of utility facilities within the railroad right-of-way, including costs related
to administering the issuance of a permit, inspecting construction, and flagging
construction for safety; (2) identify any extraordinary expenses which may be
incurred by utilities and railroads as a result of utility facilities being
located within the railroad right-of-way, including costs related to emergency
response; (3) examine the amount and scope of insurance that may be necessary
for utilities and railroads to cover risks associated with railroad property
and utility facilities located within the railroad right-of-way; (4) compare
and analyze different methods used or that could be used, for the purposes of
determining compensation paid by utilities, to value railroad right-of-way
property on which utility facilities are located; (5) compare and analyze how
terms, conditions, and fees imposed by railroads upon utilities for placing
utility facilities within the railroad right-of-way have changed over time; and
(6) make any recommendations it deems pertinent based upon its findings. The
commission shall consult with the chairs and ranking minority members of the
senate energy, technology, and telecommunications committee and the house or
representatives technology, telecommunications, and energy committee throughout
the course of study and shall submit its report to the legislature and the
governor by December 1, 1999.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 150. FOR
THE BOARD
FOR VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS

Volunteer
Firefighters' Relief and Pension

Administrative
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 573,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 151. FOR
THE MILITARY
DEPARTMENT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 18,568,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 8,264,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 22,148,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 238,000

Enhanced
911 Account‑-State Appropriation...... $ 16,491,000

Disaster
Response Account‑-State Appropriation. $ 18,970,000

Disaster
Response Account‑-Federal Appropriation $ 94,733,000

Worker
and Community Right to Know Fund‑‑State

Appropriation.............................. $ 285,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 179,697,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$10,174,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
is provided solely for deposit in the disaster response account to cover costs
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

(2)
$18,970,000 of the disaster response account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for the state share of response and recovery costs associated
with federal emergency management agency (FEMA) disaster 1079
(November/December 1995 storms), FEMA disaster 1100 (February 1996 floods),
FEMA disaster 1152 (November 1996 ice storm), FEMA disaster 1159 (December 1996
holiday storm), FEMA disaster 1172 (March 1997 floods), FEMA disaster 1252
(1998 northeast counties floods), and FEMA disaster 1255 (Kelso landslide).
The military department is to submit a report quarterly to the office of financial
management and the fiscal committees of the house of representatives and senate
detailing disaster costs, including: (a) Estimates of total costs; (b)
incremental changes from the previous estimate; (c) actual expenditures; (d)
estimates of total remaining costs to be paid; and (d) estimates of future
payments by biennium. This information is to be displayed by individual
disaster, by fund, and by type of assistance.

(3)
$75,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2000 appropriation and
$75,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2001 appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of the conditional scholarship program
pursuant to chapter 28B.103 RCW.

(4)
$35,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2000 appropriation and
$35,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2001 appropriation are
provided solely for the north county emergency medical service.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 152. FOR
THE PUBLIC
EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS COMMISSION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 2,034,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 2,032,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 4,066,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 153. FOR
THE GROWTH
PLANNING HEARINGS BOARD

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 1,419,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 1,380,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 2,799,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 154. FOR
THE STATE
CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER

State
Convention and Trade Center Operating

Account‑-State Appropriation............... $ 29,963,000

(End of part)

PART
II

HUMAN
SERVICES

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 201. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES. (1) Appropriations made in
this act to the department of social and health services shall initially be
allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not
include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly
provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys that are
provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that purpose.

(2)
The department of social and health services shall not initiate any services
that will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly
authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and
spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in
this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state
moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the
department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys
shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation
providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state
general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this
subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative
fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal
moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not
require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula
basis by state funds.

(3)
The appropriations to the department of social and health services in this act
shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified herein.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 202. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-CHILDREN
AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 207,273,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 223,208,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 337,357,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 400,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 4,194,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 772,432,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$594,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$1,964,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $195,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No.
5557 (the HOPE act) or sections 10 through 29 of Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 1493. If neither bill is enacted by June 30, 1999, the funds
shall be provided for:

(a)
The department to contract for 10 temporary residential placements, for up to
30 days, for youth by June 30, 2000, and for 29 temporary residential
placements for youth by June 30, 2001. These youth shall be sixteen to
eighteen years old who are dependents of the state, and who live outdoors or in
unsafe locations not intended for occupancy by a minor, and whose permanency
plan of care does not include return to home or family reunification. The
department shall contact the missing children's clearinghouse regarding these
youth. The department may approve placements for fourteen and fifteen-year
olds who also meet these criteria. Youth who receive these placements may
receive one or more of the following services: Educational services,
vocational training, job readiness assistance, job search assistance, chemical
dependency treatment, and counseling; and

(b)
For the department to contract for 10 residential placements for dependent
youth by June 30, 2000, and for 29 residential placements for youth by June 30,
2001. These youth shall be aged sixteen through eighteen who live outdoors or
in unsafe locations not intended for occupancy by a minor, and whose permanency
plan does not include return to home or family reunification. These placements
may be available to youth up to eighteen years of age. Youth who receive these
placements shall receive training related to one or more of the following:
Basic education, employment, money management and other skills that will assist
the youth in developing independent living skills.

(2)
$2,745,000 of the fiscal year 2000 general fund‑-state appropriation,
$2,745,000 of the fiscal year 2001 general fund‑-state appropriation, and
$1,944,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided for
the category of services titled "intensive family preservation
services."

(3)
$670,925 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2000 appropriation and
$670,925 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2001 appropriation are
provided to contract for the operation of one pediatric interim care facility.
The facility shall provide residential care for up to thirteen children through
two years of age. Seventy-five percent of the children served by the facility
must be in need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their
mothers. The facility shall also provide on-site training to biological,
adoptive, or foster parents. The facility shall provide at least three months
of consultation and support to parents accepting placement of children from the
facility. The facility may recruit new and current foster and adoptive parents
for infants served by the facility. The department shall not require case
management as a condition of the contract.

(4)
$513,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2000 appropriation and
$513,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2001 appropriation are
provided for up to three nonfacility-based programs for the training,
consultation, support, and recruitment of biological, foster, and adoptive
parents of children through age three in need of special care as a result of
substance abuse by their mothers, except that each program may serve up to
three medically fragile nonsubstance-abuse-affected children. In selecting
nonfacility-based programs, preference shall be given to programs whose federal
or private funding sources have expired or that have successfully performed
under the existing pediatric interim care program.

(5)
$3,440,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $3,441,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for distribution to county juvenile court
administrators to fund the costs of processing truancy, children in need of
services, and at-risk youth petitions. The department shall not retain any
portion of these funds to cover administrative or any other departmental
costs. The department, in conjunction with the juvenile court administrators,
shall develop an equitable funding distribution formula. The formula shall
neither reward counties with higher than average per petition processing costs
nor shall it penalize counties with lower than average per petition processing
costs.

(6)
Each quarter during the 1999-01 fiscal biennium, each county shall report the
number of petitions processed and the total costs of processing the petitions
in each of the following categories: Truancy, children in need of services,
and at-risk youth. Counties shall submit the reports to the department no
later than 45 days after the end of the quarter. The department shall forward
this information to the chair and ranking minority member of the house of
representatives appropriations committee and the senate ways and means
committee no later than 60 days after a quarter ends. These reports are deemed
informational in nature and are not for the purpose of distributing funds.

(7)
$2,311,000 of the fiscal year 2000 general fund‑-state appropriation, $2,370,000
of the fiscal year 2001 general fund‑-state appropriation, and $4,182,000
of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation are
provided solely for the family policy council and community public health and
safety networks.

(8)
$90,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$91,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $64,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1619 (foster parent
reimbursements). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(9)
$121,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$101,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $80,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1668 (foster parent
training). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided
in this subsection shall lapse.

(10)
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for legal costs associated with the defense of vendors
operating a secure treatment facility for actions arising from the good faith
performance of treatment services for behavioral difficulties or needs.

(11)
$213,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$93,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $78,000 of the general fund‑‑federal appropriation are provided
solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1692 (child sex abuse
investigations). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 203. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-JUVENILE
REHABILITATION PROGRAM

(1)
COMMUNITY SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 32,800,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 34,078,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 8,072,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 380,000

Juvenile
Accountability Incentive Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,427,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 21,034,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 101,791,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
$666,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation
is provided solely for deposit in the county criminal justice assistance
account for costs to the criminal justice system associated with the
implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The
amounts provided in this subsection are intended to provide funding for county
adult court costs associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of
1997 and shall be distributed in accordance with RCW 82.14.310.

(b)
$5,742,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997
(juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are
intended to provide funding for county impacts associated with the
implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be distributed to
counties as prescribed in the current consolidated juvenile services (CJS)
formula.

(c)
$1,161,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$1,162,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
$5,000,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account
appropriation, and $177,000 of the juvenile accountability incentive account‑-federal
appropriation are provided solely to implement community juvenile
accountability grants pursuant to chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code
revisions). Funds provided in this subsection may be used solely for community
juvenile accountability grants, administration of the grants, and evaluations
of programs funded by the grants.

(d)
$2,507,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation
is provided solely to implement alcohol and substance abuse treatment programs
for locally committed offenders. The juvenile rehabilitation administration
shall award these moneys on a competitive basis to counties that submitted a
plan for the provision of services approved by the division of alcohol and
substance abuse. The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall develop
criteria for evaluation of plans submitted and a timeline for awarding funding
and shall assist counties in creating and submitting plans for evaluation.

(e)
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for juvenile rehabilitation administration to contract
with the institute for public policy for responsibilities assigned in chapter
338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions).

(f)
The juvenile rehabilitation administration, in consultation with the juvenile
court administrators, may agree on a formula to allow the transfer of funds
among amounts appropriated for consolidated juvenile services, community
juvenile accountability act grants, the chemically dependent disposition
alternative, and the special sex offender disposition alternative.

(g)
$75,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 is
provided solely for a contract for expanded services of the teamchild project.

(h)
$75,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 is
provided solely for the Skagit county delinquency prevention project.

(i)
$350,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$735,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
$229,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation, and $673,000 of the
violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation are provided
solely to increase payment rates for contracted service providers. It is the
legislature's intent that these amounts be used primarily to increase
compensation for persons employed in direct, front‑line service delivery.

(j)
$1,191,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$1,191,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
and $356,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for parole services for lower risk youth. No later than January 1,
2001, the Washington state institute for public policy shall report to the
legislature on the outcomes of low and moderate risk juvenile rehabilitation
administration offenders who were released without supervision compared to
those who were released with supervision. The study shall compare both the
recidivism rates as well as the nature of any new criminal offenses each group
commits. The legislature shall consider the results of this study in making
any decision to continue or revise parole services for this group of offenders.

(2)
INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 47,599,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 48,799,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 740,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 15,282,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 112,420,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: $37,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2000 and $74,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2001 are provided solely to increase payment rates for contracted service
providers. It is the legislature's intent that these amounts be used primarily
to increase compensation for persons employed in direct, front‑line
service delivery.

(3)
PROGRAM SUPPORT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 1,419,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 1,418,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $ 320,000

Juvenile
Accountability Incentive Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,100,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 421,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 4,678,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 204. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-JUVENILE VIOLENCE
PREVENTION GRANTS.
$900,000 from the state general fund for fiscal year 2000 and $900,000 from the
state general fund for fiscal year 2001 are appropriated to the department of
social and health services, juvenile rehabilitation administration, community
services program, solely to implement the juvenile violence prevention grant
program in this section. Administrative costs may not exceed 10 percent of the
state appropriations made in this section. State funds shall not be used to
pay any administrative costs associated with federal programs. In addition to
these amounts, any funding provided under the federal Byrne grant program
specifically for youth violence prevention shall be included in this grant
program. If any provisions of this section conflict with federal statutes or
rules, those federal statutes or rules shall govern and any conflicting
provisions of this section shall not apply to Byrne grant programs. To the
extent practicable under federal statutes and rules, federal office of juvenile
justice and delinquency prevention funds shall also be included in the grant
program.

The
governor's juvenile justice advisory committee shall administer the grant
program created under this section.

(1)
All grant applications shall:

(a)
Identify the program or proposed program;

(b)
Identify the entity or organization proposing the program. Eligible
organizations include, but are not limited to, nonprofit, civic and charitable
organizations, local governments, tribes, and community networks;

(c)
Include a plan for expenditure of the funds, including specifying what
percentage of the grant will be spent on administration and evaluation costs;
and

(d)
Include a plan to analyze the effectiveness of the program.

(2)
A program is eligible for a grant under this section only if the program:

(a)
Is designed to reduce conditions associated with the entry of youth into the
juvenile justice system;

(b)
Is a new program or replicates in another location an existing program that
meets the criteria of this section;

(c)
Is based on research that supports the program's effectiveness in reducing the
targeted populations risk for delinquency;

(d)
Has community support and is community‑based;

(e)
Will be used for prevention of juvenile crime and not as a disposition or
confinement option for adjudicated or diverted juvenile offenders. This
restriction shall not preclude serving juveniles who have been adjudicated or
diverted prior to participation in the program or who are diverted or
adjudicated during participation in the program; and

(f)
Is in addition to any other state or locally funded juvenile violence
deterrence program and will not supplant existing federal, state, or local
funds. However, if a program is no longer eligible for federal, state, or
local funds, funding provided in this section may supplant that lost federal,
state, or local funding.

(3)
To encourage local ownership of youth violence deterrence programs, grants
awarded by the committee under this section shall:

(a)
Have a duration of up to one year, with renewal options based on availability
of funding and the achievement of outcomes; and

(b)
Not exceed more than seventy‑five percent of the total estimated cost of
a program. Entities or organizations applying for grants under this section
must demonstrate that at least twenty‑five percent of the cost of the
program will be funded from nonstate moneys.

(4)
To encourage grant applications, the committee shall simplify the grant
application process to the greatest extent possible.

(5)
The committee may require that a percentage of the expenditures for a grant be
spent to evaluate the program's effectiveness. The committee may also require
that the evaluation be conducted by individuals or organizations that are not
participating in the program.

(6)
A review team is established to make recommendations to the governor's juvenile
justice advisory committee on the funding of grants made under this section.

(a)
The review team shall consist of no more than fifteen persons appointed by the
committee. Appointees must represent the state's geographic and cultural
diversity and must have demonstrated an interest in juvenile violence and its
prevention. The review team shall include representatives from entities that
disperse funds targeted at youth, including, but not limited to, the office of
the superintendent of public instruction, the office of crime victims advocacy,
the family policy council, the department of health, the Washington council for
the prevention of child abuse and neglect, and the division of alcohol and
substance abuse within the department of social and health services.

(b)
The review team shall provide an opportunity for review by the appropriate
community health and public safety network or networks. The review team shall
receive and consider input from those networks.

(c)
Review team members are eligible for reimbursement of expenses under RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 205. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-MENTAL
HEALTH PROGRAM

(1)
COMMUNITY SERVICES/REGIONAL SUPPORT NETWORKS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 166,224,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 174,494,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 306,547,000

General
Fund‑-Local Appropriation.............. $ 1,827,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 649,092,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
Regional support networks shall use portions of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for implementation of working agreements with the vocational
rehabilitation program which will maximize the use of federal funding for
vocational programs.

(b)
From the general fund‑-state appropriations in this subsection, the
secretary of social and health services shall assure that regional support
networks reimburse the aging and adult services program for the general fund‑-state
cost of medicaid personal care services that enrolled regional support network
consumers use because of their psychiatric disability.

(c)
$600,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $616,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to directly reimburse eligible providers for the
medicaid share of mental health services provided to persons eligible for both
medicaid and medicare.

(d)
$64,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
are provided solely for regional support networks to participate in prerelease
treatment planning and to conduct involuntary commitment evaluations, as
required by Substitute Senate Bill No. 5011 (mentally ill offenders). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, these amounts shall lapse.

(e)
$5,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$466,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
are provided solely for case management and other community support services,
as authorized by Substitute Senate Bill No. 5011 (mentally ill offenders). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, these amounts shall lapse.

(f)
Within funds appropriated in this subsection, the department shall contract
with the Clark county regional support network for development and operation of
a pilot project demonstrating new and collaborative methods for providing
intensive mental health services in the school setting for severely emotionally
disturbed children who are medicaid eligible. Project services are to be
delivered by teachers and teaching assistants who qualify as, or who are under
the supervision of, mental health professionals meeting the requirements of WAC
275-57. The department shall increase medicaid payments to the regional
support network by the amount necessary to cover the necessary and allowable
costs of the demonstration, not to exceed the upper payment limit specified for
the regional support network in the department's medicaid waiver agreement with
the federal government. The regional support network shall provide the department
with (i) periodic reports on project service levels, methods, and outcomes;
(ii) protocols, guidelines, and handbooks suitable for use by other school
districts and regional support networks seeking to replicate the pilot
project's approach; and (iii) intergovernmental transfer equal to the state
share of the increased medicaid payment provided for operation of this project.

(2)
INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 69,946,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 69,932,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 138,825,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 29,456,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 308,159,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
The state mental hospitals may use funds appropriated in this subsection to
purchase goods and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations
when it is cost-effective to do so.

(b)
The mental health program at Western state hospital shall continue to use labor
provided by the Tacoma prerelease program of the department of corrections.

(c)
The department shall use general fund‑-local appropriations in this
subsection to establish a third-party revenue incentive pool, which shall be
used for staff-initiated projects which will increase the quality of care at
the state hospitals. For fiscal year 2000, the incentive pool shall be (i) the
first $200,000 by which revenues from third-party payers exceed $27,800,000;
and (ii) fifty percent of any amounts beyond $28,000,000, up to a maximum of
$500,000. For fiscal year 2001, the incentive pool shall be (iii) the first
$350,000 by which third-party revenues exceed $29,050,000; and (iv) fifty
percent of any amounts beyond $29,400,000, up to a maximum of $700,000. For
purposes of this subsection, "third-party revenues" does not include
disproportionate share hospital payments. The department may establish separate
incentive pools for each hospital. The department may also divide the annual
revenue target into quarterly goals, and make funds available from the
incentive pool on a quarterly basis.

(3)
CIVIL COMMITMENT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 8,665,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 9,524,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 18,189,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
The department shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by
October 1, 1999, on plans for increasing the efficiency of staffing patterns at
the civil commitment center sufficiently to operate within authorized staffing
and expenditure levels.

(b)
In consultation with the attorney general, the courts, prosecutors, and public
defenders, the department shall implement strategies for assuring that the
average costs of civil commitment trials and of annual court reviews do not
exceed approximately $44,000 and $17,000, respectively. If such cost-control
strategies are not in place by January 1, 2000, the department shall begin
paying 85 percent rather than 100 percent of allowable billed charges,
effective that date, for all legal-related billings except those by the
attorney general.

(4)
SPECIAL PROJECTS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 444,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 443,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 3,282,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 4,169,000

(5)
PROGRAM SUPPORT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 2,612,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 2,706,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 3,227,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 8,545,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
By December 1, 1999, the department shall provide the fiscal committees of the
legislature with an independent assessment of options for increasing the
efficiency and effectiveness of current systems and organizational structures
for billing third-party payers for hospital services.

(b)
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $120,000 of the general fund federal appropriation are provided solely for
the institute for public policy to evaluate the impacts of Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5011 (mentally ill offenders), and of chapter 297, Laws of 1998
(commitment of mentally ill persons). If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5011 is
not enacted by June 30, 1999, one-half of each of these amounts shall lapse.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 206. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES PROGRAM

(1)
COMMUNITY SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 183,530,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 197,412,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 319,962,000

Health
Services Account‑-State Appropriation... $ 262,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 701,166,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
The health services account appropriation and $127,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation are provided solely for health care benefits for home care
workers with family incomes below 200 percent of the federal poverty level who
are employed through state contracts for twenty hours per week or more.
Premium payments for individual provider home care workers shall be made only
to the subsidized basic health plan. Home care agencies may obtain coverage
either through the basic health plan or through an alternative plan with
substantially equivalent benefits.

(b)
$3,100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$4,650,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $8,250,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely to increase services and supports for people with developmental
disabilities. These funds shall be expended in accordance with priorities
established by the stakeholder advisory group established in accordance with chapter
216, Laws of 1998 (developmental disabilities), except that (i) at least 60
percent of these amounts must be used to increase the number of people
receiving residential, employment, family support, or other direct services;
(ii) the services and supports must be designed and implemented such that the
cost of continuing them in the 2001-03 biennium does not exceed $19.2 million,
of which no more than $9.3 million is from state funds; and (iii) strong
consideration shall be given to the need for increased wages for direct care
workers in contracted residential programs.

(c)
$413,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$1,172,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $694,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for employment, or other day activities and training programs, for young
people who complete their high school curriculum in 1999 or 2000.

(d)
$1,919,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$2,892,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $4,992,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for alternatives for persons who would otherwise be at substantial risk
of state psychiatric hospitalization. The department shall use these funds and
other resources appropriated in this section and in section 205(1) of this act
to assure that the average number of persons with developmental disabilities in
the state hospitals does not exceed sixty-six per day during the first biennial
quarter; sixty per day during the second; fifty-four per day during the third;
and forty-eight per day during the final quarter of the 1999-2001 biennium.
The developmental disabilities program shall transfer $285 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation to the mental health program for each bed-day by which these
quarterly targets are exceeded.

(e)
$513,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$1,421,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $2,033,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided to
develop and operate secure residential and day program placements for persons
who seem likely to pose a significant risk to the public safety if their
current residential arrangement were to continue.

(f)
$209,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$664,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $939,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided to
increase wages as required by Initiative No. 688 (state minimum wage) for
contracted adult family homes, adult residential care facilities, hourly and
daily family support providers, and hourly attendant care providers.

(g)
$1,978,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$4,475,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $6,989,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely to increase compensation for individual and agency home care workers.
Payments to individual providers are to be increased from $6.18 per hour to
$6.68 per hour on July 1, 1999, and to $7.18 per hour on July 1, 2000.
Payments to agency providers are to be increased to $11.97 per hour on July 1,
1999, and to $12.62 per hour on July 1, 2000. All but 14 cents per hour of the
July 1, 1999, increase to agency providers, and all but 15 cents per hour of
the additional July 1, 2000, increase is to be used to increase wages for
direct care workers. The appropriations in this subsection also include the
funds needed for the employer share of unemployment and social security taxes
on the amount of the increase.

(h)
Within amounts appropriated in this subsection, the developmental disabilities
program shall contract for a pilot program to test an alternative service
delivery model for persons with autism. The department must use a competitive
process to determine the site of the pilot. The pilot program must be
time-limited and subject to an evaluation of client outcomes to determine the
effectiveness and efficiency of the pilot program compared to the standard
service model for persons with autism.

(2)
INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 66,076,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 66,184,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 147,776,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 10,227,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 290,263,000

(3)
PROGRAM SUPPORT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 2,431,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 2,435,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 2,080,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 6,946,000

(4)
SPECIAL PROJECTS

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 12,007,000

NEW SECTION. Sec. 207. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-AGING
AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM

General Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 451,758,000

General Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 476,187,000

General Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 1,000,701,000

General Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 4,274,000

Health Services Account‑-State Appropriation... $ 2,104,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION................. $ 1,935,024,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The entire health services account appropriation, $2,118,000 of the general
fund‑-federal appropriation, $923,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2000, and $958,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for health care benefits
for home care workers who are employed through state contracts for at least
twenty hours per week. Premium payments for individual provider home care
workers shall be made only to the subsidized basic health plan. Home care
agencies may obtain coverage either through the basic health plan or through an
alternative plan with substantially equivalent benefits.

(2)
$1,640,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,640,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001, plus the associated vendor rate increase for each year, are provided
solely for operation of the volunteer chore services program.

(3)
For purposes of implementing Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1484
(nursing home payment rates), the weighted average nursing facility payment
rate for fiscal year 2000 shall be no more than $10.36 for the capital portion
of the rate and no more than $108.20 for the noncapital portion of the rate.
For fiscal year 2000, the weighted average nursing facility payment rate shall
be no more than $10.57 for the capital portion of the rate and no more than
$110.91 for the noncapital portion of the rate. These rates include vendor
rate increases, but exclude nurse's aide training.

(4)
If Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1484 is not enacted by June 30,
1999, for purposes of implementing chapter 322, Laws of 1998 (nursing home
payment rates), the weighted average nursing home payment rate shall be no more
than $118.39 for fiscal year 2000 and no more than $120.36 for fiscal year
2001, including vendor rate increases but excluding nurse's aide training. The
appropriations in this section include $69,173,000 for fiscal year 2000 and
$68,123,000 for fiscal year 2001 for the department of social and health
services to include a property component, a financing allowance component, and
a variable return component in the rate it pays to nursing facilities. By July
1, 1999, the department shall adopt rules on an emergency basis pursuant to RCW
34.05.350 under which each nursing facility contractor shall continue to be
paid the property, the financing allowance, and the variable return rate which
it was paid on June 30, 1999. Each nursing facility contractor's June 30,
1999, variable return rate shall be increased by 1 percent effective July 1,
1999. Each nursing facility contractor's June 30, 2000 variable return rate
shall be increased by 1 percent effective July 1, 2000. With respect to a
nursing facility which enters the medicaid program for the first time on or
after July 1, 1999, the department shall pay the lesser of (a) the property,
the financing allowance, and the variable return rate for which the facility
would qualify under chapter 388-96 WAC; or (b) the state-wide average rate for
each of those rate components, weighted by medicaid patient days. With respect
to a nursing facility which makes a capitalized addition or replacement which
requires a certificate of need and which is approved by the department of
health on or after July 1, 1999, the department shall pay the lesser of (a) the
property, the financing allowance, and the variable return rate for which the
facility would qualify under chapter 388-96 WAC; or (b) the state-wide average
rate for each of those rate components, weighted by medicaid patient days.

(5)
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for payments to any nursing facility licensed under chapter
18.51 RCW which meets all of the following criteria: (a) The nursing home
entered into an arm's length agreement for a facility lease prior to January 1,
1980; (b) the lessee purchased the leased nursing home after January 1, 1980;
and (c) the lessor defaulted on its loan or mortgage for the assets of the home
after January 1, 1991, and prior to January 1, 1992. Payments provided
pursuant to this subsection shall not be subject to the settlement, audit, or
rate-setting requirements contained in chapter 74.46 RCW.

(6)
$6,264,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$13,860,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001, and $21,795,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are
provided solely to increase compensation for individual and for agency home
care providers. Payments to individual home care providers are to be increased
from $6.18 per hour to $6.68 per hour on July 1, 1999, and to $7.18 per hour on
July 1, 2000. Payments to agency providers are to increase to $11.97 per hour
on July 1, 1999, and to $12.62 per hour on July 1, 2000. All but 14 cents per
hour of the July 1, 1999, increase to agency providers, and all but 15 cents
per hour of the additional July 1, 2000, increase is to be used to increase
wages for direct care workers. The appropriations in this subsection also
include the funds needed for the employer share of unemployment and social
security taxes on the amount of the increase.

(7)
$200,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$80,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $280,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for enhancement and integration of existing management information
systems to (a) provide data at the local office level on service utilization,
costs, and recipient characteristics; and (b) reduce the staff time devoted to
data entry.

(8)
The department of social and health services shall provide access and choice to
consumers of adult day health services for the purposes of nursing services,
physical therapy, occupational therapy, and psychosocial therapy. Adult day
health services shall not be considered a duplication of services for persons
receiving care in long-term care settings licensed under chapter 18.20, 72.36,
or 70.128 RCW.

(9)
$1,452,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$1,528,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $2,980,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1546 (in-home
care services). If Second Substitute House Bill No. 1546 is not enacted by
June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 208. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-ECONOMIC
SERVICES PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 457,162,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 441,575,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 1,220,874,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 30,838,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 2,150,449,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$308,504,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2000, $293,144,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2001, $1,133,782,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation, and
$28,402,000 of the general fund‑-local appropriation are provided solely
for the WorkFirst program and child support operations. WorkFirst
expenditures include TANF grants, diversion services, subsidized child care,
employment and training, other WorkFirst related services, allocated field
services operating costs, and allocated economic services program
administrative costs. Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the
department shall:

(a)
Continue to implement WorkFirst program improvements that are designed to
achieve progress against outcome measures specified in RCW 74.08A.410. Valid
measures of job retention and wage progression shall be developed and reported
for families who leave assistance, measured after 12 months, 24 months, and 36
months.

(b)
Provide $500,000 from the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2000 and $500,000 from the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2001 for continuation of the WorkFirst evaluation conducted by the
joint legislative audit and review committee.

(c)
Report to the appropriate committees of the legislature, by December 1, 1999,
how the new federal child support incentive system can be used to maximize
federal incentive payments and to support the greatest achievement of WorkFirst
program goals. In the event that the department earns federal child support
incentive payments in excess of amounts budgeted, the department shall use
one-half of those additional funds to offset general fund‑-state
allotments and one-half of those additional funds to improve child support
services.

(2)
$50,860,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $50,825,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for cash assistance and other services to recipients
in the general assistance‑-unemployable program. Within these amounts,
the department may expend funds for services that assist recipients to reduce
their dependence on public assistance, provided that expenditures for these
services and cash assistance do not exceed funds provided.

(3)
$8,752,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $8,752,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the food assistance program for legal immigrants.
The level of benefits shall be equivalent to the benefits provided by the
federal food stamp program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 209. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-ALCOHOL
AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 21,451,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 21,858,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 90,800,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 1,204,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 6,660,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 77,150,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 219,123,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$1,960,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$1,960,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for expansion of 50 drug and alcohol treatment beds for persons
committed under RCW 70.96A.140. Patients meeting the commitment criteria of
RCW 70.96A.140 but who voluntarily agree to treatment in lieu of commitment
shall also be eligible for treatment in these additional treatment beds. The
department shall develop specific placement criteria for these expanded
treatment beds to ensure that this new treatment capacity is prioritized for
persons incapacitated as a result of chemical dependency and who are also high
utilizers of hospital services.

(2)
$18,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $88,000
of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and $116,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5557 (the HOPE
act) or sections 10 through 29 of Second Substitute House Bill 1492. If
neither bill is enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

(3)
$1,444,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$1,484,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and
$330,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided for
implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5480 (drug-affected
infants) or sections 1 through 17 of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1574. If
legislation expanding services to prevent drug-affected infants is not enacted
by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection shall be provided
solely for the development and implementation of comprehensive programs for
alcohol and drug abusing mothers and their young children. The pilot programs
shall be implemented in several locations, including at least one rural
location. The pilot programs shall also be supported with TANF funds provided
in section 208 of this act as a way to reduce prolonged dependency on public
assistance for program participants.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 210. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-MEDICAL
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 722,863,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 784,657,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 2,345,803,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 261,534,000

Emergency
Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems

Trust
Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 9,200,000

Health
Services Account‑-State Appropriation... $ 339,535,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 4,463,592,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The department shall continue to make use of the special eligibility category created
for children through age 18 and in households with incomes below 200 percent of
the federal poverty level made eligible for medicaid as of July 1, 1994.

(2)
It is the intent of the legislature that Harborview medical center continue to
be an economically viable component of the health care system and that the
state's financial interest in Harborview medical center be recognized.

(3)
Funding is provided in this section for the adult dental program for Title XIX
categorically eligible and medically needy persons and to provide foot care
services by podiatric physicians and surgeons.

(4)
$1,647,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,672,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided for treatment of low-income kidney dialysis patients.

(5)
$80,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$80,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $160,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for the prenatal triage clearinghouse to provide access and outreach to
reduce infant mortality.

(6)
The department shall adopt a new formula for distributing funds under the
low-income disproportionate share hospital (LI-DSH) program. Under this new
formula, (a) the state's Level 1 trauma center shall continue to receive the
same amount of LI-DSH payments as in fiscal year 1999; and (b) in addition to
other factors, the amount of a hospital's LI-DSH payment shall be inversely
related to its net operating income as a percentage of total expenditures, such
that more profitable hospitals receive a relatively smaller payment under the
program.

(7)
The department shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by
September 15, 1999, and again by December 15, 1999, on (a) actions it has taken
and proposes to take to increase the share of medicare part B premium payments
upon which it is collecting medicaid matching funds; (b) the percentage of such
premium payments for each month of service subsequent to June 1998 which have
been paid with unmatched, state-only funds; and (c) why matching funds could
not be collected on those payments.

(8)
The department shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by
December 1, 1999, and again by October 1, 2000, on the amount which has been
recovered from third-party payers as a result of its efforts to improve
coordination of benefits on behalf of "basic health plan-plus"
enrollees.

(9)
The department shall report to the health care and fiscal committees of the
legislature by December 1, 1999, on options for controlling the growth in
medicaid prescription drug expenditures through strategies such as but not
limited to volume purchasing, selective contracting, supplemental drug discounts,
and improved care coordination for high utilizers.

(10)
$3,992,000 of the health services account appropriation and $7,651,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for health
insurance coverage for children with family incomes between 200 percent and 250
percent of the federal poverty level, as provided in Substitute Senate Bill No.
5416 (children's health insurance program). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 1999, these amounts shall lapse.

(11)
$191,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $391,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5587
(patient bill of rights). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, these
amounts shall lapse.

(12)
Upon approval from the federal health care financing administration, the
department shall implement the section 1115 family planning waiver to provide
family planning services to persons with family incomes at or below two hundred
percent of the federal poverty level.

(13)
Except in the case of rural hospitals and Harborview medical center, weighted
average payment rates under the ratio-of-cost-to-charges hospital payment
system shall increase by no more than 4.7 percent per year.

(14)
From the funds appropriated in this section, the department shall provide
chiropractic services for persons qualifying for medical assistance services
under chapter 74.09 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 211. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-VOCATIONAL
REHABILITATION PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 8,960,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 9,078,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 81,906,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 2,904,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 102,848,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The division of vocational rehabilitation shall negotiate cooperative
interagency agreements with state and local organizations to improve and expand
employment opportunities for people with severe disabilities served by those
organizations.

(2)
$190,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$240,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $1,590,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for vocational rehabilitation services for individuals enrolled for
services with the developmental disabilities program who complete their high
school curriculum in 1999 or 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 212. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-ADMINISTRATION
AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 25,695,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 25,200,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 46,601,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 720,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 98,216,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Funding is provided for the incremental cost of lease renewals and for the
temporary increased costs for relocating staff out of state office building no.
2 (OB2) during the renovation of that building. Of this increase, $2,400,000
is provided for relocating staff. This amount is recognized as one-time-only
funding for the 1999-01 biennium. As part of the 2001-2003 budget request, the
department shall update the estimate of increased cost for relocating staff,
including specifying what portion of that increase is due to providing more
square footage per FTE in the new leased space compared to the space occupied
previously.

(2)
The department may transfer up to $528,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $1,057,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and $812,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation to the administration and supporting services program from
various other programs to implement administrative reductions.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 213. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-PAYMENTS
TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 30,790,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 30,719,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 22,747,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 84,256,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 214. FOR
THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 6,441,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 6,563,000

State
Health Care Authority Administrative Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 39,585,000

Health
Services Account‑-State Appropriation... $ 414,159,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 4,501,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 471,249,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The general fund‑-state appropriations are provided solely for health
care services provided through local community clinics.

(2)
Within funds appropriated in this section and sections 205 and 206 of chapter
149, Laws of 1997, the health care authority shall continue to provide an
enhanced basic health plan subsidy option for foster parents licensed under
chapter 74.15 RCW and workers in state-funded home care programs. Under this
enhanced subsidy option, foster parents and home care workers with family
incomes below 200 percent of the federal poverty level shall be allowed to
enroll in the basic health plan at a cost of ten dollars per covered worker per
month.

(3)
The health care authority shall require organizations and individuals which are
paid to deliver basic health plan services and which choose to sponsor
enrollment in the subsidized basic health plan to pay the following: (i) A
minimum of fifteen dollars per enrollee per month for persons below 100 percent
of the federal poverty level; and (ii) a minimum of twenty dollars per enrollee
per month for persons whose family income is 100 percent to 125 percent of the
federal poverty level.

(4)
$442,000 of the state health care authority administrative account
appropriation is provided solely for the uniform medical plan to contract for
the following services: (a) A provider profiling system; (b) a waste, fraud,
and abuse monitoring and information system; (c) an optional case management
program; and (d) hospital audits. The health care authority may not expend any
funds under this subsection until the office of financial management has
approved a detailed project plan for expenditure of these funds.

(5)
$572,000 of the health services account appropriation is provided solely to
implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5587 (patient bill of rights). If this
bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, this amount shall lapse.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 215. FOR
THE HUMAN
RIGHTS COMMISSION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 2,536,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 2,550,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 1,474,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 100,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 6,660,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 216. FOR
THE BOARD
OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE APPEALS

Worker
and Community Right-to-Know Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 20,000

Accident
Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 11,603,000

Medical
Aid Account‑-State Appropriation........ $...................................... 11,608,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 23,231,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 217. FOR
THE CRIMINAL
JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $ 100,000

Death
Investigations Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 38,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 17,469,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 17,607,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$125,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for information technology upgrades and improvements for the criminal
justice training commission.

(2)
$481,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of provisions of chapter 351, Laws of 1997
(criminal justice training) dealing with supervisory and management training of
law enforcement personnel. Within the funds provided in this subsection, the
criminal justice training commission shall provide the required training in the
least disruptive manner to local law enforcement agencies and may include, but
is not limited to, regional on-site training, interactive training, and credit
for training given by the home department.

(3)
$2,092,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for expanding the basic law enforcement academy (BLEA) from 469 hours to
720 hours. The funds provided in this subsection are assumed sufficient for
the criminal justice training commission to provide expanded BLEA training to
330 attendees in fiscal year 2000 and 660 attendees in fiscal year 2001.

(4)
$180,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1176
(sexually violent offender records). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
1999, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5)
$276,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1692 (child
witness/victim interviews). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 218. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 7,268,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 7,240,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 16,091,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,950,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,057,000

Electrical
License Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 24,055,000

Farm
Labor Revolving Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 28,000

Worker
and Community Right-to-Know Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,211,000

Public
Works Administration Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,996,000

Accident
Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 167,736,000

Accident
Account‑-Federal Appropriation........ $ 9,112,000

Medical
Aid Account‑-State Appropriation........ $...................................... 170,197,000

Medical
Aid Account‑-Federal Appropriation..... $ 1,592,000

Plumbing
Certificate Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 971,000

Pressure
Systems Safety Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,167,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 420,671,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Pursuant to RCW 7.68.015, the department shall operate the crime victims
compensation program within the public safety and education account funds
appropriated in this section. In the event that cost containment measures are
necessary, the department may (a) institute copayments for services; (b)
develop preferred provider and managed care contracts; (c) coordinate with the
department of social and health services to use the public safety and education
account as matching funds for federal Title XIX reimbursement, to the extent
this maximizes total funds available for services to crime victims.

(2)
$123,000 of the accident account‑-state appropriation and $22,000 of the
medical aid account‑-state appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5597 (needle stick protection). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(3)
$302,000 of the accident account‑-state appropriation and $302,000 of the
medical aid account‑-state appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5439 (false claims). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(4)
$709,000 of the accident account‑-state appropriation and $709,000 of the
medical aid account‑-state appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5580 (payments during appeals). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(5)
$481,000 of the medical aid account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5470
(chemically related illnesses). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 219. FOR
THE INDETERMINATE
SENTENCE REVIEW BOARD

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 929,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 925,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 1,854,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 220. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

(1)
HEADQUARTERS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 1,409,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 1,428,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $ 134,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 78,000

Industrial
Insurance Premium Refund Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 78,000

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 3,129,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: $39,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is
provided solely as an additional state contribution toward the cost of
constructing a memorial on the state capitol grounds to the men and women who
served in the nation's armed forces during the second world war.

(2)
FIELD SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 2,466,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 2,494,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $ 26,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 1,495,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 6,481,000

(3)
INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 6,155,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001) ... $ 5,337,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 20,949,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 14,682,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 47,123,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 221. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF HEALTH

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 68,937,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 69,635,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 268,710,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 68,648,000

Hospital
Commission Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,128,000

Health
Professions Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 37,529,000

Emergency
Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems

Trust
Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 14,856,000

State
Drinking Water Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,531,000

Drinking
Water Assistance Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,456,000

Waterworks
Operator Certification‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 593,000

Water
Quality Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 3,124,000

Accident
Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 258,000

Medical
Aid Account‑-State Appropriation........ $ 45,000

State
Toxics Control Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,614,000

Medical
Test Site Licensure Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,651,000

Youth
Tobacco Prevention Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,804,000

Tobacco
Prevention and Control Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 620,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 550,151,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$2,434,000 of the health professions account appropriation is provided solely
for the development and implementation of a licensing and disciplinary
management system. Expenditures are conditioned upon compliance with section
902 of this act. These funds shall not be expended without appropriate project
approval by the department of information systems.

(2)
The department or any successor agency is authorized to raise existing fees
charged to the nursing assistants, podiatrists, and osteopaths; for certificate
of need; for temporary worker housing; for state institution inspection; for
residential care facilities and for transient accommodations, in excess of the
fiscal growth factor established by Initiative Measure No. 601, if necessary,
to meet the actual costs of conducting business and the appropriation levels in
this section.

(3)
$339,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$339,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $678,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for technical assistance to local governments and special districts on
water reclamation and reuse.

(4)
$1,636,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided to
develop a water use data management system and establish a water conservation
and reuse program for local governments and special districts. $818,000 of
this amount may be expended in each fiscal year of the biennium, only if the
state receives greater than $25,000,000 from the federal government for salmon
recovery activities in that fiscal year. Funds authorized for expenditure in
fiscal year 2000 may be expended in fiscal year 2001.

(5)
$1,685,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2000 appropriation and
$1,686,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2001 appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound water work plan and
agency action items, DOH-01, DOH-02, DOH-03, and DOH-04.

(6)
$4,645,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2000 appropriation and
$4,645,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2001 appropriation are
provided solely for distribution to local health departments.

(7)
The department of health shall not initiate any services that will require
expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this
act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW
43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long
as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the
program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department
receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides
appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state moneys shall
lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of
financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used
in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block
grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on
specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(8)
$620,000 of the tobacco prevention and control account appropriation and
$209,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely
for implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5516 or, if the bill
is not enacted, for the development of a sustainable, long-term, comprehensive
tobacco control program. The plan shall identify a specific set of outcome
measures that shall be used to track long range progress in reducing the use of
tobacco. Nationally accepted measures that can be used to compare progress
with other states shall be included. The plan shall emphasize programs that
have demonstrated effectiveness in achieving progress towards the specified
outcome measures. Components of the plan that do not have a record of success
may be included, provided that the plan also includes the means of evaluating
those components. The plan shall also include an inventory of existing
publically funded programs that seek to prevent the use of tobacco, alcohol, or
other drugs by children and youth and recommendations to coordinate and
consolidate these programs in order to achieve greatest positive outcomes
within total available resources. A preliminary plan shall be submitted to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 1999, with the final
plan submitted by September 1, 2000.

(9)
$2,075,000 of fiscal year 2000 general fund‑-state appropriation and
$2,075,000 of fiscal year 2001 general fund‑-state appropriation are
provided for the Washington poison center. The department shall require the
center to develop a long range financing plan that identifies options for
diversifying funding for center operations, including, but not limited to,
federal grants, private sector grants and sponsorships, and multistate or
regional operating agreements. The plan shall be submitted to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2000.

(10)
$50,000 of fiscal year 2000 general fund--state appropriation and $50,000 of
fiscal year 2001 general fund--state appropriation are provided solely for fund
raising and other activities for the development of early hearing loss
clinics. The development plan for these clinics shall not assume ongoing
general fund‑-state appropriations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 222. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF CORRECTIONS

(1)
ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 29,449,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 28,169,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,216,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 62,834,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
$2,072,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$212,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $5,216,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation are
provided solely for replacement of the department's offender-based tracking
system. These amounts are subject to section 902 of this act.

(b)
$462,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $538,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5421 (offender accountability). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2)
CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 363,411,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 364,857,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 34,393,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 1,614,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 764,275,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
Not more than $3,000,000 may be expended to provide financial assistance to
counties for monitoring and treatment services provided to felony offenders
involved in drug court programs pursuant to sections 7 though 12 of Engrossed
Second Substitute House Bill No. 1006 (drug offender sentencing). The
secretary may negotiate terms, conditions, and amounts of assistance with
counties or groups of counties operating drug courts, and may review charging
and other documents to verify eligibility for payment. The secretary may contract
with the division of alcohol and substance abuse, department of social and
health services, for monitoring and treatment services provided pursuant to
this subsection.

(b)
The department may expend funds generated by contractual agreements entered into
for mitigation of severe overcrowding in local jails. If any funds are
generated in excess of actual costs, they shall be deposited in the state
general fund. Expenditures shall not exceed revenue generated by such
agreements and shall be treated as recovery of costs.

(c)
The department shall provide funding for the pet partnership program at the
Washington corrections center for women at a level at least equal to that
provided in the 1995‑97 biennium.

(d)
The department of corrections shall accomplish personnel reductions with the
least possible impact on correctional custody staff, community custody staff,
and correctional industries. For the purposes of this subsection, correctional
custody staff means employees responsible for the direct supervision of
offenders.

(e)
$583,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,178,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to increase payment rates for contracted education
providers and contracted work release facilities. It is the legislature's
intent that these amounts be used primarily to increase compensation for
persons employed in direct, front‑line service delivery.

(f)
$151,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $57,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5421 (offender accountability). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(g)
$18,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$334,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
are provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5538 (sentencing)
or section 3 of House Bill No. 1544 (sentencing corrections). If neither bill
is enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(h)
$171,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,094,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 1006 (drug offender sentencing). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(i)
The department of corrections shall submit to the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the senate and house of representatives, by December 15, 1999, a
report on how the department plans to manage hepatitis C in the inmate
population. In developing the plan, the department shall work with recognized
experts in the field and shall take notice of the current national institutes
of health hepatitis C guidelines and hepatitis C protocols observed in other
correctional settings. Included in the plan shall be offender education about
the disease, how and when offenders would be tested, how the disease would be
managed if an inmate is determined to have hepatitis C, and an estimate of the
number of inmates in the Washington prison system with hepatitis C. The
proposed plan must also include recommendations to the legislature on ways to
improve hepatitis C disease management and what level of funding would be
necessary to appropriately test for and treat the disease.

(j)
For the acquisition of properties and facilities, the department of corrections
is authorized to enter into financial contracts, paid for from operating
resources, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal
amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW. This authority applies to the following:

(A)
Enter into a long-term ground lease or a long-term lease with purchase option
for development of a Tacoma prerelease facility for approximately $360,000 per
year. Prior to entering into any lease, the department of corrections shall
obtain written confirmation from the city of Tacoma and Pierce county that the
prerelease facility planned for the site meets all land use, environmental
protection, and community notification requirements.

(B)
Enter into a financing contract in the amount of $21,350,000 to acquire,
construct, or remodel a 400-bed, expandable to 600-bed, Tacoma prerelease
facility.

(C)
Lease-develop with the option to purchase or lease-purchase approximately 100
work release beds in facilities throughout the state for $7,000,000.

(3)
COMMUNITY SUPERVISION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 54,227,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 61,321,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 115,548,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
The department of corrections shall accomplish personnel reductions with the
least possible impact on correctional custody staff, community custody staff,
and correctional industries. For the purposes of this subsection, correctional
custody staff means employees responsible for the direct supervision of
offenders.

(b)
$445,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2000 and $6,662,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for
fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5421 (offender accountability). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(c)
$109,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $126,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
5011 (dangerous mentally ill offenders). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(d)
$75,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$75,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for the department of corrections to contract with the
institute for public policy for responsibilities assigned in Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5421 (offender accountability act) and sections 7
through 12 of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1006 (drug offender
sentencing).

(4)
CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 817,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 3,654,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 4,471,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for transfer to the jail industries board. The board
shall use the amounts provided only for administrative expenses, equipment
purchases, and technical assistance associated with advising cities and
counties in developing, promoting, and implementing consistent, safe, and
efficient offender work programs.

(b)
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for the correctional industries board of directors to hire one
staff person, responsible directly to the board, to assist the board in
fulfilling its duties.

(5)
INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 12,823,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 11,908,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 24,731,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 223. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF SERVICES FOR THE BLIND

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 1,481,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 1,513,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 11,062,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 80,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 14,136,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 224. FOR
THE SENTENCING
GUIDELINES COMMISSION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 803,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 746,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 1,549,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: $63,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for
fiscal year 2000 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5421 (offender accountability). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 225. FOR
THE EMPLOYMENT
SECURITY DEPARTMENT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 1,263,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 1,259,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 209,498,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 29,135,000

Unemployment
Compensation Administration Account‑-

Federal
Appropriation...................... $ 174,343,000

Administrative
Contingency Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 9,443,000

Employment
Service Administrative Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 16,890,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 441,831,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations: Expenditures of funds appropriated in this section
for the information systems project to improve the agency's labor exchange
system are conditioned upon compliance with section 902 of this act.

(End of part)

PART
III

NATURAL
RESOURCES

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 301. FOR
THE COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE COMMISSION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 370,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 327,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation........... $ 657,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 1,354,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$40,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$40,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely to implement the scenic area management plan for Klickitat
county. If Klickitat county adopts an ordinance to implement the scenic area
management plan in accordance with the national scenic area act, P.L. 99-663,
then the amounts provided in this subsection shall be provided as a grant to
Klickitat county to implement its responsibilities under the act.

(2)
Within the funding provided, the commission shall make every effort to complete
its review of the national scenic area management plan by the end of the
1999-01 biennium.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 302. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 33,558,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 33,539,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation.................. $.................................. 48,981,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation........... $ 4,234,000

Special
Grass Seed Burning Research Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 14,000

Reclamation
Revolving Account‑-State Appropriation... $................................................ 1,735,000

Flood
Control Assistance Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 3,989,000

State
Emergency Water Projects Revolving Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 317,000

Waste
Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 13,192,000

Salmon
Recovery Account‑-State Appropriation........ $ 1,120,000

State
and Local Improvements Revolving Account

(Water
Supply Facilities)‑-State Appropriation... $ 557,000

Water
Quality Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 3,879,000

Wood
Stove Education and Enforcement Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 351,000

Worker
and Community Right-to-Know Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 3,155,000

State
Toxics Control Account‑-State Appropriation.... $................................................ 46,838,000

State
Toxics Control Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation................................... $ 377,000

Local
Toxics Control Account‑-State Appropriation.... $................................................ 4,586,000

Water
Quality Permit Account‑-State Appropriation.... $................................................ 21,003,000

Underground
Storage Tank Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 2,475,000

Environmental
Excellence Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 20,000

Biosolids
Permit Account‑-State Appropriation........ $ 572,000

Hazardous
Waste Assistance Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 3,942,000

Air
Pollution Control Account‑-State Appropriation... $................................................ 15,844,000

Oil
Spill Administration Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 7,521,000

Air
Operating Permit Account‑-State Appropriation.... $................................................ 3,548,000

Freshwater
Aquatic Weeds Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 1,430,000

Oil
Spill Response Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 7,078,000

Metals
Mining Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 43,000

Water
Pollution Control Revolving Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 439,000

Water
Pollution Control Revolving Account‑-

Federal
Appropriation........................... $ 2,200,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 266,537,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$3,432,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$3,438,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
$394,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation, $2,070,000 of the
oil spill administration account‑-state appropriation, $819,000 of the
state toxics control account‑-state appropriation, and $3,686,000 of the
water quality permit account‑-state appropriation are provided solely for
the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action items DOE-01,
DOE-02, DOE-03, DOE-05, DOE-06, DOE-07, DOE-08, and DOE-09.

(2)
$170,000 of the oil spill administration account appropriation is provided
solely for implementation of the Puget Sound work plan action item UW-02
through a contract with the University of Washington's sea grant program to
develop an educational program targeted to small spills from commercial fishing
vessels, ferries, cruise ships, ports, and marinas.

(3)
$374,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$283,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for the department to digitize water rights documents and to
provide this information to watershed planning groups.

(4)
$500,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is provided solely for the
department to update its water rights tracking system. $250,000 of this amount
may be expended in each fiscal year of the biennium only if the state receives
greater than $25,000,000 from the federal government for salmon recovery
activities in that fiscal year. Funds authorized for expenditure in fiscal
year 2000 may be expended in fiscal year 2001.

(5)
$1,566,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation, $1,033,000 of the
general fund‑-private/local appropriation, and $919,000 of the water
quality account appropriation are provided solely to implement Senate Bill No.
5255 (Washington conservation corps). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
1999, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6)
$250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 is
provided solely for study of the impacts of gravel removal on the hydrology of
Maury Island. The study shall consider impacts to the nearshore environment
and aquifer recharge, and assess the potential for groundwater or marine
sediment contamination. The department shall contract for the study, which
shall be completed by June 30, 2000.

(7)
$250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 is
provided solely for a study of the impacts of gravel deposit on the Highline
aquifer. The study shall consider impacts to instream flow and sedimentation
of Des Moines, Miller, and Walker creeks. The department shall contract for
the study, which shall be completed by June 30, 2000.

(8)
The entire freshwater aquatic weeds account appropriation shall be distributed
according to the provisions of RCW 43.21A.660. Funding may be provided for
chemical control of Eurasian watermilfoil.

(9)
$15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely to monitor and address, in coordination with the marine
operations division of the department of transportation, odor problems in
Fauntleroy Cove.

(10)
$144,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$133,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $277,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for
water quality activities related to forest practices. $138,500 of the general
fund‑-federal amount may be expended in each fiscal year of the biennium
only if the state receives greater than $25,000,000 from the federal government
for salmon recovery activities in that fiscal year. Funds authorized for
expenditure in fiscal year 2000 may be expended in fiscal year 2001.

(11)
$100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 is
provided solely for the department to form an advisory committee for the
purpose of updating the department's storm water management plan and the Puget
Sound storm water management manual. The advisory committee shall be appointed
no later than September 1, 1999, and it shall provide its recommendations on
storm water management to the legislature by December 31, 2000.

(12)
$383,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $384,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for an agency permit assistance center, including four
regional permit assistance offices.

(13)
$438,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$1,025,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $1,870,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for the establishment of total maximum daily loads for water bodies
across the state. $433,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is
to implement the Puget Sound work plan and agency action item DOE-2.

(14)
$591,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$1,131,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely to process water rights applications.

(15)
$414,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$383,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and
$797,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for
technical assistance and project review for water conservation and reuse projects.
$398,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation may be expended in each
fiscal year of the biennium only if the state receives greater than $25,000,000
from the federal government for salmon recovery activities in that fiscal
year. Funds authorized for expenditure in fiscal year 2000 may be expended in
fiscal year 2001.

(16)
The entire salmon recovery account appropriation is provided to increase
compliance with existing water quality and water resources laws.

(17)
$4,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$4,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and
$1,500,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely
for grants to local governments to conduct watershed planning. $750,000 of the
general fund‑-federal amount may be expended in each fiscal year of the
biennium only if the state receives greater than $25,000,000 from the federal
government for salmon recovery activities in that fiscal year. Funds
authorized for expenditure in fiscal year 2000 may be expended in fiscal year
2001.

(18)
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$82,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $181,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for
the department, in cooperation with the department of fish and wildlife, to
establish fish and habitat index monitoring sites to measure the effectiveness
of salmon recovery activities. $90,500 of the general fund‑-federal
amount may be expended in each fiscal year of the biennium only if the state
receives greater than $25,000,000 from the federal government for salmon
recovery activities in that fiscal year. Funds authorized for expenditure in
fiscal year 2000 may be expended in fiscal year 2001.

(19)
$276,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$207,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5424 (aquatic plant management).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(20)
$500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the continuation of the southwest Washington
coastal erosion study.

(21)
$638,000 of the oil spill administration account appropriation is provided
solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 2247 (oil spill response tax).
Of this amount: (a) $120,000 is provided solely for spill response equipment;
(b) $307,000 is provided solely to develop an oil spill risk management plan;
and (c) $211,000 is provided solely for spills information management
improvements. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(23)
$145,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2000 appropriation and
$145,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2001 appropriation are
provided solely for training and technical assistance to support the activities
of county water conservancy boards.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 303. FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 27,498,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 28,073,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation.................. $.................................. 2,113,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation........... $ 59,000

Winter
Recreation Program Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 763,000

Off
Road Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation........ $ 264,000

Snowmobile
Account‑-State Appropriation............. $ 3,653,000

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 325,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 48,000

Water
Trail Program Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ 14,000

Parks
Renewal and Stewardship Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 25,907,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 88,717,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$189,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan agency action items
P&RC-01 and P&RC-03.

(2)
$105,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $31,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
are provided solely for the state parks and recreation commission to meet its
responsibilities under the Native American graves protection and repatriation
act (P.L. 101-601).

(3)
$2,000,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account appropriation is
dependent upon the parks and recreation commission generating revenue to the
account in excess of $26,000,000 for the biennium. These funds shall be used
for deferred maintenance and visitor and ranger safety activities.

(4)
$772,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $849,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5255 (Washington
conservation corps). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5)
Fees approved by the state parks and recreation commission in 1998 for camping,
group camping, extra vehicles, and the sno-park daily permit are authorized to
exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW 43.135.055.

(6)
$40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$40,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for a grant for the operation of the Northwest avalanche
center.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 304. FOR
THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Firearms
Range Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 34,000

Recreation
Resources Account‑-State Appropriation.... $................................................ 2,370,000

Recreation
Resources Account‑-Federal Appropriation. $ 11,000

NOVA Program
Account‑-State Appropriation........... $ 604,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 3,019,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 305. FOR
THE ENVIRONMENTAL HEARINGS OFFICE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 807,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 805,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 1,612,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 306. FOR
THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 2,630,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 2,634,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation.................. $.................................. 1,800,000

Salmon
Recovery Account‑-State Appropriation........ $ 3,618,000

Water
Quality Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 444,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 11,126,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$182,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$182,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $130,000 of the water quality account appropriation are provided solely for
the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan agency action item CC-01.

(2)
$550,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $550,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for grants to conservation districts to reduce nitrate
contamination in the Columbia Basin ground water management area.

(3)
$1,968,000 of the salmon recovery account appropriation is provided solely for
conducting limiting factors analysis for salmon species.

(4)
$250,000 of the salmon recovery account appropriation is provided solely for a
facilitated review of the field office technical guides of the federal natural
resource conservation service to ensure the guides meet the requirements of the
federal endangered species act and clean water act.

(5)
$500,000 of the salmon recovery account appropriation and $1,500,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for a volunteer
salmon recovery initiative. The salmon recovery account appropriation is
provided for volunteer coordination through regional fisheries enhancement
groups. $750,000 of the general fund‑‑federal amount may be
expended in each fiscal year only if the state receives greater than
$25,000,000 from the federal government for salmon recovery activities in that
fiscal year. Funds authorized for expenditure in fiscal year 2000 may be
expended in fiscal year 2001.

(6)
$900,000 of the salmon recovery account appropriation and $300,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for local salmon
recovery technical assistance. Technical assistance shall be coordinated among
all state agencies including the conservation commission, department of fish
and wildlife, department of ecology, department of health, department of
agriculture, department of transportation, state parks and recreation,
interagency committee for outdoor recreation, governor's salmon recovery
office, Puget Sound water quality action team, department of community, trade,
and economic development, and department of natural resources. $150,000 of the
general fund‑-federal amount may be expended in each fiscal year of the
biennium only if the state receives greater than $25,000,000 from the federal
government for salmon recovery activities in that fiscal year. Funds
authorized for expenditure in fiscal year 2000 may be expended in fiscal year
2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 307. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 42,896,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 42,443,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation.................. $.................................. 42,755,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation........... $ 14,416,000

Off
Road Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation........ $ 490,000

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 4,432,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 586,000

Recreational
Fisheries Enhancement Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 3,596,000

Salmon
Recovery Account‑-State Appropriation........ $ 9,316,000

Warm
Water Game Fish Account‑-State Appropriation.... $................................................ 2,419,000

Eastern
Washington Pheasant Enhancement Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 551,000

Wildlife
Account‑-State Appropriation............... $ 40,293,000

Wildlife
Account‑-Federal Appropriation............. $ 40,040,000

Wildlife
Account‑-Private/Local Appropriation........ $........................................... 13,072,000

Game
Special Wildlife Account‑-State Appropriation... $................................................ 1,939,000

Game
Special Wildlife Account‑-Federal

Appropriation................................... $ 9,603,000

Game
Special Wildlife Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation................................... $ 350,000

Environmental
Excellence Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 15,000

Regional
Fisheries Salmonid Recovery Account‑-

Federal
Appropriation........................... $ 750,000

Oil
Spill Administration Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 969,000

Sea
Cucumber Dive Fishery Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 108,000

Sea
Urchin Dive Fishery Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 122,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 271,161,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$1,252,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,244,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan
agency action items DFW-01, DFW-02, DFW-03, DFW-04, and DFW-05.

(2)
$776,000 of the salmon recovery account appropriation and $775,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for the department's
review of forest practices applications and related hydraulic permit
applications. Up to $387,500 of the general fund‑-federal amount may be
expended in each fiscal year of the biennium only if the state receives greater
than $25,000,000 from the federal government for salmon recovery activities in
that fiscal year. Funds authorized for expenditure in fiscal year 2000 may be
expended in fiscal year 2001.

(3)
$1,500,000 of the salmon recovery account appropriation and $1,500,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for the department to
update the salmon and steelhead stock inventory and, in cooperation with the
department of ecology, to establish fish and habitat index monitoring sites to
measure the effectiveness of salmon recovery activities. Up to $750,000 of the
general fund‑-federal amount may be expended in each fiscal year of the
biennium only if the state receives greater than $25,000,000 from the federal
government for salmon recovery activities in that fiscal year. Funds
authorized for expenditure in fiscal year 2000 may be expended in fiscal year
2001.

(4)
$232,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $232,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided for the control of European green crab (Carcinus maenas).
The department shall submit a report to the governor and the appropriate
legislative committees by September 1, 2000, evaluating the effectiveness of
various control strategies and providing recommendations on long-term control
strategies. $248,000 of this amount is for implementation of Puget Sound work
plan and agency action item DFW-23.

(5)
$191,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $191,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
are provided for noxious weed control and survey activities on department
lands. Of this amount, $48,000 is provided for the biological control of
yellowstar thistle.

(6)
All salmon habitat restoration and protection projects proposed for funding by regional
fisheries enhancement groups shall be submitted by January 1st or July 1st of
each year for review to the salmon recovery funding board.

(7)
$2,340,000 of the salmon recovery account appropriation and $7,000,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely to implement a
license buy-back program for commercial fishing licenses.

(8)
$511,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $488,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5255 (Washington
conservation corps). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(9)
Any indirect cost reimbursement received by the department from federal grants
must be spent on agency administrative activities and cannot be redirected to
direct program activities.

(10)
$43,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$42,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for staffing and operation of the Tennant Lake interpretive
center.

(11)
$32,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$33,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely to support the activities of the aquatic nuisance species coordination
committee to foster state, federal, tribal, and private cooperation on aquatic
nuisance species issues. The committee shall strive to prevent the
introduction of nonnative aquatic species and to minimize the spread of species
that are introduced.

(12)
$50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5508 (crab catch record cards).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(13)
$6,440,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$5,796,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
$12,260,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation, $710,000 of the
aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation, and $500,000 of the public
safety and education account appropriation are provided solely for operation of
the enforcement division. Within these funds, the department shall emphasize
enforcement of laws related to protection of fish habitat and the illegal
harvest of salmon and steelhead.

(14)
$500,000 of the salmon recovery account, $624,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2000, and $624,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for the department to
implement a hatchery endangered species act response. The strategy shall
include emergency hatchery responses and retrofitting of hatcheries for salmon
recovery.

(15)
$45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$46,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for operation of the Rod Meseberg (ringold) warmwater fish
hatchery.

(16)
$2,500,000 of the salmon recovery account appropriation is provided solely for
grants to lead entities established in accordance with RCW 75.46.060.

(17)
$200,000 of the salmon recovery account appropriation and $600,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for predation
control, bycatch monitoring, and selective harvest strategies. $300,000 of the
general fund‑-federal amount may be expended in each fiscal year of the
biennium only if the state receives greater than $25,000,000 from the federal
government for salmon recovery activities in that fiscal year. Funds
authorized for expenditure in fiscal year 2000 may be expended in fiscal year
2001.

(18)
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for additional field surveys of the Olympic Peninsula, North
Rainier, and Packwood/South Rainier elk herds.

(19)
$425,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $75,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
are provided solely to purchase and implement the automated recreational
license data base system.

(20)
$1,400,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,400,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for fish passage barrier and screening technical
assistance, engineering services, and construction assistance for local
governments, state agencies, volunteer groups, and regional fisheries
enhancement groups.

(21)
$1,500,000 of the salmon recovery account appropriation and $500,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for local salmon
recovery technical assistance. Technical assistance shall be coordinated among
all state agencies including the conservation commission, department of fish
and wildlife, department of ecology, department of health, department of
agriculture, department of transportation, state parks and recreation,
interagency committee for outdoor recreation, governor's salmon recovery
office, Puget Sound water quality action team, department of community, trade,
and economic development, and department of natural resources. $250,000 of the
general fund‑-federal amount may be expended in each fiscal year of the
biennium, only if the state receives greater than $25,000,000 from the federal
government for salmon recovery activities in that fiscal year. Funds
authorized for expenditure in fiscal year 2000 may be expended in fiscal year
2001.

(22)
$400,000 of the wildlife account appropriation is provided solely to implement
House Bill No. 1681 (trout purchase by state). The fish and wildlife
commission may authorize expenditure of these funds only if the costs of the
program will be recovered by the increase in license sales directly
attributable to the planting of privately grown trout. If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 308. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 25,784,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 25,641,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation.................. $.................................. 12,656,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation........... $ 420,000

Forest
Development Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 46,029,000

Off
Road Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation........ $........................................... 3,668,000

Surveys
and Maps Account‑-State Appropriation........ $........................................... 2,221,000

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 2,656,000

Resources
Management Cost Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 77,016,000

Surface
Mining Reclamation Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 1,435,000

Salmon
Recovery Account‑-State Appropriation........ $ 3,483,000

Aquatic
Land Dredged Material Disposal Site Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 764,000

Natural
Resource Conservation Areas Stewardship

Account
Appropriation........................... $ 1,100,000

Air
Pollution Control Account‑-State Appropriation... $ 864,000

Metals
Mining Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 63,000

Agricultural
College Trust Management Account

Appropriation................................... $ 1,736,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 205,536,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$18,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$18,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $1,058,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency
action items DNR-01, DNR-02, and DNR-04.

(2)
$7,304,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $7,304,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for emergency fire suppression.

(3)
$331,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $339,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for geologic studies to evaluate ground stability in
high growth areas and to provide geologic expertise to small communities.

(4)
$663,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $689,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5255 (Washington
conservation corps). If this bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5)
$3,483,000 of the salmon recovery account appropriation and $10,991,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided for the department to
implement changes in forest practice rules for the protection of salmon.
$5,495,500 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation may be expended in
each fiscal year of the biennium only if the state receives greater than
$25,000,000 from the federal government for salmon recovery activities in that
fiscal year. Funds authorized for expenditure in fiscal year 2000 may be
expended in fiscal year 2001.

(6)
$44,000 of the resource management cost account appropriation is provided
solely for maintenance and safety improvements at the Gull Harbor marine
station. The department shall develop a plan for use or disposal of the marine
station by December 1, 1999.

(7)
$582,000 of the resource management cost account appropriation is provided
solely to expand geoduck resource management activities.

(8)
$172,000 of the resource management cost account appropriation is provided
solely to convert aquatic land maps and records to an electronic format.

(9)
$100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and
$400,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation are provided
solely for spartina control. Within these amounts, the department shall
continue support for a field study of biological control methods.

(10)
$2,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $2,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for fire protection activities.

(11)
$450,000 of the resource management cost account appropriation is provided
solely for the control and eradication of class B designate weeds on state
lands.

(12)
$1,100,000 of the natural resources conservation areas stewardship account is
provided solely to the department for planning, management, and stewardship of
natural area preserves and natural resources conservation areas.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 309. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 7,476,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 7,316,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation.................. $.................................. 4,440,000

General
fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation........... $ 410,000

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 818,000

State
Toxics Control Account‑-State Appropriation.... $................................................ 1,365,000

Local
Toxics Control Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ 241,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 22,066,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$36,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$37,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for technical assistance on pesticide management, including the
implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action item DOA-01.

(2)
$241,000 of the local toxics control account appropriation is provided solely
to implement chapter 36, Laws of 1998 (fertilizer regulation). The amount
provided in this subsection shall be used to conduct a comprehensive study of
plant uptake of metals and to implement new fertilizer registration
requirements.

(3)
$133,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $127,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for technical assistance to local watershed and salmon
recovery planning efforts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 310. FOR
THE WASHINGTON POLLUTION LIABILITY REINSURANCE PROGRAM

Pollution Liability Insurance Program Trust Account‑-

State Appropriation............................. $ 947,000

(End of part)

PART
IV

TRANSPORTATION

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 401. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF LICENSING

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 5,519,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 4,947,000

Architects'
License Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 754,000

Cemetery
Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 203,000

Profession
Engineers' Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,828,000

Real
Estate Commission‑-State Appropriation.... $ 7,114,000

Master
License Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ 7,423,000

Uniform
Commercial Code Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,472,000

Real
Estate Education Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 606,000

Funeral
Directors and Embalmers Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 457,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 33,323,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: $150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2000, $25,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2001, and $100,000 of the professional engineers' account
appropriation are provided solely for Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5821
(on-site wastewater treatment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 402. FOR
THE STATE
PATROL

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 22,129,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 20,858,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 3,999,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 344,000

Death
Investigations Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,816,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 6,867,000

County
Criminal Justice Assistance Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,641,000

Municipal
Criminal Justice Assistance Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 1,831,000

Fire
Service Trust Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 125,000

Fire
Service Training Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 6,730,000

State
Toxics Control Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 442,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 260,000

Fingerprint
Identification Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,392,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 73,434,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$255,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $95,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
are provided solely for replacement of fire training equipment at the fire
service training academy.

(2)
$430,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5108
(missing/exploited children). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3)
$2,816,000 of the death investigation account appropriation is provided solely
for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1560 (forensic lab
services). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

(4)
$2,900,000 of the fire service training account appropriation is provided solely
for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5102 (fire fighter
training). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse. In providing the fire fighter one training
program required by the bill, the state patrol shall, to the extent possible,
utilize existing public and private fire fighting training facilities in
southeastern Washington.

(5)
$354,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for additional law enforcement and security coverage on the west capitol
campus.

(6) $66,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2000 and $58,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for activities of the missing children's
clearinghouse as related to services performed under section 202(1) (a) and (b)
of this act. If those sections are not enacted, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(End of part)

PART
V

EDUCATION

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 501. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR STATE
ADMINISTRATION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 27,800,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 26,535,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation.................. $.................................. 78,121,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 6,602,000

Health
Services Account Appropriation............... $ 5,242,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account

Appropriation................................... $ 3,671,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 147,971,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
AGENCY OPERATIONS

(a)
$404,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $403,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for the operation and expenses of the state board of education,
including basic education assistance activities.

(b)
$348,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
for administration of the traffic safety education program, including
in-service training related to instruction in the risks of driving while under
the influence of alcohol and other drugs.

(c)
$128,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for
increased costs of providing a norm-referenced test to all third grade students
and retests of certain third grade students and other costs in accordance with
chapter 319, Laws of 1998 (student achievement).

(d)
$145,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for an
institutional education program director.

(2)
STATE-WIDE PROGRAMS

(a)
$2,524,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for
in-service training and educational programs conducted by the Pacific Science
Center. Of this amount, $350,000 is provided to add a math van.

(b)
$63,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for
operation of the Cispus environmental learning center.

(c)
$2,754,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for
educational centers, including state support activities. $100,000 of this
amount is provided to help stabilize funding through distribution among
existing education centers that are currently funded by the state at an amount
less than $100,000 a biennium.

(d)
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for an
organization in southwest Washington that received funding from the Spokane
educational center in the 1995-97 biennium and provides educational services to
students who have dropped out of school.

(e)
$3,671,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation
and $2,252,000 of the public safety education account appropriation are
provided solely for matching grants to enhance security in schools. Not more
than seventy-five percent of a district's total expenditures for school
security in any school year may be paid from a grant under this subsection.
The grants shall be expended solely for the costs of employing or contracting
for building security monitors in schools during school hours and school
events. Of the amount provided in this subsection, at least $2,850,000 shall
be spent for grants to districts that, during the 1988-89 school year, employed
or contracted for security monitors in schools during school hours. However,
these grants may be used only for increases in school district expenditures for
school security over expenditure levels for the 1988-89 school year.

(f)
$200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$200,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $400,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation transferred from the
department of health are provided solely for a program that provides grants to
school districts for media campaigns promoting sexual abstinence and addressing
the importance of delaying sexual activity, pregnancy, and childbearing until
individuals are ready to nurture and support their children. Grants to the
school districts shall be for projects that are substantially designed and produced
by students. The grants shall require a local private sector match equal to
one-half of the state grant, which may include in-kind contribution of
technical or other assistance from consultants or firms involved in public
relations, advertising, broadcasting, and graphics or video production or other
related fields.

(g)
$1,500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
are provided solely for school district petitions to juvenile court for truant
students as provided in RCW 28A.225.030 and 28A.225.035. Allocation of this
money to school districts shall be based on the number of petitions filed.

(h)
A maximum of $300,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is
provided for alcohol and drug prevention programs pursuant to RCW 66.08.180.

(i)
$5,702,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely
for shared infrastructure costs, data equipment maintenance, and depreciation
costs for operation of the K-20 telecommunications network.

(j)
$4,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely
for a K-20 telecommunications network technical support system in the K-12
sector to prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school utilization
of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the network.
These funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced technical support
for the network. A maximum of $650,000 may be expended for state-level administration
and staff training on the K-20 network.

(k)
$50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for allocation to the primary coordinators of the state
geographic alliance to improve the teaching of geography in schools.

(l)
$2,000,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
for start-up grants for alternative programs and services that improve
instruction and learning for at-risk students. Grants shall be awarded to
applicants showing the greatest potential for improved student learning for
at-risk students including:

(i)
Students who are disruptive or have been suspended, expelled, or subject to
other disciplinary actions;

(ii)
Students with unexcused absences who need intervention;

(iii)
Students who have left school; and

(iv)
Students involved with the court system.

(m)
$1,600,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for
grants for magnet schools.

(n)
$4,300,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for
complex need grants. Grants shall be provided according to amounts shown in
LEAP Document 30C as developed on April 27, 1997, at 03:00 hours.

(o)
$262,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $235,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5593
(professional educator standards board). If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5593 is
not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(p)
$200,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for
the purposes of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5413 (teacher
assessment/certification). If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5413 is not enacted
by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(q)
$500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for grants to schools and school districts to
establish school safety plans.

(r)
$5,242,000 of the health services account appropriation is provided solely for
a corps of nurses located at educational service districts, as determined by
the superintendent of public instruction, to be dispatched to the most needy
schools to provide direct care to students, health education, and training for
school staff.

(s)
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided as matching
funds for district contributions to provide analysis of the efficiency of
school district business practices.

(t)
$750,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for
computer system programming and upgrades to benefit the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, schools, and school districts.

(u)
$21,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
appropriation and $21,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2001 appropriation are provided solely for the increased costs
resulting from Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1477 (school district
organization). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts in
this subsection shall lapse.

(v)
$1,500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely
for the excellence in mathematics training program as specified in Substitute
House Bill No. 1569 (excellence in mathematics). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 1999, the amount in this subsection shall lapse.

(w)
$2,000,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for teacher institutes during the summer of 2000, programs, and
administration costs, as provided for in Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill
No. 2085 (disruptive students). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999,
the amount in this subsection shall lapse.

(x)
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for
support for vocational student leadership organizations.

(y)
$1,100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for an
equal matching grant to the Northeast vocational area cooperative to establish
high-technology learning centers to provide college-level technology curriculum
for high school students leading to an information technology certificate or
degree. Only the following sources may be used as matching for the state
funds: Private sector contributions; operating levy revenues; capital levy
revenues; technology levy revenues; or other local funds not from federal or
state sources.

(z)
$75,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for speech
pathology grants to charitable organizations as qualified under the internal
revenue code and incorporated under the laws of the state of Washington. These
grants shall be used for the purpose of providing childhood speech pathology by
nationally certified speech pathologists to children who have demonstrated a
lack of verbal communication skills and who would benefit from such a program.
Speech pathology services shall be provided at no cost to the child receiving
the benefits or to the parents or guardians of the child.

(aa)
$500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for
competitive grants to school districts to obtain curriculum or programs that
allow high school students to have access to internet-based curriculum that
leads directly to higher education credits or provides preparation for tests
that lead to higher education credit in subjects including but not limited to
mathematics, languages, and science.

(bb)
$1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 is provided solely for grants to school districts for programs to prepare
high school students to achieve information technology industry skills
certifications. The funds may be expended to provide or improve internet
access; purchase and install networking or computer equipment; train faculty;
or acquire curriculum materials. A match of cash or in-kind contributions from
nonstate sources equal to at least half of the cash amount of the grant is required.
To assure continuity of the curriculum with higher education institutions, the
grant program will be designed and implemented by an interagency team comprised
of representatives from the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
the state board for community and technical colleges, the higher education
coordinating board, and the office of financial management. School districts
may apply for grants in cooperation with other school districts or community or
technical colleges and must demonstrate in the grant application a cooperative
relationship with a community or technical college in information technology
programs. Preference for grants shall be made to districts with sound
technology plans, which offer student access to computers outside of school
hours, which demonstrate involvement of the private sector in information
technology programs, and which serve the needs of low-income communities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 502. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR GENERAL
APPORTIONMENT (BASIC EDUCATION)

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 3,545,737,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 3,551,100,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 7,096,837,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are
necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior
fiscal year adjustments.

(2)
Allocations for certificated staff salaries for the 1999-00 and 2000-01 school
years shall be determined using formula‑generated staff units calculated
pursuant to this subsection. Staff allocations for small school enrollments in
(d) through (f) of this subsection shall be reduced for vocational full-time
equivalent enrollments. Staff allocations for small school enrollments in
grades K-6 shall be the greater of that generated under (a) of this subsection,
or under (d) and (e) of this subsection. Certificated staffing allocations
shall be as follows:

(a)
On the basis of each 1,000 average annual full-time equivalent enrollments,
excluding full-time equivalent enrollment otherwise recognized for certificated
staff unit allocations under (c) through (f) of this subsection:

(i)
Four certificated administrative staff units per thousand full-time equivalent
students in grades K-12;

(ii)
49 certificated instructional staff units per thousand full-time equivalent
students in grades K-3;

(iii)
An additional 4.2 certificated instructional staff units for grades K-3 and an
additional 7.2 certificated instructional staff units for grade 4. Any funds
allocated for these additional certificated units shall not be considered as
basic education funding;

(A)
Funds provided under this subsection (2)(a)(iii) in excess of the amount
required to maintain the statutory minimum ratio established under RCW
28A.150.260(2)(b) shall be allocated only if the district documents an actual
ratio equal to or greater than 53.2 certificated instructional staff per
thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-4. For any school district
documenting a lower certificated instructional staff ratio, the allocation
shall be based on the district's actual grades K-4 certificated instructional
staff ratio achieved in that school year, or the statutory minimum ratio
established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b), if greater;

(B)
Districts at or above 51.0 certificated instructional staff per one thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades K-4 may dedicate up to 1.3 of the 53.2
funding ratio to employ additional classified instructional assistants assigned
to basic education classrooms in grades K-4. For purposes of documenting a
district's staff ratio under this section, funds used by the district to employ
additional classified instructional assistants shall be converted to a
certificated staff equivalent and added to the district's actual certificated
instructional staff ratio. Additional classified instructional assistants, for
the purposes of this subsection, shall be determined using the 1989-90 school
year as the base year;

(C)
Any district maintaining a ratio equal to or greater than 53.2 certificated
instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-4
may use allocations generated under this subsection (2)(a)(iii) in excess of
that required to maintain the minimum ratio established under RCW
28A.150.260(2)(b) to employ additional basic education certificated
instructional staff or classified instructional assistants in grades 5-6.
Funds allocated under this subsection (2)(a)(iii) shall only be expended to
reduce class size in grades K-6. No more than 1.3 of the certificated
instructional funding ratio amount may be expended for provision of classified
instructional assistants; and

(iv)
Forty‑six certificated instructional staff units per thousand full-time
equivalent students in grades 4-12;

(b)
For school districts with a minimum enrollment of 250 full-time equivalent
students whose full-time equivalent student enrollment count in a given month
exceeds the first of the month full-time equivalent enrollment count by 5
percent, an additional state allocation of 110 percent of the share that such
increased enrollment would have generated had such additional full-time
equivalent students been included in the normal enrollment count for that
particular month;

(c)(i)
On the basis of full-time equivalent enrollment in:

(A)
Vocational education programs approved by the superintendent of public
instruction, a maximum of 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08
certificated administrative staff units for each 19.5 full-time equivalent
vocational students for the 1999-00 school year and the 2000-01 school year.
Districts documenting staffing ratios of less than 1 certificated staff per
19.5 students shall be allocated the greater of the total ratio in subsections
(2)(a)(i) and (iv) of this section or the actual documented ratio; and

(B)
Skills center programs meeting the standards for skill center funding
recommended by the superintendent of public instruction, January 1999, 0.92
certificated instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative
units for each 16.67 full-time equivalent vocational students;

(ii)
Indirect cost charges, as defined by the superintendent of public instruction,
to vocational-secondary programs shall not exceed 10 percent; and

(iii)
Vocational full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported on the same
monthly basis as the enrollment for students eligible for basic support, and
payments shall be adjusted for reported vocational enrollments on the same
monthly basis as those adjustments for enrollment for students eligible for
basic support.

(d)
For districts enrolling not more than twenty‑five average annual
full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within
any school district which have been judged to be remote and necessary by the
state board of education and enroll not more than twenty‑five average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8:

(i)
For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76 certificated
instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units for
enrollment of not more than five students, plus one‑twentieth of a
certificated instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled; and

(ii)
For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.32 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of
not more than five students, plus one‑tenth of a certificated
instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled;

(e)
For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than twenty‑five
but not more than one hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in
grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district which
enroll more than twenty‑five average annual full-time equivalent students
in grades K-8 and have been judged to be remote and necessary by the state
board of education:

(i)
For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time equivalent students in
grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated
administrative staff units; and

(ii)
For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time equivalent students in
grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08
certificated administrative staff units;

(f)
For districts operating no more than two high schools with enrollments of less
than three hundred average annual full-time equivalent students, for enrollment
in grades 9-12 in each such school, other than alternative schools:

(i)
For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any grades 9-12 but no
more than twenty‑five average annual full-time equivalent students in
grades K-12, four and one‑half certificated instructional staff units and
one‑quarter of a certificated administrative staff unit;

(ii)
For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine certificated
instructional staff units and one‑half of a certificated administrative
staff unit for the first sixty average annual full time equivalent students,
and additional staff units based on a ratio of 0.8732 certificated
instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated administrative staff units
per each additional forty‑three and one‑half average annual full
time equivalent students.

Units
calculated under (f)(ii) of this subsection shall be reduced by certificated
staff units at the rate of forty‑six certificated instructional staff
units and four certificated administrative staff units per thousand vocational
full-time equivalent students.

(g)
For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than seventy
annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty
students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades 1-8 program, an additional
one-half of a certificated instructional staff unit; and

(h)
For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than fifty annual
average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty
students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades 1-6 program, an additional
one‑half of a certificated instructional staff unit.

(3)
Allocations for classified salaries for the 1999-00 and 2000-01 school years
shall be calculated using formula‑generated classified staff units
determined as follows:

(a)
For enrollments generating certificated staff unit allocations under subsection
(2)(d) through (h) of this section, one classified staff unit for each three
certificated staff units allocated under such subsections;

(b)
For all other enrollment in grades K-12, including vocational full-time
equivalent enrollments, one classified staff unit for each sixty average annual
full-time equivalent students; and

(c)
For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more than fifty annual
average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty
students, an additional one‑half of a classified staff unit.

(4)
Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of 16.97 percent in
the 1999‑00 and 2000-01 school years for certificated salary allocations
provided under subsection (2) of this section, and a rate of 15.75 percent in
the 1999‑00 and 2000-01 school years for classified salary allocations
provided under subsection (3) of this section.

(5)
Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the maintenance rate
specified in section 504(2) of this act, based on the number of benefit units
determined as follows:

(a)
The number of certificated staff units determined in subsection (2) of this
section; and

(b)
The number of classified staff units determined in subsection (3) of this section
multiplied by 1.152. This factor is intended to adjust allocations so that,
for the purposes of distributing insurance benefits, full-time equivalent
classified employees may be calculated on the basis of 1440 hours of work per
year, with no individual employee counted as more than one full-time
equivalent.

(6)(a)
For nonemployee-related costs associated with each certificated staff unit
allocated under subsection (2)(a), (b), and (d) through (h) of this section,
there shall be provided a maximum of $8,117 per certificated staff unit in the
1999‑00 school year and a maximum of $8,271 per certificated staff unit
in the 2000-01 school year.

(b)
For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational certificated
staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(A) of this section, there shall
be provided a maximum of $19,933 per certificated staff unit in the 1999‑00
school year and a maximum of $20,312 per certificated staff unit in the 2000-01
school year.

(c)
For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational certificated
staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(B) of this section, there shall
be provided a maximum of $15,467 per certificated staff unit in the 1999-00
school year and a maximum of $15,761 per certificated staff unit in the 2000-01
school year.

(7)
Allocations for substitute costs for classroom teachers shall be distributed at
a maintenance rate of $365.28 per allocated classroom teachers exclusive of
salary increase amounts provided in section 504 of this act. Solely for the
purposes of this subsection, allocated classroom teachers shall be equal to the
number of certificated instructional staff units allocated under subsection (2)
of this section, multiplied by the ratio between the number of actual basic education
certificated teachers and the number of actual basic education certificated
instructional staff reported state‑wide for the 1998-99 school year.

(8)
Any school district board of directors may petition the superintendent of
public instruction by submission of a resolution adopted in a public meeting to
reduce or delay any portion of its basic education allocation for any school
year. The superintendent of public instruction shall approve such reduction or
delay if it does not impair the district's financial condition. Any delay
shall not be for more than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have
no impact on levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort
assistance pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.

(9)
The superintendent may distribute a maximum of $6,444,000 outside the basic
education formula during fiscal years 2000 and 2001 as follows:

(a)
For fire protection for school districts located in a fire protection district
as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter 52.04 RCW, a maximum of
$457,000 may be expended in fiscal year 2000 and a maximum of $466,000 may be
expended in fiscal year 2001;

(b)
For summer vocational programs at skills centers, a maximum of $2,098,000 may
be expended each fiscal year;

(c)
A maximum of $325,000 may be expended for school district emergencies; and

(d)
A maximum of $500,000 per fiscal year may be expended for programs providing
skills training for secondary students who are enrolled in extended day
school-to-work programs, as approved by the superintendent of public
instruction. The funds shall be allocated at a rate not to exceed $500 per
full-time equivalent student enrolled in those programs.

(10)
For the purposes of RCW 84.52.0531, the increase per full-time equivalent
student in state basic education appropriations provided under this act,
including appropriations for salary and benefits increases, is 7.0 percent from
the 1998‑99 school year to the 1999‑00 school year, and 3.4 percent
from the 1999‑00 school year to the 2000‑01 school year.

(11)
If two or more school districts consolidate and each district was receiving
additional basic education formula staff units pursuant to subsection (2)(b)
through (h) of this section, the following shall apply:

(a)
For three school years following consolidation, the number of basic education
formula staff units shall not be less than the number of basic education
formula staff units received by the districts in the school year prior to the
consolidation; and

(b)
For the fourth through eighth school years following consolidation, the
difference between the basic education formula staff units received by the
districts for the school year prior to consolidation and the basic education
formula staff units after consolidation pursuant to subsection (2)(a) through
(h) of this section shall be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 503. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-BASIC
EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION

(1)
The following calculations determine the salaries used in the general fund
allocations for certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and
classified staff units under section 502 of this act:

(a)
Salary allocations for certificated instructional staff units shall be
determined for each district by multiplying the district's certificated
instructional total base salary shown on LEAP Document 12E for the appropriate
year, by the district's average staff mix factor for basic education and
special education certificated instructional staff in that school year,
computed using LEAP Document 1S; and

(b)
Salary allocations for certificated administrative staff units and classified
staff units for each district shall be based on the district's certificated
administrative and classified salary allocation amounts shown on LEAP Document
12E for the appropriate year.

(2)
For the purposes of this section:

(a)
"Basic education certificated instructional staff" is defined as
provided in RCW 28A.150.100 and "special education certificated
staff" means staff assigned to the state-supported special education
program pursuant to chapter 28A.155 RCW in positions requiring a certificate;

(b)
"LEAP Document 1S" means the computerized tabulation establishing
staff mix factors for certificated instructional staff according to education
and years of experience, as developed by the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee on March 25, 1999, at 16:55 hours; and

(c)
"LEAP Document 12E" means the computerized tabulation of 1999-00 and
2000-01 school year salary allocations for certificated administrative staff
and classified staff and derived and total base salaries for certificated
instructional staff as developed by the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee on March 25, 1999, at 18:53 hours.

(3)
Incremental fringe benefit factors shall be applied to salary adjustments at a
rate of 16.33 percent for certificated staff and 12.25 percent for classified
staff for both years of the biennium.

(4)(a)
Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.410, the following state‑wide salary allocation
schedules for certificated instructional staff are established for basic
education salary allocations:

1999-00
K-12 Salary Schedule for Certificated Instructional Staff

Years
of

Service
BA BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90

0 25,716 26,410 27,130 27,850 30,165

1 26,062 26,765 27,494 28,248 30,586

2 26,649 27,367 28,111 28,930 31,284

3 27,527 28,267 29,033 29,895 32,291

4 28,146 28,927 29,705 30,605 33,040

5 28,790 29,581 30,375 31,334 33,785

6 29,161 29,935 30,756 31,765 34,203

7 30,113 30,906 31,747 32,820 35,319

8 31,079 31,915 32,776 33,938 36,471

9 32,960 33,863 35,067 37,659

10 34,964 36,255 38,881

11 37,477 40,161

12 38,660 41,474

13 42,820

14 44,173

15 45,322

16 or
more 46,228

Years
of MA+90

Service
BA+135 MA MA+45 or PHD

0 31,656 30,831 33,146 34,637

1 32,068 31,174 33,511 34,994

2 32,797 31,827 34,181 35,694

3 33,871 32,794 35,189 36,769

4 34,647 33,476 35,910 37,518

5 35,440 34,176 36,627 38,282

6 35,866 34,551 36,989 38,653

7 37,047 35,607 38,105 39,833

8 38,261 36,724 39,257 41,048

9 39,511 37,853 40,446 42,297

10 40,795 39,042 41,668 43,581

11 42,112 40,264 42,948 44,899

12 43,485 41,534 44,261 46,271

13 44,890 42,848 45,607 47,677

14 46,349 44,202 47,047 49,136

15 47,554 45,351 48,270 50,413

16 or
more 48,505 46,258 49,236 51,421

2000-01
K-12 Salary Schedule for Certificated Instructional Staff

Years
of

Service BA BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90

0 26,487 27,203 27,943 28,686 31,070

1 26,843 27,568 28,319 29,095 31,503

2 27,448 28,189 28,954 29,798 32,223

3 28,352 29,115 29,904 30,792 33,260

4 28,991 29,794 30,596 31,524 34,031

5 29,653 30,469 31,286 32,274 34,798

6 30,036 30,833 31,679 32,718 35,229

7 31,017 31,833 32,699 33,805 36,378

8 32,011 32,873 33,759 34,956 37,565

9 33,949 34,879 36,119 38,789

10 36,013 37,343 40,048

11 38,601 41,366

12 39,820 42,718

13 44,105

14 45,498

15 46,681

16 or
more 47,615

Years
of MA+90

Service
BA+135 MA MA+45 or PHD

0 32,605 31,756 34,140 35,676

1 33,030 32,109 34,517 36,044

2 33,781 32,782 35,207 36,765

3 34,887 33,778 36,245 37,872

4 35,687 34,480 36,988 38,643

5 36,503 35,202 37,726 39,431

6 36,942 35,588 38,099 39,813

7 38,158 36,675 39,249 41,028

8 39,409 37,826 40,435 42,279

9 40,696 38,989 41,659 43,566

10 42,018 40,213 42,918 44,889

11 43,375 41,471 44,236 46,246

12 44,789 42,780 45,589 47,659

13 46,237 44,134 46,975 49,107

14 47,739 45,528 48,459 50,610

15 48,981 46,711 49,719 51,926

16 or
more 49,960 47,645 50,713 52,964

(b)
As used in this subsection, the column headings "BA+(N)" refer to the
number of credits earned since receiving the baccalaureate degree.

(c)
For credits earned after the baccalaureate degree but before the masters
degree, any credits in excess of forty‑five credits may be counted after
the masters degree. Thus, as used in this subsection, the column headings
"MA+(N)" refer to the total of:

(i)
Credits earned since receiving the masters degree; and

(ii)
Any credits in excess of forty‑five credits that were earned after the
baccalaureate degree but before the masters degree.

(5)
For the purposes of this section:

(a)
"BA" means a baccalaureate degree.

(b)
"MA" means a masters degree.

(c)
"PHD" means a doctorate degree.

(d)
"Years of service" shall be calculated under the same rules adopted
by the superintendent of public instruction.

(e)
"Credits" means college quarter hour credits and equivalent
in-service credits computed in accordance with RCW 28A.415.020 and 28A.415.023.

(6)
No more than ninety college quarter-hour credits received by any employee after
the baccalaureate degree may be used to determine compensation allocations
under the state salary allocation schedule and LEAP documents referenced in
this act, or any replacement schedules and documents, unless:

(a)
The employee has a masters degree; or

(b)
The credits were used in generating state salary allocations before January 1,
1992.

(7)
The certificated instructional staff base salary specified for each district in
LEAP Document 12E and the salary schedules in subsection (4)(a) of this section
include a 1.67 percent increase for three learning improvement days added in
the 1999-00 school year and maintained in the 2000-01 school year. A school
district is eligible for the learning improvement day funds for school years
1999-00 and 2000-01, only if three days have been added to the base contract in
effect for the 1998-99 school year. If fewer than three days are added, the
additional learning improvement allocation shall be adjusted accordingly. The
additional days shall be for activities related to improving student learning
consistent with education reform implementation. The length of a learning
improvement day shall not be less than the length of a full day under the base
contract. The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that school
districts adhere to the intent and purposes of this subsection.

(8)
The salary allocation schedules established in this section are for allocation
purposes only except as provided in RCW 28A.400.200(2).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 504. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR SCHOOL
EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 187,659,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 348,636,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 536,295,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$412,995,000 is provided for a cost of living adjustment of 3.0 percent
effective September 1, 1999, and another 3.0 percent effective September 1,
2000, for state formula staff units. The appropriations include associated
incremental fringe benefit allocations at rates of 16.33 percent for
certificated staff and 12.25 percent for classified staff. The appropriation
also includes 1.67 percent effective September 1, 1999, for three learning
improvement days pursuant to section 503(7) of this act and the salary
allocation schedule adjustments for beginning and senior certificated
instructional staff.

(a)
The appropriations in this section include the increased portion of salaries
and incremental fringe benefits for all relevant state-funded school programs
in part V of this act. Salary adjustments for state employees in the office of
superintendent of public instruction and the education reform program are
provided in part VII of this act. Increases for general apportionment (basic
education) are based on the salary allocation schedules and methodology in
section 502 of this act. Increases for special education result from increases
in each district's basic education allocation per student. Increases for
educational service districts and institutional education programs are
determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the methodology
for general apportionment salaries and benefits in section 502 of this act.

(b)
The appropriations in this section provide cost-of-living, learning improvement
days for certificated instructional staff, and incremental fringe benefit
allocations based on formula adjustments as follows:

(i)
For pupil transportation, an increase of $0.60 per weighted pupil‑mile
for the 1999‑00 school year and $1.23 per weighted pupil-mile for the
2000-01 school year;

(ii)
For education of highly capable students, an increase of $14.04 per formula
student for the 1999‑00 school year and $21.28 per formula student for
the 2000-01 school year; and

(iii)
For transitional bilingual education, an increase of $36.18 per eligible
bilingual student for the 1999‑00 school year and $54.99 per eligible
student for the 2000-01 school year; and

(iv)
For learning assistance, an increase of $13.98 per entitlement unit for the
1999‑00 school year and $23.16 per entitlement unit for the 2000-01
school year.

(c)
The appropriations in this section include $420,000 for fiscal year 2000 and
$962,000 for fiscal year 2001 for salary increase adjustments for substitute
teachers.

(2)
$123,300,000 is provided for adjustments to insurance benefit allocations. The
maintenance rate for insurance benefit allocations is $335.75 per month for the
1999-00 and 2000-01 school years. The appropriations in this section provide
for a rate increase to $388.02 per month for the 1999-00 school year and
$423.57 per month for the 2000-01 school year at the following rates:

(a)
For pupil transportation, an increase of $0.48 per weighted pupil‑mile
for the 1999‑00 school year and $0.80 for the 2000-01 school year;

(b)
For education of highly capable students, an increase of $3.30 per formula
student for the 1999‑00 school year and $5.58 for the 2000-01 school
year;

(c)
For transitional bilingual education, an increase of $8.45 per eligible
bilingual student for the 1999‑00 school year and $14.22 for the 2000-01
school year; and

(d)
For learning assistance, an increase of $6.65 per funded unit for the 1999‑00
school year and $11.17 for the 2000-01 school year.

(3)
The rates specified in this section are subject to revision each year by the
legislature.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 505. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR PUPIL
TRANSPORTATION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 179,802,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 180,925,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 360,727,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are
necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior
fiscal year adjustments.

(2)
A maximum of $1,475,000 may be expended for regional transportation
coordinators and related activities. The transportation coordinators shall
ensure that data submitted by school districts for state transportation funding
shall, to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation activity
of each district.

(3)
$10,000 of the fiscal year 2000 appropriation and $10,000 of the fiscal year
2001 appropriation are provided solely for the transportation of students
enrolled in "choice" programs. Transportation shall be limited to
low-income students who are transferring to "choice" programs solely
for educational reasons.

(4)
Allocations for transportation of students shall be based on reimbursement
rates of $34.99 per weighted mile in the 1999-00 school year and $35.20 per
weighted mile in the 2000-01 school year exclusive of salary and benefit
adjustments provided in section 504 of this act. Allocations for transportation
of students transported more than one radius mile shall be based on weighted
miles as determined by superintendent of public instruction multiplied by the
per mile reimbursement rates for the school year pursuant to the formulas
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction. Allocations for
transportation of students living within one radius mile shall be based on the
number of enrolled students in grades kindergarten through five living within
one radius mile of their assigned school multiplied by the per mile
reimbursement rate for the school year multiplied by 1.29.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 506. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR SCHOOL
FOOD SERVICE PROGRAMS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 3,100,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 3,100,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation.................. $.................................. 194,483,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 200,683,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$6,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriations are provided for
state matching money for federal child nutrition programs.

(2)
$175,000 of the general fund--state appropriations are provided for summer food
programs for children in low-income areas.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 507. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR SPECIAL
EDUCATION PROGRAMS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 392,036,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 393,461,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation.................. $.................................. 148,159,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 933,656,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Each general fund‑-state fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as
are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for
prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2)
The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute state funds to school
districts based on two categories: The optional birth through age two program
for special education eligible developmentally delayed infants and toddlers,
and the mandatory special education program for special education eligible
students ages three to twenty-one. A "special education eligible
student" means a student receiving specially designed instruction in
accordance with a properly formulated individualized education program.

(3)
For the 1999-00 and 2000-01 school years, the superintendent shall distribute
state funds to each district based on the sum of:

(a)
A district's annual average headcount enrollment of developmentally delayed
infants and toddlers ages birth through two, multiplied by the district's
average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student, multiplied
by 1.15; and

(b)
A district's annual average full-time equivalent basic education enrollment
multiplied by the funded enrollment percent determined pursuant to subsection
(4)(c) of this section, multiplied by the district's average basic education
allocation per full-time equivalent student multiplied by 0.9309.

(4)
The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section.

(a)
"Average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student"
for a district shall be based on the staffing ratios required by RCW
28A.150.260 and shall not include enhancements, secondary vocational education,
or small schools.

(b)
"Annual average full-time equivalent basic education enrollment"
means the resident enrollment including students enrolled through choice (RCW
28A.225.225) and students from nonhigh districts (RCW 28A.225.210) and
excluding students residing in another district enrolled as part of an
interdistrict cooperative program (RCW 28A.225.250).

(c)
"Enrollment percent" means the district's resident special education
annual average enrollment including those students counted under the special
education demonstration projects, excluding the birth through age two
enrollment, as a percent of the district's annual average full-time equivalent
basic education enrollment. For the 1999-00 and the 2000-01 school years, each
district's funded enrollment percent shall be the lesser of the district's
actual enrollment percent for the school year for which the allocation is being
determined or 12.7 percent.

(5)
At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15 districts in
which all excess cost services for special education students of the districts
are provided by the cooperative, the maximum enrollment percent shall be 12.7,
and shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district
units. For purposes of this subsection, the average basic education allocation
per full-time equivalent student shall be calculated in the aggregate rather
than individual district units.

(6)
A maximum of $12,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2000 and a maximum of $12,000,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided as safety net funding for
districts with demonstrated needs for state special education funding beyond
the amounts provided in subsection (3) of this section. Safety net funding
shall be awarded by the state safety net oversight committee.

(a)
The safety net oversight committee shall first consider the needs of districts
adversely affected by the 1995 change in the special education funding
formula. Awards shall be based on the amount required to maintain the 1994-95
state special education excess cost allocation to the school district in
aggregate or on a dollar per funded student basis.

(b)
The committee shall then consider unusual needs of districts due to a special
education population which differs significantly from the assumptions of the
state funding formula. Awards shall be made to districts that convincingly
demonstrate need due to the concentration and/or severity of disabilities in
the district. Differences in program costs attributable to district philosophy
or service delivery style are not a basis for safety net awards.

(c)
The maximum allowable indirect cost for calculating safety net eligibility may
not exceed the federal restricted indirect cost rate for the district plus one
percent.

(d)
Safety net awards shall be adjusted based on the percent of potential medicaid
eligible students billed as calculated by the superintendent in accordance with
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5626 (medicaid payments to schools).

(e)
Safety net awards must be adjusted for any audit findings or exceptions related
to special education funding.

(7)
The superintendent of public instruction may adopt such rules and procedures as
are necessary to administer the special education funding and safety net award
process. Prior to revising any standards, procedures, or rules, the
superintendent shall consult with the office of financial management and the
fiscal committees of the legislature.

(8)
The safety net oversight committee appointed by the superintendent of public
instruction shall consist of:

(a)
Staff of the office of superintendent of public instruction;

(b)
Staff of the office of the state auditor;

(c)
Staff of the office of the financial management; and

(d)
One or more representatives from school districts or educational service
districts knowledgeable of special education programs and funding.

(9)
A maximum of $5,500,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation shall
be expended for safety net funding to meet the extraordinary needs of one or
more individual special education students.

(10)
A maximum of $678,000 may be expended from the general fund‑-state
appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1 full-time
equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and medical center. This
amount is in lieu of money provided through the home and hospital allocation
and the special education program.

(11)
A maximum of $1,000,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is
provided for projects to provide special education students with appropriate
job and independent living skills, including work experience where possible, to
facilitate their successful transition out of the public school system. The
funds provided by this subsection shall be from federal discretionary grants.

(12)
A school district may carry over from one year to the next year up to 10
percent of general fund‑-state funds allocated under this program;
however, carry over funds shall be expended in the special education program.

(13)
The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal flow-through to
school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other purposes, school
districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for
purchasing regional special education services from educational service
districts, and for staff development activities particularly relating to
inclusion issues.

(14)
A maximum of $1,200,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation may be
expended by the superintendent for projects related to use of inclusion
strategies by school districts for provision of special education services.
The superintendent shall prepare an information database on laws, best
practices, examples of programs, and recommended resources. The information
may be disseminated in a variety of ways, including workshops and other staff
development activities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 508. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR TRAFFIC
SAFETY EDUCATION PROGRAMS

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 16,276,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation includes such funds as are necessary to complete the school
year ending in each fiscal year and for prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2)
A maximum of $507,000 may be expended for regional traffic safety education
coordinators.

(3)
The maximum basic state allocation per student completing the program shall be
$137.16 in the 1999-00 and 2000-01 school years.

(4)
Additional allocations to provide tuition assistance for students from
low-income families who complete the program shall be a maximum of $66.81 per
eligible student in the 1999-00 and 2000-01 school years.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 509. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR EDUCATIONAL
SERVICE DISTRICTS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 4,547,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 4,547,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 9,094,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The educational service districts shall continue to furnish financial services
required by the superintendent of public instruction and RCW 28A.310.190 (3)
and (4).

(2)
$250,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $250,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for
student teaching centers as provided in RCW 28A.415.100.

(3)
A maximum of $500,000 is provided for centers for the improvement of teaching
pursuant to RCW 28A.415.010.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 510. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR LOCAL
EFFORT ASSISTANCE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 98,315,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 107,973,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 206,288,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 511. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR THE ELEMENTARY
AND SECONDARY SCHOOL IMPROVEMENT ACT

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 264,388,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 512. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR INSTITUTIONAL
EDUCATION PROGRAMS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 20,201,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 21,542,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation.................. $.................................. 8,548,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 50,291,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Each general fund‑-state fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as
are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for
prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2)
State funding provided under this section is based on salaries and other
expenditures for a 220‑day school year. The superintendent of public
instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans for institutional
education programs to ensure that districts plan for a full-time summer
program.

(3)
State funding for each institutional education program shall be based on the
institution's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment. Staffing
ratios for each category of institution shall remain the same as those funded
in the 1995-97 biennium.

(4)
The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles age 18 or less
in department of corrections facilities shall be the same as those provided in
the 1997-99 biennium.

(5)
$92,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$143,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
are provided solely to maintain at least one certificated instructional staff
and related support services at an institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is
not sufficient to support one full-time equivalent certificated instructional
staff to furnish the educational program. The following types of institutions
are included: Residential programs under the department of social and health
services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for juveniles under
the department of corrections, and programs for juveniles under the juvenile
rehabilitation administration.

(6)
Ten percent of the funds allocated for each institution may be carried over
from one year to the next.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 513. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR PROGRAMS
FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 6,226,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 6,220,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 12,446,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are
necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior
fiscal year adjustments.

(2)
Allocations for school district programs for highly capable students shall be
distributed at a maximum rate of $313.27 per funded student for the 1999-00
school year and $313.39 per funded student for the 2000-01 school year,
exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments pursuant to section 504 of this
act. The number of funded students shall be a maximum of two percent of each
district's full-time equivalent basic education enrollment.

(3)
$350,000 of the appropriation is for the centrum program at Fort Worden state
park.

(4)
$186,000 of the appropriation is for the odyssey of the mind and future
problem-solving programs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 514. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-EDUCATION
REFORM PROGRAMS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 35,144,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 34,355,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 69,499,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$143,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $197,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the commission established under PART I of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5418 or Second Substitute House Bill No. 1462. If
neither bill is enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this
subsection shall be used for implementation of education reform and an
accountability system by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(2)
$11,343,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $10,414,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided for development and implementation of the Washington
assessments of student learning. Up to $689,000 of the appropriation may be
expended for data analysis and data management of test results.

(3)
$2,190,000 is provided solely for training of paraprofessional classroom
assistants and certificated staff who work with classroom assistants as
provided in RCW 28A.415.310.

(4)
$6,818,000 is provided for mentor teacher assistance, including state support
activities, under RCW 28A.415.250 and 28A.415.260. Funds for the teacher
assistance program shall be allocated to school districts based on the number
of beginning teachers.

(5)
$4,050,000 is provided for improving technology infrastructure, monitoring and
reporting on school district technology development, promoting standards for
school district technology, promoting statewide coordination and planning for
technology development, and providing regional educational technology support
centers, including state support activities, under chapter 28A.650 RCW.

(6)
$7,200,000 is provided for grants to school districts to provide a continuum of
care for children and families to help children become ready to learn. Grant
proposals from school districts shall contain local plans designed
collaboratively with community service providers. If a continuum of care
program exists in the area in which the school district is located, the local
plan shall provide for coordination with existing programs to the greatest
extent possible. Grant funds shall be allocated pursuant to RCW 70.190.040.

(7)
$5,000,000 is provided solely for the meals for kids program under RCW
28A.235.145 through 28A.235.155.

(8)
$1,260,000 is provided for technical assistance related to education reform
through the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation
with the commission on student learning or its successor, as specified in RCW
28A.300.130 (center for the improvement of student learning).

(9)
$1,598,000 is provided solely for the leadership internship program for
superintendents, principals, and program administrators.

(10)
$1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to establish a mathematics helping corps subject to
the following conditions and limitations:

(a)
In order to increase the availability and quality of technical mathematics
assistance state-wide, the superintendent of public instruction, shall employ
regional school improvement coordinators and mathematics school improvement
specialists to provide assistance to schools and districts. The regional
coordinators and specialists shall be hired by and work under the direction of
a state-wide school improvement coordinator. The mathematics improvement
specialists shall serve on a rotating basis from one to three years and shall
not be permanent employees of the superintendent of public instruction.

(b)
The school improvement coordinators and specialists shall provide the
following:

(i)
Assistance to schools to disaggregate student performance data and develop
improvement plans based on those data;

(ii)
Consultation with schools and districts concerning their performance on the
Washington assessment of student learning and other assessments emphasizing the
performance on the mathematics assessments;

(iii)
Consultation concerning curricula that aligns with the essential academic
learning requirements emphasizing the academic learning requirements for
mathematics, the Washington assessment of student learning, and meets the needs
of diverse learners;

(iv)
Assistance in the identification and implementation of research-based
instructional practices in mathematics;

(v)
Staff training that emphasizes effective instructional strategies and
classroom-based assessment for mathematics;

(vi)
Assistance in developing and implementing family and community involvement
programs emphasizing mathematics; and

(vii)
Other assistance to schools and school districts intended to improve student
mathematics learning.

(11)
A maximum of $1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is
provided to expand the number of summer accountability institutes offered by
the superintendent of public instruction and the commission on student learning
or its successor. The institutes shall provide school district staff with
training in the analysis of student assessment data, information regarding
successful district and school teaching models, research on curriculum and
instruction, and planning tools for districts to improve instruction in
reading, mathematics, language arts, and guidance and counseling but placing an
emphasis on mathematics.

(12)
$8,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $8,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the Washington reading corps subject to the
following conditions and limitations:

(a)
Grants shall be allocated to schools and school districts to implement proven,
research-based mentoring and tutoring programs in reading for low-performing
students in grades K-6. If the grant is made to a school district, the
principals of schools enrolling targeted students shall be consulted concerning
design and implementation of the program.

(b)
The programs may be implemented before, after, or during the regular school
day, or on Saturdays, summer, intercessions, or other vacation periods.

(c)
Two or more schools may combine their Washington reading corps programs.

(d)
A program is eligible for a grant if it meets one of the following conditions:

(i)
The program is recommended either by the education commission of the states or
the Northwest regional educational laboratory; or

(ii)
The program is developed by schools or school districts and is approved by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction based on the following
criteria:

(A)
The program employs methods of teaching and student learning based on reliable
reading/literacy research and effective practices;

(B)
The program design is comprehensive and includes instruction, on-going student
assessment, professional development, parental/community involvement, and
program management aligned with the school's reading curriculum;

(C)
It provides quality professional development and training for teachers, staff,
and volunteer mentors and tutors;

(D)
It has measurable goals for student reading aligned with the essential academic
learning requirements; and

(E)
It contains an evaluation component to determine the effectiveness of the
program.

(e)
Funding priority shall be given to low-performing schools.

(f)
Beginning, interim, and end-of-program testing data shall be available to
determine the effectiveness of funded programs and practices. Common
evaluative criteria across programs, such as grade-level improvements shall be
available for each reading corps program. The superintendent of public
instruction shall provide program evaluations to the governor and the
appropriate committees of the legislature. Administrative and evaluation costs
may be assessed from the annual appropriation for the program.

(g)
Grants provided under this section may be used by schools and school districts
for expenditures from July 1, 1999, through August 31, 2001.

(13)
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $227,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for a 15 percent salary bonus for teachers who have
attained certification by the national board for professional teaching
standards. The bonus is provided in recognition of their outstanding
performance. The bonuses shall be provided subject to the following conditions
and limitations:

(a)
For teachers achieving certification prior to September 1, 1999, the bonus
shall begin on September 1, 1999.

(b)
Teachers enrolled in the program prior to September 1, 1999, achieving
certification during the 1999-2000 school year shall be eligible for the bonus
for the number of months during the school year that the individual has
achieved certification.

(c)
The superintendent shall establish a competitive selection process for teachers
desiring to enroll in the program after September 1, 1999, to become eligible
for the national certification bonus. Funds are provided for a maximum of 45
bonuses for the 2000-2001 school year. The superintendent shall approve a
limited number of the most qualified applicants for potential bonus eligibility
to ensure that the number of bonuses does not exceed available funds. The
Washington state professional standards board, if created by law, or an
advisory committee established by the superintendent of public instruction in
consultation with the state board of education if a professional standards
board is not created, shall review the national board certification standards
to determine whether additional requirements to the national standards are
needed to align the national requirements with Washington state standards for
teachers and students under education reform.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 515. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR TRANSITIONAL
BILINGUAL PROGRAMS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 35,136,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 36,608,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 71,744,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary
to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year
adjustments.

(2)
The superintendent shall distribute a maximum of $648.50 per eligible bilingual
student in the 1999-00 and 2000-01 school years, exclusive of salary and
benefit adjustments provided in section 503 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 516. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR THE LEARNING
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 71,205,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 75,045,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 146,250,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are
necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior
fiscal year adjustments.

(2)
Funding for school district learning assistance programs shall be allocated at
maximum rates of $382.95 per funded unit for the 1999-00 school year and
$383.76 per funded unit for the 2000-01 school year.

(3)
A school district's funded units for the 1999-2000 and 2000-01 school years
shall be the sum of the following:

(a)
The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-6, multiplied by the
5-year average 4th grade test results as adjusted for funding purposes in the
school years prior to 1999-2000, multiplied by 0.92. As the 3rd grade test
becomes available, it shall be phased into the 5-year average on a 1-year lag;
and

(b)
The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades 7-9, multiplied by the
5-year average 8th grade test results as adjusted for funding purposes in the
school years prior to 1999-2000, multiplied by 0.92. As the 6th grade test
becomes available, it shall be phased into the 5-year average for these grades
on a 1-year lag; and

(c)
The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades 10-11 multiplied by
the 5-year average 11th grade test results, multiplied by 0.92. As the 9th
grade test becomes available, it shall be phased into the 5-year average for
these grades on a 1-year lag; and

(d)
If, in the prior school year, the district's percentage of October headcount
enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free and reduced price lunch exceeded
the state average, subtract the state average percentage of students eligible
for free and reduced price lunch from the district's percentage and multiply
the result by the district's K-12 annual average full-time equivalent
enrollment for the current school year multiplied by 22.3 percent.

(4)
School districts may carry over from one year to the next up to 10 percent of
funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended
for the learning assistance program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 517. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-LOCAL
ENHANCEMENT FUNDS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 33,095,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 27,265,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 60,720,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are
necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior
fiscal year adjustments.

(2)
Funds are provided for local education program enhancements to meet educational
needs as identified by the school district, including alternative education
programs.

(3)
Allocations for the 1999-00 school year shall be at a maximum annual rate of $28.81
per full-time equivalent student and $28.81 per full-time equivalent student
for the 2000-01 school year. Allocations shall be made on the monthly
apportionment payment schedule provided in RCW 28A.510.250 and shall be based
on school district annual average full-time equivalent enrollment in grades
kindergarten through twelve: PROVIDED, That for school districts enrolling not
more than one hundred average annual full-time equivalent students, and for
small school plants within any school district designated as remote and
necessary schools, the allocations shall be as follows:

(a)
Enrollment of not more than sixty average annual full-time equivalent students
in grades kindergarten through six shall generate funding based on sixty
full-time equivalent students;

(b)
Enrollment of not more than twenty average annual full-time equivalent students
in grades seven and eight shall generate funding based on twenty full-time
equivalent students; and

(c)
Enrollment of not more than sixty average annual full-time equivalent students
in grades nine through twelve shall generate funding based on sixty full-time
equivalent students.

(4)
Funding provided pursuant to this section does not fall within the definition
of basic education for purposes of Article IX of the state Constitution and the
state's funding duty thereunder.

(5)
The superintendent shall not allocate up to one-fourth of a district's funds
under this section if:

(a)
The district is not maximizing federal matching funds for medical services
provided through special education programs, pursuant to RCW 74.09.5241 through
74.09.5256 (Title XIX funding); and

(b)
The district is not in compliance in filing truancy petitions as required under
chapter 312, Laws of 1995 and RCW 28A.225.030.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 518. K-12
CARRYFORWARD AND PRIOR SCHOOL YEAR ADJUSTMENTS. State
general fund appropriations provided to the superintendent of public
instruction for state entitlement programs in the public schools in this part V
of this act may be expended as needed by the superintendent for adjustments to
apportionment for prior fiscal periods. Recoveries of state general fund
moneys from school districts and educational service districts for a prior
fiscal period shall be made as reductions in apportionment payments for the
current fiscal period and shall be shown as prior year adjustments on
apportionment reports for the current period. Such recoveries shall not be
treated as revenues to the state, but as a reduction in the amount expended
against the appropriation for the current fiscal period.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 519. FOR
THE STATE
BOARD OF EDUCATION

Education
Savings Account‑-State Appropriation...... $ 72,000,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations: $36,000,000 in fiscal year 2000 and $36,000,000 in
fiscal year 2001 are appropriated to the common school construction account.

(End of part)

PART
VI

HIGHER
EDUCATION

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 601. The
appropriations in sections 603 through 609 of this act are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:

(1)
"Institutions" means the institutions of higher education receiving
appropriations under sections 603 through 609 of this act.

(2)(a)
The salary increases provided or referenced in this subsection shall be the
only allowable salary increases provided at institutions of higher education,
excluding increases associated with normally occurring promotions and increases
related to faculty and professional staff retention, and excluding increases
associated with employees under the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW pursuant
to the provisions of RCW 28B.16.015.

(b)
Each institution of higher education shall provide to each classified staff
employee as defined by the office of financial management a salary increase of
3.0 percent on July 1, 1999, and a salary increase of 3.0 percent on July 1,
2000.

(c)
Each institution of higher education shall provide to instructional and
research faculty, exempt professional staff, academic administrators, academic
librarians, counselors, teaching and research assistants as classified by the
office of financial management, and all other nonclassified staff, including
those employees under RCW 28B.16.015, an average salary increase of 3.0 percent
on July 1, 1999, and an average salary increase of 3.0 percent on July 1, 2000.

(d)
For employees under the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW pursuant to the
provisions of RCW 28B.16.015, distribution of the salary increases will be in
accordance with the applicable collective bargaining agreement. However, an
increase shall not be provided to any classified employee whose salary is above
the approved salary range maximum for the class to which the employee's position
is allocated.

(e)
Each institution of higher education receiving appropriations under sections
604 through 609 of this act may provide additional salary increases to
instructional and research faculty, exempt professional staff, academic
administrators, academic librarians, counselors, teaching and research
assistants, as classified by the office of financial management, and all other
nonclassified staff, but not including employees under RCW 28B.16.015. Any
salary increase granted under the authority of this subsection (2)(e) shall not
be included in an institution's salary base. It is the intent of the
legislature that general fund--state support for an institution shall not
increase during the current or any future biennium as a result of any salary
increases authorized under this subsection (2)(e).

(f)
Each institution of higher education may also provide additional salary
increases to instructional and research faculty funded from reductions in the
maximum level of employer contributions to retirement plans offered pursuant to
RCW 28B.10.400. Any salary increase granted under the authority of this
subsection (2)(f) shall not be included in an institution's salary base. It is
the intent of the legislature that general fund‑‑state support for
an institution shall not increase during the current or any future biennium as
a result of any salary increases authorized under this subsection (2)(f).

(g)
To collect consistent data for use by the legislature, the office of financial
management, and other state agencies for policy and planning purposes,
institutions of higher education shall report personnel data to be used in the
department of personnel's human resource data warehouse in compliance with
uniform reporting procedures established by the department of personnel.

(h)
Specific salary increases authorized in sections 603 through 609 of this act
are in addition to any salary increase provided in this subsection.

(3)
The tuition fees, as defined in chapter 28B.15 RCW, charged to full-time students
at the state's institutions of higher education for the 1999-00 and 2000-01
academic years, other than the summer term, may be adjusted by the governing
boards of the state universities, regional universities, The Evergreen State
College, and the state board for community and technical colleges as provided
in this subsection.

(a)
For the 1999-00 academic year, the governing boards and the state board may
implement an increase no greater than four and six-tenths percent over tuition
fees charged to full-time students for the 1998-99 academic year.

(b)
For the 2000-01 academic year, the governing boards and the state board may
implement an increase no greater than three and six-tenths percent over the
tuition fees charged to full-time students for the 1999-00 academic year.

(c)
For the 1999-01 biennium, the governing boards and the state board may adjust
full-time operating fees for factors that may include time of day and day of
week, as well as delivery method and campus, to encourage full use of the state's
educational facilities and resources.

(d)
The tuition increases adopted under (a), (b) and (c) of this subsection need
not apply uniformly across student categories as defined in chapter 28B.15 RCW
so long as the increase for each student category does not exceed the
percentages specified in this subsection.

(e)
In addition to waivers granted under the authority of RCW 28B.15.910, the
governing boards and the state board may waive all or a portion of the
operating fees for any student. State general fund appropriations shall not be
provided to replace tuition and fee revenue foregone as a result of waivers
granted under this subsection.

(4)
Pursuant to RCW 43.15.055, institutions of higher education receiving
appropriations under sections 603 through 609 of this act are authorized to
increase summer term tuition in excess of the fiscal growth factor during the
1999-01 biennium. Tuition levels increased pursuant to this subsection shall
not exceed the per credit hour rate calculated from the academic year tuition
levels adopted under this act.

(5)
Community colleges may increase services and activities fee charges in excess
of the fiscal growth factor up to the maximum level authorized in RCW
28B.15.069.

(6)
Each institution receiving appropriations under sections 604 through 609 of
this act shall submit a biennial plan to achieve measurable and specific
improvements each academic year as part of a continuing effort to make
meaningful and substantial progress towards the achievement of the following
long-term performance goals:

Goal

(a)
Undergraduate graduation efficiency index: A

measure
of how efficiently students complete

their
degrees that takes into consideration the

total
number of credits earned, dropped, repeated,

transferred
and required for graduation:

For
students beginning as freshmen 95%

For
transfer students 90%

(b)
Undergraduate student retention: Defined as

a
percentage of all undergraduate students who

return
for the next year at the same institution,

measured
from fall to fall:

Research
universities 95%

Comprehensive
universities and college 90%

(c)
Graduation rates: Defined as the percentage

of an
entering freshman class at each institution

that
graduates within five years:

Research
universities 65%

Comprehensive
universities and college 55%

The
plans, to be prepared at the direction of the higher education coordinating
board, shall be submitted by August 15, 1999. The higher education
coordinating board shall set biennial performance targets for each institution
and shall review actual achievements annually. Institutions shall track their
actual performance on the state-wide measures as well as faculty productivity,
the goals and targets for which may be unique to each institution. A report on
progress towards state-wide and institution-specific goals, with
recommendations for the ensuing biennium, shall be submitted to the fiscal and
higher education committees of the legislature by November 15, 2000.

(7)
The state board for community and technical colleges shall develop a biennial
plan to achieve measurable and specific improvements each academic year as part
of a continuing effort to make meaningful and substantial progress to achieve
the following long-term performance goals:

Goal

(a)
Academic students prepared to transfer

to
baccalaureate institutions based on minimum

transferrable
credit hours and minimum required

grade
point average. 50,000 per year

(b)
Basic skill students who demonstrate

substantive
skill gain as a result of their

adult
basic education (ABE), English as a second

language
(ESL), and general education diploma

(GED)
instruction. 80%

(c)
Students prepared for work as measured

by
vocational degrees and related certificates

awarded,
including achievement of industry

skill
standards. 25,000 per year

The
board shall set biennial performance targets for each college or district,
where appropriate, and shall review actual achievements annually. Colleges
shall track their actual performance on the state-wide measures. A report on
progress towards the state-wide goals, with recommendations for the ensuing
biennium, shall be submitted to the fiscal and higher education committees of
the legislature by November 15, 2000.

(8)
Institutions receiving appropriations under sections 603 through 609 of this
act shall provide enrollment data for students engaged in distance learning to
the office of financial management as part of the distance learning enrollment
information project.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 602. The
appropriations in sections 603 through 609 of this act provide state general
fund support or employment and training trust account support for full-time
equivalent student enrollments at each institution of higher education. Listed
below are the annual full-time equivalent student enrollments by institutions
assumed in this act.

1999-2000 2000-2001

Annual Annual

Average Average

University
of Washington

Main
campus 31,927 32,266

Bothell
branch 993 1,136

Tacoma
branch 1,143 1,316

Washington
State University

Main
campus 17,272 17,649

Spokane
branch 472 601

Tri-Cities
branch 754 754

Vancouver
branch 1,021 1,121

Central
Washington University 7,670 7,867

Eastern
Washington University 7,739 7,739

The
Evergreen State College 3,638 3,713

Western
Washington University 10,648 10,761

State
Board for Community and

Technical
Colleges 120,529 123,332

Higher
Education Coordinating

Board 50 550

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 603. FOR
THE STATE
BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 455,664,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 486,387,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation.................. $.................................. 11,404,000

Employment
and Training Trust Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 1,474,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 954,929,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The technical colleges may increase tuition and fees in excess of the fiscal
growth factor to conform with the percentage increase in community college
operating fees.

(2)(a)
$5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$5,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely to increase salaries and related benefits for part-time
faculty. The state board for community and technical colleges shall allocate
these funds to college districts based on the headcount of part-time faculty
under contract for the 1998-99 academic year. To earn these funds, a college
district must match the state funds with local revenue, the amounts for which
shall be determined by the state board. State fund allocations that go
unclaimed by a college district shall lapse. The board may provide salary
increases to part-time faculty in a total amount not to exceed $10,000,000 from
tuition revenues. The board shall report to the office of financial management
and legislative fiscal committees on the distribution of state funds, match
requirements of each district, and the wage adjustments for part-time faculty
by October 1 of each fiscal year.

(b)
Each college district shall examine its current ratio of part-time to full-time
faculty by discipline and report to the board a plan to reduce wage disparity
and reliance on part-time faculty through salary improvements, conversion of positions
to full-time status, and other remedies deemed appropriate given labor market
conditions and educational programs offered in each community. The board shall
set long-term performance targets for each district with respect to use of
part-time faculty and monitor progress annually. The board shall report to the
fiscal and higher education committees of the legislature on implementation of
this subsection by no later than December 1, 1999, with recommendations for the
ensuing biennium provided no later than December 1, 2000.

(3)
$1,155,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $2,345,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for faculty salary increments and associated benefits and
may be used in combination with salary and benefit savings from faculty
turnover to provide faculty salary increments and associated benefits. To the
extent general salary increase funding is used to pay faculty increments, the
general salary increase shall be reduced by the same amount.

(4)
$950,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $950,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to lower the part-time faculty retirement eligibility
threshold to fifty percent of the full-time workload.

(5)
$332,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $3,153,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for Cascadia Community College start-up and enrollment
costs.

(6)
$1,441,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,441,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for 500 FTE enrollment slots to implement RCW
28B.50.259 (timber-dependent communities).

(7)
$27,361,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$28,761,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and
the entire employment and training trust account appropriation are provided
solely as special funds for training and related support services, including
financial aid, child care, and transportation, as specified in chapter 226,
Laws of 1993 (employment and training for unemployed workers).

(a)
Funding is provided to support up to 7,200 full-time equivalent students in
each fiscal year.

(b)
The state board for community and technical colleges shall submit a plan for
allocation of the full-time equivalent students provided in this subsection to
the workforce training and education coordinating board for review and
approval.

(8)
$1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for tuition support for students enrolled in
work-based learning programs.

(9)
$567,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $568,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for administration and customized training contracts
through the job skills program.

(10)
$750,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $750,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for grants to expand information technology and
computer science programs. Successful grant applications from a college,
partnerships of colleges, or partnerships of colleges and K-12 school districts
must include a match of cash, in-kind, or donations equivalent to the grant
amount. Grant applications shall receive priority that prepare students to
meet industry standards, achieve industry skill certificates, or continue to
upper division computer science or computer engineering studies. No college
may receive more than $300,000 from appropriations in this section. The state
board for community and technical colleges shall report the implementation of
this section to the governor and legislative fiscal committees by June 30,
2001, including plans of successful grant recipients for the continuation of
programs funded by this section.

(11)
$1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the Pierce College branch at Puyallup.

(12)
$50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5277 (higher education
student child care matching grants). In no case shall funds provided in this
subsection be used to construct or remodel facilities. If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(13)
Funding in this section provides for the collection and reporting of Washington
enrollment data, and related activities, for the distance learning information
project described in section 129 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 604. FOR UNIVERSITY
OF WASHINGTON

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 316,592,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 334,314,000

Death
Investigations Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ 221,000

Accident
Account‑-State Appropriation............... $ 5,773,000

Medical
Aid Account‑-State Appropriation............. $...................................... 5,815,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 662,715,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$8,617,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $10,528,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided for upper division and graduate courses and other educational
services offered at the Bothell branch campus.

(2)
$10,147,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $11,438,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided for upper division and graduate courses and other educational
services offered at the Tacoma branch campus.

(3)
$2,312,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $2,312,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for competitively offered faculty recruitment and
retention salary adjustments. Tuition revenues may be expended in addition to
those required by this section to further provide recruitment and retention
salary adjustments. The university shall provide a report in their 2001-03
biennial operating budget request submittal on the effective expenditure of
funds for the purposes of this section.

(4)
$1,975,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,975,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to extend the next-generation internet hub and related
expertise.

(5)
$200,000 of the death investigations account appropriation is provided solely
for the forensic pathologist fellowship program.

(6)
$136,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $137,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan
and agency action item UW-01.

(7)
$75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for the Olympic natural resource center.

(8)
$50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $50,000
of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for the dental education in care of persons with disabilities program.

(9)
$904,000 of the accident account and medical aid account appropriations is
provided solely for a bio-contaminant laboratory and consultation service in
the department of environmental health.

(10)
For the 1999-01 biennium, five percent of tuition and fee revenue collected
from law students may be used when privately matched dollar-for-dollar to provide
public interest law scholarships to enrolled students at the university.

(11)
$958,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $958,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided for the mathematics, engineering, science achievement (MESA)
program.

(12)
$1,250,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,250,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for research faculty clusters in the advanced
technology initiative program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 605. FOR WASHINGTON
STATE UNIVERSITY

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 183,551,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 197,015,000

Air
Pollution Control Account‑-State

Appropriation................................... $ 198,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 380,764,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$7,145,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $8,718,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided for upper division and graduate courses and other educational
services offered at the Spokane branch campus.

(2)
$5,134,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $5,325,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided for upper division and graduate courses and other educational
services offered at the Tri-Cities branch campus.

(3)
$8,537,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $10,164,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided for upper division and graduate courses and other educational
services offered at the Vancouver branch campus.

(4)
$1,438,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,438,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for competitively offered faculty recruitment and
retention salary adjustments. Tuition revenues may be expended in addition to
those required by this section to further provide recruitment and retention
salary adjustments. The university shall provide a report in their 2001-03
biennial operating budget request submittal on the effective expenditure of
funds for the purposes of this section.

(5)
$565,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation in fiscal year 2000 and
$340,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation in fiscal year 2001 are
provided for learning centers in Skagit, Walla Walla, and Grays Harbor
counties.

(6)
$500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$3,750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for the safe food initiative. Of these amounts, $500,000 each
fiscal year is provided solely for the commission on pesticide registration.

(7)
$44,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$44,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for research efforts to develop suitable and economical
alternatives to field burning of grass seed harvest residue.

(8)
$165,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $166,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan
and agency action item WSU-01.

(9)
$750,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $750,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for research faculty clusters in the advanced
technology initiative program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 606. FOR EASTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 41,620,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 43,345,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 84,965,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: $375,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2000 and $375,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation
for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for competitively offered faculty
recruitment and retention salary adjustments. Tuition revenues may be expended
in addition to those required by this section to further provide recruitment
and retention salary adjustments. The university shall provide a report in
their 2001-03 biennial operating budget request submittal on the effective
expenditure of funds for the purposes of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 607. FOR CENTRAL
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 41,898,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 44,465,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 86,363,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
$312,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $312,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for competitively offered faculty recruitment,
retention, and equity salary adjustments. Tuition revenues may be expended in
addition to those required by this section to further provide recruitment and
retention salary adjustments. The university shall provide a report in their
2001-03 biennial operating budget request submittal on the effective
expenditure of funds for the purposes of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 608. FOR THE
EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 22,359,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 24,233,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 46,592,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$188,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $188,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for competitively offered faculty recruitment and
retention salary adjustments. Tuition revenues may be expended in addition to
those required by this section to further provide recruitment and retention
salary adjustments. The college shall provide a report in their 2001-03
biennial operating budget request submittal on the effective expenditure of
funds for the purposes of this section.

(2)
$101,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$102,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for the institute for public policy to complete studies of
services described in section 202(1) (a) and (b) of this act. If those
subsections are not enacted, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(3)
$40,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 is
provided solely for the institute for public policy to facilitate a work group
pursuant to Second Substitute House Bill No. 1692 (child witness/victim
interviews). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided
in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 609. FOR WESTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 53,293,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 56,272,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 109,565,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: $375,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2000 and $375,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation
for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for competitively offered faculty
recruitment and retention salary adjustments. Tuition revenues may be expended
in addition to those required by this section to further provide recruitment
and retention salary adjustments. The university shall provide a report in
their 2001-03 biennial operating budget request submittal on the effective
expenditure of funds for the purposes of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 610. FOR
THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD‑-POLICY
COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 4,458,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 8,027,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation.................. $ 653,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 13,138,000

The
appropriations in this section are provided to carry out the accountability,
performance measurement, policy coordination, planning, studies and
administrative functions of the board and are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:

(1)
The board shall review, recommend changes if necessary, and approve plans
defined in section 601(6) of this act for achieving measurable and specific
improvements in academic years 1999-00 and 2000-01.

(2)
$280,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $280,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for enrollment to implement RCW 28B.80.570 through
28B.80.585 (rural natural resources impact areas). The number of students
served shall be 50 full-time equivalent students per fiscal year. The board
shall ensure that enrollments reported under this subsection meet the criteria
outlined in RCW 28B.80.570 through 28B.80.585.

(3)
$100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$4,650,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely to contract for 500 full-time equivalent undergraduate students
in high-demand fields and programs as evidenced by limited current access,
despite graduates who are highly sought after by employers of this state. The
board shall consult with the office of financial management and the legislative
fiscal and higher education committees to design and implement a bidding
process to solicit proposals from public institutions to deliver these student
enrollments. Participating institutions shall cooperate with the board to
collect the data necessary to report to the governor and the legislature on the
impact of this subsection, particularly the degree of improved access to
high-demand fields and programs for students and successful job placements for
graduates.

(4)
$1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for competitive grants to public baccalaureate
institutions to expand information technology programs. Successful grant
applications to fund faculty, staff, or equipment for computer science,
computer engineering, or related disciplines must include a match of nonstate
cash or donations equivalent to the grant amount. No institution may receive
more than $1,000,000 from appropriations in this section. The board shall
report on the implementation of this section to the governor and legislative
fiscal committees by June 30, 2001, including plans of successful grant
recipients for the continuation of programs funded by this section.

(5)
$600,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 is
provided solely for the higher education coordinating board fund for innovation
and quality under RCW 28B.120.040. If Substitute House Bill No. 1013 is not
enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6)
$150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1729 (teacher
training pilot program). If Second Substitute House Bill No. 1729 is not
enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7)
With funding provided in this section, the higher education coordinating board,
in cooperation with the office of financial management and the state board for
community and technical colleges, shall study the feasibility of collecting
Washington enrollment data on distance learning programs sponsored by private
institutions in Washington as well as by institutions outside the state of
Washington, and it shall report findings to the legislature by January, 2000.

(8)
$432,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$68,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for a demonstration project to improve rural access to
post-secondary education by bringing distance learning technologies into
Jefferson county.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 611. FOR
THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD‑-FINANCIAL
AID AND GRANT PROGRAMS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 106,945,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 117,807,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation.................. $.................................. 2,422,000

Advanced
College Tuition Payment Program Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 3,408,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 230,582,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$534,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $529,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the displaced homemakers program.

(2)
$220,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $225,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the western interstate commission for higher
education.

(3)
$1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely to implement an aid program for the benefit of elementary and
secondary public school teachers who do not now hold a masters of education
degree. Within available funds and until these funds are exhausted, the board
may repay all or a portion of the educational expenses incurred by a teacher,
or teacher candidate, for one year of masters' level studies at an accredited
Washington college or university. Payment is conditioned upon the applicant's
successful matriculation and resumption, or assumption, of classroom teaching
duties in a public elementary or secondary school in this state. Among the
potential applicants for this program, the board shall give priority to those
individuals who returned to the classroom with a math or science teaching
credential. The board may adopt rules as necessary to implement this program.

(4)
$1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the health professional conditional scholarship
and loan program under chapter 28B.115 RCW. This amount shall be deposited to
the health professional loan repayment and scholarship trust fund to carry out
the purposes of the program.

(5)
$75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5277 (higher
education student child care matching grants). In no case shall funds provided
in this subsection be used to construct or remodel facilities. If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(6)
$103,686,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2000 and $114,700,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2001 are provided solely for student financial aid, including all
administrative costs. Of these amounts:

(a)
$80,240,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $87,696,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the state need grant program. After April 1 of
each fiscal year, up to one percent of the annual appropriation for the state
need grant program may be transferred to the state work study program;

(b)
$15,350,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $15,350,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the state work study program. After April 1 of
each fiscal year, up to one percent of the annual appropriation for the state
work study program may be transferred to the state need grant program;

(c)
$2,920,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $2,920,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for educational opportunity grants. The board may
deposit sufficient funds from its appropriation into the state education trust
fund as established in RCW 28B.10.821 to provide a one-year renewal of the
grant for each new recipient of the educational opportunity grant award. For
the purpose of establishing eligibility for the equal opportunity grant program
for placebound students under RCW 28B.101.020, Thurston county lies within the
branch campus service area of the Tacoma branch campus of the University of
Washington;

(d)
A maximum of 2.1 percent of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2000 and 2.1 percent of the general fund‑-state appropriation
for fiscal year 2001 may be expended for financial aid administration,
excluding the 4 percent state work study program administrative allowance
provision;

(e)
$230,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $201,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the educator's excellence awards. Any educator's
excellence moneys not awarded by April 1st of each year may be transferred by
the board to either the Washington scholars program or to the Washington award
for vocational excellence;

(f)(i)
$1,361,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,548,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to implement the Washington scholars program. Any
Washington scholars program moneys not awarded by April 1st of each year may be
transferred by the board to either the educator's excellence awards or to the
Washington award for vocational excellence;

(ii)
Of the amounts in (f)(i) of this subsection, $25,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $207,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely to implement Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1661 (Washington scholars program). If Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1661 is not enacted prior to June 30, 1999, then the
amounts provided in this subsection (6)(f)(ii) shall lapse;

(g)
$534,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $534,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to implement Washington award for vocational
excellence program. Any Washington award for vocational program moneys not
awarded by April 1st of each year may be transferred by the board to either the
educator's excellence awards or the Washington scholars program;

(h)
$251,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $251,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for community scholarship matching grants of $2,000
each. To be eligible for the matching grant, a nonprofit community
organization organized under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code
must demonstrate that it has raised $2,000 in new moneys for college
scholarships after the effective date of this act. No organization may receive
more than one $2,000 matching grant and preference shall be given to
organizations affiliated with the citizens' scholarship foundation; and

(i)
$2,800,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $6,200,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to establish the Washington promise scholarship
program subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(i)
Within available funds, the higher education coordinating board shall award
scholarships for use at accredited institutions of higher education in the
state of Washington to as many students as possible from among those qualifying
under (iv) and (v) of this subsection. Each qualifying student will receive
two consecutive annual installments, the value of each not to exceed the
full-time annual resident tuition rates charged by community colleges.

(ii)
Of the amounts provided, no more than $250,000 each year is for administration
of the Washington promise scholarship program.

(iii)
The Washington's promise scholarship account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. The account shall be a discrete nonappropriated account.
Other than funds provided for program administration, the higher education
coordinating board shall deposit in this account all money received for the
program. The account shall be self-sustaining and consist of funds
appropriated by the legislature for these scholarships, private contributions,
and receipts from refunds of tuition and fees.

(iv)
Seniors in the top ten percent of their individual Washington state high school
class in 1999 and whose family income does not exceed one hundred and
thirty-five percent of the state's median family income, adjusted for family
size qualify for a scholarship in fiscal year 2000.

(v)
Seniors in the top fifteen percent of their individual Washington state high
school class in 2000 and whose family income does not exceed one hundred
thirty-five percent of the state's median family income, adjusted for family
size qualify for a scholarship in fiscal year 2001.

(vi)
For students eligible under subsections (iv) and (v) of this subsection, the
superintendent of public instruction shall provide the higher education
coordinating board with the names, addresses, and unique numeric identifiers of
students in the top ten percent, or top fifteen percent, as appropriate in each
of the respective high school senior classes in Washington state. This shall
be provided no later than August 1 of each year.

(vii)
Scholarships awarded under this section may only be used at accredited
institutions of higher education in the state of Washington for college-related
expenses, including but not limited to, tuition, room and board, books,
materials, and transportation. The Washington promise scholarship award shall
not supplant other scholarship awards, financial aid, or tax programs related
to postsecondary education. Scholarships may not be transferred or refunded to
students.

(viii)
The higher education coordinating board shall evaluate the impact and
effectiveness of the Washington promise scholarship program. The evaluation
shall include, but not be limited to: (A) An analysis of other financial
assistance promise scholarship recipients are receiving through other federal,
state, and institutional programs, including grants, work study, tuition
waivers, tax credits, and loan programs; (B) an analysis of whether the
implementation of the promise scholarship program has had an impact on student
indebtedness; and (C) an evaluation of what types of students are successfully
completing high school but do not have the financial ability to attend college
because they cannot obtain financial aid or the financial aid is insufficient.
The board shall report its findings to the governor and the legislature by
November 1, 2001.

(ix)
The higher education coordinating board may adopt rules as necessary to
implement this program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 612. FOR
THE WORK
FORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 1,124,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 1,123,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation.................. $.................................. 34,408,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 36,655,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 613. FOR WASHINGTON
STATE LIBRARY

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 8,400,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 8,198,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation.................. $.................................. 8,859,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 25,457,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: At least $2,763,219 shall be expended for a contract with the
Seattle public library for library services for the Washington book and braille
library.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 614. FOR
THE WASHINGTON
STATE ARTS COMMISSION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 2,314,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 2,562,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation.................. $.................................. 1,000,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 5,876,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$250,000 from the fiscal year 2000 general fund‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for the arts in education program, arts organization funding,
and for new arts funding for underserved communities. During fiscal year 2000,
the agency shall prepare a strategic plan. The plan shall be submitted to the
governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by July 1, 2000.

(2)
$500,000 from the fiscal year 2001 general fund‑-state appropriation is
contingent upon the completion of the strategic plan required in subsection (1)
of this section. If the strategic plan is not completed by July 1, 2000, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 615. FOR
THE WASHINGTON
STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 2,646,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 2,661,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 5,307,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$50,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2000 and $50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for activities related to the Lewis and Clark
Bicentennial.

(2)
$25,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$25,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for the purchase and replacement costs of historic elm trees
along Des Moines memorial drive. These funds shall be allocated to the
Highline historical society.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 616. FOR
THE EASTERN
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 1,176,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 1,344,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 2,520,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$415,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $269,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided for temporary relocation of the Cheney Cowles museum
operations.

(2)
$311,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided for the building operation and maintenance of the Cheney Cowles museum
addition.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 617. FOR
THE STATE
SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 3,986,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 4,006,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation........... $ 644,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 8,636,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 618. FOR
THE STATE
SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 6,704,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 6,686,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION...................... $ 13,390,000

(End of part)

PART
VII

SPECIAL
APPROPRIATIONS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 701. FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES:
FOR DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT LIMIT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 614,672,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 445,689,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,168,000

Debt-Limit
Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 2,574,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 1,067,103,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The general fund appropriations are for deposit into the
debt-limit general fund bond retirement account. The appropriation for fiscal
year 2000 shall be deposited in the debt-limit general fund bond retirement
account by June 30, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 702. FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES:
FOR GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED BY ENTERPRISE ACTIVITIES

State
Convention and Trade Center Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 32,575,000

Accident
Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 5,080,000

Medical
Aid Account‑-State Appropriation........ $...................................... 5,080,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 42,735,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 703. FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES:
FOR GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 23,806,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 23,445,000

Higher
Education Construction Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 118,000

Nondebt-Limit
Reimbursable Bond Retirement

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 106,498,000

Stadium
and Exhibition Center Construction‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,250,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 155,117,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The general fund appropriation is for deposit into the
nondebt-limit general fund bond retirement account.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 704. FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES:
FOR DEBT TO BE PAID BY STATUTORILY PRESCRIBED REVENUE

Nondebt-Limit
Revenue Bond Retirement

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 1,229,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 705. FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES:
FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 567,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 568,000

Higher
Education Construction Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 30,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,237,000

Public
Safety Reimbursable Bond Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,000

Stadium/Exhibition
Center Construction

Account‑-State
Appropriation.. ............ $ 250,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 2,655,000

Total
Bond Retirement and Interest Appropriations

contained
in sections 701 through 705 of this

act........................................ $ 1,268,839,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 706. FOR
THE GOVERNOR‑-TORT
DEFENSE SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 1,632,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 1,633,000

Tort
Defense Services Revolving Account........ $ 3,265,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 6,530,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: To facilitate payment of tort defense services from special
funds, the state treasurer is directed to transfer sufficient moneys from each
special fund to the special fund agency tort defense services revolving fund,
in accordance with schedules provided by the office of financial management.
The governor shall distribute the moneys appropriated in this section to
agencies to pay for tort defense services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 707. FOR
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-EMERGENCY
FUND

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 850,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 850,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 1,700,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The appropriations in this section are for the governor's
emergency fund for the critically necessary work of any agency.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 708. FOR
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-FIRE
CONTINGENCY POOL. The sum of three million
dollars or so much thereof as may be available on June 30, 1999, from the total
amount of unspent fiscal year 1999 fire contingency funding in the disaster
response account, is appropriated for the purpose of making allocations to the
military department for fire mobilizations costs or to the department of
natural resources for fire suppression costs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 709. FOR
THE OFFICE
OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-IMPLEMENTATION
OF COLLECTIVE BARGAINING

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 2,500,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 2,500,000

Department
of Personnel Service Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 122,000

Special
Payroll System Revolving Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,000,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 10,122,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely to address
workload impacts resulting from the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5363 (state employee collective bargaining). If this bill is not enacted
by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this section shall lapse.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 710. FOR
THE EDUCATION
TECHNOLOGY REVOLVING ACCOUNT. The sum of $8,200,000 from
the general fund and $6,600,000 from the K-20 technology account are
appropriated for fiscal year 2000 to the education technology revolving
account.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 711. FOR
THE AGRICULTURAL
COLLEGE TRUST MANAGEMENT ACCOUNT

Resource
Management Cost Account Appropriation. $ 2,632,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The appropriation shall be deposited in the agricultural college
trust management account.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 712. FOR
THE SALMON
RECOVERY ACCOUNT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 4,500,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 4,500,000

Resource
Management Cost Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,900,000

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,475,000

Water
Quality Account Appropriation............. $.................................. 7,163,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 24,538,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The appropriations shall be deposited in the salmon recovery
account.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 713. FOR
THE OFFICE
OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-YEAR 2000 ALLOCATIONS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 5,000,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $ 462,000

Hospital
Commission Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 19,000

Health
Professions Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 182,000

Certified
Public Accountants' Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,000

Safe
Drinking Water Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 96,000

Water
Quality Permit Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 258,000

State
Health Care Authority Administrative

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 1,456,000

Year
2000 Contingency Revolving Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 10,000,000

Accident
Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 150,000

Medical
Aid Account‑-State Appropriation........ $ 150,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 17,778,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriations will be allocated by the office of financial management to
agencies to resolve year 2000 issues. Agencies shall submit their estimated
costs to resolve year 2000 issues to the office of financial management.

(2)
To facilitate the transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and accounts, the
state treasurer is directed to transfer sufficient moneys from each dedicated
fund or account to the year 2000 contingency revolving account, in accordance
with schedules provided by the office of financial management.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 714. FOR
THE GOVERNOR‑-EXTRAORDINARY
CRIMINAL JUSTICE COSTS. $1,200,000 of the public
safety and education account, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated solely for providing financial assistance in the 1999-01 biennium
to Okanogan county for extraordinary criminal justice costs incurred in the
adjudication of an aggravated homicide case. The office of financial
management, in consultation with Okanogan county, shall determine the amount to
be paid based on an assessment of the portion of the costs associated with the
homicide case which is disproportionate relative to the county's criminal
justice resources. The amount paid under this section shall not exceed eighty
percent of the total costs associated with the investigation, prosecution,
indigent defense, jury impanelment, expert witness, interpreters,
incarceration, and other adjudication costs of the case. On January 1, 2000,
any unexpended funds of the amount appropriated in this section shall lapse and
revert to the public safety and education account.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 715. FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑‑FOR THE COUNTY
CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

Impaired
Driving Safety Account Appropriation... $........................................... 1,440,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The amount appropriated in this section shall be distributed
quarterly during the 1999-01 biennium in accordance with RCW 82.14.310. This
funding is provided to counties for the costs of implementing criminal justice
legislation including, but not limited to: Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk
driving penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 208,
Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209, Laws of 1998 (DUI/license
suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition interlock violations); chapter
211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties);
chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels lowered); chapter 214, Laws of
1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter 215, Laws of 1998 (DUI provisions).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 716. FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑‑FOR THE MUNICIPAL
CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

Impaired
Driving Safety Account Appropriation... $ 960,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The amount appropriated in this section shall be distributed
quarterly during the 1999-01 biennium to all cities ratably based on population
as last determined by the office of financial management. The distributions to
any city that substantially decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after
July 1, 1990, and that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with
criminal cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county
in which the city is located. This funding is provided to cities for the costs
of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not limited to:
Chapter 206, Laws of 1998 (drunk driving penalties); chapter 207, Laws of 1998
(DUI penalties); chapter 208, Laws of 1998 (deferred prosecution); chapter 209,
Laws of 1998 (DUI/license suspension); chapter 210, Laws of 1998 (ignition
interlock violations); chapter 211, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 212,
Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); chapter 213, Laws of 1998 (intoxication levels
lowered); chapter 214, Laws of 1998 (DUI penalties); and chapter 215, Laws of
1998 (DUI provisions).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 717. BELATED
CLAIMS. The agencies and institutions of the state may expend
moneys appropriated in this act, upon approval of the office of financial
management, for the payment of supplies and services furnished to the agency or
institution in prior fiscal biennia.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 718. For
the period from July 1, 1999, through June 30, 2001, a one hundred fifty
thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid as a sundry claim to a teacher's
estate if the teacher is killed in the course of employment. The determination
of eligibility for the benefit shall be made consistent with Title 51 RCW by
the department of labor and industries. The department of labor and industries
shall notify the director of the department of general administration if a
teacher's estate is determined to be eligible for payment under this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 719. FOR
THE GOVERNOR‑-COMPENSATION‑-INSURANCE
BENEFITS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 10,401,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 26,095,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 12,987,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 747,000

Salary
and Insurance Increase Revolving Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 25,941,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 75,166,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)(a)
The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums shall not
exceed $375.50 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2000, and $410.53 for
fiscal year 2001.

(b)
The monthly employer funding rate for the operating costs of the health care
authority shall not exceed $12.52 per eligible employee for fiscal year 2000,
and $13.04 for fiscal year 2001.

(c)
An additional $2.42 per eligible employee shall be included in the employer
funding rate for fiscal years 2000 and 2001 to repay the public employees' and
retirees' insurance account for any claims paid as a result of a court-approved
stipulated settlement in Retired State Employees et al. v. State of
Washington (Thurston county superior court cause no. 92-2-01294-1).

(d)
An additional $0.71 per eligible employee shall be included in the employer
funding rate for fiscal year 2000, and an additional $1.47 per eligible
employee shall be included in the employer funding rate for fiscal year 2001,
to increase life insurance coverage in accordance with a court approved
settlement in Burbage et al. v. State of Washington (Thurston county
superior court cause no. 94-2-02560-8).

(e)
Surplus moneys accruing to the public employees' and retirees' insurance
account due to lower-than-projected insurance costs may not be reallocated by
the health care authority to increase the actuarial value of public employee
insurance plans. Such funds shall be held in reserve in the public employees'
and retirees' insurance account and may not be expended without prior
legislative authorization.

(f)
In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health benefits, the
public employees' benefits board may require employee premium copayments,
increase point-of-service cost sharing, and/or implement managed competition.

(g)
$2,500,000 accruing to the public employees' and retirees' insurance account as
a result of payments in fiscal year 1999 from the standard insurance company to
the state of Washington may be reallocated by the health care authority to fund
the increase in the medicare retiree explicit subsidy provided in subsection
(3) of this section.

(2)
To facilitate the transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and accounts, the
state treasurer is directed to transfer sufficient moneys from each dedicated
fund or account to the special fund salary and insurance contribution increase
revolving fund in accordance with schedules provided by the office of financial
management.

(3)
The health care authority, subject to the approval of the public employees'
benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health benefit premiums to eligible
retired or disabled public employees and school district employees who are
eligible for parts A and B of medicare, pursuant to RCW 41.05.085. From
January 1, 2000 through December 31, 2000, the subsidy shall be $62.48.
Starting January 1, 2001, the subsidy shall be $69.98 per month.

(4)
Technical colleges, school districts, and educational service districts shall
remit to the health care authority for deposit into the public employees' and
retirees' insurance account established in RCW 41.05.120 the following amounts:

(a)
For each full-time employee, $21.54 per month beginning September 1, 1999, and
$24.15 beginning September 1, 2000;

(b)
For each part-time employee who, at the time of the remittance, is employed in
an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.32.010 or 41.40.010 and is eligible
for employer fringe benefit contributions for basic benefits, $21.54 each month
beginning September 1, 1999, and $24.15 beginning September 1, 2000, prorated
by the proportion of employer fringe benefit contributions for a full-time
employee that the part-time employee receives.

The
remittance requirements specified in this subsection shall not apply to
employees of a technical college, school district, or educational service
district who purchase insurance benefits through contracts with the health care
authority.

(5)
The salary and insurance increase revolving account appropriation includes
amounts sufficient to fund health benefits for ferry workers at the premium
levels specified in subsection (1) of this section, consistent with the 1999-01
transportation appropriations act.

(6)
The allocations to agencies and institutions under this section reflect a
reduction of $3,982,000 general fund‑-state for fiscal year 2000, an
increase of $458,000 general fund‑-state for fiscal year 2001, and
reductions of $1,330,000 general fund‑-federal, $74,000 general fund‑-local,
and $3,342,000 salary and insurance increase revolving account, to reflect
savings resulting from the implementation of employer pension rate reductions
on July 1, 1999.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 720. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS‑-CONTRIBUTIONS
TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The appropriations for the law enforcement officers' and
firefighters' retirement system shall be made on a monthly basis beginning July
1, 1999, consistent with chapter 41.45 RCW as amended by this act, and the
appropriations for the judges and judicial retirement systems shall be made on
a quarterly basis consistent with chapters 2.10 and 2.12 RCW.

(1)
There is appropriated for state contributions to the law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' retirement system:

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 16,320,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 18,050,000

(2)
There is appropriated for contributions to the judicial retirement system:

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 7,000,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 7,000,000

(3)
There is appropriated for contributions to the judges retirement system:

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 750,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 750,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 49,870,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 721. PLAN
2 AND PLAN 3 EARLY RETIREMENT REDUCTION FACTORS STUDY. The joint committee
on pension policy shall study options for reducing the early retirement
actuarial reduction factors in the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 2, the public employees' retirement system plan 2, and
the teachers' retirement system, plans 2 and 3. The study shall include a
review of possible employer and member contribution rate reductions in the
2001-2003 biennium. In developing its recommendations the committee shall take
into consideration state and local government fiscal capacity, the changing
nature of the work force and employment patterns, and issues of cost-shifting
between employees of different age groups. The joint committee shall report
its findings to the legislature by January 15, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 722. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS‑-PENSION
ADVISORY COMMITTEE

Department
of Retirement Systems Expense Account

Appropriation................................... $ 181,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The state pension advisory committee is created in the department of retirement
systems for the period July 1, 1999, through June 30, 2001. The committee
membership shall consist of: (a) Four active members of the state retirement
systems, to be appointed by the governor; (b) three retired members of the
state retirement systems, appointed by the governor; (c) three local government
employer representatives, to be appointed by the governor; (d) the director of
the department of retirement systems; and (e) the director of the office of
financial management. The governor shall appoint one of the committee members
to be committee chair.

(2)
Within the level of funding provided in this section, the state pension
advisory committee shall review changes in state pension benefits which have
been enacted since 1990 and may make recommendations to the joint committee on
pension policy regarding: (a) Major pension system priorities and goals for
the next five to ten years; (b) proposals for promoting equity between state
pension systems; and (c) a prioritized list of proposed pension system changes.

In
developing its recommendations the committee shall take into consideration
constraints on the state's and local government's fiscal capacity, the changing
nature of the work force and employment patterns, issues of cost-shifting
between employees groups, and disproportionalities between how much employees
in different age groups would pay in increased contributions for a benefit
increase compared to the value of the benefit increase.

The
committee shall also advise the department of retirement systems regarding the
content and design of the department's annual report on the state retirement
systems.

The
committee shall report its recommendations, if any, to the joint committee on
pension policy no later than June 1, 2000.

(3)
Committee staff support shall be provided by one professional position employed
by the department of retirement systems from the funding provided in this
section.

(4)
In conducting its review the pension advisory committee shall, to the greatest
extent feasible, make use of fiscal notes, studies, and other analysis which
has already been completed by the office of the state actuary. The committee
may also expend not more than $60,000 for actuarial services to assist with:
(a) Committee education, including a review of tax-deferred savings options
available to public employees; (b) the development of recommendations as
provided in subsection (2) of this section; and (c) the review and evaluation
of fiscal notes and analysis done by the office of the state actuary. The
contract for actuarial services shall be entered into by the department of
retirement systems for the committee.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 723. SALARY
COST OF LIVING ADJUSTMENT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 33,614,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 68,186,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 31,436,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 2,001,000

Salary
and Insurance Increase Revolving Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 72,609,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 207,846,000

The
appropriations in this section shall be expended solely for the purposes
designated in this section and are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
In addition to the purposes set forth in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section, appropriations in this section are provided solely for a 3.0 percent
salary increase effective July 1, 1999, and a 3.0 percent salary increase
effective July 1, 2000, for all classified employees, including those employees
in the Washington management service, and exempt employees under the
jurisdiction of the personnel resources board.

(2)
The appropriations in this section are sufficient to fund a 3.0 percent salary
increase effective July 1, 1999, and a 3.0 percent increase effective July 1,
2000, for general government, legislative, and judicial employees exempt from
merit system rules whose maximum salaries are not set by the commission on
salaries for elected officials.

(3)
The salary and insurance increase revolving account appropriation in this
section includes funds sufficient to fund a 3.0 percent salary increase
effective July 1, 1999, and a 3.0 percent salary increase effective July 1,
2000, for ferry workers consistent with the 1999-01 transportation
appropriations act.

(4)(a)
No salary increase may be paid under this section to any person whose salary
has been Y-rated pursuant to rules adopted by the personnel resources board.

(b)
The average salary increases paid under this section and section 724 of this
act to agency officials whose maximum salaries are established by the committee
on agency official salaries shall not exceed the average increases provided by
subsection (2) of this section.

(5)
The appropriations in this section include $1,498,000 general fund‑-state
for fiscal year 2000, $1,765,000 general fund‑-state for fiscal year
2001, and a reduction of $3,263,000 general fund‑-federal for the
department of social and health services to adjust employer pension funding
levels to reflect historical fund source ratios.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 724. FOR
THE GOVERNOR‑-SALARY
INCREASES FOR DIRECTORS AND BOARD MEMBERS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 54,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 54,000

Salary
and Insurance Increase Revolving Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 42,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 150,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: Appropriations in this section are provided solely for salary
increases for directors and board members whose salary ranges are set by the
state committee on agency officials' salaries. Salary increases for individual
directors and board members shall be at the sole discretion of the governor in
accordance with RCW 43.03.040.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 725. FOR
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL‑-SALARY
ADJUSTMENTS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 1,014,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 2,371,000

Attorney
General Salary Increase Revolving Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,385,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 6,770,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriations are provided solely for salary adjustments for assistant
attorneys general effective July 1, 1999, and effective July 1, 2000 to address
recruitment and retention problems. The attorney general shall develop a plan
for identifying and targeting increases to those positions which are
experiencing the greatest recruitment and retention difficulties and shall
provide a copy of the plan to the office of financial management and the fiscal
committees of the senate and house of representatives no later than October 1,
2000.

(2)
To facilitate the transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and accounts, the
state treasurer is directed to transfer sufficient moneys from each dedicated
fund or account to the attorney general salary increase revolving account,
hereby created in the state treasury, in accordance with schedules provided by
the office of financial management.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 726. FOR
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS

General
Fund‑‑State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 28,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 34,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $ 3,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 65,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely to pay the
increased retirement contributions resulting from enactment of House Bill No.
1023 (TRS 3 gain sharing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the
amounts provided in this section shall lapse.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 727. FOR
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-COMPENSATION
ACTIONS OF PERSONNEL RESOURCES BOARD

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 6,543,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 6,543,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 3,343,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 173,000

Salary
and Insurance Increase Revolving Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 22,783,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 39,385,000

The
appropriations in this section shall be expended solely for the purposes
designated in this section and are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: Funding is provided to implement the salary increase
recommendations of the Washington personnel resources board for the top 26
priority classes identified pursuant to RCW 41.06.152. The salary increases
shall be effective July 1, 1999.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 728. FOR
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-PERSONNEL
RESOURCES BOARD'S SALARY SURVEY FOR STATE AND HIGHER EDUCATION EMPLOYEES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 2,805,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 2,805,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 1,446,000

Salary
and Insurance Increase Revolving Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 13,014,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 20,070,000

The
appropriations in this section shall be expended solely for the purposes
designated in this section and are subject to the conditions and limitations in
this section.

(1)
Funding is provided in sufficient amounts to bring the current salary range to
within 10 ranges of their market rate, including any cost-of-living adjustments
and associated benefit costs, those state and higher education classified and
exempt classes under the Washington personnel resources board whose current
base salary is greater than 10 ranges from their approved survey applied salary
range as determined under RCW 41.06.160.

(2)
Implementation of the salary adjustments for the various classifications is
effective July 1, 1999. For purposes of this section, the current salary range
for any job class that receives an increase under section 725 of this act shall
be the salary range for the class following the increase provided in section
725 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 729. INCENTIVE
SAVINGS‑‑FY
2000. The sum of one hundred million dollars or so much
thereof as may be available on June 30, 2000, from the total amount of unspent
fiscal year 2000 state general fund appropriations is appropriated for the
purposes of RCW 43.79.460 in the manner provided in this section.

(1)
Of the total appropriated amount, one-half of that portion that is attributable
to incentive savings, not to exceed twenty-five million dollars, is
appropriated to the savings incentive account for the purpose of improving the
quality, efficiency, and effectiveness of agency services, and credited to the
agency that generated the savings.

(2)
The remainder of the total amount, not to exceed seventy-five million dollars,
is appropriated to the education savings account.

(3)
For purposes of this section, the total amount of unspent state general fund
appropriations does not include the appropriations made in this section or any
amounts included in across-the-board allotment reductions under RCW 43.88.110.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 730. INCENTIVE
SAVINGS‑-FY
2001. The sum of one hundred million dollars or so much
thereof as may be available on June 30, 2001, from the total amount of unspent
fiscal year 2001 state general fund appropriations is appropriated for the
purposes of RCW 43.79.460 in the manner provided in this section.

(1)
Of the total appropriated amount, one-half of that portion that is attributable
to incentive savings, not to exceed twenty-five million dollars, is
appropriated to the savings incentive account for the purpose of improving the
quality, efficiency, and effectiveness of agency services, and credited to the
agency that generated the savings.

(2)
The remainder of the total amount, not to exceed seventy-five million dollars,
is appropriated to the education savings account.

(3) For purposes of this section, the total amount of unspent state
general fund appropriations does not include the appropriations made in this
section or any amounts included in across-the-board allotment reductions under
RCW 43.88.110.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 731. RESOURCE
COST MANAGEMENT ACCOUNT LOAN. The
state treasurer is authorized, upon the request of the board of natural
resources, to transfer up to $4,000,000 from the forest development account to
the resource management cost account. The loan, together with interest at a
rate determined by the state treasurer, shall be repaid to the forest
development account by June 30, 2005.

(End of part)

PART
VIII

OTHER
TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 801. FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-STATE
REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

General
Fund Appropriation for fire insurance

premiums
distribution...................... $ 6,617,250

General
Fund Appropriation for public utility

district
excise tax distribution........... $ 35,876,898

General
Fund Appropriation for prosecuting attorneys

salaries................................... $ 2,960,000

City
Police and Fire Protection Assistance

Account
Appropriation...................... $ 95,667,000

General
Fund Appropriation for camper and travel

trailer
excise tax distribution............. $ 4,325,826

General
Fund Appropriation for boating

safety/education
and law enforcement

distribution............................... $ 3,616,000

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation

for
harbor improvement revenue distribution $ 138,000

Liquor
Excise Tax Account Appropriation for liquor

excise
tax distribution.................... $ 25,580,000

Liquor
Revolving Fund Appropriation for liquor

profits
distribution....................... $ 52,269,932

Timber
Tax Distribution Account Appropriation

for
distribution to "Timber" counties...... $ 74,025,900

Municipal
Sales and Use Tax Equalization Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 84,851,000

County
Sales and Use Tax Equalization Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 13,147,000

Death
Investigations Account Appropriation for

distribution
to counties for publicly funded

autopsies.................................. $ 1,375,332

County
Criminal Justice Account Appropriation... $........................................... 103,169,000

Municipal
Criminal Justice Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 40,269,000

County
Public Health Account Appropriation..... $ 51,520,250

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 595,408,380

The
total expenditures from the state treasury under the appropriations in this
section shall not exceed the funds available under statutory distributions for
the stated purposes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 802. FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-FEDERAL
REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

Forest
Reserve Fund Appropriation for federal forest

reserve
fund distribution.................. $ 56,150,492

General
Fund Appropriation for federal flood control

funds
distribution......................... $ 4,000

General
Fund Appropriation for federal grazing fees

distribution............................... $ 52,000

General
Fund Appropriation for distribution of

federal
funds to counties in conformance with

P.L.
97-99 Federal Aid to Counties......... $ 1,281,266

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 57,487,758

The
total expenditures from the state treasury under the appropriations in this
section shall not exceed the funds available under statutory distributions for
the stated purposes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 803. FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-TRANSFERS

General
Fund: For transfer to the Water Quality

Account.................................... $ 105,245,700

General
Fund: For transfer to the Flood Control

Assistance
Account......................... $ 4,000,000

State
Convention and Trade Center Account: For

transfer
to the State Convention and Trade

Center
Operations Account.................. $ 3,800,000

Water
Quality Account: For transfer to the Water

Pollution
Control Account. Transfers shall be

made
at intervals coinciding with deposits of

federal
capitalization grant money into the

account.
The amounts transferred shall not

exceed
the match required for each federal

deposit.................. ................. $ 16,350,000

State
Treasurer's Service Account: For transfer to

the
general fund on or before June 30, 2001, an

amount
up to $10,000,000 in excess of the cash

requirements
of the State Treasurer's Service

Account.................................... $ 10,000,000

Public
Works Assistance Account: For transfer to

the
Drinking Water Assistance Account...... $ 7,700,000

County
Sales and Use Tax Equalization Account:

For
transfer to the County Public Health

Account.................................... $ 2,577,664

Public
Health Services Account: For transfer to

the
County Public Health Account........... $ 1,056,000

State
Emergency Water Projects Revolving Account:

For
transfer to the State Drought Preparedness

Account.................................... $ 6,800,000

Tobacco
Settlement Account: For transfer to

the
Health Services Account................ $ 223,087,000

State
Toxics Control Account: For transfer to the

local
toxics control account on or before

June
30, 2001, up to $2,500,000, but not

greater
than the loan enacted in the 1999

supplemental
budget. The exact amount and

timing
of the transfer shall be determined

by
the office of financial management,

based
on state toxics control account fund

balances................................... $ 2,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 804. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS‑-TRANSFERS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation: For transfer to

the
Department of Retirement Systems Expense

Account:
For the administrative expenses

of
the judicial retirement system.......... $ 21,550

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 21,550

NEW SECTION. Sec. 805. STATE
REVENUE LITIGATION. If, following exhaustion of
all appeals, the petitioner prevails in State ex rel. Heavey v. Murphy
(supreme court cause no. 67692-5), the state treasurer shall deposit in the
state general fund such revenues from the motor vehicle excise tax as the court
shall determine.

(End of part)

PART
IX

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 901. EXPENDITURE
AUTHORIZATIONS. The appropriations contained in this act are
maximum expenditure authorizations. Pursuant to RCW 43.88.037, moneys
disbursed from the treasury on the basis of a formal loan agreement shall be
recorded as loans receivable and not as expenditures for accounting purposes.
To the extent that moneys are disbursed on a loan basis, the corresponding
appropriation shall be reduced by the amount of loan moneys disbursed from the
treasury during the 1999-01 biennium.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 902. INFORMATION
SYSTEMS PROJECTS. Agencies shall comply with
the following requirements regarding information systems projects when
specifically directed to do so by this act.

(1)
Agency planning and decisions concerning information technology shall be made
in the context of its information technology portfolio. "Information
technology portfolio" means a strategic management approach in which the
relationships between agency missions and information technology investments
can be seen and understood, such that: Technology efforts are linked to agency
objectives and business plans; the impact of new investments on existing
infrastructure and business functions are assessed and understood before
implementation; and agency activities are consistent with the development of an
integrated, nonduplicative state-wide infrastructure.

(2)
Agencies shall use their information technology portfolios in making decisions
on matters related to the following:

(a)
System refurbishment, acquisitions, and development efforts;

(b)
Setting goals and objectives for using information technology in meeting
legislatively-mandated missions and business needs;

(c)
Assessment of overall information processing performance, resources, and
capabilities;

(d)
Ensuring appropriate transfer of technological expertise for the operation of
any new systems developed using external resources; and

(e)
Progress toward enabling electronic access to public information.

(3)
The agency shall produce a feasibility study for information technology
projects at the direction of the information services board and in accordance
with published department of information services policies and guidelines. At
a minimum, such studies shall include a statement of: (a) The purpose or
impetus for change; (b) the business value to the agency, including an
examination and evaluation of benefits, advantages, and cost; (c) a
comprehensive risk assessment based on the proposed project's impact on both
citizens and state operations, its visibility, and the consequences of doing
nothing; (d) the impact on agency and state-wide information infrastructure;
and (e) the impact of the proposed enhancements to an agency's information
technology capabilities on meeting service delivery demands.

(4)
The agency shall produce a comprehensive management plan for each project. The
plan or plans shall address all factors critical to successful completion of
each project. The plan(s) shall include, but is not limited to, the following
elements: A description of the problem or opportunity that the information
technology project is intended to address; a statement of project objectives
and assumptions; a definition and schedule of phases, tasks, and activities to
be accomplished; and the estimated cost of each phase. The planning for the
phased approach shall be such that the business case justification for a
project needs to demonstrate how the project recovers cost or adds measurable
value or positive cost benefit to the agency's business functions within each
development cycle.

(5)
The agency shall produce quality assurance plans for information technology
projects. Consistent with the direction of the information services board and
the published policies and guidelines of the department of information
services, the quality assurance plan shall address all factors critical to
successful completion of the project and successful integration with the agency
and state information technology infrastructure. At a minimum, quality
assurance plans shall provide time and budget benchmarks against which project
progress can be measured, a specification of quality assurance
responsibilities, and a statement of reporting requirements. The quality
assurance plans shall set out the functionality requirements for each phase of
a project.

(6)
A copy of each feasibility study, project management plan, and quality
assurance plan shall be provided to the department of information services, the
office of financial management, and legislative fiscal committees. The plans
and studies shall demonstrate a sound business case that justifies the
investment of taxpayer funds on any new project, an assessment of the impact of
the proposed system on the existing information technology infrastructure, the
disciplined use of preventative measures to mitigate risk, and the leveraging of
private-sector expertise as needed. Authority to expend any funds for
individual information systems projects is conditioned on the approval of the
relevant feasibility study, project management plan, and quality assurance plan
by the department of information services and the office of financial
management.

(7)
Quality assurance status reports shall be submitted to the department of
information services, the office of financial management, and legislative
fiscal committees at intervals specified in the project's quality assurance
plan.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 903. VIDEO
TELECOMMUNICATIONS. The department of information
services shall act as lead agency in coordinating video telecommunications
services for state agencies. As lead agency, the department shall develop
standards and common specifications for leased and purchased telecommunications
equipment and assist state agencies in developing a video telecommunications
expenditure plan. No agency may spend any portion of any appropriation in this
act for new video telecommunication equipment, new video telecommunication
transmission, or new video telecommunication programming, or for expanding
current video telecommunication systems without first complying with chapter
43.105 RCW, including but not limited to, RCW 43.105.041(2), and without first
submitting a video telecommunications expenditure plan, in accordance with the
policies of the department of information services, for review and assessment
by the department of information services under RCW 43.105.052. Prior to any
such expenditure by a public school, a video telecommunications expenditure
plan shall be approved by the superintendent of public instruction. The office
of the superintendent of public instruction shall submit the plans to the
department of information services in a form prescribed by the department. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall coordinate the use of
video telecommunications in public schools by providing educational information
to local school districts and shall assist local school districts and
educational service districts in telecommunications planning and curriculum
development. Prior to any such expenditure by a public institution of postsecondary
education, a telecommunications expenditure plan shall be approved by the
higher education coordinating board. The higher education coordinating board
shall coordinate the use of video telecommunications for instruction and
instructional support in postsecondary education, including the review and
approval of instructional telecommunications course offerings.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 904. EMERGENCY
FUND ALLOCATIONS. Whenever allocations are made
from the governor's emergency fund appropriation to an agency that is financed
in whole or in part by other than general fund moneys, the director of
financial management may direct the repayment of such allocated amount to the
general fund from any balance in the fund or funds which finance the agency.
No appropriation shall be necessary to effect such repayment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 905. STATUTORY
APPROPRIATIONS. In addition to the amounts appropriated in this
act for revenues for distribution, state contributions to the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system, and bond retirement and
interest including ongoing bond registration and transfer charges, transfers,
interest on registered warrants, and certificates of indebtedness, there is
also appropriated such further amounts as may be required or available for
these purposes under any statutory formula or under chapters 39.94 and 39.96
RCW or any proper bond covenant made under law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 906. BOND
EXPENSES. In addition to such other appropriations as are
made by this act, there is hereby appropriated to the state finance committee
from legally available bond proceeds in the applicable construction or building
funds and accounts such amounts as are necessary to pay the expenses incurred
in the issuance and sale of the subject bonds.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 907. A
new section is added to chapter 41.45 RCW to read as follows:

RETIREMENT
CONTRIBUTION RATES. (1) The changes to the
basic state and employer contribution rates adopted by the pension funding
council for the 1999-2001 biennium shall be effective on the following dates:

(a)
The changes to the basic state contribution rate for the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system, and to the basic employer
contribution rate for the public employees' retirement system plan 1 and the
Washington state patrol retirement system shall each take effect on July 1,
1999; and

(b)
The change to the basic employer contribution rate for the teachers' retirement
system plan 1 shall take effect on September 1, 1999.

(2)
The director of the department of retirement systems shall establish new
contribution rates, to be effective July 1, 1999, for the public employees'
retirement system plan 2 and the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 2. The new rates shall be established pursuant to RCW
41.40.650 and 41.26.450 respectively. The director of the department of
retirement systems shall establish a new contribution rate, to be effective
September 1, 1999, for the teachers' retirement system plan 2. The new rate
shall be established pursuant to RCW 41.45.061.

(3)
This section expires on June 30, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 908. A
new section is added to chapter 41.45 RCW to read as follows:

PUBLIC
EMPLOYEES' RETIREMENT SYSTEM. For the period from July 1, 1999, through
June 30, 2001, in addition to the basic and supplemental employer contributions
required by RCW 41.45.060 and 41.45.070, the department of retirement systems
shall also charge all public employees' retirement system employers an
additional employer contribution rate of 0.05 percent for all members of the
public employees' retirement system.

This
section expires on June 30, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 909. VOLUNTARY
SEPARATION INCENTIVES AND OPTIONS. (1) Agencies may, subject to
the requirements of this section, offer a program of voluntary separation
and/or downshifting incentives and options as a management tool to reduce costs
and make more effective use of resources while improving employee productivity
and morale.

(2)
The office of financial management, in consultation with the department of
personnel and the department of retirement systems, shall establish procedures
and guidelines for proposed agency incentives and options. An agency which
wishes to offer incentives or options pursuant to this section shall obtain
approval from the director of financial management that the agency's proposed program
is cost-neutral or results in savings and is consistent with the procedures and
guidelines established by the office. The options which may be included in an
agency plan may include, but are not limited to, financial incentives for:
Voluntary resignation and retirement, voluntary leave-without-pay, voluntary
workweek or work hour reduction, voluntary downward movement, or temporary
separation for development purposes. No employee shall have a contractual
right to a financial incentive offered pursuant to this section.

(3)
The office of financial management may request the department of personnel and
the department of retirement systems to assist with the review and monitoring
of agency programs that are offered under this section. The office shall
submit a report by January 1, 2001, to the appropriate committees of the
legislature on the outcome of programs it approves under this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 910. VOLUNTARY
RETIREMENT INCENTIVE PROGRAMS. (1) Agencies may, subject
to the requirements of this section, implement a voluntary retirement incentive
program. No employee shall have a contractual right to a benefit provided
pursuant to this section.

(2)
An agency program adopted under this section must be cost-neutral or result in
cost savings and must be reviewed and approved by the director of financial
management prior to implementation. The office of financial management, in
consultation with the department of personnel and the department of retirement
systems, shall establish procedures and guidelines for proposed voluntary
retirement incentive programs.

(3)
Agencies participating in this authorization are required to submit a report by
January 1, 2001, to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the
office of financial management on the outcome of their approved retirement
incentive program. The report shall include information on the details of the
program including resulting service delivery changes, agency efficiencies, the
cost of the retirement incentive per participant, the total cost to the state,
and the projected or actual net dollar savings over the 1999-01 fiscal
biennium.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 911. LEGISLATIVE
FACILITIES. Notwithstanding RCW 43.01.090, the house of
representatives, the senate, and the permanent statutory committees shall pay
expenses quarterly to the department of general administration facilities and
services revolving fund for services rendered by the department for operations,
maintenance, and supplies relating to buildings, structures, and facilities
used by the legislature for the biennium beginning July 1, 1999.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 912. AGENCY
RECOVERIES. Except as otherwise provided by law,
recoveries of amounts expended pursuant to an appropriation, including but not
limited to, payments for material supplied or services rendered under chapter
39.34 RCW, may be expended as part of the original appropriation of the fund to
which such recoveries belong, without further or additional appropriation.
Such expenditures shall be subject to conditions and procedures prescribed by
the director of financial management. The director may authorize expenditure
with respect to recoveries accrued but not received, in accordance with
generally accepted accounting principles, except that such recoveries shall not
be included in revenues or expended against an appropriation for a subsequent fiscal
period. This section does not apply to the repayment of loans, except for
loans between state agencies.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 913. GENERALLY
ACCEPTED ACCOUNTING PRINCIPLES. The appropriations of
moneys and the designation of funds and accounts by this and other acts of the
1999 legislature shall be construed in a manner consistent with legislation
enacted by the 1985, 1987, 1989, 1991, 1993, 1995, and 1997 legislatures to
conform state funds and accounts with generally accepted accounting principles.

Sec.
914. RCW
41.06.152 and 1996 c 319 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The board shall adopt only those job classification revisions, class studies,
and salary adjustments under RCW 41.06.150(15) that:

(a)
Are due to documented recruitment and retention difficulties, salary
compression or inversion, increased duties and responsibilities, or inequities.
For these purposes, inequities are defined as similar work assigned to
different job classes with a salary disparity greater than 7.5 percent; and

(b)
Are such that the office of financial management has reviewed the agency's
fiscal impact statement and has concurred that the agency can absorb the
biennialized cost of the reclassification, class study, or salary adjustment
within the agency's current authorized level of funding for the current fiscal
biennium and subsequent fiscal biennia.

(2)
In addition to reclassifications, class studies, and salary adjustments under
subsection (1)(b) of this section, the board may approve other
reclassifications, class studies, and salary adjustments that meet the
requirements of subsection (1)(a) of this section and have been approved under
the procedures established under this subsection.

Before
the department of personnel's biennial budget request is due to the office of
financial management, the board shall prioritize requests for
reclassifications, class studies, and salary adjustments for the next fiscal
biennium. The board shall prioritize according to such criteria as are
developed by the board consistent with RCW 41.06.150(15)(a).

The
board shall submit the prioritized list to the governor's office and the fiscal
committees of the house of representatives and senate at the same time the
department of personnel's biennial budget request is submitted. The office of
financial management shall review the biennial cost of each proposed salary
adjustment on the board's prioritized list.

In
the biennial appropriations acts, the legislature may establish a level of
funding, from the state general fund and other accounts, to be applied by the
board to the prioritized list. Upon enactment of the appropriations act, the
board may approve reclassifications, class studies, and salary adjustments only
to the extent that the total cost does not exceed the level of funding
established in the appropriations acts and the board's actions are consistent
with the priorities established in the list. The legislature may also specify
or otherwise limit in the appropriations act the implementation dates for
actions approved by the board under this section.

(3)
When the board develops its priority list in the 1999-2001 biennium, for
increases proposed for funding in the 2001-2003 biennium, the board shall give
top priority to proposed increases to address documented recruitment and
retention increases, and shall give lowest priority to proposed increases to
recognize increased duties and responsibilities. When the board submits its
prioritized list for the 2001-2003 biennium, the board shall also provide: A
comparison of any differences between the salary increases recommended by the
department of personnel staff and those adopted by the board; a review of any
salary compression, inversion, or inequities that would result from
implementing a recommended increase; and a complete description of the
information relied upon by the board in adopting its proposals and priorities.

(4)
This section does not apply to the higher education hospital special pay plan
or to any adjustments to the classification plan under RCW 41.06.150(15) that
are due to emergent conditions. Emergent conditions are defined as emergency
conditions requiring the establishment of positions necessary for the
preservation of the public health, safety, or general welfare.

Sec.
915. RCW
43.08.250 and 1997 c 149 s 910 are each amended to read as follows:

The
money received by the state treasurer from fees, fines, forfeitures, penalties,
reimbursements or assessments by any court organized under Title 3 or 35 RCW,
or chapter 2.08 RCW, shall be deposited in the public safety and education
account which is hereby created in the state treasury. The legislature shall
appropriate the funds in the account to promote traffic safety education,
highway safety, criminal justice training, crime victims' compensation,
judicial education, the judicial information system, civil representation of
indigent persons, winter recreation parking, and state game programs. During
the fiscal biennium ending June 30, ((1999)) 2001, the
legislature may appropriate moneys from the public safety and education account
for purposes of appellate indigent defense and other operations of the
office of public defense, the criminal litigation unit of the attorney
general's office, the treatment alternatives to street crimes program, crime
victims advocacy programs, justice information network telecommunication
planning, sexual assault treatment, operations of the office of administrator
for the courts, security in the common schools, alternative school start-up
grants, programs for disruptive students, criminal justice data collection,
((and)) Washington state patrol criminal justice activities, and the
replacement of the department of corrections' offender-based tracking system.

Sec.
916. RCW
43.10.220 and 1974 ex.s. c 162 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
attorney general is authorized to expend from the antitrust revolving fund,
created by RCW 43.10.210 through 43.10.220, such funds as are necessary for the
payment of costs, expenses and charges incurred in the preparation, institution
and maintenance of antitrust actions under the state and federal antitrust
acts. During the 1999-01 fiscal biennium, the attorney general may expend
up to one million three hundred thousand dollars from the antitrust revolving
fund for the purposes of implementing a case management data processing system
for the centralized management of cases and workload, including antitrust and
other complex litigation.

Sec.
917. RCW
49.70.170 and 1986 c 310 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The worker and community right to know fund is hereby established in the
custody of the state treasurer. The department shall deposit all moneys
received under this chapter in the fund. Moneys in the fund may be spent only
for the purposes of this chapter following legislative appropriation.
Disbursements from the fund shall be on authorization of the director or the
director's designee. During the 1999-2001 fiscal biennium, moneys in the
fund may also be used by the military department for the purpose of assisting
the state emergency response commission and coordinating local emergency
planning activities. The fund is subject to the allotment procedure
provided under chapter 43.88 RCW.

(2)
The department shall assess each employer who reported ten thousand four
hundred or more worker hours in the prior calendar year an annual fee to
provide for the implementation of this chapter. The department shall
promulgate rules establishing a fee schedule for all employers who reported ten
thousand four hundred or more worker hours in the prior calendar year and are
engaged in business operations having a standard industrial classification, as
designated in the standard industrial classification manual prepared by the
federal office of management and budget, within major group numbers 01 through
08 (agriculture and forestry industries), numbers 10 through 14 (mining
industries), numbers 15 through 17 (construction industries), numbers 20
through 39 (manufacturing industries), numbers 41, 42, and 44 through 49
(transportation, communications, electric, gas, and sanitary services), number
75 (automotive repair, services, and garages), number 76 (miscellaneous repair
services), number 80 (health services), and number 82 (educational services).
The department shall establish the annual fee for each employer who reported
ten thousand four hundred or more worker hours in the prior calendar year in
industries identified by this section, provided that fees assessed shall not be
more than two dollars and fifty cents per full time equivalent employee. The
annual fee shall not exceed fifty thousand dollars. The fees shall be
collected solely from employers whose industries have been identified by rule
under this chapter. The department shall promulgate rules allowing employers
who do not have hazardous substances at their workplace to request an exemption
from the assessment and shall establish penalties for fraudulent exemption
requests. All fees collected by the department pursuant to this section shall
be collected in a cost-efficient manner and shall be deposited in the fund.

(3)
Records required by this chapter shall at all times be open to the inspection
of the director, or his designee including, the traveling auditors, agents or
assistants of the department provided for in RCW 51.16.070 and 51.48.040. The
information obtained from employer records under the provisions of this section
shall be subject to the same confidentiality requirements as set forth in RCW
51.16.070.

(4)
An employer may appeal the assessment of the fee or penalties pursuant to the
procedures set forth in Title 51 RCW and accompanying rules except that the
employer shall not have the right of appeal to superior court as provided in
Title 51 RCW. The employer from whom the fee or penalty is demanded or
enforced, may however, within thirty days of the board of industrial insurance
appeal's final order, pay the fee or penalty under written protest setting
forth all the grounds upon which such fee or penalty is claimed to be unlawful,
excessive or otherwise improper and thereafter bring an action in superior
court against the department to recover such fee or penalty or any portion of
the fee or penalty which was paid under protest.

(5)
Repayment shall be made to the general fund of any moneys appropriated by law
in order to implement this chapter.

Sec.
918. RCW
70.190.090 and 1996 c 132 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A network ((that has its membership finalized under RCW 70.190.060(4)))
shall, upon application to the council, be eligible to receive planning grants
and technical assistance from the council. However, during the 1999-01
fiscal biennium, a network that has not finalized its membership shall be eligible
to receive such grants and assistance. Planning grants may be funded
through available federal funds for family preservation services. After
receiving the planning grant the network has up to one year to submit the
long-term comprehensive plan.

(2)
The council shall enter into biennial contracts with networks as part of the
grant process. The contracts shall be consistent with available resources, and
shall be distributed in accordance with the distribution formula developed
pursuant to RCW 43.41.195, subject to the applicable matching fund requirement.

(3)
No later than February 1 of each odd-numbered year following the initial
contract between the council and a network, the council shall request from the
network its plan for the upcoming biennial contract period.

(4)
The council shall notify the networks of their allocation of available
resources at least sixty days prior to the start of a new biennial contract
period.

(5)
The networks shall, by contract, distribute funds (a) appropriated for plan
implementation by the legislature, and (b) obtained from nonstate or federal
sources. In distributing funds, the networks shall ensure that administrative
costs are held to a maximum of ten percent. However, during the 1999-01
fiscal biennium, administrative costs shall be held to a maximum of ten percent
or twenty thousand dollars, whichever is greater, exclusive of costs associated
with procurement, payroll processing, personnel functions, management,
maintenance and operation of space and property, data processing and computer
services, indirect costs, and organizational planning, consultation,
coordination, and training.

(6)
A network shall not provide services or operate programs.

(7)
A network shall file a report with the council by May 1 of each year that
includes but is not limited to the following information: Detailed
expenditures, programs under way, progress on contracted services and programs,
and successes and problems in achieving the outcomes required by RCW
70.190.130(1)(h) related to reducing the rate of state-funded out-of-home
placements and the other three at-risk behaviors covered by the comprehensive
plan and approved by the council.

Sec.
919. RCW
79.24.580 and 1997 c 149 s 913 are each amended to read as follows:

After
deduction for management costs as provided in RCW 79.64.040 and payments to
towns under RCW 79.92.110(2), all moneys received by the state from the sale or
lease of state-owned aquatic lands and from the sale of valuable material from
state-owned aquatic lands shall be deposited in the aquatic lands enhancement
account which is hereby created in the state treasury. After appropriation,
these funds shall be used solely for aquatic lands enhancement projects; for
the purchase, improvement, or protection of aquatic lands for public purposes;
for providing and improving access to such lands; and for volunteer cooperative
fish and game projects. During the fiscal biennium ending June 30, ((1999))
2001, the funds may be appropriated for boating safety, shellfish
management, enforcement, and enhancement and for developing and implementing
plans for population monitoring and restoration of native wild salmon stock.

Sec.
920. RCW
82.14.310 and 1998 c 321 s 11 (Referendum Bill No. 49, approved November 3,
1998) are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The county criminal justice assistance account is created in the state
treasury. Beginning in fiscal year 2000, the state treasurer shall transfer
into the county criminal justice assistance account from the general fund the
sum of twenty-three million two hundred thousand dollars divided into four
equal deposits occurring on July 1, October 1, January 1, and April 1. For
each fiscal year thereafter, the state treasurer shall increase the total
transfer by the fiscal growth factor, as defined in RCW 43.135.025, forecast
for that fiscal year by the office of financial management in November of the
preceding year.

(2)
The moneys deposited in the county criminal justice assistance account for
distribution under this section, less any moneys appropriated for purposes
under subsection (4) of this section, shall be distributed at such times as
distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150 and on the relative basis of each county's
funding factor as determined under this subsection.

(a)
A county's funding factor is the sum of:

(i)
The population of the county, divided by one thousand, and multiplied by
two-tenths;

(ii)
The crime rate of the county, multiplied by three-tenths; and

(iii)
The annual number of criminal cases filed in the county superior court, for
each one thousand in population, multiplied by five-tenths.

(b)
Under this section and RCW 82.14.320 and 82.14.330:

(i)
The population of the county or city shall be as last determined by the office
of financial management;

(ii)
The crime rate of the county or city is the annual occurrence of specified
criminal offenses, as calculated in the most recent annual report on crime in
Washington state as published by the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs, for each one thousand in population;

(iii)
The annual number of criminal cases filed in the county superior court shall be
determined by the most recent annual report of the courts of Washington, as
published by the office of the administrator for the courts;

(iv)
Distributions and eligibility for distributions in the 1989‑91 biennium
shall be based on 1988 figures for both the crime rate as described under (ii)
of this subsection and the annual number of criminal cases that are filed as
described under (iii) of this subsection. Future distributions shall be based
on the most recent figures for both the crime rate as described under (ii) of
this subsection and the annual number of criminal cases that are filed as
described under (iii) of this subsection.

(3)
Moneys distributed under this section shall be expended exclusively for
criminal justice purposes and shall not be used to replace or supplant existing
funding. Criminal justice purposes are defined as activities that
substantially assist the criminal justice system, which may include circumstances
where ancillary benefit to the civil or juvenile justice system occurs,
and which includes (a) domestic violence services such as those provided
by domestic violence programs, community advocates, and legal advocates, as
defined in RCW 70.123.020, and (b) during the 1999-2001 fiscal biennium,
juvenile dispositional hearings relating to petitions for at-risk youth,
truancy, and children in need of services. Existing funding for purposes
of this subsection is defined as calendar year 1989 actual operating
expenditures for criminal justice purposes. Calendar year 1989 actual
operating expenditures for criminal justice purposes exclude the following:
Expenditures for extraordinary events not likely to reoccur, changes in
contract provisions for criminal justice services, beyond the control of the
local jurisdiction receiving the services, and major nonrecurring capital
expenditures.

(4)
Not more than five percent of the funds deposited to the county criminal
justice assistance account shall be available for appropriations for
enhancements to the state patrol crime laboratory system and the continuing
costs related to these enhancements. Funds appropriated from this account for
such enhancements shall not supplant existing funds from the state general
fund.

Sec.
921. RCW
72.11.040 and 1989 c 252 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

The
cost of supervision fund is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All
receipts from assessments made under RCW 9.94A.270 and 72.04A.120 shall be
deposited into the fund. Expenditures from the fund may be used only to
support the collection of legal financial obligations. During the 1999-2001
biennium, funds from the account may also be used for costs associated with the
department's supervision of the offenders in the community. Only the
secretary of the department of corrections or the secretary's designee may
authorize expenditures from the fund. The fund is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
expenditures.

Sec.
922. RCW
69.50.520 and 1998 c 346 s 909 are each amended to read as follows:

The
violence reduction and drug enforcement account is created in the state
treasury. All designated receipts from RCW 9.41.110(8), 66.24.210(4),
66.24.290(2), 69.50.505(h)(1), 82.08.150(5), 82.24.020(2), 82.64.020, and
section 420, chapter 271, Laws of 1989 shall be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for funding services and
programs under chapter 271, Laws of 1989 and chapter 7, Laws of 1994 sp. sess.,
including state incarceration costs. Funds from the account may also be
appropriated to reimburse local governments for costs associated with
implementing criminal justice legislation including chapter 338, Laws of 1997.
During the ((1997-1999)) 1999-2001 biennium, funds from the
account may also be used for costs associated with ((conducting a feasibility
study of the department of corrections' offender-based tracking system,))
providing grants to local governments in accordance with chapter 338, Laws of
1997, and for multijurisdictional narcotics task forces. After July 1, ((1999))
2001, at least seven and one-half percent of expenditures from the
account shall be used for providing grants to community networks under chapter
70.190 RCW by the family policy council.

Sec.
923. RCW
70.105D.070 and 1998 c 346 s 905 and 1998 c 81 s 2 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:

(1)
The state toxics control account and the local toxics control account are
hereby created in the state treasury.

(2)
The following moneys shall be deposited into the state toxics control account:
(a) Those revenues which are raised by the tax imposed under RCW 82.21.030 and
which are attributable to that portion of the rate equal to thirty-three
one-hundredths of one percent; (b) the costs of remedial actions recovered
under this chapter or chapter 70.105A RCW; (c) penalties collected or recovered
under this chapter; and (d) any other money appropriated or transferred to the
account by the legislature. Moneys in the account may be used only to carry
out the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to the following
activities:

(i)
The state's responsibility for hazardous waste planning, management,
regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public education required
under chapter 70.105 RCW;

(ii)
The state's responsibility for solid waste planning, management, regulation,
enforcement, technical assistance, and public education required under chapter
70.95 RCW;

(iii)
The hazardous waste cleanup program required under this chapter;

(iv)
State matching funds required under the federal cleanup law;

(v)
Financial assistance for local programs in accordance with chapters 70.95,
70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;

(vi)
State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling, or disposal of
hazardous wastes from households, small businesses, and agriculture;

(vii)
Hazardous materials emergency response training;

(viii)
Water and environmental health protection and monitoring programs;

(ix)
Programs authorized under chapter 70.146 RCW;

(x)
A public participation program, including regional citizen advisory committees;

(xi)
Public funding to assist potentially liable persons to pay for the costs of
remedial action in compliance with cleanup standards under RCW
70.105D.030(2)(e) but only when the amount and terms of such funding are
established under a settlement agreement under RCW 70.105D.040(4) and when the
director has found that the funding will achieve both (A) a substantially more
expeditious or enhanced cleanup than would otherwise occur, and (B) the
prevention or mitigation of unfair economic hardship; and

(xii)
Development and demonstration of alternative management technologies designed
to carry out the top two hazardous waste management priorities of RCW
70.105.150.

(3)
The following moneys shall be deposited into the local toxics control account:
Those revenues which are raised by the tax imposed under RCW 82.21.030 and
which are attributable to that portion of the rate equal to thirty-seven
one-hundredths of one percent.

(a)
Moneys deposited in the local toxics control account shall be used by the
department for grants or loans to local governments for the following purposes
in descending order of priority: (i) Remedial actions; (ii) hazardous waste
plans and programs under chapter 70.105 RCW; (iii) solid waste plans and
programs under chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW; and (iv) funds
for a program to assist in the assessment and cleanup of sites of
methamphetamine production, but not to be used for the initial containment of
such sites, consistent with the responsibilities and intent of RCW 69.50.511.
Funds for plans and programs shall be allocated consistent with the priorities
and matching requirements established in chapters 70.105, 70.95C, 70.95I, and
70.95 RCW. During the ((1997-1999)) 1999-2001 fiscal biennium,
moneys in the account may also be used for the following activities:
Conducting a study of whether dioxins occur in fertilizers, soil amendments,
and soils; reviewing applications for registration of fertilizers; and
conducting a study of plant uptake of metals.

(b)
Funds may also be appropriated to the department of health to implement
programs to reduce testing requirements under the federal safe drinking water
act for public water systems. The department of health shall reimburse the
account from fees assessed under RCW 70.119A.115 by June 30, 1995.

(4)
Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, moneys
in the state and local toxics control accounts may be spent only after
appropriation by statute.

(5)
One percent of the moneys deposited into the state and local toxics control
accounts shall be allocated only for public participation grants to persons who
may be adversely affected by a release or threatened release of a hazardous
substance and to not-for-profit public interest organizations. The primary
purpose of these grants is to facilitate the participation by persons and
organizations in the investigation and remedying of releases or threatened releases
of hazardous substances and to implement the state's solid and hazardous waste
management priorities. No grant may exceed sixty thousand dollars. Grants may
be renewed annually. Moneys appropriated for public participation from either
account which are not expended at the close of any biennium shall revert to the
state toxics control account.

(6)
No moneys deposited into either the state or local toxics control account may
be used for solid waste incinerator feasibility studies, construction, maintenance,
or operation.

(7)
The department shall adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and performance.

Sec.
924. RCW
72.09.050 and 1995 c 189 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
secretary shall manage the department of corrections and shall be responsible
for the administration of adult correctional programs, including but not
limited to the operation of all state correctional institutions or facilities
used for the confinement of convicted felons. In addition, the secretary shall
have broad powers to enter into agreements with any federal agency, or any
other state, or any Washington state agency or local government providing for
the operation of any correctional facility or program for persons convicted of
felonies or misdemeanors or for juvenile offenders. Such agreements for
counties with local law and justice councils shall be required in the local law
and justice plan pursuant to RCW 72.09.300. The agreements may provide for
joint operation or operation by the department of corrections, alone, or by any
of the other governmental entities, alone. Between July 1, 1999, and June
30, 2001, the secretary may expend funds appropriated for the 1999-01 biennium
to enter into agreements with any local government or private organization in
any other state, providing for the operation of any correctional facility or
program for persons convicted of felonies. The secretary may employ
persons to aid in performing the functions and duties of the department. The
secretary may delegate any of his or her functions or duties to department
employees, including the authority to certify and maintain custody of records
and documents on file with the department. The secretary is authorized to
promulgate standards for the department of corrections within appropriation
levels authorized by the legislature.

Pursuant
to the authority granted in chapter 34.05 RCW, the secretary shall adopt rules
providing for inmate restitution when restitution is determined appropriate as
a result of a disciplinary action.

Sec.
925. RCW
82.24.027 and 1986 c 3 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is hereby levied and there shall be collected by the department of
revenue from the persons mentioned in and in the manner provided by this
chapter, an additional tax upon the sale, use, consumption, handling,
possession, or distribution of cigarettes in an amount equal to the rate of
four mills per cigarette.

(2)
The moneys collected under this section shall be deposited as follows:

(a)
For the period ending July 1, 1999, in the water quality account under RCW
70.146.030;

(b)
For the period beginning July 1, 1999, through June 30, 2001, fifty percent
into the violence reduction and drug enforcement account under RCW 69.50.520
and fifty percent into the salmon recovery account;

(c)
For the period beginning July 1, 2001, through June 30, 2021, into the
water quality account under RCW 70.146.030; and

(d)
For the period beginning July 1, 2021, in the general fund ((thereafter)).

Sec.
926. RCW
82.26.025 and 1986 c 3 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In addition to the taxes imposed under RCW 82.26.020, there is levied and there
shall be collected a tax upon the sale, use, consumption, handling, or
distribution of all tobacco products in this state at the rate of sixteen and
three-fourths percent of the wholesale sales price of such tobacco products.
Such tax shall be imposed at the time the distributor (a) brings, or causes to
be brought, into this state from without the state tobacco products for sale,
(b) makes, manufactures, or fabricates tobacco products in this state for sale
in this state, or (c) ships or transports tobacco products to retailers in this
state, to be sold by those retailers.

(2)
The moneys collected under this section shall be deposited as follows:

(a)
For the period ending July 1, 1999, in the water quality account under RCW
70.146.030;

(b)
For the period beginning July 1, 1999, through June 30, 2001, fifty percent
into the violence reduction and drug enforcement account under RCW 69.50.520
and fifty percent into the salmon recovery account;

(c)
For the period beginning July 1, 2001, through June 30, 2021, into the
water quality account under RCW 70.146.030; and

(d)
For the period beginning July 1, 2021, in the general fund ((thereafter)).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 927. A
new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW to read as follows:

TOBACCO
SETTLEMENT ACCOUNT. (1) Moneys received by the
state of Washington in accordance with the settlement of the state's legal
action against tobacco product manufacturers, exclusive of costs and attorneys'
fees, shall be deposited in the tobacco settlement account created in this
section.

(2)
The tobacco settlement account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the
tobacco settlement account may only be transferred to the health services
account for the purposes set forth in RCW 43.72.900, and to the tobacco
prevention and control account for purposes set forth in this section.

(3)
The tobacco prevention and control account is created in the state treasury.
The source of revenue for this account is moneys transferred to the account
from the tobacco settlement account, investment earnings, donations to the
account, and other revenues as directed by law. Expenditures from the account
are subject to appropriation.

(4)
The state treasurer shall transfer one hundred million dollars from the tobacco
settlement account to the tobacco prevention and control account upon
authorization of the director of financial management. The director shall
authorize transfer of the total amount by June 30, 2001.

Sec.
928. RCW
43.84.092 and 1997 c 218 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management
improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation.
The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from
the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The
office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts
as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management
improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior
to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local
leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the
local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan I account, the public employees' retirement
system plan II account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource
management cost account, the site closure account, the special wildlife
account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance
reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension
account, the teachers' retirement system plan I account, the teachers'
retirement system plan II account, the tobacco prevention and control
account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation infrastructure
account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond
retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the volunteer
fire fighters' relief and pension principal account, the volunteer fire
fighters' relief and pension administrative account, the Washington judicial
retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' system plan I retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan II retirement account, the Washington
state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building
account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital projects
account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural
permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school
fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to
be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the central Puget Sound public transportation account, the city
hardship assistance account, the county arterial preservation account, the
department of licensing services account, the economic development account, the
essential rail assistance account, the essential rail banking account, the
ferry bond retirement fund, the gasohol exemption holding account, the grade
crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account, the highway
bond retirement fund, the highway construction stabilization account, the
highway safety account, the marine operating fund, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the small city
account, the special category C account, the state patrol highway account, the
transfer relief account, the transportation capital facilities account, the
transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation
improvement account, the transportation revolving loan account, and the urban
arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

Sec.
929. RCW
43.84.092 and 1998 c 341 s 708 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations
shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4)
of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services account,
the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative
account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise
tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use
tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the
municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement system
plan I account, the public employees' retirement system plan II account, the
Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource management cost account, the
site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state
investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust
fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the teachers' retirement
system plan I account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan II and
plan III account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco
settlement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the tuition
recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the
University of Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' relief
and pension principal account, the volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension
administrative account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan I
retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan II retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement
system combined plan II and III account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State
University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund,
and the Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal
school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific
permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to
their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under
this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the central Puget Sound public transportation account, the city
hardship assistance account, the county arterial preservation account, the
department of licensing services account, the economic development account, the
essential rail assistance account, the essential rail banking account, the
ferry bond retirement fund, the gasohol exemption holding account, the grade
crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account, the highway
bond retirement fund, the highway construction stabilization account, the
highway safety account, the marine operating fund, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the small city
account, the special category C account, the state patrol highway account, the
transfer relief account, the transportation capital facilities account, the
transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation
improvement account, the transportation revolving loan account, and the urban
arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 930.
Section 928 of this act expires September 1, 2000.

Sec.
931. RCW
82.44.160 and 1995 c 28 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Before
distributing moneys to the cities and towns from the ((general fund)) city
police and fire protection assistance account, as provided in RCW 82.44.155,
and from the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, as provided in
RCW 82.14.210, the state treasurer shall, on the first day of July of each
year, make an annual deduction therefrom of a sum equal to one-half of the
biennial appropriation made pursuant to this section, which amount shall be at
least seven cents per capita of the population of all cities or towns as
legally certified on that date, determined as provided in RCW 82.44.150, which
sum shall be apportioned and transmitted to the municipal research council,
herein created. Sixty-five percent of the annual deduction shall be from the
distribution to cities and towns under RCW 82.44.155, and thirty-five percent
of the annual deduction shall be from the distribution to the municipal sales
and use tax equalization account under RCW 82.14.210. The municipal research
council may contract with and allocate moneys to any state agency, educational
institution, or private consulting firm, which in its judgment is qualified to
carry on a municipal research and service program. Moneys may be utilized to
match federal funds available for technical research and service programs to
cities and towns. Moneys allocated shall be used for studies and research in
municipal government, publications, educational, conferences, and attendance
thereat, and in furnishing technical, consultative, and field services to
cities and towns in problems relating to planning, public health, municipal
sanitation, fire protection, law enforcement, postwar improvements, and public
works, and in all matters relating to city and town government. The programs
shall be carried on and all expenditures shall be made in cooperation with the
cities and towns of the state acting through the Association of Washington Cities
by its board of directors which is hereby recognized as their official agency
or instrumentality.

Funds
((appropriated to the municipal research council)) deducted under
this section shall be ((kept)) deposited in the treasury in
the general fund, and shall be disbursed by warrant or check to contracting
parties on invoices or vouchers certified by the chair of the municipal
research council or his or her designee. Payments to public agencies may be
made in advance of actual work contracted for, in the discretion of the
council.

Sixty-five
percent of any moneys remaining unexpended or uncontracted for by the municipal
research council at the end of any fiscal biennium shall be returned to the ((general
fund)) city police and fire protection assistance account and be
paid to cities and towns under RCW 82.44.155. The remaining thirty-five
percent shall be deposited into the municipal sales and use tax equalization
account.

Sec.
932. RCW
28B.15.066 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 9 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

It
is the intent of the legislature that:

In
making appropriations from the state's general fund to institutions of higher
education, each appropriation shall conform to the following:

(1)
The appropriation shall not be reduced by the amount of operating fees revenue
estimated to be collected from students enrolled at the state-funded enrollment
level specified in the omnibus biennial operating appropriations act;

(2)
The appropriation shall not be reduced by the amount of operating fees revenue
collected from students enrolled above the state-funded level, but within the
over-enrollment limitations, specified in the omnibus biennial operating
appropriations act; and

(3) The general fund state appropriation shall not be reduced by
the amount of operating fees revenue collected as a result of waiving less
operating fees revenue than the amounts authorized under RCW 28B.15.910. State
general fund appropriations shall not be provided for revenue foregone as a
result of or for waivers granted under section 601(3)(e) of this act.

(End of part)

PART
XI

GENERAL GOVERNMENT‑-SUPPLEMENTAL
APPROPRIATIONS

Sec.
1101. 1998
c 346 s 101 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE HOUSE
OF REPRESENTATIVES

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 24,221,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((25,907,000))

25,889,000

Department
of Retirement Systems Expense

Account
Appropriation...................... $ 25,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((50,153,000))

50,135,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$75,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $75,000 of the
general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation are provided solely for the
independent operations of the legislative ethics board. Expenditure decisions
of the board, including employment of staff, shall be independent of the senate
and house of representatives.

(2)
The department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided
solely to implement the provisions relating to the actuarial audit of the
pension contribution rates in Substitute House Bill No. 2544 (funding state
retirement systems). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the
appropriation shall lapse.

(3)
$125,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely for a review of the memorandum of agreement signed between the
United States environmental protection agency and the department of ecology.
The agreement requires the department to conduct total maximum daily loads on
polluted water bodies as defined by the federal clean water act. The review
may include but is not limited to the department's program for implementing the
settlement, an examination of the decisions that affect how water quality
problems are defined, the causes of those problems, and the means by which
solutions to these problems are to be developed and implemented.

Sec.
1102. 1998
c 346 s 102 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SENATE

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 19,357,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((20,838,000))

20,826,000

Department
of Retirement Systems Expense Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 25,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((40,220,000))

40,208,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$75,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $75,000 of the
general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation are provided solely for the
independent operations of the legislative ethics board. Expenditure decisions
of the board, including employment of staff, shall be independent of the senate
and house of representatives.

(2)
$100,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 is provided
solely for a study of financial aid and tuition by the senate committee on ways
and means and the house of representatives committee on appropriations.

(a)
The study shall report on the current usage and distribution of financial aid,
investigate other resources available to financial aid recipients, and shall
compare alternative methods of financial aid distribution and their impacts on
the sectors of higher education and students served within each sector.

(b)
The study shall also provide comparative data from other states on methods of
establishing tuition rates and the relationship of tuition to state funding.

(3)
The department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided
solely to implement the provisions relating to the actuarial audit of the
pension contribution rates in Substitute House Bill No. 2544 (funding state
retirement systems). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the
appropriation shall lapse.

(4)
$25,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for the legislature and the office of financial management to
contract jointly for a performance review of the state long-term care system.
The review shall result in recommendations by October 1, 1998, on strategies
for increasing the long-term affordability and cost-effectiveness of the
system, and shall include a review of topics such as methods for matching
service levels to recipient needs, options for managing growth in entitlement
caseloads, and techniques for projecting the number of persons in need of
publicly funded services.

(5)
$125,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely for a review of the memorandum of agreement signed between the
United States environmental protection agency and the department of ecology.
The agreement requires the department to conduct total maximum daily loads on
polluted water bodies as defined by the federal clean water act. The review
may include but is not limited to the department's program for implementing the
settlement, an examination of the decisions that affect how water quality
problems are defined, the causes of those problems, and the means by which
solutions to these problems are to be developed and implemented.

Sec.
1103. 1998
c 346 s 105 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE COURT
OF APPEALS

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 10,340,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((10,307,000))

10,318,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((20,647,000))

20,658,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$271,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation is provided solely
for an additional judge position and related support staff in division I in
King county, effective July 1, 1998.

(2)
$490,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation is provided solely
for remodeling existing space in division I court facilities to house
additional staff.

Sec.
1104. 1998
c 346 s 106 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE COMMISSION
ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 692,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((714,000))

719,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION................. $ ((1,406,000))

1,411,000

Sec.
1105. 1998
c 346 s 107 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE ADMINISTRATOR
FOR THE COURTS

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 12,723,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((12,770,000))

12,217,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((27,709,000))

27,876,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-

Local
Appropriation........................ $ 2,000

Judicial
Information Systems Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((17,489,000))

17,486,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((70,691,000))

70,304,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Funding provided in the judicial information systems account appropriation
shall be used for the operations and maintenance of technology systems that
improve services provided by the supreme court, the court of appeals, the
office of public defense, and the office of the administrator for the courts.
$400,000 of the judicial information systems account appropriation is provided
solely for the year 2000 date conversion.

(2)
No moneys appropriated in this section may be expended by the administrator for
the courts for payments in excess of fifty percent of the employer contribution
on behalf of superior courts judges for insurance and health care plans and
federal social security and medicare and medical aid benefits. Consistent with
Article IV, section 13 of the state Constitution and 1996 Attorney General's
Opinion No. 2, it is the intent of the legislature that the cost of these
employer contributions shall be shared equally between the state and county or
counties in which the judges serve. The administrator for the courts shall
continue to implement procedures for the collection and disbursement of these
employer contributions.

(3)
$3,255,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for the continuation of treatment alternatives to street crimes (TASC)
programs in Pierce, Snohomish, Clark, King, Spokane, and Yakima counties.

(4)
$125,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for the workload associated with the increase in state cases filed in
Thurston county superior court.

(5)
$223,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for the gender and justice commission.

(6)
$308,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for the minority and justice commission.

(7)
$100,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $100,000 of the
general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation are provided solely for judicial
program enhancements. Within the funding provided in this subsection, the
office of administrator of courts in consultation with the supreme court shall
determine the program or programs to receive an enhancement.

(8)
$35,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation is provided solely
for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1771 (guardian
certification). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(9)
$100,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation is provided solely
for the Snohomish county preprosecution diversion program.

(10)
$175,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is provided
solely for costs associated with the publication and distribution of a judicial
voter pamphlet for the 1998 primary election.

Sec.
1106. 1998
c 346 s 108 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE OFFICE
OF PUBLIC DEFENSE

Public
Safety and Education Account

Appropriation...................... ........ $ ((12,103,000))

11,503,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The cost of defending indigent offenders in death penalty cases has escalated
significantly over the last four years. The office of public defense advisory
committee shall analyze the current methods for reimbursing private attorneys
and shall develop appropriate standards and criteria designed to control costs
and still provide indigent defendants their constitutional right to representation
at public expense. The office of public defense advisory committee shall
report its findings and recommendations to the supreme court and the
appropriate legislative committees by September 30, 1998.

(2)
$688,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely to increase the reimbursement for private attorneys providing
constitutionally mandated indigent defense in nondeath penalty cases.

Sec.
1107. 1998
c 346 s 110 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE PUBLIC
DISCLOSURE COMMISSION

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 1,568,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((1,262,000))

1,519,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((2,830,000))

3,087,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$306,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $72,000 of the
general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation are provided solely for technology
for customer service improvements.

(2)
$111,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund appropriation ((is)) and
$115,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund appropriation are provided
for attorney general services for the public disclosure commission's
investigations of the Washington education association and the building
industry association of Washington, and other cases.

Sec.
1108. 1998
c 346 s 111 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SECRETARY
OF STATE

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 7,970,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((7,899,000))

7,889,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 2,000

Archives
& Records Management Account--State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((4,032,000))

4,055,000

Archives
& Records Management Account--Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,833,000

Department
of Personnel Service Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 663,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((23,397,000))

23,412,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$2,255,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 is provided
solely to reimburse counties for the state's share of primary and general
election costs and the costs of conducting mandatory recounts on state
measures.

(2)
$2,011,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$2,536,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided
solely for the verification of initiative and referendum petitions, maintenance
of related voter registration records, and the publication and distribution of
the voters and candidates pamphlet.

(3)
$99,000 of the general fund appropriation is provided solely for the state's
participation in the United States census block boundary suggestion program.

(4)
$125,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund appropriation is provided solely
for legal advertising of state measures under RCW 29.27.072.

(5)
$45,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation is provided solely
for an economic feasibility study of a state horse park.

(6)
The election review section under chapter 29.60 RCW shall be administered in a
manner consistent with Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5565 (election procedures
review).

(7)(a)
$1,850,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is provided
solely for contracting with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel
television coverage of state government deliberations and other events of
state-wide significance during fiscal year 1999. An eligible nonprofit
organization must be formed solely for the purpose of, and be experienced in,
providing gavel-to-gavel television coverage of state government deliberations
and other events of state-wide significance and must have received a
determination of tax-exempt status under section 501(c)(3) of the federal
internal revenue code.

(b)
The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding is necessary to
ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage of public affairs. For
that purpose, the secretary of state shall enter into a four-year contract with
the nonprofit organization to provide public affairs coverage through June 30,
2002. The funding level for each year of the contract shall be based on the
amount provided in this subsection and adjusted to reflect the implicit price
deflator for the previous year. The nonprofit organization shall be required
to raise contributions or commitments to make contributions, in cash or in kind,
in an amount equal to forty percent of the state contribution.

(c)
The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent audit, an annual
financial statement, and an annual report, including benchmarks that measure
the success of the nonprofit organization in meeting the intent of the program.

(d)
No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection may be used,
directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:

(i)
Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the
legislature of the state of Washington, by any county, city, town, or other
political subdivision of the state of Washington, or by the congress, or the
adoption or rejection of any rule, standard, rate, or other legislative
enactment of any state agency;

(ii)
Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or

(iii)
Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel, lodging, meals, or
entertainment to a public officer or employee.

(8)
$280,000 of the archives and records management account--private/local
appropriation is provided solely for preserving and restoring security
microfilm.

Sec.
1109. 1998
c 346 s 113 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE
AUDITOR

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 688,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ 1,193,000

State
Auditing Services Revolving Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((12,373,000))

12,370,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((14,254,000))

14,251,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Audits of school districts by the division of municipal corporations shall
include findings regarding the accuracy of: (a) Student enrollment data; and
(b) the experience and education of the district's certified instructional
staff, as reported to the superintendent of public instruction for allocation of
state funding.

(2)
$420,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $420,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for
staff and related costs to audit special education programs that exhibit unusual
rates of growth, extraordinarily high costs, or other characteristics requiring
attention of the state safety net committee, and other school districts for
baseline purposes and to determine if there are common errors. The auditor
shall consult with the superintendent of public instruction regarding training
and other staffing assistance needed to provide expertise to the audit staff.

(3)
$250,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $250,000 of the
general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation are provided solely for the budget
and reporting system (BARS) to improve the reporting of local government fiscal
data. Audits of counties and cities by the division of municipal corporations
shall include findings regarding the completeness, accuracy, and timeliness of
BARS data reported to the state auditor's office.

(4)
The state auditor shall develop recommendations and curricula for preventing
instances of improper governmental actions as defined in chapter 42.20 RCW, the
state whistleblower act. In developing these recommendations and curricula,
the state auditor shall involve the office of financial management, office of
the attorney general, executive ethics board, department of personnel, employee
organizations, and other interested parties. These recommendations shall be
submitted to the governor and the legislature by June 30, 1998.

(5)
$120,000 of the auditing services revolving fund appropriation is provided
solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2881 (auditing
state contractors). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6)
$25,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation is provided solely
to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2831 (a joint report to
the legislature on the results of cost studies and service quality and
reliability reports from electric utilities). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. No fee may
be collected from the electric utilities for this joint report.

(7)
$10,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $490,000 of the
general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation are provided solely for staff and
related costs to: Verify the accuracy of reported school district data
submitted for state funding purposes or program audits of state funded public
school programs; and establish the specific amount of funds to be recovered
whenever the amount is not firmly established in the course of any public
school audits conducted by the state auditor's office. The results of the
audits shall be submitted to the superintendent of public instruction for
corrections of data and adjustments of funds.

Sec.
1110. 1998
c 346 s 114 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE CITIZENS'
COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 11,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((63,000))

126,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((74,000))

137,000

Sec.
1111. 1998
c 346 s 115 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL

General
Fund--State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 4,161,000

General
Fund--State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((3,831,000))

3,916,000

General
Fund--Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 2,248,000

Public
Safety and Education Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,291,000

New
Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,094,000

Legal
Services Revolving Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((125,758,000))

129,192,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((138,383,000))

141,902,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual legal services
expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for each agency receiving
legal services. The report shall be submitted to the office of financial
management and the fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives
no later than ninety days after the end of each fiscal year.

(2)
The attorney general shall include, at a minimum, the following information
with each bill sent to agencies receiving legal services: (a) The number of
hours and cost of attorney services provided during the billing period; (b)
cost of support staff services provided during the billing period; (c) attorney
general overhead and central support costs charged to the agency for the
billing period; (d) direct legal costs, such as filing and docket fees, charged
to the agency for the billing period; and (e) other costs charged to the agency
for the billing period. The attorney general may, with approval of the office
of financial management change its billing system to meet the needs of its user
agencies.

(3)
$300,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund--state appropriation ((is))
and $63,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state appropriation
are provided for a comprehensive assessment of environmental and public
health impacts and for other costs related to pursuing remedies for pollution
in the Spokane river basin.

(4)
$440,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund--state appropriation and $410,000
of the fiscal year 1999 general fund--state appropriation are provided solely
to implement the supervision management and recidivist tracking program to
allow the department of corrections and local law enforcement agencies to share
information concerning the activities of offenders on community supervision.

Sec.
1112. 1998
c 346 s 118 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE OFFICE
OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

General
Fund--State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 10,626,000

General
Fund--State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((11,160,000))

11,155,000

General
Fund--Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 23,331,000

General
Fund‑-Local Appropriation.............. $ 190,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((45,307,000))

45,302,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The office of financial management, in cooperation with the higher education
coordinating board and the state board for community and technical colleges,
shall develop long-term higher education enrollment forecasting models for
consideration by the legislature. To the extent possible, the pilot models
shall incorporate trends in demography, higher education applications, K-12
graduation rates, labor market needs, and state and national higher education
policy and economic considerations. The public institutions of education shall
cooperate in the development of models by providing any necessary data in a
timely and organized manner. The private education institutions of the state
are encouraged to participate in this effort. A preliminary report shall be
provided to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1, 1998,
and a final report shall be provided by January 15, 1999.

(2)
$139,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2880
(task force on vendor contracting practices). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3)
$250,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely to (a) contract with an outside management consultant to
review the department of fish and wildlife's financial operations and
management practices and (b) contract with an outside consultant to develop
a strategic information technology plan for the department.

(4)
$25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for the legislature and the office of financial management to
contract jointly for a performance review of the state long-term care system.
The review shall result in recommendations by October 1, 1998, on strategies
for increasing the long-term affordability and cost-effectiveness of the
system, and shall include a review of topics such as methods for matching
service levels to recipient needs, options for managing growth in entitlement
caseloads, and techniques for projecting the number of persons in need of
publicly funded services.

Sec.
1113. 1998
c 346 s 121 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS--OPERATIONS

Dependent
Care Administrative Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 357,000

Department
of Retirement Systems Expense Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((34,481,000))

34,593,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((34,838,000))

34,950,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
(($1,373,000)) $527,000 of the department of retirement systems
expense account appropriation is provided solely for the information systems
project known as the electronic document image management system. Authority to
expend this amount is conditioned on compliance with section 902 of this act.

(2)
$1,259,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely for the information systems project known as
the receivables management system. Authority to expend this amount is
conditioned on compliance with section 902 of this act.

(3)
The department of retirement systems shall complete a study examining whether
it would be cost-effective to contract out the administration functions for the
dependent care assistance program and shall report to the fiscal committees of
the legislature by December 15, 1997.

(4)
$118,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account appropriation
is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2491
(TRS/PERS plan I gain sharing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5)
$920,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account appropriation
is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 6306 (creating the
Washington school employees' retirement system). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6)
$42,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6305
(death benefits for port and university police). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7)
$74,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account appropriation
is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5030 (Washington
state patrol survivor benefits). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8)
$38,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account appropriation
is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1024 (PERS 1 and TRS
1 options). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided
in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec.
1114. 1997
c 149 s 140 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

General
Fund--State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 1,302,000

General
Fund--State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((1,278,000))

1,223,000

General
Fund--Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 2,402,000

General
Fund--Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 400,000

Motor
Transport Account Appropriation.......... $ 14,120,000

Air
Pollution Control Account Appropriation.... $ 391,000

General
Administration Facilities and Services

Revolving
Account Appropriation............. $ 22,299,000

Central
Stores Revolving Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,306,000

Energy
Efficiency Services Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 180,000

Risk
Management Account Appropriation.......... $ 2,328,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((48,006,000))

47,951,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$1,200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$1,200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for the purchase of food for distribution to the state's food
assistance network and related expenses.

(2)
$25,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 is
provided solely for the World War II memorial on the condition that the
currently approved design for the World War II memorial be sited on the
location selected by the World War II advisory committee and approved and
recommended by the capitol campus design advisory committee. This site is
immediately south of the Columbia street and 11th avenue axial on the west
capitol campus.

(3)
Except for the World War II memorial, no additional monuments may be placed on
the capitol campus until the completion of the capitol campus monuments and
memorial policy by the department of general administration, adoption of the
policy by the state capitol committee, and inclusion of the policy in the
department of general administration's administrative code.

(4)
The department shall not purchase any travel product for any state employee or
state official from a vendor who is not a Washington-based seller of travel
licensed under chapter 19.138 RCW.

(5)
The department shall study the state motor pool vehicle fleet to develop a plan
for meeting and exceeding the minimum vehicle mileage standards established by
the federal government. The department shall report its findings and
conclusions to the appropriate legislative committees by December 1, 1997.

(6)
The department shall sell or contract for sale all surplus motor pool fleet
vehicles and shall, when cost effective, contract out for the reconditioning,
transport, and delivery of the vehicles prior to their sale at auction.

Sec.
1115. 1998
c 346 s 117 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

General
Fund--State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 57,078,000

General
Fund--State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((61,451,000))

62,402,000

General
Fund--Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 164,000,000

General
Fund--Private/Local Appropriation.. ... $ 6,903,000

Public
Safety and Education Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 8,720,000

Public
Works Assistance Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,223,000

Building
Code Council Account Appropriation.... $ 1,366,000

Administrative
Contingency Account

Appropriation............ ................. $ 1,776,000

Low-Income
Weatherization Assistance Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 923,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 6,042,000

Manufactured
Home Installation Training Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 250,000

Washington
Housing Trust Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 7,999,000

Public
Facility Construction Loan Revolving Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 515,000

Clean
Washington Account Appropriation (FY 1998) $ 11,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((319,257,000))

320,208,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$2,962,500 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $3,602,500 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for a contract with the Washington technology center.
For work essential to the mission of the Washington technology center and
conducted in partnership with universities, the center shall not pay any
increased indirect rate nor increases in other indirect charges above the
absolute amount paid during the 1995-97 biennium.

(2)
$155,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$445,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for a contract with the Washington manufacturing extension
partnership.

(3)
$9,964,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is provided solely for
the drug control and system improvement formula grant program, to be
distributed in state fiscal year 1998 as follows:

(a)
$3,603,250 to local units of governments to continue the multi-jurisdictional
narcotics task forces;

(b)
$500,000 to the department to continue the state-wide drug prosecution
assistance program in support of multijurisdictional narcotics task forces;

(c)
$1,306,075 to the Washington state patrol for coordination, investigative, and
supervisory support to the multijurisdictional narcotics task forces and for
methamphetamine education and response;

(d)
$240,000 to the department for grants to support tribal law enforcement needs;

(e)
$900,000 to drug courts in eastern and western Washington;

(f)
$300,000 to the department for grants to provide sentencing alternatives
training programs to defenders;

(g)
$200,000 for grants to support substance-abuse treatment in county jails;

(h)
$517,075 to the department for legal advocacy for victims of domestic violence
and for training of local law enforcement officers and prosecutors on domestic violence
laws and procedures;

(i)
$903,000 to the department to continue youth violence prevention and
intervention projects;

(j)
$91,000 for the governor's council on substance abuse;

(k)
$99,000 for program evaluation and monitoring;

(l)
$100,000 for the department of corrections for a feasibility study of replacing
or updating the offender based tracking system.

(m)
$498,200 for development of a state-wide system to track criminal history
records; and

(n)
No more than $706,400 to the department for grant administration and
reporting.

These
amounts represent the maximum Byrne grant expenditure authority for each
program. No program may expend Byrne grant funds in excess of the amounts
provided in this section. If moneys in excess of those appropriated in this
section become available, whether from prior or current fiscal year Byrne grant
distributions, the department shall hold these moneys in reserve and may not
expend them without a specific appropriation. These moneys shall be carried
forward and applied to the pool of moneys available for appropriation for
programs and projects in the succeeding fiscal year. As part of its budget
request for the succeeding fiscal year, the department shall estimate and
request authority to spend any funds remaining in reserve as a result of this
subsection.

(4)
$11,715,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided solely
for the drug control and system improvement formula grant program, to be
distributed in state fiscal year 1999 as follows:

(a)
$3,878,250 to local units of government to continue multijurisdictional
narcotics task forces;

(b)
$531,000 to the department to continue the drug prosecution assistance program
in support of multijurisdictional narcotics task forces;

(c)
$1,363,075 to the Washington state patrol for coordination, investigative, and
supervisory support to the multijurisdictional narcotics task forces and for
methamphetamine education and response;

(d)
$256,000 to the department for grants to support tribal law enforcement needs;

(e)
$1,093,000 to drug courts in eastern and western Washington;

(f)
$312,000 to the department for grants assisting in the development, conduct,
and training on sentencing alternatives;

(g)
$261,000 to the department to continue a substance-abuse treatment in jails
program, to test the effect of treatment on future criminal behavior;

(h)
$581,075 to the department to continue domestic violence legal advocacy;

(i)
$949,000 to the department to continue youth violence prevention and
intervention projects;

(j)
$91,000 to the department to continue the governor's council on substance
abuse;

(k)
$99,000 to the department to continue evaluation of Byrne formula grant
programs;

(l)
$1,496,200 to the office of financial management for the criminal history
records improvement program; and

(m)
$804,400 to the department for required grant administration, monitoring and
reporting on Byrne formula grant programs.

These
amounts represent the maximum Byrne grant expenditure authority for each
program. No program may expend Byrne grant funds in excess of the amounts
provided in this subsection. If moneys in excess of those appropriated in this
subsection become available, whether from prior or current fiscal year Byrne
grant distributions, the department shall hold these moneys in reserve and may
not expend them without specific appropriation. These moneys shall be carried
forward and applied to the pool of moneys available for appropriation for programs
and projects in the succeeding fiscal year. As part of its budget request for
the succeeding year, the department shall estimate and request authority to
spend any funds remaining in reserve as a result of this subsection.

(5)
$1,000,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $1,000,000 of
the general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation are provided solely to
implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1576 (buildable lands) or Senate
Bill No. 6094 (growth management). If neither bill is enacted by June 30,
1997, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6)
$4,766,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation, $1,000,000
of the fiscal year 1998 general fund‑-state appropriation, and $1,034,000
of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state appropriation are provided
solely for indigent civil legal representation services contracts and contracts
administration. The amounts provided in this subsection are contingent upon
enactment of section 2 of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2276 (civil legal
services for indigent persons). If section 2 of the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 1997, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7)
$643,000 of the general fund--state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $643,000
of the general fund--state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are provided solely
to increase payment rates for contracted early childhood education assistance
program providers. It is the legislature's intent that these amounts shall be
used primarily to increase compensation for persons employed in direct,
front-line service delivery.

(8)
$75,000 of the general fund--state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $75,000
of the general fund--state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are provided solely
as a grant for the community connections program in Walla Walla county.

(9)
$300,000 of the general fund--state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $300,000
of the general fund--state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are provided solely
to contract with the Washington state association of court-appointed special
advocates/guardians ad litem (CASA/GAL) to establish pilot programs in three
counties to recruit additional community volunteers to represent the interests
of children in dependency proceedings. Of this amount, a maximum of $30,000
shall be used by the department to contract for an evaluation of the
effectiveness of CASA/GAL in improving outcomes for dependent children. The
evaluation shall address the cost-effectiveness of CASA/GAL and to the extent
possible, identify savings in other programs of the state budget where the
savings resulted from the efforts of the CASA/GAL volunteers. The department
shall report to the governor and legislature by October 15, 1998.

(10)
$75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely for state sponsorship of the "BIO 99" international
biotechnology conference and exhibition in the Seattle area in 1999.

(11)
$698,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998,
$697,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999, and
$1,101,000 of the administrative contingency account appropriation are provided
solely for contracting with associate development organizations.

(12)
$50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely to expand the long-term care ombudsman program.

(13)
$60,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$60,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for implementation of the Puget Sound work plan action item
DCTED-01.

(14)
$20,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 is provided
solely for a task force on tourism promotion and development. The task force
shall report to the legislature on its findings and recommendations by January
31, 1998.

(15)
$61,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$60,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for the pacific northwest economic region (PNWER).

(16)
$123,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $124,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for the community development finance program.

(17)
Within the appropriations provided in this section, the department shall
conduct a study of possible financial incentives to assist in revitalization of
commercial areas and report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by November 15, 1997.

(((19)))
(18) $1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 1999 is provided solely for the development of housing for
low-income temporary or migrant farm workers through grants awarded after the
effective date of this act. The legislature finds that providing housing for
low-income temporary or migrant workers is a public purpose. The department shall
prioritize grants and shall award grants on a competitive basis to local
governments, nonprofit corporations, or other nonprofit entities. Grant moneys
awarded by the department under this subsection may be matched by nonstate
sources on a dollar-for-dollar basis, in cash or in-kind. Of the amount
provided in this subsection, $100,000 is provided solely for restroom and
shower facilities at the Horn Rapids Park in Benton county; no match need be
provided for this project. The amount provided in this subsection is
contingent upon enactment of sections 1 through 8 of Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6168. If any of these sections of the bill are not enacted by June
30, 1998, this subsection is null and void, and the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse. Any amounts provided in this subsection not committed
to grants by June 30, 1999, shall lapse.

(((20)))
(19) $275,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1999 is provided solely for coastal erosion project grants to the city of
Ocean Shores.

(((21)))
(20) $191,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1999 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill
No. 2556 (child abuse prevention and treatment). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((22)))
(21) $965,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1999 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill
No 6655 (Spokane intercollegiate research and technology institute).

(((23)))
(22) $92,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6560 (electric power customer rights). For any portion of the
appropriation that is expended for contracted services, the department shall:
(a) Form an advisory committee consisting of representatives from public
utility districts and residential, commercial, and industrial customers; and
(b) submit for review and approval by the advisory committee the request for
proposal and selection of the successful bidder or bidders. If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((24)))
(23) $383,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1999 is provided solely for the emergency food assistance program.

(((25)))
(24) $120,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1999 is provided solely for grants to licensed overnight youth shelters
for the purpose of assisting the shelters in meeting the minimum requirements
for receiving a license under chapter 74.15 RCW. The department may provide
grants of up to twenty thousand dollars per year for each shelter. Only
shelters that are currently licensed are eligible to receive the grants. Funds
may be used for the following purposes, including but not limited to:
Additional staff, food, facility maintenance, or beds, provided that these costs
are necessary to meet the licensing and facility standards adopted by the
department of social and health services. For purposes of this subsection,
"overnight youth shelter" means a licensed facility operated by a
nonprofit agency that provides overnight shelter to homeless or runaway youth
because of family problems or dysfunctions.

(((26)))
(25) $27,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1999 is provided solely for the sexual assault program within the office
of crime victims advocacy.

(((27)))
(26) $37,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
1998 and $128,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1999 are provided solely for deposit in the state trade fair fund. If
Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6562 is not enacted by June 30,
1998, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((28)))
(27) $1,100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 1999 is provided solely for the early childhood education and
assistance program.

(28)
$1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
is provided solely for warehouse space and equipment and other purchases
necessary to store food acquired under the emergency food assistance program.

Sec.
1116. 1997
c 149 s 143 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE BOARD
OF ACCOUNTANCY

Certified
Public Accountants' Account

Appropriation................................... $ ((978,000))

1,001,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations: $22,000 of the certified public accountants' account
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed House Bill
No. 3901 (implementing welfare reform). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
1997, the amount provided shall lapse.

Sec.
1117. 1998
c 346 s 128 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE MILITARY
DEPARTMENT

General
Fund--State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 8,602,000

General
Fund--State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((9,390,000))

21,863,000

General
Fund--Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((34,314,000))

34,304,000

General
Fund--Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 238,000

Flood
Control Assistance Account Appropriation. $ 3,000,000

Enhanced
911 Account Appropriation............. $ ((26,782,000))

29,392,000

Disaster
Response Account‑-State Appropriation. $ ((25,487,000))

29,810,000

Disaster
Response Account‑-Federal Appropriation $ ((110,812,000))

139,285,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((218,625,000))

266,494,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$365,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998,
(($1,145,000)) $12,798,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 1999, $3,000,000 of the flood control assistance
account appropriation, and $6,197,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for deposit in the disaster response account
to cover costs pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

(2)
(($25,122,000)) $27,996,000 of the disaster response
account--state appropriation is provided ((solely)) for the state share
of response and recovery costs associated with federal emergency management
agency (FEMA) disaster number 1079 (November/December 1995 storms), FEMA
disaster 1100 (February 1996 floods), FEMA disaster 1152 (November 1996 ice
storm), FEMA disaster 1159 (December 1996 holiday storm), FEMA disaster 1172 (March
1997 floods), FEMA disaster 1252 (1998 northeast counties floods), FEMA
disaster 1255 (1998 Kelso landslide), and to assist local governmental
entities with the matching funds necessary to earn FEMA funds for FEMA disaster
1100 (February 1996 floods), or, after approval by the director of financial
management, the state share of response and recovery costs associated with FEMA
declared disasters occurring between February 1, 1999, and June 30, 1999.
(($356,000)) $1,805,000 of the disaster response account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for fire mobilization costs. $9,000 of the
disaster response account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for
costs associated with FEMA disaster 1182 (Pend Oreille county 1997 spring
flood). The military department may, upon approval of the director of the
office of financial management, use portions of the disaster response account‑-state
appropriation to offset costs of new disasters occurring before June 30, 1999.

(3)
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of a conditional scholarship program
pursuant to chapter 28B.103 RCW.

(4)
$35,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$35,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely for the north county emergency medical service.

(5)
$36,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$72,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely for emergency worker claims pursuant to chapter 38.52 RCW.

(6)
$825,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely for reimbursement of costs associated with activation of the
Washington national guard for preserving the peace at the July 1998 Makah days
celebration.

(7) $2,610,000 of the enhanced 911 account appropriation is
provided solely for salary assistance to counties with populations under
seventy-five thousand in conformance with chapter 304, Laws of 1998 (Substitute
House Bill No. 1126). The military department, in consultation with the
enhanced 911 advisory committee, shall develop criteria for providing salary
assistance which shall be based on, but not limited to, the following: (a) The
additional staffing costs incurred by public safety answering points directly
related to providing enhanced 911 services; (b) disproportionate fiscal impact
relative to the county budget for providing enhanced 911 services; and (c) the
most efficient and cost-effective way to provide enhanced 911 service.

(End of part)

PART
XII

HUMAN SERVICES‑-SUPPLEMENTAL
APPROPRIATIONS

Sec.
1201. 1998
c 346 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES. (1) Appropriations made in
this act to the department of social and health services shall initially be
allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not
include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly
provided in subsection (3) of this section, nor shall allotment modifications
permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for
other than that purpose except as expressly provided in subsection (3) of
this section.

(2)
The department of social and health services shall not initiate any services
that will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly
authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and
spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in
this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state
moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the
department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys
shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation
providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state
general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this
subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative
fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal
moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not
require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula
basis by state funds.

(3)(a)
The appropriations to the department of social and health services in chapters
149 and 454, Laws of 1997, as amended, shall be expended for the programs and
in the amounts specified therein. However, after May 1, 1998, unless
specifically prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fund‑-state
appropriations for fiscal year 1998 among programs after approval by the
director of financial management. ((However, the department shall not
transfer general fund‑-state appropriations from the economic services
program for the 1997-99 fiscal biennium.))

(b)
After May 1, 1999, after approval by the director of financial management
and unless specifically prohibited by this act, the department may transfer
moneys among programs, including federal moneys that are provided solely for a
specified purpose. However, the department shall not transfer state moneys
that are provided solely for a specified purpose except as expressly provided
in subsection (3)(d) of this section.

(c)
To the extent that the transfer of appropriations under subsection (a) of this
section is insufficient to fund actual expenditures in fiscal year 1998 in the
medical assistance program that exceed the expenditures projected in the
November 1997 medical assistance caseload forecast, the department may transfer
general fund appropriations, not to exceed five million dollars, within the
medical assistance program from fiscal year 1999 into fiscal year 1998.

(((c)))
(d) To the extent that transfers under subsection (3)(b) of this section are
insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of fiscal year 1999 caseload
forecasts and utilization assumptions in the medical assistance, long term
care, foster care, adoption support, and child support programs, the department
may transfer state moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose
after approval by the director of financial management.

(e)
The director of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal
committees of the senate and house of representatives in writing prior to
approving any allotment modifications.

Sec.
1202. 1998
c 346 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-CHILDREN
AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 201,453,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((213,035,000))

197,003,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((252,300,000))

293,509,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 400,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,332,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((671,520,000))

696,697,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$16,510,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
((and $17,508,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1999 are)) is provided solely for purposes consistent with the
maintenance of effort requirements under the federal temporary assistance for
needy families program established under P.L. 104-193.

(2)
$4,332,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation
and $3,733,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for the operation of the family policy council, the community public
health and safety networks, and delivery of services authorized under the
federal family preservation and support act. Within the funds provided, the
family policy council shall contract for an evaluation of the community
networks with the institute for public policy and shall provide for audits of
ten networks. Within the funds provided, the family policy council may build
and maintain a geographic information system database tied to community network
geography.

(3)
$577,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$577,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely to contract for the operation of one pediatric interim care
facility. The facility shall provide residential care for up to twelve
children through two years of age. Seventy-five percent of the children served
by the facility must be in need of special care as a result of substance abuse
by their mothers. The facility also shall provide on-site training to
biological, adoptive, or foster parents. The facility shall provide at least
three months of consultation and support to parents accepting placement of
children from the facility. The facility may recruit new and current foster
and adoptive parents for infants served by the facility. The department shall
not require case management as a condition of the contract.

(4)
$481,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$481,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely for up to three nonfacility-based programs for the training,
consultation, support, and recruitment of biological, foster, and adoptive
parents of children through age three in need of special care as a result of
substance abuse by their mothers, except that each program may serve up to
three medically fragile nonsubstance-abuse-affected children. In selecting
nonfacility-based programs, preference shall be given to programs whose federal
or private funding sources have expired or that have successfully performed
under the existing pediatric interim care program.

(5)
$640,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $640,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely to fund Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5710
(juvenile care and treatment), including section 2 of the bill. Amounts
provided in this subsection to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5710
must be used to serve families who are screened from the child protective
services risk assessment process. Services shall be provided through contracts
with community-based organizations. If neither bill is enacted by June 30,
1997, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6)
$594,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998,
$556,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999,
and $290,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely to fund the provisions of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No.
2046 (foster parent liaison). The department shall establish a foster parent
liaison in each department of social and health services region of the state
and contract with a private provider to implement a recruitment and retention
program for foster parents and adoptive families. The department shall provide
a minimum of two hundred additional adoptive and foster home placements by June
30, 1998. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amounts in this
subsection shall lapse.

(7)
$433,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund‑-state appropriation,
$395,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state appropriation, and
$894,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely
to increase the rate paid to private child-placing agencies.

(8)
$580,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$580,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
are provided solely for development and expansion of child care training
requirements and optional training programs. The department shall adopt rules
to require annual training in early childhood development of all directors,
supervisors, and lead staff at child care facilities. Directors, supervisors,
and lead staff at child care facilities include persons licensed as family
child care providers, and persons employed at child care centers or school age
child care centers. The department shall establish a program to fund
scholarships and grants to assist persons in meeting these training
requirements. The department shall also develop criteria for approving
training programs and establish a system for tracking who has received the
required level of training. In adopting rules, developing curricula, setting
up systems, and administering scholarship programs, the department shall
consult with the child care coordinating committee and other community
stakeholders.

(9)
The department shall provide a report to the legislature by November 1997 on
the growth in additional rates paid to foster parents beyond the basic monthly
rate. This report shall explain why exceptional, personal, and special rates
are being paid for an increasing number of children and why the amount paid for
these rates per child has risen in recent years. This report must also
recommend methods by which the legislature may improve the current foster
parent compensation system, allow for some method of controlling the growth in
costs per case, and improve the department's and the legislature's ability to
forecast the program's needs in future years.

(10)
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for legal costs associated with the defense of vendors
operating a secure treatment facility, for actions arising from the good faith
performance of treatment services for behavioral difficulties or needs.

(11)
$2,745,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund‑-state appropriation,
$2,745,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state appropriation, and
$1,944,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely
for the category of services titled "intensive family preservation
services."

(12)
$1,642,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund‑-state appropriation and
$1,207,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state appropriation and
$1,551,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely
to continue existing continuum of care and street youth projects.

(13)
$1,456,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998,
$1,474,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
and $1,141,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for the improvement of quality and capacity of the child care system and
related consumer education. The activities funded by this appropriation shall
include, but not be limited to: Expansion of child care resource and referral
network services to serve additional families, to provide technical assistance
to child care providers, and to cover currently unserved areas of the state;
development of and incentives for child care during nonstandard work hours; and
the development of care for infants, toddlers, preschoolers, and school age
youth. These amounts are provided in addition to funding for child care
training and fire inspections of child care facilities. These activities shall
also improve the quality and capacity of the child care system.

(14)(a)
$6,565,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $7,454,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for distribution to county juvenile court
administrators to fund the costs of processing truancy, children in need of
services, and at-risk youth petitions. The department shall not retain any
portion of these funds to cover administrative or any other departmental
costs. The department, in conjunction with the juvenile court administrators,
shall develop an equitable funding distribution formula. The formula shall
neither reward counties with higher than average per petition processing costs
nor shall it penalize counties with lower than average per petition processing
costs.

(b)
Each quarter during the 1997-1999 fiscal biennium, each county shall report the
number of petitions processed and the total costs of processing the petitions
in each of the following categories: Truancy, children in need of services,
and at-risk youth. Counties shall submit the reports to the department no
later than 45 days after the end of the quarter. The department shall forward
this information to the chair and ranking minority member of the house
appropriations committee and the senate ways and means committee no later than
60 days after a quarter ends. These reports are deemed informational in nature
and are not for the purpose of distributing funds.

(15)
$70,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for foster parent intervention support teams.

(16)
$255,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
and $67,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2556 (child abuse
prevention and treatment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(17)
The department and the attorney general shall jointly make recommendations to
the legislature to reduce or limit the state's liability for damages in child
welfare cases, including shelter care and dependency proceedings. The
recommendations shall be submitted to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 1998.

(18)
To the extent funds are available, the department shall pay the expense of
fingerprint criminal history record checks for low-income family day care homes
through the federal bureau of investigation. The department may promulgate
rules to set eligibility levels.

(19)
Sufficient funding is provided in this section to implement Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6238 (dependent children).

Sec.
1203. 1998
c 346 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-JUVENILE
REHABILITATION PROGRAM

(1)
COMMUNITY SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 35,894,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((35,522,000))

34,366,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((13,365,000))

8,701,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 378,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 14,080,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((99,239,000))

93,419,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
$527,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation
is provided solely for deposit in the county criminal justice assistance
account solely for costs to the criminal justice system associated with the
implementation of Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 3900 (revising the
juvenile code). If Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 3900 is not
enacted by June 30, 1997, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
The amount provided in this subsection is intended to provide funding for
county adult court costs associated with the implementation of Engrossed Third
Substitute House Bill No. 3900 and shall be distributed in accordance with RCW
82.14.310.

(b)
$2,917,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account is provided
solely for the implementation of Engrossed Third Substitute Senate Bill No.
3900 (revising the juvenile code). The amount provided in this subsection is
intended to provide funding for county impacts associated with the implementation
of Third Substitute Senate Bill No. 3900 and shall be distributed to counties
as prescribed in the current consolidated juvenile services (CJS) formula. If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amounts provided shall lapse.

(c)
$2,350,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$2,350,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely for an early intervention program to be administered at the
county level. Moneys shall be awarded on a competitive basis to counties that
have submitted plans for implementation of an early intervention program
consistent with proven methodologies currently in place in the state. The
juvenile rehabilitation administration shall develop criteria for evaluation of
plans submitted and a timeline for awarding funding and shall assist counties
in creating and submitting plans for evaluation.

(d)
$1,221,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement appropriation is
provided solely to implement alcohol and substance abuse treatment for locally
committed offenders. The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall award
these moneys on a competitive basis to counties that have submitted a plan for
the provision of treatment services approved by the division of alcohol and
substance abuse. The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall develop
criteria for evaluation of plans submitted and a timeline for awarding funding
and shall assist counties in creating and submitting plans for evaluation. If
Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 3900 (juvenile code revisions) is not
enacted by June 30, 1997, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(e)
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely for the juvenile rehabilitation administration to contract with
the institute for public policy for the responsibilities assigned in Engrossed
Third Substitute House Bill No. 3900 (juvenile code revisions). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(f)
$400,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation
is provided solely for the development of standards measuring the effectiveness
of chemical dependency treatment and for conducting evaluations of chemical
dependency programs pursuant to Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 3900
(revising the juvenile code). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. The juvenile rehabilitation
administration shall consult with the division of alcohol and substance abuse
and contract with the University of Washington to develop the standards and
conduct the evaluations.

(g)
$150,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$150,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely for a contract to expand the services of the teamchild project
to additional sites. Priority use of these funds shall be to provide teamchild
service to early repeat offenders to help ensure they receive appropriate child
welfare and educational services.

(h)
$2,700,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation
is provided solely to implement community juvenile accountability grants
pursuant to chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile justice). Funds provided in
this subsection may be used solely for community juvenile accountability
grants, administration of the grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the
grants.

(i)
(($2,175,000)) $1,185,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is provided solely for the implementation of
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6445 (child community facility placement).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse. The funds are intended to improve the security of
state-operated and privately contracted group homes. By June 30, 1999, the
juvenile rehabilitation administration shall report to the appropriate policy
and fiscal committees of the legislature on the specific actions, and the cost
of each action, taken to improve security at both state-operated and contracted
group homes.

(j)
$150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely for the Skagit county delinquency prevention project.

(2)
INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 43,909,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((45,977,000))

42,912,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 727,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 15,281,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((105,894,000))

102,829,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
$3,680,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Third Substitute House
Bill No. 3900 (juvenile code revisions). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 1997, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(b)
$105,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $377,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for costs associated with implementing chapter 386,
Laws of 1997 (juvenile care and treatment).

(c)
$44,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1172 (sex offender registration).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(3)
PROGRAM SUPPORT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 1,930,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ 1,654,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $ 156,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 421,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 4,161,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
$92,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$36,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5759 (risk
classification). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amounts
provided shall lapse.

(b)
$206,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5710 (juvenile care and treatment). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 1997, the amount provided shall lapse.

(c)
$97,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $36,000
of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are provided
solely for the implementation of Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 3900
(juvenile code revisions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the
amounts provided shall lapse.

(d)
Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the juvenile rehabilitation
administration (JRA) shall develop by January 1, 1998, a staffing model for
noncustody functions at JRA institutions and work camps. The models should,
whenever possible, reflect the most efficient practices currently being used
within the system.

(e)
$15,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$175,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
are provided solely for the study required in Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
6445 (child community facility placement). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 1998, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration (JRA) shall contract with the institute for
public policy for the studies required by the bill.

Sec.
1204. 1998
c 346 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-MENTAL
HEALTH PROGRAM

(1)
COMMUNITY SERVICES/REGIONAL SUPPORT NETWORKS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 170,940,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((173,645,000))

168,663,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((299,651,000))

287,989,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 4,000,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((648,236,000))

631,592,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
Regional support networks shall use portions of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for implementation of working agreements with the vocational
rehabilitation program which will maximize the use of federal funding for
vocational programs.

(b)
From the general fund‑-state appropriations in this subsection, the
secretary of social and health services shall assure that regional support
networks reimburse the aging and adult services program for the general fund‑-state
cost of medicaid personal care services that enrolled regional support network
consumers use because of their psychiatric disability.

(c)
$1,304,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998,
$3,356,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999,
and $5,056,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely
for distribution to those regional support networks whose 1997-99 allocation
would otherwise be less than the regional support network would receive if all
funding appropriated in this subsection (1) of this section for medicaid
outpatient mental health services were distributed among all regional support
networks at the state-wide average per capita rate for each eligibility
category.

(d)
At least thirty days prior to entering contracts that would capitate payments
for voluntary psychiatric hospitalizations, the mental health division shall
report the proposed capitation rates, and the assumptions and calculations by
which they were established, to the budget and forecasting divisions of the
office of financial management, the appropriations committee of the house of
representatives, and the ways and means committee of the senate.

(e)
$533,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
and $587,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for the implementation of the Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6214
(mentally ill commitment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2)
INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 62,368,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((60,698,000))

61,605,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((133,504,000))

136,682,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ ((25,007,000))

26,692,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((281,577,000))

287,347,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
The state mental hospitals may use funds appropriated in this subsection to
purchase goods and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations
when it is cost-effective to do so.

(b)
The mental health program at Western state hospital shall continue to use labor
provided by the Tacoma prerelease program of the department of corrections.

(c)
$246,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$318,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely for funding outside medical costs. The mental health division
shall provide a report on outside medical costs to the fiscal committees of the
legislature by September 30, 1998, and September 30, 1999. The report shall
detail the monthly and per capita expenditures for outside medical costs at
each state hospital.

(d)
$256,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$254,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely for funding pharmacy and new drug costs. The mental health
division shall provide a report on pharmacy and new drug costs to the fiscal
committees of the legislature by September 30, 1998, and September 30, 1999.
The report shall detail monthly and per capita expenditures for pharmacy and
new drug costs for each state hospital. Expenditures for each new generation
atypical antipsychotic medication including clozapine, resperidone, olanzapine,
and any newly introduced medications of this nature shall be specifically
reported.

(e)
$1,700,000 of the general fund‑‑state fiscal year 1998
appropriation is provided solely for replacing lost federal revenues in fiscal
year 1998 due to a changed definition of discharge for medicare reimbursement
purposes. The mental health division must aggressively pursue the prompt
resolution of issues resulting in this loss of revenues with the federal health
care financing administration. In the event any or all of the lost federal
revenues are restored, an equal amount of the general fund‑‑state
fiscal year 1998 appropriation shall lapse.

(f)
Within the funds provided in this section, the mental health division shall
develop by October 1, 1998, a staffing model for direct and indirect functions
for the wards at each of the state hospitals. The model should, whenever
possible, reflect the most efficient practices for providing treatment and
therapeutic services appropriate to the characteristics and needs of the
individual patient.

(g)
$1,508,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999,
$92,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation, and $107,000 of the
general fund private/local appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of the Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6214 (mentally ill
commitment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the amounts provided
in this subsection shall lapse.

(3)
CIVIL COMMITMENT

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 7,174,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((7,779,000))

8,079,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((14,953,000))

15,253,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: (((a))) $2,088,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal
year 1998 appropriation and $2,415,000 of the general fund-‑state fiscal
year 1999 appropriation are provided solely for court-related costs for
residents at the special commitment center.

(4)
SPECIAL PROJECTS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 50,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((450,000))

5,233,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 3,826,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((4,326,000))

9,109,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$450,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
are provided solely for development and operation of the pilot project for
mentally ill offenders described in Substitute Senate Bill No. 6002 (mentally
ill offenders). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amounts
provided shall lapse.

(b)
$4,783,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for payment of back wages and benefits as required by the
judgment in Johanson and the Washington Federation of State Employees v.
State of Washington (Thurston county superior court cause no.
94-2-01459-2).

(5)
PROGRAM SUPPORT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 2,537,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ 2,569,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 3,085,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 8,191,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
$60,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 is
provided solely to increase the department's capacity to carry out legislative
intent set forth in RCW 71.24.400 through 71.24.415. To facilitate this
activity, the secretary shall appoint an oversight committee of project
stakeholders including representatives from: Service providers, mental health
regional support networks, the department's mental health division, the
department's division of alcohol and substance abuse, the department's division
of children and family services, and the department's medical assistance
administration. The oversight group shall continue to seek ways to streamline
service delivery as set forth in RCW 71.24.405 until at least July 1, 1998.

(b)
$96,000 of the general fund-‑state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
6214 (mentally ill commitment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(c)
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely for the evaluation required by Second Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6214 (mentally ill commitment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. The mental health
division shall contract with the institute for public policy for this
evaluation.

Sec.
1205. 1998
c 346 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES PROGRAM

Notwithstanding
any other limitations in this section, the secretary shall transfer $1,140,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation, and $1,060,000 of the general
fund‑-federal appropriation, or so much thereof as may be necessary,
among subsections of this section to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6751 (developmental disabilities service options).

(1)
COMMUNITY SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 147,757,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((166,773,000))

168,604,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((226,737,000))

227,012,000

Health
Services Account Appropriation.......... $ ((639,000))

226,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((541,906,000))

543,599,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
The health services account appropriation and (($692,000)) $243,000
of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for the
enrollment in the basic health plan of home care workers with family incomes
below 200 percent of the federal poverty level who are employed through state
contracts. Enrollment in the basic health plan for home care workers with
family incomes at or above 200 percent of poverty shall be covered with general
fund‑-state and matching general fund‑-federal revenues that were
identified by the department to have been previously appropriated for health
benefits coverage, to the extent that these funds had not been contractually
obligated for worker wage increases prior to March 1, 1996.

(b)
$365,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $1,543,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for employment, or other day activities and training
programs, for young people who complete their high school curriculum in 1997 or
1998.

(c)
(($24,399,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1998 and $28,729,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1999 are provided solely to deliver personal care services. Within these
amounts, sufficient funding is provided to restore funding for medicaid
personal care exceptional rates to the fiscal year 1997 level. If the
secretary of social and health services determines that total expenditures are
likely to exceed these appropriated amounts, the secretary shall take action as
required by RCW 74.09.520 to adjust either functional eligibility standards or
service levels or both sufficiently to maintain expenditures within
appropriated levels. Such action may include the adoption of emergency rules
and may not be taken to the extent that projected over-expenditures are offset
by under-expenditures elsewhere within the program's general fund‑-state
appropriation. Prior to making eligibility changes which would terminate all
services to some persons, the secretary should first exercise all opportunities
to manage the average cost per person served, through methods such as promoting
the use of informal care; assuring that local offices are effectively and
consistently authorizing the least expensive level of care which can meet
recipient needs; and reducing on a sliding-scale basis the amount of service
authorized per functional need level, with smaller reductions for greater
levels of need.

(d)))
$144,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998,
$453,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999,
and $654,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely to continue operation of the united cerebral palsy residential center
during the period in which its residents are phasing into new community
residences.

(((e)))
(d) $197,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1998 and $197,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 1999 are provided solely to contract with the Washington initiative
for supported employment for the purpose of continuing the promotion of
supported employment services for persons with disabilities.

(((g)))
(e) $2,151,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1998, $5,782,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1999, and $8,362,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are
provided solely to develop and operate secure residential and day program
placements for persons who seem likely to present a significant risk to the
public safety if their current residential arrangement were to continue.

(((h)
$426,000)) (f) $860,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 1999 and (($469,000)) $927,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely to develop
and operate community services for persons residing at, or at risk of
commitment to, eastern and western state hospitals whose needs are such
that they cannot be served in existing community vacancies.

(((i)))
(g) $200,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1998 and $1,592,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for employment and day program services
for adults who are not currently able to participate in such services because
of funding limitations.

(((j)))
(h) $105,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1998, $933,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1999, and $1,029,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are
provided solely to develop and operate community services for persons moving
from the residential habilitation centers as a result of an agreement with the
federal department of justice or a settlement agreement to a lawsuit.

(2)
INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 65,277,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((64,187,000))

62,843,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((145,897,000))

145,949,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ ((9,729,000))

9,979,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((285,090,000))

284,048,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
With the funds appropriated in this subsection, the secretary of social and
health services shall develop an eight-bed program at Yakima valley school
specifically for the purpose of providing respite services to all eligible
individuals on a state-wide basis, with an emphasis on those residing in
central Washington.

(b)
$112,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998,
$113,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999,
and $75,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for a nursing community outreach project at Yakima valley school.
Registered nursing staff are to provide nursing assessments, consulting
services, training, and quality assurance on behalf of individuals residing in
central Washington.

(c)
$200,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998,
$200,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999,
and $400,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for the development of a sixteen-bed program at Yakima valley school
specifically for the purpose of providing respite services to all eligible
individuals on a state-wide basis, with an emphasis on those residing in
central Washington.

(3)
PROGRAM SUPPORT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 2,530,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ 2,501,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 1,637,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 6,668,000

(4)
SPECIAL PROJECTS

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 12,030,000

Sec. 1206. 1998
c 346 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-AGING
AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 409,469,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((425,130,000))

420,905,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((910,685,000))

899,950,000

General
Fund‑-Local Appropriation.............. $ ((1,781,000))

1,757,000

Health
Services Account Appropriation.......... $ ((2,232,000))

1,940,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((1,749,297,000))

1,734,021,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The entire health services account appropriation ((and $2,175,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation are)) is provided solely
for the enrollment in the basic health plan of home care workers with family
incomes below 200 percent of the federal poverty level who are employed through
state contracts. Enrollment in the basic health plan for home care workers
with family incomes at or above 200 percent of poverty shall be covered with
general fund‑-state and matching general fund‑-federal revenues that
were identified by the department to have been previously appropriated for
health benefits coverage, to the extent that these funds had not been
contractually obligated for worker wage increases prior to March 1, 1996.

(2)
$1,277,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $1,277,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for operation of the volunteer chore program.

(3)
(($113,534,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1998, $125,310,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 1999, of which no less than forty-nine percent shall be allotted
for expenditure during the first six months of fiscal year 1999, and $7,374,000
of the general fund‑-federal social services block grant appropriation,
are provided solely to deliver chore, COPES, and medicaid personal care
services. If the secretary of social and health services determines that total
expenditures are likely to exceed these amounts, the secretary shall take
action as required by RCW 74.09.520, 74.39A.120, and 74.09.530 to adjust
functional eligibility standards and/or service levels sufficiently to maintain
expenditures within appropriated levels. Such action may include the adoption
of emergency rules, and shall not be taken to the extent that projected
over-expenditures are offset by under-expenditures resulting from lower than
budgeted nursing home caseloads. Prior to making eligibility changes which
would terminate all services to some persons, the secretary should first
exercise all opportunities to manage the average cost per person served,
through methods such as promoting the use of informal care; assuring that local
offices are effectively and consistently authorizing the least expensive level
of care that can meet recipient needs; using waiting lists for individuals with
lower levels of need in order to limit monthly growth; and reducing on a
sliding-scale basis the amount of service authorized per functional need level,
with smaller reductions for greater levels of need.

(4)
$1,080,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
is provided to maintain service eligibility for persons receiving services
through the chore, COPES, or medicaid personal care programs in the event
eligibility adjustments may be necessary or are made in accordance with
subsection (3) of this section. The department may use seventy-five percent of
amounts not needed for that purpose to implement quality of care enhancements.

(5)))
$26,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998,
$59,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999,
and $85,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely to employ registered nurses rather than social workers to fill six of
the new field positions to be filled in fiscal year 1998 and seven more of the
new positions to be filled in fiscal year 1999. These registered nurses shall
conduct assessments, develop and monitor service plans, and consult with social
work staff to assure that persons with medical needs are placed in and receive
the appropriate level of care.

(((6)))
(4) $425,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1998 and $882,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 1999 are provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5179 (nursing facility reimbursement). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 1997, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((7)))
(5) $242,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1998, $212,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1999, and $498,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are
provided solely for operation of a system for investigating allegations of
staff abuse and neglect in nursing homes, as provided in Second Substitute
House Bill No. 1850 (long-term care standards of care).

(((8)))
(6) For purposes of implementing ((Second Substitute House Bill No.
2935)) chapter 322, Laws of 1998 (nursing ((facility)) home
payment rates), the weighted average nursing facility payment rate for fiscal
year 1999 shall be no more than (($117.36)) $116.60, excluding
nurse's aide training. Each nursing facility's July 1 through September 30,
1998, medicaid payment rate shall be its June 30, 1998, rate increased by 2.0
percent, except for the property and return on investment component rates,
which shall not be increased. Beginning October 1, 1998, component rates
rebased on 1996 costs shall be adjusted for economic trends and conditions by
5.18 percent.

(((9)))
(7) $50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1998 and $50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1999 are provided solely for payments to any nursing facility licensed
under chapter 18.51 RCW which meets all of the following criteria: (a) The
nursing home entered into an arm's length agreement for a facility lease prior
to January 1, 1980; (b) the lessee purchased the leased nursing home after
January 1, 1980; and (c) the lessor defaulted on its loan or mortgage for the
assets of the home after January 1, 1991, and prior to January 1, 1992.
Payments provided pursuant to this subsection shall not be subject to the
settlement, audit, or rate-setting requirements contained in chapter 74.46 RCW.

(((10)))
(8) $506,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1998, $502,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1999, and $1,095,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are
provided solely for an increase in the state payment rates for adult
residential care and enhanced adult residential care.

(((11)
$274,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998,
$1,357,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999,
and the entire general fund‑-local appropriation are provided solely for
boarding home licensure and quality assurance by the department of social and
health services only if Engrossed House Bill No. 2410 (boarding home
administration) is enacted by June 30, 1998. If the bill is not enacted, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall be allocated to the department of
health, which will manage the boarding home licensure and quality assurance
program.))

Sec.
1207. 1998
c 346 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-ECONOMIC
SERVICES PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 508,243,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((512,200,000))

507,154,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((951,615,000))

881,335,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((1,972,058,000))

1,896,732,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The legislature finds that, with the passage of the federal personal
responsibility and work opportunity act and Engrossed House Bill No. 3901, the
temporary assistance for needy families is no longer an entitlement. The
legislature declares that the currently appropriated level for the program is
sufficient for the next few budget cycles. ((To the extent, however, that
currently appropriated amounts exceed costs during the 1997-99 biennium, the
department is encouraged to set aside excess federal funds for use in future
years.))

(2)
$485,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation,
$3,186,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation, and
$3,168,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely
to continue to implement the previously competitively procured electronic
benefits transfer system through the western states EBT alliance for
distribution of cash grants and food stamps so as to meet the requirements of
P.L. 104-193.

(3)
$50,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for a study of child care affordability as directed in section
403 of Engrossed House Bill No. 3901 (implementing welfare reform). The study
shall be performed by the Washington institute for public policy. If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(4)
$500,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund‑-state appropriation and
$500,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state appropriation are
provided solely for an evaluation of the WorkFirst program as directed in
section 705 of Engrossed House Bill No. 3901 (implementing welfare reform).
The study shall be performed by the joint legislative audit and review
committee. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

(5)
$73,129,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided ((solely))
for child care assistance for low-income families in the WorkFirst program and
for low-income working families as authorized in Engrossed House Bill No. 3901
(implementing welfare reform). All child care assistance provided shall be
subject to a monthly copay to be paid by the family receiving the assistance.

(6)
$7,624,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund‑-state appropriation, (($18,489,000))
$11,730,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state
appropriation, and $29,781,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation
are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 3901
(implementing welfare reform), including sections 404 and 405. If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse. The level of benefits in the food program for legal immigrants
authorized in the bill shall be equivalent to benefits provided by the federal
food stamp program.

(7)
$56,461,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund‑-state appropriation and
(($59,393,000)) $51,673,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state
appropriation are provided ((solely)) for cash assistance to recipients
in the general assistance‑-unemployable program. The department shall
take any and all actions necessary to maintain expenditures within these
amounts.

(8)
$55,995,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund‑-state appropriation, (($55,995,000))
$44,146,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state
appropriation, and (($184,510,000)) $121,821,000 of the general
fund‑-federal appropriation are provided ((solely)) to administer
a low-income child care program as authorized in Engrossed House Bill No. 3901
(implementing welfare reform). ((The child care program funds shall be
allotted as follows:

(a)
Each six-month period shall have $27,997,500 general fund‑-state and
$46,127,500 general fund‑-federal funds allotted to be spent during that
six-month period for low-income child care assistance.

(b)
The department may spend up to the allotted amount for child care assistance
during each six-month period. Any funds not spent during the six-month period
may be held over and allotted in the next six-month period, subject to the
provisions of subsection (5) of this section.

(c)
Federal funds allotted for child care but not spent in fiscal year 1998 may be
transferred to fiscal year 1999 for allotment but state funds must be spent in
the year appropriated.

(10))) (9)
Within the amounts provided in this section, the department shall implement the
study requirements of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2900 (pro rata
calculation of temporary assistance for needy families grants).

Sec.
1208. 1998
c 346 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-ALCOHOL
AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998) ... $ 15,459,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((15,330,000))

16,781,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((81,112,000))

81,132,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 630,000

Public
Safety and Education Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,210,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 74,889,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((190,630,000))

192,101,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$2,062,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation and $7,482,000 of
the violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation are provided
solely for the grant programs for school districts and educational service
districts set forth in RCW 28A.170.080 through 28A.170.100, including state
support activities, as administered through the office of the superintendent of
public instruction.

(2)
$1,902,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation,
$1,902,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation, and
$1,592,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely
for alcohol and substance abuse assessment, treatment, including treatment for
drug affected infants and toddlers, and child care services for clients of the
division of children and family services. Assessment shall be provided by
approved chemical dependency treatment programs as requested by child
protective services personnel in the division of children and family services.
Child care shall be provided as deemed necessary by the division of children
and family services while parents requiring alcohol and substance abuse
treatment are attending treatment programs.

(3)
$760,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund‑-state appropriation and
$760,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state appropriation are
provided solely to fund a program serving mothers of children affected by fetal
alcohol syndrome and related conditions, known as the birth-to-three program.
The program may be operated in two cities in the state.

(4)
$3,210,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for the continuation of treatment alternatives to street crimes (TASC)
programs in Pierce, Snohomish, Clark, King, Spokane, and Yakima counties.

Sec.
1209. 1998
c 346 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-MEDICAL
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ ((666,815,000))

671,815,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((681,372,000))

680,857,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((2,086,149,000))

2,115,962,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ ((306,601,000))

307,708,000

Health
Services Account Appropriation.......... $ 254,506,000

Emergency
Medical and Trauma Care Services

Account
Appropriation...................... $ 4,600,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((4,000,043,000))

4,035,448,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The department shall continue to make use of the special eligibility category
created for children through age 18 and in households with incomes below 200
percent of the federal poverty level made eligible for medicaid as of July 1,
1994.

(2)
It is the intent of the legislature that Harborview medical center continue to
be an economically viable component of the health care system and that the
state's financial interest in Harborview medical center be recognized.

(3)
Funding is provided in this section for the adult dental program for Title XIX
categorically eligible and medically needy persons and to provide foot care
services by podiatric physicians and surgeons.

(4)
$1,622,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $1,622,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided for treatment of low-income kidney dialysis patients.

(5)
$80,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998,
$80,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999,
and $160,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for the prenatal triage clearinghouse to provide access and outreach to
reduce infant mortality.

(6)
((The department shall employ the managed care contracting and negotiation
strategies defined in Substitute Senate Bill No. 5125 to assure that the
average per-recipient cost of managed care services for temporary assistance to
needy families and expansion populations increases by no more than two percent per
year in calendar years 1998 and 1999.

(7))) The
department shall seek federal approval to require adult medicaid recipients who
are not elderly or disabled to contribute ten dollars per month toward the cost
of their medical assistance coverage. The department shall report on the
progress of this effort to the house of representatives and senate health care
and fiscal committees by September 1 and November 15, 1997.

(((8)))
(7) $325,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1998 and $325,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 1999 are provided solely to increase rates paid for air ambulance
services.

(((9)
$1,468,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
is to be expended solely to the extent necessary because the federal government
has not approved the department's request to require certain recipients to pay
ten dollars per month toward the cost of their medical assistance.

(10))) (8)
By November 1, 1998, the department shall report to the health care and fiscal
committees of the legislature on the estimated average monthly number of
nongrant medical assistance recipients who do not meet the earned income
eligibility standards that were in effect prior to November 1997.

Sec.
1210. 1998
c 346 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-VOCATIONAL
REHABILITATION PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 9,046,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((8,603,000))

8,903,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((79,080,000))

78,577,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 2,904,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((99,633,000))

99,430,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The division of vocational rehabilitation shall negotiate cooperative
interagency agreements with local organizations, including higher education
institutions, mental health regional support networks, and county developmental
disabilities programs to improve and expand employment opportunities for people
with severe disabilities served by those local agencies.

(2)
$363,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998,
$506,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999,
and $3,208,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for vocational rehabilitation services for individuals enrolled for
services with the developmental disabilities program who complete their high
school curriculum in 1997 or 1998.

Sec.
1211. 1998
c 346 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-ADMINISTRATION
AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 25,818,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((25,744,000))

25,325,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((43,037,000))

43,087,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 270,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((94,869,000))

94,500,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The department may transfer up to $1,289,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 1998, $1,757,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 1999, and $2,813,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation to the administration and supporting services program from
various other programs to implement administrative reductions.

(2)
The secretary of social and health services and the director of labor and
industries shall report to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature by July 1, 1997, and every six months thereafter on the measurable
changes in employee injury and time-loss rates that have occurred in the state
developmental disabilities, juvenile rehabilitation, and mental health
institutions as a result of the upfront loss-control discount agreement between
the agencies.

(3)
$60,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 is
provided solely for a welfare fraud pilot program as described by House Bill
No. 1822 (welfare fraud investigation).

(4)
$55,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund‑-state appropriation,
$64,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state appropriation, and
$231,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely
for implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 3901 (implementing welfare
reform). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

(((6)))
(5) The department shall report on the allowance for clothing, personal
maintenance, and necessary incidentals provided to persons who receive services
funded by state and federal moneys under Title XIX of the social security act. The
report shall discuss the range of allowances granted for different populations
and programs and compare the allowances to those provided to similar
populations in other western states. The report shall also evaluate the need
for a uniform amount provided to all populations and, if a uniform allowance is
provided, at what level that allowance should be set. In compiling the report,
the department shall consult with affected parties and divisions. The report
shall be submitted by December 1, 1998, to the chairs and the ranking minority
members of the appropriate committees of the legislature.

Sec.
1212. 1998
c 346 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-CHILD
SUPPORT PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 21,344,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((20,965,000))

22,909,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((145,321,000))

150,869,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ ((32,673,000))

30,802,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((220,303,000))

225,924,000

The
appropriations provided in this section are subject to the following conditions
and limitations:

(1)
The department shall contract with private collection agencies to pursue
collection of AFDC child support arrearages in cases that might otherwise consume
a disproportionate share of the department's collection efforts. The
department's child support collection staff shall determine which cases are
appropriate for referral to private collection agencies. In determining
appropriate contract provisions, the department shall consult with other states
that have successfully contracted with private collection agencies to the
extent allowed by federal support enforcement regulations.

(2)
The amounts appropriated in this section for child support legal services shall
be expended only by means of contracts with local prosecutor's offices.

(3)
$305,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation,
$494,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation, and
$1,408,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely
to implement Engrossed House Bill No. 3901 (implementing welfare reform). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec.
1213. 1998
c 346 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-PAYMENTS
TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 25,292,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((24,792,000))

24,480,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((18,966,000))

20,278,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((69,050,000))

70,050,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$263,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund‑-state appropriation,
$349,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state appropriation, and
$1,186,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely
for implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 3901 (implementing welfare
reform). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

(2)
$113,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state appropriation and
$31,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely
for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2556 (child abuse
prevention and treatment). If this bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec.
1214. 1998
c 346 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 6,316,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ 6,317,000

State
Health Care Authority Administration

Account
Appropriation...................... $ ((14,969,000))

14,965,000

Health
Services Account Appropriation.......... $ ((341,800,000))

333,535,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((369,402,000))

361,133,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The general fund‑-state appropriations are provided solely for health
care services provided through local community clinics.

(2)
Within funds appropriated in this section and sections 205 and 206 of chapter
149, Laws of 1997, the health care authority shall continue to provide an
enhanced basic health plan subsidy option for foster parents licensed under
chapter 74.15 RCW and workers in state-funded homecare programs. Under this
enhanced subsidy option, foster parents and homecare workers with family
incomes below 200 percent of the federal poverty level shall be allowed to
enroll in the basic health plan at a cost of ten dollars per covered worker per
month.

(3)(a)
Effective October 1997, the health care authority shall require organizations
and individuals that are paid to deliver basic health plan services to
contribute a minimum of thirty dollars per enrollee per month if the
organization or individual chooses to sponsor an individual's enrollment in the
subsidized basic health plan.

(b)
Effective July 1998, the health care authority shall require organizations and
individuals which are paid to deliver basic health plan services and which
choose to sponsor enrollment in the subsidized basic health plan to pay the
following: (i) A minimum of fifteen dollars per enrollee per month for persons
below 100 percent of the federal poverty level; and (ii) a minimum of twenty
dollars per enrollee per month for persons whose family income is 100 percent
to 200 percent of the federal poverty level.

(4)
(($150,000 of the health services account appropriation is provided solely
to implement health care savings accounts. If legislation requiring a pilot
project of such accounts is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amount provided
in this subsection shall lapse.

(5)))
$270,000 of the health services account appropriation is provided solely to pay
commissions to agents and brokers in accordance with RCW 70.47.015(5) for
application assistance provided to persons on the reservation list as of June
30, 1997, who enroll in the subsidized basic health plan on or after July 1,
1997.

(((6)))
(5) $250,000 of the state health care authority administrative account
appropriation is provided solely to process claims arising from the settlement
in Retired State Employees v. State of Washington (Thurston county
superior court cause no. 92-2-01294-1).

(((7)))
(6) The health care authority administrator is directed to pay claims
resulting from a court-approved stipulated settlement in Retired State
Employees et al. v. State of Washington (Thurston county superior court
cause no. 92-2-01294-1) using funds in the public employees' and retirees'
insurance account. The legislature recognizes that payment of these claims may
reduce premium stabilization reserves below target levels on an interim basis.
It is the legislature's intent that the viability of health care
authority-administered programs be preserved and that the benefit levels for
health care authority-administered programs not be reduced in the event premium
stabilization reserves are used to pay such claims.

(((8)))
(7) $330,000 of the health services account appropriation is provided
solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 3109 (basic health plan enrollee
income verification). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec.
1215. 1998
c 346 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 6,805,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((7,069,000))

7,013,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((16,082,000))

15,333,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-

Federal
Appropriation...................... $ ((6,002,000))

5,937,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-

Private/Local
Appropriation................ $ ((2,178,000))

2,987,000

Electrical
License Account Appropriation........ $...................................... ((22,542,000))

22,506,000

Farm
Labor Revolving Account Appropriation..... $ 28,000

Worker
and Community Right-to-Know Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,187,000

Public
Works Administration Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,975,000

Accident
Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ ((151,634,000))

151,867,000

Accident
Account‑-Federal Appropriation ........ $ 9,112,000

Medical
Aid Account‑-State Appropriation........ $...................................... ((154,142,000))

154,502,000

Medical
Aid Account‑-Federal Appropriation..... $ 1,592,000

Plumbing
Certificate Account Appropriation..... $ 947,000

Pressure
Systems Safety Account Appropriation... $........................................... 2,106,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((384,401,000))

384,897,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Expenditures of funds appropriated in this section for the information systems
projects identified in agency budget requests as "claims service
delivery", "electrical permitting and inspection system", and
"credentialing information system" are conditioned upon compliance
with section 902 of this act.

(2)
Pursuant to RCW 7.68.015, the department shall operate the crime victims
compensation program within the public safety and education account funds
appropriated in this section. In the event that cost containment measures are
necessary, the department may (a) institute copayments for services; (b)
develop preferred provider and managed care contracts; (c) coordinate with the
department of social and health services to use the public safety and education
account as matching funds for federal Title XIX reimbursement, to the extent
this maximizes total funds available for services to crime victims.

(3)
$54,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $54,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for an
interagency agreement to reimburse the board of industrial insurance appeals
for crime victims appeals.

(4)
The secretary of social and health services and the director of labor and
industries shall report to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature by July 1, 1997, and every six months thereafter on the measurable
changes in employee injury and time-loss rates that have occurred in the state
developmental disabilities, juvenile rehabilitation, and mental health
institutions as a result of the upfront loss-control discount agreement between
the agencies.

(5)
The expenditures of the elevator, factory assembled structures, and
contractors' registration and compliance programs may not exceed the revenues
generated by these programs.

(6)
$101,000 of the plumbing certificate account appropriation is provided solely
for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5749 (pipe installer). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amount provided shall lapse.

(7)
$56,000 of the medical aid account appropriation and $52,000 of the accident
account appropriation are provided solely for evaluating agency operational
improvements.

(8)
$593,000 of nonappropriated funds from the medical aid account shall be
provided solely for allocation to the joint legislative audit and review
committee for a performance audit and operations review of the state workers'
compensation system pursuant to Substitute Senate Bill No. 6030.

(9)
$170,000 of the accident account‑-state appropriation and $170,000 of the
medical aid account‑-state appropriation are provided solely for payment
to the office of the attorney general for legal services provided in the
1995-97 biennium.

(10)
$686,000 of the accident account appropriation and $686,000 of the medical aid
account appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely to fund 24
claims manager positions in fiscal year 1999 (12 worker compensation
adjudicator 2 and 12 worker compensation adjudicator 3 positions). With these
new positions, the department is expected to reduce time-loss duration in
claims by 5 percent by June 30, 2000, and an additional 2.5 percent by June 30,
2001. The average caseload for level 2 claims managers should also drop to approximately
190 by June 30, 2000. The director of the department shall report to the
appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature and the office of
financial management by June 30, 1998, and every year thereafter, on the
measurable progress made toward attaining these goals. The 1998 report shall
indicate the baseline figures from July 1, 1997. If substantial progress has
not been achieved by June 30, 2000, the 24 claims manager positions and the
funding associated with these positions shall be discontinued.

Sec.
1216. 1998
c 346 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

(1)
HEADQUARTERS

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 1,609,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ 1,404,000

Industrial
Insurance Premium Refund Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 80,000

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account Appropriation......... $ 4,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION.............. ... $ 3,097,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: $200,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998
is provided solely as the state's contribution to the construction of a
memorial on the state capitol grounds to the men and women who served in the
nation's armed forces during the second world war. The department shall raise
the remaining two-thirds of the memorial's cost from individual and corporate
contributions.

(2)
FIELD SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 2,418,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ 2,420,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $ 26,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 85,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 4,949,000

(3)
INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 6,576,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((5,522,000))

5,336,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((18,950,000))

19,166,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ ((14,561,000))

14,799,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((45,609,000))

45,877,000

Sec.
1217. 1998
c 346 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF HEALTH

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 63,189,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((73,170,000))

66,106,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((262,504,000))

262,483,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ ((23,578,000))

24,356,000

Hospital
Commission Account Appropriation...... $ 3,089,000

Health
Professions Account Appropriation........ $...................................... ((36,255,000))

35,522,000

Emergency
Medical and Trauma Care Services Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((21,042,000))

5,857,000

Safe
Drinking Water Account Appropriation...... $ 2,494,000

Death
Investigations Account Appropriation..... $ 650,000

Drinking
Water Assistance Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,385,000

Waterworks
Operator Certification Appropriation $ 588,000

Water
Quality Account Appropriation............. $.................................. 3,065,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement

Account
Appropriation...................... $ 469,000

State
Toxics Control Account Appropriation..... $ 2,854,000

Medical
Test Site Licensure Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,624,000

Youth
Tobacco Prevention Account Appropriation. $ 1,812,000

Health
Services Account Appropriation.......... $ ((6,115,000))

12,474,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((507,883,000))

492,017,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$2,134,000 of the health professions account appropriation is provided solely
for the development and implementation of a licensing and disciplinary
management system. Expenditures are conditioned upon compliance with section
902 of this act. These funds shall not be expended without appropriate project
approval by the department of information systems.

(2)
Funding provided in this section for the drinking water program data management
system shall not be expended without appropriate project approval by the
department of information systems. Expenditures are conditioned upon
compliance with section 902 of this act.

(3)
The department or any successor agency is authorized to raise existing fees
charged to the nursing professions and midwives; chemical dependency
counselors; by the pharmacy board; and for boarding home; hospital; and home
health, home care, and hospice agency licenses, in excess of the fiscal growth
factor established by Initiative Measure No. 601, if necessary, to meet the
actual costs of conducting business and the appropriation levels in this
section.

(4)
$1,526,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$1,741,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound water work plan and
agency action items, DOH-01, DOH-02, DOH-03, DOH-04, DOH-05, DOH-06, DOH-07,
DOH-08, DOH-09, DOH-10, DOH-11, and DOH-12.

(5)
(($10,000,000)) $6,115,000 of the health services account
appropriation is provided solely for distribution to local health departments
for distribution on a per capita basis. Prior to distributing these funds, the
department shall adopt rules and procedures to ensure that these funds are not
used to replace current local support for public health programs.

(6)
$500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for operation of a youth suicide prevention program at
the state level, including a state-wide public educational campaign to increase
knowledge of suicide risk and ability to respond and provision of twenty-four
hour crisis hotlines, staffed to provide suicidal youth and caregivers a source
of instant help.

(7)
The department of health shall not initiate any services that will require
expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this
act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW
43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long
as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the
program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department
receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides
appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state moneys shall
lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of
financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used
in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block
grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on
specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(8)
$259,000 of the health professions account appropriation is provided solely to
implement Engrossed House Bill No. 3901 (implementing welfare reform). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

(9)
$150,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$150,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely for community‑based oral health grants that may fund
sealant programs, education, prevention, and other oral health interventions.
The grants may be awarded to state or federally funded community and migrant
health centers, tribal clinics, or public health jurisdictions. Priority shall
be given to communities with established oral health coalitions. Grant
applications for oral health education and prevention grants shall include (a)
an assessment of the community's oral health education and prevention needs;
(b) identification of the population to be served; and (c) a description of the
grant program's predicted outcomes.

(10)
(($21,042,000)) $5,857,000 of the emergency medical and trauma
care services account appropriation is provided solely for implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5127 (trauma care services). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 1997, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(11)
$500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for family support and provider training services for
children with special health care needs.

(12)
$300,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided solely
for an abstinence education program which complies with P.L. 104-193. $400,000
of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided solely for
abstinence education projects at the office of the superintendent of public
instruction and shall be transferred to the office of the superintendent of
public instruction for the 1998-99 school year. The department shall apply for
abstinence education funds made available by the federal personal
responsibility and work opportunity act of 1996 and implement a program that
complies with the requirements of that act.

(13)
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1191
(mandated health benefit review). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997,
the amounts provided in this section shall lapse.

(14)
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for the volunteer retired provider program. Funds
shall be used to increase children's access to dental care services in rural
and underserved communities by paying malpractice insurance and professional
licensing fees for retired dentists participating in the program.

(15)
$852,000 of the drinking water assistance account‑-federal appropriation
is provided solely for an interagency agreement with the department of
community, trade, and economic development to administer, in cooperation with
the public works board, loans to local governments and public water systems for
projects and activities to protect and improve the state's drinking water
facilities and resources.

(16)
$3,347,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund‑-state appropriation and
(($3,347,000)) $2,600,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state
appropriation are provided solely for the AIDS prescription drug program and
HIV intervention program. The department shall operate the program within
total appropriations. The department shall take such actions as are necessary
to control expenditures, including administrative efficiencies such as
reductions to provider reimbursement rates, modifications to financial
eligibility, modifications to the scope of services, and client cost sharing
mechanisms. The department shall identify program policy changes required to manage
within the amounts provided.

(17)
Funding provided in this section is sufficient to implement section 8 of
Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2264 (eliminating the health care policy
board).

(18)
$2,075,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund‑-state appropriation and
$2,075,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state appropriation are
provided solely for the Washington poison center.

(19)
$650,000 of the death investigations account appropriation is provided solely
for the implementation of state-wide child mortality reviews. Local health
jurisdictions shall coordinate child mortality reviews for children from birth
to eighteen years of age, develop local child mortality review protocols, and
serve as the appointing authority and lead agency for local child death review
teams. The department of health shall develop standard aggregate data
elements, collect and analyze local child mortality review data, provide
technical assistance to local child mortality review teams, and approve local
child death review protocols. If House Bill No. 1269 (death investigations
account) is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(20)
$1,125,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund‑-state appropriation and
$1,125,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state appropriation are
provided solely for deposit in the county public health account.

(21)
$60,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$60,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for attorney general services and such other activities not
covered by fee revenues as are necessary for implementation of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 2264 (health care policy). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 1997, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(22)
$250,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund‑-state appropriation
$250,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state appropriation are
provided solely for operation of a naturopathic health clinic constructed in
1996.

(23)
$60,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
6168 (temporary worker housing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(24)
$250,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided solely to
conduct monitoring for thyroid diseases for eligible people exposed to
radiation from Hanford between 1945 and 1951, and is contingent upon the
execution of an agreement with the state of Oregon that the state of Washington
will function as a subrecipient for the Hanford medical monitoring program
grant. If such an agreement is not executed by September 30, 1998, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(25)
(($730,000 of the health professions account appropriation is provided
solely for the purposes of the impaired physician program. If Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1618 (impaired physician program) or substantially
similar legislation is enacted by June 30, 1998, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(26)))
$1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
is provided solely for the breast and cervical cancer screening program.

(((27)))
(26) Within existing resources, the department shall maintain funding
support for neurodevelopmental centers and in no case shall that support in
fiscal year 1999 be reduced below the total sum awarded by contract to
neurodevelopmental centers in fiscal year 1998.

(((29)))
(27) $300,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of a hepatitis A emergency vaccination program.
This entire amount shall be passed through to county health districts that have
employed a public education effort and have infection rates in excess of 100
per 100,000 population.

Sec.
1218. 1998
c 346 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF CORRECTIONS

The
appropriations to the department of corrections in chapter 454, Laws of 1997,
as amended, shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified
therein. However, after April 1, ((1998)) 1999, unless
specifically prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fund‑-state
appropriations for fiscal year ((1998)) 1999 between the
institutional services and community corrections programs after approval by the
director of the office of financial management. The director of the
office of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal
committees of the senate and house of representatives in writing prior to
approving any deviations from appropriation levels.

(1)
ADMINISTRATION AND PROGRAM SUPPORT

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 13,926,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ 13,910,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 500,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 28,336,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
$187,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $155,000 of the
general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation are provided solely for implementation
of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5759 (risk classification). If the bill is not
enacted by July 1, 1997, the amounts provided shall lapse.

(b)
$500,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation
is provided solely for a feasibility study regarding the replacement of the
department's offender based tracking system. This appropriation is conditioned
on the department satisfying the requirements of section 902, chapter 149, Laws
of 1997.

(2)
INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 289,665,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((303,830,000))

304,972,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((18,097,000))

16,123,000

Industrial
Insurance Premium Rebate Account

Appropriation.......................... ... $ 673,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,614,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((613,879,000))

613,047,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
The department shall provide funding for the pet partnership program at the
Washington corrections center for women at a level at least equal to that
provided in the 1995-97 biennium.

(b)
$3,978,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$5,381,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely for the criminal justice costs associated with the
implementation of Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 3900 (revising the
juvenile code). If Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 3900 is not
enacted by June 30, 1997, the amounts provided shall lapse.

(c)
The department of corrections shall accomplish personnel reductions with the
least possible impact on correctional custody staff, community custody staff,
and correctional industries. For the purposes of this subsection, correctional
custody staff means employees responsible for the direct supervision of
offenders.

(d)
$296,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $297,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely to increase payment rates for contracted education
providers. It is the legislature's intent that these amounts shall be used
primarily to increase compensation for persons employed in direct, front-line
service delivery.

(e)
The department may expend funds generated by contractual agreements entered
into for mitigation of severe overcrowding in local jails. If any funds are
generated in excess of actual costs, they shall be deposited in the state
general fund. Expenditures shall not exceed revenue generated by such
agreements and shall be treated as recovery of costs.

(f)
$70,000 of the general fund‑‑state fiscal year 1999 appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6139 (amphetamine
crimes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

(g)
$36,000 of the general fund‑‑state fiscal year 1999 appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 1172 (sex offender
registration). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(h)
$8,000 of the general fund‑‑state fiscal year 1999 appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 2628 (methamphetamine
manufacture). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the amount provided
in this subsection shall lapse.

(3)
COMMUNITY CORRECTIONS

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 88,830,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((90,670,000))

89,696,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((179,500,000))

178,526,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
$27,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $185,000 of the
general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation are provided solely for the
criminal justice costs associated with the implementation of Engrossed Third
Substitute House Bill No. 3900 (revising the juvenile code). If Engrossed
Third Substitute House Bill No. 3900 is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the
amounts provided shall lapse.

(b)
The department of corrections shall accomplish personnel reductions with the
least possible impact on correctional custody staff, community custody staff,
and correctional industries. For the purposes of this subsection, correctional
custody staff means employees responsible for the direct supervision of
offenders.

(c)
$467,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $505,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely to
increase payment rates for contracted education providers and contracted work
release facilities. It is the legislature's intent that these amounts shall be
used primarily to increase compensation for persons employed in direct,
front-line service delivery.

(d)
$45,000 of the general fund‑‑state fiscal year 1999 appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5760
(mentally ill offenders). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(e)
$609,000 of the general fund‑‑state fiscal year 1998 appropriation
and $226,000 of the general fund‑‑state fiscal year 1999
appropriation are provided solely for costs associated with allowing community
corrections officers to carry firearms.

(4)
CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)................ $ 4,055,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)................ $ 4,167,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 8,222,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
$100,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $100,000 of the
general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation are provided solely for transfer to
the jail industries board. The board shall use the amounts provided only for
administrative expenses, equipment purchases, and technical assistance
associated with advising cities and counties in developing, promoting, and
implementing consistent, safe, and efficient offender work programs.

(b)
$50,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $50,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for the
correctional industries board of directors to hire one staff person,
responsible directly to the board, to assist the board in fulfilling its
duties.

(5)
INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 6,851,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((6,538,000))

6,788,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((13,389,000))

13,639,000

Sec.
1219. 1998
c 346 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE EMPLOYMENT
SECURITY DEPARTMENT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 1,260,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ 1,261,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((198,628,000))

178,472,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 28,650,000

Unemployment
Compensation Administration Account‑-

Federal
Appropriation...................... $ 182,312,000

Administrative
Contingency Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 13,527,000

Employment
Service Administrative Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 14,500,000

Employment
& Training Trust Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 600,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((440,738,000))

420,582,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Expenditures of funds appropriated in this section for the information systems
projects identified in agency budget requests as "claims and adjudication
call centers", "data/wage quality initiative", and "one
stop information connectivity" are conditioned upon compliance with
section 902 of this act.

(2)
$600,000 of the employment and training trust account appropriation is provided
solely for the account's share of unemployment insurance tax collection costs.

(3)
$1,126,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided solely
for the continuation of job placement centers colocated on community and
technical college campuses.

(4)
The employment security department shall spend no more than $25,049,511 of the
unemployment compensation administration account‑-federal appropriation
for the general unemployment insurance development effort (GUIDE) project,
except that the department may exceed this amount by up to $2,600,000 to offset
the cost associated with any vendor-caused delay. The additional spending
authority is contingent upon the department fully recovering these moneys from
any project vendors failing to perform in full. Authority to spend the amount
provided by this subsection is conditioned on compliance with section 902 of
this act.

(5)
$60,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$61,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely for the King county reemployment support center.

(6)
$1,200,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$1,200,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely for labor market information and employer outreach activities.

(7)
$948,000 of the administrative contingency account appropriation and $838,000
of the employment service administrative account appropriation are provided
solely for the department to evaluate the tax determination system compared to
other systems, improve the disclosure of information on the employer rate
notice, and address deficiencies in the tax information system (TAXIS).

(((10))) (8) $327,000 of the unemployment
compensation administration account‑-federal appropriation and $486,000
of the employment service administrative account appropriation are provided
solely for the department to replace field office computers that are not
compliant with Year 2000 conversion standards.

(End of part)

PART
XIII

NATURAL RESOURCES‑-SUPPLEMENTAL
APPROPRIATIONS

Sec.
1301. 1998
c 346 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation

(FY
1998)............................. $ ((26,013,000))

23,513,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation

(FY
1999)............................. $ ((25,860,000))

23,348,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation........ $.................................. ((46,240,000))

46,229,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation. $ 1,200,000

Special
Grass Seed Burning Research Account

Appropriation........................ $ 71,000

Reclamation
Revolving Account

Appropriation......................... $ 2,441,000

Flood
Control Assistance Account

Appropriation......................... $ 4,850,000

State
Emergency Water Projects Revolving Account

Appropriation......................... $ 319,000

Waste
Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control

Appropriation......................... $ 10,316,000

State
and Local Improvements Revolving Account

(Waste
Facilities) Appropriation...... $ 601,000

State
and Local Improvements Revolving Account

(Water
Supply Facilities)

Appropriation......................... $ 1,366,000

Basic
Data Account Appropriation.......... $ 182,000

Vehicle
Tire Recycling Account

Appropriation......................... $ ((357,000))

401,000

Water
Quality Account Appropriation........ $.................................. 2,892,000

Wood
Stove Education and Enforcement Account

Appropriation......................... $ 848,000

Worker
and Community Right-to-Know Account

Appropriation......................... $ 469,000

State
Toxics Control Account

Appropriation......................... $ ((53,715,000))

53,703,000

Local
Toxics Control Account

Appropriation......................... $ 4,759,000

Water
Quality Permit Account

Appropriation......................... $ 20,378,000

Underground
Storage Tank Account

Appropriation......................... $ 2,638,000

Solid
Waste Management Account

Appropriation......................... $ 971,000

Hazardous
Waste Assistance Account

Appropriation......................... $ 3,615,000

Air
Pollution Control Account

Appropriation......................... $ 16,224,000

Oil
Spill Administration Account

Appropriation......................... $ 6,998,000

Air
Operating Permit Account

Appropriation......................... $ 3,808,000

Freshwater
Aquatic Weeds Account

Appropriation......................... $ 1,829,000

Oil
Spill Response Account

Appropriation......................... $ 7,078,000

Metals
Mining Account Appropriation........ $ 42,000

Water
Pollution Control Revolving Account‑-State

Appropriation......................... $ 349,000

Water
Pollution Control Revolving Account‑-Federal

Appropriation......................... $ 1,726,000

Biosolids
Permit Account Appropriation.... $ 567,000

Environmental
Excellence Account

Appropriation......................... $ 247,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION............. $ ((248,969,000))

243,978,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$3,211,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998,
$3,211,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999,
$394,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation, $2,017,000 of the
oil spill administration account, $819,000 of the state toxics control account
appropriation, and $3,591,000 of the water quality permit fee account are
provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency
action items DOE-01, DOE-02, DOE-03, DOE-04, DOE-05, DOE-06, DOE-07, DOE-08,
and DOE-09.

(2)
$2,000,000 of the state toxics control account appropriation is provided solely
for the following purposes:

(a)
To conduct remedial actions for sites for which there are no potentially liable
persons, for which potentially liable persons cannot be found, or for which
potentially liable persons are unable to pay for remedial actions; and

(b)
To provide funding to assist potentially liable persons under RCW
70.105D.070(2)(d)(xi) to pay for the cost of the remedial actions; and

(c)
To conduct remedial actions for sites for which potentially liable persons have
refused to conduct remedial actions required by the department; and

(d)
To contract for services as necessary to support remedial actions.

(3)
$200,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No.
1118 (reopening a water rights claim filing period). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 1997, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4)
$3,600,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $3,600,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for the auto emissions inspection and maintenance
program. Expenditures of the amounts provided in this subsection are
contingent upon a like amount being deposited in the general fund from the auto
emission inspection fees in accordance with RCW 70.120.170(4).

(5)
$170,000 of the oil spill administration account appropriation is provided
solely for implementation of the Puget Sound work plan action item UW-02
through a contract with the University of Washington's Sea Grant program in
order to develop an educational program that targets small spills from
commercial fishing vessels, ferries, cruise ships, ports, and marinas.

(6)
The merger of the office of marine safety into the department of ecology shall
be accomplished in a manner that will maintain a priority focus on oil spill
prevention, as well as maintain a strong oil spill response capability. The
merged program shall be established to provide a high level of visibility and
ensure that there shall not be a diminution of the existing level of effort
from the merged programs.

(7)
The entire environmental excellence account appropriation is provided solely
for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1866
(environmental excellence). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. In implementing the bill, the
department shall organize the needed expertise to process environmental
excellence applications after an application has been received.

(8)
$200,000 of the freshwater aquatic weeds account appropriation is provided
solely to address saltcedar weed problems.

(9)
$4,498,000 of the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account
appropriation is provided for fiscal year 1998 and $5,818,000 is provided for
fiscal year 1999 to be expended in the following ratios: Fifty percent for a
litter patrol program to employ youth and correctional work crews to remove
litter from places that are most visible to the public; twenty percent for
grants to local governments for litter cleanup under RCW 70.93.250; and thirty
percent for public education and awareness programs and programs to foster
local waste reduction and recycling efforts. From the amounts provided in this
subsection, the department shall provide $352,000 through an interagency
agreement to the department of corrections to hire correctional crews to remove
litter in areas that are not accessible to youth crews.

(10)
The entire biosolids permit account appropriation is provided solely for
implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5590 (biosolids management). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the entire appropriation is null and
void.

(11)
$29,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$99,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1985
(landscape management plans). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(12)
$60,000 of the freshwater aquatic weeds account appropriation is provided
solely for a grant to the department of fish and wildlife to control and
eradicate purple loosestrife using the most cost-effective methods available,
including chemical control where appropriate.

(13)
$250,000 of the flood control assistance account appropriation is provided
solely as a reappropriation to complete the Skokomish valley flood reduction
plan. The amount provided in this subsection shall be reduced by the amount
expended from this account for the Skokomish valley flood reduction plan during
the biennium ending June 30, 1997.

(14)
$600,000 of the flood control assistance account appropriation is provided
solely to complete flood control projects that were awarded funds during the
1995-97 biennium. These funds shall be spent only to complete projects that
could not be completed during the 1995-97 biennium due to delays caused by weather
or delays in the permitting process.

(15)
$113,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$112,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5505
(assistance to water applicants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(16)
$70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5785
(consolidation of groundwater rights). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
1997, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(17)
$20,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$20,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5276 (water
right applications). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(18)
$500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for the continuation of the southwest Washington
coastal erosion study.

(((21)))
(19) $195,000 of the underground storage tank account appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6130
(underground storage tanks). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((22)))
(20) $417,000 of the local toxics control account appropriation is
provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 6474 (fertilizer regulation).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(((23)))
(21) Using up to $19,000 of the special grass seed burning research
account appropriation the department shall provide funding to Washington State
University to conduct a grass burning emissions study.

(((24)))
(22) Within the amounts provided in this section, the department shall
conduct a demonstration project on the effectiveness of the state-registered
herbicide "Navigate" for the control of Eurasian water milfoil in
Loon Lake in Stevens county. The department shall provide a grant to the
Stevens county weed board to cover fifty percent of the cost of application of
the herbicide. A local match of fifty percent of the cost of application of
the herbicide is required. Permits and approvals necessary to implement the
demonstration project may be conditioned by the department to protect public
health and the environment, but approval may not be withheld.

(((25)))
(23) Within the amounts provided in this section, the department shall
provide funds to Yakima county superior court for staff and associated costs to
support the Yakima river basin water rights adjudication.

Sec.
1302. 1998
c 346 s 304 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 20,489,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999) ... $ ((20,595,000))

20,573,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 3,122,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 59,000

Winter
Recreation Program Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((779,000))

759,000

Off
Road Vehicle Account Appropriation......... $ 251,000

Snowmobile
Account Appropriation............... $ ((3,260,000))

3,240,000

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation $ 321,000

Public
Safety and Education Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 48,000

Industrial
Insurance Premium Refund

Appropriation.............................. $ 10,000

Waste
Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control

Appropriation.............................. $ 34,000

Water
Trail Program Account Appropriation...... $ 14,000

Parks
Renewal and Stewardship Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((25,894,000))

25,863,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((74,876,000))

74,783,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$189,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan agency action items
P&RC-01 and P&RC-03.

(2)
$264,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is provided for boater
programs state-wide and for implementation of the Puget Sound work plan.

(3)
$45,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 is
provided solely for a feasibility study of a public/private effort to establish
a reserve for recreation and environmental studies in southwest Kitsap county.

(4)
Within the funds provided in this section, the state parks and recreation
commission shall provide to the legislature a status report on implementation
of the recommendations contained in the 1994 study on the restructuring of
Washington state parks. This status report shall include an evaluation of the
campsite reservation system including the identification of any incremental
changes in revenues associated with implementation of the system and a progress
report on other enterprise activities being undertaken by the commission. The
report may also include recommendations on other revenue generating options.
In preparing the report, the commission is encouraged to work with interested
parties to develop a long-term strategy to support the park system. The
commission shall provide this report by December 1, 1997.

(5)
$48,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$202,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
are provided solely for development of underwater park programs and
facilities. The department shall work with the underwater parks program task
force to develop specific plans for the use of these funds.

(6)
Fees approved by the state parks and recreation commission in 1997 for camping,
snow parks, wood debris collection, and Fort Worden state park are authorized
to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW 43.135.055.

(((7)
$20,000 of the winter recreation program account appropriation and $20,000 of
the snowmobile account appropriation are provided solely for a grant for the
operation of the Northwest avalanche center.))

Sec.
1303. 1997
c 149 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE ENVIRONMENTAL HEARINGS OFFICE

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)................ $ 780,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)................ $ ((773,000))

817,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ ((1,553,000))

1,597,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: $4,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$4,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided
solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5119 (forest practices appeals
board). If this bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, $4,000 of the general
fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $4,000 of the general fund
appropriation for fiscal year 1999 shall lapse.

Sec.
1304. 1998
c 346 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 35,857,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((44,998,000))

44,902,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((75,037,000))

74,972,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 26,983,000

Off
Road Vehicle Account Appropriation......... $ 488,000

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,593,000

Public
Safety and Education Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 586,000

Industrial
Insurance Premium Refund

Appropriation.............................. $ 120,000

Recreational
Fisheries Enhancement

Appropriation.......................... ... $ ((2,387,000))

2,787,000

Warm
Water Game Fish Account Appropriation..... $ 2,419,000

Wildlife
Account Appropriation.................. $............................. ((44,122,000))

46,158,000

Game
Special Wildlife Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,911,000

Game
Special Wildlife Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 10,844,000

Game
Special Wildlife Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 350,000

Oil
Spill Administration Account Appropriation. $ 843,000

Environmental
Excellence Account Appropriation. $ 20,000

Eastern
Washington Pheasant Enhancement Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 547,000

Regional
Fisheries Enhancement--Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 750,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((253,855,000))

256,130,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$1,181,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $1,181,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan
agency action items DFW-01, DFW-03, DFW-04, and DFW-8 through DFW-15.

(2)
$188,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $155,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for a maintenance and inspection program for
department-owned dams. The department shall submit a report to the governor
and the appropriate legislative committees by October 1, 1998, on the status of
department-owned dams. This report shall provide a recommendation, including a
cost estimate, on whether each facility should continue to be maintained or
should be decommissioned.

(3)
$832,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $825,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely to implement salmon recovery activities and other
actions required to respond to federal listings of salmon species under the
endangered species act.

(4)
$350,000 of the wildlife account appropriation, $72,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998, and $73,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for control
and eradication of class B designate weeds on department owned and managed
lands. The amounts from the general fund‑-state appropriations are
provided solely for control of spartina.

(5)
$140,000 of the wildlife account appropriation is provided solely for a
cooperative effort with the department of agriculture for research and
eradication of purple loosestrife on state lands.

(6)
In controlling weeds on state-owned lands, the department shall use the most
cost-effective methods available, including chemical control where appropriate,
and the department shall report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by January 1, 1998, on control methods, costs, and acres treated
during the previous year.

(7)
$193,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998,
$194,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999, and
$300,000 of the wildlife account appropriation are provided solely for the
design and development of an automated license system.

(8)
The department is directed to offer for sale its Cessna 421 aircraft by June
30, 1998. Proceeds from the sale shall be deposited in the wildlife account.

(9)
$500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely to continue the department's habitat partnerships
program during the 1997-99 biennium.

(10)
$350,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$350,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for purchase of monitoring equipment necessary to fully
implement mass marking of coho salmon.

(11)
$238,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $219,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1985 (landscape management plans). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
1997, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(12)
$150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for a contract with the United States department of agriculture
to carry out animal damage control projects throughout the state related to
cougars, bears, and coyotes.

(13)
$97,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$98,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely to implement animal damage control programs for Canada geese in
the lower Columbia river basin.

(14)
$170,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998,
$170,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999, and $360,000
of the wildlife account appropriation are provided solely to hire additional
enforcement officers to address problem wildlife throughout the state.

(15)
$133,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$133,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5442 (flood control
permitting). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amounts provided
in this subsection shall lapse.

(16)
$100,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation is provided
solely for grants to the regional fisheries enhancement groups.

(17)
$547,000 of the eastern Washington pheasant enhancement account appropriation
is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5104
(pheasant enhancement program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(18)
$150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely to hire Washington conservation corps crews to maintain
department-owned and managed lands.

(19)
The entire environmental excellence account appropriation is provided solely for
implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1866
(environmental excellence). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the
entire appropriation is null and void.

(20)
$156,000 of the recreational fisheries enhancement appropriation is provided
solely for Substitute Senate Bill No. 5102 (fishing license surcharge). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

(21)
$25,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$25,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for staffing and operation of the Tennant Lake interpretive
center.

(22)
It is the intent of the legislature that, within the general fund‑-state
appropriations provided in this section, the department shall prioritize its
resources to provide expedited assistance to businesses seeking permitting and
technical assistance for rural economic development projects.

(23)
$750,000 of the regional fisheries enhancement‑-federal appropriation is
provided solely for the regional fisheries enhancement groups. The amount in
this section may be spent for project identification, design, permitting, and
implementation; volunteer coordination; and administrative costs as approved
under RCW 75.50.100 and 75.50.115(1)(d). All amounts not committed to approved
project, volunteer coordination, or administrative costs by May 31, 1998, shall
be made available to any of the regional fisheries enhancement groups that have
submitted project approval requests that exceed their available funding from
the regional fisheries enhancement group account and the regional fisheries
enhancement salmonid recovery account. Redistribution of the moneys shall be
based on the criteria established in RCW 75.50.115(1)(e), and shall ensure to
the greatest extent possible that the funds are spent during the 1998 in-stream
season.

(24)
$700,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely for grants to habitat restoration lead entities formed in
accordance with sections 7 through 10 of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No.
2496 (salmon recovery planning) for administrative activities and development
of habitat-restoration project lists. If any of these sections of the bill
are not enacted by June 30, 1998, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse. Of this amount, $100,000 is provided as a grant to the regional
committee lead entity for administrative activities in the Snake river
evolutionarily significant unit.

(25)
$50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely for operation of the independent science panel in accordance
with section 6 of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2496 (salmon recovery
planning). If this section of the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(26)
$450,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely for fish passage technical assistance to local governments,
volunteer groups, and regional fisheries enhancement groups in accordance with
Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2496 (salmon recovery planning). The
department shall also contract with the department of transportation to train
staff at the department of transportation to become proficient in providing
fish passage technical assistance. If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(27)
(($250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely for excessive deer and elk damage claims.

(28)))
$393,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6324 (fish
remote site incubators). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((29)))
(28) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
1999, $400,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation, and $225,000 of the
general fund--local appropriation are provided solely to contract for the mass
marking of all appropriate state-wide department chinook salmon hatchery
production in accordance with Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6264 (chinook
salmon mass marking). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((30)))
(29) $3,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 is provided solely for salmon restoration projects funded according to
sections 7 through 10 of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2496 (salmon recovery
planning). Of this amount, $500,000 is provided solely for a block grant to
the conservation districts located in the Snake river evolutionarily
significant unit for habitat restoration projects. If any of these sections of
the bill are not enacted by June 30, 1998, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(((31)))
(30) $1,170,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 and $3,500,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely to implement a license buy-back program for commercial fishing licenses.

(((32)))
(31) $5,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1998 and $40,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1999 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
6114 (nonindigenous aquatic species). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((33)
$1,000,000)) (32) $500,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is provided solely for purchasing computer
equipment to support implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6330
(fish and wildlife licenses). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(33)
$500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided to improve information systems capabilities as identified in the
independent business practices assessment completed in November 1998.

(34)
$39,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely for improvements to business practices within the agency.

Sec.
1305. 1998
c 346 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 23,767,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((24,410,000))

32,080,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((1,156,000))

1,244,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 422,000

Forest
Development Account Appropriation........ $...................................... ((49,963,000))

49,895,000

Off
Road Vehicle Account Appropriation ........ $ 3,628,000

Surveys
and Maps Account Appropriation......... $ 2,088,000

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,869,000

Resource
Management Cost Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((89,769,000))

89,667,000

Waste
Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control

Appropriation.............................. $ 450,000

Surface
Mining Reclamation Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,420,000

Aquatic
Land Dredged Material Disposal Site Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 751,000

Natural
Resources Conservation Areas Stewardship

Account
Appropriation...................... $ 77,000

Air
Pollution Control Account Appropriation.... $ 890,000

Metals
Mining Account Appropriation............. $ 62,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((204,472,000))

211,310,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$7,017,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and (($6,900,000)) $13,290,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for emergency fire
suppression.

(2)
$18,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998,
$18,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999,
and $957,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan agency
action items DNR-01, DNR-02, and DNR-04.

(3)
$300,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
is provided solely for design and implementation of revisions to the
department's geographic information system hydrography and transportation data
layers.

(4)
$450,000 of the resource management cost account appropriation is provided
solely for the control and eradication of class B designate weeds on state
lands. The department shall use the most cost-effective methods available,
including chemical control where appropriate, and report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by January 1, 1998, on control methods, costs,
and acres treated during the previous year.

(((4)))
(5) $1,332,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1998 and $1,713,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for fire protection activities.

(((5)))
(6) $541,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1998 and $549,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for the stewardship of natural area
preserves, natural resource conservation areas, and the operation of the
natural heritage program.

(((6)))
(7) $2,300,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation is
provided for the department's portion of the Eagle Harbor settlement.

(((7)))
(8) $195,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1998 and $220,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 1985 (landscape management plans). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 1997, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((8)))
(9) $600,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1998 and $600,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for the cooperative monitoring,
evaluation, and research projects related to implementation of the
timber-fish-wildlife agreement.

(((9)))
(10) $6,568,000 of the forest development account appropriation is
provided solely for silviculture activities on forest board lands. To the
extent that forest board counties apply for reconveyance of lands pursuant to
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5325 (county land transfers), the amount provided in
this subsection shall be reduced by an amount equal to the estimated
silvicultural expenditures planned in each county that applies for
reconveyance.

(((12)))
(11) $71,000 of the resource management cost account appropriation is
provided solely for a study of the current method for determining water-dependent
rents in accordance with Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6156 (state aquatic
lands leases). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((13)))
(12) $117,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 is provided solely for a geographic information systems inventory of
Washington sand, gravel, and construction rock resources.

(((14)))
(13) $50,000 of the resource management cost account appropriation is
provided solely for a field study of biological control methods for eradication
of spartina.

(((15)))
(14) $50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1999 is provided solely for a study of potential finfish net-pen
aquaculture sites in the Strait of Juan de Fuca and along the Pacific coast.

(15) $1,100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation
for fiscal year 1999 is appropriated to the natural resources conservation
areas stewardship account and is provided solely to match $500,000 in private
funding for management of natural area preserves and natural resources
conservation areas. If the department has not entered into a memorandum of
understanding with the grantor regarding the use of the $500,000 by June 30,
1999, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(End of part)

PART
XIV

TRANSPORTATION‑-SUPPLEMENTAL
APPROPRIATIONS

Sec.
1401. 1998
c 346 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF LICENSING

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 4,686,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((4,717,000))

4,912,000

Architects'
License Account Appropriation...... $ 829,000

Cemetery
Account Appropriation.................. $ 197,000

Professional
Engineers' Account Appropriation... $........................................... ((2,700,000))

2,699,000

Real
Estate Commission Account Appropriation... $ ((7,062,000))

7,060,000

Master
License Account Appropriation........... $ ((6,963,000))

6,961,000

Uniform
Commercial Code Account Appropriation... $........................................... ((3,521,000))

3,520,000

Real
Estate Education Account Appropriation.... $ 606,000

Funeral
Directors And Embalmers Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 418,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((31,699,000))

31,888,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$21,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $22,000 of the
general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation are provided solely to implement
House Bill No. 1827 or Senate Bill No. 5754 (boxing, martial arts, wrestling).
If neither bill is enacted by June 30, 1997, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(2)
$40,000 of the master license account appropriation is provided solely to implement
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5483 (whitewater river outfitters). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(3)
$229,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $195,000 of the
general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of Senate Bill No. 5997 (cosmetology inspections). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(4)
$31,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation, $1,000 of the
general fund fiscal 1999 appropriation, $7,000 of the architects' license
account appropriation, $18,000 of the professional engineers' account
appropriation, $14,000 of the real estate commission account appropriation,
$40,000 of the master license account appropriation, and $3,000 of the funeral
directors and embalmers account appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 3901 (implementing welfare reform).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(5)
$17,000 of the professional engineers' account appropriation is provided solely
to implement Senate Bill No. 5266 (engineers/land surveyors). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(6)
$110,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation is provided solely
to implement Senate Bill No. 5998 (cosmetology advisory board). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(7)
$11,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $2,000 of the
general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation are provided solely to implement
Substitute House Bill No. 1748 or Substitute Senate Bill No. 5513 (vessel
registration). If neither bill is enacted by June 30, 1997, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8)(a)
Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, during the 1997-99 fiscal biennium, the department
may increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor in the appraisers and
camp resorts programs; however, such increases shall not exceed an annual
increase of eight percent.

(b)
Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, during the 1997-99 fiscal biennium, the department
may increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor in the professional
athletics, employment agencies, and security guards programs to the extent
necessary to defray the costs of the administration of these programs as set
forth in RCW 43.24.086.

(c)
Before raising fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor pursuant to this
subsection, the department shall notify the chairs and ranking minority members
of the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature.

(9)
Within the amounts provided in this section, the department shall provide
information detailing each specific component of the overhead costs allocated
to each program within the business and professions division. The department
shall establish procedures to allow each program within the business and
professions division to review and modify its business processes in order to
reduce administrative costs. The department of licensing shall provide a
report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by October 1, 1998,
detailing the specific procedures established pursuant to the requirements of
this subsection.

(10)
$110,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation is provided solely
for the implementation of the Substitute Senate Bill No. 6507 (cosmetology
advisory board). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(11)
$75,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation is provided solely
for costs associated with fully implementing chapter 178, Laws of 1997
(cosmetology inspections).

(12)
$200,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation is provided solely
for deposit in the impaired driving safety account.

Sec.
1402. 1998
c 346 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE
PATROL

General
Fund--State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 8,312,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((21,791,000))

21,855,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 5,784,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 341,000

Public
Safety and Education Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,483,000

County
Criminal Justice Assistance Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,905,000

Municipal
Criminal Justice Assistance Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,573,000

Fire
Service Trust Account Appropriation........ $ 92,000

Fire
Service Training Account Appropriation.... $ 2,295,000

State
Toxics Control Account Appropriation..... $ 439,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 570,000

Fingerprint
Identification Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,220,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((52,805,000))

52,869,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$254,000 of the fingerprint identification account appropriation is provided
solely for an automated system that will facilitate the access of criminal
history records remotely by computer or telephone for preemployment background
checks and other non-law enforcement purposes. The agency shall submit an
implementation status report to the office of financial management and the
legislature by September 1, 1997.

(2)
$264,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided solely
for a feasibility study to develop a criminal investigation computer system.
The study will report on the feasibility of developing a system that uses
incident-based reporting as its foundation, consistent with FBI standards. The
system will have the capability of connecting with local law enforcement
jurisdictions as well as fire protection agencies conducting arson
investigations. The study will report on the system requirements for
incorporating case management, intelligence data, imaging, and geographic
information. The system will also provide links to existing crime information
databases such as WASIS and WACIC. The agency shall submit a copy of the
proposed study workplan to the office of financial management and the
department of information services for approval prior to expenditure. A final
report shall be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature, the
office of financial management, and the department of information services no
later than June 30, 1998.

(3)
Pursuant to chapter 43.135 RCW, during the 1997-99 fiscal biennium, the
Washington state patrol is authorized to raise existing fees charged for
background fingerprint checks on current and potential school district and
educational service district employees by six dollars.

(4)
$166,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$499,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely as state matching funds required to complete changes to the
WACIC and WASIS systems.

(5)
To address year 2000 concerns about the automated fingerprint identification
system (AFIS), the Washington state patrol may contract with an
intergovernmental consortium for the use of a year 2000 compatible AFIS
system. Under this approach, the state patrol would begin paying a monthly
usage fee starting in fiscal year 2000.

(6) $58,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 1999 is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1172 (sex
offender registration). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(End of part)

PART
XV

EDUCATION‑-SUPPLEMENTAL
APPROPRIATIONS

Sec.
1501. 1998
c 346 s 502 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR STATE
ADMINISTRATION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 20,423,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((58,171,000))

58,323,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 49,439,000

Public
Safety and Education Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,598,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,672,000

Education
Savings Account Appropriation........ $ 39,312,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((173,615,000))

173,767,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
AGENCY OPERATIONS

(a)
$394,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $394,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for the operation and expenses of the state board of education,
including basic education assistance activities.

(b)(i)
$250,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for enhancing computer systems and support in the office of
superintendent of public instruction. These amounts shall be used to: Make a
database of school information available electronically to schools, state
government, and the general public; reduce agency and school district administrative
costs through more effective use of technology; and replace paper reporting and
publication to the extent feasible with electronic media. The superintendent,
in cooperation with the commission on student learning, shall develop a state
student record system including elements reflecting student achievement. The
system shall be made available to the office of financial management and the
legislature with suitable safeguards of student confidentiality. The
superintendent shall report to the office of financial management and the
legislative fiscal committees by December 1 of each year of the biennium on the
progress and plans for the expenditure of these amounts.

(ii)
The superintendent, in cooperation with the commission on student learning, shall
develop a feasibility plan for a state student record system, including
elements reflecting student academic achievement on goals 1 and 2 under RCW
28A.150.210. The feasibility plan shall be made available to the office of
financial management and the fiscal and education committees of the legislature
for approval before a student records database is established, and shall
identify data elements to be collected and suitable safeguards of student
confidentiality and proper use of database records, with particular attention
to eliminating unnecessary and intrusive data about nonacademic related
information.

(c)
$348,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for administration of the traffic safety education program, including
in-service training related to instruction in the risks of driving while under
the influence of alcohol and other drugs.

(d)
$50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5394 (school audit
resolutions).

(e)
The superintendent shall conduct a study and make recommendations to the 1999
legislature regarding a definition of and standards for skills centers. The
standards shall be related to the cost differential of skills centers as
compared to secondary vocational education allocations provided in the
appropriations act and other relevant factors. The study shall also address
proposals for new skills centers known as of August 31, 1998, and compare and
analyze, insofar as possible, the proposals with the recommended standards.
The study shall be submitted to the governor and the appropriate committees of
the legislature by November 25, 1998.

(f)
The superintendent shall prepare a study which compares the state's
administrative and statutory requirements to provide special education with the
requirements of federal law. A preliminary report shall be provided to the
policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by October 15, 1998, and a
final report shall be provided by December 15, 1998.

(2)
STATE-WIDE PROGRAMS

(a)
$2,174,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for
in-service training and educational programs conducted by the Pacific Science
Center.

(b)
$63,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for
operation of the Cispus environmental learning center.

(c)
$2,754,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for
educational centers, including state support activities. $100,000 of this
amount is provided to help stabilize funding through distribution among
existing education centers that are currently funded by the state at an amount
less than $100,000 a biennium.

(d)
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for an
organization in southwest Washington that received funding from the Spokane
educational center in the 1995-97 biennium and provides educational services to
students who have dropped out.

(e)
$2,148,000 of the general fund--state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$2,151,000 of the general fund--state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of reading initiatives to improve reading in
early grades as enacted by the 1997 legislature. Of this amount, $4,300,000 is
provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2042. Funds
shall be used solely for the selection and purchase of the second grade reading
tests in accordance with section 2 of the bill, scoring costs associated with
the administration of the tests in the 1998-99 school year in accordance with
section 5 of the bill, and grants to school districts in accordance with
sections 4 and 7 of the bill.

(f)
$3,672,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation
and $2,250,000 of the public safety education account appropriation are
provided solely for matching grants to enhance security in schools. Not more
than seventy-five percent of a district's total expenditures for school
security in any school year may be paid from a grant under this subsection.
The grants shall be expended solely for the costs of employing or contracting
for building security monitors in schools during school hours and school
events. Of the amount provided in this subsection, at least $2,850,000 shall
be spent for grants to districts that, during the 1988-89 school year, employed
or contracted for security monitors in schools during school hours. However,
these grants may be used only for increases in school district expenditures for
school security over expenditure levels for the 1988-89 school year.

(g)
$200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998,
$200,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999,
and $400,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation transferred from the
department of health are provided solely for a program that provides grants to
school districts for media campaigns promoting sexual abstinence and addressing
the importance of delaying sexual activity, pregnancy, and childbearing until
individuals are ready to nurture and support their children. Grants to the
school districts shall be for projects that are substantially designed and
produced by students. The grants shall require a local private sector match
equal to one-half of the state grant, which may include in-kind contribution of
technical or other assistance from consultants or firms involved in public
relations, advertising broadcasting, and graphics or video production or other
related fields.

(h)
$1,500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
are provided solely for school district petitions to juvenile court for truant
students as provided in RCW 28A.225.030 and 28A.225.035. Allocation of this
money to school districts shall be based on the number of petitions filed.

(i)
$300,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for alcohol
and drug prevention programs pursuant to RCW 66.08.180.

(j)(i)
$19,656,000 of the education savings account appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $19,656,000 of the education savings account appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for matching grants and related state activities to
provide school district consortia with programs utilizing technology to improve
learning. A maximum of $150,000 each fiscal year of this amount is provided
for administrative support and oversight of the K-20 network by the
superintendent of public instruction. The superintendent of public instruction
shall convene a technology grants committee representing private sector
technology, school districts, and educational service districts to recommend to
the superintendent grant proposals that have the best plans for improving
student learning through innovative curriculum using technology as a learning
tool and evaluating the effectiveness of the curriculum innovations. After
considering the technology grants committee recommendations, the superintendent
shall make matching grant awards, including granting at least fifteen percent
of funds on the basis of criteria in (ii)(A) through (C) of this subsection
(2)(j).

(ii)
Priority for award of funds will be to (A) school districts most in need of
assistance due to financial limits, (B) school districts least prepared to take
advantage of technology as a means of improving student learning, and (C)
school districts in economically distressed areas. The superintendent of
public instruction, in consultation with the technology grants committee, shall
propose options to the committee for identifying and prioritizing districts
according to criteria in (i) and (ii) of this subsection (2)(j).

(iii)
Options for review criteria to be considered by the superintendent of public
instruction include, but are not limited to, free and reduced lunches, levy
revenues, ending fund balances, equipment inventories, and surveys of
technology preparedness. An "economically distressed area" is (A) a county
with an unemployment rate that is at least twenty percent above the state-wide
average for the previous three years; (B) a county that has experienced sudden
and severe or long-term and severe loss of employment, or erosion of its
economic base resulting in decline of its dominant industries; or (C) a
district within a county which (I) has at least seventy percent of its families
and unrelated individuals with incomes below eighty percent of the county's
median income for families and unrelated individuals; and (II) has an
unemployment rate which is at least forty percent higher than the county's
unemployment rate.

(k)
$50,000 of the general fund--state appropriations is provided as matching funds
for district contributions to provide analysis of the efficiency of school
district business practices. The superintendent of public instruction shall
establish criteria, make awards, and provide a report to the fiscal committees
of the legislature by December 15, 1997, on the progress and details of analysis
funded under this subsection (2)(k).

(l)
(($19,797,000)) $19,702,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is provided solely for the purchase of
classroom instructional materials and supplies. The superintendent shall
allocate the funds at a maximum rate of $20.82 per full-time equivalent
student, beginning September 1, 1998, and ending June 30, 1999. The
expenditure of the funds shall be determined at each school site by the
individual teacher. School districts shall distribute all funds received to
school buildings without deduction.

(m)
$15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation is provided solely to assist
local districts vocational education programs in applying for low frequency FM
radio licenses with the federal communications commission.

(n)
$35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation is provided solely to the
state board of education to design a program to encourage high school students
and other adults to pursue careers as vocational education teachers in the
subject matter of agriculture.

(o)
$25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for allocation to the primary coordinators of the state
geographic alliance to improve the teaching of geography in schools.

(p)
$1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation is provided for state
administrative costs and start-up grants for alternative programs and services
that improve instruction and learning for at-risk and expelled students
consistent with the objectives of Engrossed House Bill No. 1581 (disruptive
students/offenders). Each grant application shall contain proposed performance
indicators and an evaluation plan to measure the success of the program and its
impact on improved student learning. Applications shall contain the
applicant's plan for maintaining the program and/or services after the grant
period, shall address the needs of students who cannot be accommodated within
the framework of existing school programs or services and shall address how the
applicant will serve any student within the proposed program's target age range
regardless of the reason for truancy, suspension, expulsion, or other
disciplinary action. Up to $50,000 per year may be used by the superintendent
of public instruction for grant administration. The superintendent shall
submit an evaluation of the alternative program start-up grants provided under
this section, and section 501(2)(q), chapter 283, Laws of 1996, to the fiscal
and education committees of the legislature by November 15, 1998. Grants shall
be awarded to applicants showing the greatest potential for improved student
learning for at-risk students including:

(i)
Students who have been suspended, expelled, or are subject to other
disciplinary actions;

(ii)
Students with unexcused absences who need intervention from community truancy
boards or family support programs;

(iii)
Students who have left school; and

(iv)
Students involved with the court system.

The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall prepare a report
describing student recruitment, program offerings, staffing practices, and
available indicators of program effectiveness of alternative education programs
funded with state and, to the extent information is available, local funds.
The report shall contain a plan for conducting an evaluation of the educational
effectiveness of alternative education programs.

(q)
$1,600,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for
grants for magnet schools to be distributed as recommended by the
superintendent of public instruction pursuant to chapter 232, section 516(13),
Laws of 1992.

(r)
$4,300,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for
complex need grants. Grants shall be provided according to amounts shown in
LEAP Document 30C as developed on April 27, 1997, at 03:00 hours.

(s)
$17,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
6509 (successful readers act). Of this amount, $9,000,000 is provided solely
for beginning reading instructional programs pursuant to section 2(1) of the
bill and $8,000,000 is provided solely for volunteer tutor and mentor programs
pursuant to section 2(2) of the bill. The superintendent shall notify
districts of the availability of the funds by April 15th, 1998, and shall
include in the notification limitations on rates for stipends and other cost
factors. Stipends authorized under section 2(5) of the bill shall not exceed
five days per program at a rate not to exceed $222 per five-hour day, including
fringe benefits. The superintendent shall establish allocation guidelines for
other cost factors associated with providing the programs. If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 1998, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(t)
$15,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
are provided solely for a study and recommendations related to education of
offenders prosecuted as adults in accordance with Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6600 (correctional facilities education program). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(u)
$375,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely for increased costs of providing a norm-referenced test to all
third grade students and retests of certain third grade students and other
costs in accordance with Second Substitute House Bill No. 2849 (student
achievement). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the amount provided
in this subsection shall lapse.

(v)
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely for development and operation of a skills center in Port
Angeles, contingent on meeting the standard for qualifying for skills center
funding as developed by the superintendent of public instruction in subsection
(1)(e) of this section.

(w)
$400,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund--state appropriation is provided
solely for matching funds to improve the fiscal and student data capabilities
of the Washington school information processing cooperative. The funds shall
be allocated only if at least 267 school districts remain members of the
cooperative for the 1998-99 school year.

(x)
$120,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely for allocation to the Olympia school district for operation of
the legislative page school. $46,000 of this amount may be expended only if
the Olympia school district is not permitted to report the page school
enrollment for apportionment purposes for the 1997-98 school year. The
remainder of this amount is for operation of the page school in the 1998-99
school year and shall be based on the state average basic education
apportionment amount per student multiplied by the number of full-time
equivalent students.

Sec.
1502. 1998
c 346 s 503 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR GENERAL
APPORTIONMENT (BASIC EDUCATION)

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 3,405,645,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((3,473,603,000))

3,449,571,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((6,879,248,000))

6,855,216,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation for fiscal year 1998 includes such funds as are necessary for
the remaining months of the 1996-97 school year.

(2)
Allocations for certificated staff salaries for the 1997-98 and 1998-99 school
years shall be determined using formula‑generated staff units calculated
pursuant to this subsection. Staff allocations for small school enrollments in
(d) through (f) of this subsection shall be reduced for vocational full-time
equivalent enrollments. Staff allocations for small school enrollments in
grades K-6 shall be the greater of that generated under (a) of this subsection,
or under (d) and (e) of this subsection. Certificated staffing allocations
shall be as follows:

(a)
On the basis of each 1,000 average annual full-time equivalent enrollments,
excluding full-time equivalent enrollment otherwise recognized for certificated
staff unit allocations under (c) through (f) of this subsection:

(i)
Four certificated administrative staff units per thousand full-time equivalent
students in grades K-12;

(ii)
49 certificated instructional staff units per thousand full-time equivalent
students in grades K-3;

(iii)
An additional 5.3 certificated instructional staff units for grades K-3. Any
funds allocated for these additional certificated units shall not be considered
as basic education funding;

(A)
Funds provided under this subsection (2)(a)(iii) in excess of the amount required
to maintain the statutory minimum ratio established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b)
shall be allocated only if the district documents an actual ratio equal to or
greater than 54.3 certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time
equivalent students in grades K-3. For any school district documenting a lower
certificated instructional staff ratio, the allocation shall be based on the
district's actual grades K-3 certificated instructional staff ratio achieved in
that school year, or the statutory minimum ratio established under RCW
28A.150.260(2)(b), if greater;

(B)
Districts at or above 51.0 certificated instructional staff per one thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades K-3 may dedicate up to 1.3 of the 54.3
funding ratio to employ additional classified instructional assistants assigned
to basic education classrooms in grades K-3. For purposes of documenting a
district's staff ratio under this section, funds used by the district to employ
additional classified instructional assistants shall be converted to a
certificated staff equivalent and added to the district's actual certificated
instructional staff ratio. Additional classified instructional assistants, for
the purposes of this subsection, shall be determined using the 1989-90 school
year as the base year;

(C)
Any district maintaining a ratio equal to or greater than 54.3 certificated
instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-3
may use allocations generated under this subsection (2)(a)(iii) in excess of
that required to maintain the minimum ratio established under RCW
28A.150.260(2)(b) to employ additional basic education certificated
instructional staff or classified instructional assistants in grades 4-6.
Funds allocated under this subsection (2)(a)(iii) shall only be expended to
reduce class size in grades K-6. No more than 1.3 of the certificated
instructional funding ratio amount may be expended for provision of classified
instructional assistants; and

(iv)
Forty‑six certificated instructional staff units per thousand full-time
equivalent students in grades 4-12;

(b)
For school districts with a minimum enrollment of 250 full-time equivalent
students whose full-time equivalent student enrollment count in a given month
exceeds the first of the month full-time equivalent enrollment count by 5
percent, an additional state allocation of 110 percent of the share that such
increased enrollment would have generated had such additional full-time
equivalent students been included in the normal enrollment count for that
particular month;

(c)
On the basis of full-time equivalent enrollment in:

(i)
Vocational education programs approved by the superintendent of public
instruction, a maximum of 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08
certificated administrative staff units for each 18.3 full-time equivalent
vocational students for the 1997-98 school year and for each 19.5 full-time
equivalent vocational students in the 1998-99 school year. Beginning with the
1998-99 school year, districts documenting staffing ratios of less than 1
certificated staff per 19.5 students shall be allocated the greater of the
total ratio in subsections (2)(a)(i) and (iv) of this section or the actual
documented ratio;

(ii)
Skills center programs approved by the superintendent of public instruction for
skills centers approved prior to September 1, 1997, 0.92 certificated
instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative units for each
16.67 full-time equivalent vocational students;

(iii)
Indirect cost charges, as defined by the superintendent of public instruction,
to vocational-secondary programs shall not exceed 10 percent; and

(iv)
Vocational full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported on the same
monthly basis as the enrollment for students eligible for basic support, and
payments shall be adjusted for reported vocational enrollments on the same
monthly basis as those adjustments for enrollment for students eligible for
basic support.

(d)
For districts enrolling not more than twenty‑five average annual
full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within
any school district which have been judged to be remote and necessary by the
state board of education and enroll not more than twenty‑five average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8:

(i)
For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76 certificated
instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units for
enrollment of not more than five students, plus one‑twentieth of a certificated
instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled; and

(ii)
For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.32 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of
not more than five students, plus one‑tenth of a certificated
instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled;

(e)
For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than twenty‑five
but not more than one hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in
grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district which
enroll more than twenty‑five average annual full-time equivalent students
in grades K-8 and have been judged to be remote and necessary by the state
board of education:

(i)
For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time equivalent students in
grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated
administrative staff units; and

(ii)
For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time equivalent students in
grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08
certificated administrative staff units;

(f)
For districts operating no more than two high schools with enrollments of less
than three hundred average annual full-time equivalent students, for enrollment
in grades 9-12 in each such school, other than alternative schools:

(i)
For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any grades 9-12 but no
more than twenty‑five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades
K-12, four and one‑half certificated instructional staff units and one‑quarter
of a certificated administrative staff unit;

(ii)
For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine certificated
instructional staff units and one‑half of a certificated administrative
staff unit for the first sixty average annual full time equivalent students,
and additional staff units based on a ratio of 0.8732 certificated
instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated administrative staff units
per each additional forty‑three and one‑half average annual full
time equivalent students.

Units
calculated under (f)(ii) of this subsection shall be reduced by certificated
staff units at the rate of forty‑six certificated instructional staff
units and four certificated administrative staff units per thousand vocational
full-time equivalent students.

(g)
For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than seventy
annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty
students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades 1-8 program, an additional
one-half of a certificated instructional staff unit; and

(h)
For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than fifty annual
average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty
students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades 1-6 program, an additional
one‑half of a certificated instructional staff unit.

(3)
Allocations for classified salaries for the 1997‑98 and 1998‑99
school years shall be calculated using formula‑generated classified staff
units determined as follows:

(a)
For enrollments generating certificated staff unit allocations under subsection
(2)(d) through (h) of this section, one classified staff unit for each three
certificated staff units allocated under such subsections;

(b)
For all other enrollment in grades K-12, including vocational full-time
equivalent enrollments, one classified staff unit for each sixty average annual
full-time equivalent students; and

(c)
For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more than fifty annual
average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty
students, an additional one‑half of a classified staff unit.

(4)
Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of 20.22 percent in
the 1997‑98 and 1998-99 school years for certificated salary allocations
provided under subsection (2) of this section, and a rate of 18.65 percent in
the 1997‑98 and 1998-99 school years for classified salary allocations
provided under subsection (3) of this section.

(5)
Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the maintenance rate
specified in section 504(2) of this act, based on the number of benefit units
determined as follows:

(a)
The number of certificated staff units determined in subsection (2) of this
section; and

(b)
The number of classified staff units determined in subsection (3) of this
section multiplied by 1.152. This factor is intended to adjust allocations so
that, for the purposes of distributing insurance benefits, full-time equivalent
classified employees may be calculated on the basis of 1440 hours of work per
year, with no individual employee counted as more than one full-time
equivalent.

(6)(a)
For nonemployee-related costs associated with each certificated staff unit
allocated under subsection (2)(a), (b), and (d) through (h) of this section,
there shall be provided a maximum of $7,950 per certificated staff unit in the
1997‑98 school year and a maximum of $8,053 per certificated staff unit
in the 1998-99 school year.

(b)
For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational certificated
staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i) of this section, there shall be
provided a maximum of $15,147 per certificated staff unit in the 1997‑98
school year and a maximum of $19,775 per certificated staff unit in the 1998-99
school year.

(c)
For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational certificated
staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(ii) of this section, there shall
be provided a maximum of $15,147 per certificated staff unit in the 1997-98
school year and a maximum of $15,344 per certificated staff unit in the 1998-99
school year.

(7)
Allocations for substitute costs for classroom teachers shall be distributed at
a maintenance rate of $354.64 per allocated classroom teachers exclusive of
salary increase amounts provided in section 504 of this act. Solely for the
purposes of this subsection, allocated classroom teachers shall be equal to the
number of certificated instructional staff units allocated under subsection (2)
of this section, multiplied by the ratio between the number of actual basic
education certificated teachers and the number of actual basic education
certificated instructional staff reported state‑wide for the 1996-97
school year.

(8)
Any school district board of directors may petition the superintendent of
public instruction by submission of a resolution adopted in a public meeting to
reduce or delay any portion of its basic education allocation for any school
year. The superintendent of public instruction shall approve such reduction or
delay if it does not impair the district's financial condition. Any delay
shall not be for more than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have
no impact on levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort
assistance pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.

(9)
The superintendent may distribute a maximum of $6,114,000 outside the basic
education formula during fiscal years 1998 and 1999 as follows:

(a)
For fire protection for school districts located in a fire protection district
as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter 52.04 RCW, a maximum of
$447,000 may be expended in fiscal year 1998 and a maximum of $453,000 may be
expended in fiscal year 1999;

(b)
For summer vocational programs at skills centers, a maximum of $1,948,000 may
be expended each fiscal year;

(c)
A maximum of $318,000 may be expended for school district emergencies; and

(d)
A maximum of $500,000 per fiscal year may be expended for programs providing
skills training for secondary students who are enrolled in extended day school-to-work
programs, as approved by the superintendent of public instruction. The funds
shall be allocated at a rate not to exceed $500 per full-time equivalent
student enrolled in those programs.

(10)
For the purposes of RCW 84.52.0531, the increase per full-time equivalent
student in state basic education appropriations provided under this act,
including appropriations for salary and benefits increases, is 2.5 percent from
the 1996‑97 school year to the 1997‑98 school year, and 1.1 percent
from the 1997‑98 school year to the 1998‑99 school year.

(11)
If two or more school districts consolidate and each district was receiving
additional basic education formula staff units pursuant to subsection (2)(b)
through (h) of this section, the following shall apply:

(a)
For three school years following consolidation, the number of basic education
formula staff units shall not be less than the number of basic education
formula staff units received by the districts in the school year prior to the
consolidation; and

(b)
For the fourth through eighth school years following consolidation, the
difference between the basic education formula staff units received by the
districts for the school year prior to consolidation and the basic education
formula staff units after consolidation pursuant to subsection (2)(a) through
(h) of this section shall be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.

Sec.
1503. 1998
c 346 s 504 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR SCHOOL
EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 79,412,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((115,187,000))

114,658,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((194,599,000))

194,070,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
(($174,999,000)) $174,538,000 is provided for a cost of living
adjustment of 3.0 percent effective September 1, 1997, for state formula staff
units. The appropriations include associated incremental fringe benefit
allocations at rates of 19.58 percent for certificated staff and 15.15 percent
for classified staff.

(a)
The appropriations in this section include the increased portion of salaries
and incremental fringe benefits for all relevant state-funded school programs
in part V of this act. Salary adjustments for state employees in the office of
superintendent of public instruction and the education reform program are
provided in part VII of this act. Increases for general apportionment (basic
education) are based on the salary allocation schedules and methodology in
section 502 of this act. Increases for special education result from increases
in each district's basic education allocation per student. Increases for
educational service districts and institutional education programs are
determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the methodology
for general apportionment salaries and benefits in section 502 of this act.

(b)
The appropriations in this section provide salary increase and incremental
fringe benefit allocations based on formula adjustments as follows:

(i)
For pupil transportation, an increase of $0.60 per weighted pupil‑mile
for the 1997‑98 school year and maintained for the 1998-99 school year;

(ii)
For education of highly capable students, an increase of $6.81 per formula
student for the 1997‑98 school year and maintained for the 1998-99 school
year; and

(iii)
For transitional bilingual education, an increase of $17.69 per eligible
bilingual student for the 1997‑98 school year and maintained for the
1998-99 school year; and

(iv)
For learning assistance, an increase of $8.74 per entitlement unit for the 1997‑98
school year and maintained for the 1998-99 school year.

(c)
The appropriations in this section include (($903,000)) $901,000
for salary increase adjustments for substitute teachers at a rate of $10.64 per
unit in the 1997-98 school year and maintained in the 1998-99 school year.

(2)
(($19,600,000)) $19,532,000 is provided for adjustments to
insurance benefit allocations. The maintenance rate for insurance benefit
allocations is $314.51 per month for the 1997-98 and 1998-99 school years. The
appropriations in this section provide for a rate increase to $317.34 per month
for the 1997-98 school year and $335.75 per month for the 1998-99 school year
at the following rates:

(a)
For pupil transportation, an increase of $0.03 per weighted pupil‑mile
for the 1997‑98 school year and $0.19 for the 1998-99 school year;

(b)
For education of highly capable students, an increase of $0.20 per formula
student for the 1997‑98 school year and $1.35 for the 1998-99 school
year;

(c)
For transitional bilingual education, an increase of $.46 per eligible
bilingual student for the 1997‑98 school year and $3.44 for the 1998-99
school year; and

(d)
For learning assistance, an increase of $.36 per funded unit for the 1997‑98
school year and $2.70 for the 1998-99 school year.

(3)
The rates specified in this section are subject to revision each year by the
legislature.

(4)
For the 1997-98 school year, the superintendent shall prepare a report showing
the allowable derived base salary for certificated instructional staff in
accordance with RCW 28A.400.200 and LEAP Document 12D, and the actual derived
base salary paid by each school district as shown on the S-275 report and shall
make the report available to the fiscal committees of the legislature no later
than February 15, 1998.

Sec.
1504. 1998
c 346 s 505 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR PUPIL
TRANSPORTATION

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 175,168,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((179,439,000))

175,618,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((354,607,000))

350,786,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation for fiscal year 1998 includes such funds as are necessary for
the remaining months of the 1996‑97 school year.

(2)
A maximum of $1,441,000 may be expended for regional transportation
coordinators and related activities. The transportation coordinators shall
ensure that data submitted by school districts for state transportation funding
shall, to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation
activity of each district.

(3)
$30,000 of the fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $40,000 of the fiscal year
1999 appropriation are provided solely for the transportation of students
enrolled in "choice" programs. Transportation shall be limited to
low-income students who are transferring to "choice" programs solely
for educational reasons.

(4)
Allocations for transportation of students shall be based on reimbursement
rates of $34.47 per weighted mile in the 1997-98 school year and $34.61 per
weighted mile in the 1998-99 school year exclusive of salary and benefit
adjustments provided in section 504 of this act. Allocations for
transportation of students transported more than one radius mile shall be based
on weighted miles as determined by superintendent of public instruction times
the per mile reimbursement rates for the school year pursuant to the formulas
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction. Allocations for
transportation of students living within one radius mile shall be based on the
number of enrolled students in grades kindergarten through five living within
one radius mile of their assigned school times the per mile reimbursement rate
for the school year times 1.29.

Sec.
1505. 1998
c 346 s 507 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR SPECIAL
EDUCATION PROGRAMS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 371,687,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((378,405,000))

377,811,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 143,106,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((893,198,000))

892,604,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation for fiscal year 1998 includes such funds as are necessary for
the remaining months of the 1996‑97 school year.

(2)
The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute state funds to school
districts based on two categories, the optional birth through age two program
for special education eligible developmentally delayed infants and toddlers,
and the mandatory special education program for special education eligible
students ages three to twenty-one. A "special education eligible
student" means a student receiving specially designed instruction in
accordance with a properly formulated individualized education program.

(3)
For the 1997-98 and 1998-99 school years, the superintendent shall distribute
state funds to each district based on the sum of:

(a)
A district's annual average headcount enrollment of developmentally delayed
infants and toddlers ages birth through two, times the district's average basic
education allocation per full-time equivalent student, times 1.15; and

(b)
A district's annual average full-time equivalent basic education enrollment
times the funded enrollment percent determined pursuant to subsection (4)(c) of
this section, times the district's average basic education allocation per
full-time equivalent student times 0.9309.

(4)
The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section.

(a)
"Average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student"
for a district shall be based on the staffing ratios required by RCW
28A.150.260 (i.e., 49/1000 certificated instructional staff in grades K-3, and
46/1000 in grades 4-12) and shall not include enhancements for K-3, secondary
vocational education, or small schools.

(b)
"Annual average full-time equivalent basic education enrollment"
means the resident enrollment including students enrolled through choice (RCW
28A.225.225) and students from nonhigh districts (RCW 28A.225.210) and
excluding students residing in another district enrolled as part of an
interdistrict cooperative program (RCW 28A.225.250).

(c)
"Enrollment percent" means the district's resident special education
annual average enrollment including those students counted under the special
education demonstration projects, excluding the birth through age two
enrollment, as a percent of the district's annual average full-time equivalent
basic education enrollment. For the 1997-98 and the 1998-99 school years, each
district's funded enrollment percent shall be:

(i)
For districts whose enrollment percent for 1994-95 was at or below 12.7 percent,
the lesser of the district's actual enrollment percent for the school year for
which the allocation is being determined or 12.7 percent.

(ii)
For districts whose enrollment percent for 1994-95 was above 12.7 percent, the
lesser of:

(A)
The district's actual enrollment percent for the school year for which the
special education allocation is being determined; or

(B)
The district's actual enrollment percent for the school year immediately prior
to the school year for which the special education allocation is being
determined if greater than 12.7 percent; or

(C)
For 1997-98, the 1994-95 enrollment percent reduced by 75 percent of the
difference between the district's 1994-95 enrollment percent and 12.7 percent
and for 1998-99, 12.7 percent.

(5)
At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15 districts in
which all excess cost services for special education students of the districts
are provided by the cooperative, the maximum enrollment percent shall be 12.7,
and shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district
units. For purposes of this subsection (4) of this section, the average basic
education allocation per full-time equivalent student shall be calculated in
the aggregate rather than individual district units.

(6)
A maximum of $12,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 1998 and a maximum of $12,000,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided as safety net funding for
districts with demonstrated needs for state special education funding beyond
the amounts provided in subsection (3) of this section. Safety net funding
shall be awarded by the state safety net oversight committee.

(a)
The safety net oversight committee shall first consider the needs of districts
adversely affected by the 1995 change in the special education funding
formula. Awards shall be based on the amount required to maintain the 1994-95
state special education excess cost allocation to the school district in
aggregate or on a dollar per funded student basis.

(b)
The committee shall then consider unusual needs of districts due to a special
education population which differs significantly from the assumptions of the
state funding formula. Awards shall be made to districts that convincingly
demonstrate need due to the concentration and/or severity of disabilities in
the district. Differences in program costs attributable to district philosophy
or service delivery style are not a basis for safety net awards.

(7)
Prior to June 1st of each year, the superintendent shall make available to each
school district from available data the district's maximum funded enrollment
percent for the coming school year.

(8)
The superintendent of public instruction may adopt such rules and procedures as
are necessary to administer the special education funding and safety net award
process. Prior to revising any standards, procedures, or rules in place for
the 1996-97 school year, the superintendent shall consult with the office of
financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature.

(9)
The safety net oversight committee appointed by the superintendent of public
instruction shall consist of:

(a)
Staff of the office of superintendent of public instruction;

(b)
Staff of the office of the state auditor;

(c)
Staff from the office of ((the)) financial management; and

(d)
One or more representatives from school districts or educational service
districts knowledgeable of special education programs and funding.

(10)
A maximum of $4,500,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation shall
be expended for safety net funding to meet the extraordinary needs of one or
more individual special education students.

(11)
A maximum of $678,000 may be expended from the general fund‑-state
appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1 full-time
equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and medical center. This
amount is in lieu of money provided through the home and hospital allocation
and the special education program.

(12)
A maximum of $1,000,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is
provided for projects to provide special education students with appropriate
job and independent living skills, including work experience where possible, to
facilitate their successful transition out of the public school system. The
funds provided by this subsection shall be from federal discretionary grants.

(13)
A school district may carry over up to 10 percent of general fund‑-state
funds allocated under this program; however, carry over funds shall be expended
in the special education program.

(14)
Beginning in the 1997-98 school year, the superintendent shall increase the
percentage of federal flow-through to school districts to at least 84 percent.
In addition to other purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds
for high cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from
educational service districts, and for staff development activities
particularly relating to inclusion issues.

(15)
Up to one percent of the general fund--federal appropriation shall be expended
by the superintendent for projects related to use of inclusion strategies by
school districts for provision of special education services. The superintendent
shall prepare an information database on laws, best practices, examples of
programs, and recommended resources. The information may be disseminated in a
variety of ways, including workshops and other staff development activities.

(16)
Amounts appropriated within this section are sufficient to fund the provisions
of House Bill No. 2682 (school medicaid incentive payments).

Sec.
1506. 1998
c 346 s 508 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR TRAFFIC
SAFETY EDUCATION PROGRAMS

Public
Safety and Education Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((16,883,000))

16,186,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation includes such funds as are necessary for the remaining months
of the 1996-97 school year.

(2)
A maximum of $507,000 shall be expended for regional traffic safety education
coordinators.

(3)
The maximum basic state allocation per student completing the program shall be
$137.16 in the 1997-98 and 1998-99 school years.

(4)
Additional allocations to provide tuition assistance for students from low-income
families who complete the program shall be a maximum of $66.81 per eligible
student in the 1997-98 and 1998-99 school years.

Sec.
1507. 1998
c 346 s 509 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR LOCAL
EFFORT ASSISTANCE

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 82,079,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((86,272,000))

83,253,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((168,351,000))

165,332,000

Sec.
1508. 1998
c 346 s 510 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR INSTITUTIONAL
EDUCATION PROGRAMS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 16,897,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((18,596,000))

18,567,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 8,548,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((44,041,000))

44,012,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 includes such
funds as are necessary for the remaining months of the 1996‑97 school
year.

(2)
State funding provided under this section is based on salaries and other
expenditures for a 220‑day school year. The superintendent of public
instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans for institutional
education programs to ensure that districts plan for a full-time summer
program.

(3)
State funding for each institutional education program shall be based on the
institution's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment. Staffing
ratios for each category of institution shall remain the same as those funded
in the 1995-97 biennium.

(4)
$1,196,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund--state appropriation is
provided to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6600 (correctional
facilities education programs). If Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6600
is enacted, beginning in the 1998-99 school year, the funded staffing ratios
for education programs for juveniles age 18 or less in department of
corrections facilities shall be the same as those provided for education
programs in delinquent institutions under the department of social and health
services. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

Sec.
1509. 1998
c 346 s 511 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR PROGRAMS
FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 5,701,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((6,121,000))

6,096,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((11,822,000))

11,797,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation for fiscal year 1998 includes such funds as are necessary for
the remaining months of the 1996‑97 school year.

(2)
Allocations for school district programs for highly capable students shall be
distributed at a maximum rate of $311.12 per funded student for the 1997-98
school year and $311.35 per funded student for the 1998-99 school year,
exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments pursuant to section 504 of this
act. The number of funded students shall be a maximum of two percent of each
district's full-time equivalent basic education enrollment.

(3)
$350,000 of the appropriation is for the centrum program at Fort Worden state
park.

(4)
$186,000 of the appropriation is for the odyssey of the mind and future
problem-solving programs.

Sec.
1510. 1998
c 346 s 512 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-EDUCATION
REFORM PROGRAMS

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 18,605,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((22,017,000))

21,967,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((40,622,000))

40,572,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
(($17,153,000)) $17,103,000 is provided for the operation of the
commission on student learning and the development and implementation of
student assessments. The commission shall cooperate with the superintendent of
public instruction in defining measures of student achievement to be included
in the student record system developed by the superintendent pursuant to
section 501(1)(b) of this act.

(2)
$2,190,000 is provided solely for training of paraprofessional classroom
assistants and certificated staff who work with classroom assistants as
provided in RCW 28A.415.310.

(3)
$2,970,000 is provided for mentor teacher assistance, including state support
activities, under RCW 28A.415.250 and 28A.415.260. Funds for the teacher
assistance program shall be allocated to school districts based on the number
of beginning teachers.

(4)
$4,050,000 is provided for improving technology infrastructure, monitoring and
reporting on school district technology development, promoting standards for
school district technology, promoting statewide coordination and planning for
technology development, and providing regional educational technology support
centers, including state support activities, under chapter 28A.650 RCW.

(5)
$7,200,000 is provided for grants to school districts to provide a continuum of
care for children and families to help children become ready to learn. Grant
proposals from school districts shall contain local plans designed
collaboratively with community service providers. If a continuum of care
program exists in the area in which the school district is located, the local
plan shall provide for coordination with existing programs to the greatest
extent possible. Grant funds shall be allocated pursuant to RCW 70.190.040.

(6)
$5,000,000 is provided solely for the meals for kids program under RCW
28A.235.145 through 28A.235.155.

(7)
$1,260,000 is provided for technical assistance related to education reform
through the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation
with the commission on student learning, as specified in RCW 28A.300.130
(center for the improvement of student learning).

(8)
$799,000 of the fiscal year 1999 appropriation is provided solely for the
leadership internship program for superintendents, principals, and program
administrators. The purpose of the program is to provide funds to school
districts to provide partial release time for district employees in an
internship with an appropriate mentor. The funds shall be distributed by the
superintendent to school districts subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(i)
The superintendent with the assistance of an advisory board that includes
school administrators and higher education representatives shall select
internship participants giving priority to candidates who intend to serve in
school districts where finding qualified applicants has been difficult.

(ii)
Candidates if accepted in the internship program must agree to seek employment
in Washington after receiving certification, participate in education
improvement training activities, and participate in evaluations of the
effectiveness of the internship program.

(iii)
The maximum amount of state funding for each internship shall not exceed the
daily rate of providing a substitute teacher for the equivalent of up to
forty-five days and the funds shall be used to pay for partial release time
while the school district employee is completing the internship.

(iv)
The superintendent may withhold a maximum of seven percent of the funds for
costs of implementing the program.

Sec.
1511. 1998
c 346 s 513 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR TRANSITIONAL
BILINGUAL PROGRAMS

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 30,711,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((32,185,000))

32,825,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((62,896,000))

63,536,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation for fiscal year 1998 provides such funds as are necessary for
the remaining months of the 1996-97 school year.

(2)
The superintendent of public instruction shall study the formula components
proposed for the 1998-99 school year and prepare a report to the legislature no
later than January 15, 1998.

(3)
The superintendent shall distribute a maximum of $643.78 per eligible bilingual
student in the 1997-98 and 1998-99 school years, exclusive of salary and
benefit adjustments provided in section 503 of this act.

Sec.
1512. 1998
c 346 s 514 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR THE LEARNING
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 60,224,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((61,000,000))

60,408,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((121,224,000))

120,632,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation for fiscal year 1998 provides such funds as are necessary for
the remaining months of the 1996‑97 school year.

(2)
For making the calculation of the percentage of students scoring in the lowest
quartile as compared with national norms, beginning with the 1991-92 school
year, the superintendent shall multiply each school district's 4th and 8th
grade test results by 0.86.

(3)
Funding for school district learning assistance programs shall be allocated at
maximum rates of $378.33 per funded unit for the 1997-98 school year and
$378.88 per funded unit for the 1998-99 school year exclusive of salary and
benefit adjustments provided in section 504 of this act. School districts may
carryover up to 10 percent of funds allocated under this program; however,
carryover funds shall be expended for the learning assistance program.

(a)
A school district's funded units for the 1997-98 and 1998-99 school years shall
be the sum of the following:

(i)
The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in kindergarten through 6th
grade, times the 5-year average 4th grade test result as adjusted pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section, times 0.92; and

(ii)
The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades 7 through 9, times the
5-year average 8th grade test result as adjusted pursuant to subsection (2) of
this section, times 0.92; and

(iii)
If in the prior school year the district's percentage of October headcount
enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free and reduced price lunch exceeded
the state average, subtract the state average percentage of students eligible
for free and reduced price lunch from the district's percentage and multiply
the result by the district's K-12 annual average full-time equivalent
enrollment for the current school year times 22.30 percent.

Sec.
1513. 1998
c 346 s 515 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-LOCAL
ENHANCEMENT FUNDS

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 49,493,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((55,659,000))

55,474,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((105,152,000))

104,967,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
A maximum of (($50,418,000)) $50,317,000 is provided for learning
improvement allocations to school districts to enhance the ability of
instructional staff to teach and assess the essential academic learning
requirements for reading, writing, communication, and math in accordance with
the timelines and requirements established under RCW 28A.630.885. However,
special emphasis shall be given to the successful teaching of reading.
Allocations under this section shall be subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
In accordance with the timetable for the implementation of the assessment
system by the commission on student learning, the allocations for the 1997-98
and 1998-99 school years shall be at a maximum annual rate per full-time
equivalent student of $36.69 for students enrolled in grades K-4, $30.00 for
students enrolled in grades 5-7, and $22.95 for students enrolled in grades
8-12. Allocations shall be made on the monthly apportionment schedule provided
in RCW 28A.510.250.

(b)
A district receiving learning improvement allocations shall:

(i)
Develop and keep on file at each building a student learning improvement plan
to achieve the student learning goals and essential academic learning
requirements and to implement the assessment system as it is developed. The
plan shall delineate how the learning improvement allocations will be used to
accomplish the foregoing. The plan shall be made available to the public upon
request;

(ii)
Maintain a policy regarding the involvement of school staff, parents, and
community members in instructional decisions;

(iii)
File a report by October 1, 1998, and October 1, 1999, with the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, in a format developed by the
superintendent that: Enumerates the activities funded by these allocations;
the amount expended for each activity; describes how the activity improved
understanding, teaching, and assessment of the essential academic learning
requirements by instructional staff; and identifies any amounts expended from
this allocation for supplemental contracts; and

(iv)
Provide parents and the local community with specific information on the use of
this allocation by including in the annual performance report required in RCW
28A.320.205, information on how funds allocated under this subsection were
spent and the results achieved.

(c)
The superintendent of public instruction shall compile and analyze the school
district reports and present the results to the office of financial management
and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than November 15,
1998, and November 15, 1999.

(2)
(($54,734,000)) $54,650,000 is provided for local education
program enhancements to meet educational needs as identified by the school
district, including alternative education programs. This amount includes such
amounts as are necessary for the remainder of the 1996-97 school year.
Allocations for the 1997-98 school year shall be at a maximum annual rate of
$29.86 per full-time equivalent student and $28.81 per full-time equivalent
student for the 1998-99 school year as determined pursuant to subsection (3) of
this section. Allocations shall be made on the monthly apportionment payment
schedule provided in RCW 28A.510.250.

(3)
Allocations provided under this section shall be based on school district
annual average full-time equivalent enrollment in grades kindergarten through
twelve: PROVIDED, That for school districts enrolling not more than one
hundred average annual full-time equivalent students, and for small school
plants within any school district designated as remote and necessary schools,
the allocations shall be as follows:

(a)
Enrollment of not more than 60 average annual full-time equivalent students in
grades kindergarten through six shall generate funding based on sixty full-time
equivalent students;

(b)
Enrollment of not more than 20 average annual full-time equivalent students in
grades seven and eight shall generate funding based on twenty full-time
equivalent students; and

(c)
Enrollment of not more than 60 average annual full-time equivalent students in
grades nine through twelve shall generate funding based on sixty full-time
equivalent students.

(4)
Funding provided pursuant to this section does not fall within the definition
of basic education for purposes of Article IX of the state Constitution and the
state's funding duty thereunder.

(5)
Receipt by a school district of one-fourth of the district's allocation of
funds under this section, shall be conditioned on a finding by the
superintendent that:

(a)
The district is enrolled as a medicaid service provider and is actively
pursuing federal matching funds for medical services provided through special
education programs, pursuant to RCW 74.09.5241 through 74.09.5256 (Title XIX
funding); and

(b)
The district is filing truancy petitions as required under chapter 312, Laws of
1995 and RCW 28A.225.030.

Sec.
1514. 1997
c 454 s 509 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION‑-COMMON
SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999) to the

Common
School Construction Account......... $ 53,050,000

Education
Savings Account Appropriation to the

Common
School Construction Account......... $ ((12,621,000))

78,916,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 131,966,000

Sec.
1515. 1997
c 235 s 501 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE
BOARD OF EDUCATION

Public
school building construction (98-2-001)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
From the appropriation in this section the state board shall fund one hundred
percent of the cost for a required standard value engineering study on all
projects exceeding 50,000 gross square feet in size. On an annual basis, the
board shall report to the legislative fiscal committees and the office of
financial management the results of these studies including but not limited to
the amounts of each study and the accepted savings achieved due to the studies.

(2)
No more than $138,000,000 of this appropriation, excluding reappropriations,
may be obligated in fiscal year 1998 for school district project design and
construction.

(3)
Total cash disbursed from the common school construction fund may not exceed
the available cash balance.

(4)
The reappropriation from the state building construction account shall serve as
full compensation to the common school trust for the transfer of land to the
Washington State University Lind Dryland Research Unit under Substitute House
Bill No. 1016 or Senate Bill No. 5174.

(5)
No more than $7,110,000 of this appropriation may be allocated by the state
board to provide up to ninety percent of the total project cost for the
renovation of facilities operating as interdistrict cooperative centers
providing vocational skill programs. The remaining portion of the project cost
shall be a match from local sources. As a condition to receiving an allocation
from this appropriation or any other appropriation for a vocational skill
center provided after calendar year 1996, the recipient facility must maintain
a separate capital account, into which the participating districts make
deposits, to pay for all future minor repair and renovation costs for the
vocational skill center. For purposes of this subsection, a future minor
repair and renovation cost is a capital project costing less than forty percent
of the value of the building.

Reappropriation:

St
Bldg Constr Acct‑-State...... $ 18,329,671

Common
School Constr Fund‑-State $ 109,115,719

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.... $ 127,445,390

Appropriation:

Common
School Constr Fund‑-

State...................... $ ((275,798,712))

289,548,712

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).... $ ((302,821,218))

719,815,320

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs) $ 801,600,000

-------------

TOTAL...................... $ ((1,507,665,320))

1,521,415,320

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1516. A
new section is added to 1997 c 149 (uncodified) to read as follows:

K-12 CARRYFORWARD AND PRIOR SCHOOL YEAR ADJUSTMENTS. State
general fund appropriations provided to the superintendent of public
instruction for state entitlement programs in the public schools may be
expended as needed by the superintendent for adjustments to apportionment for
prior fiscal periods. Recoveries of state general fund moneys from school
districts and educational service districts for a prior fiscal period shall be
made as reductions in apportionment payments for the current fiscal period and
shall be shown as prior year adjustments on apportionment reports for the
current period. Such recoveries shall not be treated as revenues to the state,
but as a reduction in the amount expended against the appropriation for the
current fiscal period.

(End of part)

PART
XVI

HIGHER EDUCATION‑-SUPPLEMENTAL
APPROPRIATIONS

Sec.
1601. 1998
c 346 s 601 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The
appropriations in sections 603 through 609 of this act are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:

(1)
"Institutions" means the institutions of higher education receiving
appropriations under sections 603 through 609 of this act.

(2)(a)
The salary increases provided or referenced in this subsection shall be the only
allowable salary increases provided at institutions of higher education,
excluding increases associated with normally occurring promotions and increases
related to faculty and professional staff retention, and excluding increases
associated with employees under the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW pursuant
to the provisions of RCW 28B.16.015.

(b)
Each institution of higher education shall provide to each classified staff
employee as defined by the office of financial management a salary increase of
3.0 percent on July 1, 1997. Each institution of higher education shall
provide to instructional and research faculty, exempt professional staff,
academic administrators, academic librarians, counselors, teaching and research
assistants as classified by the office of financial management, and all other
nonclassified staff, including those employees under RCW 28B.16.015, an average
salary increase of 3.0 percent on July 1, 1997. For employees under the
jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW pursuant to the provisions of RCW 28B.16.015,
distribution of the salary increases will be in accordance with the applicable
collective bargaining agreement. However, an increase shall not be provided to
any classified employee whose salary is above the approved salary range maximum
for the class to which the employee's position is allocated. To collect
consistent data for use by the legislature, the office of financial management,
and other state agencies for policy and planning purposes, institutions of
higher education shall report personnel data to be used in the department of
personnel's human resource data warehouse in compliance with uniform reporting
procedures established by the department of personnel.

(c)
Each institution of higher education receiving appropriations under sections
604 through 609 of this act may provide to instructional and research faculty,
exempt professional staff, academic administrators, academic librarians,
counselors, teaching and research assistants, as classified by the office of
financial management, and all other nonclassified staff, but not including
employees under RCW 28B.16.015, an additional average salary increase of 1.0
percent on July 1, 1997, and an average salary increase of 2.0 percent on July
1, 1998. Any salary increases authorized under this subsection (2)(c) shall
not be included in an institution's salary base. It is the intent of the
legislature that general fund‑-state support for an institution shall not
increase during the current or any future biennium as a result of any salary
increases authorized under this subsection (2)(c).

(d)
Specific salary increases authorized in sections 603 through 609 of this act
are in addition to any salary increase provided in this subsection.

(3)(a)
Each institution receiving appropriations under sections 604 through 609 of this
act shall submit plans for achieving measurable and specific improvements in
academic years 1997-98 and 1998-99 to the higher education coordinating board.
The plans, to be prepared at the direction of the board, shall be submitted by
August 15, 1997 (for academic year 1997-98) and June 30, 1998 (for academic
year 1998-99). The following measures and goals will be used for the 1997-99
biennium:

Goal

(i)
Undergraduate graduation efficiency index:

For
students beginning as freshmen 95

For
transfer students 90

(ii)
Undergraduate student retention, defined as the percentage of all undergraduate
students who return for the next year at the same

institution,
measured from fall to fall:

Research
universities 95%

Comprehensive
universities and college 90%

(iii)
Graduation rates, defined as the percentage of an entering

freshmen
class at each institution that graduates within five years:

Research
universities 65%

Comprehensive
universities and college 55%

(iv)
A measure of faculty productivity, with goals and targets in accord with the
legislative intent to achieve measurable and specific improvements, to be
determined by the higher education coordinating board, in consultation with the
institutions receiving appropriations under sections 604 through 609 of this
act.

(v)
An additional measure and goal to be selected by the higher education
coordinating board for each institution, in consultation with each institution.

(b)
Academic year 1995-96 shall be the baseline year against which performance in
academic year 1997-98 shall be measured. Academic year 1997-98 shall be the
baseline year against which performance in academic year 1998-99 shall be
measured. The difference between each institution's baseline year and the
state-wide performance goals shall be calculated and shall be the performance
gap for each institution for each measure for each year. The higher education
coordinating board shall set performance targets for closing the performance
gap for each measure for each institution. Performance targets shall be set at
levels that reflect meaningful and substantial progress towards the state-wide
performance goals. Each institution shall report to the higher education
coordinating board on its actual performance achievement for each measure for
academic year 1997-98 by November 1, 1998.

(4)
The state board for community and technical colleges shall develop an
implementation plan for measurable and specific improvements in productivity,
efficiency, and student retention in academic years 1997-98 and 1998-99
consistent with the performance management system developed by the work force
training and education coordinating board and for the following long-term
performance goals:

Goal

(a)
Hourly wages for vocational graduates $12/hour

(b)
Academic students transferring to Washington

higher
education institutions 67%

(c)
Core course completion rates 85%

(d)
Graduation efficiency index 95

(5)
The state's public institutions of higher education increasingly are being
called upon to become more efficient in conducting the business operations
necessary to support the carrying out of their academic missions. The
legislature recognizes that state laws and regulations may have the unintended
effect of acting as barriers to efficient operation in some instances, and
desires to encourage the institutions of higher education to think beyond the
constraints of current law in identifying opportunities for improved
efficiency. Accordingly, the legislature requests that the institutions of
higher education, working together through the council of presidents' office
and the state board for community and technical colleges, identify
opportunities for changes in state law that would form the basis for a new
efficiency compact with the state, for consideration no later than the 1999
legislative session.

(6)
Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, institutions of higher education receiving
appropriations under sections 603 through 609 of this act are authorized to
increase summer term tuition in excess of the fiscal growth factor during the
1997-99 fiscal biennium. Tuition levels increased pursuant to this subsection
shall not exceed the per credit hour rate calculated from the academic year
tuition levels established by the legislature in RCW 28B.15.067.

Sec.
1602. 1998
c 346 s 603 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE
BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 380,445,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((421,647,000))

421,050,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 11,404,000

Employment
and Training Trust Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 29,114,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((842,610,000))

842,013,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$2,718,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $4,079,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 shall be held in reserve by the board. These funds are provided for
improvements in productivity, efficiency, and student retention. The board may
approve the fiscal year 1998 allocation of funds under this subsection upon
completion of an implementation plan. The implementation plan shall be
submitted by the board to the appropriate legislative committees and the office
of financial management in accordance with section 601(4) of this act by
September 1, 1997. The board may approve the fiscal year 1999 allocation of
funds under this subsection based on the board's evaluation of:

(a)
College performance compared to the goals for productivity, efficiency, and
student retention as submitted in the plan required in section 601(4) of this
act; and

(b)
The quality and effectiveness of the strategies the colleges propose to achieve
continued improvement in quality and efficiency during the 1998-99 academic
year.

(2)
$28,546,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
and the entire employment and training trust account appropriation are provided
solely as special funds for training and related support services, including
financial aid, child care, and transportation, as specified in chapter 226,
Laws of 1993 (employment and training for unemployed workers) and Substitute
House Bill No. 2214.

(a)
Funding is provided to support up to 7,200 full-time equivalent students in each
fiscal year.

(b)
The state board for community and technical colleges shall submit a plan for
the allocation of the full-time equivalent students provided in this subsection
to the workforce training and education coordinating board for review and approval.

(3)
$1,441,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$1,441,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for 500 FTE enrollment slots to implement RCW 28B.50.259
(timber-dependent communities).

(4)
$1,862,500 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$1,862,500 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for assessment of student outcomes at community and technical
colleges.

(5)
$706,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$706,000 of general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided
solely to recruit and retain minority students and faculty.

(6)
Up to $1,035,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and up to $2,102,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 may be used in combination with salary and benefit savings from faculty
turnover to provide faculty salary increments and associated benefits. To the
extent general salary increase funding is used to pay faculty increments, the
general salary increase shall be reduced by the same amount.

(7)
To address part-time faculty salary disparities and to increase the ratio of full-time
to part-time faculty instructors, the board shall provide salary increases to
part-time instructors or hire additional full-time instructional staff under
the following conditions and limitations: (a) The amount used for such
purposes shall not exceed an amount equivalent to an additional salary increase
of 1.0 percent on July 1, 1997, and an additional salary increase of 2.0
percent on July 1, 1998, for instructional faculty as classified by the office
of financial management; and (b) at least $2,934,000 shall be spent for the
purposes of this subsection.

(8)
$83,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$867,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided for personnel and expenses to develop curricula, library resources,
and operations of Cascadia Community College. It is the legislature's intent
to use the opportunity provided by the establishment of the new institution to
conduct a pilot project of budgeting based on instructional standards and
outcomes. The college shall use a portion of the available funds to develop a
set of measurable standards and outcomes as the basis for budget development in
the 1999-01 biennium.

(9)
The technical colleges may increase tuition and fees to conform with the
percentage increase in community college operating fees enacted by the 1997
legislature. The community colleges may charge up to the maximum level
authorized for services and activities fees in RCW 28B.15.069.

(10)
Community and technical colleges with below-average faculty salaries may use
funds identified by the state board in the 1997-98 and 1998-99 operating
allocations to increase faculty salaries no higher than the system-wide
average.

(11)
$1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for tuition support for students enrolled in work-based
learning programs.

(12)
$700,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely for a technology equipment matching program for community and
technical colleges. Each college district shall match its allocation of this
appropriation with an equal amount of cash donations from private sources.

(13)
(($125,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 is provided solely to pay the increased employer funding rate resulting
from the settlement in Burbage et al. v. State of Washington (Thurston
county superior court cause no. 94-2-02560-8), as referenced in section
707(1)(c) of this act. If the stipulated settlement is not approved by the
court by August 1, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(14)))
$669,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely to pay the increased employer funding rate resulting from the
settlement in Retired State Employees et al. v. State of Washington
(Thurston county superior court cause no. 92-2-01294-1), as referenced in
section 707(1)(d) of this act. If the stipulated settlement is not approved by
the court by August 1, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

Sec.
1603. 1998
c 346 s 604 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR UNIVERSITY
OF WASHINGTON

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 283,923,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((293,988,000))

295,988,000

Death
Investigations Account Appropriation..... $ ((2,162,000))

2,342,000

Industrial
Insurance Premium Refund Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 514,000

Accident
Account Appropriation.................. $............................. 4,969,000

Medical
Aid Account Appropriation.............. $ 4,989,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((590,545,000))

592,725,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$2,019,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and (($3,029,000))
$2,562,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 shall
be placed in reserve. The office of financial management shall approve the
allotment of amounts under this subsection upon notification by the higher
education coordinating board. These amounts are provided for the preparation
of plans and for the achievement of measurable and specific improvements
towards performance and accountability goals as outlined in section 601(3) of
this act.

(2)
$800,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $1,896,000
of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely to
support additional upper-division and graduate level enrollments at the Tacoma
branch campus above the 1996-97 budgeted FTE level.

(3)
$593,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $1,547,000
of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely to
support additional upper-division and graduate level enrollments at the Bothell
branch campus above the 1996-97 budgeted FTE level.

(4)
$186,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $186,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for
assessment of student outcomes.

(5)
$324,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $324,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely to
recruit and retain minority students and faculty.

(6)
$130,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $130,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for the
implementation of the Puget Sound work plan agency action item UW-01.

(7)
$1,200,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$1,200,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided
solely for competitively offered faculty recruitment and retention salary
adjustments. The university shall provide a report in their 1999-01 biennial
operating budget request submittal on the effective expenditure of funds for
the purposes of this subsection.

(8)
$47,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund appropriation and $47,000 of the
fiscal year 1999 general fund appropriation are provided solely to employ a
fossil preparator/educator in the Burke Museum. The entire amounts provided in
this subsection shall be provided directly to the Burke Museum.

(9)
$75,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $75,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for
enhancements to research capabilities at the Olympic natural resources center.

(10)
$150,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is provided
solely for remodeling and equipment necessary to accommodate enrollment growth
at the Bothell branch campus.

(11)
$560,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is provided
solely for the disabilities, opportunities, internetworking, and technology
program.

(12)
(($3,000,000)) $6,538,000 of the general fund appropriation for
fiscal year 1999 is provided solely to establish a high speed internet-2 hub.

(13)
$150,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is provided
solely to support the physicians assistant program in Spokane.

(14)
$352,000 of the death investigations account appropriation is provided solely
for staff and equipment for the state toxicology laboratory to support
implementation of quality control procedures and laboratory certification, and
for enhanced screening of sexual assault victims, blood alcohol and volatile
intoxicants analysis, and blood tests for marijuana in driving cases.

(15)
(($74,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 is provided solely to pay the increased employer funding rate resulting
from the settlement in Burbage et al. v. State of Washington (Thurston county
superior court cause no. 94-2-02560-8), as referenced in section 707(1)(c) of
this act. If the stipulated settlement is not approved by the court by August
1, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(16)))
$397,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely to pay the increased employer funding rate resulting from the
settlement in Retired State Employees et al. v. State of Washington (Thurston
county superior court cause no. 92-2-01294-1), as referenced in section
707(1)(d) of this act. If the stipulated settlement is not approved by the
court by August 1, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(16)
$180,000 of the death investigations account appropriation is provided for the
forensic pathologist fellowship program.

Sec.
1604. 1998
c 346 s 605 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR WASHINGTON
STATE UNIVERSITY

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 169,894,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((171,125,000))

170,180,000

Air
Pollution Control Account Appropriation.... $ 206,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((341,225,000))

340,280,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$1,204,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and (($1,807,000))
$1,200,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 shall
be placed in reserve. The office of financial management shall approve the
allotment of amounts under this subsection upon notification by the higher
education coordinating board. These amounts are provided for the preparation
of plans and for the achievement of measurable and specific improvements
towards performance and accountability goals as outlined in section 601(3) of
this act.

(2)
$1,059,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is provided
solely to support additional upper-division and graduate level enrollments at
the Vancouver branch campus above the 1996-97 budgeted FTE level.

(3)
$263,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $263,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely to
support additional upper-division and graduate level enrollments at the
Tri-Cities branch campus above the 1996-97 budgeted FTE level.

(4)
$971,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is provided
solely to support additional upper-division and graduate level enrollments at
the Spokane branch campus above the 1996-97 budgeted FTE level.

(5)
$186,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $186,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for
assessment of student outcomes.

(6)
$140,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $140,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely to
recruit and retain minority students and faculty.

(7)
$157,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $157,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for the
implementation of the Puget Sound work plan agency action item WSU-01.

(8)
$600,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $600,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for
competitively offered faculty recruitment and retention salary adjustments.
The university shall provide a report in their 1999-01 biennial operating
budget request submittal on the effective expenditure of funds for the purposes
of this subsection.

(9)
$50,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $50,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for
yellow star thistle research.

(10)
$55,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $55,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for the
Goldendale distance learning center.

(11)
$3,250,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 is provided
solely for legal costs and settlement payments associated with construction
claims for the Vancouver branch campus and the veterinary teaching hospital
capital projects.

(12)
$590,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is provided
solely for the management of the Spokane riverpoint campus as provided in
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6655.

(13)
$100,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund appropriation is provided solely
for the aquatic animal health diagnostic center to accommodate an unanticipated
caseload increase.

(14)
(($43,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 is provided solely to pay the increased employer funding rate resulting
from the settlement in Burbage et al. v. State of Washington (Thurston
county superior court cause no. 94-2-02560-8), as referenced in section
707(1)(c) of this act. If the stipulated settlement is not approved by the
court by August 1, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(15)))
$228,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely to pay the increased employer funding rate resulting from the
settlement in Retired State Employees et al. v. State of Washington
(Thurston county superior court cause no. 92-2-01294-1), as referenced in
section 707(1)(d) of this act. If the stipulated settlement is not approved by
the court by August 1, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

Sec.
1605. 1998
c 346 s 606 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR EASTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 39,211,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((39,563,000))

39,460,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((78,774,000))

78,671,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$285,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and (($428,000))
$385,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 shall be
placed in reserve. The office of financial management shall approve the
allotment of amounts under this subsection upon notification by the higher
education coordinating board. These amounts are provided for the preparation
of plans and for the achievement of measurable and specific improvements
towards performance and accountability goals as outlined in section 601(3) of
this act.

(2)
$186,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $186,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for
assessment of student outcomes.

(3)
$93,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $93,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely to
recruit and retain minority students and faculty.

(4)
$53,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$54,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for competitively offered faculty recruitment and retention
salary adjustments. The university shall provide a report in their 1999-01
biennial operating budget request submittal on the effective expenditure of
funds for the purposes of this subsection.

(5)
$3,188,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$3,188,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 shall be
placed in reserve pending attainment of budgeted enrollments of 6,942 FTEs.
The office of financial management shall approve the allotment of funds under
this subsection at the annual rate of $4,000 for annual student FTEs in excess
of 6,942 based on tenth day quarterly enrollment and the office of financial
management's quarterly budget driver report. In addition, allotments of
reserve funds in this section shall be approved by the office of financial
management upon approval by the higher education coordinating board for (a)
actions that will result in additional enrollment growth, and (b) contractual
obligations in fiscal year 1998 to the extent such funds are required.

(6)
Pursuant to section 904 of this act and within current appropriation levels,
the waiver limit for Eastern Washington University is increased from 11 percent
to 14 percent during the 1997-99 fiscal biennium. Eastern Washington
University shall report by December 15, 1998, to the appropriate committees of
the legislature, the office of financial management, and the higher education
coordinating board on its implementation of the increased waiver limit.

(7)
(($12,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 is provided solely to pay the increased employer funding rate resulting
from the settlement in Burbage et al. v. State of Washington (Thurston
county superior court cause no. 94-2-02560-8), as referenced in section
707(1)(c) of this act. If the stipulated settlement is not approved by the
court by August 1, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8)))
$62,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely to pay the increased employer funding rate resulting from the
settlement in Retired State Employees et al. v. State of Washington
(Thurston county superior court cause no. 92-2-01294-1), as referenced in
section 707(1)(d) of this act. If the stipulated settlement is not approved by
the court by August 1, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

Sec.
1606. 1998
c 346 s 607 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR CENTRAL
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 37,244,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((38,749,000))

38,767,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((75,993,000))

76,011,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$269,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and (($403,000))
$302,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 shall be
placed in reserve. The office of financial management shall approve the
allotment of amounts under this subsection upon notification by the higher
education coordinating board. These amounts are provided for the preparation
of plans and for the achievement of measurable and specific improvements
towards performance and accountability goals as outlined in section 601(3) of
this act.

(2)
$186,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $186,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for
assessment of student outcomes.

(3)
$70,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $70,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely to
recruit and retain minority students and faculty.

(4)
$51,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $51,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for
competitively offered faculty recruitment and retention salary adjustments.
The college shall provide a report in their 1999-01 biennial operating budget
request submittal on the effective expenditure of funds for the purposes of
this subsection.

(5)
(($11,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 is provided solely to pay the increased employer funding rate resulting
from the settlement in Burbage et al. v. State of Washington (Thurston
county superior court cause no. 94-2-02560-8), as referenced in section
707(1)(c) of this act. If the stipulated settlement is not approved by the
court by August 1, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6)))
$62,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely to pay the increased employer funding rate resulting from the
settlement in Retired State Employees et al. v. State of Washington
(Thurston county superior court cause no. 92-2-01294-1), as referenced in
section 707(1)(d) of this act. If the stipulated settlement is not approved by
the court by August 1, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

Sec.
1607. 1998
c 346 s 608 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE
EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)....... ... $ 20,401,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((20,596,000))

20,496,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((40,997,000))

40,897,000

The
appropriations in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$144,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and (($217,000))
$153,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 shall be
placed in reserve. The office of financial management shall approve the
allotment of amounts under this subsection upon notification by the higher
education coordinating board. These amounts are provided for the preparation
of plans and for the achievement of measurable and specific improvements
towards performance and accountability goals as outlined in section 601(3) of this
act.

(2)
$186,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $186,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for
assessment of student outcomes.

(3)
$47,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $47,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely to
recruit and retain minority students and faculty.

(4)
$29,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $29,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for
competitively offered faculty recruitment and retention salary adjustments.
The college shall provide a report in their 1999-01 biennial operating budget
request submittal on the effective expenditure of funds for the purposes of
this subsection.

(5)
$35,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is provided
solely for the Washington institute for public policy to conduct a study of
college students' employment. The study shall include, but need not be limited
to, matching student enrollment information with unemployment insurance
information. The office of financial management, higher education coordinating
board, state board for community and technical colleges, and the employment
security department shall assist the institute in the performance of the
study. Results of the study are to be reported to the legislature by January
15, 1999.

(6)
$250,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 is provided
solely for equipment and expenses necessary to accommodate enrollment growth.

(7)
(($7,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
is provided solely to pay the increased employer funding rate resulting from
the settlement in Burbage et al. v. State of Washington (Thurston county
superior court cause no. 94-2-02560-8), as referenced in section 707(1)(c) of
this act. If the stipulated settlement is not approved by the court by August
1, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8)))
$36,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely to pay the increased employer funding rate resulting from the
settlement in Retired State Employees et al. v. State of Washington
(Thurston county superior court cause no. 92-2-01294-1), as referenced in
section 707(1)(d) of this act. If the stipulated settlement is not approved by
the court by August 1, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

Sec.
1608. 1998
c 346 s 609 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR WESTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 47,822,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((48,951,000))

48,703,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((96,773,000))

96,525,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$342,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and (($514,000))
$331,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 shall be
placed in reserve. The office of financial management shall approve the
allotment of amounts under this subsection upon notification by the higher
education coordinating board. These amounts are provided for the preparation
of plans and for the achievement of measurable and specific improvements
towards performance and accountability goals as outlined in section 601(3) of
this act.

(2)
$186,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $186,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for
assessment of student outcomes.

(3)
$93,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $93,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely to
recruit and retain minority students and faculty.

(4)
$66,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $67,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for
competitively offered faculty recruitment and retention salary adjustments.
The university shall provide a report in their 1999-01 biennial operating
budget request submittal on the effective expenditure of funds for the purposes
of this subsection.

(5)
(($15,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 is provided solely to pay the increased employer funding rate resulting
from the settlement in Burbage et al. v. State of Washington (Thurston
county superior court cause no. 94-2-02560-8), as referenced in section
707(1)(c) of this act. If the stipulated settlement is not approved by the
court by August 1, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6)))
$81,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely to pay the increased employer funding rate resulting from the
settlement in Retired State Employees et al. v. State of Washington
(Thurston county superior court cause no. 92-2-01294-1), as referenced in
section 707(1)(d) of this act. If the stipulated settlement is not approved by
the court by August 1, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

Sec.
1609. 1998
c 346 s 610 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD‑-POLICY
COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998)......... $ 2,809,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999)......... $ ((3,604,000))

3,603,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation.................. $ 704,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ ((7,117,000))

7,116,000

The
appropriations in this section are provided to carry out the accountability,
performance measurement, policy coordination, planning, studies and
administrative functions of the board and are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:

(1)
The board shall set performance targets, review, recommend changes if
necessary, and approve plans defined in section 601(3)(a) of this act for
achieving measurable and specific improvements in academic years 1997-98 and
1998-99. By October 1, 1997, the board shall notify the office of financial
management to allot institutions' fiscal year 1998 performance funds held in
reserve, based upon the adequacy of plans prepared by the institutions.

(2)
The board shall develop criteria to assess institutions' performance and shall
use those criteria in determining the allotment of performance and
accountability funds. The board shall evaluate each institution's achievement
of performance targets for the 1997-98 academic year and, by November 15, 1998,
the board shall notify the office of financial management to allot
institutions' fiscal year 1999 performance funds held in reserve, based upon
each institution's performance.

(3)
By January, 1999, the board shall recommend to the office of financial
management and appropriate legislative committees any recommended additions,
deletions, or revisions to the performance and accountability measures in
sections 601(3) of this act as part of the next master plan for higher
education. The recommendations shall be developed in consultation with the
institutions of higher education and may include additional performance
indicators to measure successful student learning and other student outcomes
for possible inclusion in the 1999-01 operating budget. The recommendations
shall include measures of performance demonstrating specific and measurable
improvements related to distance education and education provided primarily
through technology, to be determined by the board, in consultation with the
institutions of higher education.

(4)
$280,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$280,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
are provided solely for enrollment to implement RCW 28B.80.570 through
28B.80.585 (rural natural resources impact areas). The number of students
served shall be 50 full-time equivalent students per fiscal year. The board
shall ensure that enrollments reported under this subsection meet the criteria
outlined in RCW 28B.80.570 through 28B.80.585.

(5)
$70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided to develop a competency based admissions system for higher education
institutions. The board shall complete the competency based admissions system
and issue a report outlining the competency based admissions system by January
1999.

(6)
$500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for activities related to higher education facilities planning,
project monitoring, and access issues related to capital facilities. Of this
amount, $50,000 is provided for a study of higher education needs of Okanogan
county and surrounding communities with consideration given to alternative
approaches to educational service delivery, facility expansion, relocation or
partnership, and long-term growth and future educational demands of the region.

(7)
$150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 is
provided solely as one-time funding for computer upgrades.

(8)
$75,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$175,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
are provided solely to conduct a higher education and economic assessment of
the Spokane area as described in Substitute Senate Bill No. 6655.

(9)
$810,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely to complete the cooperative library project for the four-year
public higher education institutions. Funds shall be transferred to the
University of Washington for one-time equipment acquisition, ongoing support of
the system, and acquisition of shared electronic journals for use by all the
member institutions.

(10)
(($1,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
is provided solely to pay the increased employer funding rate resulting from
the settlement in Burbage et al. v. State of Washington (Thurston county
superior court cause no. 94-2-02560-8), as referenced in section 707(1)(c) of
this act. If the stipulated settlement is not approved by the court by August
1, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(11)))
$3,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely to pay the increased employer funding rate resulting from the
settlement in Retired State Employees et al. v. State of Washington
(Thurston county superior court cause no. 92-2-01294-1), as referenced in
section 707(1)(d) of this act. If the stipulated settlement is not approved by
the court by August 1, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

Sec.
1610. 1998
c 346 s 611 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD‑-FINANCIAL
AID AND GRANT PROGRAMS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 89,606,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ 97,232,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 8,278,000

Advanced
College Tuition Payment Program Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((1,198,000))

1,670,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((196,314,000))

196,786,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$527,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$526,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for the displaced homemakers program.

(2)
$216,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$220,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for the western interstate commission for higher education.

(3)
$118,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $118,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for the health personnel resources plan.

(4)
$1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for the scholarships and loans program under chapter
28B.115 RCW, the health professional conditional scholarship program. This
amount shall be deposited to the health professional loan repayment and
scholarship trust fund to carry out the purposes of the program.

(5)
$86,783,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$93,728,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for student financial aid, including all administrative costs.
The amounts in (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection are sufficient to implement
Second Substitute House Bill No. 1851 (higher education financial aid). Of
these amounts:

(a)
$67,266,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $73,968,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for the state need grant program. After April 1 of
each fiscal year, up to one percent of the annual appropriation for the state
need grant program may be transferred to the state work study program.

(b)
$15,350,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $15,350,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for the state work study program. After April 1 of
each fiscal year, up to one percent of the annual appropriation for the state
work study program may be transferred to the state need grant program;

(c)
$2,420,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $2,420,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for educational opportunity grants. For the purpose
of establishing eligibility for the equal opportunity grant program for placebound
students under RCW 28B.101.020, Thurston county lies within the branch campus
service area of the Tacoma branch campus of the University of Washington;

(d)
A maximum of 2.1 percent of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 1998 and 2.1 percent of the general fund‑-state appropriation
for fiscal year 1999 may be expended for financial aid administration,
excluding the four percent state work study program administrative allowance
provision;

(e)
$230,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $201,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for the educator's excellence awards. Any educator's
excellence moneys not awarded by April 1st of each year may be transferred by
the board to either the Washington scholars program or, in consultation with
the workforce training and education coordinating board, to the Washington
award for vocational excellence;

(f)
$1,011,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $1,265,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely to implement the Washington scholars program. Any
Washington scholars program moneys not awarded by April 1st of each year may be
transferred by the board to either the educator's excellence awards or, in
consultation with the workforce training and education coordinating board, to
the Washington award for vocational excellence;

(g)
$456,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $474,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely to implement Washington award for vocational
excellence program. Any Washington award for vocational program moneys not
awarded by April 1st of each year may be transferred by the board to either the
educator's excellence awards or the Washington scholars program;

(h)
$51,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$51,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for community scholarship matching grants of $2,000 each. To
be eligible for the matching grant, a nonprofit community organization
organized under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code must demonstrate
that it has raised $2,000 in new moneys for college scholarships after the
effective date of this act. No organization may receive more than one $2,000
matching grant; and

(6)
$412,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $1,198,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for working capital for the advanced tuition payment
program. The funds provided in this subsection may be expended only to the
extent that revenue from application fees and interest earnings deposited in
the advanced college tuition payment program account are insufficient to
support program operation. Prior to the end of fiscal year 1999, expenditures
shall be transferred between funds to the extent that program application fees
and interest earnings are available to minimize the expenditure from the
general fund.

(7)
$187,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $188,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for a demonstration project in the 1997-99 biennium to
provide undergraduate fellowships based upon the graduate fellowship program.

(8) Funding is provided in this section for the development of
three models for tuition charges for distance learning programs. Institutions
involved in distance education or extended learning shall provide information
to the board on the usage, cost, and revenue generated by such programs.

(End of part)

PART
XVII

SPECIAL
SUPPLEMENTAL APPROPRIATIONS

Sec.
1701. 1998
c 346 s 701 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES:
FOR GENERAL FUND BOND DEBT

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 448,355,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((484,005,000))

478,444,000

General
Fund Bonds Subject to the Limit Bond

Retirement
Account Appropriation........... $ ((932,360,000))

926,799,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((1,864,720,000))

1,853,598,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The general fund appropriation is for deposit into the general
fund bonds subject to the limit bond retirement account.

Sec.
1702. 1998
c 346 s 702 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES:
FOR GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 23,186,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((25,642,000))

25,626,000

General
Fund Bonds Excluded from the Limit

Bond
Retirement Account Appropriation...... $ ((48,828,000))

48,812,000

Reimbursable
Bonds Excluded from the Limit Bond

Retirement
Account Appropriation........... $ 104,933,000

Reimbursable
Bonds Subject to the Limit Bond

Retirement
Account Appropriation........... $ 2,264,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((204,853,000))

204,821,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The general fund appropriation is for deposit into the general
fund bonds excluded from the limit bond retirement account.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1703. A
new section is added to 1997 c 149 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE OFFICE
OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-AGRICULTURAL
COLLEGE TRUST LANDS. The sum of twenty million
dollars is appropriated from the general fund for fiscal year 1999 to the
office of financial management for settlement of claims relating to moneys used
by the department of natural resources for management of the agricultural
college trust lands. A settlement agreement shall be executed by June 30,
1999, between the office of financial management and Washington State
University that results in the release by Washington State University of any
and all claims against the state of Washington and the department of natural
resources pertaining to any past use of agricultural college trust land
revenues for payment of expenses of management or administration of that
trust. The settlement agreement shall reflect:

(1)
This initial deposit of twenty million dollars in state general funds within
five business days of the execution of the settlement agreement into the
agricultural permanent fund;

(2)
A total settlement amount of thirty-six million dollars; and

(3)
Payment of the remaining sixteen million dollar balance no later than June 30,
2005, so that the final amount reaches the total of thirty-six million dollars
and payment is made at a rate sufficient to provide debt service on the bonds
authorized for Washington State University under section 4(4) of Substitute
House Bill No. 1166.

If
such release is not executed by June 30, 1999, the appropriation in this
section shall lapse.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1704. A
new section is added to 1997 c 149 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE DISASTER
RESPONSE ACCOUNT. The sum of three million
dollars is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 1999, from the
general fund to the disaster response account for the purpose of creating a
contingency pool to fund fire-related costs. Allocations may be provided from
the disaster response account for fire mobilization costs or fire suppression
costs in excess of the amounts appropriated for these purposes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1705. A
new section is added to 1997 c 149 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-FIRE-RELATED
CONTINGENCY COSTS. The sum of three million
dollars is appropriated from the disaster response account for the purpose of
making allocations for fire mobilization costs or fire suppression costs in
excess of the amounts appropriated for these purposes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1706. A
new section is added to 1997 c 149 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS ACCOUNT. The
sum of thirty million dollars is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June
30, 1999, from the general fund to the community and technical colleges capital
projects account for system-wide minor repairs and replacement of portable
buildings.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1707. A
new section is added to 1997 c 149 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE FAIR
FUND. The sum of six million dollars is appropriated for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 1999, from the general fund to the fair fund for
the purposes set forth under RCW 15.76.115. Of this amount, up to two million
dollars shall be allotted from the fair fund for each of the fiscal years
ending June 30, 1999, June 30, 2000, and June 30, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1708. A
new section is added to 1997 c 149 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES ENDOWMENT TRUST FUND. The sum of five million
dollars is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 1999, from the
general fund to the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, solely for
implementation of sections 4, 5, and 7 of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5693. If
sections 4, 5, and 7 of the bill are not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount
appropriated in this section shall lapse.

Sec.
1709. 1998
c 346 s 704 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE OFFICE
OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-YEAR 2000 ALLOCATIONS

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 2,883,000

Liquor
Revolving Account Appropriation......... $ 131,000

Health
Care Authority Administrative Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 631,000

Accident
Account Appropriation.................. $............................. 1,102,000

Medical
Aid Account Appropriation.............. $ 1,102,000

Unemployment
Compensation Administration Account--

Federal
Appropriation...................... $ 1,313,000

Employment
Services Administrative Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 461,000

Forest
Development Account Appropriation........ $ 156,000

Off
Road Vehicle Account Appropriation......... $ 7,000

Surveys
and Maps Account Appropriation......... $ 1,000

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation $ 8,000

Resource
Management Cost Account Appropriation. $ 348,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 8,143,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriations will be allocated by the office of financial management to
agencies to complete Year 2000 date conversion maintenance on their computer
systems. Agencies shall submit their estimated costs of conversion to the
office of financial management by July 1, 1997.

(2)
Up to $10,000,000 of the cash balance of the data processing revolving account
may be expended on agency Year 2000 date conversion costs, embedded chips,
and contingency activities. The $10,000,000 will be taken from the cash
balances of the data processing revolving account's two major users, as
follows: $7,000,000 from the department of information services and $3,000,000
from the office of financial management. The office of financial management in
consultation with the department of information services shall allocate these
funds as needed to complete the date conversion projects.

(3)
Agencies receiving these allocations shall report at a minimum to the
information services board and to the governor every six months on the progress
of Year 2000 maintenance efforts.

Sec.
1710. 1998
c 346 s 705 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-YEAR
2000 CONVERSION

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)................ $ 233,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)................ $ 33,000

Hospital
Commission Account Appropriation........... $ 115,000

Architects'
License Account Appropriation........... $ 3,000

Professional
Engineers' Account Appropriation........ $ 9,000

Real
Estate Commission Account Appropriation........ $ 24,000

Health
Professions Account Appropriation............. $ 275,000

Master
License Account Appropriation................ $ 70,000

Safe
Drinking Water Account Appropriation........... $ 50,000

Uniform
Commercial Code Account Appropriation........ $ 11,000

Unemployment
Compensation Administration Account‑-

Federal
Appropriation........................... $ 3,245,000

Department
of Retirement Systems Expense Account

Appropriation................................... $ 890,000

Health
Services Account Appropriation............... $ 254,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 5,212,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriations will be allocated by the office of financial management to
agencies to perform Year 2000 date conversion maintenance on their computer
systems, embedded chips, and contingency activities and are provided
solely for these purposes.

(2)
Agencies receiving these allocations shall report at a minimum to the
information services board and to the governor every six months on the progress
of Year 2000 maintenance efforts.

Sec.
1711. 1998
c 346 s 706 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-YEAR
2000 CONTINGENCY POOL

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)................ $ 800,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)................ $ 4,200,000

Year
2000 Contingency Revolving Account

Appropriation................................... $ 5,000,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 10,000,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriations will be allocated by the office of financial management, in
consultation with the department of information systems or the department of
general administration, to agencies to perform Year 2000 maintenance on
their computer systems, embedded chips, and contingency activities and
are provided solely for these purposes.

(2)
To facilitate the transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and accounts, the
state treasurer is directed to transfer sufficient moneys from each dedicated
fund or account to the Year 2000 contingency revolving account, hereby created
in the state treasury, in accordance with schedules provided by the office of
financial management for additional Year 2000 maintenance on their computer
systems.

(3)
All agencies that receive these allocations will report upon request throughout
the biennium to the information services board and to the governor on the
progress of Year 2000 maintenance efforts.

Sec.
1712. 1998
c 346 s 707 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE GOVERNOR‑-COMPENSATION‑-INSURANCE
BENEFITS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 823,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((8,355,000))

8,025,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((3,152,000))

3,039,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ ((190,000))

183,000

Salary
and Insurance Increase Revolving Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((7,081,000))

6,827,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((19,601,000))

18,897,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)(a)
The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums shall not
exceed $312.35 per eligible employee for fiscal year 1998, and $331.31 for
fiscal year 1999.

(b)
The monthly employer funding rate for the operating costs of the health care
authority shall not exceed $4.99 per eligible employee for fiscal year 1998,
and $4.67 for fiscal year 1999.

(c)
((An additional $1.12 per eligible employee shall be included in the
employer funding rate for fiscal year 1999 to increase life insurance coverage
in accordance with the stipulated settlement in Burbage et al. v. State of
Washington (Thurston county superior court cause no. 94-2-02560-8).
$330,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state appropriation,
$113,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation, $7,000 of the
general fund‑-private/local appropriation, and $254,000 of the salary and
insurance increase revolving account appropriation are provided solely for the
additional $1.12 employer funding rate. If the stipulated settlement is not
approved by August 1, 1998, these amounts shall lapse.

(d))) An
additional $5.77 per eligible employee shall be included in the employer
funding rate for fiscal year 1999 to begin repaying the public employees' and
retirees' insurance account for any claims paid as a result of a court-approved
stipulated settlement in Retired State Employees et al. v. State of
Washington (Thurston county superior court cause no. 92-2-01294-1).
$1,768,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state appropriation,
$608,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation, $37,000 of the general
fund‑-private/local appropriation, and $1,362,000 of the salary and
insurance increase revolving account appropriation are provided solely for the
additional $5.77 employer funding rate. If the stipulated settlement is not
approved by August 1, 1998, these amounts shall lapse.

(((e)))
(d) Surplus moneys accruing to the public employees' and retirees'
insurance account due to lower-than-projected insurance costs may not be
reallocated by the health care authority to increase the actuarial value of public
employee insurance plans. Such funds shall be held in reserve in the public
employees' and retirees' insurance account and may not be expended without
prior legislative authorization.

(((f)))
(e) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health
benefits, the public employees' benefits board may require employee premium
co-payments, increase point-of-service cost sharing, and/or implement managed
competition.

(2)
To facilitate the transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and accounts, the
state treasurer is directed to transfer sufficient moneys from each dedicated
fund or account to the special fund salary and insurance contribution increase
revolving fund in accordance with schedules provided by the office of financial
management.

(3)
The health care authority, subject to the approval of the public employees'
benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health benefit premiums to eligible
retired or disabled public employees and school district employees who are
eligible for parts A and B of medicare, pursuant to RCW 41.05.085. From
January 1, 1998, through December 31, 1998, the subsidy shall be $41.26 per
month. Starting January 1, 1999, the subsidy shall be $43.16 per month.

(4)
Technical colleges, school districts, and educational service districts shall
remit to the health care authority for deposit in the public employees' and
retirees' insurance account established in RCW 41.05.120:

(a)
For each full-time employee, $14.80 per month beginning September 1, 1997;

(b)
For each part-time employee who, at the time of the remittance, is employed in
an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.32.010 or 41.40.010 and is eligible
for employer fringe benefit contributions for basic benefits, $14.80 each month
beginning September 1, 1997, prorated by the proportion of employer fringe
benefit contributions for a full-time employee that the part-time employee
receives.

The
remittance requirements specified in this subsection shall not apply to
employees of a technical college, school district, or educational service
district who purchase insurance benefits through contracts with the health care
authority.

(5)
The salary and insurance increase revolving account appropriation includes
amounts sufficient to fund health benefits for ferry workers at the premium
levels specified in subsection (1) of this section, consistent with the 1997-99
transportation appropriations act.

Sec.
1713. 1998
c 346 s 710 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-COMPENSATION
ACTIONS OF PERSONNEL RESOURCES BOARD

General
Fund--State Appropriation (FY 1998)......... $ 5,289,000

General
Fund--State Appropriation (FY 1999)......... $ 10,642,000

General
Fund--Federal Appropriation.................. $.................................. ((2,777,000))

2,803,000

Salary
and Insurance Increase Revolving

Account
Appropriation........................... $ ((6,085,000))

6,059,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 24,793,000

The
appropriations in this section shall be expended solely for the purposes
designated in this section and are subject to the conditions and limitations in
this section.

(1)
Funding is provided to fully implement the recommendations of the Washington
personnel resources board consistent with the provisions of chapter 319, Laws
of 1996.

(2)
Implementation of the salary adjustments for the various clerical classes,
physicians, dental classifications, pharmacists, maintenance custodians,
medical records technicians, fish/wildlife biologists, fish/wildlife
enforcement, habitat technicians, and fiscal technician classifications will be
effective July 1, 1997. Implementation of the salary adjustments for safety
classifications, park rangers, park aides, correctional officers/sergeants,
community corrections specialists, tax information specialists, industrial
relations specialists, electrical classifications at the department of labor
and industries, fingerprint technicians, some labor relations classifications,
health benefits specialists, foresters/land managers, and liquor enforcement
officers will be effective July 1, 1998.

Sec.
1714. 1997
c 149 s 713 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS‑-CONTRIBUTIONS
TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The ((appropriations)) state contributions to the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system shall be made on
a monthly basis consistent with chapter 41.45 RCW.

(1)
There is appropriated for state contributions to the law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' retirement system:

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 68,350,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((72,750,000))

71,350,000

Of
the appropriations in this subsection, $50,000 of the general fund fiscal year
1998 appropriation and $50,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1999
appropriation are provided solely for House Bill No. 1099 (LEOFF retirement
plan I). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, these amounts shall
lapse.

(2)
There is appropriated for contributions to the judicial retirement system:

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 8,500,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ 8,500,000

(3)
There is appropriated for contributions to the judges retirement system:

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 750,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ 750,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((159,600,000))

158,200,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1715. A
new section is added to 1997 c 149 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
SUNDRY
CLAIMS. The following sums, or so much thereof as may be
necessary, are appropriated from the general fund, unless otherwise indicated,
for relief of various individuals, firms, and corporations for sundry claims.
These appropriations are to be disbursed on vouchers approved by the director
of general administration, except as otherwise provided, as follows:

(1)
Reimbursement of criminal defendants acquitted on the basis of self-defense,
pursuant to RCW 9A.16.110:

(a)
Heather S. Lausten, claim number SCJ 98-02 $ 2,089

(b)
Michael A. McGee, claim number SCJ 98-03 $ 10,364

(c)
Arthur Watkins, claim number SCJ 98-05 $ 2,767

(d)
Lukes Markishtum, claim number SCJ 98-06 $ 3,832

(e)
Francesco Cozza, claim number SCJ 98-07 $ 10,862

(f)
Jason Brown, claim number SCJ 98-08 $ 21,093

(g)
Darius Deshields, claim number SCJ 98-10 $ 4,000

(h)
Justin D. Rogers, claim number SCJ 98-11 $ 52,114

(i)
Justin Anderson, claim number SCJ 98-12 $ 3,769

(j)
R. L. Heaverlo, claim number SCJ 98-13 $ 2,145

(k)
James A. Patten, claim number SCJ 98-14 $ 6,963

(l)
Robert S. Cain, claim number SCJ 98-15 $ 2,169

(m)
Jason Near, claim number SCJ 98-16 $ 4,304

(n)
Michael Fontana, claim number SCJ 98-17 $ 3,201

(o)
Hillel Schwartz, claim number SCJ 98-18 $ 5,758

(p)
Thomas H. Von Muller, claim number SCJ 99-01 $ 17,941

(q)
Dean Montgomery, claim number SCJ 99-03 $ 2,432

(r)
Douglas H. Jones, claim number SCJ 99-05 $ 17,116

(s)
Jack Zimmerman; George A. Bomar; George W. Bomar,

claim
number SCJ 99-06 $ 9,718

(t)
Vicki Polanco, claim number SCJ 99-04 $ 5,552

(2)
Payment from the state wildlife account for damage to crops by wildlife,
pursuant to RCW 77.36.040:

(a)
Gordon Sylvester, claim number SCG 98-03 $ 6,925

(b)
Northwestern Fruit & Produce Company,

claim
number SCG 99-01 $ 30,040

Sec.
1716. 1998
c 346 s 714 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑‑FOR THE MUNICIPAL
CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

Impaired
Driving Safety Account Appropriation ...... $ 480,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The amount appropriated in this section shall be distributed ((in accordance
with RCW 82.14.320)) to all cities ratably based on population as last
determined by the office of financial management. The distributions to any
city that substantially decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July
1, 1990, and that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with
criminal cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county
in which the city is located. $240,000 of the appropriation shall be
distributed in January 1999 and the remaining $240,000 of the appropriation
shall be distributed in April 1999. This funding is provided to cities for the
costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not limited
to, Substitute House Bill No. 2885 (drunk driving penalties), Second Substitute
House Bill No. 3070 (DUI penalties), Second Substitute House Bill No. 3089
(deferred prosecution), Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6142 (DUI/license
suspension), Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6165 (ignition interlock
violations), Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6166 (DUI penalties),
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6187 (DUI penalties), Engrossed Senate
Bill No. 6257 (intoxication levels lowered), and Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6293 (DUI penalties).

(2)
To implement the 1999 amendments to this section, the state treasurer shall
determine the amount of the April 1999 distribution to each city in the
following manner:

(a)
The state treasurer shall determine the amount of the total appropriation that
would have been distributed to each city if both the January 1999 and April
1999 distributions were made ratably based on population;

(b)
The state treasurer shall deduct from the amounts calculated under (a) of this
subsection the amount received by each city in the January 1999 distribution;

(c)
The amount to be distributed to each city shall be the amount calculated under
subsection (b) of this section if that amount is greater than zero; and

(d) If the appropriation in this section is inadequate to
distribute the amounts calculated under (c) of this subsection, the amounts
distributed to each city shall be ratably reduced.

(End of part)

PART
XVIII

OTHER SUPPLEMENTAL
TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS

Sec.
1801. 1998
c 346 s 801 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-STATE
REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

General
Fund Appropriation for fire insurance

premiums
distribution...................... $ ((6,617,250))

5,645,404

General
Fund Appropriation for public utility

district
excise tax distribution........... $ ((35,183,803))

32,201,185

General
Fund Appropriation for prosecuting attorneys

salaries................................... $ ((2,960,000))

2,879,908

General
Fund Appropriation for motor vehicle excise

tax
distribution........................... $ ((84,721,573))

60,839,289

City
Police and Fire Protection Assistance Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 23,882,284

General
Fund Appropriation for local mass transit

assistance................................. $ ((383,208,166))

284,666,379

General
Fund Appropriation for camper and travel

trailer
excise tax distribution............. $ ((3,904,937))

3,779,292

General
Fund Appropriation for boating

safety/education
and law enforcement

distribution............................... $ ((3,616,000))

3,750,381

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation

for
harbor improvement revenue distribution $ ((142,000))

152,342

Liquor
Excise Tax Account Appropriation for liquor

excise
tax distribution.................... $ ((22,287,746))

24,134,742

Liquor
Revolving Fund Appropriation for liquor

profits
distribution....................... $ ((36,989,000))

50,199,076

Timber
Tax Distribution Account Appropriation

for
distribution to "Timber" counties...... $ ((107,146,000))

85,930,224

Municipal
Sales and Use Tax Equalization Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((66,860,014))

67,308,480

County
Sales and Use Tax Equalization Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((11,843,224))

11,183,832

Death
Investigations Account Appropriation for

distribution
to counties for publicly funded

autopsies.................................. $ ((1,266,000))

1,365,401

County
Criminal Justice Account Appropriation... $........................................... 81,354,471

Municipal
Criminal Justice Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 32,522,450

County
Public Health Account Appropriation..... $ ((44,279,086))

49,012,899

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((924,901,720))

820,808,039

The
total expenditures from the state treasury under the appropriations in this
section shall not exceed the funds available under statutory distributions for
the stated purposes.

Sec.
1802. 1998
c 346 s 802 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

WILDLIFE
ACCOUNT LOAN. On June 30, 1998, the state treasurer shall
lend three million five hundred thousand dollars from the state general fund to
the wildlife account. Expenditure of funds is dependent upon the following
conditions:

(1)
By April 17, 1998, the department of fish and wildlife shall submit an
expenditure reduction plan for the 1997-99 biennium for the state wildlife
account to the office of financial management, the senate ways and means
committee, and the house of representatives appropriations committee. The plan
shall specify positions to be eliminated by program. The reductions shall be limited
to activities currently funded by the wildlife account.

(2)
By April 17, 1998, the department of fish and wildlife shall submit a list of
properties proposed for sale, with a site description of each property, to the
office of financial management, the senate ways and means committee, and the
house of representatives appropriations committee.

(3)
Beginning with the fourth quarter of fiscal year 1998, the department of fish
and wildlife shall submit quarterly revenue and expenditure reports for the wildlife
account to the office of financial management, the senate ways and means
committee, and the house of representatives appropriations committee.

(4)
The department of fish and wildlife shall develop, with the office of financial
management and the department of revenue, a model for forecasting revenues to
the state wildlife account. This forecast shall be incorporated into the
quarterly revenue and expenditure reports.

(5)
By ((November 1, 1998)) June 30, 1999, the department of fish and
wildlife shall submit a six-year financial plan for the state wildlife account
for fiscal years 1999-05 to the office of financial management, the senate ways
and means committee, and the house of representatives appropriations
committee. The plan shall include repayment of this loan by June 30, 2001.

Failure
to comply with the terms and conditions of this section shall cause the loan to
be immediately payable.

Sec.
1803. 1997
c 149 s 802 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-FEDERAL
REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

Forest
Reserve Fund Appropriation for federal forest

reserve
fund distribution.................. $ ((58,801,910))

56,515,669

General
Fund Appropriation for federal flood control

funds
distribution......................... $ 4,000

General
Fund Appropriation for federal grazing fees

distribution............................... $ ((52,000))

22,102

General
Fund Appropriation for distribution of

federal
funds to counties in conformance with

P.L.
97-99 Federal Aid to Counties......... $ ((885,916))

1,629,491

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((59,743,826))

58,171,262

The
total expenditures from the state treasury under the appropriations in this
section shall not exceed the funds available under statutory distributions for
the stated purposes.

Sec.
1804. 1998
c 346 s 803 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-TRANSFERS

General
Fund: For transfer to the Water Quality

Account.................................... $ ((28,595,900))

29,379,600

General
Fund: For transfer to the Flood Control

Assistance
Account.. ...................... $ 4,000,000

State
Convention and Trade Center Account: For

transfer
to the State Convention and Trade

Center
Operations Account.................. $ ((3,877,000))

0

Water
Quality Account: For transfer to the Water

Pollution
Control Account. Transfers shall be

made
at intervals coinciding with deposits of

federal
capitalization grant money into the

account.
The amounts transferred shall not

exceed
the match required for each federal

deposit.................................... $ 21,688,000

State
Treasurer's Service Account: For transfer to

the
general fund on or before June 30, 1999 an

amount
up to $3,600,000 in excess of the cash

requirements
of the State Treasurer's Service

Account.................................... $ 3,600,000

Public
Works Assistance Account: For transfer to

the
Drinking Water Assistance Account...... $ 9,949,000

County Sales and Use Tax Equalization Account:

For transfer to the County Public Health

Account.................................... $ ((2,191,498))

2,146,222

Local
Toxics Control Account: For transfer to the

state
toxics control account on or before June

30,
1999, an amount up to $2,500,000. The exact

amount
transferred shall be determined by the

office
of financial management, dependent on

whether
the June 1999 department of revenue

forecast
for the state toxics control account

identifies
revenue that, when combined with

the
fund balance, are sufficient to support

the
1999-01 budget as enacted by the legislature.

This
transfer is intended as a loan, to be repaid

by June 30, 2001........................... $ 2,500,000

(End of part)

PART
XIX

SUPPLEMENTAL
MISCELLANEOUS

Sec.
1901. 1998
c 347 s 53 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

ACQUISITION
OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS. The
following agencies may enter into financial contracts, paid for from operating
revenues, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts
indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section, agencies shall use the
most economical financial contract option available, including long-term
leases, lease-purchase agreements, lease-development with option to purchase
agreements or financial contracts using certificates of participation. The
director of general administration shall ensure that the clustering of state
facilities and the collocation and consolidation of state agencies take place
where such configurations are economical and consistent with agency space
needs. Agencies shall assist the department of general administration with
facility collocation and consolidation efforts.

State
agencies may enter into agreements with the department of general
administration and the state treasurer's office to develop requests to the
legislature for acquisition of properties and facilities through financial
contracts. The agreements may include charges for services rendered.

(1)
Department of general administration:

(a)
Enter into a financing contract in the amount of $8,804,000 plus financing
expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW, to purchase an
existing office building and associated land in Yakima for use by the
department of social and health services.

(b)
Enter into a financing contract in the amount of $2,874,100 plus financing
expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW, to purchase and
renovate the old federal building and associated land in Olympia for use by the
secretary of state.

(c)
Enter into a financing contract in the amount of $6,990,000 plus financing
expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW, to buy out the
lease and make improvements to the old Thurston county courthouse for use by
the office of attorney general. The department of general administration shall
advise and assist the office of attorney general on space and functional
planning to improve the efficient use of the facility.

(2)
Liquor control board:

Enter
into a long-term lease for a headquarters office in Thurston County for
approximately 46,000 square feet.

(3)
Department of corrections:

(a)
Enter into a long-term ground lease ((for 17 acres in the Tacoma tide flats
property from the Puyallup Nation)) or a long-term lease with a purchase
option for development of the ((400-bed)) Tacoma prerelease facility
for approximately $360,000 per annum. ((Prior to entering into the lease,
the department shall obtain written confirmation from the city of Tacoma and
Pierce county that the prerelease facility planned for the site meets all land
use, environmental protection, and community notification requirements that
would apply to the facility if the land was not owned by the Puyallup nation.))

(b)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of the department of corrections in
the amount of $14,736,900 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a 400-bed Tacoma prerelease
facility. The department of corrections shall comply with all land use,
environmental protection, and community notification statutes, regulations, and
ordinances in the construction and operation of this facility.

(c)
Lease-develop with the option to purchase or lease-purchase approximately 100
work release beds in facilities throughout the state for $5,000,000.

(d)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of the department of corrections in
the amount of $396,369 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a dairy barn at the Monroe farm.

(e)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of the department of corrections in
the amount of $2,100,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase or construct a correctional industries
transportation services warehouse.

(4)
Community and technical colleges:

(a)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Whatcom Community College in the
amount of $800,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to develop a childcare center costing $2,410,000. The
balance of project cost will be a combination of local capital funds and
nonstate funds provided through private gifts or contributions.

(b)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Pierce College in the amount of
$750,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW to develop a new classroom building on the Lakewood campus costing
$1,816,665. The balance of project cost will be provided through a combination
of local capital funds and existing minor works appropriation to replace
relocatable classrooms that are at the end of their useful lives.

(c)
Enter into a financing contract in behalf of Bellingham Technical College in
the amount of $350,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW for construction of a new classroom addition to the
diesel/heavy equipment instructional shop costing $411,309.

(d)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Green River Community College in
the amount of $1,526,150 plus financing expenses and reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for remodel of the Lindbloom student center building.

(e)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Edmonds Community College in the
amount of $2,787,950 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to develop a 10,000 square foot music building on the college
campus.

(f)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Highline Community College in the
amount of $2,070,613 plus financing and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW for the purchase of the Federal Way Center, currently being leased by
the college.

(g)
Enter into a financial contract on behalf of Green River Community College in
the amount of $100,000 plus financing and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW to purchase approximately 1.5 acres of land adjacent to the westside
parking lot.

(h)
Enter into a financial contract on behalf of South Puget Sound Community
College in the amount of $619,210 plus financing and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW to expand and redevelop the main campus parking lot A.

(i)
Enter into a financial contract on behalf of South Puget Sound Community
College in the amount of $5,500,000 plus financing and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to develop a $6,500,000 student union facility.

(j)
Enter into a financial contract on behalf of Wenatchee Valley College in the
amount of $500,000 plus financing and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW to purchase two buildings and property contiguous to the college
campus.

(5)
State parks and recreation:

Enter
into a financing contract on behalf of state parks and recreation in the amount
of $2,012,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW, to construct cabin and lodge facilities at Cama Beach, develop new
campsite electrical hookups, develop new recreational facilities, and expand
campsites at Ocean Beach/Grayland. It is the intent of the legislature that
debt service on all projects financed under this authority be paid from
operating revenues.

(6)
Washington state patrol:

Enter
into a financing contract for $600,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase the Washington state patrol
Port Angeles detachment office.

Sec.
1902. RCW
72.09.050 and 1995 c 189 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
secretary shall manage the department of corrections and shall be responsible
for the administration of adult correctional programs, including but not
limited to the operation of all state correctional institutions or facilities
used for the confinement of convicted felons. In addition, the secretary shall
have broad powers to enter into agreements with any federal agency, or any
other state, or any Washington state agency or local government providing for
the operation of any correctional facility or program for persons convicted of
felonies or misdemeanors or for juvenile offenders. Such agreements for
counties with local law and justice councils shall be required in the local law
and justice plan pursuant to RCW 72.09.300. The agreements may provide for
joint operation or operation by the department of corrections, alone, for by
any of the other governmental entities, alone. Beginning February 1, 1999,
the secretary may expend funds appropriated for the 1997-1999 biennium to enter
into agreements with any local government or private organization in any other
state, providing for the operation of any correctional facility or program for
persons convicted of felonies. The secretary may employ persons to aid in
performing the functions and duties of the department. The secretary may
delegate any of his or her functions or duties to department employees,
including the authority to certify and maintain custody of records and
documents on file with the department. The secretary is authorized to
promulgate standards for the department of corrections within appropriation
levels authorized by the legislature.

Pursuant to the authority granted in chapter 34.05 RCW, the
secretary shall adopt rules providing for inmate restitution when restitution
is determined appropriate as a result of a disciplinary action.

(End of part)

PART
XX

SEVERABILITY
AND EFFECTIVE DATES

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2001. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2002. (1)
Sections 927, 928, 931, and sections 1101 through 1902 of this act are
necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and take effect immediately.

(2)
Section 929 of this act takes effect September 1, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2003. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999, except as provided in section 2002
of this act.

(End of part)

ADMINISTRATOR
FOR THE COURTS............................... 6, 193

AGRICULTURAL COLLEGE TRUST
MANAGEMENT ACCOUNT................. 147

ATTORNEY GENERAL.......................................... 13,
199

SALARY ADJUSTMENTS............................................ 154

BELATED CLAIMS................................................ 150

BOARD FOR VOLUNTEER FIRE
FIGHTERS.............................. 29

BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY...................................... 27,
212

BOARD OF INDUSTRIAL INSURANCE
APPEALS.......................... 56

BOARD OF TAX APPEALS........................................... 25

BOND EXPENSES................................................. 165

CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL...................................... 14

CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY............................ 133,
328

CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON
SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS.... 13, 199

COLUMBIA RIVER GORGE
COMMISSION................................ 69

COMMISSION ON
AFRICAN-AMERICAN AFFAIRS......................... 23

COMMISSION ON ASIAN-AMERICAN
AFFAIRS........................... 12

COMMISSION ON HISPANIC
AFFAIRS................................. 22

COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL
CONDUCT............................. 6, 192

CONSERVATION COMMISSION........................................ 76

COURT OF APPEALS........................................... 6,
192

CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING
COMMISSION........................... 57

DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE...................................... 83

DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY,
TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.. 14, 205

DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS................................. 63,
256

DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY..................................... 69,
262

DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL
INSTITUTIONS........................... 14

DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND
WILDLIFE........................... 77, 269

DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION...................... 25, 203

DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH...................................... 60,
250

DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION
SERVICES............................. 26

DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND
INDUSTRIES........................ 58, 247

DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING................................... 85,
279

DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL
RESOURCES........................... 81, 275

DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL........................................ 21

DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT
SYSTEMS

CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT
SYSTEMS...................... 152, 346

OPERATIONS................................................ 23,
202

TRANSFERS..................................................... 160

DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE.......................................... 24

DEPARTMENT OF SERVICES FOR
THE BLIND........................... 67

DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND
HEALTH SERVICES.................. 31, 215

ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING
SERVICES PROGRAM............ 54, 242

AGING AND ADULT SERVICES
PROGRAM.......................... 46, 233

ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE
PROGRAM....................... 50, 239

CHILD SUPPORT PROGRAM......................................... 244

CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
PROGRAM...................... 31, 216

DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
PROGRAM........................ 43, 230

ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM................................. 49,
237

JUVENILE REHABILITATION
PROGRAM........................... 35, 221

Juvenile Violence Prevention
Grants............................ 38

MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM................................ 51,
240

MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM..................................... 40,
225

PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES
PROGRAM........................ 55, 245

VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION
PROGRAM......................... 54, 242

DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS
AFFAIRS............................ 59, 249

DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
ENDOWMENT TRUST FUND............... 340

DISASTER RESPONSE ACCOUNT..................................... 339

EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY................... 142

EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY............................ 133,
327

ECONOMIC AND REVENUE FORECAST
COUNCIL.......................... 20

EDUCATION TECHNOLOGY
REVOLVING ACCOUNT........................ 147

EMERGENCY FUND ALLOCATIONS.................................... 165

EMPLOYMENT SECURITY
DEPARTMENT............................ 68, 260

ENVIRONMENTAL HEARINGS OFFICE............................. 75,
269

EXPENDITURE AUTHORIZATIONS.................................... 162

FAIR FUND..................................................... 340

FORENSIC INVESTIGATION
COUNCIL................................. 27

GOVERNOR

COMPENSATION--INSURANCE
BENEFITS......................... 150, 343

EXTRAORDINARY CRIMINAL
JUSTICE COSTS.......................... 148

SALARY INCREASES FOR
DIRECTORS AND BOARD MEMBERS.............. 154

TORT DEFENSE SERVICES......................................... 145

GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF INDIAN
AFFAIRS............................ 12

GROWTH PLANNING HEARINGS
BOARD................................. 30

HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING
BOARD

FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT
PROGRAMS......................... 136, 334

POLICY COORDINATION AND
ADMINISTRATION................... 135, 332

HORSE RACING COMMISSION........................................ 27

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES................................... 2,
190

HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION........................................ 56

INCENTIVE SAVINGS

FY 2000....................................................... 156

FY 2001....................................................... 157

INDETERMINATE SENTENCE REVIEW
BOARD............................ 59

INFORMATION SYSTEMS PROJECTS.................................. 162

INSURANCE COMMISSIONER......................................... 26

INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR
OUTDOOR RECREATION................... 75

JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND
REVIEW COMMITTEE.................... 3

JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS
COMMITTEE............................. 5

LAW LIBRARY..................................................... 6

LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND
ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM COMMITTEE..... 4

LEGISLATIVE FACILITIES........................................ 168

LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR............................................. 9

LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD........................................... 27

MILITARY DEPARTMENT....................................... 29,
212

MUNICIPAL RESEARCH COUNCIL..................................... 25

OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE
HEARINGS.............................. 21

OFFICE OF FINANCIAL
MANAGEMENT.................. 20, 146, 201, 339

AGRICULTURAL COLLEGE TRUST
LANDS.............................. 339

COMPENSATION ACTIONS OF
PERSONNEL RESOURCES BOARD........ 155, 345

CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT
SYSTEMS........................... 155

EMERGENCY FUND................................................ 146

FIRE CONTINGENCY POOL......................................... 146

FIRE-RELATED CONTINGENCY
COSTS................................ 340

IMPLEMENTATION OF COLLECTIVE
BARGAINING....................... 146

PERSONNEL RESOURCES BOARD'S
SALARY SURVEY..................... 156

YEAR 2000 ALLOCATIONS.................................... 147,
341

YEAR 2000 CONTINGENCY POOL.................................... 342

YEAR 2000 CONVERSION.......................................... 342

OFFICE OF MINORITY AND
WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES............ 25

OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE................................... 8,
194

OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR.......................................... 8

OFFICE OF THE STATE ACTUARY..................................... 5

PERSONNEL APPEALS BOARD........................................ 23

PLAN 2 AND PLAN 3 EARLY
RETIREMENT REDUCTION FACTORS STUDY.... 153

PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION............................... 9,
195

PUBLIC EMPLOYEES' RETIREMENT
SYSTEM........................... 166

PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS
COMMISSION......................... 30

REDISTRICTING COMMISSION....................................... 12

RESOURCE COST MANAGEMENT
ACCOUNT LOAN......................... 157

SALARY COST OF LIVING
ADJUSTMENT.............................. 153

SALMON RECOVERY ACCOUNT....................................... 147

SECRETARY OF STATE......................................... 9,
195

SENATE..................................................... 3,
191

SENTENCING GUIDELINES
COMMISSION............................... 68

STATE AUDITOR............................................. 12,
198

STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGES......... 127, 319

STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION................................. 121,
313

COMMON SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION.................................... 313

STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE
CENTER.............................. 30

STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY............................... 55,
245

STATE INVESTMENT BOARD......................................... 24

STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION..................... 74, 267

STATE PATROL.............................................. 85,
281

STATE REVENUE LITIGATION...................................... 160

STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND.................................... 143

STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF..................................... 143

STATE TREASURER................................................ 12

BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST........................ 144,
145, 338

COUNTY CRIMINAL JUSTICE
ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT.................... 149

FEDERAL REVENUES FOR
DISTRIBUTION........................ 159, 352

MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE
ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT............ 149, 348

STATE REVENUES FOR
DISTRIBUTION.......................... 158, 350

TRANSFERS................................................ 159,
353

STATUTE LAW COMMITTEE........................................... 5

STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS...................................... 165

SUNDRY CLAIMS................................................. 347

SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION

BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE
COMPENSATION......................... 100

EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS................................ 113,
307

EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS................................. 111

ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY
SCHOOL IMPROVEMENT ACT............... 112

GENERAL APPORTIONMENT (BASIC
EDUCATION)................... 93, 291

INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION
PROGRAMS......................... 112, 306

LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM.............................. 118,
310

LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE.................................. 112,
305

LOCAL ENHANCEMENT FUNDS.................................. 119,
311

PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE
STUDENTS..................... 113, 306

PUPIL TRANSPORTATION..................................... 106,
300

SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION
ADJUSTMENTS................. 104, 298

SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE PROGRAMS.................................. 107

SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS............................... 107,
301

STATE ADMINISTRATION...................................... 88,
284

TRAFFIC SAFETY EDUCATION
PROGRAMS........................ 111, 305

TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL
PROGRAMS.......................... 118, 309

SUPREME COURT................................................... 5

THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE.............................. 133,
329

UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON................................. 130,
322

UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION
COMMISSION........................ 28

VIDEO TELECOMMUNICATIONS...................................... 164

VOLUNTARY RETIREMENT
INCENTIVE PROGRAMS....................... 167

VOLUNTARY SEPARATION
INCENTIVES AND OPTIONS................... 166

WASHINGTON POLLUTION
LIABILITY REINSURANCE PROGRAM............. 84

WASHINGTON STATE ARTS
COMMISSION.............................. 141

WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY........................... 142

WASHINGTON STATE LIBRARY...................................... 141

WASHINGTON STATE LOTTERY....................................... 22

WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY.............................. 131,
324

WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY............................ 134,
331

WILDLIFE ACCOUNT.............................................. 351

WORK FORCE TRAINING AND
EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD.......... 141

--- END ---