BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
capital budget is hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions set forth in
this act, the several dollar amounts hereinafter specified, or so much thereof
as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby
appropriated and authorized to be incurred for capital projects during the
period ending June 30, 2001, out of the several funds specified in this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
Numbers in parentheses refer to project identifier codes established by the
office of financial management.

PART
1

GENERAL
GOVERNMENT

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 101. FOR
THE COURT
OF APPEALS

Division
II Court and Office: Renovation (00-1-001)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,454,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,454,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 102. FOR
THE OFFICE
OF THE GOVERNOR

Salmon
Recovery Grants Program (00-2-001)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
This appropriation is provided to the salmon recovery office within the office
of the governor to provide grants to local governments and tribes to implement
the state-wide salmon recovery strategy.

(2)
$16,000,000 of the appropriation in this section shall be provided to salmon
recovery regions to conduct planning and analysis necessary to prepare salmon
recovery plans. Local governments with a demonstrated economic need shall
receive first priority for these funds.

(3)
The remaining amount is provided for salmon recovery projects and activities
including but not limited to: Water quality, water conservation and reuse,
fish passage barrier correction, storm water mitigation, and monitoring of
salmon recovery projects and activities. These funds will be distributed to
priority water resource inventory areas as described in the state-wide salmon
recovery strategy.

(4)
All projects and activities funded with this appropriation must be
science-based and clearly benefit salmonid species currently listed or proposed
for listing under the Federal Endangered Species Act or listed as a species of
concern in the state-wide salmon and steelhead stock inventory.

(5)
In making allocation decisions, the salmon recovery office shall utilize the
interagency review team established in RCW 75.46.080, along with the department
of ecology and the interagency committee for outdoor recreation and a panel of
scientists from local governments, tribes, and federal agencies, to review
projects and plans.

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 80,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 180,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 260,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 103. FOR
THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY
OF STATE

Northwest
Washington Regional Archives: HVAC system upgrade and balancing (00-1-001)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 70,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 70,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 104. FOR
THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE

Tumwater
Records Center: Expansion (00-2-001)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 250,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 2,550,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,800,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 105. FOR
THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE

Puget
Sound Archives Building (94-2-003)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 200,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 6,540,125

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,740,125

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 106. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Community
Economic Revitalization (00-2-001)

The
moneys from the public facility construction loan revolving account shall be
used solely to provide loans to eligible local governments and shall not be
used for grants. The department shall ensure that all principal and interest
payments from loans made on moneys from this account are paid into this
account.

Appropriation:

Public
Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account‑-State........................... $ 13,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 36,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 49,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 107. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

County
Public Facility Construction (00-2-010)

The
appropriation in this section shall be used solely for financial assistance to
distressed counties that have experienced extraordinary costs due to the
location of a major new business facility or the substantial expansion of an
existing business facility in the county.

Appropriation:

Distressed
County Facilities Construction

Loan
Account‑-State...................... $ 4,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 108. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Public
Works Trust Fund (00-2-002)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following condition and
limitation: $10,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is for the preconstruction
program as set forth in RCW 43.155.068.

Appropriation:

Public
Works Assistance Account‑-State.......... $ 213,150,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 852,600,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,065,750,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 109. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Housing
Assistance, Weatherization, and Affordable Housing (00-2-003)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 50,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 200,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 250,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 110. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Development
Loan Fund (00-2-004)

Appropriation:

Washington
State Development Loan

Account‑-State........................... $ 3,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 18,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 21,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 111. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Building
for the Arts (00-2-005)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The following projects are eligible for funding:

Location Recommendation

Projects
Previously Approved

Columbia
Theatre (Phase II), Longview $75,000

Mt.
Baker Theatre (Phase II), Bellingham $137,000

People's
Lodge, Seattle $256,000

Seattle
Symphony, Seattle $1,600,000

New
Projects

Arts
West, Seattle $262,000

Bellevue
Art Museum, Bellevue $1,250,000

Chewelah
Com. Celebrations, Chewelah $6,500

Children's
Museum/Spokane, Spokane $62,000

Columbia
Point (Phase II), Richland $428,000

Everett
Theatre, Everett $91,000

Filipino-American
Community Hall, Bainbridge Island $32,000

Gladish
Center, Pullman $36,000

Harlequin
Productions, Olympia $170,000

Harrington
Opera House, Harrington $35,000

Icicle
Creek Music Center, Leavenworth $54,000

Intiman
Theatre, Seattle $380,000

International
Glass Museum, Tacoma $750,000

Kirkland
Arts Center, Kirkland $9,900

Knutzen
Theatre, Federal Way $413,000

Maple
Hall, La Conner $135,000

Nisqually
Cultural Museum, Olympia $2,400

Pottery
Northwest, Seattle $298,000

Richard
Hugo House, Seattle $50,000

Spokane
Civic Theatre, Spokane $69,000

Tacoma
Art Museum, Tacoma $1,250,000

West
Olympic Council/Arts, Forks $18,000

Total
All Projects $7,869,800

(2)
State grants shall not exceed fifteen percent of either the estimated total
capital cost or actual capital cost of a project, whichever is less. The
remaining portions of the project capital costs shall be a match from nonstate
sources. The match may include cash and land value. The department is
authorized to set matching requirements for individual projects.

(3)
State grants shall be distributed in the order in which matching requirements
are met. The department may fund projects that demonstrate adequate progress
and have secured the necessary match funding. The department may require that
projects recompete for funding.

(4)
By December 15, 1999, the department shall submit a report to the appropriate
fiscal committees of the legislature on the progress of the building for the
arts program, including a list of projects funded under this section.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,600,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 16,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 21,600,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 112. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Community
Services Facilities Program (00-2-006)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The state grant may provide no more than twenty-five percent of
either the estimated total capital cost or actual total capital cost, whichever
is less. The remaining portion of the project capital cost shall be a match
from nonstate sources and may include cash, land value, and other in-kind
contributions.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 16,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 20,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 113. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Drinking
Water Assistance Program (00-2-007)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Funding from the state shall be matched with new federal sources to improve the
quality of drinking water in the state, and shall be used solely for projects
that achieve the goals of the federal safe drinking water act.

(2)
The department shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
January 1, 2000, on the progress of the program, including administrative and
technical assistance procedures, the application process, and funding
priorities.

Appropriation:

Drinking
Water Assistance Account‑-State........ $ 7,700,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 20,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 27,700,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 114. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Boarding
Home Fire Safety Program (00-2-008)

The
appropriations in this section are provided solely for grants for the
installation or retrofit of fire sprinklers in adult boarding homes. The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The department in consultation with the state fire marshal and the department
of social and health services may develop rules to implement the grant program.

(2)
The amount of the grant for an existing adult boarding home shall not be
greater than the difference between the cost of retrofitting and the cost of
installing sprinklers during original construction of a comparable adult
boarding home with fire sprinklers.

(3)
To be eligible for a grant under this section, the adult group home shall be
licensed and accredited with the department of social and health services. To
be eligible for a grant under this section, at least fifteen percent of the
adult group home's residents must be department of social and health services
clients. The adult group home must maintain the department of social and
health services client ratio level for a period of no less than five years. If
the department of social and health services client ratio level is not
maintained, then the adult group home shall reimburse the state for the amount
of the grant plus appropriate interest.

(4)
Any home receiving a grant shall complete the installation of the fire
sprinklers by June 30, 2001.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 115. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Housing
for Homeless Families With Children Program (00-2-009)

The
appropriation in this section is provided solely for the development of
additional emergency shelters and transitional housing opportunities for
homeless families with children. The department shall endeavor to minimize the
amount of these funds that are utilized for staff and administrative purposes.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 20,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 25,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 116. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Farm
Worker Housing Assistance (00-2-011)

The
appropriation in this section is provided solely for the development of housing
for farm workers. The department shall endeavor to minimize the amount of
these funds that are utilized for staff and administrative purposes.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 8,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 32,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 40,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 117. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Seattle
- Burke Museum of Natural History: Predesign (00-2-012)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Funds in this section are provided solely for the predesign of an addition to
the museum.

(2)
Each dollar expended from the appropriation in this section shall be matched by
at least one dollar from nonstate sources for the same purpose.

(3)
Funds in this section shall be disbursed by the department as appropriate and
only when the matching portion has been secured by the museum.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 350,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 350,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 118. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Community
Economic Revitalization (86-1-001)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Moneys from the reappropriation shall be used solely to provide loans to
eligible local governments and shall not be used for grants.

(2)
The department shall ensure that all principal and interest payments from loans
made from moneys from the reappropriation are paid into this account.

Reappropriation:

Public
Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account‑-State........................... $ 6,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 559,003

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,559,003

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 119. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Development
Loan Fund (88-2-002)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-

State.................................... $ 558,716

Washington
State Development Loan

Account‑-State........................... $ 2,893,400

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 3,452,116

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 351,769

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,803,885

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 120. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Grays
Harbor Dredging (88-2-006)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The reappropriation is provided solely for the state's share of remaining cost
for Grays Harbor dredging and associated mitigation.

(2)
State funds shall be disbursed at a rate not to exceed one dollar for every
four dollars of federal funds expended by the army corps of engineers and one
dollar from other nonstate sources.

(3)
Expenditure of moneys from this reappropriation is contingent on a cost-sharing
arrangement and the execution of a local cooperation agreement between the port
of Grays Harbor and the army corps of engineers pursuant to P.L. 99-662, the
federal water resources development act of 1986, whereby the corps of engineers
will construct the project as authorized by the federal act.

(4)
In the event the project cost is reduced, any resulting reduction and
reimbursement of nonfederal costs realized by the port of Grays Harbor shall be
shared proportionally with the state.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-

State.................................... $ 1,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 121. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Housing
Assistance Weatherization and Affordable Housing Program (88-5-015)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 17,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 48,790,503

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 65,790,503

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 122. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Seventh
Street Theatre (90-2-008)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 130,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 130,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 123. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Snohomish
County Drainage (92-2-011)

The
reappropriation in this section shall be matched by at least $585,000 provided
from nonstate sources for capital costs of this project.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 344,829

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 344,829

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 124. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Building
for the Arts (92-5-100)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,655,186

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,888,708

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,543,894

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 125. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Challenger
Learning Center (93-5-006)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The reappropriation is provided solely for support of science education at the
Challenger learning center at the museum of flight; and

(2)
Each dollar expended from the reappropriation in this section shall be matched
by at least one dollar from nonstate sources for the same purpose.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 61,673

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 258,639

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 320,312

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 126. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Public
Works Trust Fund (94-2-001)

The
moneys from the public works assistance account shall be used solely to provide
loans to eligible local governments and shall not be used for grants. The
department shall ensure that all principal and interest payments from loans
made on moneys from this account are paid into this account.

Reappropriation:

Public
Works Assistance Account‑-State.......... $ 142,632,386

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 142,632,386

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 127. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Washington
Technology Center: Equipment (94-2-002)

The
reappropriation in this section is provided solely for equipment installation
on the first floor of Fluke Hall. The reappropriation shall be transferred and
administered by the University of Washington.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 9,435

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)............ ... $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,435

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 128. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Olympic
Peninsula Natural History Museum (94-2-005)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Each two dollars expended from this reappropriation shall be matched by at
least one dollar from other sources. The match may include cash, land, and
in-kind donations.

(2)
It is the intent of the legislature that this reappropriation represents a
one-time grant for this project.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 164,827

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 164,827

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 129. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Thorp
Grist Mill (94-2-007)

The
total state funding in this section shall be matched by at least $47,500 from
nonstate and nonfederal sources. The match may include cash or in-kind
contributions. The department shall assist the Thorp Mill town historical
preservation society in soliciting moneys from the intermodal surface
transportation efficiency act to support the project.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 61,958

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 916

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 62,874

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 130. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Daybreak
Star Center (94-2-100)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 304,632

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 365,058

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 669,690

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 131. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Timber
Ports Capital Asset Improvement (94-2-102)

The
appropriation in this section is provided to continue assisting the ports of
Grays Harbor, Port Angeles, and Longview with infrastructure development and
facilities improvements to increase economic diversity and enhance employment
opportunities. The reappropriation is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Each port shall provide, at a minimum, six dollars of nonstate match for every
five dollars received from the reappropriation. The match may include cash and
land value.

(2)
State assistance to each port shall not exceed the following amounts:

Port Amount

Grays
Harbor $ 564,000

Port
Angeles $1,500,000

Longview $1,855,000

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,594,481

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 706,687

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,301,168

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 132. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Community
Services Facilities Program (98-2-007)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,840,455

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,599,012

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,439,467

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 133. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Drinking
Water Assistance Program (98-2-008)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Funding from the state public works trust fund program shall be matched with
new federal sources to improve the quality of drinking water in the state, and
shall be used solely for projects which achieve the goals of the federal safe
drinking water act.

(2)
The department shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
January 1, 2000, on the progress of the program, including administrative and
technical assistance procedures, the application process and funding
priorities.

Reappropriation:

Drinking
Water Assistance Account‑-State........ $ 9,949,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,949,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 134. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Mirabeau
Point Community Complex (98-2-010)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The amount is provided solely for a grant to Spokane county for design and
development costs for Mirabeau Point community complex.

(2)
The amount represents the entire state contribution to the project and shall be
matched by $8,500,000 in contributions toward the project from nonstate
sources.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL................................ ... $ 1,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 135. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Infrastructure
Needs Assessment (99-2-008)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The public works board, "board", in consultation with the department
of community, trade, and economic development, shall contract for a local
government infrastructure needs assessment. The board shall issue a progress
report to the governor, house of representatives capital budget committee, the
senate ways and means committee, the joint legislative transportation
committee, the house of representative government administration committee, and
the senate government operations committee by January 31, 1999. The final
report shall be delivered by June 30, 1999.

(2)
The infrastructure needs assessment shall use local capital improvement plans,
to the extent available, to identify local government infrastructure needs for
the planning, acquisition, construction, repair, replacement, rehabilitation,
or improvements necessary for the next six years. The definitions and
principles to be used in determining infrastructure needs shall be those set
forth in chapter 36.70A RCW, including economic development. The
infrastructure assessment shall also include a listing, description and
evaluation of utilization of all private and public financing options, and
policy alternatives that would assist in meeting local government
infrastructure needs. For the purpose of this infrastructure needs assessment:

(a)
Local government shall include each city, town, and each water, sewer, storm
water, and public utility district providing water or sewer services in the
state of Washington.

(b)
Infrastructure shall be limited to bridges, roadways, domestic water, sanitary
sewer, and storm water systems.

(3)
The board shall contract for the collection and review of local capital
expenditure data, the evaluation of local government infrastructure needs, the
projection of future infrastructure needs, including needs to meet requirements
under chapter 36.70A RCW. The board shall also contract for the development of
criteria for a data base which can be maintained and updated, and such other
matters as the board may deem necessary to provide an adequate representation
of local capital needs and the ability of local governments to finance such
needs.

(4)
The legislative evaluation and accountability program shall cooperate with the
department in the completion of the infrastructure needs assessment and may
enter into interagency agreements. The legislative evaluation and
accountability program shall develop the structure of the local government
infrastructure data base and provide recommendations on the maintenance of the
data base. The data base shall: Use the data compiled by and be compatible
with that developed by the board's contractor; and have a structure to maintain
its future use and update.

The
department shall provide a compilation of all capital improvement plans
prepared by local governments. The department shall identify: Federal, state,
and local infrastructure financing sources currently in use; all revenue
sources available, but fully utilized by each local government, and obstacles
to full utilization; and the compilation of local government expenditures for
infrastructure investments by source of funds and by jurisdiction for the
period beginning January 1, 1993, and ending December 31, 1997, for local
governments with a population greater than fifty thousand; and January 1, 1995,
and ending December 31, 1997, for local governments with fewer than fifty
thousand population.

(5)
The board shall convene an advisory committee of stakeholders to include
representatives from the department of community, trade, and economic
development, the office of financial management, the legislative evaluation and
accountability program, the association of Washington cities, the Washington
association of realtors, the national association of industrial office
properties, the building industry association of Washington, the associated
general contractors, the association of Washington business, Washington state
building and construction trades council, and 1000 friends of Washington. The
board may, as it deems necessary, utilize technical advisory groups or state
agencies in addition to the advisory committee to assist itself in implementing
this proviso.

The
advisory committee shall serve assist the board in guiding the infrastructure
assessment and in developing interpretation of this proviso as necessary. The
committee shall establish criteria and categorize infrastructure projects as
necessary to meet the requirements set forth in chapter 36.70A RCW, or as
reflective of other community priorities, and review elements and standards of
infrastructure needs identified in the study.

Reappropriation:

Public
Works Assistance Account‑-State.......... $ 50,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 50,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 136. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Emergency
Flood and Erosion Repairs (99-2-009)

The
reappropriation in this section is provided solely to continue shoreline
repairs at Ocean Shores to prevent further erosion and flood control.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 150,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 150,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 137. FOR
THE OFFICE
OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Underground
Storage Tank: Pool (00-1-001)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The money provided in this section shall be allocated to agencies and
institutions, except for the state community and technical colleges, for
removal, replacement, and environmental cleanup projects related to underground
storage tanks.

(2)
No moneys appropriated in this section or in any section specifically
referencing this section shall be expended unless the office of financial
management has reviewed and approved the cost estimates for the project.
Projects to replace tanks shall conform with guidelines to minimize risk of
environmental contamination. Above ground storage tanks shall be used whenever
possible and agencies shall avoid duplication of tanks.

(3)
Funds not needed for the purposes identified in this section may be transferred
for expenditure to the Year 2000 Building, Facility, and Equipment Date
Conversion project in section 141 of this act.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 13,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 17,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 138. FOR
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Hazardous
Materials: Pool (00-1-002)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The money provided in this section shall be allocated to agencies and
institutions, except for the state community and technical colleges, for
removal or abatement of asbestos and other hazardous materials.

(2)
No moneys appropriated in this section or in any section specifically
referencing this section shall be expended unless the office of financial
management has reviewed and approved the cost estimates for the project.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 54,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 59,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 139. FOR
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Budget
System Improvements (00-1-004)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 300,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 1,200,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,600,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 140. FOR
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Colocated
Cascadia Branch Campus (94-1-003)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 15,421,888

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 17,421,888

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 141. FOR
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

Year
2000 Building, Facility, and Equipment Date Conversion (99-1-001)

The
office of financial management shall allocate appropriations to be used by
state agencies and universities in performing Year 2000 assessments of facility
management systems, control systems, and other computer systems related to
capital facilities and equipment. Funds available in this appropriation may
also be allocated for corrective measures on a priority basis to address
critical system repairs.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 142. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Emergency
and Small Repairs (00-1-002)

The
appropriations in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

Capitol
Building Construction Account‑-State.... $ 100,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 125,000

Thurston
County Capital Facilities Account‑-State $ 775,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 1,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,076,473

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 6,200,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,276,473

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 143. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Capitol
Campus Facilities: Preservation (00-1-003)

The
appropriations shall support the detailed list of projects maintained by the
office of financial management.

Appropriation:

Capitol
Building Construction Account‑-State.... $ 1,350,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,350,000

Thurston
County Capital Facilities Account‑-

State.................................... $ 1,940,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 4,640,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 24,335,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 28,975,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 144. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

General
Administration Building: Preservation (00-1-004)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,275,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 5,900,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,175,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 145. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Alaska
Street Building: Renovation (00-1-005)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 146. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

IBM
Building: Replacement (00-1-006)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Funds provided in this section shall be used solely to conduct an evaluation of
the project described in this section in order to determine the highest and
best use in accordance with the predesign manual published by the office of
financial management.

(2)
Future appropriations for this project are subject to the submittal of
completed predesign requirements on or before July 1, 2000.

Appropriation:

Thurston
County Capital Facilities Account‑-

State.................................... $ 150,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).. ................. $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 150,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 147. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Capitol
Lake: Management plan implementation (00-1-007)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,600,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 9,125,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,725,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 148. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Washington
State Training and Conference Center: Preservation (00-1-008)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriations shall support the detailed list of projects maintained by
the office of financial management.

(2)
The department shall coordinate all work with the tenants of the center.

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑-Private/Local..................... $ 125,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 1,125,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 1,200,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,325,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 149. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Thurston
County Facilities: Preservation (00-1-009)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriations shall support the detailed list of projects maintained by
the office of financial management.

(2)
The department shall coordinate all work with the tenants in facilities
undergoing preservation work.

Appropriation:

Capitol
Building Construction Account‑-State.... $ 500,000

Thurston
County Capital Facilities Account‑-

State.................................... $ 1,700,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 2,200,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 8,225,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,425,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 150. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

North
Cascade Gateway Center (Northern State Multiservice Center): Preservation
(00-1-010)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriations shall support the detailed list of projects maintained by
the office of financial management.

(2)
The department shall coordinate all work with the tenants of the center.

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑-Private/Local..................... $ 607,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 800,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 1,407,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 6,770,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,177,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 151. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Americans
with Disabilities Act: Pool (00-1-011)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The money provided in this section shall be solely allocated to agencies and
institutions, except for the state community and technical colleges, for
improvements to state-owned facilities for program access enhancements.

(2)
No moneys appropriated in this section or in any section specifically
referencing this section shall be expended unless the department of general
administration has reviewed and approved the cost estimates for the project.
The department of general administration shall implement an agency request and
evaluation procedure similar to the one adopted in the 1997-99 biennium for
distribution of funds.

(3)
No moneys appropriated in this section shall be available to institutions of
higher education to modify dormitories.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 20,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 25,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 152. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Infrastructure
Project: Savings (00-1-999)

Projects
that are completed in accordance with section 911 of this act that have been
reviewed by the office of financial management may have their remaining funds
transferred to this project for the following purposes: (1) Road repair; (2)
roof repair; (3) electrical system repair; (4) steam and utility distribution
system repair; (5) plumbing system repair; (6) heating, ventilating, and air
conditioning repairs; (7) emergency repairs due to natural disasters or
accidents; and, (8) critical year 2000 embedded chip modifications.

Appropriation:

Capitol
Building Construction Account‑-

State.................................... $ 1

State
Building Construction Account‑-

State.................................... $ 1

Thurston
County Capital Facilities

Account‑-State........................... $ 1

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 3

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)..................... $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 153. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Engineering
and Architectural Services: Project management (00-2-007)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriations in this section shall be used to provide those services to
state agencies required by RCW 43.19.450 that are essential and mandated
activities defined as core services and are included in the engineering and
architectural services responsibilities and task list for general public works
projects of normal complexity. The department may negotiate agreements with
agencies for additional fees to manage exceptional projects or for services
above core services as described as optional and extra services in the task
list.

(2)
The department shall create a central repository and distribution point for
information and knowledge that can improve design and construction projects and
practices. Copies of all completed predesigns, BEST studies, and value
engineering and constructability reviews shall be collected by the department
and be distributed electronically.

Appropriation:

Capitol
Building Construction Account‑-State.... $ 200,000

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 700,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 7,600,000

Thurston
County Capital Facilities Account‑-

State.................................... $ 200,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 8,700,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 37,550,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 46,250,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 154. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

East
Plaza and Plaza Garage Repairs (96-1-002)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Capitol
Building Construction Account‑-State.... $ 1,300,000

Appropriation:

Capitol
Building Construction Account‑-State.... $ 700,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,700,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 4,400,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 7,895,572

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 30,000,000

-------------

TOTAL....................... ............ $ 43,595,572

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 155. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Legislative
Buildings: Safety and infrastructure (98-1-005)

(1)
The appropriations shall support the detailed list of projects maintained by
the office of financial management.

(2)
The department, in consultation with the legislative building tenants, shall
undertake a full analysis of long-term building preservation and improvement
alternatives. This analysis shall separately identify the cost and schedule
for exterior stone cleaning and repair, structural repairs, utility and
infrastructure upgrades, and remodeling and renovation of interior spaces. The
study shall identify alternative approaches and schedules to accomplish this
work, and define various methods of financing the improvements. The plan shall
also describe a decision making process that includes all tenants of the
building to be used in determining the use of space, the scope of work, and
timelines of any work to be performed.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 179,454

Thurston
County Capital Facilities Account‑-

State.................................... $ 414,110

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 593,564

Appropriation:

Capitol
Building Construction Account‑-State.... $ 6,250,000

Thurston
County Capital Facilities Account‑-

State.................................... $ 585,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 6,835,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,476,436

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,905,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 156. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

OB-2
Building: Preservation (98-1-007)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Capitol
Building Construction Account‑-State.... $ 150,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,100,000

Thurston
County Capital Facilities Account‑-

State.................................... $ 3,900,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 7,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 4,300,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 40,200,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 51,650,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 157. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Transportation
Building: Preservation (98-1-008)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures
under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Appropriation:

Thurston
County Capital Facilities Account‑-

State.................................... $ 1,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 734,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 6,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,234,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 158. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Heritage
Park: Development (98-2-003)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures
under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Appropriation:

Capitol
Building Construction Account‑-State.... $ 2,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 10,379,774

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 8,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 20,379,774

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 159. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Washington
State Training and Conference Center: Dorm (98-2-004)

Reappropriation:

Public
Safety Reimbursable Bond Account‑-State... $ 300,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,300,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,600,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 160. FOR
THE MILITARY
DEPARTMENT

Centralia
- Readiness Center: Preservation (00-1-030)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 700,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 700,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 161. FOR
THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Energy
Management Systems (00-4-001)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 278,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 908,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,186,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 162. FOR
THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Infrastructure
Project: Savings (00-4-002)

Projects
that are completed in accordance with section 911 of this act that have been
reviewed by the office of financial management may have their remaining funds
transferred to this project for the following purposes: (1) Road repair; (2)
roof repair; (3) electrical system repair; (4) steam and utility distribution
system repair; (5) plumbing system repair; (6) heating, ventilating, and air
conditioning repairs; (7) emergency repairs due to natural disasters or
accidents; and, (8) critical year 2000 embedded chip modifications.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 163. FOR
THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Camp
Murray - Military Support Civilian Activities Center (00-5-002)

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 365,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 385,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 750,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 750,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 164. FOR
THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Camp
Murray Infrastructure: Preservation (96-1-006)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 450,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 2,300,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,750,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 165. FOR
THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor
Works: Federal construction projects (98-1-001)

The
appropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 5,078,400

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,274,100

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 6,352,500

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 43,821,100

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 50,173,600

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 166. FOR
THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT

Minor
Works: Preservation (98-1-002)

The
appropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 5,700,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,800,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 167. FOR
THE STATE
CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER

Seattle
- Convention Center Museum of History and Industry: Expansion (00-2-001)

Appropriation:

State
Convention & Trade Center Account‑-State... $ 5,750,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,750,000

(End of part)

PART
2

HUMAN
SERVICES

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 201. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Rainier
School - Laundry: Equipment (00-1-001)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 450,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 1,250,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,700,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 202. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Lakeland
Village: Cottage renovation (00-1-002)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 450,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 1,250,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,700,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 203. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Maple
Lane School - Multi-Services Building: Renovation (00-1-003)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures
under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 700,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 5,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,700,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 204. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Division
of Land and Buildings: Project management (00-1-005)

Appropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 2,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 8,500,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 205. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Emergency
and Small Repairs (00-1-006)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 750,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 3,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,750,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 206. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Mission
Creek Youth Camp - Main Building: Renovation phase II (00-1-010)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 300,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,300,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 207. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Child
Study & Treatment Center: Cottage modifications (00-1-015)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,200,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 1,200,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,400,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 208. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor
Works: Preservation (00-1-018)

The
appropriations in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 4,000,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,000,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 8,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 32,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 40,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 209. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Echo
Glen - Cottage Renovation (00-1-041)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures
under section 912 of this act.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 75,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 11,100,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,175,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 210. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Infrastructure
Project: Savings (00-1-053)

Projects
that are completed in accordance with section 911 of this act that have been
reviewed by the office of financial management may have their remaining funds
transferred to this project for the following purposes: (1) Road repair; (2)
roof repair; (3) electrical system repair; (4) steam and utility distribution
system repair; (5) plumbing system repair; (6) heating, ventilating, and air
conditioning repairs; (7) emergency repairs due to natural disasters or
accidents; and, (8) critical year 2000 embedded chip modifications.

Appropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 1

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 2

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 211. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern
State Hospital: Campus renovation phase V (00-2-002)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures
under section 913 of this act.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,300,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 15,200,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 16,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 212. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor
Works: Program (00-2-019)

The
appropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 4,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 213. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Maple
Lane School: Wastewater treatment plant (94-1-201)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,380,448

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 892,052

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,272,500

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 214. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Naselle
Youth Camp: Water system improvements (94-1-202)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 118,456

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,047,239

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,165,695

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 215. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western
State Hospital: Ward renovation phase 6 (94-1-316)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 798,546

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 5,370,677

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,169,223

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 216. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Asbestos
Abatement (96-1-002)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 59,659

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,766,340

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,825,999

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 217. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Americans
With Disabilities Act Improvements (96-1-003)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 61,899

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 415,953

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 477,852

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 218. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor
Works: Preservation (96-1-004)

The
reappropriations shall support the detailed list of projects maintained by the
office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 4,483,362

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,556,626

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 8,039,988

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 10,074,048

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 18,114,036

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 219. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Chlorofluorocarbon
Abatement (96-1-008)

Reappropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 76,756

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 173,245

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 250,001

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 220. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor
Works Projects: Mental health (96-1-030)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 137,688

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 3,661,704

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,799,392

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 221. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor
Works Projects: Division of developmental disabilities (96-1-040)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects maintained
by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 111,621

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 959,725

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,071,346

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 222. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Underground
Storage Tanks Removal and Replacement (96-1-060)

Reappropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 59,078

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 80,648

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 139,726

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 640,065

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 779,791

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 223. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Maintenance
Management and Planning (96-1-150)

Reappropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 109,381

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 150,971

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 260,352

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 49,029

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 309,381

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 224. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Medical
Lake Wastewater Treatment Facility (96-1-301)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,436,972

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 7,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,077,472

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,014,444

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 225. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western
State Hospital: Replace boiler 1 (96-1-322)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 252,350

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,187,651

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,440,001

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 226. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Crisis
Residential Centers (96-1-900)

The
reappropriation in this section is provided to the department of social and
health services for grants to provide secure crisis residential centers
consistent with the plan developed pursuant to the omnibus 1995-97 operating
budget.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,800,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 200,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 227. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Echo
Glen: New beds and infrastructure (96-2-229)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,188,952

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,972,817

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,161,769

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 228. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Green
Hill School Redevelopment: 416 bed institution (96-2-230)

The
reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The reappropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

(2)
The general fund‑-federal reappropriation shall be transferred to the
department of social and health services as a subaward of the violent offender
incarceration and truth-in-sentencing grant awarded to the department of
corrections.

Reappropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 3,466,558

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 15,000,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 18,466,558

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 27,665,873

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 46,132,431

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 229. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Maple
Lane School: Renovation and infrastructure improvements (96-2-231)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,009,989

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 3,845,512

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,855,501

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 230. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Mission
Creek Preservation Projects (96-2-233)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 120,253

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,069,824

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,190,077

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 231. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor
Works: State-owned Juvenile Rehabilitation Administration group homes
(96-2-235)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 10,967

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 333,433

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 344,400

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 232. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Underground
Storage Tank Pool (98-1-001)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 41,669

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 88,331

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 130,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 233. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Asbestos
and Demolition Pool (98-1-002)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 445,565

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 54,435

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 234. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western
State Hospital: South hall HVAC retrofit (98-1-041)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 794,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 206,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 235. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Renovate
Main Building: Mission Creek (98-1-166)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,993,158

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 506,842

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 236. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Emergency
Projects (98-1-428)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 202,814

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 47,186

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 250,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 237. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Americans
with Disabilities Act (98-1-993)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 70,500

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 68,600

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 139,100

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 238. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern
State Hospital: Legal offender unit (98-2-002)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 13,752,896

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 4,943,104

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 18,696,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 239. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western
State Hospital: Legal offender unit (98-2-052)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,170,666

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 46,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,194,675

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 10,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 60,365,341

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 240. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Naselle
Youth Camp: Academic school and support space (98-2-154)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 713,303

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 824,205

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,537,508

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 241. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Echo
Glen: Vocational program addition (98-2-211)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 25,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 350,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 75,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 3,725,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,175,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 242. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Maple
Lane School: 124 bed housing replacement/support services (98-2-216)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 6,733,260

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,599,380

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,332,640

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 243. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Northern
State Hospital: Safe passage program space (98-2-395)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 252,721

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 76,779

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 329,500

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 244. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Minor
Works: Program (98-2-409)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 336,754

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 506,381

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 843,135

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 245. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF HEALTH

Waste
Water Treatment System: Upgrade (00-1-008)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 208,802

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 208,802

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 246. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Referendum
38: Water bonds (86-2-099)

Reappropriation:

State
and Local Improvements Revolving Account

(Water
Supply Facilities)‑-State......... $ 500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 199,483

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 699,483

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 247. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Public
Health Laboratory: Repairs and improvements (96-1-001)

Reappropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 145,401

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,286,875

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 1,432,276

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 857,274

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 276,632

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 2,233,800

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,799,982

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 248. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Emergency
Power System (96-1-009)

Reappropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 515,423

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 12,598

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL....................... ............ $ 528,021

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 249. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Public
Health Laboratory: Consolidation of facilities (96-2-001)

The
appropriations in this section shall not be expended until the documents
described in the capital project review requirements process and procedures
prescribed by the office of financial management have been complied with under
sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 516,400

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,128,150

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 143,900

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,788,450

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 250. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking
Water Assistance Program (97-2-001)

The
reappropriation in this section is provided solely for an interagency agreement
with the department of community, trade, and economic development to make, in
cooperation with the public works board, loans to local governments and public
water systems for projects and activities to protect and improve the state's
drinking water facilities and resources.

Reappropriation:

Drinking
Water Assistance Account‑-Federal...... $ 16,133,576

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 17,739,874

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 34,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 67,873,450

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 251. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Public
Health Laboratory: Building 5 system upgrade (98-1-002)

Reappropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 297,040

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 14,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 311,040

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 252. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Orting
- Washington Soldiers' Home, Fire Alarm System: Upgrade (00-1-009)

Appropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 450,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)... ............ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 450,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 253. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

State-wide
- Emergency Fund (00-1-012)

Appropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 3,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 254. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Orting
- Grounds Projects: Preservation (00-1-013)

Appropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 700,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)..................... $ 575,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,275,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 255. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

State-wide
- Master Plan (00-2-015)

Appropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 150,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 600,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 750,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 256. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

State-wide
- Program for Restructuring and Infrastructure Upgrade (00-2-016)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Funds from the state building construction account shall be expended only after
July 1, 2000 and are contingent upon the receipt of matching federal funds at
the rate of sixty-five percent of the total capital project cost.

(2)
Should the application for federal funding not be approved, up to $500,000 of
state building construction account funding shall be expended on emergency
maintenance and upgrade projects at both Orting and Retsil according to the
list maintained by the office of financial management.

(3)
The appropriations in this section shall not be expended until the documents
described in the capital project review requirements process and procedures
prescribed by the office of financial management have been complied with under
sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 16,000,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 8,000,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 24,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 34,500,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 58,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 257. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Retsil
- Washington Veterans' Home, Building Exteriors: Preservation (99-1-001)

Reappropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 50,000

Appropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 400,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 540,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 990,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 258. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

Orting
- Washington Soldiers' Home, Mechanical/Electrical/HVAC: Preservation
(99-1-002)

Reappropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 350,000

Appropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 650,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 1,275,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,275,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 259. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF CORRECTIONS

Minor
Works: Preservation (00-1-020)

The
appropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 21,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 100,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 121,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 260. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Emergency
and Small Repairs (00-1-021)

Appropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 1,600,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 1,600,001

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 7,400,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,000,001

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 261. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Infrastructure
Project: Savings (00-1-024)

Projects
that are completed in accordance with section 911 of this act that have been
reviewed by the office of financial management may have their remaining funds
transferred to this project for the following purposes: (1) Road repair; (2)
roof repair; (3) electrical system repair; (4) steam and utility distribution
system repair; (5) plumbing system repair; (6) heating, ventilating, and air
conditioning repairs; (7) emergency repairs due to natural disasters or
accidents; and, (8) critical year 2000 embedded chip modifications.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 262. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington
State Penitentiary - Intensive Management Unit: Improvements (00-1-025)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 263. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

State-wide
Reception Centers: Master plan (00-2-003)

To
conduct a master plan and predesign of the project described in this section in
accordance with the predesign manual published by the office of financial
management. Future appropriations for this project are subject to the
submittal of completed predesign requirements on or before July 1, 2000.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 600,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 600,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 264. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Monroe
Correctional Complex - Twin Rivers: 512-bed expansion (00-2-004)

The
appropriation is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
912 and 913 of this act.

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 5,104,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 590,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 5,694,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)........... ........ $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 63,070,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 68,764,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 265. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

McNeil
Island Corrections Center - 200-bed department of social and health
services-Special Commitment Center (00-2-005)

The
appropriation is subject to the review and allotment procedures under sections
912 and 913 of this act.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,700,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 39,400,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 42,100,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 266. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Monroe
Correctional Complex - Reformatory: 100-bed Intensive Management Unit
(00-2-008)

To
conduct a predesign of the project described in this section in accordance with
the predesign manual published by the office of financial management. Future
appropriations for this project are subject to the submittal of completed
predesign requirements on or before July 1, 2000.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 190,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 21,500,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 21,690,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 267. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Minor
Works: Program (00-2-010)

The
appropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 6,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 32,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 38,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 268. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Monroe
Correctional Complex: Kitchen consolidation/modifications (00-2-011)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures
under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 8,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,100,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 269. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington
State Penitentiary Steam System (96-1-016)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 325,443

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,550,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,875,443

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 270. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington
State Corrections Center for Women (96-2-001)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 823,272

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,250,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,073,272

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 271. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Monroe
Correctional Complex - Reformatory: 400-bed facility (96-2-002)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 337,969

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,147,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,484,969

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 272. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Airway
Heights Expansion (96-2-003)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,644,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 17,396,752

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 19,040,752

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 273. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington
Corrections Center for Women Mental Health, Special Needs, and Reception Unit
(96-2-006)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,333,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 24,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 167,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 25,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 274. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Larch
and Cedar Creek Expansions (96-2-010)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,443,958

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 19,556,042

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 22,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 275. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Clallam
Bay Corrections Center - Juvenile Justice Program: Improvements (97-2-005)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,074,296

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 425,704

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 276. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

State-wide
Preservation Projects (98-1-001)

The
reappropriations in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 3,200,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 11,602,853

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 14,802,853

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 30,468,683

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 45,271,536

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 277. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Underground
Storage Tank and Above Ground Storage Tank Program (98-1-002)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,122,947

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 847,353

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,970,300

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 278. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

State-wide
Asbestos Removal (98-1-003)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 800,817

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 254,251

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.... ................................ $ 1,055,068

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 279. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

State-wide
Americans with Disabilities Act Compliance Projects (98-1-004)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 108,090

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 63,060

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 171,150

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 280. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Emergency
Funds (98-1-005)

Reappropriation:

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 217,746

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 300,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 517,746

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 3,839,433

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,357,179

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 281. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Stafford
Creek Corrections Center (98-2-001)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,400,000

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 5,435,107

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 17,030,309

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 22,465,416

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 31,357,986

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 154,223,402

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 282. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington
State Reformatory: Convert medium to close custody (98-2-002)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 975,588

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 3,500,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,475,588

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 283. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Tacoma:
Design 400-bed prerelease facility (98-2-003)

The
reappropriation is subject to the review and allotment procedures under
sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,129,047

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 496,653

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,625,700

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 284. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

State-wide:
Correctional industries expansion (98-2-005)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,976,103

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 323,897

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 16,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 19,300,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 285. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Expand
Special Offenders Center to 400 Beds (98-2-010)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,507,879

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 39,800,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,327,400

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 43,635,279

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 286. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

New
1,936-Bed Multicustody Facility: Predesign and site selection (98-2-011)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,110,688

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 137,765

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 242,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 243,248,453

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 287. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

State-wide
Programmatic Projects (98-2-013)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,612,342

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 14,938,059

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 19,550,401

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 288. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington
Corrections Center: Replace razor ribbon (99-1-001)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 975,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 225,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,200,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 289. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

McNeil
Island Corrections Center: Still harbor dock (99-2-001)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,200,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,700,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 290. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Washington
State Reformatory Farm: Dairy animal waste lagoon improvement (99-2-002)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 642,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 600,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,242,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 291. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Local
Government Criminal Justice Facilities (99-2-003)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriations in this section are provided solely for the purpose of
construction, developing, expanding, modifying, or improving local jails and
other correctional facilities in accordance with the violent offender
incarceration and truth-in-sentencing grant requirements.

(2)
The department of corrections, in consultation with the Washington association
of sheriffs and police chiefs, shall develop criteria for allocating moneys
appropriated in this section to local governments.

Reappropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 639,196

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 1,960,565

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,599,761

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 292. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Grant
Administration and Minor Improvements (99-2-004)

The
appropriations in this section are provided solely for cost associated with
administration of the violent offender incarceration and truth-in-sentencing
grant program to local governments and other agencies receiving a subaward from
the grant and minor improvements for correctional facilities.

Reappropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 155,550

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 392,113

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State.............. $ 60,851

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 452,964

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 608,514

(End of part)

PART
3

NATURAL
RESOURCES

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 301. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF ECOLOGY

Spokane
- Eastern Regional Offices: Preservation (00-1-004)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 600,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 8,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 570,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,178,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 302. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water
For People, Farms, and Fish (00-2-001)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The state building construction account appropriation is provided for the
purchase of water rights under the trust water rights program under chapter
90.42 RCW, for the purpose of improving stream and river flows in fish critical
basins. This appropriation shall only be used to acquire water rights in
basins with current or proposed listings of salmon or steelhead under the
Federal Endangered Species Act and where low flows have been identified as a
limiting factor for salmon recovery. Priority for funding such purchases and
leases shall take into consideration the following:

(a)
Proposals providing the greatest benefit for restoring and protecting fish;

(b)
Proposals providing benefits in addition to protecting fish critical streams
and rivers;

(c)
Proposals that include funds from other sources;

(d)
Proposals showing a broad level of support among interested parties;

(e)
Proposals requiring the lowest administrative costs to implement; and

(f)
Proposals requiring the lowest overall cost within the context of the local
marketplace.

On
or before September 3, 2000, the department shall report to the governor and
appropriate legislative committees on the progress in implementing the program
and any recommendations for improvement.

(2)
The salmon recovery account appropriation is provided for grants for clean
water projects in basins with current or proposed listings of salmon or
steelhead under the Federal Endangered Species Act and where low flows have
been identified as a limiting factor for salmon recovery. These funds shall be
used exclusively for projects for communities with populations less than
50,000.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 10,000,000

Salmon
Recovery Account‑-State.................. $ 4,500,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 14,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 40,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 54,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 303. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Small
Communities Initiative (00-2-002)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$500,000 of this appropriation is provided for grants to counties in north
Puget Sound to participate in a study of potential oil spill risk reduction
strategies, or to relocate or purchase oil spill response equipment. If county
governments do not apply for these funds before July 1, 2000, then these funds
shall be disbursed as a part of the small communities initiative in subsection
(2) of this section.

(2)
$5,500,000 of this appropriation is provided for grants to address
environmental issues in rural cities and towns, and rural unincorporated areas
of counties. Applicants should demonstrate economic hardship that has reduced
access to existing toxics cleanup programs because of an inability to raise
necessary matching funds. Projects to be funded may include, but are not
limited to:

(a)
Remedial action on agricultural lands being converted to environmental uses;

(b)
Wellhead protection;

(c)
Septage handling;

(d)
Solid or hazardous waste cleanup;

(e)
Irrigation techniques that improve water quality; and

(f)
Cleaning brownfields for redevelopment.

The
department shall report to the governor and the legislature no later than
September 3, 2000, on the effectiveness of this program.

Appropriation:

Local
Toxics Control Account‑-State............. $ 6,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 304. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Drought
Preparedness Program (00-2-003)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is provided for grants and loans for
agricultural water supply conservation projects in basins with current or
proposed listings of salmon or steelhead under the Federal Endangered Species
Act and where low flows have been identified as a limiting factor for salmon
recovery.

(2)
The expenditure of these funds is dependent upon the passage of Z-..../99
(omnibus water resources).

Appropriation:

State
Drought Preparedness‑-State............... $ 6,800,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,800,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 305. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Referendum
26 Waste Disposal Facilities (74-2-004)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriations in this section are provided solely for projects under
contracts on or before June 30, 1999. Reappropriated funds not associated with
contracted projects shall lapse on June 30, 1999.

(2)
The office of financial management may grant waivers from this lapse
requirement for specific projects upon findings of exceptional circumstances
after notification of the chairs of the house of representatives capital budget
committee and senate ways and means committee.

(3)
The department shall submit a report to the office of financial management and
the house of representatives capital budget committee and senate ways and means
committee by December 1, 1999, listing all projects funded from this section.

Reappropriation:

State
and Local Improvements Revolving Account

(Waste
Facilities)‑-State................ $ 2,204,376

Appropriation:

State
and Local Improvements Revolving Account

(Waste
Facilities)‑-State................ $ 1,310,467

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 4,186,488

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,701,331

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 306. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Referendum
38 Water Supply Facilities (74-2-006)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for projects under
contracts on or before June 30, 1999. Reappropriated funds not associated with
contracted projects shall lapse on June 30, 1999.

(2)
The office of financial management may grant waivers from this lapse
requirement for specific projects upon findings of exceptional circumstances
after notification of the chairs of the house of representatives capital budget
committee and senate ways and means committee.

(3)
The department shall submit a report to the office of financial management and
the house of representatives capital budget committee and senate ways and means
committee by December 1, 1999, listing all projects funded from this section.

Reappropriation:

State
and Local Improvements Revolving Account

(Water
Supply Facilities)‑-State......... $ 6,004,436

Appropriation:

State
and Local Improvements Revolving Account

(Water
Supply Facilities)‑-State......... $ 10,900,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 4,320,950

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 13,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 34,225,386

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 307. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

State
Emergency Water Projects Revolving Account (76-2-003)

Reappropriation:

State
Emergency Water Projects Revolving Account‑-

State.................................... $ 577,833

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)....... ............ $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 577,833

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 308. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Referendum
39 Waste Disposal Facilities (82-2-005)

The
reappropriation in this section is provided solely for projects under contracts
on or before June 30, 1999. Reappropriated funds not associated with
contracted projects shall lapse on June 30, 1999. The office of financial
management may grant waivers from this lapse requirement for specific projects
upon findings of exceptional circumstances after notification of the chairs of
the house of representatives capital budget committee and senate ways and means
committee. The department shall submit a report to the office of financial
management and the house of representatives capital budget committee and senate
ways and means committee by December 1, 1999, listing all projects funded from
this section.

Reappropriation:

State
and Local Improvements Revolving Account

(Waste
Facilities 1980)‑-State........... $ 6,113,126

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 12,293,785

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 18,406,911

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 309. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial
Clean Water Fund (86-2-007)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Up to $25,000,000 of the appropriation is provided for the extended grant
payment to Metro/King county.

(2)
Up to $10,000,000 of the appropriation is provided for the extended grant
payment to Spokane for the Spokane-Rathdrum Prairie aquifer.

(3)
In awarding state-wide water quality implementation and planning grants and
loans, the department shall give priority consideration to:

(a)
Proposals submitted by communities with populations less than 2,500 and that
have demonstrated an economic hardship that will prevent the completion or
implementation of water quality projects;

(b)
Projects located in basins with critical or depressed salmonid stocks; and

(c)
The completion of projects for which design work has been completed.

(4)
The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for projects under contract
on or before June 30, 1999. Reappropriated funds not associated with contracts
projects lapse on June 30, 1999. The office of financial management may grant
waivers from this subsection for specific projects upon findings of exceptional
circumstances after notification of the chairs of the house of representatives
capital budget committee and the senate ways and means committee. The
department shall submit a report to the office of financial management and the
house of representatives capital budget committee and the senate ways and means
committee by December 1, 1999, listing all projects funded from the
reappropriation in this section.

Reappropriation:

Water
Quality Account‑-State.................... $ 32,336,890

Appropriation:

Water
Quality Account‑-State................ ... $ 48,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 158,376,857

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 140,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 378,713,747

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 310. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Local
Toxics Control Account (88-2-008)

The
reappropriation in this section is provided solely for projects under contract
on or before June 30, 1999. Reappropriated funds not associated with
contracted projects shall lapse on June 30, 1999. The office of financial
management may grant waivers from this lapse requirement for specific projects
upon findings of exceptional circumstances after notification of the chairs of
the house of representatives capital budget committee and senate ways and means
committee. The department shall submit a report to the office of financial
management and the house of representatives capital budget committee and senate
ways and means committee by December 1, 1999, listing all projects funded from
this section.

Reappropriation:

Local
Toxics Control Account‑-State............. $ 25,833,809

Appropriation:

Local
Toxics Control Account‑-State............. $ 42,479,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 65,202,174

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 180,000,000

-------------

TOTAL................................ ... $ 313,514,983

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 311. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water
Pollution Control Revolving Fund (90-2-002)

Reappropriation:

Water
Pollution Control Revolving Account‑-

State.................................... $ 55,640,931

Water
Pollution Control Revolving Account‑-

Federal.................................. $ 34,914,688

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 90,555,619

Appropriation:

Water
Pollution Control Revolving Account‑-

State.................................... $ 32,375,833

Water
Pollution Control Revolving Account‑-

Federal.................................. $ 46,830,366

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 79,206,199

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 120,971,790

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 320,207,299

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 610,940,907

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 312. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Methow
Basin Water Conservation (92-2-009)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 87,689

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 312,311

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 400,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 313. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Low-Level
Nuclear Waste Disposal Trench Closure (97-2-012)

Reappropriation:

Site
Closure Account‑-State..................... $ 5,443,978

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 989,386

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,433,364

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 314. FOR
THE STATE
PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Coastal
Facility Relocation (00-1-005)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 2,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 315. FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Historic
Structure and Land Use Stewardship Program (00-1-007)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 6,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 35,500,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 42,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 316. FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Lewis
and Clark Trail Bicentennial: Preservation (00-1-010)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 317. FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Park
Housing (00-1-014)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 2,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 318. FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Pacific
County: Seashore conservation (00-1-015)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 50,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 50,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 319. FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Spokane
Centennial Trail (89-5-112)

Reappropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 200,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 200,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 320. FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide
- Boat Pumpouts: Federal Clean Vessel Act (96-2-008)

Reappropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 300,000

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 900,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 211,246

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,411,246

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 321. FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Americans
with Disabilities Act Improvements (96-5-003)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 200,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 153,855

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)....... ........ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 353,855

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 322. FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Statewide
- Emergency Projects (98-1-001)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 50,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 198,618

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 2,650,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,398,618

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 323. FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Underground
Storage Tank Replacement (98-1-002)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 493,367

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 345,922

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 939,289

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 324. FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Facilities
Preservation: State-wide (98-1-003)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation shall support the detailed list of projects maintained by the
office of financial management.

(2)
$1,000,000 of the state building construction account appropriation and
$1,000,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account appropriation in this
section are provided on the condition the parks renewal and stewardship account
receives in excess of $26,000,000 in biennial revenue. These amounts must be
expended on a dollar-for- dollar matching basis.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,000,000

Parks
Renewal and Stewardship Account‑-State.... $ 1,000,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 6,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 643,234

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 31,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 39,643,234

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 325. FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Historic
Facilities Renovation (98-1-004)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The reappropriation shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 370,628

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,370,628

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 326. FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Park
Roadways: Preservation (98-1-006)

Reappropriation:

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 1,739,000

Appropriation:

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State.................... $ 4,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 3,151,114

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 19,500,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 28,390,114

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 327. FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Natural
and Historic Stewardship: State-wide (98-1-007)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list resulting from
the 1996 historic structures condition assessment study which is maintained by
the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 37,394

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 537,394

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 328. FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

State-wide
- Recreation Development Program (98-2-008)

Reappropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 920,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 1,920,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 369,953

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 15,500,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 21,289,953

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 329. FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Storm
Disaster Recovery (99-1-001)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 526,647

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 3,353

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 530,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 330. FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Cama
Beach Donation (99-2-001)

Reappropriation:

Parks
Renewal and Stewardship Account‑-State.... $ 1,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 331. FOR
THE INTERAGENCY
COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Boating
Facilities (98-2-001)

Reappropriation:

Outdoor
Recreation Account‑-State............... $ 1,906,547

Recreation
Resources Account‑-State............. $ 12,098,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 14,004,547

Appropriation:

Recreation
Resources Account‑-State............. $ 8,433,414

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 7,054,913

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 38,855,506

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 68,348,380

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 332. FOR
THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Nonhighway
and Off-Road Vehicle Activities Program (98-2-002)

Reappropriation:

Outdoor
Recreation Account‑-State............... $ 696,758

NOVA
Program Account‑-State..................... $ 7,801,779

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 8,498,537

Appropriation:

NOVA
Program Account‑-State..................... $ 5,434,090

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 6,927,217

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 23,141,446

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 44,001,290

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 333. FOR
THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Washington
Wildlife and Recreation Program (98-2-003)

The
appropriations in this section for the wildlife and recreation program under
chapter 43.98A RCW and RCW 43.98A.040 are subject to the following condition
and limitation: The new appropriations in this section are provided for the
approved list of projects included in LEAP capital document No.
. . ., as developed on . . ., 1999.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 6,673,858

Outdoor
Recreation Account‑-State............... $ 23,733,311

Habitat
Conservation Account‑-State............. $ 26,620,337

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 57,027,506

Appropriation:

Outdoor
Recreation Account‑-State............... $ 25,000,000

Habitat
Conservation Account‑-State............. $ 25,000,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 50,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 57,420,756

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 200,000,000

-------------

TOTAL........ ........................... $ 364,448,262

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 334. FOR
THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Firearms
Range Program (98-2-004)

Reappropriation:

Firearms
Range Account‑-State................... $ 828,986

Appropriation:

Firearms
Range Account‑-State................... $ 354,400

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 598,075

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 800,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,581,461

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 335. FOR
THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Land
and Water Conservation Fund (98-2-005)

Reappropriation:

Outdoor
Recreation Account‑-Federal............. $ 384,044

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,446,635

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,830,679

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 336. FOR
THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

National
Recreation Trails Act (98-2-006)

Reappropriation:

Outdoor
Recreation Account‑-Federal............. $ 47,879

Recreation
Resources Account‑-Federal........... $ 965,669

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 1,013,548

Appropriation:

Recreation
Resources Account‑-Federal........... $ 1,478,350

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 280,835

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 2,797,251

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,569,984

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 337. FOR
THE STATE
CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Conservation
Reserve Enhancement Program (00-2-004)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,000,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 10,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 5,000,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 5,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 24,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 338. FOR
THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Water
Quality Grants Program (98-2-001)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Appropriations equal to $3,840,000 are provided solely for grants to qualifying
conservation districts for nonpoint water quality projects and programs.

(2)
Appropriations equal to $80,000 are provided for audits of districts receiving
grants conducted by the office of the state auditor.

(3)
Remaining funds are to be distributed by a competitive process that uses state
priorities to rank proposals from districts.

Reappropriation:

Water
Quality Account‑-State.................... $ 1,732,102

Appropriation:

Water
Quality Account‑-State.................... $ 5,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 10,500,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 20,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 37,232,102

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 339. FOR
THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Dairy
Waste Management Grants Program (98-2-002)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$1,500,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for a state-wide grant
program to assist dairy operators in implementing dairy waste management
systems; and

(2)
$1,500,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for a state-wide grant
program to provide technical assistance to dairy operators for development and
implementation of dairy waste management plans.

Reappropriation:

Water
Quality Account‑-State.................... $ 529,132

Appropriation:

Water
Quality Account‑-State.................... $ 3,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 3,000,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 12,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 18,529,132

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 340. FOR
THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Puget
Sound Action Plan (98-2-003)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriations shall be used solely for grants to conservation districts in
the Puget Sound area for water quality projects and programs contained in the Puget
Sound work plan.

(2)
The grants to the Puget Sound area conservation districts shall be in addition
to other grant dollars that may be available from the water quality account and
the basic funding grant programs administered by the commission.

Reappropriation:

Water
Quality Account‑-State.................... $ 137,071

Appropriation:

Water
Quality Account‑-State.................... $ 830,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 830,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 3,320,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,117,071

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 341. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Upland
Wildlife Habitat: Replacement (00-2-005)

Appropriation:

Wildlife
Account‑-State......................... $ 600,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 600,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,200,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 342. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Watchable
Wildlife Program (00-2-007)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 800,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 900,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 343. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Grandy
Creek Hatchery (92-5-024)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,607,100

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 712,080

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,319,180

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 344. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Tideland
Acquisition (94-2-003)

Reappropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 1,244,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 3,756,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 345. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Nemah
Hatchery Building and Incubation System Replacement (96-1-006)

Reappropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 250,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,450,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,700,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 346. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Shellfish
Laboratory and Hatchery Upgrades (96-1-009)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 85,000

Appropriation:

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account‑-State........ $ 190,400

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 115,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 305,400

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 769,578

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 1,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,159,978

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 347. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minter
Creek Hatchery Renovation (96-2-019)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 400,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 5,100,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 348. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Minor
Works: Preservation (98-1-001)

The
appropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 330,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,300,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 6,705,303

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 9,600,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 18,935,303

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 349. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Underground
Storage Tank Removal and Replacement (98-1-002)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 45,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 65,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,552,900

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,662,900

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 350. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Emergency
Repairs (98-1-003)

The
appropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 35,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 900,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,710,923

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 2,300,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,945,923

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 351. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Dam
Inspection and Repair (98-1-004)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 50,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 1,700,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,850,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 352. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Facilities
Renovation (98-1-005)

The
appropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 340,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,200,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 4,834,258

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 6,400,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,774,258

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 353. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Hatchery
Renovations (98-1-006)

The
appropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 250,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 16,598,022

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 18,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 38,848,022

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 354. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Recreational
Access Redevelopment (98-1-007)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 60,000

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 550,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State.. ... $ 400,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 950,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 4,427,787

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 4,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,437,787

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 355. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Coast
and Puget Sound Wild Salmonid Habitat Restoration (98-1-009)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 514,000

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 200,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local..................... $ 1,000,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,700,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 4,900,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 11,822,386

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 23,200,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 40,436,386

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 356. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Coast
and Puget Sound Wildstock Restoration: Hatcheries (98-1-010)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 350,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,200,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 5,750,626

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 5,500,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,800,626

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 357. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Fish
Protection Facilities (98-1-011)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following condition and
limitation: The salmon recovery account appropriation is provided for a grant
program for the installation and retrofit of irrigation diversion screens in
basins with current or proposed listings of salmon or steelhead under the
Federal Endangered Species Act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 230,000

Appropriation:

Salmon
Recovery Account‑-State.................. $ 1,000,000

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 200,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local..................... $ 300,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,300,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation. ................. $ 2,800,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 3,202,806

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 7,600,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 13,832,806

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 358. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

State-wide
Fencing Renovation and Construction (98-1-012)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 85,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,543,070

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 2,550,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,678,070

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 359. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Wildlife
Area Renovation (98-1-013)

Reappropriation:

Wildlife
Account‑-State......................... $ 85,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 250,000

Wildlife
Account‑-State......................... $ 288,300

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 538,300

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,912,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 2,300,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,835,300

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 360. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Issaquah
Hatchery Improvements (98-1-015)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,000

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑-Private/Local..................... $ 600,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 4,120,955

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,820,955

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 361. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Crop
and Orchard Protection Fencing (98-2-002)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 25,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 300,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 275,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 1,700,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,300,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 362. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Game
Farm Consolidation (98-2-005)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 150,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,024,388

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,174,388

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 363. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Warm
Water Game Fish Access Facilities (98-2-006)

Reappropriation:

Warm
Water Game Fish Account‑-State............. $ 210,000

Appropriation:

Warm
Water Game Fish Account‑-State............. $ 600,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 2,080,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,890,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 364. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Recreational
Fish Enhancement (98-2-007)

Reappropriation:

Recreational
Fisheries Enhancement‑-State........ $ 515,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 285,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 2,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,800,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 365. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Mitigation
Projects and Dedicated Funds (98-2-008)

Reappropriation:

Game
Special Wildlife Account‑-State............. $ 30,000

Game
Special Wildlife Account‑-Private/Local.... $ 1,190,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 1,220,000

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 4,000,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local..................... $ 2,000,000

Game
Special Wildlife Account‑-State............. $ 60,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 6,060,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 28,229,081

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 26,270,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 61,779,081

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 366. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Migratory
Waterfowl Habitat Acquisition and Development (98-2-009)

Reappropriation:

Wildlife
Account‑-State......................... $ 200,000

Appropriation:

Wildlife
Account‑-State......................... $ 750,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,865,044

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 2,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,815,044

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 367. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Columbia
River Wildlife Mitigation (98-2-010)

Reappropriation:

Game
Special Wildlife Account‑-Federal.......... $ 2,000,000

Appropriation:

Game
Special Wildlife Account‑-Federal.......... $ 2,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 4,654,773

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 21,600,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 30,254,773

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 368. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Deep
Water Slough Restoration (98-2-013)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 400,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 14,968

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 600,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,014,968

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 369. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Clam
and Oyster Beach Enhancement (98-2-019)

Reappropriation:

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account‑-State........ $ 110,000

Appropriation:

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account‑-State........ $ 130,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,783,803

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 600,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,623,803

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 370. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Salmon
Restoration (99-2-001)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 750,000

Salmon
Recovery Account‑-State.................. $ 1,000,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 1,750,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,750,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 371. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Agricultural
Asset Preservation and Emergency Repairs (00-1-001)

Appropriation:

Resources
Management Cost Account‑-State........ $ 125,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 100,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 1,080,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,305,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 372. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Repairs,
Maintenance and Tenant Improvements (00-1-002)

Appropriation:

Resources
Management Cost Account‑-State........ $ 677,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 893,900

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 3,065,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,635,900

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 373. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Communication
Site Repair Program (00-1-003)

Appropriation:

Forest
Development Account‑-State............... $ 50,000

Resources
Management Cost Account‑-State........ $ 40,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 90,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 150,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)..................... $ 964,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,204,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 374. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Underground
Storage Tank Removal and Upgrade (00-1-005)

Appropriation:

Forest
Development Account‑-State............... $ 10,800

Resources
Management Cost Account‑-State........ $ 30,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 19,200

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 60,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 193,120

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 61,200

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 314,320

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 375. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

State-wide
Emergency Repairs (00-1-006)

Appropriation:

Forest
Development Account‑-State............... $ 18,000

Resources
Management Cost Account‑-State........ $ 50,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 32,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 98,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 400,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 598,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 376. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Americans
with Disabilities Act Compliance (00-1-009)

Appropriation:

Forest
Development Account‑-State............... $ 18,000

Resources
Management Cost Account‑-State........ $ 50,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 32,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 34,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 272,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 406,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 377. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Hazardous
Material and Waste Removal (00-1-010)

Appropriation:

Forest
Development Account‑-State............... $ 34,000

Resources
Management Cost Account‑-State........ $ 50,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 16,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 160,800

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 336,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 596,800

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 378. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

NAP/NRCA
Management and Emergency Repairs (00-1-011)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 400,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 710,500

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 1,600,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,710,500

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 379. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

NRCA
Management Plan Implementation (00-1-012)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 450,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 400,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 1,800,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,650,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 380. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Emergency
Repairs: Recreation sites (00-1-015)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 150,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 154,200

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 600,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 904,200

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 381. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Recreation
Health and Safety (00-1-016)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 300,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 578,900

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 1,200,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,078,900

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 382. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Americans
with Disabilities Act: Recreation site improvements (00-1-017)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 968,100

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 1,200,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,268,100

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 383. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Administrative
Site Preservation (00-1-018)

Appropriation:

Forest
Development Account‑-State............... $ 203,580

Resources
Management Cost Account‑-State........ $ 565,500

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 361,920

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 1,131,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 938,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 5,118,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,187,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 384. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Trust
Land Transfer (00-2-001)

The
state building construction account appropriation in this section is subject to
the following conditions and limitations:

(1)
The total appropriation is provided to the department solely to transfer from
trust status certain trust lands of state-wide significance deemed appropriate
for state park, fish and wildlife habitat, natural area preserve, natural
resources conservation area, open space, or recreation purposes.

(2)
The new appropriation in this section is provided solely for the approved list
of projects included in the LEAP capital document No. . . . as
developed on . . ., 1999.

(3)
Property transferred under this section shall be appraised and transferred at
fair market value. The value of the timber transferred shall be deposited by
the department in the same manner as timber revenues from other common school
trust lands. No deduction shall be made for the resource management cost
account under RCW 79.64.040. The value of the land transferred shall be
deposited in the school construction revolving account. These funds shall be
expended by the department for the exclusive purpose of acquiring real property
of equal value to be managed as common school trust land.

(4)
All reasonable costs incurred by the department to implement this section,
including all costs of acquiring real property to replace the trust lands
transferred, are authorized to be paid out of this appropriation. Authorized
costs include the actual cost of appraisals, staff time, environmental reviews,
surveys, and other similar costs.

(5)
The department shall attempt to maintain an aggregate ratio of 85:15 timber-to-land
value in these transactions.

(6)
Intergrant exchanges between common school and other trust lands of equal value
may occur if the exchange is in the interest of each trust, as determined by
the board of natural resources.

(7)
Prior to or concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the department,
with full cooperation of the receiving agencies, shall execute and record a
real property instrument that dedicates the transferred properties to the
purposes identified in subsection (1) of this section for a minimum period of
twenty years. The department of natural resources, in consultation with the
receiving state agencies, shall develop policy to address requests to replace
transferred properties subject to the recorded property instrument that are no
longer deemed appropriate for the purposes identified in subsection (1) of this
section.

(8)
The department and receiving agencies shall work in good faith to carry out the
intent of this section. However, the department or receiving agencies may
remove a property from the transfer list in subsection (2) of this section if,
based on new, substantive information, it is determined that transfer of the
property is not in the state-wide interest of either the common school trust or
the receiving agency.

(9)
On June 30, 2001, the state treasurer shall transfer all remaining uncommitted
funds from this appropriation to the common school construction fund and the
appropriation in this section shall be reduced by an equivalent amount.

Appropriation:

Natural
Resources Real Property Replacement‑-

State.................................... $ 6,200,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 62,000,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 68,200,000

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 9,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 25,500,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 220,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 322,700,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 385. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Natural
Resources Real Property Replacement (00-2-002)

Appropriation:

Natural
Resources Real Property Replacement‑-

State.................................... $ 8,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 12,400,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 48,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 68,400,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 386. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Land
Bank (00-2-003)

Appropriation:

Resources
Management Cost Account‑-State........ $ 2,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,800,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 8,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,800,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 387. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Community
and Technical College Trust Land Acquisition (00-2-004)

Appropriation:

Community
and Technical College Forest Reserve

Account‑-State........................... $ 200,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 200,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 388. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Right-of-Way
Acquisition (00-2-005)

Appropriation:

Forest
Development Account‑-State............... $ 387,000

Resources
Management Cost Account‑-State........ $ 650,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 1,037,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,392,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 6,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,429,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 389. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Jobs
for the Environment (00-2-009)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriations shall be used solely for the jobs for the environment
program to achieve the following goals:

(a)
Restore and protect watersheds to benefit anadromous fish stocks, including
critical or depressed stocks as determined by the department of fish and
wildlife and a priority shall be given to stocks currently listed or proposed
for listing under the federal endangered species act;

(b)
Conduct watershed restoration and protection projects primarily on state lands
in coordination with federal, local, tribal, and private sector efforts; and

(c)
Create market wage jobs with benefits in environmental restoration for
displaced workers in rural natural resource impact areas, as defined under RCW
43.31.601(2).

(2)
The appropriations are solely for projects selected by the department of
natural resources, in consultation with an interagency task force consisting of
the department of fish and wildlife, other appropriate state agencies, tribal
governments, local governments, the federal government, labor, and other
interested stakeholders. In recommending projects for funding the task force
shall use the following criteria:

(a)
The extent to which the project, using best available science, addresses
habitat factors limiting fish and wildlife populations;

(b)
The number, duration, and quality of jobs to be created or retained by the
project for displaced workers in natural resource impact areas;

(c)
The extent to which the project will help avoid the listing of threatened or
endangered species or provides for the recovery of species already listed;

(d)
The extent to which the project will augment existing federal, state, tribal or
local watershed planning efforts or completed watershed restoration and
conservation plans;

(e)
The cost effectiveness of the project;

(f)
The availability of matching funds; and

(g)
The demonstrated ability of the project sponsors to administer the project.

(3)
Prior to making final project decisions, the department of natural resources
shall submit its proposed project list by January 1st or July 1st of each year
for review to the interagency review team established in RCW 75.46.080. The
interagency review team shall coordinate these projects with habitat
restoration project lists prepared by lead entities and provide recommendations
for funding to the department.

(4)
Funds expended shall be used for specific projects and not for ongoing
operational costs. Eligible projects include, but are not limited to, closure
or improvement of forest roads, repair of culverts, cleanup of stream beds,
removal of fish barriers, installation of fish screens, fencing of streams, and
construction and planting of fish cover. Funds may also be expended for
planning, design, engineering, and monitoring of eligible projects.

(5)
The department of natural resources and the department of fish and wildlife, in
consultation with the office of financial management and other appropriate
agencies, shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
January 1, 1999, and January 1, 2000, on the results of expenditures from the
appropriations.

(6)
All projects funded under this section shall be consistent with any development
regulations or comprehensive plans adopted under the growth management act for
the project areas. No funds may be expended to acquire land through
condemnation.

Reappropriation:

Water
Quality Account‑-State.................... $ 2,800,000

Appropriation:

Water
Quality Account‑-State.................... $ 6,333,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 9,133,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 25,332,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 43,598,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 390. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Minor
Works: Program (00-2-011)

The
appropriations in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

Forest
Development Account‑-State............... $ 136,600

Resources
Management Cost Account‑-State........ $ 379,500

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 242,900

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 759,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 609,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 5,580,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,948,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 391. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Mineral
Resource Testing (00-2-012)

Appropriation:

Forest
Development Account‑-State............... $ 18,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 28,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 175,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 221,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 392. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Commercial
Development - Local Improvement Districts (00-2-013)

Appropriation:

Resources
Management Cost Account‑-State........ $ 90,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 200,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 451,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 741,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 393. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Grants (00-2-014)

The
appropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects to be
submitted to the office of financial management by September 1, 1999.

The
department shall submit a list of recommended projects to be funded from the
aquatic lands enhancement account in the 2001-03 capital budget. The list
shall result from a competitive grants program developed by the department
based upon, at a minimum: A uniform criteria for the selection of projects and
awarding of grants for up to fifty percent of the total project cost; local
community support for the project; and a state-wide geographic distribution of
projects. The list of projects shall be submitted to the office of financial
management by September 15, 2000.

Reappropriation:

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account‑-State........ $ 2,300,000

Appropriation:

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account‑-State........ $ 5,800,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 9,756,817

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 24,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 41,856,817

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 394. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Aquatic
Special Lands Acquisition (00-2-015)

The
appropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

Resources
Management Cost Account‑-State........ $ 4,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 18,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 22,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 395. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Mobile
Radio System Upgrade (00-2-017)

Appropriation:

Forest
Development Account‑-State............... $ 106,300

Resources
Management Cost Account‑-State........ $ 177,200

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 783,500

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 2,623,500

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,407,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 396. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Compound:
Utilization study (00-2-019)

Appropriation:

Forest
Development Account‑-State............... $ 27,000

Resources
Management Cost Account‑-State........ $ 75,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 48,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 150,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 150,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 397. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Forest
Legacy and Wetlands Conservation Grants (00-2-020)

Reappropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 1,688,000

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 6,340,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,435,320

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,463,320

(End of part)

PART
4

TRANSPORTATION

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 501. FOR
THE WASHINGTON
STATE PATROL

Minor
Works: Preservation (00-1-004)

The
appropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 850,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,870,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 3,675,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,395,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 502. FOR
THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

Fire
Training Academy: Minor works (00-1-005)

The
appropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 110,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 320,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 6,900,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,330,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 503. FOR
THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

Seattle
Crime Laboratory (00-2-008)

The
appropriation in this section shall not be expended until the documents
described in the capital project review requirements process and procedures
prescribed by the office of financial management have been complied with under
sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 10,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 200,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,200,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 504. FOR
THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

Fire
Training Academy: Water systems upgrades (00-2-009)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,845,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 500,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,345,000

(End of part)

PART
5

EDUCATION

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 601. FOR
THE HIGHER
EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD

NSIS
Consortium Development (00-2-001)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 6,180,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,180,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 602. FOR
THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD

Facility
Assessment and Space Utilization: Study (00-2-002)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 200,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 200,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 603. FOR
THE STATE
BOARD OF EDUCATION

Emergency
Funds (00-1-001)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Prior to the distribution of funds from this section, the state board of education
shall develop rules for school district eligibility to receive emergency grants
and requirements for repayment of recovered costs. It is intended that these
funds be provided to school districts only for emergency repairs due to
accidents, natural disasters, fire, floods, vandalism or similar events and
only after all avenues of local funding have been exhausted.

(2)
The board shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature and the
office of financial management the amount and purpose of each grant provided to
school districts.

(3)
Any recoveries by the districts from insurance, litigation, or other sources
for repairs and improvements funded from this appropriation shall be returned
to the state in proportion to the state assistance as a share of total project
cost.

Appropriation:

Common
School Construction Account‑-State........ $ 2,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 10,500,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 604. FOR
THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION

Common
School Construction (00-2-001)

Appropriation:

Common
School Construction Account‑-State........ $ 280,575,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 1,379,582,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,660,157,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 605. FOR
THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION

Common
School Construction: Quality and Value Improvements (00-2-002)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
From the appropriation in section 603 of this act and $200,000 from the
appropriation in this section, the state board of education shall fund one
hundred percent of the cost for a required standard value engineering study on
all projects exceeding 50,000 gross square feet in size. The funding standards
for these studies shall be calculated based on the September 1996 value
engineering and constructability review study conducted by the office of
financial management and the superintendent of public instruction. Upon
completion an electronic copy, in an acceptable format, of each value
engineering study shall be transmitted to the department of general administration
for sharing with other school districts and agencies. On an annual basis, the
board shall report to the legislative fiscal committees and the office of
financial management the results of these studies including but not limited to
the amounts of each study and the accepted savings achieved due to the studies.

(2)
From $1,200,000 of the appropriation in this section, the state board shall
match fifty percent of the cost for a constructability review of all projects
exceeding 50,000 gross square feet in size. The funding standards for these
reviews and the required scope of work for the review process shall be
developed by the superintendent of public instruction and approved by the state
board of education and the office of financial management prior to distribution
of funds.

(3)
From $1,200,000 of the appropriation in this section, the state board shall
match fifty percent of the cost for the building commissioning process of all
projects exceeding 50,000 gross square feet in size. The funding standards for
commissioning along with the required scope of work, shall be developed by the
superintendent of public instruction and approved by the state board of
education and the office of financial management prior to the distribution of
funds.

(4)
From $1,000,000 of the appropriation in this section, the state board shall
match fifty percent of the cost for construction management services on a
voluntary basis on projects exceeding $10 million in size. The total cost for
this service shall be based on the architect and engineering basic services
percentage for state projects less three percent. In order to receive funding,
the construction manager must be selected during the design phase and shall be
an independent firm or contractor independent from the school district, the
architect/engineer, and the contractor.

(5)
$200,000 from this appropriation is provided to fund two FTEs in the office of
state fire marshal to exclusively review K-12 construction documents for fire
and life safety in accordance with the state building code. It is the intent
of this appropriation to provide these services only to those districts that
are located in counties without qualified review capabilities.

(6)
On an annual basis, the state board shall report to the fiscal committees of
the legislature and the office of financial management with a summary of the
results of the value engineering studies and constructability reviews, and an
evaluation of the use of building commissioning construction management
services and fire marshal reviews.

Appropriation:

Common
School Construction Account‑-State........ $ 3,800,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 19,250,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 23,050,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 606. FOR
THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION

Public
School Building Construction (98-2-001)

The
reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
From the reappropriations in this section the state board shall fund one
hundred percent of the cost for a required standard value engineering study on
all projects exceeding 50,000 gross square feet in size. The funding standards
for these studies shall be calculated based on the September 1996 value
engineering and constructability review study conducted by the office of
financial management and the superintendent of public instruction. On an
annual basis, the board shall report to the legislative fiscal committees and
the office of financial management the results of these studies including but
not limited to the amounts of each study and the expected savings achieved due
to the studies.

(2)
Total cash disbursed from the common school construction fund may not exceed
the available cash balance.

(3)
The reappropriation from the state building construction account shall serve as
full compensation to the common school trust for the transfer of land to the
Washington State University Lind dryland research unit under chapter 35, Laws
of 1997.

(4)
No more than $7,110,000 of the appropriations may be allocated by the state
board to provide up to ninety percent of the total project cost for the
renovation of facilities operating as interdistrict cooperative centers
providing vocational skills programs. The remaining portion of the project
cost shall be a match from local sources. As a condition to receiving an allocation
from this appropriation or any other appropriation for a vocational skills
center provided after calendar year 1996, the recipient facility must maintain
a separate capital account, into which the participating districts make
deposits, to pay for all future minor repair and renovation costs for the
vocational skills center. For the purposes of this section, a future minor
repair and renovation cost is a capital project costing less than forty percent
of the value of the building.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,993,556

Common
School Construction Account‑-State........ $ 112,424,633

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 114,418,189

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 607,956,559

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 722,374,748

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 607. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Program
Management (98-1-001)

Funding
is provided for five full-time equivalent regional coordinators. The
coordinators shall have direct construction or architectural training and
experience and be strategically located across the state. The coordinators
shall assist local school districts with: State board of education rules
relating to school construction and modernization projects, building condition
analysis, development of state studies and surveys, architect/engineer and
construction manager selection, value engineering and constructability reviews
during design, building commissioning, construction administration, maintenance
issues, and data verification to allow equitable administration of the state
board priority system.

Appropriation:

Common
School Construction Account‑-State........ $ 1,619,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 7,644,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,263,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 608. FOR
THE STATE
SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

Irwin
Building, HVAC: Upgrade (00-1-001)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 800,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 300,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,100,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 609. FOR
THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

Old
Main and Alhsten Buildings, HVAC: Upgrade (00-1-002)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,700,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 1,400,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,100,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 610. FOR
THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

Minor
Works: Preservation (00-1-003)

The
appropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 600,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 5,500,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,100,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 611. FOR
THE STATE
SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF

Northrup
Elementary School, HVAC: Upgrade (00-1-002)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 900,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 900,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 612. FOR
THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF

Epperson
Middle School, HVAC: Upgrade (00-1-003)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 900,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 900,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 613. FOR
THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF

Minor
Works: Preservation (00-1-004)

The
appropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 4,850,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,350,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 614. FOR
THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF

Clark
Hall, HVAC: Upgrade (00-1-006)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 1,275,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,775,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 615. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY
OF WASHINGTON

Minor
Works: Various infrastructure upgrades (00-1-001)

The
appropriations in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,287,160

University
of Washington Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 5,500,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 10,787,160

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 100,300,000

-------------

TOTAL....................... ............ $ 111,087,160

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 616. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW
Bothell Campus and Cascadia Community College: Future Phases (00-2-015)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
No money from this appropriation may be expended that would be inconsistent
with the recommendations of the higher education coordinating board and the
project design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of financial
management.

(2)
$7,500,000 of this appropriation is provided solely for equipment and
completion of phase I of the colocated campus.

(3)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 through 914 of this act.

(4)
The appropriation in this section is to be combined with the appropriations
shown in sections 637, 638, 764, and 816 of this act and shall be managed by
the department of general administration.

(5)
$46,000,000 of this appropriation is provided solely for the completion of
construction of phase IIA of the campus. The appropriation represents the
total state contribution for all costs including design, construction and
equipping of phase IIA of the campus.

(6)
Phase IIA shall accommodate 1,000 additional FTE students when completed.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 53,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 105,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 158,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 617. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW
Tacoma - Branch Campus Phase IIA: To construct phase IIA and provide parking
for 600 vehicles (00-2-017)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
No money from this appropriation may be expended that would be inconsistent
with the recommendations of the higher education coordinating board and the
project design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of financial
management.

(2)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 through 914 of this act.

(3)
Phase IIA shall accommodate and additional 600 FTE students upon completion of
new construction and renovated spaces. The appropriation in this section
includes all costs for completion of this phase, including equipment, parking,
and site improvements.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,450,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 37,719,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,000,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 41,169,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 618. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Electrical
Engineering and Computer Science Engineering Building (90-2-013)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 7,916,971

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 87,874,029

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 95,791,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 619. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Old
Physics Hall: (Mary Gates hall) design and construction (92-2-008)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 15,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 21,407,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 36,407,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 620. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Minor
Repairs: Preservation (94-1-003)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 8,485,199

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,985,199

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 621. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Harborview
Research and Training Facility: Construction (94-2-013)

The
reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The reappropriations in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

(2)
The reappropriations in this section are provided solely for the completion of
construction of this facility. The reappropriations represents the total state
contribution for all costs including design, construction and equipping this
facility.

(3)
The reappropriation from the state building construction account may be
expended before the higher education construction account moneys.

Reappropriation:

Higher
Education Construction Account‑-State.... $ 3,000,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,500,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 7,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 71,261,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 78,761,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 622. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

New
Law School Building (94-2-017)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

(2)
In addition to any state appropriation for this project, at least $23,500,000
shall be derived from private funding. The private funds shall be applied
proportionately to all project costs including, but not limited to the costs of
design and consulting services, construction and equipment.

(3)
The appropriations in this section are provided solely for the completion of
construction of this facility. The appropriation represents the total state
contribution for all costs including design, construction, and equipping this
facility.

Reappropriation:

University
of Washington Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 50,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 44,801,500

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,218,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 46,069,500

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 623. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Tacoma
Branch Campus: To complete phase IB, conduct predesign of phase II, design of
phase II, to acquire property, and to remediate unknown site conditions
(94-2-500)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
No money from this reappropriation may be expended that would be inconsistent
with the recommendations of the higher education coordinating board and the
project design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of financial
management.

(2)
The reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 through 914 of this act.

(3)
The predesign for phase II to serve at least 1,200 additional student full-time
equivalents shall be conducted in accordance with the predesign manual
published by the office of financial management. Design of phase IIA to serve
at least 600 student full-time equivalents shall not proceed until the
completed predesign requirements have been reviewed and approved by the office
of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 15,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 15,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 624. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Minor
Repairs (96-1-002)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 7,047,008

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,047,008

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 625. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Minor
Works: Utility infrastructure (96-1-004)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 200,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 5,700,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,900,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 626. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Health
Sciences Center BB Tower Elevators (96-1-007)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

(2)
The appropriation represents the total state contribution for all costs
including design, construction, and equipping this facility.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 93,100

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 6,182,586

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 699,499

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,119,034

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 627. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Fisheries
Science - Oceanography Science Buildings (96-2-006)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The reappropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

(2)
The reappropriations represent the total state contribution for all costs
including design, construction, and equipping this facility.

Reappropriation:

Higher
Education Construction Account‑-State.... $ 2,000,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 6,500,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 8,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 71,794,751

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 80,294,751

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 628. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Social
Work Third Floor Addition (96-2-010)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 600,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,815,600

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,415,600

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 629. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

West
Electrical Power Station (96-2-011)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 6,704,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,804,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 630. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Power
Plant Boiler 7 (96-2-020)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State.. ... $ 6,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 3,912,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,912,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 631. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Southwest
Campus Utilities Phase I (96-2-027)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 9,209,500

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,309,500

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 632. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Minor
Works: Safety (98-1-001)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,200,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,700,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 633. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Minor
Works: Preservation (98-1-002)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,700,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,646,075

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,346,075

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 634. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Utility
and Data Communications Projects: Preservation (98-1-004)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 500,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 635. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Minor
Works: Program (98-2-003)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,000,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 636. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Building
Communication: Upgrade (98-2-009)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,000,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 637. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW
Bothell and Cascadia Community College Phase I (98-2-899)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
No money from this reappropriation may be expended that would be inconsistent
with the recommendations of the higher education coordinating board and the
project design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of financial
management.

(2)
The reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 through 914 of this act.

(3)
The reappropriation in this section is to be combined with the appropriations
shown in sections 616, 638, 764, and 816 of this act and shall be managed by
the department of general administration to construct a campus to serve at
least 2,000 student full-time equivalents with approximately 1,200 for the
University of Washington and 800 for Cascadia Community College.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 34,273,747

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 13,696,253

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 47,970,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 638. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

UW
Bothell and Cascadia Community College Future Phases (98-2-999)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
No money from this reappropriation may be expended that would be inconsistent
with the recommendations of the higher education coordinating board and the
project design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of financial
management.

(2)
The reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 through 914 of this act.

(3)
The reappropriation in this section is to be combined with the appropriations
shown in sections 616, 637, 764, and 816 of this act and shall be managed by
the department of general administration.

(4)
The predesign for phase II to serve at least 2,000 additional University of
Washington and community college student full-time equivalents included in this
reappropriation shall be conducted in accordance with the predesign manual
published by the office of financial management.

(5)
Design of phase IIA to serve at least 1,000 total University of Washington and
Cascadia Community College student full-time equivalents shall not proceed until
the completed predesign requirements in subsection (4) of this section have
been reviewed and approved by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,069,063

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)........... ........ $ 930,937

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 639. FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Nuclear
Reactor: Decommissioning (99-2-009)

The
appropriation in this section shall not be expended until the documents
described in the capital project review requirements process and procedures
prescribed by the office of financial management have been complied with under
sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 750,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,207,853

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 450,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,407,853

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 640. FOR WASHINGTON
STATE UNIVERSITY

Minor
Works: Safety and environmental (00-1-001)

The
appropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 8,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 641. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Minor
Works: Preservation (00-1-004)

The
appropriations in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,750,000

Washington
State University Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 3,250,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 6,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 24,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 30,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 642. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Child
Care Facility - Human Development Lab, Infant Care (00-1-039)

Appropriation:

Washington
State University Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 3,100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,100,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 643. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Scholars
Hall - White Hall: Renovation (00-1-078)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures
under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,400,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,400,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 644. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Minor
Works - Branch Campus: Preservation (00-1-901)

The
appropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

Washington
State University Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 1,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)....... ........ $ 4,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 645. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Minor
Works: Program (00-2-002)

The
appropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

Washington
State University Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 6,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 28,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 34,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 646. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Major
Equipment: Acquisition (00-2-003)

Appropriation:

Washington
State University Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 3,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 16,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 19,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 647. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Animal
Disease Biotechnology Facility: Equipment (00-2-067)

Appropriation:

Washington
State University Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 1,200,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 6,200,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,400,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 648. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Museum
of Art Building (00-2-071)

To
conduct a predesign of the project described in this section in accordance with
the predesign manual published by the office of financial management. Future
appropriations for this project are subject to the submittal of completed
predesign requirements on or before July 1, 2000.

Appropriation:

Washington
State University Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 125,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 14,100,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 14,225,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 649. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Shock
Physics Building (00-2-080)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

(2)
The program scope and project budget for this project shall comply with the
approved predesign document on file with the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,830,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 11,100,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,930,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 650. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

WSU
Vancouver - Engineering/Life Science Building (00-2-904)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures
under sections 912 through 914 of this act.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 27,750,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 27,750,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 651. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

WSU
Vancouver - New Academic Building D (00-2-905)

To
conduct a predesign of the project described in this section in accordance with
the predesign manual published by the office of financial management. Future
appropriations for this project are subject to the submittal of completed
predesign requirements on or before July 1, 2000. The project shall serve at
least 1,200 additional student full-time equivalents on the Vancouver campus.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 250,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 29,700,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 29,950,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 652. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

WSU
Spokane - Study of Future Campus Development (00-2-906)

To
conduct a study of future campus developments, including alternatives regarding
the size and timing of future building construction.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 250,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 44,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 44,250,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 653. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Hazardous,
Pathological, and Radioactive Waste Handling Facilities (92-1-019)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 675,425

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 667,575

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,343,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 654. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Todd
Hall Renovation (92-1-021)

The
reappropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,918

Washington
State University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 168,909

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 269,827

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 14,343,680

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 14,613,507

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 655. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Veterinary
Teaching Hospital: Construction (92-2-013)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 364,892

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 7,245,608

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,610,500

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 656. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Fulmer
Hall: Fulmer Annex Renovation (92-2-023)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 171,069

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 11,447,398

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,618,467

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 657. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Bohler
Gym Renovation: Construction (94-1-010)

The
reappropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 16,134,865

Washington
State University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 319,898

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 16,454,763

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,558,537

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 19,013,300

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 658. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Thompson
Hall Renovation: Construction (94-1-024)

The
reappropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 9,903,066

Washington
State University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 101,325

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 10,004,391

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,692,009

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,696,400

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 659. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Infrastructure
Project: Savings (94-1-999)

Projects
that are completed in accordance with section 911 of this act that have been
reviewed by the office of financial management may have their remaining funds
transferred to this project for the following purposes: (1) Road repair; (2)
roof repair; (3) electrical system repair; (4) steam and utility distribution
system repair; (5) plumbing system repair; (6) heating, ventilating, and air
conditioning repairs; (7) emergency repairs due to natural disasters or
accidents; and (8) critical year 2000 embedded chip modifications.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 212,474

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 376,662

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 589,136

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 660. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Hazardous
Waste Facilities: Construction (94-2-006)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Washington
State University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 1,084,093

Appropriation:

Washington
State University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 3,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 626,907

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 9,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................. ................. $ 13,711,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 661. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Pathological
and Biomedical Incinerator: Design and construction (94-2-012)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,844,941

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 598,059

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,443,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 662. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Engineering
Teaching and Research Laboratory Building: Construction (94-2-014)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 528,901

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 16,611,399

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 17,140,300

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 663. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Chemical
Waste Collection Facilities: Design and construction (94-2-016)

Reappropriation:

Washington
State University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 158,463

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 841,537

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 664. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Kimbrough
Hall Addition and Remodeling (94-2-019)

The
reappropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 9,761,115

Washington
State University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 205,535

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 9,966,650

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,766,350

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,733,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 665. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

WSU
Vancouver: Campus construction (94-2-902)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 through 914 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,890,404

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 36,832,058

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 38,722,462

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 666. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Plant
Growth: Wheat research center (96-2-047)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act and shall not be expended
until the university has received the federal money or an equivalent amount
from other sources.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 613,194

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 3,386,806

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 667. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Minor
Works: Preservation (98-1-004)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

Washington
State University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 4,278,238

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 774,762

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,053,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 668. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Campus
Infrastructure and Road Improvements (98-1-073)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,344,984

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,947,016

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 12,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 24,292,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 669. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

WSU
Spokane - Minor Works: Program (98-1-821)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 50,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 12,700

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 62,700

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 670. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Americans
with Disabilities Act Pool Account (98-1-993)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 140,159

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 3,900

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 144,059

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 671. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Minor
Works: Safety and environmental (98-2-001)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,244,834

Washington
State University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 1,807,800

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 3,052,634

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 355,166

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,407,800

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 672. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Minor
Works: Program (98-2-002)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

Washington
State University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 4,580,404

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,419,596

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 673. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Major
Equipment: Acquisition (98-2-003)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 867,265

Washington
State University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 1,729,095

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 2,596,360

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,403,640

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 674. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Murrow
Hall: Renovation and addition (98-2-008)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

(2)
The program scope and project budget for this project shall comply with the
approved predesign document on file with the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

Washington
State University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 36,502

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,760,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 68,498

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 10,800,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,665,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 675. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Cleveland
Hall: Renovation and addition (98-2-032)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

(2)
The program scope and project budget for this project shall comply with the
approved predesign document on file with the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

Washington
State University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 46,967

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 93,033

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 10,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,640,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 676. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

South
Campus Electrical Services: Design and construction (98-2-044)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,757,288

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,142,712

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,900,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 677. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Teaching
and Learning Center: Design and construction (98-2-062)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,734,861

Washington
State University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 616,781

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 2,351,642

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 30,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 322,858

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 32,674,500

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 678. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Apparel,
Merchandise, and Interior Design and Landscape Architecture Building (98-2-072)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures
under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

(2)
The program scope and project budget for this project shall comply with the
approved predesign document on file with the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,750,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 98,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 27,850,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 30,698,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 679. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

WSUnet:
Infrastructure (98-2-074)

Reappropriation:

Washington
State University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 1,671,951

Appropriation:

Washington
State University Building

Account‑-State........................... $ 3,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,403,049

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 12,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 19,075,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 680. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

WSU
Spokane - Health Sciences Building (98-2-903)

The
reappropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The reappropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 through 914 of this act.

(2)
No money from the reappropriations may be expended in a manner that is
inconsistent with the recommendations of the higher education coordinating
board and the project design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of
financial management.

(3)
Design and construction of this building shall accommodate at least 240
additional full-time equivalent students on the Riverpoint campus.

Reappropriation:

State
Higher Education Construction Account‑-

State.................................... $ 36,300,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,685,375

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 38,985,375

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 38,985,375

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 681. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

WSU
Tri-Cities - Science Education Center (98-2-905)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 through 914 of this act.

(2)
The program scope and project budget for this project shall comply with the
approved predesign document on file with the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 12,962

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 127,038

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 22,500,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 22,640,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 682. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

WSU
Vancouver: Phase II (98-2-911)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
No money from this appropriation may be expended that would be inconsistent
with the recommendations of the higher education coordinating board and the
project design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of financial
management.

(2)
The reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 through 914 of this act.

(3)
This reappropriation includes the design phase of the engineering/life science
building and multimedia building and to construct campus infrastructure and
physical plant shops. Section 650 of this act appropriates the funds for
construction phase and equipping the engineering/life science building.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 12,999,834

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 500,166

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 13,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 683. FOR EASTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Senior
Hall: Renovation (00-1-003)

To
conduct a predesign of the project described in this section in accordance with
the predesign manual published by the office of financial management. Future
appropriations for this project are subject to the submittal of completed
predesign requirements on or before July 1, 2000.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 11,600,000

-------------

TOTAL................................ ... $ 11,700,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 684. FOR
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor
Works: Preservation (00-1-004)

The
appropriations in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 28,386

Eastern
Washington University Capital

Projects
Account‑-State.................. $ 2,758,432

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 2,786,818

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Eastern
Washington University Capital

Projects
Account‑-State.................. $ 2,000,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 3,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 7,635,687

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 14,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 27,422,505

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 685. FOR
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Infrastructure
Project: Savings (00-1-999)

Projects
that are completed in accordance with section 911 of this act that have been
reviewed by the office of financial management may have their remaining funds
transferred to this project for the following purposes: (1) Road repair; (2)
roof repair; (3) electrical system repair; (4) steam and utility distribution
system repair; (5) plumbing system repair; (6) heating, ventilating, and air
conditioning repairs; (7) emergency repairs due to natural disasters or
accidents; and, (8) critical year 2000 embedded chip modifications.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 686. FOR
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor
Works: Program (00-2-002)

The
appropriations in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 520,187

Eastern
Washington University Capital

Projects
Account‑-State.................. $ 888,384

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 1,408,571

Appropriation:

Eastern
Washington University Capital

Projects
Account‑-State.................. $ 2,690,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 5,631,069

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 11,600,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 21,329,640

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 687. FOR
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Campus
Network and Cable: Replacement (90-2-004)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 377,807

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 6,295,993

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 4,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,673,800

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 688. FOR
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

JFK
Library Addition and Remodel: Construction (90-5-003)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,079,670

Eastern
Washington University Capital

Projects
Account‑-State.................. $ 54,281

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 2,133,951

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 18,582,292

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 20,716,243

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 689. FOR
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Chillers,
Heating, Ventilation, and Air Conditioning (94-1-003)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 308,773

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,288,938

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,597,711

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 690. FOR
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Monroe
Hall: Renovation (96-1-002)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 683,408

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 11,115,000

Eastern
Washington University Capital

Projects
Account‑-State.................. $ 250,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 11,365,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).. ................. $ 340,592

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,389,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 691. FOR
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Campus
Classroom: Renewal (96-2-001)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 556,227

Eastern
Washington University Capital

Projects
Account‑-State.................. $ 494,709

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 1,050,936

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Eastern
Washington University Capital

Projects
Account‑-State.................. $ 500,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 1,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 4,099,064

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 10,700,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 17,350,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 692. FOR
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Water
System: Preservation and expansion (98-1-002)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 443,052

Appropriation:

Eastern
Washington University Capital

Projects
Account‑-State.................. $ 880,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 56,948

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 7,500,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,880,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 693. FOR
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Electrical
Substations: Preservation (98-1-004)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,977,416

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 22,584

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 694. FOR
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Roof
Replacements (98-1-006)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 785,056

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 3,919,944

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,705,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 695. FOR
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Infrastructure:
Preservation (98-1-007)

The
appropriations in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,900,005

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 99,995

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 4,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 696. FOR
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Heating,
Ventilation, and Air Conditioning Systems: Preservation (98-1-008)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 977,084

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 22,916

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 697. FOR
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Boiler
Plant Expansion (98-1-011)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 525,314

Eastern
Washington University Capital

Projects
Account‑-State.................. $ 106,415

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 631,729

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 6,725,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 151,896

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,508,625

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 698. FOR CENTRAL
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Infrastructure
Project: Savings (00-1-001)

Projects
that are completed in accordance with section 911 of this act that have been
reviewed by the office of financial management may have their remaining funds
transferred to this project for the following purposes: (1) Road repair; (2)
roof repair; (3) electrical system repair; (4) steam and utility distribution
system repair; (5) plumbing system repair; (6) heating, ventilating, and air
conditioning repairs; (7) emergency repairs due to natural disasters or
accidents; and (8) critical year 2000 embedded chip modifications.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 699. FOR
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor
Works: Preservation (00-1-120)

The
appropriations in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 900,000

Central
Washington University Capital

Projects
Account‑-State.................. $ 4,100,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 5,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 27,500,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 32,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 700. FOR
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Music
Facility (00-2-001)

To
revise and update the predesign of the project described in this section in
accordance with the predesign manual published by the office of financial
management. Future appropriations for this project are subject to the
submittal of completed predesign requirements on or before July 1, 2000.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 116,372

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 28,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 28,216,372

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 701. FOR
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

K-20
Distance Education Classrooms (00-2-060)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 750,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,250,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 702. FOR
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor
Works: Program (00-2-110)

The
appropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

Central
Washington University Capital

Projects
Account‑-State.................. $ 3,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 13,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 16,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 703. FOR
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Fiber
Optic Backbone: Upgrade (00-2-130)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 2,150,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,150,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 704. FOR
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

CWU
- Yakima Valley Higher Education Center (00-2-993)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

(2)
The program scope and project budget for this project shall comply with the
approved predesign document on file with the office of financial management.

(3)
This appropriation shall be combined with the appropriation in section 770 of
this act to develop a multi-institutional higher education center in
cooperation with all participating institutions.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,900,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 75,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 17,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 18,975,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 705. FOR
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Science
Facility: Design and construction (94-2-002)

The
reappropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 through 914 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Central
Washington University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 1,100,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 1,600,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 56,796,500

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 58,393,500

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 706. FOR
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Black
Hall: Design and construction (94-2-010)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 26,403,401

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 27,403,401

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 707. FOR
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor
Works: Infrastructure preservation (96-1-040)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

(2)
No money from this reappropriation may be expended for remodeling or repairing
the president's residence.

Reappropriation:

Central
Washington University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,300,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,400,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 708. FOR
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor
Works: Preservation (96-1-120)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

(2)
A maximum of $85,000 from this reappropriation may be expended for remodeling
the president's residence.

Reappropriation:

Central
Washington University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,700,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,200,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 709. FOR
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor
Works: Program (96-2-130)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

Central
Washington University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 75,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,425,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 710. FOR
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Chilled
Water Systems: Improvements (98-1-020)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 400,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 600,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 711. FOR
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Heating
System Improvements (98-1-030)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 450,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,450,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 712. FOR
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Electrical
Utility: Upgrade (98-1-110)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,300,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,700,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 200,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,200,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 713. FOR
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Steamline
Replacement (98-1-120)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 300,000

Central
Washington University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 250,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 550,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 900,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 4,500,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,450,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 714. FOR
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor
Works: Preservation (98-1-130)

Reappropriation:

Central
Washington University Capital Projects

Account‑-State....................... ... $ 1,700,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,463,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,163,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 715. FOR
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Building
Indoor Air Quality: Improvements (98-1-170)

Reappropriation:

Central
Washington University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 200,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 229,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 429,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 716. FOR
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

SeaTac
Center Building: Renovation (98-2-010)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 162,500

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 662,500

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 717. FOR
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Lynnwood
Higher Education Center (98-2-080)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

(2)
The program scope and project budget for this project shall comply with the
approved predesign document on file with the office of financial management.

(3)
The design of this facility shall be based on a combination of construction
funding included in this section and the state board for community and
technical college.

(4)
The design of this facility shall be developed in cooperation with other NSIS
consortium members and accommodate consortium programs.

Reappropriation:

Central
Washington University Capital

Projects
Account‑-State.................. $ 875,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 700,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 125,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 10,060,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,760,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 718. FOR
CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor
Works: Program (98-2-135)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

Central
Washington University Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 1,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,382,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,382,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 719. FOR THE
EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Minor
Works: Safety and code (00-1-001)

The
appropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,900,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 11,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,900,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 720. FOR
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Minor
Works: Preservation (00-1-002)

The
appropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

The
Evergreen State College Capital

Projects
Account‑-State.................. $ 3,600,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 13,800,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 17,400,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 721. FOR
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Emergency
and Small Repairs (00-1-003)

Appropriation:

The
Evergreen State College Capital

Projects
Account‑-State.................. $ 560,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 2,510,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,070,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 722. FOR
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Infrastructure
Project: Savings (00-1-004)

Projects
that are completed in accordance with section 911 of this act that have been
reviewed by the office of financial management may have their remaining funds
transferred to this project for the following purposes: (1) Road repair; (2)
roof repair; (3) electrical system repair; (4) steam and utility distribution
system repair; (5) plumbing system repair; (6) heating, ventilating, and air
conditioning repairs; (7) emergency repairs due to natural disasters or
accidents; and (8) critical year 2000 embedded chip modifications.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 723. FOR
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Lab
II First Floor Remodel - CAL and Adjacent Labs (00-2-005)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account--State...... $ 2,600,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,600,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 724. FOR
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Minor
Works: Program (00-2-007)

The
appropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,037,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 7,250,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,287,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 725. FOR
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Library
Building - Technology Center (00-2-008)

To
conduct a predesign of the project described in this section in accordance with
the predesign manual published by the office of financial management. Future
appropriations for this project are subject to the submittal of completed
predesign requirements on or before July 1, 2000.

Appropriation:

The
Evergreen State College Capital

Projects
Account‑-State.................. $ 150,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 16,450,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 16,600,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 726. FOR
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Minor
Works: Safety and code (98-1-001)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 166,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,284,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,450,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 727. FOR
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Minor
Works: Preservation (98-1-002)

The
reappropriations in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,304,319

The
Evergreen State College Capital

Projects
Account‑-State.................. $ 249,389

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 1,553,708

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,070,631

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,624,339

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 728. FOR
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Seminar
Phase II: Design (98-2-004)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

(2)
The program scope and project budget for this project shall comply with the
approved predesign document on file with the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,200,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 140,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 37,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 40,340,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 729. FOR
THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

Minor
Works: Program (98-2-006)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

The
Evergreen State College Capital

Projects
Account‑-State.................. $ 1,442,084

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 357,916

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,800,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 730. FOR
THE SPOKANE
INTERCOLLEGIATE RESEARCH AND TECHNICAL INSTITUTE

Minor
Works: Preservation (00-1-001)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 80,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 320,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 400,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 731. FOR WESTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor
Works: Preservation (00-1-068)

The
appropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 24,800,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 29,300,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 732. FOR
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor
Works: Program (00-2-069)

The
appropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

Western
Washington University Capital

Projects
Account‑-State.................. $ 7,600,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).. ................. $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 24,500,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 32,100,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 733. FOR
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Infrastructure
Project: Savings (94-1-999)

Projects
that are completed in accordance with section 911 of this act that have been
reviewed by the office of financial management may have their remaining funds
transferred to this project for the following purposes: (1) Road repair; (2)
roof repair; (3) electrical system repair; (4) steam and utility distribution
system repair; (5) plumbing system repair; (6) heating, ventilating, and air
conditioning repairs; (7) emergency repairs due to natural disasters or
accidents; and, (8) critical year 2000 embedded chip modifications.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 970,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 970,001

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 734. FOR
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Haggard
Hall Renovation and Abatement: Construction (94-2-015)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,400,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 19,804,405

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 22,204,405

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 735. FOR
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Campus
Services Facility: Construction (96-2-025)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

(2)
The university shall comply with local comprehensive land use laws and
regulations for this project.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 958,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 10,563,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 333,800

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,854,800

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 736. FOR
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Integrated
Signal Distribution: Construction (96-2-056)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,800,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 4,677,900

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 13,477,900

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 737. FOR
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor
Works: Preservation (98-1-064)

The
reappropriations in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,700,000

Western
Washington University Capital

Projects
Account‑-State.................. $ 1,800,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 3,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 3,200,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,700,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 738. FOR
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Facility
and Property Acquisition (98-2-023)

The
university shall comply with local comprehensive land use laws and regulations
for this project.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,720,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,280,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 4,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 739. FOR
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Campus
Infrastructure: Development (98-2-024)

The
university shall comply with local comprehensive land use laws and regulations
for this project.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 450,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 20,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 22,450,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 740. FOR
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Communications
Facility: Design (98-2-053)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

(2)
The program scope and project budget for this project shall comply with the
approved predesign document on file with the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,960,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 204,400

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 39,100,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 43,264,400

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 741. FOR
WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Minor
Works: Program (98-2-063)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

Western
Washington University Capital

Projects
Account‑-State.................. $ 2,700,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,928,529

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,628,529

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 742. FOR
THE WASHINGTON
STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Stadium
Way Facility: Seismic and infrastructure repair (96-1-102)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures
under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,745,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 3,422,626

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,167,626

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 743. FOR
THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

State
Capital Museum: Preservation (98-1-001)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 284,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 200,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 1,150,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,634,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 744. FOR
THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Minor
Works (98-1-003)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 90,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 83,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 390,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 563,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 745. FOR
THE WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Washington
Heritage Projects (98-2-004)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The state grant may provide no more than one-third of the actual total capital
cost of the project, or the amount of state assistance listed in this section,
whichever is less. The remaining portions of capital project costs shall be a
match from nonstate sources. The match may include cash, land value, and
documented in-kind gifts and support.

(2)
By December 15, 1999, the society shall submit a report to the appropriate
fiscal committees of the legislature and to the office of financial management
on the progress of the heritage program, including a list of projects funded under
this section.

(3)
The appropriation is provided for the following list of projects:

Organization Amount
Recommended Total Project Cost

Port
Townsend Marine

Science
Center 70,000 711,530

Yakima
Valley Museum 400,000 3,266,771

Northwest
Railway Museum 118,000 377,209

Columbia
Breaks Fire

Interpretive
Center 48,298 175,764

Fort
Nisqually Historic Site 121,435 364,303

Kittitas
County 500,000 2,878,285

South
Whidbey Historical

Society 25,000 114,301

Shoreline
Historical Museum 196,073 597,148

Okanogan
County 113,000 459,342

North
Central Washington Museum 500,000 2,572,750

Historic
Seattle Public

Development
Authority 330,000 4,781,600

Pearson
Field 250,000 1,154,711

Touchet
Valley 180,000 632,607

Anacortes
Museum - W.T. Preston 54,004 195,198

Whatcom
Museum 360,000 2,929,050

Oysterville
Community Club 37,799 113,400

Meadowbrook
Farm 94,000 4,208,000

City of
Lynnwood (9971) 50,391 151,175

Grays
Harbor Historical Seaport 220,000 3,865,800

Lewis
County 25,000 80,574

City of
Des Moines 120,000 712,852

Steilacoom
Historical Society 187,000 905,739

Total $4,000,000 31,248,109

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 4,100,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 16,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 24,100,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 746. FOR
THE EASTERN
WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

Cheney
Cowles Museum: Addition and remodel (98-2-001)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

(2)
The program scope and project budget for this project shall comply with the
approved predesign document on file with the office of financial management.

(3)
The appropriation in this section shall be matched by at least twenty percent
from nonstate sources.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 300,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 19,500,000

Washington
State Historical Trust Account‑-

Private/Local............................ $ 4,535,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 24,035,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,425,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 26,760,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 747. FOR
THE COMMUNITY
AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor
Works: Preservation (00-1-001)

The
appropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 31,967,400

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 120,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 151,967,400

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 748. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Hazardous
Materials Abatement: Pool (00-1-092)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The money provided in this section shall be allocated to colleges by the state
board for community and technical colleges for removal or abatement of asbestos
and other hazardous materials.

(2)
No moneys appropriated in this section or in any section specifically
referencing this section shall be expended unless the state board for community
and technical colleges has reviewed and approved the cost estimates for the
project.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 4,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 749. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Underground
Storage Tank and Year 2000: Pool (00-1-094)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The money provided in this section shall be allocated to state community and
technical colleges for removal, replacement, and environmental cleanup projects
related to underground storage tanks and correcting year 2000 embedded chip
issues.

(2)
No moneys appropriated in this section or in any section specifically
referencing this section shall be expended unless the state board for community
and technical colleges has reviewed and approved the cost estimates for the
project. Projects to replace tanks shall conform with guidelines to minimize
risk of environmental contamination. Above ground storage tanks shall be used
whenever possible and agencies shall avoid duplication of tank removal,
replacement, and environmental cleanup projects related to underground storage
tanks.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 4,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 750. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Americans
with Disabilities Act: Pool (00-1-096)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The money provided in this section shall be allocated to colleges within the
state board for community and technical college system for improvements to
state-owned facilities for program access enhancements.

(2)
No moneys appropriated in this section or in any section specifically referencing
this section shall be expended unless the department of general administration
has reviewed and approved the cost estimates for the project. The state board
of community and technical colleges together with the department of general
administration shall implement an agency request and evaluation procedure
similar to the one adopted in the 1997-99 biennium for distribution of funds.

(3)
No moneys appropriated in this section shall be available to community colleges
to modify dormitories.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 4,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 751. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor
Works: Program (00-2-001)

The
appropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 10,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 40,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 50,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 752. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Olympic
College - Plant Operations Building: Replacement (00-2-002)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures
under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 753. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor
Works: Access projects (00-2-003)

The
appropriation in this section is provided solely to add space at Green River,
Clark, and Whatcom Community Colleges to increase capacity for full-time
equivalent students.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,800,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,800,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 754. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Vocational
Program Equipment: Upgrades (00-2-004)

The
appropriation in this section is provided solely for equipment in new and
upgraded high-demand technical programs. The state board of community and
technical colleges shall include in the report referenced in the operating
budget a summary of how the equipment funds were distributed.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,150,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,150,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 755. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bellevue
Community College - Robinswood School: Replacement (00-2-005)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures
under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 15,806,600

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 15,806,600

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 756. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Matching
Funds (00-2-296)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 8,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 757. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Shoreline
Community College - Library/Technology Center (00-2-319)

To
conduct a predesign of the project described in this section in accordance with
the predesign manual published by the office of financial management. Future
appropriations for this project are subject to the submittal of completed
predesign requirements on or before July 1, 2000.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 50,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 7,250,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,300,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 758. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Green
River Community College - Drama and Music Class/Labs: Renovation (00-2-322)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,430,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,430,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 759. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clark
College - Applied Arts IV Building: Renovation (00-2-326)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,540,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,540,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 760. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Wenatchee
Valley College - Sexton Hall Computer Labs: Renovation (00-2-327)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 700,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL............................ ........ $ 700,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 761. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Yakima
Valley Community College - Mechanics Complex: Renovation (00-2-328)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,715,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,715,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 762. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Tacoma
Community College - Building 5: Renovation (00-2-335)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 763. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bellingham
Technical College - Building B: Renovation (00-2-338)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,926,800

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,926,800

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 764. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Cascadia
Community College: Development (00-2-501)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
No money from this appropriation may be expended that would be inconsistent
with the recommendations of the higher education coordinating board and the
project design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of financial
management.

(2)
$7,500,000 of this appropriation is provided solely for equipment and
completion of phase I of the colocated campus.

(3)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 through 914 of this act.

(4)
The appropriation in this section is to be combined with the appropriations
shown in sections 616, 637, 638, and 816 of this act and shall be managed by
the department of general administration.

(5)
$46,000,000 of this appropriation is provided solely for the completion of
construction of phase IIA of the campus. The appropriation represents the
total state contribution for all costs including design, construction, and
equipping of phase IIA of the campus.

(6)
Phase IIA shall accommodate 1,000 additional full-time equivalent students when
completed.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 53,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 105,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 158,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 765. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Whatcom
Community College - Classroom/Laboratory Building (00-2-677)

To
conduct a predesign of the project described in this section in accordance with
the predesign manual published by the office of financial management. Future
appropriations for this project are subject to the submittal of completed
predesign requirements on or before July 1, 2000.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 80,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 9,300,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,380,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 766. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Highline
Community College - 21st Century Careers Center (00-2-678)

To
conduct a predesign of the project described in this section in accordance with
the predesign manual published by the office of financial management. Future
appropriations for this project are subject to the submittal of completed
predesign requirements on or before July 1, 2000.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 117,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 17,900,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 18,017,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 767. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

South
Puget Sound Community College - Humanities/General Education Complex (00-2-679)

To
conduct a predesign of the project described in this section in accordance with
the predesign manual published by the office of financial management. Future
appropriations for this project are subject to the submittal of completed
predesign requirements on or before July 1, 2000.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 124,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 14,900,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 15,024,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 768. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clark
College - Higher Education Center at WSU Vancouver (00-2-680)

To
conduct a predesign of the project described in this section in accordance with
the predesign manual published by the office of financial management. Future
appropriations for this project are subject to the submittal of completed
predesign requirements on or before July 1, 2000.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 120,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 18,350,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 18,470,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 769. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Wenatchee
Valley Omak - Science Lab (00-2-952)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 900,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 900,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 770. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Yakima
Valley Higher Education Center: Acquisition (00-2-954)

This
appropriation shall be combined with the appropriation in section 704 of this
act to develop a multi-institutional higher education center in cooperation
with all participating institutions.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 771. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Construct
Classroom and Laboratory Building: Edmonds Community College (94-2-604)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 318,142

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 4,840,318

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,158,460

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 772. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Construct
Center for Information Technology: Green River Community College (94-2-606)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 350,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,681,551

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,031,551

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 773. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Americans
with Disabilities Act: Improvements (94-5-001)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 30,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 97,939

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 127,939

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 774. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Small
Repairs, Improvements, and Underground Storage Tank Removal (96-1-001)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 3,372,038

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,472,038

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 775. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Asbestos
Abatement (96-1-002)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 200,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 959,890

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,159,890

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 776. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Roof
Repairs (96-1-010)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,015,690

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,515,690

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 777. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Heating,
Ventilating, and Air Conditioning Repairs (96-1-030)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 45,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 640,356

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 685,356

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 778. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Mechanical
Repairs (96-1-060)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 441,547

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 541,547

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 779. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Electrical
Repairs (96-1-080)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 250,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 409,872

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 659,872

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 780. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Exterior
Repairs (96-1-100)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 30,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).. ................. $ 1,501,582

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,531,582

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 781. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Interior
Repairs (96-1-120)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 895,514

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 995,514

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 782. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Site
Repairs (96-1-140)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 295,040

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL............. ...................... $ 395,040

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 783. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Infrastructure
Project: Savings (96-1-500)

Projects
that are completed in accordance with section 911 of this act that have been
reviewed by the office of financial management may have their remaining funds
transferred to this project for the following purposes: (1) Road repair; (2)
roof repair; (3) electrical system repair; (4) steam and utility distribution
system repair; (5) plumbing system repair; (6) heating, ventilating, and air
conditioning repairs; (7) emergency repairs due to natural disasters or
accidents; and (8) critical year 2000 embedded chip modifications.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 784. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Repair
and Minor Improvement Projects (96-2-199)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,176,473

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,176,473

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 785. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Project
Artwork Consolidation Account (96-2-400)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 241,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)................ ... $ 219,270

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 460,270

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 786. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

North
Seattle Community College - Vocational/Child Care Buildings: Construction
(96-2-651)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 10,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 4,704,161

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 14,704,161

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 787. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Everett
Community College - Instructional Technology Center: Construction (96-2-652)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,400,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 15,217,483

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 16,617,483

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 788. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

South
Seattle Community College - Integrated Learning Assistance Resource Center:
Construction (96-2-653)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,960,167

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,460,167

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 789. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Olympic
College - Poulsbo Center: Construction (96-2-654)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 147,034

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 13,250,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 13,397,034

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 790. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bellevue
Community College - Classrooms and Labs: Construction (96-2-655)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 250,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 9,419,551

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,669,551

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 791. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clover
Park Technical College - Transportation Trades: Design (96-2-662)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 25,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,200,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 25,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 17,500,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 18,750,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 792. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clover
Park Technical College - Aviation Trades Complex: Construction (96-2-998)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

Community/Technical
College Capital Projects

Account‑-State........................... $ 4,800,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,700,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 2,500,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 793. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Repair
and Minor Improvement (98-1-001)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 7,000,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 794. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Asbestos
Abatement (98-1-002)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 744,097

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 844,097

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 795. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Underground
Storage Tanks (98-1-003)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 400,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 390,490

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 790,490

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 796. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Roof
Repairs (98-1-010)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 7,080,400

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,580,400

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 797. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Heating,
Ventilating, and Air Conditioning Repairs (98-1-040)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 5,940,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,940,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 798. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Mechanical
Repairs (98-1-070)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 800,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,832,300

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,632,300

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 799. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Electrical
Repairs (98-1-090)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,549,400

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,049,400

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 800. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Exterior
Repairs (98-1-110)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 3,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 914,200

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,914,200

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 801. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Interior
Repairs (98-1-130)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,361,500

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 2,361,500

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 802. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Site
Repairs (98-1-150)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 850,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 325,400

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................. ................. $ 1,175,400

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 803. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bates
Technical College: Renovation (98-1-190)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 8,400,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 294,716

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,694,716

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 804. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bellingham
Technical College: Renovation (98-1-191)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 400,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 992,648

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,392,648

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 805. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Clover
Park Technical College: Renovation (98-1-192)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 2,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,781,518

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,781,518

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 806. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Seattle
Central Community College: Renovation (98-1-193)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 4,600,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 233,605

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 4,833,605

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 807. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Americans
with Disabilities Act: Improvements (98-1-993)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 260,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 362,393

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 622,393

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 808. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Minor
Improvements (98-2-200)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 7,900,369

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,900,369

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 809. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Olympic
College - Library: Replacement (98-2-500)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 3,700,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,600,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 5,300,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 976,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 836,448

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,112,448

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 810. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Highline
Community College - Classroom/Laboratory Building: Construction (98-2-660)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 310,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 5,700,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 79,717

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,089,717

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 811. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Spokane
Community College - Allied Health Building: Addition (98-2-661)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 250,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 441,108

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 10,700,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 11,391,108

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 812. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Bellingham
Technical College - Business and Health Technology Building (98-2-672)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

(2)
The program scope and project budget for this project shall comply with the
approved predesign document on file with the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 19,693

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 730,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 55,307

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 7,450,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,255,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 813. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Lake
Washington Technical College - Phase III: Design (98-2-673)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

(2)
The program scope and project budget for this project shall comply with the
approved predesign document on file with the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 26,923

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,100,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 88,077

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 15,500,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 16,715,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 814. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Renton
Technical College - Technology Resource Center: Design (98-2-674)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

(2)
The program scope and project budget for this project shall comply with the
approved predesign document on file with the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 67,064

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 970,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 67,936

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 10,950,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 12,055,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 815. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Skagit
Valley College Higher Education Center (98-2-675)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

(2)
The program scope and project budget for this project shall comply with the
approved predesign document on file with the office of financial management.

(3)
The project shall be coordinated with Western Washington University in order to
incorporate a distance education classroom and additional classroom, lab, and
office space for use by the university.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 17,942

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 924,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 32,058

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 12,200,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 13,174,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 816. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Cascadia
Community College and UW - Bothell: Construction (98-2-999)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)
No money from this appropriation may be expended that would be inconsistent
with the recommendations of the higher education coordinating board and the
project design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of financial
management.

(2)
$3,000,000 of this appropriation is provided solely for design of phase IIA of
this project to accommodate an additional 1,000 University of Washington and
community college student full-time equivalents for the colocated campus.

(3)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 912 through 914 of this act.

(4)
The appropriation in this section is to be combined with the appropriations
shown in sections 616, 637, 638, and 764 of this act and shall be managed by
the department of general administration to construct a campus to serve at
least 2,000 student full-time equivalents with approximately 1,200 for the
University of Washington and 800 for Cascadia Community College.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 35,955,792

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 10,014,208

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 45,970,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 817. FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Centralia
College - Instructional Building: Replacement (99-2-001)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures
under sections 912 and 913 of this act.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 14,450,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,434,614

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 15,884,614

(End of part)

PART
6

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 901. The
estimated debt service costs impacting future general fund expenditures related
solely to new capital appropriations within this act are $15,330,000 during the
1999-01 fiscal period; $96,189,000 during the 2001-03 fiscal period;
$136,763,000 during the 2003-05 fiscal period; $137,126,000 during the 2005-07
fiscal period; and $137,126,000 during the 2007-09 fiscal period.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 902.
ACQUISITION OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS. The
following agencies may enter into financial contracts, paid for from operating
revenues, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts
indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section, agencies shall use the
most economical financial contract option available, including long-term
leases, lease-purchase agreements, lease-development with option to purchase
agreements or financial contracts using certificates of participation. The
director of general administration shall ensure that the clustering of state
facilities and the collocation and consolidation of state agencies take place
where such configurations are economical and consistent with agency space
needs. Agencies shall assist the department of general administration with
facility collocation and consolidation efforts.

State
agencies may enter into agreements with the department of general
administration and the state treasurer's office to develop requests to the
legislature for acquisition of properties and facilities through financial
contracts. The agreements may include charges for services rendered.

(1)
Department of general administration:

(a)
Enter into a financing contract in the amount of $9,435,000 plus financing
expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW, to purchase an
existing office building and associated land in Yakima for use by state
agencies.

(b)
Enter into a financing contract in the amount of $4,621,000 plus financing
expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW, to purchase an
existing office building and associated land in Kelso for use by the department
of social and health services and the employment security department.

(c)
Enter into an analysis of the feasibility to develop a multi-agency office
building on state owned land in Tumwater. A financial and business plan
identifying all costs related to this project, and the sources and amounts of
all payments to cover these costs shall be submitted for review to both the
office of financial management and legislative fiscal committees.

(2)
Department of corrections:

(a)
Enter into a long-term ground lease of approximately 12 acres with purchase
option for development of the 400-bed, expandable to 600-bed Tacoma prerelease
facility for approximately $360,000 per annum.

(b)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of the department of corrections in
the amount of $21,530,500 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to acquire, construct/remodel a 400-bed,
expandable to 600-bed Tacoma prerelease facility.

(c)
Lease-develop with the option to purchase or lease-purchase approximately 200
work release beds in facilities throughout the state for $14,000,000.

(d)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of the department of corrections in
the amount of $2,300,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase or construct a correctional industries
transportation services warehouse.

(e)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of the department of corrections in
the amount of $1,450,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase or construct a lethal fence at the intensive
management unit of the penitentiary in Walla Walla.

(3)
State parks and recreation. It is the intent of the legislature that the
operating revenues of the department provide the primary source of funds
necessary to meet financing contract obligations for the projects financed
under this authority. In addition, state parks and recreation is authorized to
pledge to make payments from appropriated funds pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW:

(a)
Enter into financing contracts on behalf of state parks and recreation in the
amount of $500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to construct cabins at Cama beach.

(b)
Enter into financing contracts on behalf of state parks and recreation in the
amount of $250,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to complete improvements at the interpretive center/store at
Deception Pass.

(c)
Enter into financing contracts on behalf of state parks and recreation in the
amount of $1,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase and install additional yurts and cabins
state-wide.

(d)
Enter into financing contracts on behalf of state parks and recreation in the
amount of $500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a day use shelter at Lake Sammamish.

(e)
Enter into financing contracts on behalf of state parks and recreation in the
amount of $500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to improve campsite electrification state-wide.

(f)
Enter into financing contracts on behalf of state parks and recreation in the
amount of $750,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to develop additional campsites state-wide.

(4)
Community and technical colleges:

(a)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Green River Community College in
the amount of $1,526,150 plus financing expenses and reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for remodel of the Lindbloom student center building.

(b)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Highline Community College in the
amount of $2,070,613 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for the purchase of the Federal Way Center, currently being
leased by the college.

(c)
Enter into a financial contract on behalf of Green River Community College in
the amount of $100,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase approximately 1.5 acres of land adjacent to
the westside parking lot.

(d)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Grays Harbor Community College in
the amount of $600,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW for the purchase and remodeling of the Riverview School
and 2.83 acres of property, currently being leased by the college.

(e)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Everett Community College in the
amount of $1,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for the remodeling of the fitness center.

(f)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Tacoma Community College in the
amount of $1,697,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for a 10,000 gross square foot addition to the existing
student center.

(g)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Spokane Community College in the
amount of $3,840,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for a 20,000 gross square foot addition and remodeling to the
existing Lair student service building costing $6,000,000. The balance of
project cost will be cash from student and activity fees and enterprise funds.

(h)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Big Bend Community College in the
amount of $150,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for the exchange of 10 acres of land with Grant county.

(i)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Green River Community College in
the amount of $7,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW for purchase and development of property in the downtown
Kent area.

(j)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Columbia Basin Community College
in the amount of $1,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for a 10,000 gross square foot student services
auditorium.

(k)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Yakima Valley Community College in
the amount of $375,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW for a 2,700 gross square foot addition and remodeling to
the existing student union building costing $1,400,000. Prior to commencing,
the college shall prepare and present a business plan describing the financing
of the complete project to the state board for community and technical
colleges, the office of financial management, and the legislative fiscal
committees.

(l)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Peninsula Community College in the
amount of $2,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for a 10,000 gross square foot addition to the student union
building.

(m)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Whatcom Community College in the
amount of $2,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for a 20,000 gross square foot addition and remodeling to the
existing extended learning/work force facility costing $4,388,000. Prior to
commencing, the college shall prepare and present a business plan describing
the financing of the complete project to the state board for community and
technical colleges, the office of financial management, and the legislative
fiscal committees.

(n)
Enter into a financial contract on behalf of Green River Community College in
the amount of $350,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase Lea Hill park from King county.

(o)
Enter into a financial contract on behalf of Bellevue Community College in the
amount of $4,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for replacement of the Robinswood school. This authority is
provided in addition to the appropriation in section 755 of this act.

(p)
Enter into a financial contract on behalf of Wenatchee Valley College in the
amount of $500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase two buildings and property contiguous to the
college campus.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 903. FOR
THE ARTS COMMISSION‑-ART WORK ALLOWANCE POOLING. (1) One-half of one
percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original construction of school
plant facilities is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210. The
Washington state arts commission may combine the proceeds from individual
projects in order to fund larger works of art or mobile art displays in
consultation with the superintendent of public instruction and representatives
of school district boards.

(2)
One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original
construction or any major renovation or remodel work exceeding two hundred
thousand dollars by colleges or universities is provided solely for the
purposes of RCW 28B.10.027. The Washington state arts commission may combine
the proceeds from individual projects in order to fund larger works of art or
mobile art displays in consultation with the board of regents or trustees.

(3)
One-half of one percent of moneys appropriated in this act for original
construction of any public building by a state agency as defined in RCW
43.17.200 is provided solely for the purposes of RCW 43.17.200. The Washington
state arts commission may combine the proceeds from individual projects in
order to fund larger works of art or mobile art displays in consultation with
the state agency.

(4)
At least eighty-five percent of the moneys spent by the Washington state arts
commission during the 1999-01 biennium for the purposes of RCW 28A.335.210,
28B.10.027, and 43.17.200 shall be spent solely for direct acquisition of works
of art.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 904. The
amounts shown under the headings "Prior Biennia," "Future
Biennia," and "Total" in this act are for informational purposes
only and do not constitute legislative approval of these amounts.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 905.
"Reappropriations" in this act are appropriations and, unless the
context clearly provides otherwise, are subject to the relevant conditions and
limitations applicable to appropriations. Reappropriations shall be limited to
the unexpended balances remaining on June 30, 1999, from the 1997-99 biennial
appropriations for each project.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 906. To
carry out the provisions of this act, the governor may assign responsibility
for predesign, design, construction, and other related activities to any
appropriate agency.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 907. If
any federal moneys appropriated by this act for capital projects are not
received by the state, the department or agency to which the moneys were
appropriated may replace the federal moneys with funds available from private
or local sources. No replacement may occur under this section without the
prior approval of the director of financial management in consultation with the
senate committee on ways and means and the house of representatives capital
budget committee.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 908. (1)
Unless otherwise stated, for all appropriations under this act that require a
match of nonstate money or in-kind contributions, the following requirement,
consistent with RCW 43.88.150, shall apply: Expenditures of state money shall
be timed so that the state share of project expenditures never exceeds the
intended state share of total project costs.

(2)
Provision of the full amount of required matching funds is not required to
permit the expenditure of capital budget appropriations for phased projects if
a proportional amount of the required matching funds is provided for each
distinct, identifiable phase of the project.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 909.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, for the 1999-01 biennium,
transfers of reimbursement by the state treasurer to the general fund from the
community college capital projects account for debt service payments made under
Title 28B RCW shall occur only after such debt service payment has been made
and only to the extent that funds are actually available to the account. Any
unpaid reimbursements shall be a continued obligation against the community
college capital projects account until paid. The state board for community and
technical colleges need not accumulate any specific balance in the community
college capital projects account in anticipation of transfers to reimburse the
general fund.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 910. Any
capital improvements or capital projects involving construction or major
expansion of a state office facility, including, but not limited to, district
headquarters, detachment offices, and off-campus faculty offices, shall be
reviewed by the department of general administration for possible
consolidation, colocation, and compliance with state office standards before
allotment of funds. The intent of the requirement imposed by this section is
to eliminate duplication and reduce total office space requirements where
feasible, while ensuring proper service to the public.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 911. The
governor, through the office of financial management, may authorize a transfer
of appropriation authority provided for a capital project that is in excess of
the amount required for the completion of such project to another capital
project for which the appropriation is insufficient. No such transfer may be
used to expand the capacity of any facility beyond that intended by the
legislature in making the appropriation. Such transfers may be effected only
between capital appropriations to a specific department, commission, agency, or
institution of higher education and only between capital projects that are
funded from the same fund or account. No transfers may occur between projects
to local government agencies except where the grants are provided within a
single omnibus appropriation and where such transfers are specifically
authorized by the implementing statutes which govern the grants.

For
purposes of this section, the governor may find that an amount is in excess of
the amount required for the completion of a project only if: (1) The project
as defined in the notes to the budget document is substantially complete and
there are funds remaining; or (2) bids have been let on a project and it
appears to a substantial certainty that the project as defined in the notes to
the budget document can be completed within the biennium for less than the
amount appropriated in this act.

For
the purposes of this section, the legislature intends that each project be
defined as proposed to the legislature in the governor's budget document,
unless it clearly appears from the legislative history that the legislature
intended to define the scope of a project in a different way.

A
report of any transfer effected under this section except emergency projects or
any transfer under $250,000 shall be filed with the legislative fiscal
committees of the senate and house of representatives by the office of
financial management at least thirty days before the date the transfer is
effected. The office of financial management shall report all emergency or
smaller transfers within thirty days from the date of transfer.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 912. To
ensure that major construction projects are carried out in accordance with legislative
and executive intent, appropriations in this act referencing this section or in
excess of $5,000,000 shall not be expended until the office of financial
management has reviewed and approved the agency's predesign and other documents
and approved an allotment for the project. The predesign document shall
include but not be limited to program, site, and cost analysis in accordance
with the predesign manual adopted by the office of financial management. To
improve monitoring of major construction projects, progress reports shall be
submitted by the agency administering the project to the office of financial
management and to the fiscal committees of the house of representatives and
senate. Reports will be submitted on July 1st and December 31st each year in a
format to be developed by the office of financial management.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 913.
Allotments for appropriations shall be provided in accordance with the capital
project review requirements adopted by the office of financial management. The
office of financial management shall notify the house of representatives
capital budget committee and the senate ways and means committee of allotment
releases based on review by the office of financial management. No expenditure
may be incurred or obligation entered into for appropriations referring to this
section until the allotment of the funds to be expended has been approved by
the office of financial management. Projects that will be employing
alternative public works construction procedures, under chapter 39.10 RCW, are
subject to the allotment procedures defined in this section and RCW 43.88.110.
Contracts shall not be executed that call for expenditures in excess of the
approved allotment, and the total amount shown in such contracts for the cost
of future work that has not been appropriated shall not exceed the amount
identified for such work in the level of funding approved by the office of
financial management at the completion of predesign.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 914.
Appropriations for design and construction of facilities on higher education
branch campuses shall be expended only after funds are allotted to institutions
of higher education on the basis of: (1) Comparable unit cost standards, as
determined by the office of financial management in consultation with the
higher education coordinating board; (2) costs consistent with other higher
education teaching facilities in the state; and (3) student full-time
equivalent enrollment levels as established by the office of financial
management in consultation with the higher education coordinating board.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 915. The
department of information services shall act as lead agency in coordinating
video telecommunications services for state agencies. As lead agency, the
department shall develop standards and common specifications for leased and
purchased telecommunications equipment and assist state agencies in developing
a video telecommunications expenditure plan. No agency may spend any portion
of any appropriation in this act for new video telecommunications equipment,
new video telecommunications transmission, or new video telecommunications
systems without first complying with chapter 43.105 RCW, including but not
limited to RCW 43.105.041(2), and without first submitting a video
telecommunications equipment expenditure plan, in accordance with the policies
of the department of information services, for review and assessment by the
department of information services under RCW 43.105.052. Before any such
expenditure by a public school, a video telecommunications expenditure plan
shall be approved by the superintendent of public instruction. The office of
the superintendent of public instruction shall submit the plans to the
department of information services in a form prescribed by the department. The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall coordinate the use of
the video telecommunications in public schools by providing educational
information to local school districts and shall assist local school districts
and educational service districts in telecommunications planning and curriculum
development. Before any such expenditure by a public institution of postsecondary
education, a telecommunications expenditure plan shall be approved by the
higher education coordinating board. The higher education coordinating board
shall coordinate the use of video telecommunications for instruction and
instructional support in postsecondary education, including the review and
approval of instructional telecommunications course offerings.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 916.
Electronic copies of all completed predesigns, BEST studies, value engineering
studies, and constructability reviews performed pursuant to appropriations
contained in this act will be forwarded to the department of general
administration in a format prescribed by the department. These documents will
serve as a means to share information and lessons that may be useful in other
projects. Best practices, changes in technology and materials, new approaches
to resolving facility and construction problems, and any other useful
information will be shared among all agencies and the public through use of the
Internet.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 917. As a
management tool to reduce costs and make more effective use of resources, while
improving employee productivity and morale, agencies shall offer either
voluntary separation or downshifting incentives and options, or both, according
to procedures and guidelines established by the department of personnel and
the department of retirement systems, in consultation with the office of
financial management. The options may include, but are not limited to,
financial incentives for: Voluntary resignation and retirement, voluntary
leave-without-pay, voluntary work week or work hour reduction, voluntary
downward movement, or temporary separation for development purposes.

Agency
plans and offers shall be reviewed and monitored jointly by the department of
personnel, the office of financial management, and the department of retirement
systems.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 918. It is
the intent of the legislature that agencies may implement a voluntary
retirement incentive program that is cost neutral or results in cost savings,
provided that such a program is approved by the director of the office of
financial management. Agencies participating in this authorization are
required to submit a report by June 30, 2001, to the legislature and the office
of financial management on the outcome of their approved retirement incentive
program. The report should include information on the details of the program,
including resulting service delivery changes, agency efficiencies, the cost of
the retirement incentive per participant, the total cost to the state, and the
projected or actual net dollar and staff savings over the 1999-01 biennium.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 919. The
legislature finds that opportunities for additional student enrollment capacity
at higher education facilities can be created by increased course scheduling,
more intensive space utilization practices, and the delivery of distance
learning programs. By May 1, 2000, the institutions of higher education and the
state board for community and technical colleges shall review course scheduling
and weekly room use standards and determine if additional student capacity can
be reasonably obtained by changes in practices. Further, this review shall
include an assessment of options to increase distance learning programs as a
means to further increase student full-time equivalent capacity. The findings
of this review and the delineation of the course scheduling and weekly room use
assumptions shall be submitted to the higher education coordinating board and
the office of financial management for review and approval.

Institutions
of higher education receiving appropriations for predesign, design, or
construction of branch campus facilities in this act shall work with the higher
education coordinating board and the office of financial management to identify
options and prepare plans to increase the full-time equivalent capacity of
these projects and all future construction phases for these campuses. The goal
of these plans is to substantially increase full-time equivalent delivery
capacity above the level identified in the appropriation section. The plans
shall identify alternative program delivery strategies, options to increase use
of distance learning and technology, plans to improve space utilization, and
other recommendations to meet this goal. Branch campuses to be analyzed in
these plans include Vancouver, Tacoma, Bothell, Tri-Cities, and Spokane. The
development of these plans shall include consultation with every institution
that is planned to offer services at each site. Proposals for changes in the
facilities to be constructed in future phases shall clearly identify costs and
schedule alternatives, and currently designed construction projects shall
proceed on schedule.

Sec.
920. RCW
43.98A.040 and 1997 c 235 s 718 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Moneys appropriated for this chapter to the habitat conservation account shall
be distributed in the following way:

(a)
Not less than thirty-five percent for the acquisition and development of
critical habitat;

(b)
Not less than twenty percent for the acquisition and development of natural
areas;

(c)
Not less than fifteen percent for the acquisition and development of urban
wildlife habitat; and

(d)
The remaining amount shall be considered unallocated and shall be used by the
committee to fund high priority acquisition and development needs for critical
habitat, natural areas, and urban wildlife habitat. During the fiscal biennium
ending June 30, ((1999)) 2001, the remaining amount reappropriated
from the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 1999, may be allocated for
matching grants for riparian zone habitat protection projects that implement
watershed plans under the program established in section 329(6), chapter
235, Laws of 1997.

(2)
In distributing these funds, the committee retains discretion to meet the most
pressing needs for critical habitat, natural areas, and urban wildlife habitat,
and is not required to meet the percentages described in subsection (1) of this
section in any one biennium.

(3)
Only state agencies may apply for acquisition and development funds for
critical habitat and natural areas projects under subsection (1)(a), (b), and
(d) of this section.

(4)
State and local agencies may apply for acquisition and development funds for
urban wildlife habitat projects under subsection (1)(c) and (d) of this
section.

Sec.
921. RCW
43.98A.060 and 1997 c 235 s 719 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The committee may adopt rules establishing acquisition policies and priorities
for distributions from the habitat conservation account.

(2)
Moneys appropriated for this chapter may not be used by the committee to fund
additional staff positions or other overhead expenses, or by a state, regional,
or local agency to fund operation and maintenance of areas acquired under this
chapter, except that the committee may use moneys appropriated for this chapter
for the fiscal biennium ending June 30, ((1999)) 2001, for the
administrative costs of implementing the pilot watershed plan implementation
program established in section 329(6), chapter 235, Laws of 1997, and
developing an inventory of publicly owned lands established in section
329(7), chapter 235, Laws of 1997.

(3)
Moneys appropriated for this chapter may be used for costs incidental to
acquisition, including, but not limited to, surveying expenses, fencing, and
signing.

(4)
Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the committee may not
approve a local project where the local agency share is less than the amount to
be awarded from the habitat conservation account.

(5)
During the fiscal biennium ending June 30, ((1999)) 2000, the
committee may approve a riparian zone habitat protection project established
in section 329(6), chapter 235, Laws of 1997, where the local agency share
is less than the amount to be awarded from the habitat conservation account.

(6)
In determining acquisition priorities with respect to the habitat conservation
account, the committee shall consider, at a minimum, the following criteria:

(a)
For critical habitat and natural areas proposals:

(i)
Community support;

(ii)
Immediacy of threat to the site;

(iii)
Uniqueness of the site;

(iv)
Diversity of species using the site;

(v)
Quality of the habitat;

(vi)
Long-term viability of the site;

(vii)
Presence of endangered, threatened, or sensitive species;

(viii)
Enhancement of existing public property;

(ix)
Consistency with a local land use plan, or a regional or state-wide
recreational or resource plan; and

(x)
Educational and scientific value of the site.

(b)
For urban wildlife habitat proposals, in addition to the criteria of (a) of
this subsection:

(i)
Population of, and distance from, the nearest urban area;

(ii)
Proximity to other wildlife habitat;

(iii)
Potential for public use; and

(iv)
Potential for use by special needs populations.

(7)
Before October 1st of each even-numbered year, the committee shall recommend to
the governor a prioritized list of state agency projects to be funded under RCW
43.98A.040(1) (a), (b), and (c). The governor may remove projects from the
list recommended by the committee and shall submit this amended list in the
capital budget request to the legislature. The list shall include, but not be
limited to, a description of each project; and shall describe for each project
any anticipated restrictions upon recreational activities allowed prior to the
project.

(8)
Before October 1st of each year, the committee shall recommend to the governor
a prioritized list of all local projects to be funded under RCW
43.98A.040(1)(c). The governor may remove projects from the list recommended
by the committee and shall submit this amended list in the capital budget
request to the legislature. The list shall include, but not be limited to, a
description of each project and any particular match requirement, and describe
for each project any anticipated restrictions upon recreational activities
allowed prior to the project.

Sec.
922. RCW
43.98A.070 and 1997 c 235 s 720 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In determining which state parks proposals and local parks proposals to fund,
the committee shall use existing policies and priorities.

(2)
Moneys appropriated for this chapter may not be used by the committee to fund
additional staff or other overhead expenses, or by a state, regional, or local
agency to fund operation and maintenance of areas acquired under this chapter,
except that the committee may use moneys appropriated for this chapter for the
fiscal biennium ending June 30, ((1999)) 2000, for the
administrative costs of implementing the pilot watershed plan implementation
program established in section 329(6), chapter 235, Laws of 1997, and
developing an inventory of publicly owned lands established in section
329(7), chapter 235, Laws of 1997.

(3)
Moneys appropriated for this chapter may be used for costs incidental to
acquisition, including, but not limited to, surveying expenses, fencing, and
signing.

(4)
The committee may not approve a project of a local agency where the share
contributed by the local agency is less than the amount to be awarded from the
outdoor recreation account.

(5)
The committee may adopt rules establishing acquisition policies and priorities
for the acquisition and development of trails and water access sites to be
financed from moneys in the outdoor recreation account.

(6)
In determining the acquisition and development priorities, the committee shall
consider, at a minimum, the following criteria:

(a)
For trails proposals:

(i)
Community support;

(ii)
Immediacy of threat to the site;

(iii)
Linkage between communities;

(iv)
Linkage between trails;

(v)
Existing or potential usage;

(vi)
Consistency with an existing local land use plan or a regional or state-wide
recreational or resource plan;

(vii)
Availability of water access or views;

(viii)
Enhancement of wildlife habitat; and

(ix)
Scenic values of the site.

(b)
For water access proposals:

(i)
Community support;

(ii)
Distance from similar water access opportunities;

(iii)
Immediacy of threat to the site;

(iv)
Diversity of possible recreational uses; and

(v)
Public demand in the area.

(7)
Before October 1st of each even-numbered year, the committee shall recommend to
the governor a prioritized list of state agency projects to be funded under RCW
43.98A.050(1) (a), (c), and (d). The governor may remove projects from the
list recommended by the committee and shall submit this amended list in the
capital budget request to the legislature. The list shall include, but not be
limited to, a description of each project; and shall describe for each project
any anticipated restrictions upon recreational activities allowed prior to the
project.

(8)
Before October 1st of each year, the committee shall recommend to the governor
a prioritized list of all local projects to be funded under RCW 43.98A.050(1)
(b), (c), and (d) of this act. The governor may remove projects from the list
recommended by the committee and shall submit this amended list in the capital
budget request to the legislature. The list shall include, but not be limited
to, a description of each project and any particular match requirement, and
describe for each project any anticipated restrictions upon recreational
activities allowed prior to the project.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 923. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

(End of part)

INDEX PAGE #

CENTRAL
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY................................. 150

COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL
COLLEGE SYSTEM........................ 169

COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT...................... 4

COURT OF APPEALS................................................ 2

DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS...................................... 55

DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY.......................................... 68

DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND
WILDLIFE................................ 86

DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION........................... 22

DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH........................................... 50

DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL
RESOURCES................................ 95

DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND
HEALTH SERVICES....................... 35

DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS
AFFAIRS................................. 52

EASTERN WASHINGTON STATE
HISTORICAL SOCIETY................... 168

EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY................................. 144

HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING
BOARD........................... 110

INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR
OUTDOOR RECREATION................... 81

MILITARY DEPARTMENT............................................ 32

OFFICE OF FINANCIAL
MANAGEMENT................................. 20

OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR.......................................... 2

OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF
STATE................................ 3

SPOKANE INTERCOLLEGIATE
RESEARCH AND TECHNICAL INSTITUTE...... 161

STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION...................................... 110

STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION.................................. 84

STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE
CENTER.............................. 34

STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION.......................... 76

STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND.................................... 114

STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF..................................... 115

SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION.......................... 114

THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE................................... 157

UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON...................................... 116

WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY........................... 166

WASHINGTON STATE PATROL....................................... 108

WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY................................... 127

WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY................................. 162

--- END ---