BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART I--NEW BOND AUTHORIZATION
1999-01 BUDGET

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. For
the purpose of providing funds to finance the projects described and authorized
by the legislature in the capital and operating appropriation acts for the
1999-01 fiscal biennium only, and all costs incidental thereto, the state
finance committee is authorized to issue general obligation bonds of the state
of Washington in the sum of one billion forty-nine million two hundred fifty
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be required, to finance these
projects and all costs incidental thereto. Bonds authorized in this section
may be sold at such price as the state finance committee shall determine. No
bonds authorized in this section may be offered for sale without prior
legislative appropriation of the net proceeds of the sale of the bonds.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
proceeds from the sale of the bonds authorized in section 1 of this act shall
be deposited in the state building construction account created by RCW
43.83.020. The proceeds shall be transferred as follows:

(1)
Nine hundred sixty-seven million seven hundred seventy-one thousand dollars to
remain in the state building construction account created by RCW 43.83.020;

(2)
Twenty-five million dollars to the outdoor recreation account created by RCW
43.99.060.

(3)
Twenty-five million dollars to the habitat conservation account created by RCW
43.98A.020.

These
proceeds shall be used exclusively for the purposes specified in this section
and for the payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds
issued for the purposes of this section, and shall be administered by the
office of financial management subject to legislative appropriation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The debt-limit general fund bond retirement account shall be used for the
payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds authorized in section 2
of this act.

(2)
The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of each year, certify
to the state treasurer the amount needed in the ensuing twelve months to meet
the bond retirement and interest requirements on the bonds authorized in
section 2 of this act.

(3)
On each date on which any interest or principal and interest payment is due on
bonds issued for the purposes of section 1 of this act the state treasurer
shall withdraw from any general state revenues received in the state treasury
and deposit in the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account an amount
equal to the amount certified by the state finance committee to be due on the
payment date.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
Bonds issued under sections 1 through 3 of this act shall state that they are a
general obligation of the state of Washington, shall pledge the full faith and
credit of the state to the payment of the principal thereof and the interest
thereon, and shall contain an unconditional promise to pay the principal and
interest as the same shall become due.

(2)
The owner and holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for the owner and
holder of any of the bonds may by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding
require the transfer and payment of funds as directed in this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
legislature may provide additional means for raising moneys for the payment of
the principal of and interest on the bonds authorized in section 1 of this act,
and sections 2 and 3 of this act shall not be deemed to provide an exclusive
method for the payment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
bonds authorized in section 1 of this act shall be a legal investment for all
state funds or funds under state control and for all funds of any other public
body.

PART II--NEW BOND
AUTHORIZATION FOR WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. For
the purpose of providing funds to finance the Washington State University
Spokane Health Sciences Building project described and authorized by the
legislature in the supplemental capital and operating appropriation acts for
the 1997-99 fiscal biennium, and all costs incidental thereto, the state
finance committee is authorized to issue general obligation bonds of the state
of Washington in the sum of thirty-seven million four hundred twenty-five
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be required, to finance this
project and all costs incidental thereto. Bonds authorized in this section may
be sold at such price as the state finance committee shall determine. No bonds
authorized in this section may be offered for sale without prior legislative
appropriation of the net proceeds of the sale of bonds.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. The
proceeds from the sale of the bonds authorized in section 7 of this act shall
be deposited in the state building construction account created by RCW
43.83.020 and thirty-six million three hundred thousand dollars shall be
transferred to the state higher education construction account created by RCW
28B.10.851. These proceeds shall be used exclusively for the purposes specified
in this section and for the payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and
sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this section, and shall be
administered by the office of financial management subject to legislative
appropriation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. (1)
The nondebt-limit reimbursable bond retirement account shall be used for the
payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds authorized in section 8
of this act.

(2)
The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of each year, certify
to the state treasurer the amount needed in the ensuing twelve months to meet
the bond retirement and interest requirements on the bonds authorized in
section 8 of this act.

(3)
On each date on which any interest or principal and interest payment is due on
bonds issued for the purposes of section 8 of this act, the board of regents of
Washington State University shall cause to be paid out of Washington State
University nonappropriated local funds to the state treasurer for deposit into
the nondebt-limit reimbursable bond retirement account the amount computed in
subsection (2) of this section for bonds issued for the purposes of section 8
of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. (1)
Bonds issued under sections 7 through 9 of this act shall state that they are a
general obligation of the state of Washington, shall pledge the full faith and
credit of the state to the payment of the principal thereof and the interest
thereon, and shall contain an unconditional promise to pay the principal and
interest as the same shall become due.

(2)
The owner and holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for the owner and
holder of any of the bonds may by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding
require the transfer and payment of funds as directed in this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. The
legislature may provide additional means for raising moneys for the payment of
the principal of and interest on the bonds authorized in section 7 of this act,
and sections 8 and 9 of this act shall not be deemed to provide an exclusive
method for the payment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. The
bonds authorized in section 7 of this act shall be a legal investment for all state
funds or funds under state control and for all funds of any other public body.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. The
bonds authorized for the purposes identified in section 7 of this act are
exempt from the statutory limitations of indebtedness under RCW 39.42.060.

PART
III--NEW CONTINGENT BOND AUTHORIZATION

FOR PUBLIC
SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. For
the purpose of providing contingent funds which are not to be sold except under
certification by the director of financial management to the state finance
committee that revenues projected to be available for public school
construction will be insufficient to cover current appropriations. If these
conditions are met, these funds would be used to help finance the construction
of public schools projects described and authorized by the legislature in the
capital and operating appropriation acts for the 1999-01 fiscal biennium, and
all costs incidental thereto, the state finance committee is authorized to
issue general obligation bonds of the state of Washington in the sum of up to
forty-one million two hundred thirty-five thousand dollars, or as much thereof
as may be required, to finance this project and all costs incidental thereto.
Bonds authorized in this section may be sold at such price as the state finance
committee shall determine. No bonds authorized in this section may be offered
for sale without prior legislative appropriation of the net proceeds of the
sale of the bonds.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. The
proceeds from the sale of the bonds authorized in section 14 of this act shall
be deposited in the state building construction account created by RCW
43.83.020 and up to forty million dollars shall be transferred to the common
school construction account created by Article IX, section 3 of the state
Constitution. These proceeds shall be used exclusively for the purposes
specified in this section and for the payment of expenses incurred in the
issuance and sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this section, and
shall be administered by the office of financial management subject to legislative
appropriation

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. (1)
The debt-limit general fund bond retirement account shall be used for the
payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds authorized in section 15
of this act.

(2)
The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of each year, certify
to the state treasurer the amount needed in the ensuing twelve months to meet
the bond retirement and interest requirements on the bonds authorized in
section 15 of this act.

(3)
On each date on which any interest or principal and interest payment is due on
bonds issued for the purposes of section 15 of this act the state treasurer
shall withdraw from any general state revenues received in the state treasury
and deposit in the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account an amount
equal to the amount certified by the state finance committee to be due on the
payment date.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17. (1)
Bonds issued under sections 14 through 16 of this act shall state that they are
a general obligation of the state of Washington, shall pledge the full faith
and credit of the state to the payment of the principal thereof and the
interest thereon, and shall contain an unconditional promise to pay the
principal and interest as the same shall become due.

(2)
The owner and holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for the owner and
holder of any of the bonds may by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding
require the transfer and payment of funds as directed in this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. The
legislature may provide additional means for raising moneys for the payment of
the principal of and interest on the bonds authorized in section 14 of this
act, and sections 15 and 16 of this act shall not be deemed to provide an
exclusive method for the payment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19. The
bonds authorized in section 14 of this act shall be a legal investment for all
state funds or funds under state control and for all funds of any other public
body.

PART
IV--AMENDING 1997-99 BIENNIUM BOND AUTHORIZATION

AND
INTEREST EARNINGS PROVISIONS OF THE

STATE HIGHER
EDUCATION CONSTRUCTION ACCOUNT

Sec.
20. RCW
43.99L.010 and 1997 c 456 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

For
the purpose of providing funds to finance the projects described and authorized
by the legislature in the capital and operating appropriations acts for the
1997-99 fiscal biennium only, and all costs incidental thereto, the state
finance committee is authorized to issue general obligation bonds of the state
of Washington in the sum of ((nine hundred eighty-nine million)) one
billion thirty-four million four hundred thirty-five thousand dollars, or
as much thereof as may be required, to finance these projects and all costs
incidental thereto. Bonds authorized in this section may be sold at such price
as the state finance committee shall determine. No bonds authorized in this
section may be offered for sale without prior legislative appropriation of the
net proceeds of the sale of the bonds.

Sec.
21. RCW
43.99L.020 and 1997 c 456 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
proceeds from the sale of the bonds authorized in RCW 43.99L.010 shall be
deposited in the state building construction account created by RCW 43.83.020.
The proceeds shall be transferred as follows:

(1)
Nine hundred fifteen million dollars to remain in the state building
construction account created by RCW 43.83.020;

(2)
One million six hundred thousand dollars to the public safety reimbursable bond
account; ((and))

(3)
Forty-four million three hundred thousand dollars to the higher education
construction account created by RCW 28B.14D.040.

These
proceeds shall be used exclusively for the purposes specified in this section
and for the payment of expenses incurred in the issuance and sale of the bonds
issued for the purposes of this section, and shall be administered by the
office of financial management subject to legislative appropriation;

(4)
Twenty million dollars to the outdoor recreation account created by RCW
43.99.060; and

(5)
Twenty-two million five hundred thousand dollars to the habitat conservation
account created by RCW 43.98A.020.

Sec.
22. RCW
43.99L.030 and 1997 c 456 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The debt-limit general fund bond retirement account shall be used for the
payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds authorized in RCW
43.99L.020 (1), (3), and (4).

(2)
The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th of each year, certify
to the state treasurer the amount needed in the ensuing twelve months to meet
the bond retirement and interest requirements on the bonds authorized in RCW
43.99L.020 (1), (3), and (4).

(3)
On each date on which any interest or principal and interest payment is due on
bonds issued for the purpose of RCW 43.99L.020(1), the state treasurer shall
withdraw from any general state revenues received in the state treasury and
deposit in the debt-limit general fund bond retirement account an amount equal to
the amount certified by the state finance committee to be due on the payment
date.

Sec.
23. RCW
43.84.092 and 1997 c 218 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations
shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4)
of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the state higher education construction account, the highway
infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the
judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the
judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account,
the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account,
the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the municipal
criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the perpetual surveillance
and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement system plan I
account, the public employees' retirement system plan II account, the Puyallup
tribal settlement account, the resource management cost account, the site
closure account, the special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance
account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment
board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund
accounts, the supplemental pension account, the teachers' retirement system
plan I account, the teachers' retirement system plan II account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the
University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington
building account, the volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension principal
account, the volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension administrative
account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan I retirement account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan II
retirement account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the
Washington State University building account, the Washington State University
bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings derived from
investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent
fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their
respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the central Puget Sound public transportation account, the city
hardship assistance account, the county arterial preservation account, the
department of licensing services account, the economic development account, the
essential rail assistance account, the essential rail banking account, the
ferry bond retirement fund, the gasohol exemption holding account, the grade
crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account, the highway
bond retirement fund, the highway construction stabilization account, the
highway safety account, the marine operating fund, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the small city
account, the special category C account, the state patrol highway account, the
transfer relief account, the transportation capital facilities account, the
transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation
improvement account, the transportation revolving loan account, and the urban arterial
trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

Sec.
24. RCW
43.84.092 and 1998 c 341 s 708 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations
shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4)
of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the state higher education construction account, the highway
infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the
judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the
judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account,
the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account,
the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the municipal
criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement system
plan I account, the public employees' retirement system plan II account, the
Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource management cost account, the
site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment
board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund
accounts, the supplemental pension account, the teachers' retirement system
plan I account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan II and plan III
account, the transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust
fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of
Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension
principal account, the volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension
administrative account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan I
retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan II retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement
system combined plan II and III account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State
University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund,
and the Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal
school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific
permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to
their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under
this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the central Puget Sound public transportation account, the city
hardship assistance account, the county arterial preservation account, the
department of licensing services account, the economic development account, the
essential rail assistance account, the essential rail banking account, the
ferry bond retirement fund, the gasohol exemption holding account, the grade
crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account, the highway
bond retirement fund, the highway construction stabilization account, the
highway safety account, the marine operating fund, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the small city
account, the special category C account, the state patrol highway account, the
transfer relief account, the transportation capital facilities account, the
transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation
improvement account, the transportation revolving loan account, and the urban
arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

PART
V--OTHER

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 25. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 26. Part
headings used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 27.
Sections 1 through 19 of this act shall constitute a new chapter in Title 43
RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 28.
Section 23 of this act expires September 1, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 29. (1)
Section 24 of this act takes effect September 1, 2000.

(2) Sections 1 through 24 of this act are necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state
government and its existing public institutions, and take effect immediately.

---
END ---