BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
47.28.030 and 1984 c 194 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A
state highway shall be constructed, altered, repaired, or improved, and
improvements located on property acquired for right of way purposes may be
repaired or renovated pending the use of such right of way for highway
purposes, by contract or state forces. The work or portions thereof may be
done by state forces when the estimated costs thereof is less than ((thirty))
fifty thousand dollars and effective July 1, 2005, sixty thousand
dollars: PROVIDED, That when delay of performance of such work would
jeopardize a state highway or constitute a danger to the traveling public, the
work may be done by state forces when the estimated cost thereof is less than
((fifty)) eighty thousand dollars and effective July 1, 2005,
one hundred thousand dollars. When the department of transportation
determines to do the work by state forces, it shall enter a statement upon its
records to that effect, stating the reasons therefor. To enable a larger number
of small businesses, and minority, and women contractors to effectively compete
for ((highway)) department of transportation contracts, the
department may adopt rules providing for bids and award of contracts for the
performance of work, or furnishing equipment, materials, supplies, or operating
services whenever any work is to be performed and the engineer's estimate
indicates the cost of the work would not exceed ((fifty)) eighty
thousand dollars and effective July 1, 2005, one hundred thousand dollars.
The rules adopted under this section:

(1)
Shall provide for competitive bids to the extent that competitive sources are
available except when delay of performance would jeopardize life or property or
inconvenience the traveling public; and

(2)
Need not require the furnishing of a bid deposit nor a performance bond, but if
a performance bond is not required then progress payments to the contractor may
be required to be made based on submittal of paid invoices to substantiate
proof that disbursements have been made to laborers, materialmen, mechanics,
and subcontractors from the previous partial payment; and

(3)
May establish prequalification standards and procedures as an alternative to
those set forth in RCW 47.28.070, but the prequalification standards and
procedures under RCW 47.28.070 shall always be sufficient.

The department of transportation shall comply with such goals and
rules as may be adopted by the office of minority and women's business
enterprises to implement chapter 39.19 RCW with respect to contracts entered
into under this chapter. The department may adopt such rules as may be
necessary to comply with the rules adopted by the office of minority and
women's business enterprises under chapter 39.19 RCW.

---
END ---