BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART
I

GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES-‑OPERATING

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 101. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF AGRICULTURE

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 327,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: The
entire appropriation is provided solely for costs associated with the motor
fuel quality program, including sampling and laboratory analysis of diesel fuel
samples taken from retailers selling diesel fuel. The purpose of this testing
is to detect the possible presence of illegally-blended diesel fuel.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 102. FOR
THE JOINT
LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS COMMITTEE

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 102,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 103. FOR
THE LEGISLATIVE
EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 655,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 104. FOR
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-YEAR
2000 ALLOCATIONS

Highway
Safety Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 666,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 17,000

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 2,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 685,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The appropriations will be allocated by the office of financial
management to agencies to resolve year 2000 issues. Agencies shall submit
their estimated costs to resolve year 2000 issues to the office of financial
management.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 105. FOR
THE UTILITIES
AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION

Grade
Crossing Protective Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 222,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 106. FOR
THE STATE
PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 931,000

GENERAL
GOVERNMENT AGENCIES‑-CAPITAL

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 107. FOR
WASHINGTON STATE PARKS AND RECREATION‑-CAPITAL
PROJECTS

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation...... ... $ 5,731,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that
activity: The appropriation in this section contains $1,731,000 reappropriated
from the 1997-99 biennium.

(End of part)

PART
II

TRANSPORTATION
AGENCIES

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 201. FOR
THE WASHINGTON
TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION

Highway
Safety Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 477,000

Highway
Safety Account‑-Federal Appropriation........ $........................................... 9,038,000

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 950,000

School
Zone Safety Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 1,004,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION ...................... $ 11,469,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
$1,004,000 of the school zone safety account‑-state appropriation is
provided to fund projects in local communities to improve school zone safety,
pupil transportation safety, and student safety in school bus loading and
unloading areas.

(2)
$204,000 of the highway safety account‑-federal appropriation is provided
to fund the fatality analysis reporting system.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 202. FOR
THE BOARD
OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERS

Pilotage
Account‑-State Appropriation............... $ 289,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 203. FOR
THE COUNTY
ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD

Rural
Arterial Trust Account‑-State Appropriation.... $................................................ 72,510,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 1,546,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation................................... $ 376,000

County
Arterial Preservation Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 28,612,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 103,044,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: The
appropriations in this section contain $17,000,000 reappropriated from the
1997-99 biennium.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 204. FOR
THE TRANSPORTATION
IMPROVEMENT BOARD

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 11,800,000

Urban
Arterial Trust Account‑-State Appropriation.... $................................................ 94,180,000

Transportation
Improvement Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 114,414,000

City
Hardship Assistance Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 2,100,000

Central
Puget Sound Public Transportation Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 38,408,000

Public
Transportation Systems Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 3,088,000

Small
City Account‑-State Appropriation............. $ 17,736,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 281,726,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The appropriations in this section contain $38,272,000 reappropriated from the
1997-99 biennium.

(2)
The motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for
grants to local agencies for transportation capital projects that support the
statewide salmon recovery efforts. The transportation improvement board,
department of transportation, and the department of fish and wildlife shall
establish a competitive grant process and project selection criteria by
September 1, 1999. Eligible projects should include at a minimum fish passage
barrier removal and/or storm water mitigation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 205. FOR
THE LEGISLATIVE
TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 3,260,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 206. FOR
THE MARINE
EMPLOYEES COMMISSION

Puget
Sound Ferry Operations Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 475,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:
$119,000 of the puget sound ferry operations account‑-state appropriation
is provided solely for the marine employees commission to act as a resource for
contractual resolution of disputes between the Washington state ferries and the
inland boatman's union of the pacific.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 207. FOR
THE TRANSPORTATION
COMMISSION

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 807,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 208. FOR
THE FREIGHT
MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 600,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: The
freight mobility strategic investment board shall give first consideration for
funding to those freight mobility projects that will complete construction
prior to June 30, 2005.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 209. FOR
THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL‑-FIELD OPERATIONS
BUREAU

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 165,799,000

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-

Federal
Appropriation........................... $ 7,240,000

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-

Private/Local
Appropriation..................... $ 168,000

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 712,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 173,919,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: The
Washington state patrol is authorized to use the federal community oriented
policing program (COPS) for 36 troopers with 18 COPS troopers to begin in July
1999 and 18 COPS troopers to begin in July 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 210. FOR
THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL‑-SUPPORT
SERVICES BUREAU

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 56,933,000

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-

Federal
Appropriation........................... $ 104,000

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-

Private/Local
Appropriation..................... $ 708,000

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 101,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 57,846,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
$2,400,000 of the state patrol highway account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of a 110,000 mile pursuit, mission, and
general transportation vehicle replacement plan. This plan shall not include
light or heavy trucks and motorcycles.

(2)
$2,097,000 of the state patrol highway account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for implementation of a standardized personal computer and
technology replacement plan.

(3)
$3,093,200 of the state patrol highway account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for the continued upgrade and enhancement of the statewide
emergency communication system.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 211. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING‑-MANAGEMENT
AND SUPPORT SERVICES

Motorcycle
Safety Education Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 118,000

Wildlife
Account‑-State Appropriation............... $ 50,000

Highway
Safety Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 6,143,000

Motor
Vehicle Account--State Appropriation.......... $ 4,711,000

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 629,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 11,651,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 212. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING‑-INFORMATION
SYSTEMS

Motorcycle
Safety Education Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 104,000

Wildlife
Account‑-State Appropriation............... $ 47,000

Highway
Safety Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 4,522,000

Motor
Vehicle Account--State Appropriation.......... $ 3,678,000

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 521,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 8,872,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 213. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF LICENSING‑-VEHICLE SERVICES

Marine
Fuel Tax Refund Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 26,000

Wildlife
Account‑-State Appropriation............... $ 556,000

Motor
Vehicle Account--State Appropriation.......... $ 55,625,000

DOL
Services Account‑-State Appropriation........... $ 2,907,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION ...................... $ 59,114,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 214. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF LICENSING‑-DRIVER SERVICES

Motorcycle
Safety Education Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 1,688,000

Highway
Safety Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 71,933,000

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 5,118,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 78,739,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: $2,880,000 of the highway safety account-‑state
appropriation is provided solely for the department to enter into a contract
for the implementation of an improved state driver's license and identicard.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 215. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-HIGHWAY
MANAGEMENT AND FACILITIES‑-PROGRAM D‑-OPERATING

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 20,919,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation........ $ 400,000

Transportation
Capital Facilities Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 25,241,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 46,560,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 216. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-AVIATION‑-PROGRAM F

Aeronautics
Account‑-State Appropriation............. $...................................... 2,510,000

Aircraft
Search and Rescue Safety and

Education
Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 159,000

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 247,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 2,916,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 217. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Motorcycle
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 364,064,000

Motorcycle
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation.... $................................................ 160,000,000

Motorcycle
Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation................................... $ 26,194,000

Special
Category C Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 40,010,000

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 183,592,000

Transportation
Account‑-Federal Appropriation........ $........................................... 67,104,000

Congestion
Relief Account‑-State Appropriation...... $ 142,100,000

Puyallup
Tribal Settlement Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 7,368,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 990,432,000

The
appropriations in this section are provided for the location, design, right of
way acquisition, or construction of state highway projects designated as
improvements under RCW 47.05.030. The appropriations in this section are
subject to the following conditions and limitations and specified amounts are
provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The special category C account‑-state appropriation of $40,010,000
includes $35,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by
Z-0203.2/99. The transportation commission may authorize the use of current
revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds
for any part of the state appropriation.

(2)
$46,500,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for the state's total share, including the department of transportation,
of state interest/lead projects to be selected by the freight mobility
strategic investment board. If the board allocates funding for the State Route
519 intermodal access project from this appropriation, authorization to expend
funds for the construction of phase 1 of this project (Atlantic street
structure) is contingent upon the preservation of the future ability to utilize
any one of the currently identified optional configurations for phase 2 of this
project (Royal Brougham way structure).

(3)
$10,000,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for high priority interchange projects to include an interchange on
State Route 522 in the vicinity of the University of Washington Bothell branch
campus.

(4)
$153,900,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for Core HOV projects. Projects that complete a continuous HOV
system on Interstate 5 from Seattle to State Route 2 in Everett and State Route
16 in Tacoma, projects that complete HOV lanes on State Route 405, and projects
that complete the HOV system on State Route 167 to 15th Street SW, south of
Auburn shall be given first priority for funding.

(5)
The congestion relief account‑-state appropriation of $142,100,000
includes $85,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.843 and is provided solely for congestion relief corridor projects as
specified in Z-0264.2/99. The transportation commission may authorize the use
of current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu of
bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.

(6)
The motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation of $364,064,000 includes
$247,400,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843.
The transportation commission may authorize the use of current revenues
available to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any
part of the state appropriation.

(7)
$7,777,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for weigh in motion projects at Sea-Tac, Fort Lewis, Stanwood, Cle Elem,
and Kelso and related facilities at Cle Elem and Stanwood.

(8)
The department shall report January 1st and July 1st of each year to the
legislative transportation committee and the office of financial management on
the timing and the scope of work being performed for the regional transit
authority. This report shall provide a description of all department
activities related to the regional transit authority including investments in
state‑owned infrastructure.

(9)
The motor vehicle account‑-federal appropriation in this section is
transferrable to the transportation account to ensure efficient funds
management and program delivery.

(10)
$8,000,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for transfer to the advanced environmental mitigation revolving account‑-state.
These funds are to be used to purchase wetlands or to complete other capital
improvements that would support the statewide salmon recovery efforts.
Preference shall be given to those projects or wetlands that benefit salmonids
that are listed or proposed to be listed as threatened or endangered under the
federal endangered species act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 218. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSPORTATION
ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS‑-PROGRAM K

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 4,904,000

Transportation
Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation................................... $ 3,500,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 8,404,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 219. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE‑-PROGRAM M

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 256,056,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation........ $ 463,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local Appropriation... $................................................ 3,315,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 259,834,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
If portions of the appropriations in this section are required to fund
maintenance work resulting from major disasters not covered by federal
emergency funds such as fire, flooding, and major slides, supplemental
appropriations will be requested to restore state funding for ongoing
maintenance activities.

(2)
The department shall deliver the highway maintenance program according to the
plans for each major maintenance group to the extent practical. However, snow
and ice expenditures are highly variable depending on actual weather conditions
encountered. If extraordinary winter needs result in increased winter
maintenance expenditures, the department shall, after prior consultation with
the transportation commission, the office of financial management, and the
legislative transportation committee adopt one or both of the following courses
of action: (a) Reduce planned maintenance activities in other groups to offset
the necessary increases for snow and ice control; or (b) continue delivery as
planned within other major maintenance groups and request a supplemental
appropriation in the following legislative session to fund the additional snow
and ice control expenditures.

(3)
The department shall request an unanticipated receipt for any federal moneys received
for emergency snow and ice removal and shall place an equal amount of the motor
vehicle fund‑-state into unallotted status. This exchange shall not
affect the amount of funding available for snow and ice removal.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 220. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-PRESERVATION‑-PROGRAM P

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 237,179,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation........ $ 349,230,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local Appropriation... $................................................ 3,117,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 589,526,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 221. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-TRAFFIC
OPERATIONS‑-PROGRAM Q

State
Patrol Highway Account--State Appropriation.... $ 68,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 40,343,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation........ $ 610,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local Appropriation... $ 122,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 41,143,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amount is provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation includes $600,000 for
contracted roving service patrols. The department is directed to provide a
progress report on this program to the office of financial management and the
legislative transportation committee by December 1, 1999.

(2)
The motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation includes $4,324,000 for
state matching funds for federally selected competitive grant or congressional
earmark projects other than CVISN. These moneys shall be placed into reserve
status until such time as federal funds are secured and a state match is
required.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 222. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT‑-PROGRAM S

Puget
Sound Capital Construction Account--

State
Appropriation............................. $ 4,463,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 100,729,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation........ $ 125,000

Puget
Sound Ferry Operations Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 6,436,000

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 1,461,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 113,214,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: Up to
$500,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation may be used to
fund the activities of the blue ribbon commission on transportation. The
funding conditioned in this section shall be from revenues provided for
interjurisdictional studies.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 223. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND
RESEARCH‑-PROGRAM T

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 17,056,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation........ $ 14,971,000

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 1,371,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION ...................... $ 33,398,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 224. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES‑-PROGRAM U

(1)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL TORT CLAIMS SUPPORT

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 3,750,000

(2)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE OFFICE OF THE STATE AUDITOR

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 907,000

(3)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION FACILITIES AND
SERVICES AND CONSOLIDATED MAIL SERVICES

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 2,823,000

(4)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 2,240,000

(5)
FOR PAYMENT OF SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY PREMIUMS AND ADMINISTRATION

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 10,918,000

(6)
FOR PAYMENT OF SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY PREMIUMS AND ADMINISTRATION

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Puget Sound Ferry Operation Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 4,583,000

(7)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION CAPITAL PROJECTS

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 787,000

(8)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 315,000

(9)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION STATE PARKING
SERVICES

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 90,000

(10)
FOR PAYMENT OF THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION CAPITAL PROJECTS
SURCHARGE

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 1,100,000

(11)
FOR ARCHIVES AND RECORDS MANAGEMENT

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 342,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 225. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION‑-PROGRAM
W

Puget
Sound Capital Construction Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 121,665,000

Puget
Sound Capital Construction Account‑-

Federal
Appropriation........................... $ 30,266,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 117,600,000

Passenger
Ferry Account‑-State Appropriation........ $ 771,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 270,302,000

The
appropriations in this section are provided for improving the Washington state
ferry system, including, but not limited to, vessel acquisition, vessel
construction, major and minor vessel improvements, and terminal construction
and improvements. The appropriations in this section are subject to the
following conditions and limitations and specified amounts are provided solely
for that activity:

(1)
The appropriations in this section, unless otherwise specified, are provided to
carry out only the projects in the Washington state ferries capital program
plan - version 2. The department shall reconcile the 1997-99 capital
expenditures within ninety days of the end of the biennium and submit a final
report to the legislative transportation committee and office of financial
management.

(2)
The Puget Sound capital construction account‑-state appropriation
includes $13,190,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.60.800 for vessel and terminal acquisition, major and minor improvements,
and long lead time materials acquisition for the Washington state ferries,
including construction of new jumbo ferry vessels in accordance with the
requirements of RCW 47.60.770 through 47.60.778. The transportation commission
may authorize the use of current revenues available to the Puget Sound capital
construction account in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state
appropriation.

(3)
The motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation includes $117,600,000 in
proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843. The
transportation commission may authorize the use of current revenues available
to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of
the state appropriation.

(4)
The appropriations in this section contain $10,768,000 reappropriated from the
1997-99 biennium.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 226. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-MARINE‑-PROGRAM X

Marine
Operating Account‑-State Appropriation........ $........................................... 302,028,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The appropriation is based on the budgeted expenditure of $32,118,000 for
vessel operating fuel in the 1999-2001 biennium. If the actual cost of fuel is
less than this budgeted amount, the excess amount may not be expended. If the
actual cost exceeds this amount, the department shall request a supplemental
appropriation.

(2)
The appropriation provides for the compensation of ferry employees. The
expenditures for compensation paid to ferry employees during the 1999-2001
biennium may not exceed $203,661,000 plus a dollar amount, as prescribed by the
office of financial management, that is equal to any insurance benefit increase
granted general government employees in excess of $341.75 a month annualized
per eligible marine employee multiplied by the number of eligible marine
employees for the respective fiscal year, a dollar amount as prescribed by the
office of financial management for costs associated with pension amortization
charges, and a dollar amount prescribed by the office of financial management
for salary increases during the 1999-2001 biennium. For the purposes of this
section, the expenditures for compensation paid to ferry employees shall be
limited to salaries and wages and employee benefits as defined in the office of
financial management's policies, regulations, and procedures named under
objects of expenditure "A" and "B" (7.2.6.2).

The
prescribed salary and insurance benefit increase or decrease dollar amount that
shall be allocated from the governor's compensation appropriations is in
addition to the appropriation contained in this section and may be used to
increase or decrease compensation costs, effective July 1, 1999, and
thereafter, as established in the 1999-2001 general fund operating budget.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 227. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-PUBLIC
TRANSPORTATION AND RAIL‑-PROGRAM Y

Essential
Rail Assistance Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 85,000

High
Capacity Transportation Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ 16,789,000

Air
Pollution Control Account‑-State Appropriation... $................................................ 5,711,000

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 117,494,000

Transportation
Account‑-Federal Appropriation........ $........................................... 2,445,000

Transportation
Account‑-Private/Local Appropriation. $ 105,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 142,629,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
Up to $3,500,000 of the transportation account‑-state appropriation is
provided for the rural mobility program administered by the department of
transportation. Priority for grants provided from this account shall be given
to projects and programs that can be accomplished in the 1999-2001 biennium.

(2)
Up to $1,000,000 of the transportation account‑-state appropriation is
provided for grants that fund activities relating to coordinating special needs
transportation among state and local providers. When selecting grant
recipients, the agency council on coordinated transportation shall give
priority to projects and programs that can be accomplished in the 1999-2001
biennium.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 228. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-LOCAL PROGRAMS‑-PROGRAM Z

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 39,001,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation........ $ 3,219,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 42,220,000

The appropriations in this section are subject to the following
conditions and limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that
activity: $34,000,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation
is provided solely for the state's total share of local interest/lead projects
to be selected by the freight mobility strategic investment board.

(End of part)

PART
III

TRANSPORTATION
AGENCIES CAPITAL FACILITIES

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 301. FOR
THE WASHINGTON
STATE PATROL

Minor
Works: Preservation (00-1-004)

The
appropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-State............. $ 828,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 302. FOR
THE WASHINGTON
STATE PATROL

Field
Facilities Preservation (00-1-015)

Appropriation:

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-State............. $ 1,400,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 303. FOR
THE WASHINGTON
STATE PATROL

Thurston
County Electronic Services Facility: Construction (00-2-006)

Appropriation:

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-State............. $ 2,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 304. FOR
THE WASHINGTON
STATE PATROL

Communications
Tower Projects: Acquisition and Upgrade (00-2-016)

Appropriation:

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-State............. $ 275,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 305. The
Washington state patrol is authorized to continue with the exchange of the
Olympia, Washington Martin Way property for a light industrial land complex to
be used to consolidate existing separately located state activities and
functions. The agency will work with the office of financial management,
department of general administration, and the legislative transportation
committee in the exchange and approval processes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 306. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS)‑-CAPITAL

Transportation
Capital Facilities Account‑-

State Appropriation............................. $ 17,432,000

(End of part)

PART
IV

TRANSFERS
AND DISTRIBUTIONS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 401. FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES:
FOR BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE FUND AND
TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUE

Highway
Bond Retirement Account Appropriation........ $........................................... 211,067,000

Ferry
Bond Retirement Account Appropriation......... $ 55,317,000

Transportation
Improvement Board Bond Retirement

Account
Appropriation........................... $ 35,158,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 301,542,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity. If
Z-0020.1/99 is enacted by June 30, 1999, then $35,158,000 of the highway bond
retirement account appropriation shall lapse. If Z-0020.1/99 is not enacted by
June 30, 1999, then the appropriation for the transportation improvement board
bond retirement account shall lapse.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 402. FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES:
FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL AGENT CHARGES

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Puget Sound Capital Construction

Account
Appropriation........................... $ 66,000

Motor
Vehicle Account Appropriation.................. $.................................. 1,827,000

Special
Category C Account Appropriation............. $ 175,000

Congestion
Relief Account Appropriation............. $ 425,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 2,493,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 403. FOR
THE STATE
TREASURER‑-STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

Motor
Vehicle Fund Appropriation for

motor
vehicle fuel tax and overload

penalties
distribution.......................... $ 492,472,000

Transportation
Fund Appropriation for

motor
vehicle excise tax distribution........... $ 452,996,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 404. FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS‑-TRANSFERS

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Patrol Highway Account:

For
transfer to the Department of

Retirement
Systems Expense Fund.................. $ 170,776

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 405. STATUTORY
APPROPRIATIONS. In addition to the amounts appropriated in this
act for revenue for distribution, state contributions to the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system, and bond retirement and
interest including ongoing bond registration and transfer charges, transfers,
interest on registered warrants, and certificates of indebtedness, there is
also appropriated such further amounts as may be required or available for
these purposes under any statutory formula or under any proper bond covenant
made under law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 406. The
department of transportation is authorized to undertake federal advance
construction projects under the provisions of 23 U.S.C. Sec. 115 in order to
maintain progress in meeting approved highway construction and preservation
objectives. The legislature recognizes that the use of state funds may be
required to temporarily fund expenditures of the federal appropriations for the
highway construction and preservation programs for federal advance construction
projects prior to conversion to federal funding.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 407. FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-TRANSFERS

(1)
RV Account‑-State Appropriation:

For
transfer to the Motor Vehicle Fund‑-State........ $........................................... 1,590,000

(2)
Motor Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation:

For
transfer to the Transportation Capital

Facilities
Account‑-State....................... $ 38,639,000

(3)
Small City Account‑-State Appropriation:

For
transfer to the Transportation Improvement

Account‑-State.................................. $ 3,478,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 408. FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-STATE
REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation

for
distribution to the cities.................. $ 11,800,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation

for
distribution to the counties................ $ 11,800,000

The
distributions in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation for distribution to the
cities shall be in a manner consistent with RCW 46.68.110(4) in two equal
distributions on March 1, 2000, and March 1, 2001.

(2)
The motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation for distribution to the
counties shall be in a manner consistent with RCW 46.68.122 in two equal
distributions on March 1, 2000, and March 1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 409. The
department of transportation is authorized to transfer any balances available
in the highway construction stabilization account to the motor vehicle account
to fund the appropriations contained in this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 410. The
office of the state treasurer is authorized to transfer any transportation
improvement account and urban arterial trust account balances available in the
highway bond retirement account into the transportation improvement board bond
retirement account following a cooperative agreement by the department of
transportation and the transportation improvement board on the exact amount of
the transfer.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 411. The
motor vehicle account revenues are received at a relatively even flow
throughout the year. Expenditures may exceed the revenue during the
accelerated summer and fall highway construction season, creating a negative
cash balance during the heavy construction season. Negative cash balances also
may result from the use of state funds to finance federal advance construction
projects prior to conversion to federal funding. The governor and the
legislature recognize that the department of transportation may require
interfund loans or other short‑term financing to meet temporary seasonal
cash requirements and additional cash requirements to fund federal advance
construction projects.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 412. In
addition to such other appropriations as are made by this act, there is
appropriated to the department of transportation from legally available bond
proceeds in the respective transportation funds and accounts such amounts as
are necessary to pay the expenses incurred by the state finance committee in
the issuance and sale of the subject bonds.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 413. EXPENDITURE
AUTHORIZATIONS. The appropriations contained in this act are
maximum expenditure authorizations. Pursuant to RCW 43.88.037, moneys
disbursed from the treasury on the basis of a formal loan agreement shall be
recorded as loans receivable and not as expenditures for accounting purposes.
To the extent that moneys are disbursed on a loan basis, the corresponding
appropriation shall be reduced by the amount of loan moneys disbursed from the
treasury during the 1999-2001 biennium.

(End of part)

PART
V

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 501. As a
management tool to reduce costs and make more effective use of resources, while
improving employee productivity and morale, agencies shall offer voluntary
separation and/or downshifting incentives and options according to procedures
and guidelines established by the department of personnel and the department of
retirement systems, in consultation with the office of financial management.
The options may include, but are not limited to, financial incentives for:
Voluntary resignation and retirement, voluntary leave-without-pay, voluntary
workweek or work hour reduction, voluntary downward movement, and temporary
separation for development purposes.

Agency
plans and offers shall be reviewed and monitored jointly by the department of
personnel, office of financial management, and the department of retirement
systems.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 502. It is
the intent of the legislature that agencies may implement a voluntary
retirement incentive program that is cost neutral or results in cost savings
provided that such program is approved by the director of financial
management. Agencies participating in this authorization are required to
submit a report by June 30, 2001, to the legislature and the office of
financial management on the outcome of their approved retirement incentive
program. The report should include information on the details of the program
including resulting service delivery changes, agency efficiencies, the cost of
the retirement incentive per participant, the total cost to the state and the
projected or actual net dollar and staff savings over the 1999-2001 biennium.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 503. INFORMATION
SYSTEMS PROJECTS. Agencies shall comply with
the following requirements regarding information systems projects when
specifically directed to do so by this act.

(1)
Agency planning and decisions concerning information technology shall be made
in the context of its information technology portfolio. "Information
technology portfolio" means a strategic management approach in which the
relationships between agency missions and information technology investments
can be seen and understood, such that: Technology efforts are linked to agency
objectives and business plans; the impact of new investments on existing
infrastructure and business functions are assessed and understood before
implementation; and agency activities are consistent with the development of an
integrated, nonduplicative state-wide infrastructure.

(2)
Agencies shall use their information technology portfolios in making decisions
on matters related to the following:

(a)
System refurbishment, acquisitions, and development efforts;

(b)
Setting goals and objectives for using information technology in meeting
legislatively-mandated missions and business needs;

(c)
Assessment of overall information processing performance, resources, and
capabilities;

(d)
Ensuring appropriate transfer of technological expertise for the operation of
any new systems developed using external resources; and

(e)
Progress toward enabling electronic access to public information.

(3)
The agency shall produce a feasibility study for information technology
projects at the direction of the information services board and in accordance
with published department of information services policies and guidelines. At
a minimum, such studies shall include a statement of: (a) The purpose or
impetus for change; (b) the business value to the agency, including an
examination and evaluation of benefits, advantages, and cost; (c) a
comprehensive risk assessment based on the proposed project's impact on both
citizens and state operations, its visibility, and the consequences of doing
nothing; (d) the impact on agency and state-wide information infrastructure;
and (e) the impact of the proposed enhancements to an agency's information
technology capabilities on meeting service delivery demands.

(4)
The agency shall produce a comprehensive management plan for each project. The
plan or plans shall address all factors critical to successful completion of
each project. The plan(s) shall include, but is not limited to, the following
elements: A description of the problem or opportunity that the information
technology project is intended to address; a statement of project objectives
and assumptions; a definition and schedule of phases, tasks, and activities to
be accomplished; and the estimated cost of each phase. The planning for the
phased approach shall be such that the business case justification for a
project needs to demonstrate how the project recovers cost or adds measurable
value or positive cost benefit to the agency's business functions within each
development cycle.

(5)
The agency shall produce quality assurance plans for information technology
projects. Consistent with the direction of the information services board and
the published policies and guidelines of the department of information
services, the quality assurance plan shall address all factors critical to
successful completion of the project and successful integration with the agency
and state information technology infrastructure. At a minimum, quality
assurance plans shall provide time and budget benchmarks against which project
progress can be measured, a specification of quality assurance
responsibilities, and a statement of reporting requirements. The quality
assurance plans shall set out the functionality requirements for each phase of
a project.

(6)
A copy of each feasibility study, project management plan, and quality
assurance plan shall be provided to the department of information services, the
office of financial management, and legislative fiscal committees. The plans
and studies shall demonstrate a sound business case that justifies the
investment of taxpayer funds on any new project, an assessment of the impact of
the proposed system on the existing information technology infrastructure, the
disciplined use of preventative measures to mitigate risk, and the leveraging
of private-sector expertise as needed. Authority to expend any funds for
individual information systems projects is conditioned on the approval of the
relevant feasibility study, project management plan, and quality assurance plan
by the department of information services and the office of financial
management.

(7)
Quality assurance status reports shall be submitted to the department of
information services, the office of financial management, and legislative
fiscal committees at intervals specified in the project's quality assurance
plan.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 504. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

(End of part)

INDEX PAGE #

BOARD
OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERS................................. 3

COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION
BOARD................................ 3

DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE....................................... 1

DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING

DRIVER SERVICES................................................. 7

INFORMATION SYSTEMS............................................. 6

MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT
SERVICES................................. 6

VEHICLE SERVICES................................................ 7

DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT
SYSTEMS

TRANSFERS...................................................... 20

DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION

AVIATION--PROGRAM F............................................. 7

CHARGES FROM OTHER
AGENCIES--PROGRAM U......................... 12

HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE--PROGRAM
M................................. 10

HIGHWAY MANAGEMENT AND
FACILITIES--PROGRAM D--OPERATING......... 7

IMPROVEMENTS--PROGRAM I......................................... 8

LOCAL PROGRAMS--PROGRAM Z...................................... 15

MARINE--PROGRAM X.............................................. 14

PRESERVATION--PROGRAM P........................................ 11

PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS)......... 18

PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION AND
RAIL--PROGRAM Y...................... 15

TRAFFIC OPERATIONS--PROGRAM Q.................................. 11

TRANSPORTATION ECONOMIC
PARTNERSHIPS--PROGRAM K................ 10

TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND
SUPPORT--PROGRAM S............... 11

TRANSPORTATION PLANNING,
DATA, AND RESEARCH--PROGRAM T......... 12

WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES
CONSTRUCTION--PROGRAM W............... 13

EXPENDITURE AUTHORIZATIONS..................................... 22

FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC
INVESTMENT BOARD..................... 5

INFORMATION SYSTEMS PROJECTS................................... 23

JOINT LEGISLATIVE SYSTEMS
COMMITTEE............................. 1

LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND
ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM............... 2

LEGISLATIVE TRANSPORTATION
COMMITTEE............................ 4

MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION..................................... 4

OFFICE OF FINANCIAL
MANAGEMENT

YEAR 2000 ALLOCATIONS........................................... 2

STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION........................... 2

STATE TREASURER

BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST................................... 19

STATE REVENUES FOR
DISTRIBUTION............................ 19, 20

TRANSFERS...................................................... 20

STATUTORY APPROPRIATIONS....................................... 20

TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION....................................... 5

TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT
BOARD................................ 4

UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION
COMMISSION......................... 2

WASHINGTON STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION

CAPITAL PROJECTS................................................ 2

WASHINGTON STATE PATROL........................................ 17

FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU......................................... 5

SUPPORT SERVICES BUREAU......................................... 5

WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY
COMMISSION............................ 3

--- END ---