BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
81.80.070 and 1963 c 242 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No "common carrier," "contract carrier," or "temporary
carrier" shall operate for the transportation of property for compensation
in this state without first obtaining from the commission a permit so to do.
Permits heretofore issued or hereafter issued to any carrier, shall be
exercised by said carrier to the fullest extent so as to render reasonable
service to the public. Applications for common or contract carrier permits or extensions
thereof shall be on file for a period of at least thirty days prior to the
granting thereof unless the commission finds that special conditions require
the earlier granting thereof.

(2)
A permit or extension thereof shall be issued to any qualified applicant
therefor, authorizing the whole or any part of the operations covered by the
application, if it is found that the applicant is fit, willing, and able
properly to perform the services proposed and conform to the provisions of this
chapter and the requirements, rules and regulations of the commission
thereunder, and that such operations will be consistent with the public
interest, and, in the case of common carriers, that the same are or will be
required by the present or future public convenience and necessity, otherwise
such application shall be denied.

(3)
Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to confer upon any person
or persons the exclusive right or privilege of transporting property for
compensation over the public highways of the state.

(4)
A common carrier, contract carrier, or temporary carrier operating without the
permit required in subsection (1) of this section, or who violates a cease and
desist order of the commission issued under RCW 81.04.510, is subject to a penalty,
under the process set forth in RCW 81.04.405, of one thousand five hundred
dollars.

(5) Notwithstanding RCW 81.04.510, the commission may, in
conjunction with issuing the penalty set forth in subsection (4) of this
section, issue cease and desist orders to carriers operating without the permit
required in subsection (1) of this section, and to all persons involved in the
carriers' operations.

---
END ---