BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 46.32 RCW to read as follows:

A
person or employer operating as a motor carrier shall comply with the
requirements of the United States department of transportation federal motor
carrier safety regulations as contained in Title 49 C.F.R. Part 382, controlled
substances and alcohol use and testing. A person or employer who begins or
conducts commercial motor vehicle operations without having a controlled
substance and alcohol testing program that is in compliance with the
requirements of Title 49 C.F.R. Part 382 is subject to a penalty, under the
process set forth in RCW 46.32.100, of up to one thousand five hundred dollars
and an additional five hundred dollars for each motor vehicle driver employed
by the person or employer who is not in compliance with the motor vehicle
driver testing requirements. A person or employer having actual knowledge that
a driver has tested positive for controlled substances or alcohol who allows a
positively tested person to continue to perform a safety-sensitive function is
subject to a penalty, under the process set forth in RCW 46.32.100, of one
thousand five hundred dollars. Each violation is a separate and distinct
offense, and in the case of a continuing violation every day's continuance is a
separate and distinct violation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 81.04 RCW to read as follows:

A person or employer operating as a motor carrier shall comply with
the requirements of the United States department of transportation federal
motor carrier safety regulations as contained in Title 49 C.F.R. Part 382,
controlled substances and alcohol use and testing. A person or employer who
begins or conducts commercial motor vehicle operations without having a
controlled substance and alcohol testing program that is in compliance with the
requirements of Title 49 C.F.R. Part 382 is subject to a penalty, under the
process set forth in RCW 81.04.405, of up to one thousand five hundred dollars
and an additional five hundred dollars for each motor vehicle driver employed
by the person or employer who is not in compliance with the motor vehicle
driver testing requirements. A person or employer having actual knowledge that
a driver has tested positive for controlled substances or alcohol who allows a
positively tested person to continue to perform a safety-sensitive function is
subject to a penalty, under the process set forth in RCW 81.04.405, of one
thousand five hundred dollars. Each violation is a separate and distinct
offense, and in the case of a continuing violation every day's continuance is a
separate and distinct violation.

---
END ---