BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

Any information obtained by governmental agencies that is collected
by the use of an intelligent transportation system or any comparable
information equipment attached to a truck, tractor, or trailer is confidential
and not subject to public disclosure under this chapter. However, the
information may be given to other governmental agencies or the owners of the
truck, tractor, or trailer from which the information is obtained.

---
END ---