BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
11.108.060 and 1997 c 252 s 86 are each amended to read as follows:

For an
estate that exceeds the amount exempt from tax by virtue of the ((unified))
credit under section 2010 of the Internal Revenue Code, if taking into account
applicable adjusted taxable gifts as defined in section 2001(b) of the Internal
Revenue Code, any marital deduction gift that is conditioned upon the
transferor's spouse surviving the transferor for a period of more than six
months, is governed by the following:

(1) A
survivorship requirement expressed in the governing instrument in excess of six
months, other than survival by a spouse of a common disaster resulting in the
death of the transferor, does not apply to property passing under the marital
deduction gift, and for the gift, the survivorship requirement is limited to a
six-month period beginning with the transferor's death.

(2)
The property that is the subject of the marital deduction gift must be held in
a trust meeting the requirements of section 2056(b)(7) of the Internal Revenue
Code the corpus of which must: (a) Pass as though the spouse failed to survive
the transferor if the spouse, in fact, fails to survive the term specified in
the governing instrument; and (b) pass to the spouse under the terms of the
governing instrument if the spouse, in fact, survives the term specified in the
governing instrument.

---
END ---