BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.58.107 and 1997 c 223 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of health shall charge a fee of ((thirteen)) fifteen
dollars for certified copies of records and for copies or information provided
for research, statistical, or administrative purposes, and ((eight)) ten
dollars for a search of the files or records when no copy is made. The
department shall prescribe by regulation fees to be paid for preparing sealed
files and for opening sealed files.

No
fee may be demanded or required for furnishing certified copies of a birth,
death, fetal death, marriage, divorce, annulment, or legal separation record
for use in connection with a claim for compensation or pension pending before
the veterans administration.

The
department shall keep a true and correct account of all fees received and turn
the fees over to the state treasurer on a weekly basis.

Local
registrars shall charge the same fees as the state as hereinabove provided and
as prescribed by department regulation, except that local registrars shall
charge ((thirteen)) fifteen dollars for the first copy of a death
certificate and ((eight)) ten dollars for each additional copy of
the same death certificate when the additional copies are ordered at the same
time as the first copy. All such fees collected, except for ((five)) six
dollars of each fee for the issuance of a certified copy, shall be paid to the
jurisdictional health department.

All
local registrars in cities and counties shall keep a true and correct account
of all fees received under this section for the issuance of certified copies
and shall turn ((five)) six dollars of the fee over to the state
treasurer on or before the first day of January, April, July, and October.

Five
dollars of each fee imposed for the issuance of certified copies, except for
copies suitable for display issued under RCW 70.58.085, at both the state and
local levels shall be held by the state treasurer in the death investigations'
account established by RCW 43.79.445. One dollar of each fee imposed for
the issuance of certified copies, except for copies suitable for display issued
under RCW 70.58.085, at local levels shall be held by the state treasurer for
remittance to the department.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 70.58 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The state board of health shall adopt by rule the fees charged by the
department and local registrars for copies of vital records, including
certified copies, for searches of records where no copy is made, and for
preparing and opening sealed files.

(2)
The rules adopted by the state board of health shall include the following:

(a)
All fees collected by local registrars shall be retained by the jurisdictional
health department, except that not less than six dollars of each fee collected
by local registrars for the issuance of certified copies shall be turned over
to the state treasurer;

(b)
Not less than five dollars of each fee imposed for the issuance of certified
copies, except for copies suitable for display issued under RCW 70.58.085, at
both the state and local levels shall be held by the state treasurer in the
death investigations account established by RCW 43.79.445; and

(c)
Not less than one dollar of each fee imposed for the issuance of certified
copies, except for copies suitable for display issued under RCW 70.58.085, at
local levels shall be held by the state treasurer for remittance to the
department.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. RCW
70.58.107 (Fees charged by department and local registrars) and
1999 c ... s 1 (section 1 of this act), 1997 c 223 s 1, 1991 c 3 s 343, 1988 c
40 s 1, & 1987 c 223 s 3 are each repealed, effective July 1, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4.
Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1, 2001. The state board of health may
take necessary steps to ensure that section 2 of this act is implemented on its
effective date.

---
END ---