BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.96A.020 and 1993 c 71 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to the exceptions in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, and
unless there is another provision of law to the contrary, a person is not
disqualified from employment by the state of Washington or any of its counties,
cities, towns, municipal corporations, or quasi-municipal corporations, nor is
a person disqualified to practice, pursue or engage in any occupation, trade,
vocation, or business for which a license, permit, certificate or registration
is required to be issued by the state of Washington or any of its counties,
cities, towns, municipal corporations, or quasi-municipal corporations solely
because of a prior conviction of a felony. However, this section does not
preclude the fact of any prior conviction of a crime from being considered.

(2)
A person may be denied employment by the state of Washington or any of its
counties, cities, towns, municipal corporations, or quasi-municipal
corporations, or a person may be denied a license, permit, certificate or
registration to pursue, practice or engage in an occupation, trade, vocation,
or business by reason of the prior conviction of a felony if the felony for
which he or she was convicted directly relates to the position of employment
sought or to the specific occupation, trade, vocation, or business for which
the license, permit, certificate or registration is sought, and the time
elapsed since the conviction is less than ten years. However, for positions
in the county treasurer's office, a person may be disqualified from employment
because of a prior guilty plea or conviction of a felony involving embezzlement
or theft, even if the time elapsed since the guilty plea or conviction is ten
years or more.

(3)
A person is disqualified for any certificate required or authorized under
chapters 28A.405 or 28A.410 RCW, because of a prior guilty plea or the
conviction of a felony involving sexual exploitation of a child under chapter
9.68A RCW, sexual offenses under chapter 9A.44 RCW where a minor is the victim,
promoting prostitution of a minor under chapter 9A.88 RCW, or a violation of
similar laws of another jurisdiction, even if the time elapsed since the guilty
plea or conviction is ten years or more.

(4)
A person is disqualified from employment by school districts, educational
service districts, and their contractors hiring employees who will have
regularly scheduled unsupervised access to children, because of a prior guilty
plea or conviction of a felony involving sexual exploitation of a child under
chapter 9.68A RCW, sexual offenses under chapter 9A.44 RCW where a minor is the
victim, promoting prostitution of a minor under chapter 9A.88 RCW, or a
violation of similar laws of another jurisdiction, even if the time elapsed
since the guilty plea or conviction is ten years or more.

(5) Subsections (3) and (4) of this section only apply to a person
applying for a certificate or for employment on or after July 25, 1993.

---
END ---