BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
79.60.090 and 1988 c 128 s 74 are each amended to read as follows:

The
purchaser shall, at the time of executing the contract, deliver a performance
bond or sureties acceptable in regard to terms and amount to the department of
natural resources, but such performance bond or sureties shall not exceed ten
percent of the estimated value of the timber purchased computed at the stumpage
price and at no time shall exceed a total of fifty thousand dollars. The
purchaser shall also be required to make a cash deposit equal to twenty percent
of the estimated value of the timber purchased, computed at the stumpage bid.
Upon failure of the purchaser to comply with the terms of the contract, the
performance bond or sureties may be forfeited to the state upon order of the
department of natural resources.

At
no time shall the amount due the state for timber actually cut and removed
exceed the amount of the deposit as hereinabove set forth. The amount of the
deposit shall be returned to the purchaser upon completion and full compliance
with the contract by the purchaser, or it may, at the discretion of the
purchaser, be applied on final payment on the contract.

The purchaser must pay all taxes, including but not limited to
excise and personal property taxes that are due, or that become due, as a
result of the contract.

---
END ---