BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 9.46 RCW to read as follows:

A
bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization may conduct a recreational
gaming activity in accordance with the following restrictions:

(1)
Gambling devices used for the activity must be rented or obtained from a
licensed distributor of fund-raising event equipment or a licensee authorized
to conduct fund-raising events. This does not apply to homemade,
nonprofessional devices.

(2)
An organization conducting a recreational gaming activity may use the services
of a licensed recreational gaming contractor. A licensed recreational gaming
contractor may use paid personnel to run the gaming tables. The recreational
gaming contractor must provide services for a fixed price as agreed to between
the contractor and the sponsoring organization.

(3)
Scrip or chips having no value must be used for each activity.

(4)
The organizer of the event may charge a fee of up to five hundred dollars per
person for the opportunity to participate or enter the premises.

(5)
Participants may redeem their scrip or chips for a chance to win a prize or
prizes. All prizes must be donated to or provided by the sponsoring
organization. The value of all purchased prizes must not exceed ten percent of
the gross revenue from the recreational gaming activity. Participants may
purchase additional scrip or chips from the sponsoring organization throughout
the event.

(6)
All of the profits from the activity must be donated to a bona fide charitable
or nonprofit organization.

(7)
The activity is limited to eight hours. The director may, for good cause
shown, grant additional time.

(8)
The sponsoring organization must notify local law enforcement officials at
least ten days before the commencement of the activity, and specify the date,
time, and location of the activity.

(9) The commission may adopt rules regulating recreational gaming
activities and establishing reporting requirements.

---
END ---