BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
16.52.185 and 1994 c 261 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing
in this chapter applies to accepted husbandry practices used in the commercial
raising or slaughtering of livestock or poultry, or products ((thereof or));
to the use of animals in the normal and usual course of rodeo events; the
humane, usual, and normal use of horses in racing activities that are
authorized under chapter 67.16 RCW and that are subject to rules adopted by the
Washington horse racing commission under RCW 67.16.020; the humane, normal, and
usual use of horses, mules, or oxen, for logging, training, riding, showing, or
driving; or to the customary humane use or exhibiting of animals in
normal and usual events at fairs as defined in RCW 15.76.120.

For the purposes of this section, "humane" means
animal use that would be characterized as kind, merciful, or compassionate by a
reasonably prudent person using the animal under the same conditions.

---
END ---