BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
26.09.170 and 1997 c 58 s 910 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as otherwise provided in subsection (7) of RCW 26.09.070, the provisions
of any decree respecting maintenance or support may be modified: (a) Only as
to installments accruing subsequent to the petition for modification or motion
for adjustment except motions to compel court-ordered adjustments, which shall
be effective as of the first date specified in the decree for implementing the
adjustment; and, (b) except as otherwise provided in subsections (4), (5), (8),
and (9) of this section, only upon a showing of a substantial change of
circumstances. The provisions as to property disposition may not be revoked or
modified, unless the court finds the existence of conditions that justify the
reopening of a judgment under the laws of this state.

(2)
Unless otherwise agreed in writing or expressly provided in the decree the
obligation to pay future maintenance is terminated upon the death of either
party or the remarriage of the party receiving maintenance.

(3)
Unless otherwise agreed in writing or expressly provided in the decree,
provisions for the support of a child are terminated by emancipation of the
child or by the death of the parent obligated to support the child.

(4)
An order of child support may be modified one year or more after it has been
entered without showing a substantial change of circumstances:

(a)
If the order in practice works a severe economic hardship on either party or
the child;

(b)
If a party requests an adjustment in an order for child support which was based
on guidelines which determined the amount of support according to the child's
age, and the child is no longer in the age category on which the current
support amount was based;

(c)
If a child is still in high school, upon a finding that there is a need to
extend support beyond the eighteenth birthday to complete high school; or

(d)
To add an automatic adjustment of support provision consistent with RCW
26.09.100.

(5)
An order or decree entered prior to June 7, 1984, may be modified without
showing a substantial change of circumstances if the requested modification is
to:

(a)
Require health insurance coverage for a child named therein; or

(b)
Modify an existing order for health insurance coverage.

(6)
An obligor's voluntary unemployment or voluntary underemployment, by itself, is
not a substantial change of circumstances.

(7)
The department of social and health services may file an action to modify an
order of child support if public assistance money is being paid to or for the
benefit of the child and the child support order is twenty-five percent or more
below the appropriate child support amount set forth in the standard
calculation as defined in RCW 26.19.011 and reasons for the deviation are not
set forth in the findings of fact or order. The determination of twenty-five
percent or more shall be based on the current income of the parties and the
department shall not be required to show a substantial change of circumstances
if the reasons for the deviations were not set forth in the findings of fact or
order.

(8)(a)
All child support decrees may be adjusted once every twenty-four months based
upon changes in the income of the parents without a showing of substantially
changed circumstances. Either party may initiate the adjustment by filing a
motion and child support worksheets.

(b)
A party may petition for modification in cases of substantially changed
circumstances under subsection (1) of this section at any time. However, if
relief is granted under subsection (1) of this section, twenty-four months must
pass before a motion for an adjustment under (a) of this subsection may be
filed.

(c)
If, pursuant to (a) of this subsection or subsection (9) of this section, the
court adjusts or modifies a child support obligation by more than thirty
percent and the change would cause significant hardship, the court may
implement the change in two equal increments, one at the time of the entry of
the order and the second six months from the entry of the order. Twenty-four
months must pass following the second change before a motion for an adjustment
under (a) of this subsection may be filed.

(d)
A parent who is receiving transfer payments who receives a wage or salary
increase may not bring a modification action pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section alleging that increase constitutes a substantial change of
circumstances.

(e)
The department of social and health services may file an action at any time to
modify an order of child support in cases of substantially changed
circumstances if public assistance money is being paid to or for the benefit of
the child. The determination of the existence of substantially changed
circumstances by the department that lead to the filing of an action to modify
the order of child support is not binding upon the court.

(9)
An order of child support may be adjusted twenty-four months from the date of
the entry of the decree or the last adjustment or modification, whichever is
later, based upon changes in the economic table or standards in chapter 26.19
RCW.

(10)
Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter, an order of child support
may be temporarily adjusted at any time upon a showing that the responsible
parent is: (a) Participating in a substance abuse treatment program that
precludes employment; (b) incarcerated; (c) participating in a strike at the
workplace at which the individual is employed; (d) locked out by his or her
employer at the workplace at which the individual is employed; or (e)
involuntarily unemployed for reasons other than misconduct at the workplace.
Either party may initiate the temporary adjustment by filing a motion and child
support worksheets.

For
the purposes of this subsection, "temporarily adjusted" means for a
period no longer than necessary to return to work or find new employment. It
is the duty of the responsible parent to report reemployment or a return to
work to the court within seven days. Failure to report reemployment or a
return to work to the court within seven days shall constitute contempt of
court.

Upon
reemployment or return to work, new child support worksheets shall accompany
the notice to the court. The court shall recalculate the child support amount
and enter a new child support order. The new child support amount applies
retroactively to the date the responsible parent was reemployed or returned to
work.

Nothing in this subsection shall diminish, suspend, or otherwise
affect the responsible parent's duty to provide child support due prior to
entry of the temporary adjustment.

---
END ---