BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
15.54.340 and 1998 c 36 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any commercial fertilizer distributed in this state shall have placed on or
affixed to the package a label setting forth in clearly legible and conspicuous
form the following information:

(a)
The net weight;

(b)
The product name, brand, and grade. The grade is not required if no primary
nutrients are claimed;

(c)
The guaranteed analysis;

(d)
The name and address of the registrant or licensee. The name and address of
the manufacturer, if different from the registrant or licensee, may also be
stated;

(e)
Any information required under WAC 296-62-054;

(f)
(i) For products labeled by July 1, 1999, at a minimum, the following
labeling statement: (("This product has been registered with the
Washington State Department of Agriculture. When applied as directed, this
fertilizer meets the Washington standards for arsenic, cadmium, cobalt,
mercury, molybdenum, lead, nickel, selenium, and zinc. You have the right to
receive specific information about Washington standards from the distributor of
this product.";

(g)
After July 1, 1999, the label must also state:))
"Information received by the Washington State Department of Agriculture
regarding the components in this product is available on the internet at
http://www.wa.gov/agr/((.))";

(ii)
For products not labeled by July 1, 1999, and for all products after July 1,
2000, at a minimum, the following statement: "Information regarding the
levels of metals in this product is available on the internet at
http://www.wa.gov/agr/"; and

(((h)))
(g) Other information as required by the department by rule.

(2)
If a commercial fertilizer is distributed in bulk, a written or printed statement
of the information required by subsection (1) of this section shall accompany
delivery and be supplied to the purchaser at the time of delivery.

(3)
Each delivery of a customer-formula fertilizer shall be subject to containing
those ingredients specified by the purchaser, which ingredients shall be shown
on the statement or invoice with the amount contained therein, and a record of
all invoices of customer-formula grade mixes shall be kept by the registrant or
licensee for a period of twelve months and shall be available to the department
upon request: PROVIDED, That each such delivery shall be accompanied by either
a statement, invoice, a delivery slip, or a label if bagged, containing the
following information: The net weight; the brand; the guaranteed analysis
which may be stated to the nearest tenth of a percent or to the next lower
whole number; the name and address of the registrant or licensee, or
manufacturer, or both; and the name and address of the purchaser.

(((4)
Any person who distributes a commercial fertilizer in this state shall make
available to the purchaser on request, a copy of standards for metals
established in RCW 15.54.800.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. By
January 1, 2000, the department of agriculture shall establish guidelines
recommending the size of the type for the label requirement in RCW
15.54.340(1)(f).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 15.54 RCW to read as follows:

Specialty
fertilizers are exempt from the labeling requirements in RCW 15.54.340(1)(f) if
there is a label setting forth in clearly legible and conspicuous form the
registrant's or licensee's website placed on or affixed to the package. In
order to qualify for this exemption, the website must also have a hypertext
link to http://www.wa.gov/agr and contain a statement that information on the
metal content of the product is available on that website.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---