BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature intends to improve student safety by helping school districts
revise and update their crisis and emergency plans and by providing additional
training to staff in the implementation of those plans. The legislature finds
that all-hazard crisis planning will prevent catastrophic events from
escalating into school-wide chaos, will minimize damage, and will help
students, staff, and parents recover from the crisis.

Sec.
2. RCW
28A.305.130 and 1997 c 13 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to any other powers and duties as provided by law, the state board of
education shall:

(1)
Approve or disapprove the program of courses leading to teacher, school administrator,
and school specialized personnel certification offered by all institutions of
higher education within the state which may be accredited and whose graduates
may become entitled to receive such certification.

(2)
Conduct every five years a review of the program approval standards, including
the minimum standards for teachers, administrators, and educational staff
associates, to reflect research findings and assure continued improvement of
preparation programs for teachers, administrators, and educational staff
associates.

(3)
Investigate the character of the work required to be performed as a condition
of entrance to and graduation from any institution of higher education in this
state relative to such certification as provided for in subsection (1) ((above))
of this section, and prepare a list of accredited institutions of higher
education of this and other states whose graduates may be awarded such
certificates.

(4)(a)
The state board of education shall adopt rules to allow a teacher certification
candidate to fulfill, in part, teacher preparation program requirements through
work experience as a classified teacher's aide in a public school or private
school meeting the requirements of RCW 28A.195.010. The rules shall include,
but are not limited to, limitations based upon the recency of the teacher
preparation candidate's teacher aide work experience, and limitations based on
the amount of work experience that may apply toward teacher preparation program
requirements under this chapter.

(b)
The state board of education shall require that at the time of the individual's
enrollment in a teacher preparation program, the supervising teacher and the
building principal shall jointly provide to the teacher preparation program of
the higher education institution at which the teacher candidate is enrolled, a
written assessment of the performance of the teacher candidate. The assessment
shall contain such information as determined by the state board of education
and shall include: Evidence that at least fifty percent of the candidate's
work as a classified teacher's aide was involved in instructional activities
with children under the supervision of a certificated teacher and that the
candidate worked a minimum of six hundred thirty hours for one school year; the
type of work performed by the candidate; and a recommendation of whether the
candidate's work experience as a classified teacher's aide should be
substituted for teacher preparation program requirements. In compliance with
such rules as may be established by the state board of education under this
section, the teacher preparation programs of the higher education institution
where the candidate is enrolled shall make the final determination as to what
teacher preparation program requirements may be fulfilled by teacher aide work
experience.

(5)
Supervise the issuance of such certificates as provided for in subsection (1)
((above)) of this section and specify the types and kinds of
certificates necessary for the several departments of the common schools by
rule ((or regulation)) in accordance with RCW 28A.410.010.

(6)
Accredit, subject to such accreditation standards and procedures as may be
established by the state board of education, all schools that apply for
accreditation, and approve, subject to the provisions of RCW 28A.195.010,
private schools carrying out a program for any or all of the grades
kindergarten through twelve: PROVIDED, That no private school may be approved
that operates a kindergarten program only: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no public or
private schools shall be placed upon the list of accredited schools so long as
secret societies are knowingly allowed to exist among its students by school
officials: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the state board may elect to require all or
certain classifications of the public schools to conduct and participate in
such preaccreditation examination and evaluation processes as may now or
hereafter be established by the board.

(7)
Make rules ((and regulations)) governing the establishment in any existing
nonhigh school district of any secondary program or any new grades in grades
nine through twelve. Before any such program or any new grades are established
the district must obtain prior approval of the state board.

(8)
Prepare such outline of study for the common schools as the board shall deem
necessary, and prescribe such rules for the general government of the common
schools, as shall seek to secure regularity of attendance, prevent truancy,
secure efficiency, and promote the true interest of the common schools.

(9)
Continuously reevaluate courses and adopt and enforce ((regulations)) rules
within the common schools so as to meet the educational needs of students and
articulate with the institutions of higher education and unify the work of the public
school system.

(10)
Carry out board powers and duties relating to the organization and
reorganization of school districts under chapters 28A.315, 28A.323, and
28A.343 RCW ((28A.315.010 through 28A.315.680 and 28A.315.900)).

(11)
By rule ((or regulation promulgated)) adopted upon the advice of
the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire
protection, and in consultation with the superintendent of public
instruction and the state military department, provide for the development
by school districts and schools of comprehensive all-hazard crisis and
emergency plans. The rules must require the plans to:

(a)
Include how to prepare for, manage, and evaluate site-based responses to school
crises, including but not limited to natural disasters and violent acts or
serious injuries or death of students or staff;

(b)
Provide for instruction of pupils in the public and private schools
carrying out a K through 12 program, or any part thereof, so that in case of
sudden crisis or emergency they shall be able to leave their particular
school building in the shortest possible time or take such other steps as the
particular emergency demands((, and)) without confusion or panic; ((such
rules and regulations shall be published and distributed to certificated
personnel throughout the state whose duties shall include a familiarization
therewith as well as the means of implementation thereof at their particular
school))

(c)
Be updated by school districts and schools at least once every five years or
more frequently if circumstances change;

(d)
Be developed by school districts in consultation with local law enforcement,
fire, emergency medical services, and emergency management agencies;

(e)
Include who to contact in an emergency;

(f)
Include procedures for leaving a building safely;

(g)
Include procedures for responding to an emergency;

(h)
Include procedures for training students and certificated and classified staff;

(i)
Include procedures for practicing the plan; and

(j)
Include procedures for notifying certificated and classified staff about the
plan.

(12)
Hear and decide appeals as otherwise provided by law.

The
state board of education is given the authority to promulgate information and
rules dealing with the prevention of child abuse for purposes of curriculum use
in the common schools.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.305 RCW to read as follows:

(1) The comprehensive all-hazard crisis and emergency plan
development assistance program is created. The superintendent of public
instruction shall administer the program to provide funds, to the extent funds
are appropriated, to school districts to update the crisis and emergency
response plan for every school in their district and to train staff in the
implementation of the plans. The superintendent of public instruction shall
provide funds to school districts based upon the district developing an
effective plan for updating and implementing its comprehensive all-hazard crisis
and emergency response plan. The funds shall be used for developing the plan,
staff training on implementing the plan, materials, and practicing the plan.
In distributing funds to school districts, priority shall be given to school
districts that have not received funds for crisis planning.

---
END ---