BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.195 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature finds additional safeguards are necessary to ensure safety of
school children attending private schools in the state of Washington. In order
to ensure this goal, private schools approved under this chapter shall require
that all employees who have regularly scheduled unsupervised access to children
who apply for employment on or after July 1, 1999, undergo a record check
through the Washington state patrol criminal identification system under RCW
43.43.830 through 43.43.838, 10.97.030, and 10.97.050 and through the federal
bureau of investigation. The record check shall include a fingerprint check
using a complete Washington state criminal identification fingerprint card.
Employee applicants who have completed a record check in accordance with RCW
28A.410.010 are not required to undergo the record check required by this
section. The superintendent of public instruction shall provide a copy of the
record report to the applicant. Once an applicant has a record check as
required under this section, additional record checks shall not be required of
the applicant unless required by other provisions of law.

(2)
The approved private school or the applicant shall pay the costs associated
with the record check required in this section.

(3)
When necessary, applicants may be employed on a conditional basis pending
completion of the investigation. If the applicant has had a record check
within the previous two years, the approved private school or contractor may
waive the requirement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---