BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28B.15.620 and 1995 c 349 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature finds that military and naval veterans who have served their
country in wars on foreign soil have risked their own lives to defend both the
lives of all Americans and the freedoms that define and distinguish our
nation. The legislature also finds that veterans of the Vietnam conflict
suffered during and after the war as the country anguished over its involvement
in the conflict. It is the intent of the legislature to honor Vietnam veterans
for the public service they have provided to their country. It is the further
intent of the legislature that, for eligible Vietnam veterans, colleges and
universities waive tuition and fee increases that have occurred since October
1, 1977.

(2)
Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state
universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the
community colleges may exempt veterans of the Vietnam conflict who have served
in the southeast Asia theater of operations from the payment of all or a portion
of any increase in tuition and fees that occur after October 1, 1977, if the
veteran qualifies as a resident student under RCW 28B.15.012.

(3)
For the purposes of this section, "veterans of the Vietnam conflict"
shall be those persons who have been on active federal service as a member of
the armed military or naval forces of the United States between a period
commencing August 5, 1964, and ending on May 7, 1975.

(((4)
This section shall expire June 30, 1999.))

Sec.
2. RCW
28B.15.628 and 1996 c 169 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature finds that military and naval veterans who have served their
country in wars on foreign soil have risked their own lives to defend both the
lives of all Americans and the freedoms that define and distinguish our
nation. It is the intent of the legislature to honor Persian Gulf combat zone
veterans for the public service they have provided to their country. It is the
further intent of the legislature that, for eligible Persian Gulf combat zone
veterans, institutions of higher education waive tuition and fee increases that
have occurred after the 1990-91 academic year.

(2)
Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state
universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the
community colleges may exempt veterans of the Persian Gulf combat zone from all
or a portion of increases in tuition and fees that occur after the 1990‑91
academic year, if the veteran could have qualified as a Washington resident
student under RCW 28B.15.012(2), had he or she been enrolled as a student on
August 1, 1990.

(3)
For the purposes of this section, "a veteran of the Persian Gulf combat
zone" means a person who served on active duty in the armed forces of the
United States during any portion of the 1991 calendar year in the Persian Gulf
combat zone as designated by executive order of the president of the United
States.

(((4)
This section expires June 30, 1999.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW to read as follows:

Technical
colleges are encouraged to provide veterans of the Vietnam conflict as defined
in RCW 28B.15.620 and veterans of the Persian Gulf combat zone as defined in
RCW 28B.15.628 with tuition waivers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---