BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
Podiatric physicians and surgeons are well-trained, well-educated, and required
to take postgraduate training to be licensed in Washington. They are
well-suited to become physician assistants. The growing older population of
citizens is particularly well-served by having access to these well-trained
providers. The legislature finds that by providing for the licensure and supervision
of podiatric physicians and surgeons by physicians as physician assistants, the
health and welfare of our citizens will be improved and access to preventative
health care will be increased.

Sec.
2. RCW
18.71A.010 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 318 are each amended to read as follows:

The
definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Physician assistant" means: (a) A person who is licensed by
the commission to practice medicine to a limited extent only under the
supervision of a physician as defined in chapter 18.71 RCW and who is
academically and clinically prepared to provide health care services and
perform diagnostic, therapeutic, preventative, and health maintenance services;
and (b) a person who is currently licensed as a podiatric physician and surgeon
as defined in chapter 18.22 RCW and who is licensed by the commission to
practice medicine to a limited extent only under the supervision of a physician
licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW.

(2)
"Commission" means the medical quality assurance commission.

(3)
"Practice medicine" has the meaning defined in RCW 18.71.011.

(4)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.

(5)
"Department" means the department of health.

Sec.
3. RCW
18.71A.020 and 1998 c 132 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The commission shall adopt rules fixing the qualifications and the educational
and training requirements for licensure as a physician assistant or for those
enrolled in any physician assistant training program. The requirements shall
include completion of an accredited physician assistant training program
approved by the commission and eligibility to take an examination approved by
the commission, if the examination tests subjects substantially equivalent to
the curriculum of an accredited physician assistant training program.
Physician assistants licensed by the board of medical examiners as of June 7,
1990, shall continue to be licensed. No additional training either
academically or clinically shall be required of a person currently licensed as
a podiatric physician and surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW to become a physician
assistant under this chapter.

(2)(a)
The commission shall adopt rules governing the extent to which:

(i)
Physician assistant students may practice medicine during training; and

(ii)
Physician assistants may practice after successful completion of a physician
assistant training course.

(b)
Such rules shall provide:

(i)
That the practice of a physician assistant shall be limited to the performance
of those services for which he or she is trained; and

(ii)
That each physician assistant shall practice medicine only under the
supervision and control of a physician licensed in this state, but such
supervision and control shall not be construed to necessarily require the
personal presence of the supervising physician or physicians at the place where
services are rendered.

(3)
Applicants for licensure shall file an application with the commission on a
form prepared by the secretary with the approval of the commission, detailing
the education, training, and experience of the physician assistant and such
other information as the commission may require. The application shall be
accompanied by a fee determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250
and 43.70.280. A surcharge of twenty-five dollars per year shall be charged on
each license renewal or issuance of a new license to be collected by the
department and deposited into the impaired physician account for physician
assistant participation in the impaired physician program. Each applicant
shall furnish proof satisfactory to the commission of the following:

(a)
That the applicant has completed an accredited physician assistant program
approved by the commission, or that the applicant is licensed as a podiatric
physician and surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW, and the applicant is
eligible to take the examination approved by the commission;

(b)
That the applicant is of good moral character; and

(c)
That the applicant is physically and mentally capable of practicing medicine as
a physician assistant with reasonable skill and safety. The commission may
require an applicant to submit to such examination or examinations as it deems
necessary to determine an applicant's physical or mental capability, or both,
to safely practice as a physician assistant.

(4)
The commission may approve, deny, or take other disciplinary action upon the
application for license as provided in the Uniform Disciplinary Act, chapter
18.130 RCW. The license shall be renewed as determined under RCW 43.70.250 and
43.70.280. The commission may authorize the use of alternative supervisors who
are licensed either under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW.

Sec.
4. RCW
18.71A.060 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 324 are each amended to read as follows:

No
health care services may be performed under this chapter in any of the
following areas:

(1)
The measurement of the powers or range of human vision, or the determination of
the accommodation and refractive state of the human eye or the scope of its
functions in general, or the fitting or adaptation of lenses or frames for the
aid thereof.

(2)
The prescribing or directing the use of, or using, any optical device in
connection with ocular exercises, visual training, vision training, or
orthoptics.

(3)
The prescribing of contact lenses for, or the fitting or adaptation of contact
lenses to, the human eye.

(4)
Nothing in this section shall preclude the performance of routine visual
screening.

(5)
The practice of dentistry or dental hygiene as defined in chapters 18.32 and
18.29 RCW respectively. The exemptions set forth in RCW 18.32.030 (1) and (8),
shall not apply to a physician assistant.

(6)
The practice of chiropractic as defined in chapter 18.25 RCW including the
adjustment or manipulation of the articulations of the spine.

(7)
The practice of podiatric medicine and surgery as defined in chapter 18.22 RCW unless
the physician assistant is licensed as a podiatric physician and surgeon under
chapter 18.22 RCW.

Sec.
5. RCW
18.57A.010 and 1979 c 117 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
"Osteopathic physician's assistant" means: (a) A person who
has satisfactorily completed a board-approved training program designed to
prepare persons to practice osteopathic medicine to a limited extent; and
(b) a person who is currently licensed as a podiatric physician and surgeon as
defined in chapter 18.22 RCW and who is licensed by the commission to practice
medicine to a limited extent only under the supervision of an osteopathic
physician licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW;

(2)
"Board" means the board of osteopathic medicine and surgery; and

(3) "Practice medicine" shall have the meaning defined in
RCW 18.57.001.

Sec.
6. RCW
18.57A.020 and 1998 c 132 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The board shall adopt rules fixing the qualifications and the educational and
training requirements for licensure as an osteopathic physician assistant or
for those enrolled in any physician assistant training program. The
requirements shall include completion of an accredited physician assistant
training program approved by the board and eligibility to take an examination
approved by the board, providing such examination tests subjects substantially
equivalent to the curriculum of an accredited physician assistant training
program. No additional training either academically or clinically shall be
required of a person currently licensed as a podiatric physician and surgeon
under chapter 18.22 RCW to become an osteopathic physician's assistant under
this chapter.

(2)(a)
The board shall adopt rules governing the extent to which:

(i)
Physician assistant students may practice medicine during training; and

(ii)
Physician assistants may practice after successful completion of a training
course.

(b)
Such rules shall provide:

(i)
That the practice of an osteopathic physician assistant shall be limited to the
performance of those services for which he or she is trained; and

(ii)
That each osteopathic physician assistant shall practice osteopathic medicine
only under the supervision and control of an osteopathic physician licensed in
this state, but such supervision and control shall not be construed to
necessarily require the personal presence of the supervising physicians at the
place where services are rendered. The board may authorize the use of
alternative supervisors who are licensed either under chapter 18.57 or 18.71
RCW.

(3)
Applicants for licensure shall file an application with the board on a form
prepared by the secretary with the approval of the board, detailing the
education, training, and experience of the physician assistant and such other
information as the board may require. The application shall be accompanied by a
fee determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. A
surcharge of twenty-five dollars per year may be charged on each license
renewal or issuance of a new license to be collected by the department of
health for physician assistant participation in an impaired practitioner
program. Each applicant shall furnish proof satisfactory to the board of the
following:

(a)
That the applicant has completed an accredited physician assistant program
approved by the board, or that the applicant is licensed as a podiatric
physician and surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW, and the applicant is
eligible to take the examination approved by the board;

(b)
That the applicant is of good moral character; and

(c)
That the applicant is physically and mentally capable of practicing osteopathic
medicine as an osteopathic physician assistant with reasonable skill and
safety. The board may require any applicant to submit to such examination or
examinations as it deems necessary to determine an applicant's physical and/or
mental capability to safely practice as an osteopathic physician assistant.

(4)
The board may approve, deny, or take other disciplinary action upon the
application for a license as provided in the uniform disciplinary act, chapter
18.130 RCW. The license shall be renewed as determined under RCW 43.70.250 and
43.70.280.

Sec.
7. RCW
18.57A.060 and 1973 c 77 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

No
health care services may be performed under this chapter in any of the
following areas:

(1)
The measurement of the powers or range of human vision, or the determination of
the accommodation and refractive state of the human eye or the scope of its
functions in general, or the fitting or adaptation of lenses or frames for the
aid thereof.

(2)
The prescribing or directing the use of, or using, any optical device in
connection with ocular exercises, visual training, vision training or
orthoptics.

(3)
The prescribing of contact lenses for, or the fitting or adaptation of contact
lenses to, the human eye.

(4)
Nothing in this section shall preclude the performance of routine visual
screening.

(5)
The practice of dentistry or dental hygiene as defined in chapter 18.32 and
18.29 RCW respectively. The exemptions set forth in RCW 18.32.030, paragraphs
(1) and (8), shall not apply to a physician's assistant.

(6)
The practice of chiropractic as defined in chapter 18.25 RCW including the
adjustment or manipulation of the articulations of the spine.

(7)
The practice of ((podiatry)) podiatric medicine and surgery as
defined in chapter 18.22 RCW unless the osteopathic physician's assistant is
licensed as a podiatric physician and surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW.

Sec.
8. RCW
18.22.035 and 1990 c 147 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A podiatric physician and surgeon is responsible for the quality of podiatric
care.

(2)
The practice of podiatric medicine and surgery is the diagnosis and the
medical, surgical, mechanical, manipulative, and electrical treatments of
ailments of the human foot.

(3)
Podiatric physicians and surgeons may issue prescriptions valid at any pharmacy
for any drug, including narcotics, necessary in the practice of podiatry.

(4)
Podiatrists shall not:

(a)
Amputate the foot;

(b)
Administer spinal anesthetic or any anesthetic that renders the patient
unconscious; or

(c)
Treat systemic conditions, except as authorized under chapter 18.71A or
18.57A RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. A
new section is added to chapter 18.71A RCW to read as follows:

From
2000 through 2004, the commission shall report to the legislature each December
on the number of podiatric physicians and surgeons who apply and the number who
are licensed as physician assistants.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. A
new section is added to chapter 18.57A RCW to read as follows:

From 2000 through 2004, the board shall report to the legislature
each December on the number of podiatric physicians and surgeons who apply and
the number who are licensed as osteopathic physicians' assistants.

---
END ---