BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.52.065 and 1991 sp.s. c 31 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to the limitations in RCW 84.55.010, in each year the state shall levy
for collection in the following year for the support of common schools of the
state a tax ((of three dollars and sixty cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value)) at the rate specified in subsection (2) of this section
upon the assessed valuation of all taxable property within the state adjusted
to the state equalized value in accordance with the indicated ratio fixed by
the state department of revenue.

(2)
The rate of state tax in subsection (1) of this section shall be as follows:

(a)
Three dollars and sixty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value for taxes
levied for collection in 1999, and before;

(b)
Three dollars per thousand dollars of assessed value for taxes levied for
collection in 2000;

(c)
Two dollars and seventy cents per thousand dollars of assessed value for taxes
levied for collection in 2001;

(d)
Two dollars and forty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value for taxes
levied for collection in 2002;

(e)
Two dollars and ten cents per thousand dollars of assessed value for taxes
levied for collection in 2003;

(f)
One dollar and eighty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value for taxes
levied for collection in 2004;

(g)
One dollar and fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value for taxes
levied for collection in 2005;

(h)
One dollar and twenty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value for taxes
levied for collection in 2006;

(i)
Ninety cents per thousand dollars of assessed value for taxes levied for
collection in 2007;

(j)
Sixty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value for taxes levied for
collection in 2008;

(k)
Thirty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value for taxes levied for
collection in 2009; and

(l)
No tax may be levied under this section for taxes levied for collection in 2010
and thereafter.

(3)
As used in this section, "the support of common schools" includes the
payment of the principal and interest on bonds issued for capital construction
projects for the common schools.

Sec.
2. RCW
84.52.043 and 1995 c 99 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Within
and subject to the limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 as amended, the regular
ad valorem tax levies upon real and personal property by the taxing districts
hereafter named shall be as follows:

(1)
Levies of the senior taxing districts shall be as follows: (a) The levy by the
state shall not exceed ((three dollars and sixty cents)) the dollar
rate per thousand dollars of assessed value specified in RCW 84.52.065
adjusted to the state equalized value in accordance with the indicated ratio
fixed by the state department of revenue to be used exclusively for the support
of the common schools; (b) the levy by any county shall not exceed one dollar
and eighty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value; (c) the levy by any
road district shall not exceed two dollars and twenty-five cents per thousand
dollars of assessed value; and (d) the levy by any city or town shall not
exceed three dollars and thirty-seven and one-half cents per thousand dollars
of assessed value. However any county is hereby authorized to increase its
levy from one dollar and eighty cents to a rate not to exceed two dollars and
forty-seven and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed value for
general county purposes if the total levies for both the county and any road
district within the county do not exceed four dollars and five cents per
thousand dollars of assessed value, and no other taxing district has its levy
reduced as a result of the increased county levy.

(2)
The aggregate levies of junior taxing districts and senior taxing districts,
other than the state, shall not exceed five dollars and ninety cents per
thousand dollars of assessed valuation. The term "junior taxing
districts" includes all taxing districts other than the state, counties,
road districts, cities, towns, port districts, and public utility districts.
The limitations provided in this subsection shall not apply to: (a) Levies at
the rates provided by existing law by or for any port or public utility district;
(b) excess property tax levies authorized in Article VII, section 2 of the
state Constitution; (c) levies for acquiring conservation futures as authorized
under RCW 84.34.230; (d) levies for emergency medical care or emergency medical
services imposed under RCW 84.52.069; (e) levies to finance affordable housing
for very low-income housing imposed under RCW 84.52.105; and (f) the portions
of levies by metropolitan park districts that are protected under RCW
84.52.120.

Sec.
3. RCW
84.52.050 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 194 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as hereinafter provided, the aggregate of all tax levies upon real and
personal property by the state and all taxing districts, now existing or
hereafter created, shall not in any year exceed ((one percentum)) the
following percentage of the true and fair value of such property in money:
((PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That))

(a)
For taxes levied for collection in 1999, and before, 1.0 percent;

(b)
For taxes levied for collection in 2000, 0.94 percent;

(c)
For taxes levied for collection in 2001, 0.91 percent;

(d)
For taxes levied for collection in 2002, 0.88 percent;

(e)
For taxes levied for collection in 2003, 0.85 percent;

(f)
For taxes levied for collection in 2004, 0.82 percent;

(g)
For taxes levied for collection in 2005, 0.79 percent;

(h)
For taxes levied for collection in 2006, 0.76 percent;

(i)
For taxes levied for collection in 2007, 0.73 percent;

(j)
For taxes levied for collection in 2008, 0.70 percent;

(k)
For taxes levied for collection in 2009, 0.67 percent; and

(l)
For taxes levied for collection in 2010 and thereafter, 0.64 percent.

(2)
Nothing herein shall prevent levies at the rates now provided by law by or
for any port or public utility district. The term "taxing district"
for the purposes of this section shall mean any political subdivision,
municipal corporation, district, or other governmental agency authorized by law
to levy, or have levied for it, ad valorem taxes on property, other than a port
or public utility district. Such aggregate limitation or any specific
limitation imposed by law in conformity therewith may be exceeded only as
authorized by law and in conformity with the provisions of Article VII, section
2(a), (b), or (c) of the Constitution of the state of Washington.

(3)
Nothing herein contained shall prohibit the legislature from allocating or
reallocating the authority to levy taxes between the taxing districts of the
state and its political subdivisions in a manner which complies with the
aggregate tax limitation set forth in this section.

Sec.
4. RCW
36.58.150 and 1984 c 186 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A solid waste disposal district shall not have the power to levy an annual levy
without voter approval, but it shall have the power to levy a tax, in excess of
the ((one percent)) limitation in RCW 84.52.050, upon the
property within the district for a one year period to be used for operating or
capital purposes whenever authorized by the electors of the district pursuant
to RCW 84.52.052 and Article VII, section 2(a) of the state Constitution.

A
solid waste disposal district may issue general obligation bonds for capital
purposes only, subject to the limitations prescribed in RCW 39.36.020(1), and
may provide for the retirement of the bonds by voter-approved bond retirement
tax levies pursuant to Article VII, section 2(b) of the state Constitution and
RCW 84.52.056. Such general obligation bonds shall be issued and sold in
accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

A
solid waste disposal district may issue revenue bonds to fund its activities.
Such revenue bonds may be in any form, including bearer bonds or registered
bonds as provided in RCW 39.46.030.

(2)
Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, such revenue bonds may be
issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

Sec.
5. RCW
36.60.040 and 1983 c 303 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

A
county rail district is not authorized to impose a regular ad valorem property
tax levy but may:

(1)
Levy an ad valorem property tax, in excess of the ((one percent))
limitation in RCW 84.52.050, upon the property within the district for a
one-year period to be used for operating or capital purposes whenever
authorized by the voters of the district pursuant to RCW 84.52.052 and Article
VII, section 2(a) of the state Constitution.

(2)
Provide for the retirement of voter approved general obligation bonds, issued
for capital purposes only, by levying bond retirement ad valorem property tax
levies, in excess of the one percent limitation, whenever authorized by the
voters of the district pursuant to Article VII, section 2(b) of the state
Constitution and RCW 84.52.056.

Sec.
6. RCW
36.69.145 and 1994 c 156 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A park and recreation district may impose regular property tax levies in an
amount equal to sixty cents or less per thousand dollars of assessed value of
property in the district in each year for six consecutive years when
specifically authorized so to do by a majority of at least three-fifths of the
voters thereof approving a proposition authorizing the levies submitted at a
special election or at the regular election of the district, at which election
the number of voters voting "yes" on the proposition shall constitute
three-fifths of a number equal to forty per centum of the number of voters voting
in such district at the last preceding general election when the number of
voters voting on the proposition does not exceed forty per centum of the number
of voters voting in such taxing district in the last preceding general
election; or by a majority of at least three-fifths of the voters thereof
voting on the proposition if the number of voters voting on the proposition
exceeds forty per centum of the number of voters voting in such taxing district
in the last preceding general election. A proposition authorizing the tax
levies shall not be submitted by a park and recreation district more than twice
in any twelve-month period. Ballot propositions shall conform with RCW
29.30.111. In the event a park and recreation district is levying property taxes,
which in combination with property taxes levied by other taxing districts
subject to the ((one percent)) limitation provided for in ((Article
7, section 2, of our state Constitution)) RCW 84.52.050 result in
taxes in excess of the limitation provided for in RCW 84.52.043, the park and
recreation district property tax levy shall be reduced or eliminated before the
property tax levies of other taxing districts are reduced.

(2) The limitation in RCW 84.55.010 shall not apply to the first
levy imposed under this section following the approval of the levies by the
voters under subsection (1) of this section.

Sec.
7. RCW
36.73.060 and 1987 c 327 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A transportation benefit district may levy an ad valorem property tax in excess
of the ((one percent)) limitation in RCW 84.52.050 upon the
property within the district for a one-year period whenever authorized by the
voters of the district pursuant to RCW 84.52.052 and Article VII, section 2(a)
of the state Constitution.

(2)
A district may provide for the retirement of voter-approved general obligation
bonds, issued for capital purposes only, by levying bond retirement ad valorem
property tax levies in excess of the one percent limitation whenever authorized
by the voters of the district pursuant to Article VII, section 2(b) of the
state Constitution and RCW 84.52.056.

Sec.
8. RCW
36.83.030 and 1983 c 130 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A service district may levy an ad valorem property tax, in excess of the ((one
percent)) limitation in RCW 84.52.050, upon the property within the
district for a one-year period whenever authorized by the voters of the
district pursuant to RCW 84.52.052 and Article VII, section 2(a) of the state
Constitution.

(2)
A service district may provide for the retirement of voter approved general
obligation bonds, issued for capital purposes only, by levying bond retirement
ad valorem property tax levies, in excess of the one percent limitation,
whenever authorized by the voters of the district pursuant to Article VII,
section 2(b) of the state Constitution and RCW 84.52.056.

Sec.
9. RCW
36.100.050 and 1988 ex.s. c 1 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A public facilities district may levy an ad valorem property tax, in excess of
the ((one percent)) limitation in RCW 84.52.050, upon the
property within the district for a one-year period to be used for operating or
capital purposes whenever authorized by the voters of the district pursuant to
RCW 84.52.052 and Article VII, section 2(a) of the state Constitution.

(2)
A public facilities district may provide for the retirement of voter-approved
general obligation bonds, issued for capital purposes only, by levying bond
retirement ad valorem property tax levies, in excess of the one percent
limitation, whenever authorized by the voters of the district pursuant to
Article VII, section 2(b) of the state Constitution and RCW 84.52.056.

Sec.
10. RCW
67.38.130 and 1984 c 131 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
governing body of a cultural arts, stadium and convention district may levy or
cause to levy the following ad valorem taxes:

(1)
Regular ad valorem property tax levies in an amount equal to twenty-five cents
or less per thousand dollars of the assessed value of property in the district
in each year for six consecutive years when specifically authorized so to do by
a majority of at least three-fifths of the electors thereof approving a
proposition authorizing the levies submitted at a general or special election,
at which election the number of persons voting "yes" on the
proposition shall constitute three-fifths of a number equal to forty percentum
of the total votes cast in such taxing district at the last preceding general
election; or by a majority of at least three-fifths of the electors thereof
voting on the proposition when the number of electors voting yes on the
proposition exceeds forty percentum of the total votes cast in such taxing
district in the last preceding general election. Ballot propositions shall
conform with RCW 29.30.111.

In
the event a cultural arts, stadium and convention district is levying property
taxes, which in combination with property taxes levied by other taxing
districts subject to the ((one percent)) limitation provided for in ((Article
VII, section 2, of our state Constitution)) RCW 84.52.050 result in
taxes in excess of the limitation provided for in RCW 84.52.043, the cultural
arts, stadium and convention district property tax levy shall be reduced or
eliminated before the property tax levies of other taxing districts are
reduced: PROVIDED, That no cultural arts, stadium, and convention district may
pledge anticipated revenues derived from the property tax herein authorized as
security for payments of bonds issued pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That such limitation shall not apply to property
taxes approved pursuant to subsections (2) and (3) of this section.

The
limitation in RCW 84.55.010 shall apply to levies after the first levy authorized
under this section following the approval of such levy by voters pursuant to
this section.

(2)
An annual excess ad valorem property tax for general district purposes when
authorized by the district voters in the manner prescribed by ((section 2,))
Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution and by RCW
84.52.052.

(3)
Multi-year excess ad valorem property tax levies used to retire general
obligation bond issues when authorized by the district voters in the manner
prescribed by ((section 2,)) Article VII, section 2 of the state
Constitution and by RCW 84.52.056.

The district shall include in its regular property tax levy for
each year a sum sufficient to pay the interest and principal on all outstanding
general obligation bonds issued without voter approval pursuant to RCW
67.38.110 and may include a sum sufficient to create a sinking fund for the
redemption of all outstanding bonds.

Sec.
11. RCW
84.52.010 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as is permitted under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes shall be levied or voted in
specific amounts.

The
rate percent of all taxes for state and county purposes, and purposes of taxing
districts coextensive with the county, shall be determined, calculated and
fixed by the county assessors of the respective counties, within the
limitations provided by law, upon the assessed valuation of the property of the
county, as shown by the completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent
of all taxes levied for purposes of taxing districts within any county shall be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the respective
counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the assessed valuation
of the property of the taxing districts respectively.

When
a county assessor finds that the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property,
that is subject to the limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.043 or 84.52.050,
exceeds the limitations provided in either of these sections, the assessor
shall recompute and establish a consolidated levy in the following manner:

(1)
The full certified rates of tax levy for state, county, county road district,
and city or town purposes shall be extended on the tax rolls in amounts not
exceeding the limitations established by law; however any state levy shall take
precedence over all other levies and shall not be reduced for any purpose other
than that required by RCW 84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed
under RCW 84.52.069, 84.34.230, the portion of the levy by a metropolitan park
district that was protected under RCW 84.52.120, and 84.52.105, the combined
rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the ((one percent))
limitation under RCW 84.52.050 exceeds ((one percent of the true and
fair value of any property)) the limitation under RCW 84.52.050,
then these levies shall be reduced as follows: (a) The portion of the levy by
a metropolitan park district that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 shall be
reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds ((one percent of the true
and fair value of any property)) the limitation under RCW 84.52.050
or shall be eliminated; (b) if the combined rate of regular property tax levies
that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds ((one percent
of the true and fair value of any property)) the limitation under RCW
84.52.050, then the levies imposed under RCW 84.34.230, 84.52.105, and any
portion of the levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 that is in excess of thirty
cents per thousand dollars of assessed value, shall be reduced on a pro rata
basis until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and
fair value of any property or shall be eliminated; and (c) if the combined rate
of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation
still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then the
thirty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of tax levy imposed under
RCW 84.52.069 shall be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one
percent of the true and fair value of any property or eliminated.

(2)
The certified rates of tax levy subject to these limitations by all junior
taxing districts imposing taxes on such property shall be reduced or eliminated
as follows to bring the consolidated levy of taxes on such property within the
provisions of these limitations:

(a)
First, the certified property tax levy rates of those junior taxing districts
authorized under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, and 67.38.130 shall be reduced on a
pro rata basis or eliminated;

(b)
Second, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the
certified property tax levy rates of flood control zone districts shall be
reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;

(c)
Third, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the
certified property tax levy rates of all other junior taxing districts, other
than fire protection districts, library districts, the first fifty cent per
thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park districts,
and the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for
public hospital districts, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;

(d)
Fourth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the
certified property tax levy rates authorized to fire protection districts under
RCW 52.16.140 and 52.16.160 shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
and

(e)
Fifth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the
certified property tax levy rates authorized for fire protection districts
under RCW 52.16.130, library districts, metropolitan park districts under their
first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, and public
hospital districts under their first fifty cent per thousand dollars of
assessed valuation levy, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated.

In
determining whether the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property, that is
subject to the limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations
provided in that section, the assessor shall use the hypothetical state levy,
as apportioned to the county under RCW 84.48.080, that was computed under RCW
84.48.080 without regard to the reduction under RCW 84.55.012.

Sec.
12. RCW
84.69.020 and 1998 c 306 s 2 and 1997 c 393 s 18 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

On
the order of the county treasurer, ad valorem taxes paid before or after
delinquency shall be refunded if they were:

(1)
Paid more than once;

(2)
Paid as a result of manifest error in description;

(3)
Paid as a result of a clerical error in extending the tax rolls;

(4)
Paid as a result of other clerical errors in listing property;

(5)
Paid with respect to improvements which did not exist on assessment date;

(6)
Paid under levies or statutes adjudicated to be illegal or unconstitutional;

(7)
Paid as a result of mistake, inadvertence, or lack of knowledge by any person
exempted from paying real property taxes or a portion thereof pursuant to RCW
84.36.381 through 84.36.389, as now or hereafter amended;

(8)
Paid as a result of mistake, inadvertence, or lack of knowledge by either a
public official or employee or by any person with respect to real property in
which the person paying the same has no legal interest;

(9)
Paid on the basis of an assessed valuation which was appealed to the county
board of equalization and ordered reduced by the board;

(10)
Paid on the basis of an assessed valuation which was appealed to the state
board of tax appeals and ordered reduced by the board: PROVIDED, That the
amount refunded under subsections (9) and (10) of this section shall only be
for the difference between the tax paid on the basis of the appealed valuation
and the tax payable on the valuation adjusted in accordance with the board's
order;

(11)
Paid as a state property tax levied upon property, the assessed value of which
has been established by the state board of tax appeals for the year of such
levy: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the amount refunded shall only be for the
difference between the state property tax paid and the amount of state property
tax which would, when added to all other property taxes within the ((one
percent)) limitation of Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution
equal ((one percent)) the percentage under RCW 84.52.050 of the
assessed value established by the board;

(12)
Paid on the basis of an assessed valuation which was adjudicated to be unlawful
or excessive: PROVIDED, That the amount refunded shall be for the difference
between the amount of tax which was paid on the basis of the valuation adjudged
unlawful or excessive and the amount of tax payable on the basis of the
assessed valuation determined as a result of the proceeding;

(13)
Paid on property acquired under RCW 84.60.050, and canceled under RCW 84.60.050(2);

(14)
Paid on the basis of an assessed valuation that was reduced under RCW
84.48.065; or

(15)
Paid on the basis of an assessed valuation that was reduced under RCW
84.40.039.

No
refunds under the provisions of this section shall be made because of any error
in determining the valuation of property, except as authorized in subsections
(9), (10), (11), and (12) of this section nor may any refunds be made if a bona
fide purchaser has acquired rights that would preclude the assessment and
collection of the refunded tax from the property that should properly have been
charged with the tax. Any refunds made on delinquent taxes shall include the
proportionate amount of interest and penalties paid. The county treasurer may
deduct from moneys collected for the benefit of the state's levy, refunds of
the state levy including interest on the levy as provided by this section and
chapter 84.68 RCW.

The
county treasurer of each county shall make all refunds determined to be
authorized by this section, and by the first Monday in February of each year,
report to the county legislative authority a list of all refunds made under
this section during the previous year. The list is to include the name of the
person receiving the refund, the amount of the refund, and the reason for the
refund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. This
act applies to taxes levied for collection in 2000 and thereafter.

---
END ---