BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature intends annexation procedures set forth in sections 2 through 5 of
this act to be alternative methods available to port districts that are less
than county-wide. The legislature does not intend the alternative procedures
to supersede any other method authorized by chapter 53.04 RCW or other law for
annexation of territory to a port district.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
port district that is less than county-wide may petition for annexation of an
area that is contiguous to its boundaries, is not located within the boundaries
of any other port district, and contains no registered voters. The petition
must be in writing, addressed to and filed with the port commission, and signed
by the owners of not less than seventy-five percent of the property value in
the area to be annexed, according to the assessed value for general taxation.
The petition must contain a legal description of the property according to
government legal subdivisions or legal plats, or a sufficient metes and bounds
description, and must be accompanied by a plat outlining the boundaries of the
property to be annexed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. If a
petition meeting the requirements set forth in section 2 of this act is filed
with the commission, the commission shall determine a date, time, and location
for a hearing on the petition and shall provide public notice of that hearing
and its nature by publishing the notice in one issue of a newspaper of general
circulation in the district and by posting the notice in three public places
within the territory proposed for annexation. The commission may require proof
of a petition's authenticity before complying with notice requirements imposed
by this section and may require the signers of a petition to bear the costs of
publishing and posting notice.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. At
the hearing, the commission may determine to annex all
or any portion of the proposed area described in the petition. Following the
hearing, the commission shall by resolution approve or disapprove annexation.
Upon passage of the resolution, the commission shall file, with the board of
county commissioners of the county in which the annexed property is located, a
certified copy of the resolution. On the date fixed in the resolution, the
area annexed becomes part of the district.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
By a majority vote of the commission, and with the written consent of all the
owners of the property to be annexed, a port commission of a district that is
less than county-wide may annex, for industrial development or other port
district purposes, property contiguous to the district's boundaries and not
located within the boundaries of any other port district.

(2)
The written consent required by subsection (1) of this section must contain a
full and correct legal description of the property to be annexed, must include
the signature of all owners of the property to be annexed, and must be
addressed to and filed with the commission.

(3)
If the commission approves annexation under this section, it shall do so by
resolution and shall file a certified copy of the resolution with the board of
county commissioners of the county in which the annexed property is located.
Upon the date fixed in the resolution, the area annexed becomes part of the
district.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. No
property within the territory annexed under sections 2 through 5 of this act
may be taxed or assessed for the payment of any outstanding indebtedness of the
port district as it existed before the annexation unless another law requires
the tax or assessment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. This
act expires December 31, 2003.

---
END ---