BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
39.04.150 and 1998 c 278 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
As used in this section, "agency" means the department of general
administration, the department of fish and wildlife, the department of natural
resources, the department of transportation, and the state parks and recreation
commission.

(2)
An agency may use either the small works roster process as defined in
subsection (3) of this section or the limited public works process as defined
in subsection (4) of this section for work, construction, repair, alteration,
or improvement projects.

(3)(a)
In addition to any other power or authority that an agency may have, each
agency, alone or in concert, may establish a small works roster consisting of
all qualified contractors who have requested to be included on the roster.

(((3)))
(b) The small works roster may make distinctions between contractors
based on the geographic areas served and the nature of the work the contractor
is qualified to perform. At least once every year, the agency shall advertise
in a newspaper of general circulation the existence of the small works roster
and shall add to the roster those contractors who request to be included on the
roster.

(((4)))
(c) Construction, repair, or alteration projects estimated to cost less
than one hundred thousand dollars are exempt from the requirement that the
contracts be awarded after advertisement and competitive bid as defined by RCW
39.04.010. In lieu of advertisement and competitive bid, each agency alone or
in concert shall establish a procedure for securing ((telephone,))
electronic((,)) or written quotations from the contractors on the small
works roster to assure establishment of a competitive price and for awarding
contracts to the lowest responsive and responsible bidder. This procedure
shall require either that the agency make a good faith effort to request
quotations from all contractors on the small works roster who have indicated
the capability of performing the kind of public works being contracted or that
the agency solicit quotations from at least five contractors in a manner that
will equitably distribute the opportunity among contractors willing to perform
in the geographic area of the work. The agency shall invite at least one
proposal from a certified minority or women-owned contractor, if available, who
is otherwise qualified to perform such work. Immediately after an award is
made, the bid quotations obtained shall be recorded, open to public inspection,
and available by ((telephone)) electronic inquiry.

(((5)
The breaking down of any public work or improvement into units or accomplishing
any public work or improvement by phases for the purpose of avoiding the
minimum dollar amount for bidding is contrary to public policy and is
prohibited.

(6))) (d)
The director of general administration shall adopt by rule a procedure to
qualify contractors for inclusion on the small works roster. Each agency shall
follow the procedure adopted by the director of general administration. No
agency shall be required to make available for public inspection or copying
under chapter 42.17 RCW financial information required to be provided by the
qualification procedure.

(((7)))
(e) An agency may adopt by rule procedures to implement this section
which shall not be inconsistent with the procedures adopted by the director of
the department of general administration pursuant to (d) of this
subsection (((6) of this section)).

(4)
Work, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement projects estimated to
cost less than thirty-five thousand dollars are limited public works exempt
from the small works roster process and from the requirement that contracts be
awarded after advertisement and competitive bid as provided in RCW 39.04.010.
For limited public works projects, the agency shall solicit electronic or
written quotations from a minimum of three contractors including a certified
minority or certified woman-owned contractor, when practicable, and shall award
the work to the licensed or registered contractor with the lowest quotation,
even if only one quotation is received, or reject all quotations. After an
award is made, the quotations shall be open to public inspection and available
by electronic request. An agency shall attempt to equitably distribute
opportunities for limited public works projects among contractors willing to
perform in the geographic area of the work. An agency shall maintain a list
each biennium of the contracts awarded under the limited public works process,
including the name of the contractor, the amount of the contract, a brief
description of the type of work performed, and the date it was awarded. For
limited public works projects, an agency may waive the payment and performance
bond requirements of chapter 39.08 RCW and the retainage requirements of
chapter 60.28 RCW, thereby assuming the liability for the contractor's
nonpayment of laborers, mechanics, subcontractors, materialmen, suppliers, and
taxes imposed pursuant to Title 82 RCW that may be due from the contractor for
the limited public works project, however the agency shall have a right of
recovery against the contractor for any payments made on the contractor's
behalf.

(5)
The breaking down of any public work or improvement into units or accomplishing
any public work or improvement by phases for the purpose of avoiding the
minimum dollar amount for bidding is contrary to public policy and is
prohibited.

Sec.
2. RCW
39.04.155 and 1998 c 278 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A municipality may use either the small works roster process as defined in
subsection (2) of this section or the limited public works process as defined
in subsection (3) of this section for work, construction, repair, alteration,
or improvement projects.

(2)(a)
This ((section)) subsection provides a uniform process to award
contracts for public works projects by those municipalities that are authorized
to use a small works roster in lieu of the requirements for formal sealed
bidding. The state statutes governing a specific type of municipality shall
establish the maximum dollar thresholds of the contracts that can be awarded
under this process, and may include other matters concerning the small works
roster process, for the municipality.

(((2)))
(b) Such municipalities may create a single general small works roster,
or may create a small works roster for different categories of anticipated
work. The small works roster or rosters shall consist of all responsible
contractors who have requested to be on the list, and where required by law are
properly licensed or registered to perform such work in this state. At least
twice a year, the municipality shall publish in a newspaper of general
circulation within the jurisdiction a notice of the existence of the roster or
rosters and solicit the names of contractors for such roster or rosters.

The
governing body of the municipality shall establish a procedure for securing ((telephone))
electronic or written quotations from the contractors on the general
small works roster, or a specific small works roster for the appropriate
category of work, to assure that a competitive price is established and to
award contracts to the lowest responsible bidder, as defined in RCW
43.19.1911. Such invitations for quotations shall include an estimate of the
scope and nature of the work to be performed as well as materials and equipment
to be furnished. However, detailed plans and specifications need not be
included in the invitation. This section does not eliminate other requirements
for architectural or engineering approvals as to quality and compliance with
building codes. Whenever possible at least five contractors shall be invited
to submit bids. Once a contractor has been afforded an opportunity to submit a
proposal, that contractor shall not be offered another opportunity until all
other appropriate contractors on the small works roster have been afforded an
opportunity to submit a proposal on a contract. Proposals may be invited from
all appropriate contractors on the small works roster.

A
contract awarded from a small works roster under this section need not be
advertised.

Immediately
after an award is made, the bid quotations obtained shall be recorded, open to
public inspection, and available by ((telephone)) electronic
inquiry.

(3) Work, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement
projects estimated to cost less than thirty-five thousand dollars are limited
public works exempt from the small works roster process and from the
requirement that contracts be awarded after advertisement and competitive bid
as provided in RCW 39.04.010. For limited public works projects, the
municipality shall solicit electronic or written quotations from a minimum of
three contractors including a certified minority or certified woman-owned
contractor, when practicable, and shall award the work to the licensed or
registered contractor with the lowest quotation, even if only one quotation is
received, or reject all quotations. After an award is made, the quotations
shall be open to public inspection and available by electronic request. A
municipality shall attempt to equitably distribute opportunities for limited
public works projects among contractors willing to perform in the geographic
area of the work. A municipality shall maintain a list each biennium of the
contracts awarded under the limited public works process, including the name of
the contractor, the amount of the contract, a brief description of the type of
work performed, and the date it was awarded. For limited public works
projects, a municipality may waive the payment and performance bond
requirements of chapter 39.08 RCW and the retainage requirements of chapter
60.28 RCW, thereby assuming the liability for the contractor's nonpayment of
laborers, mechanics, subcontractors, materialmen, suppliers, and taxes imposed
pursuant to Title 82 RCW that may be due from the contractor for the limited
public works project, however the agency shall have a right of recovery against
the contractor for any payments made on the contractor's behalf.

---
END ---