BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
39.10.100 and 1994 c 132 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, all proceedings, records,
contracts, and other public records relating to alternative public works
transactions under this chapter shall be open to the inspection of any
interested person, firm, or corporation in accordance with chapter 42.17 RCW.

(2)
Trade secrets, as defined in RCW 19.108.010, financial information supplied
by or on behalf of a person, partnership, joint venture, firm, or corporation
for the purpose of qualifying a bidder or offeror submitting a bid or proposal,
or other proprietary information submitted by a bidder, offeror, or contractor
in connection with an alternative public works transaction under this chapter
shall not be subject to chapter 42.17 RCW if the bidder, offeror, or contractor
specifically states in writing the reasons why protection is necessary, and
identifies the data or materials to be protected.

Sec.
2. RCW
39.10.050 and 1997 c 376 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and after complying with RCW
39.10.030, the following public bodies may utilize the design-build procedure
of public works contracting for public works projects authorized under this
section: The state department of general administration; the University of
Washington; Washington State University; every city with a population greater
than one hundred fifty thousand; every county with a population greater than
four hundred fifty thousand; and every port district with a population greater
than five hundred thousand. The authority granted to port districts in this
section is in addition to and does not affect existing contracting authority
under RCW 53.08.120 and 53.08.130. For the purposes of this section,
"design-build procedure" means a contract between a public body and
another party in which the party agrees to both design and build the facility,
portion of the facility, or other item specified in the contract.

(2)
Public bodies authorized under this section may utilize the design-build
procedure for public works projects valued over ten million dollars where:

(a)
The construction activities or technologies to be used are highly specialized
and a design-build approach is critical in developing the construction
methodology or implementing the proposed technology;

(b)
The project design is repetitive in nature and is an incidental part of the
installation or construction; or

(c)
Regular interaction with and feedback from facilities users and operators
during design is not critical to an effective facility design.

(3)
Public bodies authorized under this section may also use the design-build
procedure for the following projects that meet the criteria in subsection (2)(a),
(b), and (c) of this section:

(a)
The construction or erection of preengineered metal buildings ((or)),
prefabricated modular buildings, or the design, fabrication, and
installation of building engineering systems, regardless of cost; or

(b)
The construction of new student housing projects valued over five million
dollars.

(4)
Contracts for design-build services shall be awarded through a competitive
process utilizing public solicitation of proposals for design-build services.
The public body shall publish at least once in a legal newspaper of general
circulation published in or as near as possible to that part of the county in which
the public work will be done, a notice of its request for proposals for
design-build services and the availability and location of the request for
proposal documents. The request for proposal documents shall include:

(a)
A detailed description of the project including programmatic, performance, and
technical requirements and specifications, functional and operational elements,
minimum and maximum net and gross areas of any building, and, at the discretion
of the public body, preliminary engineering and architectural drawings;

(b)
The reasons for using the design-build procedure;

(c)
A description of the qualifications to be required of the proposer including,
but not limited to, submission of the proposer's accident prevention program;

(d)
A description of the process the public body will use to evaluate
qualifications and proposals, including evaluation factors and the relative
weight of factors. Evaluation factors shall include, but not be limited to:
Proposal price; ability of professional personnel; past performance on similar
projects; ability to meet time and budget requirements; ability to provide a
performance and payment bond for the project; recent, current, and projected
work loads of the firm; location; and the concept of the proposal;

(e)
The form of the contract to be awarded;

(f)
The maximum allowable construction cost and minority and women enterprise total
project goals;

(g)
The amount to be paid to finalists submitting best and final proposals who are
not awarded a design-build contract; and

(h)
Other information relevant to the project.

(5)
The public body shall establish a committee to evaluate the proposals based on
the factors, weighting, and process identified in the request for proposals.
Based on its evaluation, the public body shall select not fewer than three nor
more than five finalists to submit best and final proposals. The public body
may, in its sole discretion, reject all proposals. Design-build contracts
shall be awarded using the procedures in (a) or (b) of this subsection.

(a)
Best and final proposals shall be evaluated and scored based on the factors,
weighting, and process identified in the initial request for proposals. The
public body may score the proposals using a system that measures the quality
and technical merits of the proposal on a unit price basis. Final proposals
may not be considered if the proposal cost is greater than the maximum
allowable construction cost identified in the initial request for proposals.
The public body shall initiate negotiations with the firm submitting the
highest scored best and final proposal. If the public body is unable to
execute a contract with the firm submitting the highest scored best and final
proposal, negotiations with that firm may be suspended or terminated and the
public body may proceed to negotiate with the next highest scored firm. Public
bodies shall continue in accordance with this procedure until a contract
agreement is reached or the selection process is terminated.

(b)
If the public body determines that all finalists are capable of producing plans
and specifications that adequately meet project requirements, the public body
may award the contract to the firm that submits the responsive best and final
proposal with the lowest price.

(6) The firm awarded the contract shall provide a performance and
payment bond for the contracted amount. The public body shall provide
appropriate honorarium payments to finalists submitting best and final
proposals who are not awarded a design-build contract. Honorarium payments
shall be sufficient to generate meaningful competition among potential
proposers on design-build projects.

---
END ---