BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
4.84.250 and 1984 c 258 s 88 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding
any other provisions of chapter 4.84 RCW and RCW 12.20.060, in any action for
damages where the amount pleaded by the prevailing party as hereinafter
defined, exclusive of costs, is ((seven)) thirty-five thousand ((five
hundred)) dollars or less, there shall be taxed and allowed to the
prevailing party as a part of the costs of the action a reasonable amount to be
fixed by the court as attorneys' fees. ((After July 1, 1985, the maximum
amount of the pleading under this section shall be ten thousand dollars.))
Attorneys' fees provided for in this section accrue to the benefit of the
prevailing party.

---
END ---