BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
49.12.240 and 1985 c 336 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
employer or association of employers shall, at least annually, upon the
request of an employee, permit that employee to inspect and copy any or
all of his or her own personnel file(s).

No
fee may be charged for inspecting the personnel file or for locating the
personnel file and making it available for copying. However, a charge may be
imposed to reimburse the employer or association of employers for providing the
copies and for the use of the employer equipment to copy the personnel file. The
charge shall be for either the actual costs directly incident to the copying or
fifteen cents per page, whichever is less.

Sec.
2. RCW
49.12.250 and 1985 c 336 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each employer or association of employers shall make such file(s)
available locally within a reasonable period of time after the employee
requests the file(s).

(2)
An employee annually may petition that the employer or association of
employers review all information in the employee's personnel file(s) that
are regularly maintained by the employer or association of employers as
a part of his business records or are subject to reference for information
given to persons outside of the company. The employer or association of
employers shall determine if there is any irrelevant or erroneous
information in the file(s), and shall remove all such information from the
file(s). If an employee does not agree with the employer's determination, the
employee may at his or her request have placed in the employee's personnel file
a statement containing the employee's rebuttal or correction. Nothing in this
subsection prevents the employer or association of employers from
removing information more frequently.

(3) A former employee shall retain the right of rebuttal or
correction for a period not to exceed two years.

---
END ---