BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that:

(a)
High levels of ambient noise may cause adverse auditory and nonauditory
effects, including hearing loss, communication and sleep disturbance,
increasing stress levels, and adversely impacting cardiovascular and endocrine
systems;

(b)
Noise impacts are a function not only of the level of sound but the duration of
exposure to high levels of sound and the distance from the noise source;

(c)
Research indicates that, for example, exposure to noise of ninety decibels or
more for eight hours may cause damage, and exposure to one hundred five-decibel
noise for an hour or more may cause damage;

(d)
The decibel levels of common sources of noise include:

(i)
Jet take-off (one hundred thirty decibels);

(ii)
Fireworks (one hundred thirty decibels);

(iii)
Amplified rock music (one hundred twenty decibels);

(iv)
Jackhammer (one hundred twenty decibels);

(v)
Chain saw (one hundred decibels);

(vi)
Lawnmower (eighty-five to one hundred decibels);

(vii)
Seaplane (eighty to one hundred ten decibels);

(viii)
Dirt bike (ninety-five decibels); and

(ix)
Portable stereo (ninety-five decibels);

(e)
With increasing population and increasing sources of noise, more Washingtonians
are exposed for longer periods to high noise levels;

(f)
The scientific research into the health effects of noise exposure has advanced
greatly in the recent past and state and local programs should be reviewed in
light of this research; and

(g)
The state noise program, including technical assistance to implementing local
governments, has not been comprehensively reviewed since its initiation nearly
twenty-five years ago.

(2)
Therefore the legislature intends by this act to authorize a comprehensive
review of current federal research studies on the health effects of noise and a
review of current state and local noise programs in order to provide greater
understanding of opportunities to strengthen such programs as well as further
public education regarding the health effects of noise.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. By
January 1, 2000, the department of health with the guidance of the board of
health shall provide to the appropriate committees of the senate and the house
of representatives an assessment of the health effects of noise and
recommendations for reducing such effects. The study shall include:

(1)
A review of the literature on the effects of noise, with an emphasis upon more
contemporary research completed in the previous two decades, subsequent to the
authorization of the state's noise control program in 1974. The review shall
include review of the research findings on direct auditory effects, as well as
nonauditory effects such as sleep and communication disturbance, and stress
effects;

(2)
An assessment of the principal noise sources in Washington communities and
trends in cumulative noise levels in representative urban, suburban, and rural
areas;

(3)
A review of the current noise control programs at the state and local level,
including public education and compliance activities;

(4)
A review of federal noise control laws and programs and regulatory subjects
preempted by federal laws;

(5)
A review of existing studies concerning whether disadvantaged groups have a
disproportionately higher exposure to unhealthy noise levels; and

(6)
Recommendations for improving state and local noise control programs to address
the health effects identified and for more effective administration of existing
programs, including state financial and technical assistance to local
governments.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
In conducting the noise study required by section 2 of this act, the department
of health shall form an advisory committee including representatives of
community organizations concerned with noise, industries characterized by high
noise levels, motorized vehicle manufacturers, transportation facilities, and
scientific research interests. The department may retain independent
consultants for technical elements of health effects analyses.

(2)
The department shall provide for public participation in the development of the
report, including one or more public forums and the provision of an opportunity
for public review and comment upon a draft report.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The
sum of forty-five thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the general fund to
the department of health for the purposes of this act. The department may
contract with another entity to complete portions of the study provisions in
this act, but any contract may not allow greater than twenty-five percent of
the total contract amount for indirect costs.

---
END ---