BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART I‑-LEGISLATIVE
INTENT

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 101. (1)
The legislature finds:

(a)
The continued economic vitality of downtown and neighborhood commercial
districts in our state's cities is essential to community preservation, social
cohesion, and economic growth;

(b)
In recent years there has been a deterioration of downtown and neighborhood
commercial districts in rural and urban communities due to a shifting
population base, changes in the marketplace, and greater competition from
suburban shopping malls and discount centers;

(c)
This decline has eroded the ability of businesses and property owners to
renovate and enhance their commercial and residential properties; and

(d)
Business owners in these districts need to maintain their local economies in
order to provide goods and services to adjacent residents, to provide
employment opportunities, and to avoid disinvestment and economic dislocations,
and have developed downtown and neighborhood commercial district revitalization
programs to address these problems.

(2)
It is the intent of the legislature to establish a program to:

(a)
Work in partnership with these organizations;

(b)
Provide technical assistance and training to local governments, business
organizations, downtown and neighborhood commercial district organizations, and
business and property owners to accomplish community and economic
revitalization and development of business districts; and

(c)
Certify a downtown and neighborhood commercial district organization's use of
available tax incentives.

PART
II‑-DOWNTOWN AND NEIGHBORHOOD COMMERCIAL DISTRICT

REVITALIZATION
INCENTIVES

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 201. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
There may be credit against the tax imposed by this chapter, the value of
private contributions that are designed to assist in the development and
operation of a downtown and neighborhood commercial district revitalization
program for a city or town located within a rural county.

(2)
The credit allowed under this section is limited to an amount equal to:

(a)
Seventy-five percent of the value of the contribution that is made directly, by
the business, to a downtown and neighborhood commercial district revitalization
program; or

(b)
Fifty percent of the value of the contribution that is made directly, by the
business, to the department of community, trade, and economic development for
distribution as financial or technical assistance under section 302 of this
act. The total credits allowed under this section for an individual downtown
and neighborhood commercial district cannot exceed one hundred thousand dollars
in a calendar year. The total credits allowed under this section for a
business cannot exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars in a calendar year.
The total credits allowed on a state-wide basis cannot exceed two million
dollars in a calendar year.

(3)
Prior to making the contribution under this section, the business must obtain
approval from the department of community, trade, and economic development.
The businesses' request for approval must include a description of the
contribution and the value of the contribution.

(4)
This section applies only to contributions for which an application is approved
on or after the effective date of this act.

(5)
As used in this section:

(a)
"Contribution" means either cash or other in-kind contributions or
both.

(b)
"Downtown and neighborhood commercial district revitalization
program" means a program designated by the department of community, trade,
and economic development under sections 101 and 301 through 306 of this act.

(c)
"Rural county" means a county with a population density of less than
one hundred persons per square mile.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 202. A
new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A physical improvement to a commercial building upon real property, that is
located within boundaries identified and approved by the department of
community, trade, and economic development under section 303 of this act and
that is located in a rural county, is exempt from taxation for the ten
assessment years subsequent to the completion of the improvement, if the
improvement meets the guidelines established by the local downtown and
neighborhood commercial district revitalization program. In addition, for
buildings that meet the definition of historic property as defined in RCW
84.26.020, the improvements must be consistent with the definition of
rehabilitation as defined in RCW 84.26.020, and adhere to the historic
preservation process and guidelines adopted by the community. A taxpayer
desiring to obtain the exemption granted by this section must file notice of
their intent to construct the improvement prior to the improvement being made
on forms prescribed by the department of revenue and furnished to the taxpayer
by the county assessor. This exemption cannot be claimed more than once in a
fifteen-year period. As used in this section, "downtown and neighborhood
commercial district revitalization program" has the same meaning as in
section 201 of this act.

(2)
The department of revenue shall adopt those rules as are necessary to properly
administer the provisions of this section.

(3)
As used in this section, "rural county" means a county with a
population density of less than one hundred persons per square mile.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 203. A
new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislative authority of an eligible local government located in a rural
county may impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this
chapter. The tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by law and shall be
collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08
and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the boundaries of
the local government. The rate of tax shall not exceed two-tenths of one
percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of the article
used in the case of a use tax.

(2)
The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be deducted from the
amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or paid to the department of
revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department of revenue shall
perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the local government at no
cost to the local government.

(3)
Moneys collected under this section shall only be used for the purpose of
paying the costs for a downtown and neighborhood commercial district
revitalization project in an eligible area.

(4)
No tax may be collected under this section before January 1, 2000.

(5)
Moneys collected under this section must be matched with one dollar of local
government or private funds for every two dollars of funds collected under this
section.

(6)
As used in this section:

(a)
"Downtown and neighborhood commercial district revitalization
project" means: Public infrastructure improvements, including street and
utility improvements; professional management, planning, and promotion within
the eligible area, including the management and promotion of retail trade
activities in the eligible area; maintenance and security for common or public
areas in the eligible area; and historic preservation activities authorized
under RCW 35.21.395.

(b)
"Eligible local government" means a local government that is
implementing a program designated by the department of community, trade, and
economic development at the partner-level or associate-level under section 303
of this act.

(c)
"Local government" means a city, code city, or town.

(d)
"Rural county" means a county with a population density of less than
one hundred persons per square mile.

PART
III‑-DOWNTOWN AND NEIGHBORHOOD COMMERCIAL DISTRICT

REVITALIZATION
PROGRAM

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 301. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this section and sections 101 and
302 through 306 of this act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Area" means a geographic area within a local government that is
described by a closed perimeter boundary.

(2)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(3)
"Director" means the director of community, trade, and economic
development.

(4)
"Local government" means a city, code city, or town.

(5)
"Qualified levels of participation" means a local downtown and
neighborhood commercial district revitalization effort that has been certified
by the department, as being at the participant-level, associate-level, or
partner-level.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 302. The
Washington main street program is created within the department. In order to
implement the Washington main street program, the department shall:

(1)
Provide technical assistance to businesses, property owners, organizations, and
local governments undertaking a comprehensive downtown and neighborhood
commercial district revitalization and management strategy within a specified
area. Technical assistance includes, but is not limited to: Initial site
evaluations and assessments; training for local programs; training for local
program staff; site visits and assessments by technical specialists; local
program design assistance and evaluation; and continued local program on-site
assistance;

(2)
To the extent funds are made available, provide financial assistance to local
governments or local organizations to assist in initial program start-up costs,
specific project feasibility studies, market studies, and design assistance;

(3)
Develop objective criteria for selecting recipients of financial assistance
under subsection (1) of this section and providing designation of a local
program under section 303 of this act;

(4)
Operate the Washington main street program in accordance with the plan
described in section 304(2) of this act; and

(5)
Consider other factors the department deems necessary for the implementation of
this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 303. (1)
The department shall, by rule, adopt criteria for the designation of the local
downtown and neighborhood commercial district revitalization programs and
official local main street programs. In establishing the criteria, the
department shall consider:

(a)
The degree of interest and commitment to downtown and neighborhood commercial
district revitalization and, where applicable, historic preservation by both
the public and private sectors;

(b)
The evidence of potential private sector investment in the downtown and
neighborhood commercial district;

(c)
Where applicable, a downtown and neighborhood commercial district with
sufficient historic fabric to become a foundation for an enhanced community
image;

(d)
The capacity of the organization to undertake a comprehensive program and the
financial commitment to implement a long-term downtown and neighborhood
commercial district revitalization program that includes a commitment to employ
a professional program manager with a sufficient operating budget;

(e)
The department's existing downtown revitalization services tier system;

(f)
The national main street center's criteria for designating official main street
cities; and

(g)
Other factors the department deems necessary for the designation of a local program.

(2)
The department shall designate local downtown and neighborhood commercial
district revitalization programs and official local main street programs. The
programs shall be limited to the following three categories: Partner-level,
associate-level, and participant-level.

(3)
Sections 201, 202, and 203 of this act do not apply to any local downtown and
neighborhood commercial district revitalization program unless the boundaries
of the program have been identified and approved by the department. The
boundaries of a local downtown and neighborhood commercial district
revitalization program are typically limited to the pedestrian core area or the
central commercial district.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 304. (1)
The Washington main street advisory committee is created within the
department. The members of the advisory committee are appointed by the
director and consist of:

(a)
The director, or the director's designee, who shall serve as chair;

(b)
One representative of private industry councils;

(c)
Two representatives of local governments;

(d)
The chair of the governor's small business improvement council;

(e)
Five representatives from existing main street programs or downtown and
neighborhood commercial district programs; and

(f)
One representative of the Washington state office of archaeology and historic
preservation.

(2)
The department shall develop a plan for the Washington main street program, in
consultation with the Washington main street advisory committee. The plan must
describe:

(a)
The objectives and strategies of the Washington main street program;

(b)
How the Washington main street program will be coordinated with existing
federal, state, local, and private sector business development and historic
preservation efforts;

(c)
The means by which private investment will be solicited and employed;

(d)
The methods of selecting and providing assistance to participating local
programs; and

(e)
A means to solicit private contributions for state and local operations of the
Washington main street program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 305. The
Washington main street trust fund account is created in the state treasury.
All receipts from private contributions, federal funds, legislative
appropriations, and fees for services, if levied, must be deposited into the
account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the operation of the
Washington main street program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 306.
Sections 101 and 301 through 306 of this act may be known and cited as the
Washington main street act.

PART IV‑-TECHNICAL
PROVISIONS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 401.
Sections 101 and 301 through 306 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title
43 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 402. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 403. Part
headings as used in this act constitute no part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 404.
Sections 201 through 203 of this act are necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state
government and its existing public institutions, and take effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---