BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.29A.120 and 1994 c 95 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
After computation of the taxes imposed pursuant to RCW 82.29A.030 and
82.29A.040 there shall be allowed the following credits in determining the tax
payable:

(((1)))
(a) With respect to a leasehold interest other than a product lease,
executed with an effective date of April 1, 1986, or thereafter, or a leasehold
interest in respect to which the department of revenue under the authority of
RCW 82.29A.020 does adjust the contract rent base used for computing the tax
provided for in RCW 82.29A.030, there shall be allowed a credit against the tax
as otherwise computed equal to the amount, if any, that such tax exceeds the
property tax that would apply to such leased property without regard to any
property tax exemption under RCW 84.36.381, if it were privately owned by the
lessee or if it were privately owned by any sublessee if the value of the
credit inures to the sublessee. ((For lessees and sublessees who would
qualify for a property tax exemption under RCW 84.36.381 if the property were
privately owned, the tax otherwise due after this credit shall be reduced by a
percentage equal to the percentage reduction in property tax that would result
from the property tax exemption under RCW 84.36.381.

(2))) (b)
With respect to a leasehold interest consisting of three thousand or more
residential lots that are subleased for residential purposes for which taxable
rent is determined under RCW 82.29A.020(2)(b), there shall be allowed a credit
against the tax as otherwise computed and after any credit under (a) of this
subsection equal to the amount, if any, that the tax due after any credit under
(a) of this subsection exceeds an increase in revenue on the leasehold interest
from the prior year of the lesser of six percent or the inflation factor. The
inflation factor is the percentage change in the implicit price deflator for
personal consumption expenditures for the United States as published for the
most recent twelve-month period by the bureau of economic analysis of the
federal department of commerce in September of the year before the taxes are
payable.

(c)
With respect to a product lease, a credit of thirty-three percent of the tax
otherwise due.

(2) For lessees and sublessees who would qualify for a property
tax exemption under RCW 84.36.381 if the property were privately owned, the tax
otherwise due after the credits authorized in subsection (1) of this section
shall be reduced by a percentage equal to the percentage reduction in property
tax that would result from the property tax exemption under RCW 84.36.381.

Sec.
2. RCW
82.29A.050 and 1992 c 206 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the leasehold
excise taxes provided for in RCW 82.29A.030 and 82.29A.040 shall be paid by the
lessee to the lessor and the lessor shall collect such tax and remit the same
to the department of revenue. The tax shall be payable at the same time as
payments are due to the lessor for use of the property from which the leasehold
interest arises, and in the case of payment of contract rent to a person other
than the lessor, at the time of payment. The tax payment shall be accompanied
by such information as the department of revenue may require. In the case of
prepaid contract rent the payment may be prorated in accordance with
instructions of the department of revenue and the prorated portion of the tax
shall be due, one-half not later than May 31 and the other half not later than
November 30 each year.

(2)
Leasehold excise taxes on a leasehold interest consisting of three thousand
or more residential lots that are subleased for residential purposes for which
taxable rent is determined under RCW 82.29A.020(2)(b) shall be paid by the
sublessee, or the lessee if there is no sublessee for a particular lot, to the
county treasurer at such times and subject to the same penalties as property
taxes under RCW 84.56.020. Immediately following the last day of each month,
the county treasurer shall remit the taxes collected to the state treasurer for
deposit into the local leasehold excise tax account. The remittance shall be
accompanied by such information as the department of revenue may require.

(3)
The lessor receiving taxes payable under the provisions of this chapter shall
remit the same together with a return provided by the department, to the
department of revenue on or before the last day of the month following the
month in which the tax is collected. The department may relieve any taxpayer
or class of taxpayers from the obligation of filing monthly returns and may
require the return to cover other reporting periods, but in no event shall
returns be filed for a period greater than one year. The lessor shall be fully
liable for collection and remittance of the tax. The amount of tax until paid
by the lessee to the lessor shall constitute a debt from the lessee to the
lessor. The tax required by this chapter shall be stated separately from
contract rent, and if not so separately stated for purposes of determining the
tax due from the lessee to the lessor and from the lessor to the department,
the contract rent does not include the tax imposed by this chapter. Where a
lessee has failed to pay to the lessor the tax imposed by this chapter and the
lessor has not paid the amount of the tax to the department, the department
may, in its discretion, proceed directly against the lessee for collection of
the tax: PROVIDED, That taxes due where contract rent has not been paid shall
be reported by the lessor to the department and the lessee alone shall be
liable for payment of the tax to the department.

(((3))) (4) Each person having a leasehold interest
subject to the tax provided for in this chapter arising out of a lease of
federally owned or federal trust lands shall report and remit the tax due
directly to the department of revenue in the same manner and at the same time
as the lessor would be required to report and remit the tax if such lessor were
a state public entity.

Sec.
3. RCW
82.29A.080 and 1985 c 57 s 84 are each amended to read as follows:

The
counties and cities shall contract, prior to the effective date of an ordinance
imposing a leasehold excise tax, with the department of revenue for
administration and collection. The department of revenue shall deduct a
percentage amount, as provided by such contract, not to exceed two percent of
the taxes collected, for administration and collection expenses incurred by the
department. No amount may be deducted for taxes collected under RCW
82.29A.050(2). The remainder of any portion of any tax authorized by RCW
82.29A.040 which is collected by the department of revenue shall be deposited
by the state department of revenue in the local leasehold excise tax account
hereby created in the state treasury. Moneys in the local leasehold excise tax
account may be spent only for distribution to counties and cities imposing a
leasehold excise tax.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act takes effect January 1, 2000.

---
END ---