BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.27.010 and 1997 c 314 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Contractor" means any person, firm, or corporation who or which, in
the pursuit of an independent business undertakes to, or offers to undertake,
or submits a bid to, construct, alter, repair, add to, subtract from, improve,
move, wreck or demolish, for another, any building, highway, road, railroad,
excavation or other structure, project, development, or improvement attached to
real estate or to do any part thereof including the installation of carpeting
or other floor covering, the erection of scaffolding or other structures or
works in connection therewith or who installs or repairs roofing or siding; or,
who, to do similar work upon his or her own property, employs members of more
than one trade upon a single job or project or under a single building permit
except as otherwise provided herein. "Contractor" includes any
person, firm, or corporation covered by this subsection, whether or not registered
as required under this chapter.

(2)
"Department" means the department of labor and industries.

(3)
"Director" means the director of the department of labor and
industries.

(4)
"General contractor" means a contractor whose business operations
require the use of more than two unrelated building trades or crafts whose work
the contractor shall superintend or do in whole or in part. "General
contractor" shall not include an individual who does all work personally
without employees or other "specialty contractors" as defined in this
section. The terms "general contractor" and "builder" are
synonymous.

(((3)))
(5) "Partnership" means a business formed under Title 25 RCW.

(6)
"Residential homeowner" means an individual person or persons owning
real property upon which one single-family residence is to be built or upon
which there is a single-family residence to which construction improvements are
to be made and in which the owner intends to reside upon completion of any
construction.

(7)
"Specialty contractor" means a contractor whose operations do not
fall within the ((foregoing)) definition of "general contractor(("))."

(((4)))
(8) "Substantial completion" means the earliest occurrence of either:
(a) The date upon which the work of improvement has been completed as specified
under the contract; (b) the date upon which the improvement becomes usable or
fit for the purposes for which it was intended; (c) the date of issuance of a
certificate of occupancy; or (d) the date of occupation or use of the
improvement by the owner or an agent of the owner.

(9)
"Unregistered contractor" means a person, firm, or corporation doing
work as a contractor without being registered in compliance with this chapter.
"Unregistered contractor" includes contractors whose registration is
expired for more than thirty days beyond the renewal date or has been
suspended.

(((5)
"Department" means the department of labor and industries.

(6)
"Director" means the director of the department of labor and
industries.

(7))) (10)
"Verification" means the receipt and duplication by the city, town,
or county of a contractor registration card that is current on its face,
checking the department's contractor registration data base, or calling the
department to confirm that the contractor is registered.

(11)
"Work of improvement" means work performed or provided, including
labor, materials, equipment, and professional services, that led to the
improvement of real property for a private or public owner. Work of
improvement includes incremental improvements that are in themselves complete
but do not necessarily bring a property improvement to a state of substantial
completion.

Sec.
2. RCW
18.27.030 and 1998 c 279 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
An applicant for registration as a contractor shall submit an application under
oath upon a form to be prescribed by the director and which shall include the
following information pertaining to the applicant:

(a)
Employer social security number.

(b)
Evidence of workers' compensation coverage for the applicant's employees
working in Washington, as follows:

(i)
The applicant's industrial insurance account number issued by the department;

(ii)
The applicant's self-insurer number issued by the department; or

(iii)
For applicants domiciled in a state or province of Canada subject to an
agreement entered into under RCW 51.12.120(7), as permitted by the agreement,
filing a certificate of coverage issued by the agency that administers the
workers' compensation law in the applicant's state or province of domicile
certifying that the applicant has secured the payment of compensation under the
other state's or province's workers' compensation law.

(c)
Employment security department number.

(d)
State excise tax registration number.

(e)
Unified business identifier (UBI) account number may be substituted for the
information required by (b) of this subsection if the applicant will not employ
employees in Washington, and by (c) and (d) of this subsection.

(f)
Type of contracting activity, whether a general or a specialty contractor and
if the latter, the type of specialty.

(g)
The name and address of each partner if the applicant is a firm or partnership,
or the name and address of the owner if the applicant is an individual
proprietorship, or the name and address of the corporate officers and statutory
agent, if any, if the applicant is a corporation. The information contained in
such application is a matter of public record and open to public inspection.

(2)
The department may verify the workers' compensation coverage information
provided by the applicant under subsection (1)(b) of this section, including
but not limited to information regarding the coverage of an individual employee
of the applicant. If coverage is provided under the laws of another state, the
department may notify the other state that the applicant is employing employees
in Washington.

(3)(a)
The department shall deny an application for registration if: (i) The
applicant has been previously registered as a sole proprietor, partnership, or
corporation and the department has notice that the applicant has an
unsatisfied final judgment against him or her in an action based on this
chapter that was incurred during a previous registration under this chapter;
or (ii) the applicant was a principal or officer named on a previous
application of a previously registered partnership or corporation that has an
unsatisfied final judgment against it in an action based on this chapter that
was incurred during a previous registration under this chapter.

(b)
The department shall suspend an active registration if the department has
notice that the registrant is a sole proprietor or a principal or officer named
in the application of another registered entity that has an unsatisfied final
judgment against it.

(c)
The department shall not deny an application or suspend a registration because
of an unsatisfied final judgment if the applicant's or registrant's unsatisfied
final judgment was the result of the fraud or negligence of another party.

(4)
For the purposes of this section, "an unsatisfied final judgment"
includes a judgment assigned under RCW 19.72.070.

Sec.
3. RCW
18.27.040 and 1997 c 314 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each applicant shall file with the department a surety bond issued by a surety
insurer who meets the requirements of chapter 48.28 RCW in the sum of ((six))
twelve thousand dollars if the applicant is a general contractor and ((four))
six thousand dollars if the applicant is a specialty contractor. If no
valid bond is already on file with the department at the time the application
is filed, a bond must accompany the registration application. The bond shall
have the state of Washington named as obligee with good and sufficient surety
in a form to be approved by the department. The bond shall be continuous and
may be canceled by the surety upon the surety giving written notice to the
director of its intent to cancel the bond. A cancellation or revocation of the
bond or withdrawal of the surety from the bond suspends the registration issued
to the registrant until a new bond or reinstatement notice has been filed and
approved as provided in this section. The bond shall be conditioned that the
applicant will pay all persons performing labor, including employee benefits,
for the contractor, will pay all taxes and contributions due to the state of
Washington, and will pay all persons furnishing labor or material or renting or
supplying equipment to the contractor and will pay all amounts that may be
adjudged against the contractor by reason of breach of contract including
negligent or improper work in the conduct of the contracting business. A
change in the name of a business or a change in the type of business entity
shall not impair a bond for the purposes of this section so long as one of the
original applicants for such bond maintains partial ownership in the business
covered by the bond.

(2)
((Any contractor registered as of July 1, 1997, who maintains such
registration in accordance with this chapter shall be in compliance with this
chapter until the next annual renewal of the contractor's certificate of
registration. At that time)) At the time of initial registration or
renewal, the contractor shall provide a bond, cash deposit, or other
security deposit as required by this chapter and comply with all of the other
provisions of this chapter before the department shall issue or renew
the contractor's certificate of registration. Any increase in bond or
deposit amounts required by statutory changes to this chapter shall not be
required of a currently registered contractor until the next annual renewal of
the contractor's certificate of registration.

(3)
The total amount paid from a bond or deposit required by this section to
claimants other than residential homeowners must not exceed in the aggregate
six thousand dollars if provided by a general contractor and four thousand
dollars if provided by a specialty contractor.

(4)
Any person, firm, or corporation having a claim against the contractor for any
of the items referred to in this section may bring suit upon the bond or
deposit in the superior court of the county in which the work was done or of
any county in which jurisdiction of the contractor may be had. The surety
issuing the bond shall be named as a party to any suit upon the bond. Action
upon the bond or deposit shall be commenced by filing the summons and complaint
with the clerk of the appropriate superior court within one year from the date
of expiration of the certificate of registration in force at the time the
claimed labor was performed and benefits accrued, taxes and contributions owing
the state of Washington became due, materials and equipment were furnished, or
the claimed contract work was completed, substantially completed, or
abandoned. Service of process in an action against the contractor, the
contractor's bond, or the deposit shall be exclusively by service upon the
department. Three copies of the summons and complaint and a fee of ten dollars
to cover the handling costs shall be served by registered or certified mail
upon the department at the time suit is started and the department shall
maintain a record, available for public inspection, of all suits so commenced.
Service is not complete until the department receives the ten-dollar fee and
three copies of the summons and complaint. The service shall constitute
service on the registrant and the surety for suit upon the bond or deposit and
the department shall transmit the summons and complaint or a copy thereof to the
registrant at the address listed in the registrant's application and to the
surety within forty-eight hours after it shall have been received.

(((4)))
(5) The surety upon the bond shall not be liable in an aggregate amount
in excess of the amount named in the bond nor for any monetary penalty assessed
pursuant to this chapter for an infraction. The liability of the surety shall
not cumulate where the bond has been renewed, continued, reinstated, reissued
or otherwise extended. The surety upon the bond may, upon notice to the
department and the parties, tender to the clerk of the court having
jurisdiction of the action an amount equal to the claims thereunder or the
amount of the bond less the amount of judgments, if any, previously satisfied
therefrom and to the extent of such tender the surety upon the bond shall be
exonerated but if the actions commenced and pending at any one time exceed the
amount of the bond then unimpaired, claims shall be satisfied from the bond in
the following order:

(a)
Employee labor and claims of laborers, including employee benefits;

(b)
Claims for breach of contract by a party to the construction contract;

(c)
Registered subcontractors, material, and equipment;

(d)
Taxes and contributions due the state of Washington;

(e)
Any court costs, interest, and attorney's fees plaintiff may be entitled to
recover. The surety is not liable for any amount in excess of the penal limit
of its bond.

A
payment made by the surety in good faith exonerates the bond to the extent of
any payment made by the surety.

(((5)))
(6) If a final judgment impairs the liability of the surety upon the
bond so furnished that there shall not be in effect a bond undertaking in the
full amount prescribed in this section, the department shall suspend the registration
of the contractor until the bond liability in the required amount unimpaired by
unsatisfied judgment claims is furnished. If the bond becomes fully impaired,
a new bond must be furnished at the rates prescribed by this section.

(((6)))
(7) In lieu of the surety bond required by this section the contractor
may file with the department a deposit consisting of cash or other security
acceptable to the department.

(((7)))
(8) Any person having filed and served a summons and complaint as
required by this section having an unsatisfied final judgment against the
registrant for any items referred to in this section may execute upon the
security held by the department by serving a certified copy of the unsatisfied
final judgment by registered or certified mail upon the department within one
year of the date of entry of such judgment. Upon the receipt of service of
such certified copy the department shall pay or order paid from the deposit,
through the registry of the superior court which rendered judgment, towards the
amount of the unsatisfied judgment. The priority of payment by the department
shall be the order of receipt by the department, but the department shall have
no liability for payment in excess of the amount of the deposit.

(((8)))
(9) The director may adopt rules necessary for the proper administration
of the security.

Sec.
4. RCW
18.27.050 and 1987 c 303 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
At the time of registration and subsequent reregistration, the applicant shall
furnish insurance or financial responsibility in the form of an assigned
account in the amount of ((twenty)) fifty thousand dollars for
injury or damages to property, and ((fifty)) one hundred thousand
dollars for injury or damage including death to any one person, and ((one))
two hundred thousand dollars for injury or damage including death to
more than one person ((or financial responsibility to satisfy these amounts)).

(2)
Failure to maintain insurance or financial responsibility relative to the
contractor's activities shall be cause to suspend or deny the contractor his or
her or their registration.

(3)(a)
Proof of financial responsibility authorized in this section may be given by
providing, in the amount required by subsection (1) of this section, an
assigned account acceptable to the department. The assigned account shall be
held by the department to satisfy any execution on a judgment issued against
the contractor for damage to property or injury or death to any person
occurring in the contractor's contracting operations, according to the
provisions of the assigned account agreement. The department shall have no
liability for payment in excess of the amount of the assigned account.

(b)
The assigned account filed with the director as proof of financial
responsibility shall be canceled at the expiration of three years after:

(i)
The contractor's registration has expired or been revoked; or

(ii)
The contractor has furnished proof of insurance as required by subsection (1)
of this section;

if, in
either case, no legal action has been instituted against the contractor or on
the account at the expiration of the three-year period.

(c)
If a contractor chooses to file an assigned account as authorized in this
section, the contractor shall, on any contracting project, notify each person
with whom the contractor enters into a contract or to whom the contractor
submits a bid that the contractor has filed an assigned account in lieu of
insurance and that recovery from the account for any claim against the
contractor for property damage or personal injury or death occurring in the
project requires the claimant to obtain a court judgment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 18.27 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
If a contractor, whether registered or not, defaults in a payment, penalty, or
fine due to the department, the director or the director's designee may issue a
notice of assessment certifying the amount due. The notice must be served upon
the contractor by mailing the notice to the contractor by certified mail to the
contractor's last known address or served in the manner prescribed for the
service of a summons in a civil action.

(2)
A notice of assessment becomes final thirty days from the date the notice was
served upon the contractor unless a written request for reconsideration is
filed with the department or an appeal is filed in superior court in the manner
specified in RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598. The request for reconsideration
must set forth with particularity the reason for the contractor's request. The
department, within thirty days after receiving a written request for
reconsideration, may modify or reverse a notice of assessment, or may hold a
notice of assessment in abeyance pending further investigation. If a final
decision of a court in favor of the department is not appealed within the time
allowed by law, then the amount of the unappealed assessment, or such amount of
the assessment as is found due by the final decision of the court, is final.

(3)
The director or the director's designee may file with the clerk of any county
within the state a warrant in the amount of the notice of assessment. The
clerk of the county in which the warrant is filed shall immediately designate a
superior court cause number for the warrant, and the clerk shall cause to be
entered in the judgment docket under the superior court cause number assigned
to the warrant, the name of the contractor mentioned in the warrant, the amount
of payment, penalty, or fine due on it, and the date when the warrant was
filed. The aggregate amount of the warrant as docketed is a lien upon the
title to, and interest in, all real and personal property of the contractor
against whom the warrant is issued, the same as a judgment in a civil case
docketed in the office of the clerk. The sheriff shall proceed upon the
warrant in all respects and with like effect as prescribed by law with respect
to execution or other process issued against rights or property upon judgment
in the superior court. The warrant so docketed is sufficient to support the
issuance of writs of garnishment in favor of the state in a manner provided by
law in case of judgment, wholly or partially unsatisfied. The clerk of the
court is entitled to a filing fee of five dollars, which will be added to the
amount of the warrant. A copy of the warrant must be mailed to the contractor
within three days of filing with the clerk.

(4)
The director or the director's designee may issue to any person, firm,
corporation, municipal corporation, political subdivision of the state, a
public corporation, or any agency of the state, a notice and order to withhold
and deliver property of any kind whatsoever when he or she has reason to
believe that there is in the possession of the person, firm, corporation,
municipal corporation, political subdivision of the state, public corporation,
or agency of the state, property that is or will become due, owing, or
belonging to a contractor upon whom a notice of assessment has been served by
the department for payments, penalties, or fines due to the department. The
effect of a notice and order is continuous from the date the notice and order
is first made until the liability out of which the notice and order arose is
satisfied or becomes unenforceable because of lapse of time. The department
shall release the notice and order when the liability out of which the notice
and order arose is satisfied or becomes unenforceable by reason of lapse of
time and shall notify the person against whom the notice and order was made
that the notice and order has been released.

The
notice and order to withhold and deliver must be served by the sheriff of the
county or by the sheriff's deputy, by certified mail, return receipt requested,
or by an authorized representative of the director. A person, firm,
corporation, municipal corporation, political subdivision of the state, public
corporation, or agency of the state upon whom service has been made shall
answer the notice within twenty days exclusive of the day of service, under
oath and in writing, and shall make true answers to the matters inquired of in
the notice and order. Upon service of the notice and order, if the party
served possesses any property that may be subject to the claim of the
department, the party shall promptly deliver the property to the director or
the director's authorized representative. The director shall hold the property
in trust for application on the contractor's indebtedness to the department, or
for return without interest, in accordance with a final determination of a
petition for review. In the alternative, the party shall furnish a good and
sufficient surety bond satisfactory to the director conditioned upon final
determination of liability. If a party served and named in the notice fails to
answer the notice within the time prescribed in this section, the court may
render judgment by default against the party for the full amount claimed by the
director in the notice, together with costs. If a notice is served upon a
contractor and the property subject to it is wages, the contractor may assert
in the answer all exemptions provided for by chapter 6.27 RCW to which the wage
earner is entitled.

(5)
In addition to the procedure for collection of a payment, penalty, or fine due
to the department as set forth in this section, the department may recover
civil penalties imposed under this chapter in a civil action in the name of the
department brought in the superior court of the county where the violation is
alleged to have occurred.

Sec.
6. RCW
18.27.100 and 1997 c 314 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in RCW 18.27.065 for partnerships and joint ventures, no
person who has registered under one name as provided in this chapter shall
engage in the business, or act in the capacity, of a contractor under any other
name unless such name also is registered under this chapter.

(2)
All advertising and all contracts, correspondence, cards, signs, posters,
papers, and documents which show a contractor's name or address shall show the
contractor's name or address as registered under this chapter.

(3)(a)
All advertising that shows the contractor's name or address shall show the
contractor's current registration number. The registration number may be
omitted in an alphabetized listing of registered contractors stating only the
name, address, and telephone number: PROVIDED, That signs on motor vehicles
subject to RCW 46.16.010 and on-premise signs shall not constitute advertising
as provided in this section. All materials used to directly solicit business
from retail customers who are not businesses shall show the contractor's
current registration number. A contractor shall not use a false or expired
registration number in purchasing or offering to purchase an advertisement for
which a contractor registration number is required. Advertising by airwave
transmission shall not be subject to this subsection (3)(a).

(b)
The director may issue a subpoena to any person or entity selling any
advertising subject to this section for the name, address, and telephone number
provided to the seller of the advertising by the purchaser of the advertising.
The subpoena must have enclosed a stamped, self-addressed envelope and blank
form to be filled out by the seller of the advertising. If the seller of the
advertising has the information on file, the seller shall, within a reasonable
time, return the completed form to the department. The subpoena must be issued
before forty-eight hours after the expiration of the issue or publication
containing the advertising or after the broadcast of the advertising. The
good-faith compliance by a seller of advertising with a written request of the
department for information concerning the purchaser of advertising shall
constitute a complete defense to any civil or criminal action brought against
the seller of advertising arising from such compliance. Advertising by airwave
or electronic transmission is subject to this subsection (3)(b).

(4)
((No contractor shall advertise that he or she is bonded and insured because
of the bond required to be filed and sufficiency of insurance as provided in
this chapter.

(5))) A
contractor shall not falsify a registration number and use it, or use an
expired registration number, in connection with any solicitation or
identification as a contractor. All individual contractors and all partners,
associates, agents, salesmen, solicitors, officers, and employees of
contractors shall use their true names and addresses at all times while engaged
in the business or capacity of a contractor or activities related thereto.

(((6)))
(5) Any advertising by a person, firm, or corporation soliciting work as
a contractor when that person, firm, or corporation is not registered pursuant
to this chapter is a violation of this chapter.

(((7)))
(6)(a) The finding of a violation of this section by the director at a
hearing held in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05
RCW, shall subject the person committing the violation to a penalty of not more
than ((five)) ten thousand dollars as determined by the director.

(b)
Penalties under this section shall not apply to a violation determined to be an
inadvertent error.

Sec.
7. RCW
18.27.110 and 1997 c 314 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No city, town or county shall issue a construction building permit for work
which is to be done by any contractor required to be registered under this
chapter without verification that such contractor is currently registered as
required by law. When such verification is made, nothing contained in this
section is intended to be, nor shall be construed to create, or form the basis
for any liability under this chapter on the part of any city, town or county,
or its officers, employees or agents. However, failure to verify the
contractor registration number results in liability to the city, town, or
county to a penalty to be imposed according to RCW 18.27.100(((7))) (6)(a).

(2)
At the time of issuing the building permit, all cities, towns, or counties are
responsible for:

(a)
Printing the contractor registration number on the building permit; and

(b)
Providing a written notice to the building permit applicant informing them of
contractor registration laws and the potential risk and monetary liability to the
homeowner for using an unregistered contractor.

(3)
If a building permit is obtained by an applicant or contractor who falsifies
information to obtain an exemption provided under RCW 18.27.090, the building
permit shall be forfeited.

Sec.
8. RCW
18.27.114 and 1997 c 314 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any contractor agreeing to perform any contracting project: (a) For the
repair, alteration, or construction of four or fewer residential units or
accessory structures on such residential property when the bid or contract
price totals one thousand dollars or more; or (b) for the repair, alteration,
or construction of a commercial building when the bid or contract price totals
one thousand dollars or more but less than sixty thousand dollars, must provide
the customer with the following disclosure statement in substantially the
following form using lower case and upper case twelve-point and bold type where
appropriate, prior to starting work on the project:

"NOTICE TO CUSTOMER

((This contractor is registered with the state of
Washington, registration no. . . . ., as a general/specialty
contractor and has posted with the state a bond or cash deposit of
$6,000/$4,000 for the purpose of satisfying claims against the contractor for
negligent or improper work or breach of contract in the conduct of the
contractor's business. The expiration date of this contractor's registration
is . . . . . . This bond or cash deposit may not be
sufficient to cover a claim which might arise from the work done under your
contract. If any supplier of materials used in your construction project or
any employee of the contractor or subcontractor is not paid by the contractor
or subcontractor on your job, your property may be liened to force payment. If
you wish additional protection, you may request the contractor to provide you
with original "lien release" documents from each supplier or
subcontractor on your project. The contractor is required to provide you with
further information about lien release documents if you request it. General
information is also available from the department of labor and
industries."))

This contractor is registered with the state of
Washington, registration no. . . ., and has posted with the state a
bond or cash deposit of . . . . . for the purpose of
satisfying claims against the contractor for breach of contract including
negligent or improper work in the conduct of the contractor's business. The
expiration date of this contractor's registration is
. . . . ..

THIS BOND OR CASH DEPOSIT MIGHT NOT BE SUFFICIENT TO
COVER A CLAIM THAT MIGHT ARISE FROM THE WORK DONE UNDER YOUR CONTRACT.

This bond or deposit is not for your exclusive use
because it covers all work performed by this contractor. The bond or deposit
is intended to pay valid claims up to . . . . . that you
and other customers, suppliers, subcontractors, or taxing authorities may have.

FOR GREATER PROTECTION YOU MAY REQUEST YOUR CONTRACTOR
TO PROVIDE YOU WITH A PAYMENT AND PERFORMANCE BOND FOR YOUR JOB.

Your contractor may obtain a payment and performance
bond for an additional fee to guarantee payment of suppliers and subcontractors
and performance of your construction project.

Other methods of protecting yourself include: Employing
the services of an attorney, a construction contract control professional, or
other construction professional; entering into a joint check arrangement with
your contractor and his or her subcontractors and suppliers to insure that
payment is made to those parties; and withholding a contracturally defined
percentage of your construction contract as retainage for a stated period of
time to provide protection to you and help insure that your project will be
completed as required by your contract.

YOUR PROPERTY MAY BE LIENED.

If a supplier of materials used in your construction
project or an employee or subcontractor of your contractor or subcontractors is
not paid, your property may be liened to force payment and you could pay twice
for the same work.

FOR ADDITIONAL PROTECTION, YOU SHOULD MAKE CHECKS
PAYABLE JOINTLY TO THE CONTRACTOR AND SUPPLIERS OR SUBCONTRACTORS AND REQUIRE
THE CONTRACTOR TO PROVIDE YOU WITH ORIGINAL "LIEN RELEASE" DOCUMENTS
FROM EACH SUPPLIER OR SUBCONTRACTOR ON YOUR PROJECT.

The contractor is required to provide you with further
information about lien release documents if you request it. General
information is also available from the state Department of Labor and
Industries."

(2)
A contractor subject to this section shall notify any consumer to whom notice
is required under subsection (1) of this section if the contractor's
registration has expired or is revoked or suspended by the department prior to
completion or other termination of the contract with the consumer.

(3)
No contractor subject to this section may bring or maintain any lien claim
under chapter 60.04 RCW based on any contract to which this section applies
without alleging and proving that the contractor has provided the customer with
a copy of the disclosure statement as required in subsection (1) of this
section.

(4)
This section does not apply to contracts authorized under chapter 39.04 RCW or
to contractors contracting with other contractors.

(5)
Failure to comply with this section shall constitute an infraction under the
provisions of this chapter.

(6)
The department shall produce model disclosure statements, and public service
announcements detailing the information needed to assist contractors and
contractors' customers to comply under this section. As necessary, the
department shall periodically update these education materials.

Sec.
9. RCW
18.27.340 and 1997 c 314 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, a contractor
found to have committed an infraction under RCW 18.27.200 shall be assessed a
monetary penalty of not less than two hundred dollars and not more than five
thousand dollars.

(2)
The director may waive collection in favor of payment of restitution to a
consumer complainant.

(3)
A contractor found to have committed an infraction under RCW 18.27.200 for
failure to register shall be assessed a fine of not less than one thousand
dollars, nor more than five thousand dollars. The director may reduce the
penalty for failure to register, but in no case below five hundred dollars, if
the person becomes registered within ten days of receiving a notice of
infraction and the notice of infraction is for a first offense.

(4)
((Monetary penalties collected under this chapter shall be deposited in the
general fund.)) The department shall retain revenue generated through
fines and penalties for infractions of this chapter for the purposes of
administering and enforcing this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. (1)
The professional contractors' advisory board is created in the department. The
director shall appoint the board to consist of:

(a)
Five contractors who have been actively engaged in the contracting business for
a minimum of five years, two of whom are contractors primarily engaged in
commercial construction, two of whom are contractors primarily engaged in
residential construction, and one of whom is a specialty contractor. At least
three of the contractor members must be general contractors, and at least one
of the contractor members must be a specialty contractor;

(b)
One member of a labor organization representing the building trades;

(c)
One local building official; and

(d)
Four public members who are knowledgeable of and represent consumer's interests
in construction issues but do not meet any of the qualifications of (a) through
(c) of this subsection (1).

(2)
The board shall develop a dispute resolution process for construction disputes
that are currently experienced in the residential remodeling and construction
market and recommend it to the legislature and the director along with such
implementation steps as the board feels are warranted.

(3)
Each member of the board will receive compensation in accordance with RCW
43.03.240 and reimbursement for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(4)
The professional contractors' advisory board is terminated on February 1, 2000.

Sec.
11. RCW
60.04.031 and 1992 c 126 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as otherwise provided in this section, every person furnishing
professional services, materials, or equipment for the improvement of real
property shall give the owner or reputed owner notice in writing of the right
to claim a lien. If the prime contractor is in compliance with the
requirements of RCW 19.27.095, 60.04.230, and 60.04.261, this notice shall also
be given to the prime contractor as described in this subsection unless the
potential lien claimant has contracted directly with the prime contractor. The
notice may be given at any time but only protects the right to claim a lien for
professional services, materials, or equipment supplied after the date which is
sixty days before:

(a)
Mailing the notice by certified or registered mail to the owner or reputed
owner; or

(b)
Delivering or serving the notice personally upon the owner or reputed owner and
obtaining evidence of delivery in the form of a receipt or other
acknowledgement signed by the owner or reputed owner or an affidavit of
service.

In
the case of new construction of a single-family residence, the notice of a
right to claim a lien may be given at any time but only protects the right to
claim a lien for professional services, materials, or equipment supplied after
a date which is ten days before the notice is given as described in this
subsection.

(2)
Notices of a right to claim a lien shall not be required of:

(a)
Persons who contract directly with the owner or the owner's common law agent;

(b)
Laborers whose claim of lien is based solely on performing labor; or

(c)
Subcontractors who contract for the improvement of real property directly with
the prime contractor, except as provided in subsection (3)(b) of this section.

(3)
Persons who furnish professional services, materials, or equipment in
connection with the repair, alteration, or remodel of an existing
owner-occupied single-family residence or appurtenant garage or in
connection with the new construction of a single-family residence for a
residential homeowner:

(a)
Who contract directly with the ((owner-occupier)) owner or ((their))
the owner's common law agent shall not be required to send a written
notice of the right to claim a lien and shall have a lien for the full amount
due under their contract, as provided in RCW 60.04.021; or

(b)
Who do not contract directly with the ((owner-occupier)) owner or
((their)) the owner's common law agent shall give notice of the
right to claim a lien to the ((owner-occupier)) owner. Liens of
persons furnishing professional services, materials, or equipment who do not
contract directly with the ((owner-occupier)) owner or ((their))
the owner's common law agent may only be satisfied from amounts not yet
paid to the prime contractor by the owner at the time the notice described in
this section is received, regardless of whether amounts not yet paid to the
prime contractor are due. For the purposes of this subsection
"received" means actual receipt of notice by personal service, or
registered or certified mail, or three days after mailing by registered or
certified mail, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, or legal holidays.

(4)
The notice of right to claim a lien described in subsection (1) of this
section, shall include but not be limited to the following information and
shall substantially be in the following form, using lower-case and upper-case
ten-point type where appropriate.

NOTICE
TO OWNER

IMPORTANT: READ BOTH SIDES OF THIS NOTICE

CAREFULLY.

PROTECT YOURSELF FROM PAYING TWICE

To: ............. Date:..........................

Re: (description
of property: Street address or general location.)

From: ..........................................................

AT THE
REQUEST OF: (Name
of person ordering the professional services, materials, or
equipment)

THIS IS
NOT A LIEN‑-THIS NOTICE IS MEANT TO PROVIDE YOU WITH INFORMATION
NECESSARY TO PROPERLY MANAGE YOUR CONSTRUCTION PROJECT: This notice is
sent to you to tell you who is providing professional services, materials, or
equipment for the improvement of your property and to advise you of the rights
of these persons and your responsibilities. Also take note that laborers on
your project may claim a lien without sending you a notice.

OWNER/OCCUPIER OF EXISTING

RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY AND/OR

NEW RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY

Under
Washington law, those who furnish labor, professional services, materials, or
equipment for the repair, remodel, or alteration of your owner-occupied
principal residence and who are not paid, have a right to enforce their claim
for payment against your property. This claim is known as a construction lien.

The law
limits the amount that a lien claimant can claim against your property. If
the improvement to your property is the construction of a new single-family
residence, a lien may be claimed for all professional services, materials, or
equipment furnished during the ten days preceding the date this notice was
given to you or mailed to you and thereafter. Claims may only be made
against that portion of the contract price you have not yet paid to your prime
contractor as of the time this notice was given to you or three days after this
notice was mailed to you. Review the back of this notice for more information
and ways to avoid lien claims.

COMMERCIAL ((AND/OR NEW

RESIDENTIAL))
PROPERTY

We have
or will be providing professional services, materials, or equipment for the
improvement of your commercial ((or new residential)) project. In the
event you or your contractor fail to pay us, we may file a lien against your
property. A lien may be claimed for all professional services, materials, or
equipment furnished after a date that is sixty days before this notice was
given to you or mailed to you((, unless the improvement to your property is
the construction of a new single-family residence, then ten days before this
notice was given to you or mailed to you)).

Sender: ....................................................

Address: ...................................................

Telephone:
.................................................

Brief
description of professional services, materials, or equipment provided or to be
provided: ....................................

IMPORTANT INFORMATION

ON REVERSE SIDE

IMPORTANT INFORMATION

FOR YOUR PROTECTION

This
notice is sent to inform you that we have or will provide professional
services, materials, or equipment for the improvement of your property. We
expect to be paid by the person who ordered our services, but if we are not
paid, we have the right to enforce our claim by filing a construction lien
against your property.

LEARN
more about the lien laws and the meaning of this notice by discussing them with
your contractor, suppliers, Department of Labor and Industries, the firm
sending you this notice, your lender, or your attorney.

COMMON
METHODS TO AVOID CONSTRUCTION LIENS: There are several methods available to
protect your property from construction liens. The following are two of the
more commonly used methods.

DUAL PAYCHECKS (Joint Checks): When paying your
contractor for services or materials, you may make checks payable jointly to
the contractor and the firms furnishing you this notice.

LIEN RELEASES: You may require your contractor to
provide lien releases signed by all the suppliers and subcontractors from whom
you have received this notice. If they cannot obtain lien releases because you
have not paid them, you may use the dual payee check method to protect
yourself.

YOU
SHOULD TAKE APPROPRIATE STEPS TO PROTECT YOUR PROPERTY FROM LIENS.

YOUR
PRIME CONTRACTOR AND YOUR CONSTRUCTION LENDER ARE REQUIRED BY LAW TO GIVE YOU
WRITTEN INFORMATION ABOUT LIEN CLAIMS. IF YOU HAVE NOT RECEIVED IT, ASK THEM
FOR IT.

*
* * * * * * * * * * * *

(5)
Every potential lien claimant providing professional services where no
improvement as defined in RCW 60.04.011(5) (a) or (b) has been commenced, and
the professional services provided are not visible from an inspection of the
real property may record in the real property records of the county where the
property is located a notice which shall contain the professional service
provider's name, address, telephone number, legal description of the property,
the owner or reputed owner's name, and the general nature of the professional
services provided. If such notice is not recorded, the lien claimed shall be
subordinate to the interest of any subsequent mortgagee and invalid as to the
interest of any subsequent purchaser if the mortgagee or purchaser acts in good
faith and for a valuable consideration acquires an interest in the property
prior to the commencement of an improvement as defined in RCW 60.04.011(5) (a)
or (b) without notice of the professional services being provided. The notice
described in this subsection shall be substantially in the following form:

NOTICE OF FURNISHING

PROFESSIONAL SERVICES

That
on the (day) day of (month and
year) , (name of
provider) began providing professional
services upon or for the improvement of real property legally described as
follows:

[Legal Description

is
mandatory]

The
general nature of the professional services provided is..

.................................................................

The
owner or reputed owner of the real property is...............

.................................................................

...................................

(Signature)

...................................

(Name
of Claimant)

...................................

(Street
Address)

...................................

(City,
State, Zip Code)

...................................

(Phone
Number)

(6)
A lien authorized by this chapter shall not be enforced unless the lien
claimant has complied with the applicable provisions of this section.

(7) For the purposes of this section "commercial
property" includes residential property that is not owned by a residential
homeowner.

---
END ---