BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
41.06.071 and 1989 c 185 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the exemptions provided under RCW 41.06.070, the
provisions of this chapter shall not apply in the department of corrections to
the secretary, the secretary's personal secretary, the deputy ((secretary))
secretaries and their personal secretaries, all ((division directors
and assistant directors)) assistant deputy secretaries and their
personal secretaries, all regional administrators and program administrators,
all facility superintendents and associate superintendents for facilities with
a resident capacity of fifty or more, and all management and sales staff
of correctional industries.

---
END ---