BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 9A.44 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of custodial sexual misconduct in the first degree when the
person has sexual intercourse with another person:

(a)
When:

(i)
The victim is a resident of a state, county, or city adult or juvenile
correctional facility, including but not limited to jails, prisons, detention
centers, or work release facilities, or is under correctional supervision; and

(ii)
The perpetrator is an employee or contract personnel of a correctional agency
and the perpetrator has, or the victim reasonably believes the perpetrator has,
the ability to influence the terms, conditions, length, or fact of
incarceration or correctional supervision; or

(b)
When the victim is being detained, under arrest or in the custody of a law
enforcement officer and the perpetrator is a law enforcement officer.

(2)
Consent of the victim is not a defense to a prosecution under this section.

(3)
Custodial sexual misconduct in the first degree is a class C felony.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 9A.44 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of custodial sexual misconduct in the second degree when the
person has sexual contact with another person:

(a)
When:

(i)
The victim is a resident of a state, county, or city adult or juvenile
correctional facility, including but not limited to jails, prisons, detention
centers, or work release facilities, or is under correctional supervision; and

(ii)
The perpetrator is an employee or contract personnel of a correctional agency
and the perpetrator has, or the victim reasonably believes the perpetrator has,
the ability to influence the terms, conditions, length, or fact of
incarceration or correctional supervision; or

(b)
When the victim is being detained, under arrest, or in the custody of a law
enforcement officer and the perpetrator is a law enforcement officer.

(2)
Consent of the victim is not a defense to a prosecution under this section.

(3)
Custodial sexual misconduct in the second degree is a gross misdemeanor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 9A.44 RCW to read as follows:

It
is an affirmative defense to prosecution under section 1 or 2 of this act, to
be proven by the defendant by a preponderance of the evidence, that the act of
sexual intercourse or sexual contact resulted from forcible compulsion by the
other person.

Sec.
4. RCW
9.94A.320 and 1998 c 290 s 4, 1998 c 219 s 4, 1998 c 82 s 1, and 1998 c 78 s 1
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVAggravated Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XIVMurder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

XIIIMurder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

Malicious explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1 (RCW
70.74.270(1))

XIIAssault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW
70.74.272(1)(a))

XIRape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

XKidnapping 1 (RCW
9A.40.020)

Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Over 18 and deliver heroin, a narcotic from Schedule
I or II, or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Indecent Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW
9A.44.100(1)(a))

Manufacture of methamphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

IXAssault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Malicious placement of an explosive 2 (RCW
70.74.270(2))

Over 18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV,
or V or a nonnarcotic, except flunitrazepam, from Schedule I-V to someone under
18 and 3 years junior (RCW 69.50.406)

Controlled Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW
9.68A.040)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Vehicular Homicide, by being under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)

Homicide by Watercraft, by being under the influence
of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 88.12.029)

VIIIArson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Promoting Prostitution 1
(RCW 9A.88.070)

Selling for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any
controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver heroin or cocaine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Deliver or possess with intent to deliver
methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver amphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Possession of ephedrine or pseudoephedrine with
intent to manufacture methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle
in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

Homicide by Watercraft, by the operation of any
vessel in a reckless manner (RCW 88.12.029)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

VIIBurglary 1 (RCW
9A.52.020)

Vehicular Homicide, by
disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)

Homicide by Watercraft, by
disregard for the safety of others (RCW 88.12.029)

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible compulsion)
(RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Dealing in depictions of minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Sending, bringing into
state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.060)

Involving a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.401(f))

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in the first degree
(RCW 9.41.040(1)(a))

Malicious placement of an explosive 3 (RCW
70.74.270(3))

VIBribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110,
9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW
70.74.272(1)(b))

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II (except heroin or cocaine) or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW
9A.72.160)

Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(a))

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

VPersistent prison
misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW
9A.42.020)

Abandonment of dependent
person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Sexual Misconduct with a
Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW 9A.44.‑‑‑
(section 1 of this act))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Extortionate Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Advancing money or property for extortionate
extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Extortionate Means to Collect Extensions of Credit
(RCW 9A.82.040)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Bail Jumping with class A Felony (RCW
9A.76.170(2)(b))

Sexually Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

Delivery of imitation controlled substance by person
eighteen or over to person under eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

IVResidential Burglary (RCW
9A.52.025)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW
9A.56.080)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Commercial Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW
9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Malicious Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Willful Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW
72.66.060)

Hit and Run‑-Injury Accident (RCW
46.52.020(4))

Hit and Run with Vessel‑-Injury Accident (RCW
88.12.155(3))

Vehicular Assault (RCW 46.61.522)

Assault by Watercraft (RCW 88.12.032)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V
(except marijuana, amphetamine, methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)
(iii) through (v))

Influencing Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW
9A.82.070)

Use of Proceeds of
Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Knowingly Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW
9A.82.050(2))

IIICriminal Gang
Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Criminal Mistreatment 2
(RCW 9A.42.030)

Abandonment of dependent
person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Extortion 2 (RCW
9A.56.130)

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Assault 3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the second degree
(RCW 9.41.040(1)(b))

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Willful Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW
72.65.070)

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Communication with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Patronizing a Juvenile Prostitute (RCW 9.68A.100)

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW
9A.76.170(2)(c))

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Delivery of a material in lieu of a controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.401(c))

Manufacture, distribute, or possess with intent to
distribute an imitation controlled substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

Recklessly Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW
9A.82.050(1))

Theft of livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Securities Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

IIUnlawful Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Class B Felony Theft of Rental, Leased, or
Lease-purchased Property (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW
18.130.190(7))

Health Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Possession of controlled substance that is either
heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV
(RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession of phencyclidine (PCP) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Create, deliver, or possess a counterfeit controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.401(b))

Computer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Escape from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

ITheft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Class C Felony Theft of
Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Possession of Stolen
Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission (RCW
9A.56.070)

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW
46.61.024)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW
9A.56.060)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.140 (2) and
(3))

False Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forged Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged Prescription for a Controlled Substance (RCW
69.50.403)

Possess Controlled Substance that is a Narcotic from
Schedule III, IV, or V or Non-narcotic from Schedule I-V (except phencyclidine
or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Sec.
5. RCW
43.43.830 and 1998 c 10 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.840.

(1)
"Applicant" means:

(a)
Any prospective employee who will or may have unsupervised access to children
under sixteen years of age or developmentally disabled persons or vulnerable
adults during the course of his or her employment or involvement with the
business or organization;

(b)
Any prospective volunteer who will have regularly scheduled unsupervised access
to children under sixteen years of age, developmentally disabled persons, or
vulnerable adults during the course of his or her employment or involvement
with the business or organization under circumstances where such access will or
may involve groups of (i) five or fewer children under twelve years of age,
(ii) three or fewer children between twelve and sixteen years of age, (iii)
developmentally disabled persons, or (iv) vulnerable adults; or

(c)
Any prospective adoptive parent, as defined in RCW 26.33.020.

(2)
"Business or organization" means a business or organization licensed
in this state, any agency of the state, or other governmental entity, that
educates, trains, treats, supervises, houses, or provides recreation to
developmentally disabled persons, vulnerable adults, or children under sixteen
years of age, including but not limited to public housing authorities, school
districts, and educational service districts.

(3)
"Civil adjudication" means a specific court finding of sexual abuse
or exploitation or physical abuse in a dependency action under RCW 13.34.040 or
in a domestic relations action under Title 26 RCW. In the case of vulnerable
adults, civil adjudication means a specific court finding of abuse or financial
exploitation in a protection proceeding under chapter 74.34 RCW. It does not
include administrative proceedings. The term "civil adjudication" is
further limited to court findings that identify as the perpetrator of the abuse
a named individual, over the age of eighteen years, who was a party to the
dependency or dissolution proceeding or was a respondent in a protection
proceeding in which the finding was made and who contested the allegation of abuse
or exploitation.

(4)
"Conviction record" means "conviction record" information
as defined in RCW 10.97.030(3) relating to a crime against children or other
persons committed by either an adult or a juvenile. It does not include a
conviction for an offense that has been the subject of an expungement, pardon,
annulment, certificate of rehabilitation, or other equivalent procedure based
on a finding of the rehabilitation of the person convicted, or a conviction
that has been the subject of a pardon, annulment, or other equivalent procedure
based on a finding of innocence. It does include convictions for offenses for
which the defendant received a deferred or suspended sentence, unless the
record has been expunged according to law.

(5)
"Crime against children or other persons" means a conviction of any
of the following offenses: Aggravated murder; first or second degree murder;
first or second degree kidnaping; first, second, or third degree assault;
first, second, or third degree assault of a child; first, second, or third
degree rape; first, second, or third degree rape of a child; first or second
degree robbery; first degree arson; first degree burglary; first or second
degree manslaughter; first or second degree extortion; indecent liberties;
incest; vehicular homicide; first degree promoting prostitution; communication
with a minor; unlawful imprisonment; simple assault; sexual exploitation of
minors; first or second degree criminal mistreatment; child abuse or neglect as
defined in RCW 26.44.020; first or second degree custodial interference; first
or second degree custodial sexual misconduct; malicious harassment; first,
second, or third degree child molestation; first or second degree sexual
misconduct with a minor; patronizing a juvenile prostitute; child abandonment;
promoting pornography; selling or distributing erotic material to a minor;
custodial assault; violation of child abuse restraining order; child buying or
selling; prostitution; felony indecent exposure; criminal abandonment; or any
of these crimes as they may be renamed in the future.

(6)
"Crimes relating to drugs" means a conviction of a crime to
manufacture, delivery, or possession with intent to manufacture or deliver a
controlled substance.

(7)
"Crimes relating to financial exploitation" means a conviction for
first, second, or third degree extortion; first, second, or third degree theft;
first or second degree robbery; forgery; or any of these crimes as they may be
renamed in the future.

(8)
"Disciplinary board final decision" means any final decision issued
by a disciplining authority under chapter 18.130 RCW or the secretary of the
department of health for the following businesses or professions:

(a)
Chiropractic;

(b)
Dentistry;

(c)
Dental hygiene;

(d)
Massage;

(e)
Midwifery;

(f)
Naturopathy;

(g)
Osteopathic medicine and surgery;

(h)
Physical therapy;

(i)
Physicians;

(j)
Practical nursing;

(k)
Registered nursing; and

(l)
Psychology.

"Disciplinary
board final decision," for real estate brokers and salespersons, means any
final decision issued by the director of the department of licensing for real
estate brokers and salespersons.

(9)
"Unsupervised" means not in the presence of:

(a)
Another employee or volunteer from the same business or organization as the
applicant; or

(b)
Any relative or guardian of any of the children or developmentally disabled
persons or vulnerable adults to which the applicant has access during the course
of his or her employment or involvement with the business or organization.

(10)
"Vulnerable adult" means "vulnerable adult" as defined in
chapter 74.34 RCW, except that for the purposes of requesting and receiving
background checks pursuant to RCW 43.43.832, it shall also include adults of
any age who lack the functional, mental, or physical ability to care for
themselves.

(11)
"Financial exploitation" means the illegal or improper use of a
vulnerable adult or that adult's resources for another person's profit or
advantage.

(12)
"Agency" means any person, firm, partnership, association,
corporation, or facility which receives, provides services to, houses or
otherwise cares for vulnerable adults.

Sec.
6. RCW
70.125.030 and 1996 c 123 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter and unless the context indicates otherwise:

(1)
"Core services" means treatment services for victims of sexual
assault including information and referral, crisis intervention, medical
advocacy, legal advocacy, support, and system coordination.

(2)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(3)
"Law enforcement agencies" means police and sheriff's departments of
this state.

(4)
"Personal representative" means a friend, relative, attorney, or
employee or volunteer from a community sexual assault program or specialized
treatment service provider.

(5)
"Rape crisis center" means a community-based social service agency
which provides services to victims of sexual assault.

(6)
"Community sexual assault program" means a community-based social
service agency that is qualified to provide and provides core services to
victims of sexual assault.

(7)
"Sexual assault" means one or more of the following:

(a)
Rape or rape of a child;

(b)
Assault with intent to commit rape or rape of a child;

(c)
Incest or indecent liberties;

(d)
Child molestation;

(e)
Sexual misconduct with a minor;

(f)
Custodial sexual misconduct;

(g)
Crimes with a sexual motivation; or

(((g)))
(h) An attempt to commit any of the aforementioned offenses.

(8)
"Specialized services" means treatment services for victims of sexual
assault including support groups, therapy, specialized sexual assault medical
examination, and prevention education to potential victims of sexual assault.

(9)
"Victim" means any person who suffers physical and/or mental anguish
as a proximate result of a sexual assault.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall investigate any alleged violations of section
1 or 2 of this act that are alleged to have been committed by an employee or
contract personnel of the department, to determine whether there is probable
cause to believe that the allegation is true before reporting the alleged
violation to a prosecuting attorney.

---
END ---