BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.04.105 and 1992 c 103 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The certificate of "certified public accountant" shall be granted by
the board to any person:

(a)
Who is of good character. Good character, for purposes of this section, means
lack of a history of dishonest or felonious acts. The board may refuse to
grant a certificate on the ground of failure to satisfy this requirement only
if there is a substantial connection between the lack of good character of the
applicant and the professional responsibilities of a certified public
accountant and if the finding by the board of lack of good character is
supported by a preponderance of evidence. When an applicant is found to be
unqualified for a certificate because of a lack of good character, the board
shall furnish the applicant a statement containing the findings of the board
and a notice of the applicant's right of appeal;

(b)
Who has met the educational standards established by rule as the board
determines to be appropriate;

The
board may, in its discretion, waive the educational requirements for any person
if it is satisfied through review of documentation of successful completion of
an equivalency examination that the person's educational qualifications are an
acceptable substitute for the requirements of (b) of this subsection; and

(c)
Who has passed a written examination.

(2)
The examination described in subsection (1)(c) of this section shall be in
writing, shall be held twice a year, and shall test the applicant's knowledge
of the subjects of accounting and auditing, and other related fields the board
may specify by rule. The time for holding the examination is fixed by the
board and may be changed from time to time. The board shall prescribe by rule
the methods of applying for and taking the examination, including methods for
grading papers and determining a passing grade required of an applicant for a
certificate. The board shall to the extent possible see to it that the grading
of the examination, and the passing grades, are uniform with those applicable
to all other states. The board may make use of all or a part of the uniform
certified public accountant examination and advisory grading service of the
American Institute of Certified Public Accountants and may contract with third
parties to perform administrative services with respect to the examination as
the board deems appropriate to assist it in performing its duties under this
chapter.

(3)
An applicant is required to pass all sections of the examination provided for
in subsection (2) of this section in order to qualify for a certificate. If at
a given sitting of the examination an applicant passes two or more but not all
sections, then the applicant shall be given credit for those sections that he
or she passed, and need not take those sections again: PROVIDED, That:

(a)
The applicant took all sections of the examination at that sitting;

(b)
The applicant attained a minimum grade of fifty on each section not passed at
that sitting;

(c)
The applicant passes the remaining sections of the examination within six
consecutive examinations given after the one at which the first sections were
passed;

(d)
At each subsequent sitting at which the applicant seeks to pass additional
sections, the applicant takes all sections not yet passed; and

(e)
In order to receive credit for passing additional sections in a subsequent
sitting, the applicant attains a minimum grade of fifty on sections written but
not passed on the sitting.

(4)
The board may waive or defer any of the requirements of subsection (3) of this
section for candidates transferring conditional CPA exam credits from other
states or for qualifying reciprocity certification applicants who met the
conditioning requirements of the state or foreign jurisdiction issuing their
original certificate.

(5)
The board shall charge each applicant an examination fee for the initial
examination under subsection (1) of this section, or for reexamination under
subsection (3) of this section for each subject in which the applicant is
reexamined. The applicable fee shall be paid by the person at the time he or
she applies for examination, reexamination, or evaluation of educational
qualifications. Fees for examination, reexamination, or evaluation of
educational qualifications shall be determined by the board under chapter 18.04
RCW. There is established in the state treasury an account to be known as the
certified public accountants' account. All fees received from candidates to
take any or all sections of the certified public accountant examination shall
be used only for costs related to the examination.

(6)
Persons who on June 30, 1986, held certified public accountant certificates
previously issued under the laws of this state shall not be required to obtain
additional certificates under this chapter, but shall otherwise be subject to
this chapter. Certificates previously issued shall, for all purposes, be
considered certificates issued under this chapter and subject to its
provisions.

(7)
A certificate of a "certified public accountant" under this chapter
is issued on a biennial basis with renewal subject to requirements of
continuing professional education and payment of fees, prescribed by the board.

(8)
The board shall adopt rules providing for continuing professional education for
certified public accountants. The rules shall:

(a)
Provide that a certified public accountant shall verify to the board that he or
she has completed at least an accumulation of ((eighty)) one hundred
twenty hours of continuing professional education during the last ((two-year))
three-year period to maintain the certificate;

(b)
Establish continuing professional education requirements;

(c)
Establish when newly certificated public accountants shall verify that they
have completed the required continuing professional education; ((and))

(d)
Provide that failure to furnish verification of the completion of the
continuing professional education requirement shall make the certificate
invalid and subject to reinstatement, unless the board determines that the
failure was due to retirement, reasonable cause, or excusable neglect; and

(e)
Provide for transition from existing to new continuing professional education
requirements.

(9)
The board may adopt by rule new CPE standards that differ from those in
subsection (8) of this section or RCW 18.04.215 if the new standards comply
with the CPE standards in the uniform accountancy act as proposed by the
American institute of certified public accountants and the national association
of state boards of accountancy.

Sec.
2. RCW
18.04.215 and 1992 c 103 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Biennial licenses shall be issued by the board:

(a)
To holders of certificates as certified public accountants who have
demonstrated, in accordance with rules issued by the board, one year of public
accounting experience, or such other experience or employment which the board
in its discretion regards as substantially equivalent and who, if their
certificate was issued more than forty-eight months prior to application under
this section, submit to the board satisfactory proof of having completed an
accumulation of ((eighty)) one hundred twenty hours of continuing
professional education during the ((twenty-four)) thirty-six
months preceding the application;

(b)
To firms under RCW 18.04.195, if all offices of the firm in this state are
maintained and registered as required under RCW 18.04.205.

(2)
The board shall, by rule, provide for a system of certificate and license
renewal. Applicants for issuance or renewal of certificates or licenses shall,
at the time of filing their applications, list with the board all states and
foreign jurisdictions in which they hold or have applied for certificates,
permits or licenses to practice.

(3)
A certified public accountant who holds a permit or license issued by another
state, and applies for a license in this state, may practice in this state from
the date of filing a completed application with the board, until the board has
acted upon the application provided the application is made prior to holding
out as a certified public accountant in this state and no sanctions or
investigations, deemed by the board to be pertinent to public accountancy, by
other jurisdictions or agencies are in process.

(4)
A certified public accountant shall submit to the board satisfactory proof of
having completed an accumulation of ((eighty)) one hundred twenty
hours of continuing education recognized and approved by the board during the
preceding ((two)) three years. Failure to furnish this evidence
as required shall make the certificate invalid and subject to reinstatement
procedures, unless the board determines the failure to have been due to retirement,
reasonable cause, or excusable neglect.

The
board in its discretion may renew a certificate or license despite failure to
furnish evidence of compliance with requirements of continuing professional
education upon condition that the applicant follow a particular program of
continuing professional education. In issuing rules and individual orders with
respect to continuing professional education requirements, the board, among
other considerations, may rely upon guidelines and pronouncements of recognized
educational and professional associations, may prescribe course content,
duration, and organization, and may take into account the accessibility of
continuing education to applicants and instances of individual hardship.

(5) Fees for issuance or renewal of certificates and licenses in
this state shall be determined by the board under chapter 18.04 RCW. Fees
shall be paid by the applicant at the time the application form is filed with
the board. The board, by rule, may provide for proration of fees for
certificates and licenses issued between normal renewal dates.

---
END ---