BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 35.63 RCW to read as follows:

Notwithstanding
any zoning provision pertaining to minimum lot sizes, property that is zoned
agricultural and is at least twenty-five acres in size may be developed, so
long as:

(1)
The property is transferred to an immediate family member; and

(2)
Each lot that is created contains sufficient area for a single-family residence
and an on-site sewage disposal system using any method of on-site sewage
disposal appropriate for the lot under standards that exist when the lots are
created, as determined by the local health department with a lot and on-site
sewage disposal system submitted for final approval to the legislative body of
the city or town within five years of the date of creation of the lot.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 35A.63 RCW to read as follows:

Notwithstanding
any zoning provision pertaining to minimum lot sizes, property that is zoned
agricultural and is at least twenty-five acres in size may be developed, so
long as:

(1)
The property is transferred to an immediate family member; and

(2)
Each lot that is created contains sufficient area for a single-family residence
and an on-site sewage disposal system using any method of on-site sewage
disposal appropriate for the lot under standards that exist when the lots are
created, as determined by the local health department with a lot and on-site
sewage disposal system submitted for final approval to the legislative body of
the city within five years of the date of creation of the lot.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 36.70 RCW to read as follows:

Notwithstanding
any zoning provision pertaining to minimum lot sizes, property that is zoned
agricultural and is at least twenty-five acres in size may be developed, so
long as:

(1)
The property is transferred to an immediate family member; and

(2)
Each lot that is created contains sufficient area for a single-family residence
and an on-site sewage disposal system using any method of on-site sewage
disposal appropriate for the lot under standards that exist when the lots are
created, as determined by the local health department with a lot and on-site
sewage disposal system submitted for final approval to the legislative body of
the county within five years of the date of creation of the lot.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

Notwithstanding
any zoning provision pertaining to minimum lot sizes, property that is zoned
agricultural and is at least twenty-five acres in size may be developed, so
long as:

(1)
The property is transferred to an immediate family member; and

(2) Each lot that is created contains sufficient area for a
single-family residence and an on-site sewage disposal system using any method
of on-site sewage disposal appropriate for the lot under standards that exist
when the lots are created, as determined by the local health department with a
lot and on-site sewage disposal system submitted for final approval to the
legislative body of the county, city, or town within five years of the date of
creation of the lot.

---
END ---