BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
64.40.020 and 1982 c 232 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Owners of a property interest who have filed an application for a permit,
and other property owners or organizations with standing to oppose the granting
of the permit and who have participated in administrative proceedings regarding
the permit, have an action for damages to obtain relief from acts of an
agency which are arbitrary, capricious, unlawful, or exceed lawful authority,
or relief from a failure to act within time limits established by law:
PROVIDED, That the action is unlawful or in excess of lawful authority only if
the final decision of the agency was made with knowledge of its unlawfulness or
that it was in excess of lawful authority, or it should reasonably have been
known to have been unlawful or in excess of lawful authority.

(2)
The prevailing party in an action brought pursuant to this chapter may be
entitled to reasonable costs and attorney's fees.

(3)
No cause of action is created for relief from unintentional procedural or
ministerial errors of an agency.

(4) Invalidation of any regulation in effect prior to the date an
application for a permit is filed with the agency shall not constitute a cause
of action under this chapter.

---
END ---