BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that in the enactment of the growth management act in 1990,
the legislature expressed its intent that city and county comprehensive plans
be the guiding local documents for land use activities and that the
implementation through development regulations be consistent with such plans.
However, a recent appellate court decision has construed the legislation in a
manner inconsistent with this intent. It is the purpose of this act to
reaffirm the legislature's intent that comprehensive plans providing greater
restrictions will control over inconsistent development regulations.

Sec.
2. RCW
36.70A.120 and 1993 sp.s. c 6 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Each county and city that is required or chooses to plan under RCW
36.70A.040 shall perform its activities and make capital budget decisions in
conformity with its comprehensive plan. In the event of a conflict between
a comprehensive plan and development regulations adopted before adoption of a
comprehensive plan, the policies of the comprehensive plan shall apply to any
project permit application as that term is defined in RCW 36.70B.020.

---
END ---