BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
90.58.200 and 1971 ex.s. c 286 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

The department and local governments are authorized to adopt such
rules as are necessary and appropriate to carry out the provisions of this
chapter. No rule adopted by the department or by any local government may
be construed to change the definitions in RCW 90.58.030. In the event that any
rule by the department or by a local government conflicts with the criteria in
RCW 90.58.030, the criteria shall control.

---
END ---