BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.70.070 and 1996 c 194 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Before issuing a vehicle dealer's license, the department shall require the
applicant to file with the department a surety bond in the amount of:

(a)
((Fifteen)) Forty-five thousand dollars for motor vehicle
dealers;

(b)
Thirty thousand dollars for mobile home, park trailer, and travel trailer
dealers: PROVIDED, That if such dealer does not deal in mobile homes or park
trailers such bond shall be fifteen thousand dollars;

(c)
Five thousand dollars for miscellaneous dealers,

running
to the state, and executed by a surety company authorized to do business in the
state. Such bond shall be approved by the attorney general as to form and
conditioned that the dealer shall conduct his business in conformity with the
provisions of this chapter.

Any
retail purchaser, consignor who is not a motor vehicle dealer, or a motor
vehicle dealer who has purchased from, sold to, or otherwise transacted
business with a wholesale dealer, who has suffered any loss or damage by reason
of any act by a dealer which constitutes a violation of this chapter shall have
the right to institute an action for recovery against such dealer and the
surety upon such bond. However, under this section, motor vehicle dealers who
have purchased from, sold to, or otherwise transacted business with wholesale
dealers may only institute actions against wholesale dealers and their surety
bonds. Successive recoveries against said bond shall be permitted, but the
aggregate liability of the surety to all persons shall in no event exceed the
amount of the bond. Upon exhaustion of the penalty of said bond or
cancellation of the bond by the surety the vehicle dealer license shall
automatically be deemed canceled.

(2)
The bond for any vehicle dealer licensed or to be licensed under more than one
classification shall be the highest bond required for any such classification.

(3) Vehicle dealers shall maintain a bond for each business
location in this state and bond coverage for all temporary subagencies.

---
END ---