BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. Local
governments enter into separate, individual contracts with banks for custody
services. The rate and terms which each local government obtains from a given
bank sometimes varies widely depending upon the size of the local government's
portfolio, and thus fails to provide all of the state's taxpayers with the most
advantageous rates and terms for such custody services. The purpose of this
act is to enable local governments, through a state-wide custody contract, to
collectively obtain the most advantageous rate and terms from a single
financial institution for custodial banking services. Under such a state-wide
custody contract, smaller local governments may receive a higher level of
service, while paying lower fees than they might have individually obtained.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The state treasurer is authorized to negotiate a state-wide custody contract
for local government custody services. The term of the contract shall be for a
minimum of four years.

(2)
The state treasurer shall, as soon as is practical after negotiations have been
successfully completed, notify local governments that a state-wide custody
contract has been negotiated.

(3)
Following such notification, each local government may, at its option, become a
signatory to the state-wide contract. Each local government may only become a
signatory to the contract by having its authorized local government official or
financial officer and the state-wide custodian execute the state-wide contract.
The contract is between the state-wide custodian and the respective local
government. It is the responsibility of the local government official or
financial officer to fully understand the terms and conditions of the
state-wide custody contract prior to its execution, and to ensure those terms
and conditions are observed by the state-wide custodian during the term of the
contract.

(4)
The state treasurer may adopt rules to implement this section, including, but
not limited to, those rules deemed necessary to provide for an orderly
transition in the event of a different state-wide custodian in a new state-wide
custody contract.

(5)
Any state-wide custodian who becomes a signatory to the state-wide custody
contract may be exempted from the requirements of chapter 39.58 RCW for the
purposes of this section, based on rules adopted by the public deposit
protection commission.

(6)
For the purposes of this section:

(a)
"Financial institution" means a bank or trust company chartered and
supervised under state or federal law;

(b)
"Local government" means any county, city, town, special purpose
district, political subdivision, municipal corporation, or quasi-municipal
corporation, including any public corporation created by such an entity, which
legally possesses and exercises investment authority;

(c)
"State-wide custody contract" means a contract negotiated between the
state treasurer and a financial institution that establishes terms and fees for
custody services which are optional to any local government for the term of the
contract;

(d)
"State-wide custodian" means the financial institution with whom the
state treasurer has negotiated a state-wide custody contract;

(e)
"Custody services" means services performed by a financial
institution such as the settlement, safekeeping, valuation, and market-value
reporting of negotiable instruments owned by the local government;

(f)
"Local government official" means any officer or employee of a local
government who has been designated by statute or local charter, ordinance, or
resolution as the officer having the authority to invest the funds of the local
government. However, the county treasurer is the only local government
official for all political subdivisions for which the county treasurer has
statutory or contractual authority to invest the funds thereof;

(g)
"Financial officer" means the board-appointed treasurer of a college,
university, community or technical college district, or the state board for
community and technical colleges.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 39.58 RCW to read as follows:

A
state-wide custodian under section 2 of this act may be exempted from the
requirements of this chapter, based on rules adopted by the public deposit
protection commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act takes effect September 1, 1999.

---
END ---