BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

The secretary may solicit and accept such grants, services, and
property from the federal government, foundations, organizations, medical
schools, and other entities as are available for the purpose of designing and
implementing programs that specifically address the health-related needs of
women.

---
END ---