BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that over twenty-five thousand state residents per year file
cases and complaints with the department of labor and industries alleging they
have been denied payment for work they performed. Each month an average of
over one million dollars in back wages is sought by workers. The legislature
further finds that greater enforcement of and compliance with minimum wage and
wage payment laws is essential. The legislature intends that interest on back
wages may be assessed and civil penalties may be imposed against employers that
fail to comply with minimum wage and wage payment laws. The legislature
further intends that any such penalties be deposited in a dedicated account,
and be used by the department of labor and industries to administer and enforce
wage payment laws.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 49.48 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Every employer shall establish and maintain a regular payday, when all
employees shall be paid the wages due them.

(2)
The regular payday shall be at least once per month.

(3)
This section does not prevent the employer from establishing and maintaining
regular paydays at more frequent intervals.

(4)
This section does not prevent the employer from implementing a regular payroll
system in which wages from up to seven days before the regular payday may be
withheld from the covered pay period and included in the next pay period.

(5)
This section does not prevent any employer from entering into a written
agreement, prior to the rendering of any services, and mutually satisfactory
with the employees, as to the payment of wages at a future date.

Sec.
3. RCW
49.46.100 and 1959 c 294 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any employer who hinders or delays the director or ((his)) the
director's authorized representatives in the performance of ((his)) the
director's duties in the enforcement of this chapter, or refuses to admit
the director or ((his)) the director's authorized representatives
to any place of employment, or fails to make, keep, and preserve any records as
required under the provisions of this chapter, or falsifies any such record, or
refuses to make any record accessible to the director or ((his)) the
director's authorized representatives upon demand, or refuses to furnish a
sworn statement of such record or any other information required for the proper
enforcement of this chapter to the director or ((his)) the director's
authorized representatives upon demand((, or pays or agrees to pay wages at
a rate less than the rate applicable under this chapter, or otherwise violates
any provision of this chapter or of any regulation issued under this chapter))
shall be deemed in violation of this chapter and shall((, upon conviction
therefor, be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(2)
Any)) be assessed a civil penalty of not more than one
thousand dollars depending on the size of the business and the gravity of the
violation.

(2)(a)
An employer who pays or agrees to pay wages at a rate less than the rate
applicable under this chapter or any rule or order adopted under this chapter
may be assessed civil penalties of an amount equal to twenty percent of the
wage violation.

(b)
An employer who willfully or repeatedly pays or agrees to pay wages at a rate
less than the rate applicable under this chapter or a rule or order adopted
under this chapter is in violation of this chapter, and upon conviction, is
guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(c)
An employer who fails to pay wages due as required by this chapter may be
assessed civil penalties of:

(i)
Fifty dollars for each failure to pay each worker; and

(ii)
For each subsequent violation, or any willful or intentional violation, one
hundred dollars for each failure to pay each worker, plus twenty-five percent
of the amount of wages unlawfully withheld.

(d)
An employer who does not pay all wages owed within seventy-two hours of an
order issued by the department under RCW 49.48.040(1)(c) shall, in addition to
any other applicable penalty, be assessed a civil penalty equal to three times
the amount of wages due and not paid.

(3)
Upon a finding by the director that an employer who discharges or in any
other manner discriminates against any employee because such employee has made
any complaint to ((his)) the employer, to the director, or ((his))
the director's authorized representatives that ((he has not been paid))
wages have not been paid in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter, or that the employer has violated any provision of this chapter, or
because such employee has caused to be instituted or is about to cause to be
instituted any proceeding under or related to this chapter, or because such
employee has testified or is about to testify in any such proceeding ((shall
be deemed in violation of this chapter and shall, upon conviction therefor, be
guilty of a gross misdemeanor)), the director may require an employer
who has discharged or discriminated against an employee in violation of this
chapter to reinstate the employee to the same position with back pay and
interest of up to one percent per month.

(4)
Civil penalties imposed under this chapter shall be paid to the director for
deposit in the wage claim collection account. Civil penalties may be recovered
and other civil remedies authorized by this chapter may be enforced in a civil
action in the name of the department brought in the superior court of the
county where the violation is alleged to have occurred, or the department may
use the procedures for collection of wages set forth in chapter 49.48 RCW.

Sec.
4. RCW
49.48.020 and 1971 ex.s. c 55 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person, firm, or corporation which violates any of the provisions
of ((RCW 49.48.010 through 49.48.030 and 49.48.060 shall be)) this
chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor.

Sec.
5. RCW
49.48.040 and 1987 c 172 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of labor and industries ((may)) shall:

(a)
Upon obtaining information indicating an employer may be committing a violation
under chapter((s)) 39.12, 49.46, ((and)) or 49.48 RCW,
conduct investigations to ensure compliance with chapters 39.12, 49.46, and
49.48 RCW;

(b)
Upon completing an investigation, issue a written determination, including
findings of fact, as to the alleged violation of this chapter or chapter 39.12
or 49.46 RCW:

(c)
Upon determining that a violation of this chapter or chapter 39.12 or 49.46 RCW
has occurred, order the payment of all wages owed the workers, including
interest of up to one percent per month on back wages owed, and institute
actions necessary for the collection of the sums determined owed; and

(((c)))
(d) Take assignments of wage claims and prosecute actions for the
collection of wages ((of persons who are financially unable to employ
counsel)), and interest of up to one percent per month on back wages
owed when in the judgment of the director of the department the claims are
valid and enforceable in the courts, unless the workers cancel such
assignments or prosecute such actions with the assistance of independent legal
counsel or pro se.

(2)
The director of the department or any authorized representative may, for the
purpose of carrying out ((RCW 49.48.040 through 49.48.080)) this
chapter: (a) Issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses or
parties and the production of books, papers, or records; (b) administer oaths
and examine witnesses under oath; (c) take the verification of proof of
instruments of writing; and (d) take depositions and affidavits. If
assignments for wage claims are taken, court costs shall not be payable by the
department for prosecuting such suits.

(3)
The director shall have a seal inscribed "Department of Labor and
Industries--State of Washington" and all courts shall take judicial notice
of such seal. Obedience to subpoenas issued by the director or authorized
representative shall be enforced by the courts in any county.

(4)
The director or authorized representative shall have free access to all places
and works of labor. Any employer or any agent or employee of such employer who
refuses the director or authorized representative admission therein, or who,
when requested by the director or authorized representative, willfully
neglects or refuses to furnish the director or authorized representative any
statistics or information pertaining to ((his or her)) the lawful
duties of the employee or agent, which statistics or information may be
in ((his or her)) the possession or under the control of the
employer or agent, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(5)
An action for relief under this section shall be commenced within three years
after the cause of action accrues, unless a longer period of time applies under
law.

Sec.
6. RCW
49.48.050 and 1935 c 96 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing
herein contained shall be construed to limit the authority of the prosecuting
attorney of any county to prosecute actions, both civil and criminal, for ((such))
violations of ((RCW 49.48.040 through 49.48.080 as may come to his knowledge))
this chapter, or to enforce the provisions ((hereof)) of this
chapter independently and without specific direction of the director of
labor and industries.

Sec.
7. RCW
49.48.060 and 1971 ex.s. c 55 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If upon investigation by the director, after taking assignments of any wage
claim under RCW 49.48.040, it appears to the director that the employer is
representing to ((his)) employees that ((he)) the employer
is able to pay wages for their services and that the employees are not being
paid for their services or if the director determines an employer has
repeatedly violated the provisions of this chapter or chapter 39.12 or 49.46
RCW, requiring payment of wages, the director may require the employer to
give a bond in such sum as the director deems reasonable and adequate in the
circumstances, with sufficient surety, conditioned that the employer will for a
definite future period not exceeding six months conduct ((his)) business
and pay ((his)) employees in accordance with the laws of the state of
Washington.

(2)
If within ten days after demand for such bond the employer fails to provide the
same, the director may commence a suit against the employer in the superior
court of appropriate jurisdiction to compel ((him)) the employer
to furnish such bond or cease doing business until ((he)) the
employer has done so. The employer shall have the burden of proving the
amount thereof to be excessive.

(3)
If the court finds that there is just cause for requiring such bond and that
the same is reasonable, necessary or appropriate to secure ((the))
prompt payment of the wages of the employees of such employer and ((his))
compliance with ((RCW 49.48.010 through 49.48.080)) this chapter,
the court shall enjoin such employer from doing business in this state until
the requirement is met, or shall make other, and may make further, orders
appropriate to compel compliance with the requirement.

Upon
being informed of a wage claim against an employer or former employer, the
director shall, if such claim appears to be just, immediately notify the
employer or former employer, of such claim by mail. If the employer or former
employer fails to pay the claim or make satisfactory explanation to the
director of ((his)) the failure to do so, within thirty days
thereafter, the employer or former employer shall be liable to a penalty of ((ten))
twenty percent of that portion of the claim found to be justly due. The
director shall have a cause of action against the employer or former employer
for the recovery of such penalty, and the same may be included in any
subsequent action by the director on said wage claim, or may be exercised
separately after adjustment of such wage claim without court action.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
new section is added to chapter 49.48 RCW to read as follows:

The
wage claim collection account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All monetary penalties collected under this chapter shall be
deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
the purposes of administering and enforcing this chapter. Only the director or
the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.

Sec.
9. RCW
49.48.070 and 1935 c 96 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

It
shall be the duty of the director of labor and industries to inquire diligently
for any violations of ((RCW 49.48.040 through 49.48.080)) this
chapter, and to institute the actions for penalties herein provided, and to
enforce generally the provisions of ((RCW 49.48.040 through 49.48.080)) this
chapter.

Sec.
10. RCW
49.48.080 and 1935 c 96 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing
in ((RCW 49.48.040 through 49.48.080)) this chapter except RCW
49.48.115 and 49.48.120 shall apply to the payment of wages or compensation
of employees directly employed by any county, incorporated city or town, or
other municipal corporation. Nor shall anything ((herein)) in this
chapter except RCW 49.48.115 and 49.48.120 apply to employees, directly
employed by the state, any department, bureau, office, board, commission or institution
hereof.

Sec.
11. RCW
43.84.092 and 1997 c 218 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management
improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation.
The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from
the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The
office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts
as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management
improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior
to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local
leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the
local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan I account, the public employees' retirement
system plan II account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource
management cost account, the site closure account, the special wildlife
account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance
reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension
account, the teachers' retirement system plan I account, the teachers'
retirement system plan II account, the transportation infrastructure account,
the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement
fund, the University of Washington building account, the volunteer fire
fighters' relief and pension principal account, the volunteer fire fighters'
relief and pension administrative account, the wage claim collection
account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan I retirement account,
the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan II
retirement account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the
Washington State University building account, the Washington State University
bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western
Washington University capital projects account. Earnings derived from
investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent
fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their
respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the central Puget Sound public transportation account, the city
hardship assistance account, the county arterial preservation account, the
department of licensing services account, the economic development account, the
essential rail assistance account, the essential rail banking account, the
ferry bond retirement fund, the gasohol exemption holding account, the grade
crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account, the highway
bond retirement fund, the highway construction stabilization account, the highway
safety account, the marine operating fund, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the small city
account, the special category C account, the state patrol highway account, the
transfer relief account, the transportation capital facilities account, the
transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation
improvement account, the transportation revolving loan account, and the urban
arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

Sec.
12. RCW
43.84.092 and 1998 c 341 s 708 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated
with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement
act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter
43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of
interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of
interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement
act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office
of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal
government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of
financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed
necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act,
and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the
distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings
based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The
capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel construction and
operation account, the Central Washington University capital projects account,
the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the
common school construction fund, the county criminal justice assistance
account, the county sales and use tax equalization account, the data processing
building construction account, the deferred compensation administrative
account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of
retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the
Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education construction
fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest revolving account, the
health services account, the public health services account, the health system
capacity account, the personal health services account, the highway
infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the
judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the
judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account,
the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account,
the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the municipal
criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement system
plan I account, the public employees' retirement system plan II account, the
Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource management cost account, the
site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state
investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust
fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the teachers' retirement
system plan I account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan II and
plan III account, the transportation infrastructure account, the tuition
recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University
of Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension
principal account, the volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension
administrative account, the wage claim collection account, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan I retirement account, the Washington
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan II retirement account,
the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan II and III
account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement
fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington
University capital projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances
of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state
university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary
accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall
first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the central Puget Sound public transportation account, the city
hardship assistance account, the county arterial preservation account, the
department of licensing services account, the economic development account, the
essential rail assistance account, the essential rail banking account, the
ferry bond retirement fund, the gasohol exemption holding account, the grade
crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account, the highway
bond retirement fund, the highway construction stabilization account, the
highway safety account, the marine operating fund, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the small city
account, the special category C account, the state patrol highway account, the
transfer relief account, the transportation capital facilities account, the transportation
equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation improvement
account, the transportation revolving loan account, and the urban arterial
trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury
accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative
directive of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13.
Section 11 of this act expires September 1, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14.
Section 12 of this act takes effect September 1, 2000.

---
END ---