BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.33A.170 and 1982 c 58 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

((There is established in the state treasury)) The
state investment board ((commingled trust fund)) is authorized to
establish commingled trust funds in the state treasury for the implementation
of specific investment programs for any combination of funds under its
jurisdiction. At the discretion of the state investment board, the funds
under the jurisdiction of the board may participate in the investments made by
the board through ((the)) state investment board commingled trust funds.
The state investment board may establish accounts within ((the)) any
such commingled trust fund as necessary for the implementation of specific
investment programs. The combining of moneys from funds located outside the
state treasury with moneys from funds located within the state treasury for
investment under this section shall not affect the nature, character, or
purpose of a participating fund.

---
END ---