BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
There is created the equal access to justice task force to study and review the
provision of attorneys' fees for qualified parties at administrative hearings.
The task force shall review and determine the type of administrative hearings
that require the presence of counsel to preserve fundamental rights or
entitlements. In addition, the task force shall also review issues related to
representation and adequate due process where the qualified party has a
substantial economic interest in the outcome of the agency action. The task
force may also determine those cases at which payment of attorneys' fees would
encourage settlement prior to hearings or which would discourage appeals of
nonmeritorious claims. The task force may determine those instances where it
would be inappropriate to require payment of attorneys' fees by a state agency
because the agency is only a nominal party to the action at the administrative
hearing. The task force shall also determine whether the qualifying net worth
amount should be lowered for qualified parties in administrative appeals and
whether nonattorney representatives should be compensated for their
representation at administrative hearings. The task force may determine any
other relevant matters that arise in connection with this review and study.

(2)
The task force shall be comprised of: Two persons from the Washington state
bar association, selected by the board of governors; two persons from the
access to justice board, selected by the chief justice of the Washington state
supreme court; four persons representing state agencies, selected by the
governor; two state senators, one from each of the two largest caucuses,
selected by the president of the senate; and two state representatives, one
from each of the two largest caucuses, selected by the co-speakers of the house
of representatives.

(3) The task force shall report to the appropriate committees of
the legislature during the 2000 regular session. The task force shall
terminate July 1, 2000.

---
END ---