BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes the benefit to our state and nation of providing equal
educational opportunities for all races and nationalities. The legislature
finds that Hispanic American students are underrepresented in Washington's
colleges and universities. The legislature also finds that past discriminatory
practices have resulted in this underrepresentation. Creating an endowed
scholarship program to help Hispanic American students obtain a higher
education will help to rectify past discrimination by providing a means and an
incentive for Hispanic American students to pursue a higher education. The
state will benefit from contributions made by Hispanic Americans who
participate in a program of higher education.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section
apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Institution of higher education" or "institution" means a
college or university in the state of Washington which is accredited by an
accrediting association recognized as such by rule of the higher education
coordinating board.

(2)
"Board" means the higher education coordinating board.

(3)
"Eligible student" or "student" means a Hispanic American
student as defined by the board in consultation with the advisory committee
described in section 4 of this act, who is a financially needy student, as
defined by the board, who is a resident student, as defined by RCW
28B.15.012(2), who is a full-time student at an institution of higher
education, and who promises to use his or her education to benefit other
Hispanic Americans.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
Hispanic American endowed scholarship program is created. The program shall be
administered by the board. In administering the program, the board's powers
and duties shall include but not be limited to:

(1)
Selecting students to receive scholarships, with the assistance of a screening
committee composed of persons involved in helping Hispanic American students
obtain a higher education;

(2)
Adopting necessary rules and guidelines;

(3)
Publicizing the program;

(4)
Accepting and depositing donations into the endowment fund created in section 7
of this act;

(5)
Requesting and accepting from the state treasurer moneys earned from the trust
fund and the endowment fund created in sections 6 and 7 of this act;

(6)
Soliciting and accepting grants and donations from public and private sources
for the program; and

(7)
Naming scholarships in honor of Hispanic Americans who have acted as role
models.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
board shall establish an advisory committee to assist in program design and to
develop criteria for the screening and selection of scholarship recipients.
The committee shall be composed of persons involved in helping Hispanic
American students obtain higher education. The criteria shall include a
priority for upper‑division or graduate students. The criteria may
include a priority for students who are majoring in program areas in which
expertise is needed by the state's Hispanic Americans.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
board may award scholarships to eligible students from moneys earned from the
endowment fund created in section 7 of this act, or from funds appropriated to
the board for this purpose, or from any private donations, or from any other
funds given to the board for this program. For an undergraduate student, the
amount of the scholarship shall not exceed the student's demonstrated financial
need. For a graduate student, the amount of the scholarship shall not exceed
the student's demonstrated need or the stipend of a teaching assistant,
including tuition, at the University of Washington, whichever is higher. In
calculating a student's need, the board shall consider the student's costs for
tuition, fees, books, supplies, transportation, room, board, personal expenses,
and child care. The student's scholarship awarded under this chapter shall not
exceed the amount received by a student attending a state research university.
A student is eligible to receive a scholarship for a maximum of five years.
However, the length of the scholarship shall be determined at the discretion of
the board.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
Hispanic American endowed scholarship trust fund is established. The trust
fund shall be administered by the state treasurer. Funds appropriated by the
legislature for the trust fund shall be deposited into the fund. All moneys
deposited in the fund shall be invested by the state treasurer.
Notwithstanding RCW 43.84.092, all earnings of investments of balances of the
trust fund shall be credited to the fund. At the request of the board, and
when conditions set forth in section 8 of this act are met, the treasurer shall
transfer state matching moneys and any earned interest from the trust fund to
the Hispanic American scholarship endowment fund. No appropriation is required
for expenditures from the trust fund.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
Hispanic American scholarship endowment fund is established. The endowment
fund shall be administered by the state treasurer. Moneys received from the
board, private donations, state matching moneys and any earned interest, and
funds received from any other source may be deposited into the endowment fund.
All moneys deposited in the endowment fund shall be invested by the state
treasurer. Notwithstanding RCW 43.84.092, all earnings of investments of balances
of the endowment fund shall be credited to the endowment fund. At the request
of the board, the treasurer shall release earnings from the endowment fund to
the board for scholarships. No appropriation is required for expenditures from
the endowment fund.

The
principal of the endowment fund shall not be invaded. The earnings on the fund
shall be used solely for the purposes set forth in section 5 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. The
board may request that the treasurer deposit fifty thousand dollars of state
matching funds and any earned interest into the Hispanic American scholarship
endowment fund when the board can match the state funds with an equal amount of
private cash donations. Private cash donations means moneys from nonstate
sources that include, but are not limited to, federal moneys, and assessments
by commodity commissions authorized to conduct research activities, including
but not limited to research studies authorized under RCW 15.66.030 and 15.65.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9.
Sections 1 through 8 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

---
END ---