BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.20.100 and 1990 c 250 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of licensing shall not consider an application of any minor under
the age of eighteen years for a driver's license or the issuance of a
motorcycle endorsement ((for a particular category)) unless:

(1)
The application is also signed by a parent or guardian having the custody of
such minor, or in the event a minor under the age of eighteen has no father,
mother, or guardian, then a driver's license shall not be issued to the minor
unless his or her application is also signed by the minor's employer; and

(2)
The applicant has satisfactorily completed a traffic safety education course as
defined in RCW 28A.220.020, conducted by a recognized secondary school, that
meets the standards established by the office of the state superintendent of
public instruction or the applicant has satisfactorily completed a traffic
safety education course, conducted by a commercial driving instruction enterprise,
that meets the standards established by the office of the superintendent of
public instruction and is officially approved by that office on an annual
basis: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the director may upon a showing that an
applicant was unable to take or complete a driver education course waive that
requirement if the applicant shows to the satisfaction of the department that a
need exists for the applicant to operate a motor vehicle and he or she has the
ability to operate a motor vehicle in such a manner as not to jeopardize the
safety of persons or property, under rules to be promulgated by the department
in concert with the supervisor of the traffic safety education section, office
of the superintendent of public instruction. For a person under the age of
eighteen years to obtain a motorcycle endorsement, he or she must successfully
complete a motorcycle safety education course that meets the standards
established by the department of licensing.

The
department may waive any education requirement under this subsection for an
applicant previously licensed to drive a motor vehicle or motorcycle outside
this state if the applicant provides proof satisfactory to the department that
he or she has had education equivalent to that required under this subsection.

Sec.
2. RCW
46.20.500 and 1997 c 328 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

No
person may drive a motorcycle or a motor-driven cycle unless such person has a
valid driver's license specially endorsed by the director to enable the holder
to drive such vehicles((, nor may a person drive a motorcycle of a larger
engine displacement than that authorized by such special endorsement or by an
instruction permit for such category)). However, a person sixteen years of
age or older, holding a valid driver's license of any class issued by the state
of the person's residence, may operate a moped without taking any special
examination for the operation of a moped. No driver's license is required for
operation of an electric-assisted bicycle if the operator is at least sixteen
years of age. Persons under sixteen years of age may not operate an
electric-assisted bicycle.

Sec.
3. RCW
46.20.505 and 1993 c 115 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Every person applying for a special endorsement ((or a new
category of endorsement)) of a driver's license authorizing such person to
drive a motorcycle or a motor-driven cycle shall pay ((an examination)) a
fee of two dollars which is not refundable. In addition, the endorsement fee
for the initial ((or new category)) motorcycle endorsement shall be six
dollars, and the subsequent renewal endorsement fee shall be fourteen
dollars. The initial ((or new category)) and renewal endorsement fees
shall be deposited in the motorcycle safety education account of the highway
safety fund.

Sec.
4. RCW
46.20.510 and 1989 c 337 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1)
There shall be three categories for the special motorcycle endorsement of a
driver's license. Category one shall be for motorcycles or motor-driven cycles
having an engine displacement of one hundred fifty cubic centimeters or less.
Category two shall be for motorcycles having an engine displacement of five
hundred cubic centimeters or less. Category three shall include categories one
and two, and shall be for motorcycles having an engine displacement of five
hundred one cubic centimeters or more.

(2))) The department may issue a motorcyclist's
instruction permit to an individual who wishes to learn to ride a motorcycle ((or
obtain an endorsement of a larger endorsement category)) for a period not
to exceed ninety days. This motorcyclist's instruction permit may be renewed
for an additional ninety days. The director shall collect a two dollar and
fifty cent fee for the motorcyclist's instruction permit or renewal, and the
fee shall be deposited in the motorcycle safety education account of the
highway safety fund. This permit and a valid driver's license ((with
current endorsement, if any, shall)) must be carried when operating
a motorcycle. An individual with a motorcyclist's instruction permit may not
carry passengers, and may not operate a motorcycle during the hours of
darkness ((or on a fully-controlled, limited-access facility, and shall be
under the direct visual supervision of a person with a motorcycle endorsement
of the appropriate category and at least five years' riding experience)).

Sec.
5. RCW
46.20.515 and 1982 c 77 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
motorcycle endorsement examination ((for each displacement category shall))
must emphasize maneuvers necessary for on-street operation, including
emergency braking and turning as may be required to avoid an impending
collision. The department may waive all or part of the examination for
persons who satisfactorily complete the voluntary motorcycle operator training
and education program authorized under RCW 46.20.520.

Sec.
6. RCW
46.30.020 and 1991 sp.s. c 25 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
No person may operate a motor vehicle subject to registration under chapter
46.16 RCW in this state unless the person is insured under a motor vehicle
liability policy with liability limits of at least the amounts provided in RCW
46.29.090, is self-insured as provided in RCW 46.29.630, is covered by a
certificate of deposit in conformance with RCW 46.29.550, or is covered by a
liability bond of at least the amounts provided in RCW 46.29.090. Written
proof of financial responsibility for motor vehicle operation must be provided
on the request of a law enforcement officer in the format specified under RCW
46.30.030.

(b)
A person who drives a motor vehicle that is required to be registered in
another state that requires drivers and owners of vehicles in that state to
maintain insurance or financial responsibility shall, when requested by a law
enforcement officer, provide evidence of financial responsibility or insurance
as is required by the laws of the state in which the vehicle is registered.

(c)
When asked to do so by a law enforcement officer, failure to display an
insurance identification card as specified under RCW 46.30.030 creates a
presumption that the person does not have motor vehicle insurance.

(d)
Failure to provide proof of motor vehicle insurance is a traffic infraction and
is subject to penalties as set by the supreme court under RCW 46.63.110 or
community service.

(2)
If a person cited for a violation of subsection (1) of this section appears in
person before the court and provides written evidence that at the time the
person was cited, he or she was in compliance with the financial responsibility
requirements of subsection (1) of this section, the citation shall be
dismissed. In lieu of personal appearance, a person cited for a violation of
subsection (1) of this section may, before the date scheduled for the person's
appearance before the court, submit by mail to the court written evidence that
at the time the person was cited, he or she was in compliance with the
financial responsibility requirements of subsection (1) of this section, in
which case the citation shall be dismissed without cost, except that the court
may assess court administrative costs of twenty-five dollars at the time of
dismissal.

(3)
The provisions of this chapter shall not govern((:

(a))) the
operation of a motor vehicle registered under RCW 46.16.305(1), governed by RCW
46.16.020, or registered with the Washington utilities and transportation
commission as common or contract carriers((;)), or

(((b)))
the operation of a ((motorcycle as defined in RCW 46.04.330, a))
motor-driven cycle as defined in RCW 46.04.332, or a moped as defined in RCW
46.04.304.

(4)
RCW 46.29.490 shall not be deemed to govern all motor vehicle liability
policies required by this chapter but only those certified for the purposes
stated in chapter 46.29 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

This chapter does not apply to the use of motorcycles that are
loaned to the department of licensing exclusively for purposes of providing
motorcycle training under RCW 46.20.520, or to persons contracting with the
department to provide such training.

---
END ---