BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.160.060 and 1996 c 51 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board is authorized to make direct loans to political subdivisions of the state
for the purposes of assisting the political subdivisions in financing the cost
of public facilities, including development of land and improvements for public
facilities, as well as the construction, rehabilitation, alteration, expansion,
or improvement of the facilities. Grants may be authorized for permit
coordination under chapters 36.70B and 90.60 RCW and for facilitation costs of
collaborative procedure products under section 1, chapter . . ., Laws
of 1999 (section 1 of S-0741/99). A grant may also be authorized for
purposes designated in this chapter, but only when, and to the extent that, a
loan is not reasonably possible, given the limited resources of the political
subdivision and the finding by the board that unique circumstances exist. The
board shall not obligate more than twenty percent of its biennial appropriation
as grants.

Application
for funds shall be made in the form and manner as the board may prescribe. In
making grants or loans the board shall conform to the following requirements:

(1)
The board shall not provide financial assistance:

(a)
For a project the primary purpose of which is to facilitate or promote a retail
shopping development or expansion.

(b)
For any project that evidence exists would result in a development or expansion
that would displace existing jobs in any other community in the state.

(c)
For the acquisition of real property, including buildings and other fixtures
which are a part of real property.

(2)
The board shall only provide financial assistance:

(a)
For those projects which would result in specific private developments or
expansions (i) in manufacturing, production, food processing, assembly,
warehousing, and industrial distribution; (ii) for processing recyclable
materials or for facilities that support recycling, including processes not
currently provided in the state, including but not limited to, de-inking
facilities, mixed waste paper, plastics, yard waste, and problem-waste
processing; (iii) for manufacturing facilities that rely significantly on
recyclable materials, including but not limited to waste tires and mixed waste
paper; (iv) which support the relocation of businesses from nondistressed urban
areas to distressed rural areas; or (v) which substantially support the trading
of goods or services outside of the state's borders.

(b)
For projects which it finds will improve the opportunities for the successful
maintenance, establishment, or expansion of industrial or commercial plants or
will otherwise assist in the creation or retention of long-term economic
opportunities.

(c)
When the application includes convincing evidence that a specific private
development or expansion is ready to occur and will occur only if the public
facility improvement is made.

(3)
The board shall prioritize each proposed project according to the relative
benefits provided to the community by the jobs the project would create, not
just the total number of jobs it would create after the project is completed
and according to the unemployment rate in the area in which the jobs would be
located. As long as there is more demand for financial assistance than there
are funds available, the board is instructed to fund projects in order of their
priority.

(4)
A responsible official of the political subdivision shall be present during
board deliberations and provide information that the board requests.

Before any financial assistance application is approved, the
political subdivision seeking the assistance must demonstrate to the community
economic revitalization board that no other timely source of funding is
available to it at costs reasonably similar to financing available from the
community economic revitalization board.

---
END ---