BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.61.655 and 1990 c 250 s 56 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No vehicle shall be driven or moved on any public highway unless such vehicle
is so constructed or loaded as to prevent any of its load from dropping,
sifting, leaking, or otherwise escaping therefrom, except that sand may be
dropped for the purpose of securing traction. Any person operating a vehicle
from which any glass or objects have fallen or escaped, which would constitute
an obstruction or injure a vehicle or otherwise endanger travel upon such
public highway shall immediately cause the public highway to be cleaned of all
such glass or objects and shall pay any costs therefor.

(2)
No person may operate on any public highway any vehicle with any load unless
the load and such covering as required thereon by subsection (3) of this
section is securely fastened to prevent the covering or load from becoming
loose, detached, or in any manner a hazard to other users of the highway.

(3)
Any vehicle operating on a paved public highway with a load of dirt, sand, or
gravel susceptible to being dropped, spilled, leaked, or otherwise escaping
therefrom shall be covered so as to prevent spillage. Covering of such loads
is not required if the vehicle is being operated in counties of less than
200,000 population and six inches of freeboard is maintained within the
bed.

(4)
Any vehicle with deposits of mud, rocks, or other debris on the vehicle's body,
fenders, frame, undercarriage, wheels, or tires shall be cleaned of such
material before the operation of the vehicle on a paved public highway.

(5)
The state patrol may make necessary rules to carry into effect the provisions
of this section, applying such provisions to specific conditions and loads and
prescribing means, methods, and practices to effectuate such provisions.

(6) Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit a public
maintenance vehicle from dropping sand on a highway to enhance traction, or
sprinkling water or other substances to clean or maintain a highway.

---
END ---