BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
39.12.010 and 1989 c 12 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The "prevailing rate of wage", for the intents and purposes of this
chapter, shall be the rate of hourly wage, usual benefits, and overtime paid in
the locality, as hereinafter defined, to the majority of workers, laborers, or
mechanics, in the same trade or occupation. In the event that there is not a
majority in the same trade or occupation paid at the same rate, then the
average rate of hourly wage and overtime paid to such laborers, workers, or
mechanics in the same trade or occupation shall be the prevailing rate. If the
wage paid by any contractor or subcontractor to laborers, workers, or mechanics
on any public work is based on some period of time other than an hour, the
hourly wage for the purposes of this chapter shall be mathematically determined
by the number of hours worked in such period of time.

(2)
The "locality" for the purposes of this chapter shall be the largest
city in the county ((wherein)) where the physical work is being
performed. For off-site work, "locality" shall be the physical
place or places where the construction called for in the contract will remain
when work on it has been completed.

(3)
The "usual benefits" for the purposes of this chapter shall include
the amount of:

(a)
The rate of contribution irrevocably made by a contractor or subcontractor to a
trustee or to a third person pursuant to a fund, plan, or program; and

(b)
The rate of costs to the contractor or subcontractor which may be reasonably
anticipated in providing benefits to workers, laborers, and mechanics pursuant
to an ((enforcible)) enforceable commitment to carry out a
financially responsible plan or program which was communicated in writing to
the workers, laborers, and mechanics affected, for medical or hospital care,
pensions on retirement or death, compensation for injuries or illness resulting
from occupational activity, or insurance to provide any of the foregoing, for
unemployment benefits, life insurance, disability and sickness insurance, or
accident insurance, for vacation and holiday pay, for defraying costs of
apprenticeship or other similar programs, or for other bona fide fringe
benefits, but only where the contractor or subcontractor is not required by
other federal, state, or local law to provide any of such benefits.

(4) An "interested party" for the purposes of this
chapter shall include a contractor, subcontractor, an employee of a contractor
or subcontractor, an organization whose members' wages, benefits, and
conditions of employment are affected by this chapter, and the director of
labor and industries or the director's designee.

---
END ---