BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
39.12.030 and 1989 c 12 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The specifications and contract documents for every contract
for the construction, reconstruction, maintenance, or repair of any
public work to which the state or any county, municipality, or political
subdivision created by its laws is a party, shall contain a provision stating in
dollars and cents the hourly minimum rate of wage, not less than the
prevailing rate of wage, which may be paid to laborers, workers, or mechanics
in each trade or occupation classification required for such public work
employed in the performance of the contract either by the contractor, all
tiers of subcontractors, or any other person doing or
contracting to do the whole or any part of the work contemplated by the
contract, and the contract shall contain a stipulation that such laborers,
workers, or mechanics shall be paid not less than such specified hourly minimum
rate of wage.

---
END ---