BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.41 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning
December 1, 1999, the office shall publish an annual index that reports, by
subject and legislative bill number, for all session laws beginning with the
1999 legislative session:

(1)
Rules adopted as a result of the legislation;

(2)
Reports and studies required by the legislation, and sources for obtaining the
reports and studies; and

(3) Each agency's contact for tracking expenditures of moneys
appropriated for specified purposes under the legislation other than for
ongoing regular programs.

---
END ---