BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

By
November 1, 1999, and every year thereafter, the superintendent of public
instruction shall present awards to selected girls under the age of thirteen
who have demonstrated exceptional effort, sportsmanship, and achievement in an
organized athletic program.

The
awards shall be entitled the Sue Durrant athletic achievement awards, honoring
a champion of gender equity in athletics in Washington state.

The superintendent of public instruction shall develop a fair
mechanism for accepting nominations and selecting recipients, and shall
publicize the achievements of the recipients. The office of the superintendent
of public instruction may enter into partnerships with private and nonprofit
organizations for the awards program.

---
END ---