BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.04.080 and 1961 c 15 s 82.04.080 are each amended to read as follows:

"Gross income of the business" means the value proceeding
or accruing by reason of the transaction of the business engaged in and
includes gross proceeds of sales, compensation for the rendition of services,
gains realized from trading in stocks, bonds, or other evidences of
indebtedness, interest, discount, rents, royalties, fees, commissions,
dividends, and other emoluments however designated, all without any deduction
on account of the cost of tangible property sold, the cost of materials used,
labor costs, interest, discount, delivery costs, taxes, or any other expense
whatsoever paid or accrued and without any deduction on account of losses:
PROVIDED HOWEVER, It shall not mean amounts proceeding or accruing (1) under a
written cost-sharing agreement for allocable reimbursement of administrative
services incurred on behalf of a foreign affiliate that engages in a travel
service business and (2) by a person that engages a travel service business and
also holds a passenger vessel surety bond in compliance with Subpart A of Part
540 of Title 48, Code of Federal Regulations. "Affiliate" means a
person who directly or indirectly controls, or is controlled by, or is under
common control with, a person. "Foreign" means the affiliate is
organized under laws outside of the United States.

---
END ---