BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. Two
Washington accounts for student child care in higher education are
established. The higher education coordinating board and the state board for
community and technical colleges shall administer the programs. Through these
programs the boards may award on a competitive basis child care grants to state
institutions of higher education to encourage programs to address the need for
high quality, accessible, and affordable child care for students at higher
education institutions. The university or college administration and student
government association, or its equivalent, of each institution receiving the
award shall contribute financial support in an amount equal to the child care
grant received by the institution.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
institution of higher education shall be eligible to receive the grant for a
period not exceeding two years. After the expiration of any two-year grant,
the institution may reapply to receive subsequent grant awards or a
continuation of the grant awarded the prior two years.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
higher education coordinating board shall administer the program for four-year
institutions of higher education. The state board for community and technical
colleges shall administer the program for community and technical colleges.
The higher education coordinating board and the state board for community and
technical colleges shall have the following powers and duties in administering
each program:

(1)
To adopt rules necessary to carry out the program;

(2)
To establish one or more review committees to assist in the evaluation of
proposals for funding. The review committee shall include but not be limited
to individuals from the Washington association for the education of young
children, the child care coordinating committee, and the child care resource
and referral network;

(3)
To establish each biennium specific guidelines for submitting grant proposals
consistent with the overall goals of the program. During the 1999-2001
biennium the guidelines shall be consistent with the following desired outcomes
of increasing access to child care for students, addressing the demand for
infant and toddler care, providing affordable child care alternatives, creating
more cooperative preschool programs, creating models that can be replicated at
other institutions, creating a partnership between university or college
administrations and student government, or its equivalent and increasing
efficiency and innovation at campus child care centers;

(4)
To establish guidelines for an allocation system based on factors that include
but are not limited to: The amount of money available in the trust fund;
characteristics of the institutions including the size of the faculty and
student body; and the number of child care grants received;

(5)
To solicit grant proposals and provide information to the institutions of
higher education about the program; and

(6)
To establish reporting, evaluation, accountability, monitoring, and
dissemination requirements for the recipients of the grants.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. Two
accounts for student child care in higher education are established in the
custody of the state treasurer. Moneys in the accounts may be spent only for
the purposes of section 1 of this act. Disbursements from one of the accounts
shall be on the authorization of the higher education coordinating board and
disbursements from the other account shall be on the authorization of the state
board for community and technical colleges. The accounts are subject to the
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required
for disbursements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5.
Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

---
END ---