BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28B.90.020 and 1993 c 181 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

A foreign degree-granting institution that submits evidence
satisfactory to the board of its authorized status in its country of domicile
and its intent to establish an educational facility in the state is entitled to
operate a branch campus ((in the state)) as defined in RCW 28B.90.010.
Upon receipt of the satisfactory evidence, the board ((shall)) may
certify that the branch campus of the foreign degree-granting institution is
approved to operate in the state under this chapter, for as long as the foreign
degree-granting institution retains its authorized status in its country of
domicile.

---
END ---