BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the intent of the legislature that minor children in the custody of the
department of social and health services pursuant to chapter 13.32A, 13.34, or
26.44 RCW be provided the most appropriate possible mental health care
consistent with the child's best interests, family reconciliation, the child's
medical need for mental health treatment, available state and community
resources, and professional standards of medical care. The legislature intends
that admission of such minors for mental health hospitalization be made
pursuant to the criteria and standards for mental health services for minors
established in chapter 71.34 RCW and that minor children in the custody of the
department in need of mental health hospitalization shall retain all rights set
forth therein. The legislature specifically intends that this act shall not be
construed to affect the standards or procedures established for the involuntary
commitment of minors under chapter 71.34 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
No minor child under the jurisdiction of the department pursuant to this
chapter, chapter 13.32A RCW, or chapter 26.44 RCW shall be admitted into a
facility for inpatient mental health hospitalization unless the secretary
determines by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence: (a) It is medically
necessary for the child to receive treatment on an inpatient basis based on an
evaluation of the child's case by the responsible mental health regional
support network pursuant to the criteria and procedures set forth in chapter
71.34 RCW; (b) the facility to which the child is admitted offers the most
appropriate and available services and facilities for the needs of the child;
(c) the facility is the facility with available treatment space closest to the
child's home unless the secretary in consultation with the admitting authority
finds that admission into the facility closest to the child's home would
jeopardize the health or safety of the child; (d) the facility complies with
all state-required licensing and professional standards for providing inpatient
mental health care to minors; and (e) the proposed treatment plan gives
consideration to treatment in the least restrictive manner and includes a plan
to transfer the child to outpatient care as soon as such transfer is medically
appropriate. The department shall establish rules and procedures consistent
with these criteria.

(2)
The fact of admission and all information obtained through treatment under this
section is confidential and may be disclosed only pursuant to RCW 71.34.200 and
71.34.210.

(3)
Except as otherwise provided in this section, the department shall seek to
obtain the prior consent of a child's parent, legal guardian, or legal
custodian before a child is admitted into an inpatient mental health treatment
facility under this section. If the child's parent, legal guardian, or legal
custodian is unavailable or does not agree with the proposed admission, the
department shall request a hearing and provide notice to all interested parties
to seek prior approval of the juvenile court before such admission. In the
event that an emergent situation creating a risk of substantial harm to the
health and welfare of a child in the custody of the department does not allow
time for the department to obtain prior approval or to request a court hearing
before consenting to the admission of the child into an inpatient mental health
hospital the department will seek court approval by requesting that a hearing
be set on the first available court date.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The secretary shall maintain a list of all facilities to which minor children under
the jurisdiction of the department may be admitted for inpatient mental health
hospitalization pursuant to this chapter, chapter 13.32A RCW, or chapter 26.44
RCW. Facilities shall not be listed unless they comply with all medicaid,
federal, and state-required licensing and professional standards for providing
inpatient mental health treatment to minors and are sufficiently financially
stable to continue in operation for the foreseeable future. The list shall be
updated each time a facility is added or deleted and shall be published by the
secretary once a year in a format intended to provide the public with the
maximum opportunity to learn the name, address, and telephone number of each
facility.

(2)
Not later than December 1st of each year, the secretary shall provide the
governor and legislature a report setting forth: (a) The number of minor
children under the jurisdiction of the department who have been placed in
mental health inpatient treatment; (b) the facilities that received minor
children for treatment; (c) the number of minor children treated at each
facility; and (d) the number of inpatient treatment days provided at each
facility for each child.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

No
facility that owes the federal government, or state government, financial
penalties related to noncompliance with federal medicaid rules or state
licensing or health safety regulations may be listed under section 3 of this
act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

For minors who cannot consent to release of their records with the
department because they are not old enough to consent to treatment or, if old
enough, lack the capacity to consent, or the minor is receiving treatment
involuntarily with a provider the department has authorized to provide mental
health treatment under section 2 of this act, the department shall disclose,
upon the treating physician's request, all relevant records, including the
minor's passport, in the department's possession that the treating physician
determines contain information required for treatment of the minor. The
treating physician shall maintain all records received from the department in a
manner that distinguishes the records from any other records in the minor's
file with the treating physician and the department records shall not be
disclosed by the treating physician to any other person or entity absent a court
order.

---
END ---