BE IT ENACTED BY
THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.16.212 and 1989 c 353 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of licensing shall notify the public of the requirements of RCW
46.30.020 through 46.30.040 at the time of new vehicle registration and when
the department sends a registration renewal notice.

(2)
When the department sends a vehicle license renewal notice, it shall also
provide notice of the requirement for written proof of meeting the financial
responsibility requirements in order to renew the license.

(3)
The department shall not renew a vehicle license due for renewal January 1,
2000, or after unless the applicant provides written proof of meeting the
financial responsibility requirements for operating a motor vehicle as provided
in RCW 46.30.020.

Sec.
2. RCW
46.16.210 and 1997 c 241 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Upon receipt of the application and proper fee for an original vehicle
license, the director shall make a recheck of the application and in the event
that there is any error in the application it may be returned to the county
auditor or other agent to effectively secure the correction of such error, who
shall return the same corrected to the director.

(2)
Application for the renewal of a vehicle license shall be made to the director
or his agents, including county auditors, by the registered owner on a form
prescribed by the director. The application must be accompanied by the certificate
of registration for the last registration period in which the vehicle was
registered in Washington unless the applicant submits a preprinted application
mailed from Olympia, and the payment of such license fees and excise tax as may
be required by law. Such application shall be handled in the same manner and
the fees transmitted to the state treasurer in the same manner as in the case
of an original application. Any such application which upon validation becomes
a renewal certificate need not have entered upon it the name of the lien
holder, if any, of the vehicle concerned.

(3)
Persons expecting to be out of the state during the normal renewal period of a
vehicle license may secure renewal of such vehicle license and have license
plates or tabs preissued by making application to the director or his agents
upon forms prescribed by the director. The application must be accompanied by
the certificate of registration for the last registration period in which the
vehicle was registered in Washington and be accompanied by such license fees,
and excise tax as may be required by law.

(4)
Every applicant for renewal of a vehicle license due for renewal January 1,
2000, or after shall provide current proof of financial responsibility to
operate a vehicle as required in RCW 46.30.020. The department may adopt rules
regarding valid proof of financial responsibility for persons renewing a
vehicle license. The department shall reimburse its agents, including county
auditors, for the mailing costs of returning license renewal applications that
are submitted without proof of financial responsibility.

(5)
Application for the annual renewal of a vehicle license number plate to the
director or the director's agents shall not be required for those vehicles owned,
rented, or leased by the state of Washington, or by any county, city, town,
school district, or other political subdivision of the state of Washington or a
governing body of an Indian tribe located within this state and recognized as a
governmental entity by the United States department of the interior.

Sec.
3. RCW
46.30.040 and 1991 sp.s. c 25 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person who knowingly provides false evidence of financial
responsibility to a law enforcement officer ((or)), to a court, or
to the department of licensing on an application for renewal of a vehicle
license, including an expired or canceled insurance policy, bond, or
certificate of deposit is guilty of a misdemeanor.

---
END ---