BE IT ENACTED BY
THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
90.60.030 and 1997 c 429 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:

The
permit assistance center is established within the department. The center
shall:

(1)
Establish regional center offices at each of the four department regional or
field offices;

(2)
Publish and keep current one or more handbooks containing lists and
explanations of all permit laws at each of its regional center offices.
To the extent possible, the handbook shall include relevant local, state,
federal, and tribal laws. A state agency or local government shall
provide a reasonable number of copies of application forms, statutes,
ordinances, rules, handbooks, and other informational material requested by the
center and shall otherwise fully cooperate with the center. The center shall
seek the cooperation of relevant federal agencies and tribal governments;

(((2)))
(3) Establish, and make known, a point of contact at each of its
regional center offices for distribution of the handbook and advice to the
public as to its interpretation in any given case;

(((3)))
(4) Establish, and make known, a point of contact at each of its regional
center offices responsible for identifying and providing contact information
for all local, state, and federal permits necessary to complete a project to
applicants or other interested persons;

(5)
Work closely and cooperatively with the business license center in providing
efficient and nonduplicative service to the public;

(((4)))
(6) Seek the assignment of employees from the permit agencies listed
under RCW 90.60.020(6)(a) to serve on a rotating basis in staffing the center;

(((5)))
(7) Collect and disseminate information to public and private entities
on federal, state, local, and tribal government programs that rely on private
professional expertise to assist governmental agencies in project permit
review; and

(((6)
Provide an annual report to the legislature on potential conflicts and
perceived inconsistencies among existing statutes. The first report shall be
submitted to the appropriate standing committees of the house of
representatives and senate by December 1, 1996)) (8)(a) Work
cooperatively with residents, local governments, and businesses in rural
counties, and establish and implement plans and procedures for enhancing
knowledge of and access to the center's services for individuals, businesses,
and public agencies in rural counties and for businesses considering locating
or expanding in rural counties; and

(b) Provide a biennial report to the legislature on the status
of the center's plans and procedures for enhancing rural counties' access to
and usage of the center as specified in RCW 90.60.030(8).

Sec.
2. RCW
90.60.040 and 1995 c 347 s 604 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
((Not later than January 1, 1996,)) The center shall establish by
rule an administrative process for the designation of a coordinating permit
agency for a project.

(2)
The administrative process shall consist of the establishment of guidelines for
designating the coordinating permit agency for a project. If a permit agency
is the lead agency for purposes of chapter 43.21C RCW, that permit agency shall
be the coordinating permit agency. In other cases, the guidelines shall
require that at least the following factors be considered in determining which
permit agency has the greatest overall jurisdiction over the project:

(a)
The types of facilities or activities that make up the project;

(b)
The types of public health and safety and environmental concerns that should be
considered in issuing permits for the project;

(c)
The environmental medium that may be affected by the project, the extent of
those potential effects, and the environmental protection measures that may be
taken to prevent the occurrence of, or to mitigate, those potential effects;

(d)
The regulatory activity that is of greatest importance in preventing or
mitigating the effects that the project may have on public health and safety or
the environment; and

(e) The statutory and regulatory requirements that apply to the
project and the complexity of those requirements.

Sec.
3. RCW
90.60.050 and 1995 c 347 s 605 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon
the request of a project applicant, the center shall appoint a project
facilitator to assist the applicant in determining which regulatory
requirements, processes, and permits may be required for development and
operation of the proposed project. If the applicant requests, the project
facilitator shall also identify and provide contact information for all local,
state, and federal permits necessary to complete a project. The project
facilitator shall provide the information to the applicant and explain the
options available to the applicant in obtaining the required permits. If the
applicant requests, the center shall designate a coordinating permit agency as
provided in RCW 90.60.060.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
43.131.387 (Permit assistance center--Termination) and 1995 c 347
s 617; and

(2) RCW
43.131.388 (Permit assistance center--Repeal) and 1995 c 347 s
618.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect June 29, 1999.

---
END ---