BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
47.26.426 and 1981 c 315 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

At
least one year prior to the date any interest is due and payable on such first
authorization bonds, series II bonds, and series III bonds or before the
maturity date of any such bonds, the state finance committee shall estimate,
subject to the provisions of RCW 47.26.425, 47.26.4252, and 47.26.4254 the
percentage of the receipts in money of the motor vehicle fund, resulting from
collection of excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels, for each month
of the year which shall be required to meet interest or bond payments hereunder
when due, and shall notify the state treasurer of such estimated requirement.
The state treasurer, subject to RCW 47.26.425, 47.26.4252, and 47.26.4254,
shall thereafter from time to time each month as such funds are paid into the
motor vehicle fund, transfer such percentage of the monthly receipts from
excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels of the motor vehicle fund to
the ((highway bond retirement fund)) transportation improvement board
bond retirement account, maintained in the office of the state treasurer,
which fund shall be available for payment of interest or bonds when due. If in
any month it shall appear that the estimated percentage of money so made is
insufficient to meet the requirements for interest or bond retirement, the
treasurer shall notify the state finance committee forthwith and such committee
shall adjust its estimates so that all requirements for interest and principal
of all bonds issued shall be fully met at all times.

Sec.
2. RCW
47.26.427 and 1979 c 5 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever the percentage of the motor vehicle fund arising from
excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels payable into the ((highway
bond retirement fund)) transportation improvement board bond retirement
account, shall prove more than is required for the payment of interest on
bonds when due, or current retirement of bonds, any excess may, in the
discretion of the state finance committee, be available for the prior redemption
of any bonds or remain available in the fund to reduce the requirements upon
the fuel excise tax portion of the motor vehicle fund at the next interest or
bond payment period.

Sec.
3. RCW
47.26.507 and 1993 c 440 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever
the percentage of the motor vehicle fund arising from excise taxes on motor
vehicle and special fuels payable into the ((highway bond retirement fund))
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, shall prove
more than is required for the payment of interest on bonds when due, or current
retirement of bonds, any excess may, in the discretion of the state finance
committee, be available for the prior redemption of any bonds or remain
available in the fund to reduce the requirements upon the fuel excise tax
portion of the motor vehicle fund at the next interest or bond payment period.

Sec.
4. RCW
43.84.092 and 1997 c 218 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations
of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds
of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management
improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation.
The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from
the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The
office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts
as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management
improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior
to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income
account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation
is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior
to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local
leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the
local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan I account, the public employees' retirement
system plan II account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource
management cost account, the site closure account, the special wildlife
account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance
reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension
account, the teachers' retirement system plan I account, the teachers'
retirement system plan II account, the transportation infrastructure account,
the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement
fund, the University of Washington building account, the volunteer fire
fighters' relief and pension principal account, the volunteer fire fighters'
relief and pension administrative account, the Washington judicial retirement
system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan I retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' system plan II retirement account, the Washington state patrol
retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control
revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital projects
account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural
permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school
fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to
be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the central Puget Sound public transportation account, the city
hardship assistance account, the county arterial preservation account, the
department of licensing services account, the economic development account, the
essential rail assistance account, the essential rail banking account, the
ferry bond retirement fund, the gasohol exemption holding account, the grade
crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account, the highway
bond retirement fund, the highway construction stabilization account, the
highway safety account, the marine operating fund, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the small city
account, the special category C account, the state patrol highway account, the
transfer relief account, the transportation capital facilities account, the
transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation
improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement
account, the transportation revolving loan account, and the urban arterial
trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

Sec.
5. RCW
43.84.092 and 1998 c 341 s 708 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations
shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4)
of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local
leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the
local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan I account, the public employees' retirement system plan
II account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource management
cost account, the site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account,
the state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the teachers'
retirement system plan I account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan
II and plan III account, the transportation infrastructure account, the tuition
recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the
University of Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' relief
and pension principal account, the volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension
administrative account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan I retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system
plan II retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system
combined plan II and III account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State
University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund,
and the Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal
school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific
permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to
their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the central Puget Sound public transportation account, the city
hardship assistance account, the county arterial preservation account, the
department of licensing services account, the economic development account, the
essential rail assistance account, the essential rail banking account, the
ferry bond retirement fund, the gasohol exemption holding account, the grade
crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account, the highway
bond retirement fund, the highway construction stabilization account, the
highway safety account, the marine operating fund, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the small city
account, the special category C account, the state patrol highway account, the
transfer relief account, the transportation capital facilities account, the
transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation
improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement
account, the transportation revolving loan account, and the urban arterial
trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
Section 4 of this act expires September 1, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7.
Section 5 of this act takes effect September 1, 2000.

---
END ---