BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
47.66.030 and 1996 c 49 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
The transportation improvement board is authorized and responsible for the
final selection of programs and projects funded from the central Puget Sound
public transportation account; public transportation systems account; and the
((intermodal surface transportation and efficiency act of 1991)) Transportation
Equity Act for the 21st Century or its successor acts, surface
transportation program, state-wide competitive, and enhancement program.

(b)
The board may establish subcommittees as well as technical advisory committees
to carry out the mandates of this chapter.

(2)
Expenses of the board, including administrative expenses for managing the
program, shall be paid in accordance with RCW 47.26.140.

Sec.
2. RCW
47.66.040 and 1995 c 269 s 2606 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The transportation improvement board shall select programs and projects based
on a competitive process consistent with the mandates governing each account or
source of funds. The competition shall be consistent with the following
criteria:

(a)
Local, regional, and state transportation plans;

(b)
Local transit development plans; and

(c)
Local comprehensive land use plans.

(2)
The following criteria shall be considered by the board in selecting programs
and projects:

(a)
Objectives of the growth management act, the high capacity transportation act,
the commute trip reduction act, transportation demand management programs,
federal and state air quality requirements, and federal Americans with Disabilities
Act and related state accessibility requirements; and

(b)
Energy efficiency issues, freight and goods movement ((as related to)),
economic development, regional significance, rural isolation, the leveraging of
other funds including funds administered by this board, and safety and security
issues.

(3) The board shall determine the appropriate level of local match
required for each program and project based on the source of funds.

---
END ---