BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 7.48 RCW to read as follows:

A
person may maintain an action under this chapter based upon air emission, water
discharge, or solid waste discharge or release, other than the placement of
nuclear waste, only where:

(1)
The emission, discharge, or release was not authorized by a term or condition
of:

(a)
A statute or regulation;

(b)
A license, permit, or order that is issued after the opportunity for public
comment by a local, state, or federal government and subject to continuing
compliance assurance procedures, review by the issuing authority, and amendment
or renewal; or

(c)
A court order or judgment; and

(2) A violation of the term or condition proximately caused or
causes the injury or damage claimed.

---
END ---