BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
36.70A.367 and 1998 c 289 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In addition to the major industrial development allowed under RCW 36.70A.365, a
rural county required or choosing to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 ((that
meets the criteria in subsection (9) of this section)) may establish, in
consultation with cities consistent with provisions of RCW 36.70A.210, a
process for designating a bank of no more than two master planned locations for
major industrial activity outside urban growth areas.

(2)
A master planned location for major industrial developments outside an urban
growth area may be included in the urban industrial land bank for the county if
criteria including, but not limited to, the following are met:

(a)
New infrastructure is provided for and/or applicable impact fees are paid;

(b)
Transit-oriented site planning and traffic demand management programs are
implemented;

(c)
Buffers are provided between the major industrial development and adjacent
nonurban areas;

(d)
Environmental protection including air and water quality has been addressed and
provided for;

(e)
Development regulations are established to ensure that urban growth will not
occur in adjacent nonurban areas;

(f)
Provision is made to mitigate adverse impacts on designated agricultural lands,
forest lands, and mineral resource lands;

(g)
The plan for the major industrial development is consistent with the county's
development regulations established for protection of critical areas; and

(h)
An inventory of developable land has been conducted as provided in RCW
36.70A.365.

(3)
In selecting master planned locations for inclusion in the urban industrial
land bank, priority shall be given to locations that are adjacent to, or in
close proximity to, an urban growth area.

(4)
Final approval of inclusion of a master planned location in the urban
industrial land bank shall be considered an adopted amendment to the
comprehensive plan adopted pursuant to RCW 36.70A.070, except that RCW
36.70A.130(2) does not apply so that inclusion or exclusion of master planned
locations may be considered at any time.

(5)
Once a master planned location has been included in the urban industrial land
bank, manufacturing and industrial businesses that qualify as major industrial
development under RCW 36.70A.365 may be located there.

(6)
Nothing in this section may be construed to alter the requirements for a county
to comply with chapter 43.21C RCW.

(7)
((The authority of a county to engage in the process of including or
excluding master planned locations from the urban industrial land bank shall
terminate on December 31, 1999. However, any location included in the urban
industrial land bank on December 31, 1999, shall remain available for major
industrial development as long as the criteria of subsection (2) of this
section continue to be met.

(8))) For
the purposes of this section, "major industrial development" means a
master planned location suitable for ((manufacturing or industrial
businesses)) a manufacturing, industrial, commercial,
warehouse/distribution, office park, office, resort, or related commercial and
retail development that: (a) Requires a parcel of land so large that no
suitable parcels are available within an urban growth area; or (b) is a natural
resource-based industry requiring a location near agricultural land, forest
land, or mineral resource land upon which it is dependent; or (c) requires a
location with characteristics such as proximity to transportation facilities or
related industries, or distance from densely populated areas, such that
there is no suitable location in an urban growth area. ((The major
industrial development may not be for the purpose of retail commercial
development or multitenant office parks.

(9)
This section applies to a county that at the time the process is established
under subsection (1) of this section:

(a)
Has a population greater than two hundred fifty thousand and is part of a
metropolitan area that includes a city in another state with a population
greater than two hundred fifty thousand;

(b)
Has a population greater than one hundred forty thousand and is adjacent to
another country; or

(c)
Has a population greater than forty thousand but less than seventy-five
thousand and has an average level of unemployment for the preceding three years
that exceeds the average state unemployment for those years by twenty percent;
and

(i)
Is bordered by the Pacific Ocean; or

(ii)
Is located in the Interstate 5 or Interstate 90 corridor.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
Nothing in the 1999 amendments to RCW 36.70A.367 contained in section 1 of this
act affects the authority of, or any action taken by, a county under RCW
36.70A.367 as it existed prior to the 1999 amendments. Any location included
in an urban industrial land bank on the effective date of this act shall remain
available for major industrial development as long as the criteria of RCW
36.70A.367(2) continue to be met. However, the authority of a county that is
not a rural county to engage in the process of including or excluding master
planned locations from an urban industrial land bank terminates on the
effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---