BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
88.16.190 and 1994 c 52 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any oil tanker, whether enrolled or registered, of greater than ((one
hundred and twenty-five)) forty thousand deadweight tons shall be
prohibited from proceeding beyond a point, within the internal waters of the
state of Washington and the United States, east of a line extending from ((Discovery
Island light south to New Dungeness)) Bonilla Point light on Vancouver
Island to Tatoosh Island light, unless the conditions set in subsection
(2) of this section are met.

(2)
An oil tanker, whether enrolled or registered, of greater than forty ((to
one hundred and twenty-five)) thousand deadweight tons may proceed beyond
the points enumerated in subsection (1) of this section if ((such))
the tanker is in ballast or under the escort of a tug or tugs with
the ability to control the movement of or stop the tanker. A tanker is exempt
from this section if it possesses all of the following standard safety
features:

(a)
((Shaft horsepower in the ratio of one horsepower to each two and one-half
deadweight tons)) A bow thruster with a dedicated power source; ((and))

(b)
Two rudders with separate steering systems;

(c)
An independent source of electrical power for each rudder and screw
combination;

(d)
Twin screws with a dedicated power source to each; ((and

(c))) (e)
Double bottoms, underneath all oil, fuel, and liquid cargo compartments;
((and

(d))) (f)
Two radars in working order and operating, one of which must be collision
avoidance radar; and

(((e)))
(g) Such other navigational position location systems as may be
prescribed from time to time by the board of pilotage commissioners((:

PROVIDED,
That, if such forty to one hundred and twenty-five thousand deadweight ton
tanker is in ballast or is under escort of a tug or tugs with an aggregate
shaft horsepower equivalent to five percent of the deadweight tons of that
tanker, subsection (2) of this section shall not apply: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
additional tug shaft horsepower equivalencies may be required under certain
conditions as established by rule and regulation of the Washington utilities
and transportation commission pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That)).

(3) A tanker assigned a deadweight of less than forty
thousand deadweight tons at the time of construction or reconstruction as
reported in Lloyd's Register of Ships is not subject to the provisions of RCW
88.16.170 through 88.16.190.

---
END ---