BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall accord priority to the processing of applications for
transfers and changes in water rights.

(2)
The department in its discretion may process applications for transfers or
changes regarding water uses in a basin independently of the order of
processing or priority placed upon processing applications for new withdrawals
within the same basin, and independently of the order of processing or priority
placed upon any applications regarding water use in other basins.

Sec.
2. RCW
90.58.080 and 1995 c 347 s 305 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Local governments shall develop or amend((, within twenty-four months after
the adoption of guidelines as provided in RCW 90.58.060,)) a master program
for regulation of uses of the shorelines of the state consistent with the
required elements of the guidelines adopted by the department. Except as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, master programs shall be reviewed
for compliance with the guidelines and adopted or amended as necessary within
twenty-four months after the adoption of guidelines as provided in RCW
90.58.060.

(2)
Consistent with the priority salmon recovery regions and WRIA's map, as defined
in the state-wide strategy to recover salmon volume 1, page V.95, and
population growth data provided by the office of financial management, the
following master program development or amendment schedule applies for
guidelines adopted by the department before December 31, 2000:

(a)
For King, Snohomish, Pierce, Clark, and Kitsap counties and the cities and
towns therein with shorelines of the state, master programs shall be reviewed
for compliance with the guidelines and adopted or amended as necessary within
thirty-six months after the adoption of guidelines as provided in RCW
90.58.060;

(b)
For Thurston, Whatcom, Benton, Yakima, Skagit, Cowlitz, Clallam, Chelan, Mason,
Lewis, Jefferson, and Okanogan counties and the cities and towns therein with
shorelines of the state, master programs shall be reviewed for compliance with
the guidelines and adopted or amended as necessary within forty-eight months
after the adoption of guidelines as provided in RCW 90.58.060;

(c)
For all other counties, cities, and towns with shorelines of the state, master
programs shall be reviewed for compliance with the guidelines and adopted or
amended as necessary within sixty months after the adoption of guidelines
amendments as provided in RCW 90.58.060.

(3) Local governments failing to meet the schedule provided in
subsection (2) of this section shall not be eligible for grant moneys from the
department pursuant to implementation of this section.

---
END ---