BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.21A.660 and 1996 c 190 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Funds
in the freshwater aquatic weeds account may be appropriated to the department
of ecology to develop a freshwater aquatic weeds management program ((to)).
Funds shall be expended as follows:

(1)
((Issue)) No less than two-thirds of the appropriated funds shall be
issued as grants to (a) cities, counties, tribes, special purpose
districts, and state agencies to prevent, remove, reduce, or manage
excessive freshwater aquatic weeds; (b) fund demonstration or pilot projects
consistent with the purposes of this section; and (c) fund hydrilla eradication
activities in waters of the state. Such grants shall only be issued for
lakes, rivers, or streams with a public boat launching ramp. The department
shall give preference to projects having matching funds or in-kind services; and

(2)
No more than one-third of the appropriated funds shall be expended to:

(a)
Develop public education programs relating to preventing the propagation and
spread of freshwater aquatic weeds; and

(((3)))
(b) Provide technical assistance to local governments and citizen
groups((;

(4)
Fund demonstration or pilot projects consistent with the purposes of this
section; and

(5)
Fund hydrilla eradication activities in waters of the state)).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.21A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall appoint an advisory committee to oversee the freshwater
aquatic weeds management program.

(2)
The advisory committee shall include representatives from the following groups:

(a)
Recreational boaters interested in freshwater aquatic weed management;

(b)
Residents adjacent to lakes, rivers, or streams with public boat launch
facilities;

(c)
Local governments;

(d)
Scientific specialists;

(e)
Pesticide registrants, as defined in RCW 15.58.030(34);

(f)
Certified pesticide applicators, as defined in RCW 17.21.020(5), who specialize
in the use of aquatic pesticides; and

(g)
If chapter . . ., Laws of 1999 (Senate Bill No. 5315) is enacted by
June 30, 1999, the aquatic nuisance species coordinating committee.

(3) The advisory committee shall review and provide recommendations
to the department on freshwater aquatic weeds management program activities and
budget and establish criteria for grants funded from the freshwater aquatic
weeds account.

---
END ---