BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature intends to reduce the deaths, injuries, and property damage
resulting from inappropriate aggressive driving. The cost to the families,
survivors, and taxpayers associated with accidents involving aggressive driving
is in the hundreds of millions of dollars annually and continues to grow as
congestion and population increases. The legislature does not recognize
aggressive driving as a defense or mental disorder in criminal or civil
litigation, and does not intend to reform or affect the law on self-defense.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A person who commits any two or more acts of aggressive driving within five
consecutive miles, in a manner which intimidates or threatens another person,
is guilty of the crime of aggressive driving.

(2)(a)
The first violation of this section within a five-year period is a misdemeanor
and shall be punished as follows:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than one day. Twenty-four consecutive hours of
the imprisonment may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds that
the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial
risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the
reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the
suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than three hundred fifty dollars nor more than five
thousand dollars. Three hundred fifty dollars of the fine may not be suspended
or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be indigent.

(b)
A second or subsequent violation of this section within a five-year period is a
gross misdemeanor and shall be punished as follows:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than two days. Two consecutive days of the
imprisonment may not be suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the
imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk
to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory
minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the
reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the
suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand
dollars. Five hundred dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds the offender to be indigent.

(3)
For the purposes of this section, the following traffic infractions are acts of
aggressive driving:

(a)
RCW 46.61.050;

(b)
RCW 46.61.060;

(c)
RCW 46.61.080;

(d)
RCW 46.61.110;

(e)
RCW 46.61.130;

(f)
RCW 46.61.145;

(g)
RCW 46.61.150;

(h)
RCW 46.61.180;

(i)
RCW 46.61.185;

(j)
RCW 46.61.190;

(k)
RCW 46.61.195;

(l)
RCW 46.61.245;

(m)
RCW 46.61.290;

(n)
RCW 46.61.295;

(o)
RCW 46.61.305;

(p)
RCW 46.61.345;

(q)
RCW 46.61.370;

(r)
RCW 46.61.400;

(s)
RCW 46.61.425;

(t)
RCW 46.61.440;

(u)
RCW 46.61.527(2);

(v)
RCW 46.61.560;

(w)
RCW 46.61.570;

(x)
RCW 46.61.620;

(y)
RCW 46.61.645(1);

(z)
RCW 46.61.670.

Sec.
3. RCW
46.63.020 and 1998 c 294 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Failure
to perform any act required or the performance of any act prohibited by this
title or an equivalent administrative regulation or local law, ordinance,
regulation, or resolution relating to traffic including parking, standing,
stopping, and pedestrian offenses, is designated as a traffic infraction and
may not be classified as a criminal offense, except for an offense contained in
the following provisions of this title or a violation of an equivalent
administrative regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution:

(1)
RCW 46.09.120(2) relating to the operation of a nonhighway vehicle while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance;

(2)
RCW 46.09.130 relating to operation of nonhighway vehicles;

(3)
RCW 46.10.090(2) relating to the operation of a snowmobile while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or narcotics or habit‑forming drugs or
in a manner endangering the person of another;

(4)
RCW 46.10.130 relating to the operation of snowmobiles;

(5)
Chapter 46.12 RCW relating to certificates of ownership and registration and
markings indicating that a vehicle has been destroyed or declared a total loss;

(6)
RCW 46.16.010 relating to initial registration of motor vehicles;

(7)
RCW 46.16.011 relating to permitting unauthorized persons to drive;

(8)
RCW 46.16.160 relating to vehicle trip permits;

(9)
RCW 46.16.381(2) relating to knowingly providing false information in
conjunction with an application for a special placard or license plate for
disabled persons' parking;

(10)
RCW 46.20.005 relating to driving without a valid driver's license;

(11)
RCW 46.20.091 relating to false statements regarding a driver's license or
instruction permit;

(12)
RCW 46.20.336 relating to the unlawful possession and use of a driver's
license;

(13)
RCW 46.20.342 relating to driving with a suspended or revoked license or
status;

(14)
RCW 46.20.410 relating to the violation of restrictions of an occupational
driver's license;

(15)
RCW 46.20.420 relating to the operation of a motor vehicle with a suspended or
revoked license;

(16)
RCW 46.20.740 relating to operation of a motor vehicle without an ignition
interlock device in violation of a license notation that the device is
required;

(17)
RCW 46.20.750 relating to assisting another person to start a vehicle equipped
with an ignition interlock device;

(18)
RCW 46.25.170 relating to commercial driver's licenses;

(19)
Chapter 46.29 RCW relating to financial responsibility;

(20)
RCW 46.30.040 relating to providing false evidence of financial responsibility;

(21)
RCW 46.37.435 relating to wrongful installation of sunscreening material;

(22)
RCW 46.44.180 relating to operation of mobile home pilot vehicles;

(23)
RCW 46.48.175 relating to the transportation of dangerous articles;

(24)
RCW 46.52.010 relating to duty on striking an unattended car or other property;

(25)
RCW 46.52.020 relating to duty in case of injury to or death of a person or
damage to an attended vehicle;

(26)
RCW 46.52.090 relating to reports by repairmen, storagemen, and appraisers;

(27)
RCW 46.52.100 relating to driving under the influence of liquor or drugs;

(28)
RCW 46.52.130 relating to confidentiality of the driving record to be furnished
to an insurance company, an employer, and an alcohol/drug assessment or
treatment agency;

(29)
RCW 46.55.020 relating to engaging in the activities of a registered tow truck
operator without a registration certificate;

(30)
RCW 46.55.035 relating to prohibited practices by tow truck operators;

(31)
RCW 46.61.015 relating to obedience to police officers, flagmen, or fire
fighters;

(32)
RCW 46.61.020 relating to refusal to give information to or cooperate with an
officer;

(33)
RCW 46.61.022 relating to failure to stop and give identification to an
officer;

(34)
RCW 46.61.024 relating to attempting to elude pursuing police vehicles;

(35)
RCW 46.61.500 relating to reckless driving;

(36)
RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504 relating to persons under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or drugs;

(37)
RCW 46.61.503 relating to a person under age twenty-one driving a motor vehicle
after consuming alcohol;

(38)
RCW 46.61.520 relating to vehicular homicide by motor vehicle;

(39)
RCW 46.61.522 relating to vehicular assault;

(40)
RCW 46.61.5249 relating to first degree negligent driving;

(41)
RCW 46.61.527(4) relating to reckless endangerment of roadway workers;

(42)
RCW 46.61.530 relating to racing of vehicles on highways;

(43)
RCW 46.61.685 relating to leaving children in an unattended vehicle with the
motor running;

(44)
RCW 46.61.--- (section 2 of this act) relating to aggressive driving;

(45)
RCW 46.64.010 relating to unlawful cancellation of or attempt to cancel a
traffic citation;

(((45)))
(46) RCW 46.64.048 relating to attempting, aiding, abetting, coercing,
and committing crimes;

(((46)))
(47) Chapter 46.65 RCW relating to habitual traffic offenders;

(((47)))
(48) RCW 46.68.010 relating to false statements made to obtain a refund;

(((48)))
(49) Chapter 46.70 RCW relating to unfair motor vehicle business
practices, except where that chapter provides for the assessment of monetary
penalties of a civil nature;

(((49)))
(50) Chapter 46.72 RCW relating to the transportation of passengers in
for hire vehicles;

(((50)))
(51) RCW 46.72A.060 relating to limousine carrier insurance;

(((51)))
(52) RCW 46.72A.070 relating to operation of a limousine without a
vehicle certificate;

(((52)))
(53) RCW 46.72A.080 relating to false advertising by a limousine
carrier;

(((53)))
(54) Chapter 46.80 RCW relating to motor vehicle wreckers;

(((54)))
(55) Chapter 46.82 RCW relating to driver's training schools;

(((55)))
(56) RCW 46.87.260 relating to alteration or forgery of a cab card,
letter of authority, or other temporary authority issued under chapter 46.87
RCW;

(((56)))
(57) RCW 46.87.290 relating to operation of an unregistered or
unlicensed vehicle under chapter 46.87 RCW.

Sec.
4. RCW
9.94A.390 and 1997 c 52 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

If
the sentencing court finds that an exceptional sentence outside the standard
range should be imposed in accordance with RCW 9.94A.120(2), the sentence is
subject to review only as provided for in RCW 9.94A.210(4).

The
following are illustrative factors which the court may consider in the exercise
of its discretion to impose an exceptional sentence. The following are
illustrative only and are not intended to be exclusive reasons for exceptional
sentences.

(1)
Mitigating Circumstances

(a)
To a significant degree, the victim was an initiator, willing participant,
aggressor, or provoker of the incident.

(b)
Before detection, the defendant compensated, or made a good faith effort to
compensate, the victim of the criminal conduct for any damage or injury
sustained.

(c)
The defendant committed the crime under duress, coercion, threat, or compulsion
insufficient to constitute a complete defense but which significantly affected
his or her conduct.

(d)
The defendant, with no apparent predisposition to do so, was induced by others
to participate in the crime.

(e)
The defendant's capacity to appreciate the wrongfulness of his or her conduct
or to conform his or her conduct to the requirements of the law, was
significantly impaired (voluntary use of drugs or alcohol is excluded).

(f)
The offense was principally accomplished by another person and the defendant
manifested extreme caution or sincere concern for the safety or well-being of
the victim.

(g)
The operation of the multiple offense policy of RCW 9.94A.400 results in a
presumptive sentence that is clearly excessive in light of the purpose of this
chapter, as expressed in RCW 9.94A.010.

(h)
The defendant or the defendant's children suffered a continuing pattern of
physical or sexual abuse by the victim of the offense and the offense is a response
to that abuse.

(2)
Aggravating Circumstances

(a)
The defendant's conduct during the commission of the current offense manifested
deliberate cruelty to the victim.

(b)
The defendant knew or should have known that the victim of the current offense was
particularly vulnerable or incapable of resistance due to extreme youth,
advanced age, disability, or ill health.

(c)
The current offense was a violent offense, and the defendant knew that the
victim of the current offense was pregnant.

(d)
The current offense was a major economic offense or series of offenses, so
identified by a consideration of any of the following factors:

(i)
The current offense involved multiple victims or multiple incidents per victim;

(ii)
The current offense involved attempted or actual monetary loss substantially
greater than typical for the offense;

(iii)
The current offense involved a high degree of sophistication or planning or
occurred over a lengthy period of time; or

(iv)
The defendant used his or her position of trust, confidence, or fiduciary
responsibility to facilitate the commission of the current offense.

(e)
The current offense was a major violation of the Uniform Controlled Substances
Act, chapter 69.50 RCW (VUCSA), related to trafficking in controlled substances,
which was more onerous than the typical offense of its statutory definition:
The presence of ANY of the following may identify a current offense as a major
VUCSA:

(i)
The current offense involved at least three separate transactions in which
controlled substances were sold, transferred, or possessed with intent to do
so;

(ii)
The current offense involved an attempted or actual sale or transfer of
controlled substances in quantities substantially larger than for personal use;

(iii)
The current offense involved the manufacture of controlled substances for use
by other parties;

(iv)
The circumstances of the current offense reveal the offender to have occupied a
high position in the drug distribution hierarchy;

(v)
The current offense involved a high degree of sophistication or planning or
occurred over a lengthy period of time or involved a broad geographic area of
disbursement; or

(vi)
The offender used his or her position or status to facilitate the commission of
the current offense, including positions of trust, confidence or fiduciary
responsibility (e.g., pharmacist, physician, or other medical professional).

(f)
The current offense included a finding of sexual motivation pursuant to RCW
9.94A.127.

(g)
The offense was part of an ongoing pattern of sexual abuse of the same victim
under the age of eighteen years manifested by multiple incidents over a
prolonged period of time.

(h)
The current offense involved domestic violence, as defined in RCW 10.99.020 and
one or more of the following was present:

(i)
The offense was part of an ongoing pattern of psychological, physical, or
sexual abuse of the victim manifested by multiple incidents over a prolonged
period of time;

(ii)
The offense occurred within sight or sound of the victim's or the offender's
minor children under the age of eighteen years; or

(iii)
The offender's conduct during the commission of the current offense manifested
deliberate cruelty or intimidation of the victim.

(i)
The operation of the multiple offense policy of RCW 9.94A.400 results in a
presumptive sentence that is clearly too lenient in light of the purpose of
this chapter, as expressed in RCW 9.94A.010.

(j)
The defendant's prior unscored misdemeanor or prior unscored foreign criminal
history results in a presumptive sentence that is clearly too lenient in light
of the purpose of this chapter as expressed in RCW 9.94A.010.

(k)
The offense resulted in the pregnancy of a child victim of rape.

(l)
The offender's conduct during or leading to the offense included an act of
aggressive driving as defined in section 2(3) of this act.

Sec.
5. RCW
13.40.150 and 1998 c 86 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In disposition hearings all relevant and material evidence, including oral and
written reports, may be received by the court and may be relied upon to the
extent of its probative value, even though such evidence may not be admissible
in a hearing on the information. The youth or the youth's counsel and the
prosecuting attorney shall be afforded an opportunity to examine and controvert
written reports so received and to cross-examine individuals making reports
when such individuals are reasonably available, but sources of confidential
information need not be disclosed. The prosecutor and counsel for the juvenile
may submit recommendations for disposition.

(2)
For purposes of disposition:

(a)
Violations which are current offenses count as misdemeanors;

(b)
Violations may not count as part of the offender's criminal history;

(c)
In no event may a disposition for a violation include confinement.

(3)
Before entering a dispositional order as to a respondent found to have committed
an offense, the court shall hold a disposition hearing, at which the court
shall:

(a)
Consider the facts supporting the allegations of criminal conduct by the
respondent;

(b)
Consider information and arguments offered by parties and their counsel;

(c)
Consider any predisposition reports;

(d)
Consult with the respondent's parent, guardian, or custodian on the
appropriateness of dispositional options under consideration and afford the
respondent and the respondent's parent, guardian, or custodian an opportunity
to speak in the respondent's behalf;

(e)
Allow the victim or a representative of the victim and an investigative law
enforcement officer to speak;

(f)
Determine the amount of restitution owing to the victim, if any, or set a
hearing for a later date not to exceed one hundred eighty days from the date of
the disposition hearing to determine the amount, except that the court may
continue the hearing beyond the one hundred eighty days for good cause;

(g)
Determine the respondent's offender score;

(h)
Consider whether or not any of the following mitigating factors exist:

(i)
The respondent's conduct neither caused nor threatened serious bodily injury or
the respondent did not contemplate that his or her conduct would cause or
threaten serious bodily injury;

(ii)
The respondent acted under strong and immediate provocation;

(iii)
The respondent was suffering from a mental or physical condition that
significantly reduced his or her culpability for the offense though failing to
establish a defense;

(iv)
Prior to his or her detection, the respondent compensated or made a good faith
attempt to compensate the victim for the injury or loss sustained; and

(v)
There has been at least one year between the respondent's current offense and
any prior criminal offense;

(i)
Consider whether or not any of the following aggravating factors exist:

(i)
In the commission of the offense, or in flight therefrom, the respondent
inflicted or attempted to inflict serious bodily injury to another;

(ii)
The offense was committed in an especially heinous, cruel, or depraved manner;

(iii)
The victim or victims were particularly vulnerable;

(iv)
The respondent has a recent criminal history or has failed to comply with
conditions of a recent dispositional order or diversion agreement;

(v)
The current offense included a finding of sexual motivation pursuant to RCW
13.40.135;

(vi)
The respondent was the leader of a criminal enterprise involving several
persons;

(vii)
There are other complaints which have resulted in diversion or a finding or
plea of guilty but which are not included as criminal history; ((and))

(viii)
The standard range disposition is clearly too lenient considering the
seriousness of the juvenile's prior adjudications; and

(ix)
The respondent's conduct during or leading to the offense included an act of
aggressive driving as defined in section 2(3) of this act.

(4)
The following factors may not be considered in determining the punishment to be
imposed:

(a)
The sex of the respondent;

(b)
The race or color of the respondent or the respondent's family;

(c)
The creed or religion of the respondent or the respondent's family;

(d)
The economic or social class of the respondent or the respondent's family; and

(e)
Factors indicating that the respondent may be or is a dependent child within
the meaning of this chapter.

(5)
A court may not commit a juvenile to a state institution solely because of the
lack of facilities, including treatment facilities, existing in the community.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW to read as follows:

The department shall suspend for sixty days the license or permit
to drive or a nonresident driving privilege of a person convicted of aggressive
driving.

---
END ---