BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.335.210 and 1983 c 204 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The
state board of education and superintendent of public instruction shall
allocate, as a nondeductible item, out of any moneys appropriated for state assistance
to school districts for the original construction of any school plant facility
the amount of one-half of one percent of the appropriation to be expended by
the Washington state arts commission for the acquisition of works of art. The
works of art may be placed in accordance with Article IX, sections 2 and 3 of
the state Constitution on public lands, integral to or attached to a public
building or structure, detached within or outside a public building or
structure, part of a portable exhibition or collection, part of a temporary
exhibition, or loaned or exhibited in other public facilities. The Washington
state arts commission shall, in consultation with the superintendent of public
instruction, determine the amount to be made available for the purchase of
works of art under this section, and payments therefor shall be made in
accordance with law. The designation of projects and sites, selection,
contracting, purchase, commissioning, reviewing of design, execution and
placement, acceptance, maintenance, and sale, exchange, or disposition of works
of art shall be the responsibility of the Washington state arts commission in
consultation with the superintendent of public instruction and representatives
of school district boards of directors. However, the costs to carry out the
Washington state arts commission's responsibility for maintenance shall not be
funded from the moneys referred to under this section, RCW 43.17.200,
43.19.455, or 28B.10.025, but shall be contingent upon adequate appropriations
being made for that purpose: PROVIDED, That the superintendent of public
instruction and the school district board of directors of the districts where
the sites are selected shall have the right to:

(1)
Waive its use of the one-half of one percent of the appropriation for the
acquisition of works of art before the selection process by the Washington
state arts commission;

(2)
Appoint a representative to the body established by the Washington state arts
commission to be part of the selection process with full voting rights;

(3)
Reject the results of the selection process;

(4)
Reject the placement of a completed work or works of art on school district
premises if such works are portable.

Rejection
at any point before or after the selection process shall not cause the loss of
or otherwise endanger state construction funds available to the local school
district. Any works of art rejected under this section shall be applied to the
provision of works of art under this chapter, at the discretion of the Washington
state arts commission, notwithstanding any contract or agreement between the
affected school district and the artist involved. In addition to the cost of
the works of art the one-half of one percent of the appropriation as provided
herein shall be used to provide for the administration by the Washington state
arts commission and all costs for installation of the work of art. For the
purpose of this section building shall not include sheds, warehouses or other
buildings of a temporary nature.

The
executive director of the arts commission, the superintendent of public
instruction and the Washington state school directors association shall appoint
a study group to review the operations of the one-half of one percent for works
of art under this section.

For schools located in rural communities with student
populations under one thousand five hundred pupils, the art selection process
shall be determined by the local school board in consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction and the Washington state arts commission.

---
END ---