BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
49.78.005 and 1997 c 16 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the department shall
cease to administer and enforce this chapter beginning on July 27, 1997, and
until the earlier of the following dates:

(a)
The effective date of the repeal of the federal family and medical leave act of
1993 (Act Feb. 5, 1993, P.L. 103-3, 107 Stat. 6); or

(b)
July 1st of the year following the year in which ((amendments to)) the
federal family and medical leave act of 1993 (Act Feb. 5, 1993, P.L. 103-3, 107
Stat. 6) ((take effect that)) provides less family leave than is
provided under RCW 49.78.030. In determining whether the federal law provides
the same or more leave, the department shall only consider whether (i) the
total period of leave allowed under the ((amended)) federal law is
twelve or more workweeks in a twenty-four month period, ((and)) (ii) the
types of leave authorized under the amended federal law are similar to the
types authorized in this chapter, and (iii) the employees who are entitled
to leave under the federal law are the same as the employees entitled to leave
under this chapter.

(2)
An employee's right under RCW 49.78.070(1)(b) to be returned to a workplace
within twenty miles of the employee's workplace when leave commenced shall
remain in effect. The family leave required by U.S.C. 29.2612(a)(1)(A) and (B)
of the federal family and medical leave act of 1993 (Act Feb. 5, 1993, P.L.
103-3, 107 Stat. 6) shall be in addition to any leave for sickness or temporary
disability because of pregnancy or childbirth. The department shall enforce
this subsection under RCW 49.78.140 through 49.78.190, except that an initial
notice of infraction shall state that the employer has thirty days in which to
take corrective action. No infraction or penalty may be assessed if the
employer complies with the requirements of the initial notice of infraction.

Sec.
2. RCW
49.78.010 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 11 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that the demands of the workplace and of families need to be
balanced to promote family stability and economic security. Changes in
workplace leave policies are desirable to accommodate changes in the work force
such as rising numbers of dual-career couples ((and)), working
single parents, and part-time workers. In addition, given the mobility
of American society, many people no longer have available community or family
support networks and therefore need additional flexibility in the workplace.
The legislature declares it to be in the public interest to provide reasonable
family leave upon the birth or adoption of a child and to care for a child
under eighteen years old with a terminal health condition.

Sec.
3. RCW
49.78.020 and 1996 c 178 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Child" means a biological or adopted child, or a stepchild, living
with the employee.

(2)
"Department" means the department of labor and industries.

(3)
"Employee" means a person other than an independent contractor
employed by an employer on a continuous basis for the previous fifty-two weeks
for at least ((thirty-five)) ten hours per week.

(4)
"Employer" means: (a) Any person, firm, corporation, partnership,
business trust, legal representative, or other business entity which engages in
any business, industry, profession, or activity in this state and includes any
unit of local government including, but not limited to, a county, city, town,
municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or political subdivision,
which (i) employed a daily average of ((one hundred)) fifty or
more employees during the last calendar quarter at the place where the employee
requesting leave reports for work, or (ii) employed a daily average of ((one
hundred)) fifty or more employees during the last calendar quarter
within a twenty mile radius of the place where the employee requesting leave
reports for work, where the employer maintains a central hiring location and
customarily transfers employees among workplaces; and (b) the state, state
institutions, and state agencies.

(5)
"Family leave" means leave from employment to care for a newborn or
newly adopted child under the age of six or a child under eighteen years old
with a terminal health condition, as provided in RCW 49.78.030.

(6)
"Health care provider" means a person licensed as a physician under
chapter 18.71 RCW or an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57
RCW.

(7)
"Parent" means a biological or adoptive parent, or a stepparent.

(8)
"Reduced leave schedule" means leave scheduled for fewer than an
employee's usual number of hours or days per workweek.

(9) "Terminal health condition" means a condition caused
by injury, disease, or illness, that, within reasonable medical judgment, is
incurable and will produce death within the period of leave to which the
employee is entitled.

---
END ---