BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 49.60 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature declares that the promotion of family values and child health
demands putting an end to the vicious cycle of embarrassment and ignorance that
constricts women and men alike on the subject of breastfeeding and represents
cultural hostility to mothers and children that is based on archaic and
outdated moral taboos. The legislature finds that:

(1)
The American academy of pediatrics recommends exclusive breastfeeding for the
first six months and breastfeeding with solids to continue for at least twelve
months. The American academy of pediatrics recommends that mothers begin
breastfeeding within the first hour after delivery and recommends that
arrangements be made to provide expressed breast milk if the mother and child
must separate during the first year;

(2)
Breast milk contains all the nutrients a child needs for ideal growth and
development, many of which can only be found in breast milk. Breast milk is
easy to digest and helps guard against juvenile diabetes, lymphomas, Crohn's
disease, and a number of chronic liver diseases;

(3)
Studies show that children who are not breastfed have higher rates of death,
meningitis, childhood leukemia and other cancers, diabetes, respiratory
illnesses, bacterial and viral infections, diarrheal diseases, allergies,
obesity, and developmental delays;

(4)
In 1997, the United States had one of the lowest breastfeeding rates of all
industrialized nations, and one of the highest rates of infant mortality;

(5)
Breastfeeding may help reduce the mother's risk of breast and ovarian cancer
and osteoporosis;

(6)
Breastfeeding releases oxytocin, a hormone in a woman's body that causes her
uterus to return to its normal size and shape more quickly after birth.
Breastfeeding also releases prolactin, a hormone which promotes closeness
between a mother and her child;

(7)
Women with children are the fastest growing segment of today's labor force;

(8)
At least fifty percent of women who are employed when they become pregnant
return to the work force by the time their children are three months old;

(9)
Women who wish to continue breastfeeding after returning to work have
relatively few and simple needs: Availability of suitable, dependable,
efficient breast pumps; a convenient, sanitary, safe, private, and comfortable
location at the workplace; and the ability during the work shift to express
milk from her breasts and safely store it;

(10)
Women who are allowed to breastfeed in their place of employment benefit their
employers because these women have higher morale, higher self-esteem, increased
productivity, more company loyalty, and lower health care costs;

(11)
Childhood illness is a frequent cause of absenteeism among employed parents.
Work programs that aim to improve infant health may also bring about a
reduction in employee absenteeism;

(12)
Lower incidents of illness in the breastfed infant allows the parents more time
for attention to siblings and other family duties and reduces parental absence
from work and lost income;

(13)
Although the pregnancy discrimination act, enacted by Congress in 1978, prohibits
discrimination on the basis of pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical
condition, courts have not interpreted the pregnancy discrimination act to
include breastfeeding.

Sec.
2. RCW
9A.88.010 and 1990 c 3 s 904 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of indecent exposure if he or she intentionally makes
any open and obscene exposure of his or her person or the person of
another knowing that such conduct is likely to cause reasonable affront or
alarm. The act of breastfeeding or expressing breast milk is not indecent
exposure.

(2)
Indecent exposure is a misdemeanor unless such person exposes himself or
herself to a person under the age of fourteen years in which case indecent
exposure is a gross misdemeanor on the first offense and, if such person has
previously been convicted under this subsection or of a sex offense as defined
in RCW 9.94A.030, then such person is guilty of a class C felony punishable
under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

Sec.
3. RCW
49.60.040 and 1997 c 271 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"Person" includes one or more individuals, partnerships,
associations, organizations, corporations, cooperatives, legal representatives,
trustees and receivers, or any group of persons; it includes any owner, lessee,
proprietor, manager, agent, or employee, whether one or more natural persons;
and further includes any political or civil subdivisions of the state and any
agency or instrumentality of the state or of any political or civil subdivision
thereof;

(2)
"Commission" means the Washington state human rights commission;

(3)
"Employer" includes any person acting in the interest of an employer,
directly or indirectly, who employs eight or more persons, and does not include
any religious or sectarian organization not organized for private profit;

(4)
"Employee" does not include any individual employed by his or her
parents, spouse, or child, or in the domestic service of any person;

(5)
"Labor organization" includes any organization which exists for the
purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing with employers concerning grievances
or terms or conditions of employment, or for other mutual aid or protection in
connection with employment;

(6)
"Employment agency" includes any person undertaking with or without
compensation to recruit, procure, refer, or place employees for an employer;

(7)
"Marital status" means the legal status of being married, single,
separated, divorced, or widowed;

(8)
"National origin" includes "ancestry";

(9)
"Full enjoyment of" includes the right to purchase any service,
commodity, or article of personal property offered or sold on, or by, any
establishment to the public, and the admission of any person to accommodations,
advantages, facilities, or privileges of any place of public resort,
accommodation, assemblage, or amusement, without acts directly or indirectly
causing persons of any particular race, creed, color, sex, national origin, or
with any sensory, mental, or physical disability, or the use of a trained dog
guide or service animal by a disabled person, to be treated as not welcome,
accepted, desired, or solicited;

(10)
"Any place of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement"
includes, but is not limited to, any place, licensed or unlicensed, kept for
gain, hire, or reward, or where charges are made for admission, service,
occupancy, or use of any property or facilities, whether conducted for the
entertainment, housing, or lodging of transient guests, or for the benefit,
use, or accommodation of those seeking health, recreation, or rest, or for the
burial or other disposition of human remains, or for the sale of goods,
merchandise, services, or personal property, or for the rendering of personal
services, or for public conveyance or transportation on land, water, or in the
air, including the stations and terminals thereof and the garaging of vehicles,
or where food or beverages of any kind are sold for consumption on the
premises, or where public amusement, entertainment, sports, or recreation of
any kind is offered with or without charge, or where medical service or care is
made available, or where the public gathers, congregates, or assembles for
amusement, recreation, or public purposes, or public halls, public elevators,
and public washrooms of buildings and structures occupied by two or more
tenants, or by the owner and one or more tenants, or any public library or
educational institution, or schools of special instruction, or nursery schools,
or day care centers or children's camps: PROVIDED, That nothing contained in
this definition shall be construed to include or apply to any institute, bona
fide club, or place of accommodation, which is by its nature distinctly
private, including fraternal organizations, though where public use is
permitted that use shall be covered by this chapter; nor shall anything
contained in this definition apply to any educational facility, columbarium,
crematory, mausoleum, or cemetery operated or maintained by a bona fide
religious or sectarian institution;

(11)
"Real property" includes buildings, structures, dwellings, real
estate, lands, tenements, leaseholds, interests in real estate cooperatives,
condominiums, and hereditaments, corporeal and incorporeal, or any interest
therein;

(12)
"Real estate transaction" includes the sale, appraisal, brokering,
exchange, purchase, rental, or lease of real property, transacting or applying
for a real estate loan, or the provision of brokerage services;

(13)
"Dwelling" means any building, structure, or portion thereof that is
occupied as, or designed or intended for occupancy as, a residence by one or
more families, and any vacant land that is offered for sale or lease for the
construction or location thereon of any such building, structure, or portion
thereof;

(14)
"Sex" means gender;

(15)
"Aggrieved person" means any person who: (a) Claims to have been
injured by an unfair practice in a real estate transaction; or (b) believes
that he or she will be injured by an unfair practice in a real estate
transaction that is about to occur;

(16)
"Complainant" means the person who files a complaint in a real estate
transaction;

(17)
"Respondent" means any person accused in a complaint or amended
complaint of an unfair practice in a real estate transaction;

(18)
"Credit transaction" includes any open or closed end credit
transaction, whether in the nature of a loan, retail installment transaction,
credit card issue or charge, or otherwise, and whether for personal or for
business purposes, in which a service, finance, or interest charge is imposed,
or which provides for repayment in scheduled payments, when such credit is
extended in the regular course of any trade or commerce, including but not
limited to transactions by banks, savings and loan associations or other financial
lending institutions of whatever nature, stock brokers, or by a merchant or
mercantile establishment which as part of its ordinary business permits or
provides that payment for purchases of property or service therefrom may be
deferred;

(19)
"Nursing mother status" means a woman who is breastfeeding or who
is expressing breast milk;

(20)
"Families with children status" means one or more individuals who
have not attained the age of eighteen years being domiciled with a parent or
another person having legal custody of such individual or individuals, or with
the designee of such parent or other person having such legal custody, with the
written permission of such parent or other person. Families with children
status also applies to any person who is pregnant or is in the process of
securing legal custody of any individual who has not attained the age of
eighteen years;

(((20)))
(21) "Covered multifamily dwelling" means: (a) Buildings
consisting of four or more dwelling units if such buildings have one or more
elevators; and (b) ground floor dwelling units in other buildings consisting of
four or more dwelling units;

(((21)))
(22) "Premises" means the interior or exterior spaces, parts,
components, or elements of a building, including individual dwelling units and
the public and common use areas of a building;

(((22)))
(23) "Restroom" means a room containing one or more toilets, but
not an adjoining and separate room with easily accessible electrical outlets;

(24)
"Dog guide" means a dog that is trained for the purpose of guiding
blind persons or a dog that is trained for the purpose of assisting hearing
impaired persons;

(((23)))
(25) "Service animal" means an animal that is trained for the
purpose of assisting or accommodating a disabled person's sensory, mental, or
physical disability.

Sec.
4. RCW
49.60.215 and 1997 c 271 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

((It
shall be)) (1) Except as provided in this section, it is an unfair
practice for any person or the person's agent or employee to commit an act
which directly or indirectly results in any distinction, restriction, or
discrimination, or the requiring of any person to pay a larger sum than the
uniform rates charged other persons, or the refusing or withholding from any
person the admission, patronage, custom, presence, frequenting, dwelling,
staying, or lodging in any place of public resort, accommodation, assemblage,
or amusement, except for conditions and limitations established by law and
applicable to all persons, regardless of race, creed, color, national origin,
sex, nursing mother status, the presence of any sensory, mental, or
physical disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a
disabled person: PROVIDED, That this section shall not be construed to require
structural changes, modifications, or additions to make any place accessible to
a disabled person or to provide a room or other location for a nursing
mother to breastfeed or express breast milk except as otherwise required by
law: PROVIDED, That behavior or actions constituting a risk to property or
other persons can be grounds for refusal and shall not constitute an unfair
practice.

(2)
It is not an unfair practice for:

(a)
A business that is not a public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement
to offer a specific area of the business, other than a restroom, for a nursing
mother to use, so long as the business makes the availability of such an area
known only by posting a sign in a prominent location or by responding to an
inquiry from a nursing mother; or

(b)
An employer to designate a specific room or other location in the workplace for
an employee to use as provided under section 5 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 49.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Except where reasonable safety or security considerations require other
options, or where structural changes or additions would be required, an
employer must make reasonable efforts to provide a convenient, sanitary, safe,
private, and comfortable room or other location, in close proximity to the work
area, other than a restroom, where the employee can express her milk in
privacy.

(2)
An employer may use the designation "baby-friendly" on its
promotional materials if the employer has an approved workplace breastfeeding
policy addressing at least the following:

(a)
Flexible work scheduling, including scheduling breaks and permitting work
patterns that provide time for expression of breast milk;

(b)
Convenient, sanitary, safe, private, and comfortable locations allowing privacy
for breastfeeding or expressing breast milk;

(c)
A convenient clean and safe water source with facilities for washing hands and
rinsing breast-pumping equipment; and

(d)
A convenient hygienic refrigerator in the workplace for the mother's breast
milk.

(3)
Employers seeking approval of a workplace breastfeeding policy must submit the
policy to the department of health. The department of health shall review and
approve those policies that meet the requirements of this section.

(4)
The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.

(a) "Employer" includes those employers defined in RCW
49.12.005 and also includes the state, state institutions, state agencies,
political subdivisions of the state, and municipal corporations or quasi-municipal
corporations; and

(b) "Restroom" includes a room containing one or more
toilets, but not an adjoining and separate room with easily accessible
electrical outlets.

---
END ---