BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.190.005 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that a primary goal of public involvement in the lives of
children has been to strengthen the family unit.

However,
the legislature recognizes that traditional two-parent families with one parent
routinely at home are now in the minority. In addition, extended family and
natural community supports have eroded drastically. The legislature recognizes
that public policy assumptions must be altered to account for this new social
reality. Public effort must be redirected to expand, support, strengthen, and
help reconstruct family and community networks to assist in meeting the needs
of children.

The
legislature finds that a broad variety of services for children and families
has been independently designed over the years and that the coordination and
cost-effectiveness of these services will be enhanced through the adoption of
an approach that allows communities to prioritize and coordinate services to
meet their local needs. The legislature further finds that the most successful
programs for reaching and working with at-risk families and children treat
individuals' problems in the context of the family, offer a broad spectrum of
services, are flexible in the use of program resources, and use staff who are
trained in crossing traditional program categories in order to broker services
necessary to fully meet a family's needs.

The
legislature further finds that eligibility criteria, expenditure restrictions,
and reporting requirements of state and federal categorical programs often
create barriers toward the effective use of resources for addressing the
multiple problems of at-risk families and children.

The
legislature also finds that research has shown that interventions designed to
deter juvenile violence and delinquency are cost-effective and compare
favorably with the cost of detention.

The
purposes of this chapter are: (1) To modify public policy and
programs to empower communities to support and respond to the needs of
individual families and children ((and)); (2) to improve the
responsiveness of services for children and families at risk by facilitating
greater coordination and flexibility in the use of funds by state and local
service agencies; and (3) to develop a program to fund research-based
prevention and early intervention programs targeting youth and their families
who have not yet entered the juvenile justice system.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The
sum of five million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated from the general fund to the family policy council for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2001, to carry out the purposes of this act.

---
END ---