BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.535.020 and 1996 c 48 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever
the board of directors of any school district shall deem it advisable to
validate and ratify the indebtedness mentioned in RCW 28A.535.010, they shall
provide therefor by resolution, which shall be entered on the records of such
school district, which resolution shall provide for the holding of an election
for the purpose of submitting the question of validating and ratifying the
indebtedness so incurred to the voters of such school district for approval or
disapproval, and if at such election ((three-fifths)) a majority
of the voters in such school district voting at such election shall vote in
favor of the validation and ratification of such indebtedness, then such
indebtedness so validated and ratified and every part thereof existing at the
time of the adoption of said resolution shall thereby become and is hereby
declared to be validated and ratified and a binding obligation upon such school
district.

Sec.
2. RCW
28A.535.050 and 1984 c 186 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

If
the indebtedness of such school district is validated and ratified, as provided
in this chapter, by ((three-fifths)) a majority of the voters
voting at such election, the board of directors of such school district,
without any further vote, may borrow money and issue and sell negotiable bonds
therefor in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

Sec.
3. RCW
84.52.056 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 104 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
municipal corporation otherwise authorized by law to issue general obligation
bonds for capital purposes may, at an election duly held after giving notice
thereof as required by law, authorize the issuance of general obligation bonds
for capital purposes only, which shall not include the replacement of
equipment, and provide for the payment of the principal and interest of such
bonds by annual levies in excess of the tax limitations contained in RCW
84.52.050 to 84.52.056, inclusive and RCW 84.52.043. Such an election shall
not be held oftener than twice a calendar year, and the proposition to issue
any such bonds and to exceed said tax limitation must receive the affirmative
vote of a three-fifths majority of those voting on the proposition and the
total number of ((persons)) voters voting at such election must
constitute not less than forty percent of the voters in said municipal
corporation who voted at the last preceding general state election, except
that a proposition by a school district to issue such bonds and to pay the
principal and interest on the bonds by annual tax levies shall be authorized by
receiving the affirmative vote of a majority of the voters voting on the
proposition.

Any
taxing district shall have the right by vote of its governing body to refund
any general obligation bonds of said district issued for capital purposes only,
and to provide for the interest thereon and amortization thereof by annual
levies in excess of the tax limitations provided for in RCW 84.52.050 to
84.52.056, inclusive and RCW 84.52.043.

Sec.
4. RCW
39.36.020 and 1994 c 277 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as otherwise expressly provided by law or in subsections (2), (3) and
(4) of this section, no taxing district shall for any purpose become indebted
in any manner to an amount exceeding three‑eighths of one percent of the
value of the taxable property in such taxing district without the assent of
three‑fifths of the voters therein voting at an election to be held for
that purpose, nor in cases requiring such assent shall the total indebtedness
incurred at any time exceed one and one-fourth percent on the value of the
taxable property therein.

(2)(a)(i)
Public hospital districts are limited to an indebtedness amount not exceeding
three-fourths of one percent of the value of the taxable property in such
public hospital districts without the assent of three-fifths of the voters
therein voting at an election held for that purpose.

(ii)
Counties, cities, and towns are limited to an indebtedness amount not exceeding
one and one-half percent of the value of the taxable property in such counties,
cities, or towns without the assent of three-fifths of the voters therein
voting at an election held for that purpose.

(b)
In cases requiring such assent counties, cities, towns, and public hospital
districts are limited to a total indebtedness of two and one-half percent of
the value of the taxable property therein. However, any county that has
assumed the rights, powers, functions, and obligations of a metropolitan
municipal corporation under chapter 36.56 RCW may become indebted to a larger
amount for its authorized metropolitan functions, as provided under chapter
35.58 RCW, but not exceeding an additional three-fourths of one percent of the
value of the taxable property in the county without the assent of three-fifths
of the voters therein voting at an election held for that purpose, and in cases
requiring such assent not exceeding an additional two and one-half percent of
the value of the taxable property in the county.

(3)
School districts are limited to an indebtedness amount not exceeding
three-eighths of one percent of the value of the taxable property in such
district without the assent of ((three‑fifths)) a majority
of the voters therein voting at an election held for that purpose. In cases
requiring such assent school districts are limited to a total indebtedness of
two and one-half percent of the value of the taxable property therein.

(4)
No part of the indebtedness allowed in this chapter shall be incurred for any
purpose other than strictly county, city, town, school district, township, port
district, metropolitan park district, or other municipal purposes: PROVIDED,
That a city or town, with such assent, may become indebted to a larger amount,
but not exceeding two and one-half percent additional, determined as herein
provided, for supplying such city or town with water, artificial light, and
sewers, when the works for supplying such water, light, and sewers shall be
owned and controlled by the city or town; and a city or town, with such assent,
may become indebted to a larger amount, but not exceeding two and one-half
percent additional for acquiring or developing open space and park facilities:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That any school district may become indebted to a larger
amount but not exceeding two and one-half percent additional for capital outlays.

(5)
Such indebtedness may be authorized in any total amount in one or more
propositions and the amount of such authorization may exceed the amount of
indebtedness which could then lawfully be incurred. Such indebtedness may be
incurred in one or more series of bonds from time to time out of such
authorization but at no time shall the total general indebtedness of any taxing
district exceed the above limitation.

The
term "value of the taxable property" as used in this section shall
have the meaning set forth in RCW 39.36.015.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. RCW
28A.530.020 and 1996 c 48 s 1, 1990 c 33 s 478, 1984 c 186 s 11, 1970 ex.s. c
42 s 9, & 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.51.020 are each repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. This
act takes effect if the proposed amendment to Article VII, section 2 and
Article VIII, section 6 of the state Constitution providing for a simple
majority of voters voting to authorize school district levies and bonds is
validly submitted to and is approved and ratified by the voters at the next
general election and certified by the secretary of state. If the proposed
amendment is not approved, ratified, and certified, this act is void in its
entirety.

---
END ---