BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
74.08.025 and 1997 c 58 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Public assistance may be awarded to any applicant:

(a)
Who is in need and otherwise meets the eligibility requirements of department
assistance programs; and

(b)
Who has not made a voluntary assignment of property or cash for the purpose of
qualifying for an assistance grant; and

(c)
Who is not an inmate of a public institution except as a patient in a medical
institution or except as an inmate in a public institution who could qualify
for federal aid assistance: PROVIDED, That the assistance paid by the
department to recipients in nursing homes, or receiving nursing home care, may
cover the cost of clothing and incidentals and general maintenance exclusive of
medical care and health services. The department may pay a grant to cover the
cost of clothing and personal incidentals in public or private medical
institutions and institutions for tuberculosis. The department shall allow
recipients in nursing homes to retain, in addition to the grant to cover the
cost of clothing and incidentals, wages received for work as a part of a
training or rehabilitative program designed to prepare the recipient for less
restrictive placement to the extent permitted under Title XIX of the federal
social security act.

(2)
((Any person otherwise qualified for temporary assistance for needy families
under this title who has resided in the state of Washington for fewer than
twelve consecutive months immediately preceding application for assistance is
limited to the benefit level in the state in which the person resided
immediately before Washington, using the eligibility rules and other
definitions established under this chapter, that was obtainable on the date of
application in Washington state, if the benefit level of the prior state is
lower than the level provided to similarly situated applicants in Washington state.
The benefit level under this subsection shall be in effect for the first twelve
months a recipient is on temporary assistance for needy families in Washington
state.

(3))) Any
person otherwise qualified for temporary assistance for needy families who is
assessed through the state alcohol and substance abuse program as drug or
alcohol-dependent and requiring treatment to become employable shall be
required by the department to participate in a drug or alcohol treatment
program as a condition of benefit receipt.

(((4)))
(3) In order to be eligible for temporary assistance for needy families
and food stamp program benefits, any applicant with a felony conviction after
August 21, 1996, involving drug use or possession, must: (a) Have been
assessed as chemically dependent by a chemical dependency program approved
under chapter 70.96A RCW and be participating in or have completed a
coordinated rehabilitation plan consisting of chemical dependency treatment and
vocational services; and (b) have not been convicted of a felony involving drug
use or possession in the three years prior to the most current conviction.

Sec.
2. RCW
74.08A.100 and 1997 c 57 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The state shall exercise its option under P.L. 104-193 to continue
services to legal immigrants under temporary assistance for needy families,
medicaid, and social services block grant programs. ((Eligibility for these
benefits for legal immigrants arriving after August 21, 1996, is limited to
those families where the parent, parents, or legal guardians have been in
residence in Washington state for a period of twelve consecutive months before
making their application for assistance.)) Legal immigrants who lose
benefits under the supplemental security income program as a result of P.L.
104-193 are immediately eligible for benefits under the state's general
assistance-unemployable program. The department shall redetermine income and
resource eligibility at least annually, in accordance with existing state
policy.

---
END ---