BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
41.04.190 and 1996 c 230 s 1610 are each amended to read as follows:

The
cost of a policy or plan to a public agency or body is not additional
compensation to the employees or elected officials covered thereby. The
elected officials to whom this section applies include but are not limited to
commissioners elected under chapters 28A.315, 52.14, 53.12, 54.12, 57.12,
70.44, and 87.03 RCW, as well as any county elected officials who are provided
insurance coverage under RCW 41.04.180, and city officials elected under
chapters 35.17, 35.22, 35.23, 35.27, 35A.12, and 35A.13 RCW. Such a policy or
plan for elected city officials must be adopted at an open meeting, must be
included on the council meeting agenda, and must be included as a line item in
the city budget. Any officer authorized to disburse such funds may pay in
whole or in part to an insurance carrier or health care service contractor the
amount of the premiums due under the contract.

Sec.
2. RCW
35.33.075 and 1995 c 301 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

Following
conclusion of the hearing, and prior to the beginning of the fiscal year, the
legislative body shall make such adjustments and changes as it deems necessary
or proper and after determining the allowance in each item, department,
classification and fund, and shall by ordinance, adopt the budget in its final
form and content. Appropriations shall be limited to the total estimated
revenues contained therein including the amount to be raised by ad valorem
taxes and the unencumbered fund balances estimated to be available at the close
of the current fiscal year. Such ordinances may adopt the final budget by
reference: PROVIDED, That the ordinance adopting such budget shall set forth
in summary form the totals of estimated revenues and appropriations for each
separate fund and the aggregate totals for all such funds combined.

A
complete copy of the final budget as adopted shall be transmitted to the ((association
of Washington cities)) municipal research council or its designee.

Sec.
3. RCW
35.34.120 and 1995 c 301 s 45 are each amended to read as follows:

Following
conclusion of the hearing, and prior to the beginning of the fiscal biennium,
the legislative body shall make such adjustments and changes as it deems
necessary or proper and, after determining the allowance in each item,
department, classification, and fund, shall by ordinance adopt the budget in
its final form and content. Appropriations shall be limited to the total
estimated revenues contained therein including the amount to be raised by ad
valorem taxes and the unencumbered fund balances estimated to be available at
the close of the current fiscal biennium. Such ordinances may adopt the final
budget by reference. However, the ordinance adopting the budget shall set
forth in summary form the totals of estimated revenues and appropriations for
each separate fund and the aggregate totals for all such funds combined.

A
complete copy of the final budget as adopted shall be transmitted to the state
auditor and to the ((association of Washington cities)) municipal
research council or its designee.

Sec.
4. RCW
35.34.130 and 1995 c 301 s 46 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislative authority of a city or town having adopted the provisions of this
chapter shall provide by ordinance for a mid-biennial review and modification
of the biennial budget. The ordinance shall provide that such review and
modification shall occur no sooner than eight months after the start nor later
than conclusion of the first year of the fiscal biennium. The chief
administrative officer shall prepare the proposed budget modification and shall
provide for publication of notice of hearings consistent with publication of
notices for adoption of other city or town ordinances. City or town ordinances
providing for a mid-biennium review and modification shall establish procedures
for distribution of the proposed modification to members of the city or town
legislative authority, procedures for making copies available to the public,
and shall provide for public hearings on the proposed budget modification. The
budget modification shall be by ordinance approved in the same manner as are
other ordinances of the city or town.

A
complete copy of the budget modification as adopted shall be transmitted to the
state auditor and to the ((association of Washington cities)) municipal
research council or its designee.

Sec.
5. RCW
35A.33.075 and 1995 c 301 s 53 are each amended to read as follows:

Following
conclusion of the hearing, and prior to the beginning of the fiscal year, the
legislative body shall make such adjustments and changes as it deems necessary
or proper and after determining the allowance in each item, department,
classification and fund, and shall by ordinance, adopt the budget in its final
form and content. Appropriations shall be limited to the total estimated
revenues contained therein including the amount to be raised by ad valorem
taxes and the unencumbered fund balances estimated to be available at the close
of the current fiscal year. Such ordinances may adopt the final budget by
reference: PROVIDED, That the ordinance adopting such budget shall set forth
in summary form the totals of estimated revenues and appropriations for each
separate fund and the aggregate totals for all such funds combined.

A
complete copy of the final budget as adopted shall be transmitted to the state
auditor((,)) and to the ((association of Washington cities)) municipal
research council or its designee.

Sec.
6. RCW
35A.34.120 and 1995 c 301 s 57 are each amended to read as follows:

Following
conclusion of the hearing, and prior to the beginning of the fiscal biennium,
the legislative body shall make such adjustments and changes as it deems
necessary or proper and, after determining the allowance in each item,
department, classification, and fund, shall by ordinance adopt the budget in
its final form and content. Appropriations shall be limited to the total
estimated revenues contained therein including the amount to be raised by ad
valorem taxes and the unencumbered fund balances estimated to be available at
the close of the current fiscal biennium. Such ordinances may adopt the final
budget by reference. However, the ordinance adopting the budget shall set forth
in summary form the totals of estimated revenues and appropriations for each
separate fund and the aggregate totals for all such funds combined.

A
complete copy of the final budget as adopted shall be transmitted to the state
auditor and to the ((association of Washington cities)) municipal
research council or its designee.

Sec.
7. RCW
35A.34.130 and 1995 c 301 s 58 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislative authority of a city having adopted the provisions of this chapter
shall provide by ordinance for a mid-biennial review and modification of the
biennial budget. The ordinance shall provide that such review and modification
shall occur no sooner than eight months after the start nor later than
conclusion of the first year of the fiscal biennium. The chief administrative
officer shall prepare the proposed budget modification and shall provide for
publication of notice of hearings consistent with publication of notices for
adoption of other city ordinances. City ordinances providing for a mid‑biennium
review and modification shall establish procedures for distribution of the
proposed modification to members of the city legislative authority, procedures
for making copies available to the public, and shall provide for public
hearings on the proposed budget modification. The budget modification shall be
by ordinance approved in the same manner as are other ordinances of the city.

A
complete copy of the budget modification as adopted shall be transmitted to the
state auditor and to the ((association of Washington cities)) municipal
research council or its designee.

Sec.
8. RCW
35.23.181 and 1993 c 199 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
city council and mayor shall meet in January next succeeding the date of each
general municipal election, and shall take the oath of office, and shall hold
regular meetings at least once during each month but not to exceed one regular
meeting in each week, at such times as may be fixed by ordinance.

Special
meetings may be called by the mayor or by a majority of the members of the
city council by written notice as provided in RCW 42.30.080. No ordinances
shall be passed or contract let or entered into, or bill for the payment of
money allowed at any special meeting.

All
meetings of the city council shall be held at such place as may be designated
by the city council. All final actions on resolutions and ordinances must take
place within the corporate limits of the city. All meetings of the city
council must be public.

Sec.
9. RCW
35A.12.110 and 1993 c 199 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The city council and mayor shall meet regularly, at least once a
month, at a place and at such times as may be designated by the city council.
All final actions on resolutions and ordinances must take place within the
corporate limits of the city. Special meetings may be called by the mayor or
((any three)) by a majority of the members of the council by
written notice delivered to each member of the council at least twenty-four
hours before the time specified for the proposed meeting. All actions that have
heretofore been taken at special council meetings held pursuant to this
section, but for which the number of hours of notice given has been at variance
with requirements of RCW 42.30.080, are hereby validated. All council meetings
shall be open to the public except as permitted by chapter 42.30 RCW. No
ordinance or resolution shall be passed, or contract let or entered into, or
bill for the payment of money allowed at any meeting not open to the public,
nor at any public meeting the date of which is not fixed by ordinance,
resolution, or rule, unless public notice of such meeting has been given by
such notice to each local newspaper of general circulation and to each local
radio or television station, as provided in RCW 42.30.080 as now or hereafter amended.
Meetings of the council shall be presided over by the mayor, if present, or
otherwise by the mayor pro tempore, or deputy mayor if one has been appointed,
or by a member of the council selected by a majority of the council members at
such meeting. Appointment of a council member to preside over the meeting
shall not in any way abridge his right to vote on matters coming before the
council at such meeting. In the absence of the clerk, a deputy clerk or other
qualified person appointed by the clerk, the mayor, or the council, may perform
the duties of clerk at such meeting. A journal of all proceedings shall be
kept, which shall be a public record.

Sec.
10. RCW
35A.14.299 and 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.14.299 are each amended to read as
follows:

Such
annexation ordinance as provided for in RCW 35A.14.297 shall be subject to
referendum for forty-five days after the passage thereof. Upon the filing of a
timely and sufficient referendum petition with the legislative body, signed by
qualified ((electors)) registered voters in number equal to not
less than ten percent of the votes cast in the last general state election in
the area to be annexed, the question of annexation shall be submitted to the
voters of such area in a general election if one is to be held within ninety
days or at a special election called for that purpose not less than forty-five
days nor more than ninety days after the filing of the referendum petition.
Notice of such election shall be given as provided in RCW 35A.14.070 ((and
the election shall be conducted as provided in RCW 35A.14.060)). The
annexation shall be deemed approved by the voters unless a majority of the
votes cast on the proposition are in opposition thereto.

After
the expiration of the forty-fifth day from but excluding the date of passage of
the annexation ordinance, if no timely and sufficient referendum petition has
been filed, the area annexed shall become a part of the code city upon the date
fixed in the ordinance of annexation. From and after such date, if the
ordinance so provided, property in the annexed area shall be subject to the
proposed zoning regulation prepared and filed for such area as provided in RCW
35A.14.330 and 35A.14.340. If the ordinance so provided, all property within
the area annexed shall be assessed and taxed at the same rate and on the same
basis as the property of such annexing code city is assessed and taxed to pay
for any then outstanding indebtedness of such city contracted prior to, or
existing at, the date of annexation.

Sec.
11. RCW
35A.14.020 and 1989 c 351 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

When
a petition is sufficient under the rules set forth in RCW 35A.01.040, calling
for an election to vote upon the annexation of unincorporated territory
contiguous to a code city, describing the boundaries of the area proposed to be
annexed, stating the number of voters therein as nearly as may be, and signed
by qualified ((electors)) registered voters resident in such
territory equal in number to ten percent of the votes cast at the last state
general election therein, it shall be filed with the auditor of the county in
which all, or the greatest portion, of the territory is located, and a copy of
the petition shall be filed with the legislative body of the code city. If the
territory is located in more than a single county, the auditor of the county with
whom the petition is filed shall act as the lead auditor and transmit a copy of
the petition to the auditor of each other county within which a portion of the
territory is located. The auditor or auditors shall examine the petition, and
the auditor or lead auditor shall certify the sufficiency of the petition to
the legislative authority of the code city.

If the signatures on the petition are certified as containing
sufficient valid signatures, the city legislative authority shall, by
resolution entered within sixty days thereafter, notify the petitioners, either
by mail or by publication in the same manner notice of hearing is required by
RCW 35A.14.040 to be published, of its approval or rejection of the proposed
action. In approving the proposed action, the legislative body may require
that there also be submitted to the electorate of the territory to be annexed,
a proposition that all property within the area to be annexed shall, upon
annexation, be assessed and taxed at the same rate and on the same basis as the
property of such annexing city is assessed and taxed to pay for all or any
portion of the then-outstanding indebtedness of the city to which said area is
annexed, which indebtedness has been approved by the voters, contracted for, or
incurred prior to, or existing at, the date of annexation. Only after the
legislative body has completed preparation and filing of a proposed zoning
regulation for the area to be annexed as provided for in RCW 35A.14.330 and
35A.14.340, the legislative body in approving the proposed action, may require
that the proposed zoning regulation be simultaneously adopted upon the approval
of annexation by the electorate of the area to be annexed. The approval of the
legislative body shall be a condition precedent to further proceedings upon the
petition. The costs of conducting the election called for in the petition
shall be a charge against the city concerned. The proposition or questions
provided for in this section may be submitted to the voter either separately or
as a single proposition.

Sec.
12. RCW
35A.63.110 and 1979 ex.s. c 18 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

A
code city which pursuant to this chapter creates a planning agency and which
has twenty-five hundred or more inhabitants, by ordinance, shall create a board
of adjustment and provide for its membership, terms of office, organization,
jurisdiction. A code city which pursuant to this chapter creates a planning
agency and which has a population of less than twenty‑five hundred may,
by ordinance, similarly create a board of adjustment. In the event a code city
with a population of less than twenty-five hundred creates a planning agency,
but does not create a board of adjustment, the code city shall provide that the
city legislative authority shall itself hear and decide the items listed in
subdivisions (1), (2), and (3) of this section. The action of the board of
adjustment shall be final and conclusive, unless, within ((ten)) twenty-one
days from the date of the action, the original applicant or an adverse party
makes application to the superior court for the county in which that city is
located for a writ of certiorari, a writ of prohibition, or a writ of
mandamus. No member of the board of adjustment shall be a member of the
planning agency or the legislative body. Subject to conditions, safeguards,
and procedures provided by ordinance, the board of adjustment may be empowered
to hear and decide:

(1)
Appeals from orders, recommendations, permits, decisions, or determinations
made by a code city official in the administration or enforcement of the
provisions of this chapter or any ordinances adopted pursuant to it.

(2)
Applications for variances from the terms of the zoning ordinance, the official
map ordinance or other land-use regulatory ordinances under procedures and
conditions prescribed by city ordinance, which among other things shall provide
that no application for a variance shall be granted unless the board of
adjustment finds:

(a)
the variance shall not constitute a grant of special privilege inconsistent
with the limitation upon uses of other properties in the vicinity and zone in
which the property on behalf of which the application was filed is located; and

(b)
that such variance is necessary, because of special circumstances relating to
the size, shape, topography, location, or surroundings of the subject property,
to provide it with use rights and privileges permitted to other properties in
the vicinity and in the zone in which the subject property is located; and

(c)
that the granting of such variance will not be materially detrimental to the
public welfare or injurious to the property or improvements in the vicinity and
zone in which the subject property is situated.

(3)
Applications for conditional-use permits, unless such applications are to be
heard and decided by the planning agency. A conditional use means a use listed
among those classified in any given zone but permitted to locate only after
review as herein provided in accordance with standards and criteria set forth
in the zoning ordinance.

(4)
Such other quasi judicial and administrative determinations as may be delegated
by ordinance.

In
deciding any of the matters referred to in subsections (1), (2), (3), and (4)
of this section, the board of adjustment shall issue a written report giving
the reasons for its decision. If a code city provides for a hearing examiner
and vests in him the authority to hear and decide the items listed in
subdivisions (1), (2), and (3) of this section pursuant to RCW 35A.63.170, then
the provisions of this section shall not apply to such a city.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. A
new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The disincorporation of a city or town is exempt from compliance with this
chapter.

(2) The reduction of city or town limits is exempt from compliance
with this chapter.

Sec.
14. RCW
82.29A.090 and 1981 2nd ex.s. c 4 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Bimonthly the state treasurer shall make distribution from the local leasehold
excise tax account to the counties and cities the amount of tax collected on
behalf of each county or city.

(2)
Earnings accrued through July 31, 1999, shall be disbursed to counties and
cities proportionate to the amount of tax collected annually on behalf of each
county or city.

(3)
After July 31, 1999, bimonthly the state treasurer shall disburse earnings from
the local leasehold excise tax account to the counties or cities proportionate
to the amount of tax collected on behalf of each county or city.

(4)
The state treasurer shall make the distribution under this section without
appropriation.

Sec.
15. RCW
65.04.045 and 1998 c 27 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
When any instrument is presented to a county auditor or recording officer for
recording, the first page of the instrument shall contain:

(a)
A top margin of at least three inches and a one-inch margin on the bottom and
sides, except that an instrument may be recorded if a minor portion of a notary
seal, incidental writing, or minor portion of a signature extends beyond the
margins;

(b)
The top left-hand side of the page shall contain the name and address to whom
the instrument will be returned;

(c)
The title or titles, or type or types, of the instrument to be recorded
indicating the kind or kinds of documents or transactions contained therein.
The auditor or recording officer shall only be required to index the title or
titles captioned on the document;

(d)
Reference numbers of documents assigned or released with reference to the
document page number where additional references can be found, if applicable;

(e)
The names of the grantor(s) and grantee(s), as defined under RCW 65.04.015,
with reference to the document page number where additional names are located,
if applicable;

(f)
An abbreviated legal description of the property, including lot, block, plat,
or section, township, and range, and reference to the document page number
where the full legal description is included, if applicable;

(g)
The assessor's property tax parcel or account number.

(2)
All pages of the document shall be on sheets of paper of a weight and color
capable of producing a legible image that are not larger than fourteen inches
long and eight and one-half inches wide with text printed or written in eight
point type or larger; however, reduced illustrative exhibits, such as maps
or drawings, the original of which exceeds the fourteen inch long and eight and
one-half inch wide requirement, are exempt from the eight point type
requirement if labeled "reduced for recording." Further,
all instruments presented for recording must have a one-inch margin on the top,
bottom, and sides for all pages except page one, be prepared in ink color
capable of being imaged, and have all seals legible and capable of being
imaged, and no attachments may be affixed to the pages.

The
information provided on the instrument must be in substantially the following
form:

This
Space Provided for Recorder's Use

When
Recorded Return to:

.................................................................

Document
Title(s)

Grantor(s)

Grantee(s)

Legal
Description

Assessor's
Property Tax Parcel or Account Number

Reference
Numbers of Documents Assigned or Released

Sec.
16. RCW
39.36.020 and 1994 c 277 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as otherwise expressly provided by law or in subsections (2), (3) and
(4) of this section, no taxing district shall for any purpose become indebted
in any manner to an amount exceeding three‑eighths of one percent of the
value of the taxable property in such taxing district without the assent of
three‑fifths of the voters therein voting at an election to be held for
that purpose, nor in cases requiring such assent shall the total indebtedness
incurred at any time exceed one and one-fourth percent on the value of the
taxable property therein.

(2)(a)(i)
Public hospital districts are limited to an indebtedness amount not exceeding
three-fourths of one percent of the value of the taxable property in such
public hospital districts without the assent of three-fifths of the voters
therein voting at an election held for that purpose.

(ii)
Counties, cities, and towns are limited to an indebtedness amount not exceeding
one and one-half percent of the value of the taxable property in such counties,
cities, or towns without the assent of three-fifths of the voters therein
voting at an election held for that purpose.

(b)
In cases requiring such assent counties, cities, towns, and public hospital
districts are limited to a total indebtedness of two and one-half percent of
the value of the taxable property therein. However, any county that has
assumed the rights, powers, functions, and obligations of a metropolitan
municipal corporation under chapter 36.56 RCW may become indebted to a larger
amount for its authorized metropolitan functions, as provided under chapter
35.58 RCW, but not exceeding an additional three-fourths of one percent of the
value of the taxable property in the county without the assent of three-fifths
of the voters therein voting at an election held for that purpose, and in cases
requiring such assent not exceeding an additional two and one-half percent of
the value of the taxable property in the county.

(3)
School districts are limited to an indebtedness amount not exceeding
three-eighths of one percent of the value of the taxable property in such
district without the assent of three‑fifths of the voters therein voting
at an election held for that purpose. In cases requiring such assent school
districts are limited to a total indebtedness of two and one-half percent of
the value of the taxable property therein.

(4)
No part of the indebtedness allowed in this chapter shall be incurred for any
purpose other than strictly county, city, town, school district, township, port
district, metropolitan park district, or other municipal purposes: PROVIDED,
That a city or town, with such assent, may become indebted to a larger amount,
but not exceeding two and one-half percent additional, determined as herein
provided, for supplying such city or town with water, artificial light, and
sewers, when the works for supplying such water, light, and sewers shall be
owned and controlled by the city or town; and a city or town, with such assent,
may become indebted to a larger amount, but not exceeding two and one-half
percent additional for acquiring or developing open space ((and)),
park facilities, and capital facilities associated with economic development:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That any school district may become indebted to a larger
amount but not exceeding two and one-half percent additional for capital
outlays.

(5)
Such indebtedness may be authorized in any total amount in one or more
propositions and the amount of such authorization may exceed the amount of
indebtedness which could then lawfully be incurred. Such indebtedness may be
incurred in one or more series of bonds from time to time out of such
authorization but at no time shall the total general indebtedness of any taxing
district exceed the above limitation.

The term "value of the taxable property" as used in this
section shall have the meaning set forth in RCW 39.36.015.

---
END ---