BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
3.42.010 and 1984 c 258 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
When so authorized by the districting plan, one or more district court
commissioners may be appointed in any district by the judges of the district.
Each commissioner shall be a registered voter of the county in which the
district or a portion thereof is located, and shall hold office at the pleasure
of the appointing judges.

(2)
When authorized by a city legislative authority, one or more municipal court
commissioners may be appointed in any municipality by the municipal court
judges. Each commissioner shall hold office at the pleasure of the appointing
judges.

(3)
Any person appointed as a commissioner authorized to hear or dispose of cases
shall:

(a)
Be a lawyer who is admitted to the practice of law in the state of
Washington; or

((who
has)) (b) Have passed the qualifying examination for lay judges as
provided under RCW 3.34.060.

Sec.
2. RCW
3.42.020 and 1984 c 258 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
((district)) court commissioner shall have such power, authority, and
jurisdiction in criminal and civil matters as the appointing judges possess ((and
shall prescribe)) unless a written appointment prescribes a lesser
power, authority, and jurisdiction.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. RCW
3.42.030 and 1984 c 258 s 32 & 1961 c 299 s 33 are each
repealed.

Sec.
4. RCW
3.42.040 and 1984 c 258 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

((District))
Court commissioners shall receive such compensation as the county or
city legislative authority ((or city council)) shall provide.

Sec.
5. RCW
3.46.020 and 1987 c 3 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
judge of a municipal department shall be a judge or commissioner of the
district court in which the municipal department is situated. Such judge shall
be designated as a municipal judge.

Sec.
6. RCW
3.50.075 and 1994 c 10 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

When
so authorized by the city legislative authority, one or more court
commissioners may be appointed by a judge of the municipal court. Each
commissioner holds office at the pleasure of the appointing judge. A
commissioner authorized to hear or dispose of cases must be ((a lawyer who
is admitted to practice law in the state of Washington or a nonlawyer who has
passed the qualifying examination for lay judges for courts of limited
jurisdiction under RCW 3.34.060)) qualified as set forth in RCW 3.42.010.

A
commissioner need not be a resident of the city or of the county in which the
municipal court is created. When a court commissioner has not been appointed
and the municipal court is presided over by a part-time appointed judge, the
judge need not be a resident of the city or of the county in which the
municipal court is created.

The
provisions of chapter 3.42 RCW apply to court commissioners appointed pursuant
to this chapter.

Sec.
7. RCW
7.80.010 and 1987 c 456 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All violations of state law, local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution
designated as civil infractions may be heard and determined by a district
court, except as otherwise provided in this section.

(2)
Any municipal court has the authority to hear and determine pursuant to this
chapter civil infractions that are established by municipal ordinance and that
are committed within the jurisdiction of the municipality.

(3)
Any city or town with a municipal court under chapter 3.50 RCW may contract
with the county to have civil infractions that are established by city or town
ordinance and that are committed within the city or town adjudicated by a
district court.

(4)
District and municipal court commissioners have the authority to hear
and determine civil infractions pursuant to this chapter.

(5)
Nothing in this chapter prevents any city, town, or county from hearing and
determining civil infractions pursuant to its own system established by
ordinance.

Sec.
8. RCW
26.04.050 and 1987 c 291 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
following named officers and persons, active or retired, are hereby authorized
to solemnize marriages, to wit: Justices of the supreme court, judges of the
court of appeals, judges and commissioners of the superior courts, ((superior
court commissioners,)) judges and full-time commissioners of courts of
limited jurisdiction as defined in RCW 3.02.010 or 35.20.010, and any
regularly licensed or ordained minister or any priest of any church or
religious denomination((, and judges of courts of limited jurisdiction as
defined in RCW 3.02.010)).

Sec.
9. RCW
46.63.040 and 1984 c 258 s 137 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All violations of state law, local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution
designated as traffic infractions in RCW 46.63.020 may be heard and determined
by a district court, except as otherwise provided in this section.

(2)
Any municipal court has the authority to hear and determine traffic infractions
pursuant to this chapter.

(3)
Any city or town with a municipal court may contract with the county to have
traffic infractions committed within the city or town adjudicated by a district
court.

(4)
District and municipal court commissioners have the authority to hear
and determine traffic infractions pursuant to this chapter.

(5)
The boards of regents of the state universities, and the boards of trustees of
the regional universities and of The Evergreen State College have the authority
to hear and determine traffic infractions under RCW 28B.10.560.

Sec.
10. RCW
3.34.080 and 1984 c 258 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
district judge, district judge pro tempore and district court commissioner
shall, before entering upon the duties of office, take an oath to support the
Constitution of the United States and the Constitution and laws of the state of
Washington, and to perform the duties of the office faithfully and impartially
and to the best of his or her ability, which oath shall be filed in the
office of the county auditor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11.
Chapter 3.42 RCW shall be retitled "District and Municipal Court
Commissioners."

---
END ---