BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
66.28.230 and 1989 c 271 s 232 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the violation of any
provisions of RCW 66.28.200 through 66.28.220 is punishable by a fine of not
more than five hundred dollars.

(2)))
Except as provided in RCW 66.44.270, a person who intentionally furnishes a keg
or other container containing four or more gallons of malt liquor to a minor is
((liable, on conviction, for a first offense for a penalty of not more than
five hundred dollars, or for imprisonment for not more than two months, or
both; for a second offense for a penalty of not more than five hundred dollars
or imprisonment for not more than six months, or both; and for a third or
subsequent offense for a penalty of not more than five hundred dollars or
imprisonment for more than one year, or both)) guilty of a gross
misdemeanor punishable under RCW 9.92.020.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 66.28 RCW to read as follows:

The violation of any provisions of RCW 66.28.200 through 66.28.230
is a gross misdemeanor punishable under RCW 9.92.020.

Sec.
3. RCW
66.44.180 and 1987 c 202 s 225 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
person ((guilty of)) found to have committed a violation of this
title for which no penalty has been specifically provided ((shall be liable,
on conviction, for a first offense to a penalty of not more than five hundred
dollars, or to imprisonment for not more than two months, or both; for a second
offense to imprisonment for not more than six months; and for a third or
subsequent offense to imprisonment for not more than one year)) is
guilty of a misdemeanor punishable under RCW 9.92.030. If the offender
convicted of an offense referred to in this section is a corporation, it shall
for a first offense be liable to a penalty of not more than five thousand
dollars((, and)); for a second or subsequent offense to a penalty
of not more than ten thousand dollars, or to forfeiture of its corporate
license, or both.

Every
district ((judge)) and municipal ((judge)) court shall
have concurrent jurisdiction with the superior courts ((judges))
of the state of Washington of all violations of the provisions of this title
and may impose any punishment provided therefor.

Sec.
4. RCW
66.44.100 and 1981 1st ex.s. c 5 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as permitted by this title, no person shall open the package containing liquor
or consume liquor in a public place. Every person who violates any provision
of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor((, and on conviction
therefor shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars)) punishable
under RCW 9.92.030.

Sec.
5. RCW
66.44.320 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 209 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
person who shall sell any intoxicating liquor to any minor shall be guilty of a
((violation of Title 66 RCW)) gross misdemeanor punishable under RCW
9.92.020.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This
act applies to crimes committed on or after the effective date of this act.

---
END ---