BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
INTENT. The legislature finds that the labor market demand by
businesses in Washington for vocational-technical certificates is high and that
there is a severe shortage in this state in the supply of individuals
completing a postsecondary vocational-technical certificate or degree program.
The legislature further finds that encouraging students to enroll in
postsecondary vocational-technical degree or certificate programs in
high-demand industrial sectors will benefit students, business and industry,
and the economy as a whole. By creating a conditional scholarship program, the
legislature intends to assist in the effort to recruit students to be trained
for employment in high-demand industrial sectors.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
DEFINITIONS. Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Conditional scholarship" means a loan that may be used for (a) the
payment of tuition and services and activities fees; (b) the purchase of books
and training supplies; and (c) transportation expenses; and that is forgiven in
whole or in part if the recipient is employed in this state in the occupation
or industrial sector in which the recipient was trained.

(2)
"Board" means the higher education coordinating board.

(3)
"Eligible student" means an individual who qualifies for enrollment
in an eligible program.

(4)
"Eligible program" means:

(a)
A vocational-technical program offered through a community college, a technical
college, or a licensed private career school that results in a certificate or
degree; and

(b)
A program that the work force training and education coordinating board
determines constitutes an eligible program under section 6 of this act.

(5)
"Participant" means an eligible student who has received a
conditional scholarship under this chapter.

(6)
"Satisfied" means paid-in-full.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
PROGRAM CREATED‑-POWERS AND DUTIES OF BOARD. The bright futures
conditional scholarship program is established. The program shall be
administered by the board. In administering the program, the board shall:

(1)
Adopt selection criteria based on the date of application;

(2)
Allocate conditional scholarship funds, awarding at least thirty percent of the
scholarships to individuals that are either currently eligible to receive
temporary assistance for needy families or were so eligible during the
twenty-four months preceding their application for the scholarship;

(3)
Adopt necessary rules and guidelines;

(4)
Record the amount of loan forgiven for those students who meet their service
obligations and collect and manage repayments from students who do not meet
their service obligations under this chapter;

(5)
Accept grants and donations from public and private sources for the program;
and

(6)
Ensure that the awarding of conditional scholarships to students under this
program (a) results in a net increase in the number of vocational-technical
students receiving financial aid; and (b) does not result in the loss of other
federal or state financial and gift assistance to those students, to the extent
allowable under federal and state student aid rules and regulations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
DUTIES OF THE WORK FORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD. The work
force training and education coordinating board shall:

(1)
Publicize and promote the scholarship program under this chapter;

(2)
Solicit grants and donations from public and private sources for the program;

(3)
Determine what constitutes an eligible program; and

(4)
Determine what constitutes being employed in the occupation or industrial
sector in which an individual was trained for purposes of the repayment
obligation under section 8 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
DUTIES OF THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES. The department of
social and health services shall:

(1)
Work with the work force training and education coordinating board to encourage
recipients of temporary assistance for needy families to become participants in
the scholarship program under this chapter; and

(2)
Ensure that no department rule prevents recipients of temporary assistance for
needy families from becoming participants in the scholarship program under this
chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
ELIGIBLE PROGRAM. (1) In making its determination of what constitutes an
eligible program, the work force training and education coordinating board
shall consider:

(a)
Whether there is a significant industry or occupational gap between the supply
of skilled workers and the demand for such workers within the occupation or
industrial sector that the degree or certificate program prepares students to
work in;

(b)
The wage level likely to be earned by persons who complete the program; and

(c)
Whether the degree or certificate program performs at a high level in terms of
placement rates.

(2)
In order to be an eligible program, there must be a contribution from the
industry that benefits from students graduating from the degree or certificate
program that equals or exceeds twenty-five percent of the scholarships awarded
to individuals who enroll in the degree or certificate programs that prepare
students to work in that occupation or industry.

(3)
In determining what constitutes an eligible program, the work force training
and education coordinating board shall consult with the state board for
community and technical colleges for advice on which public certificate or
degree programs prepare students for work in a given occupation or industry.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. AWARD‑-AMOUNT,
DURATION. The board shall allocate funds for conditional scholarships to
eligible students from the funds appropriated to the board for this purpose, or
from any private donations, or any other funds given to the board for this
program. The amount of the conditional scholarship awarded an individual shall
not exceed an amount that is double the common tuition and service and
activities fees charged at Washington state public community and technical
colleges per academic year. Students are eligible to receive conditional
scholarships for a maximum of two years and must complete using each award
within five years of receipt.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
REPAYMENT OBLIGATION. (1) Participants in the conditional scholarship program
incur an obligation to repay the conditional scholarship, with interest, unless
they are employed in this state for two years in the occupation or industrial
sector in which they were trained, for each year of scholarship received, under
rules adopted by the board.

(2)
The interest rate shall be eight percent for the length of the repayment
period. The board shall establish the repayment period, with payments accruing
quarterly commencing nine months from the date the participant completes or
discontinues the eligible program. Payments shall be no less than one hundred
fifty dollars per quarter.

(3)
The entire principal and interest of each payment shall be forgiven for each
payment period in which the participant is employed in this state in the
occupation or industrial sector in which the participant was trained until
either the entire repayment obligation is satisfied or the participant has been
employed in this state in the occupation or industrial sector in which he or
she was trained for eight payment periods for each year of receiving a
scholarship under this chapter. Should the participant cease to be employed in
this state in the occupation or industrial sector in which the participant was
trained before the participant's repayment obligation is completed, payments on
the unsatisfied portion of the principal and interest shall begin the next
payment period and continue until the remainder of the participant's repayment
obligation is satisfied.

(4)
The board is responsible for collection of repayments made under this section
and shall exercise due diligence in such collection, maintaining all necessary
records to ensure that maximum repayments are made. Collection and servicing
of repayments under this section shall be pursued using the full extent of the
law, including wage garnishment if necessary. The board is responsible to
forgive all or parts of such repayments under the criteria established in this
section and shall maintain all necessary records of forgiven payments.

(5)
Receipts from the payment of principal or interest or any other subsidies to
which the board as administrator is entitled, which are paid by or on behalf of
participants under this section, shall be deposited with the board and shall be
used to cover the costs of granting the conditional scholarships, maintaining
necessary records, and making collections under subsection (4) of this
section. The board shall maintain accurate records of these costs, and all
receipts beyond those necessary to pay such costs shall be used to grant
conditional scholarships under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9.
BRIGHT FUTURES CONDITIONAL SCHOLARSHIP ACCOUNT. (1) The bright futures
conditional scholarship account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer.

(2)
All appropriations for the bright futures conditional scholarship program,
private donations to the bright futures conditional scholarship program, and
receipts from students' repayments must be deposited into the account.

(3)
Expenditures from the account may be used only for conditional loans to
students and the board's administrative costs associated with the awarding,
tracking, and collection of the loans.

(4)
With the exception of the operating costs associated with the management of the
account by the treasurer's office as authorized in chapter 43.79A RCW, the
account shall be credited with all investment income earned by the account.
Only the director of the higher education coordinating board or the director's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account.

(5)
Disbursements from the account are exempt from appropriations and the allotment
provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW, however money used for program administration
is subject to the allotment and budgetary controls of chapter 43.88 RCW, and an
appropriation is required for expenditures.

Sec.
10. RCW
43.79A.040 and 1998 c 268 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested, and reinvested
by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and
to the same extent as if the money were in the state treasury.

(2)
All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust fund shall be set
aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment
income account.

(3)
The investment income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased
banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not
limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state
treasurer or affected state agencies. The investment income account is subject
in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution
of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4)(a)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
investment income account to the state general fund except under (b) and (c) of
this subsection.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The bright futures conditional scholarship account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the agricultural
local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the energy account, the fair
fund, the game farm alternative account, the grain inspection revolving fund,
the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition center account,
the youth athletic facility grant account, the self-insurance revolving fund,
the sulfur dioxide abatement account, and the children's trust fund. However,
the earnings to be distributed shall first be reduced by the allocation to the
state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(c)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way revolving fund, the advanced
environmental mitigation revolving account, the federal narcotics asset
forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle account, the local rail service
assistance account, and the miscellaneous transportation programs account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no trust
accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative
directive of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11.
CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this chapter are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12.
Sections 1 through 9 and 11 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 28B
RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13.
(1)(a) The sum of three million dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the
general fund to the higher education coordinating board for the purposes of
this act.

(b)
The sum of seven million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2001, from the general fund to the higher education coordinating board for
the purposes of this act.

(2)(a)
The sum of seven million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2002, from the general fund to the higher education coordinating board for
the purposes of this act.

(b)
The sum of seven million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2003, from the general fund to the higher education coordinating board for
the purposes of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14.
(1)(a) The sum of one hundred twenty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as
may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000,
from the general fund to the work force training and education coordinating
board for the purposes of section 4 of this act.

(b)
The sum of sixty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the general fund to
the work force training and education coordinating board for the purposes of
section 4 of this act.

(2)(a)
The sum of sixty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002, from the general fund to
the work force training and education coordinating board for the purposes of
section 4 of this act.

(b) The sum of sixty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2003, from the
general fund to the work force training and education coordinating board for
the purposes of section 4 of this act.

---
END ---