BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

Every
health carrier that provides coverage for any outpatient mental health service
shall comply with the following requirements:

(1)
In performing a utilization review of mental health services for a specific
enrollee, the utilization review is limited to accessing only the specific
health care information contained in the enrollee's record.

(2) In performing an audit of a provider that has furnished mental
health services to a carrier's enrollees, the audit is limited to accessing
only the records of enrollees covered by the specific health carrier for which
the audit is being performed, except as otherwise permitted by RCW 70.02.050
and 71.05.630.

---
END ---