BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.160 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Except as authorized to the contrary under subsection (3) of this section, from
all funds available to the board for financial assistance, the board shall
designate at least seventy-five percent for financial assistance for the
development of public facilities in rural counties.

(2)
Financial assistance made under this section shall be provided on a one-to-one
matching basis, provided the county and the city are working cooperatively on
public facilities financed under RCW 82.14.370.

(3)
If at any time during the last six months of a biennium the board finds that
the actual and anticipated application for qualified projects in rural counties
are clearly insufficient to use up the seventy-five percent allocation, then
the board shall estimate the amount of the insufficiency and during the remainder
of the biennium may use that amount of the allocation for financial assistance
for projects not located in rural counties.

(4)
For the purposes of this section:

(a)
"Rural county" means a county with a population density of fewer than
one hundred persons per square mile, as determined by the office of financial
management; and

(b) "Public facilities" means a project of a local
government for the planning, acquisition, construction, repair, reconstruction,
replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of bridges, roads, domestic and
industrial water, sanitary sewer, storm sewer, railroad, electricity, natural
gas, telecommunications, buildings or structures, and port facilities all for
the purpose of job creation, job retention, or job expansion.

---
END ---