BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
53.12.010 and 1994 c 223 s 81 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The powers of the port district shall be exercised through a port commission
consisting of three or, when permitted or required by this title, five
members. Every port district that is not coextensive with a county having a
population of five hundred thousand or more and less than one million
shall be divided into the same number of commissioner districts as there are
commissioner positions, each having approximately equal population, unless
provided otherwise under subsection (2) of this section. Every port
district with a population of one million or more shall have five commissioners
and shall be divided into five commissioner districts, each having
approximately equal population. Where a port district with three
commissioner positions is coextensive with the boundaries of a county that has
a population of less than five hundred thousand and the county has three county
legislative authority districts, the port commissioner districts shall be the
county legislative authority districts. In other instances where a port
district is divided into commissioner districts, the port commission shall
divide the port district into commissioner districts unless the commissioner
districts have been described pursuant to RCW 53.04.031. The commissioner
districts shall be altered as provided in chapter 53.16 RCW.

Commissioner
districts shall be used as follows: (a) Only a registered voter who resides in
a commissioner district may be a candidate for, or hold office as, a
commissioner of the commissioner district; and (b) only the voters of a
commissioner district may vote at a primary to nominate candidates for a
commissioner of the commissioner district. Voters of the entire port district
may vote at a general election to elect a person as a commissioner of the
commissioner district, except in a port district with a population of one
million or more, where only the voters of a commissioner district may vote at a
general election to elect a person as a commissioner of the commissioner
district.

(2)
In port districts having a population of less than one million with five
commissioners, two of the commissioner districts may include the entire port
district if approved by the voters of the district either at the time of
formation or at a subsequent port district election at which the issue is
proposed pursuant to a resolution adopted by the board of commissioners and
delivered to the county auditor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 53.12 RCW to read as follows:

If
the commissioners of a port district wish to have their district exempted from
the requirement of RCW 53.12.010 that only the voters of a commissioner
district may vote at a general election to elect a person as a commissioner
from that commissioner district, the commissioners may place on the next
general election ballot following the effective date of this section the
following measure: "Shall the port of . . . elect all of
its commissioners at large, instead of by separate district?" The request
shall be in the form of a resolution consistent with RCW 29.13.020. The
measure shall be advertised as required by RCW 29.27.060, and shall be
considered enacted if approved by a majority of voters voting on the measure.

Sec.
3. RCW
53.12.021 and 1994 c 223 s 82 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
less than county-wide port district having a population of less than one
million that uses commissioner districts may cease using commissioner
districts as provided in this section.

A
ballot proposition authorizing the elimination of commissioner districts shall
be submitted to the voters of a less than county-wide port district having a
population of less than one million that is divided into commissioner
districts if (1) a petition is submitted to the port commission proposing that
the port district cease using commissioner districts, that is signed by
registered voters of the port district equal in number to at least ten percent
of the number of voters who voted at the last district general election; or (2)
the port commissioners adopt a resolution proposing that the port district
cease using commissioner districts. The port commission shall transfer the
petition or resolution immediately to the county auditor who shall, when a petition
is submitted, review the signatures and certify its sufficiency. A ballot
proposition authorizing the elimination of commissioner districts shall be
submitted at the next district general election occurring sixty or more days
after a petition with sufficient signatures was submitted. If the ballot
proposition authorizing the port district to cease using commissioner districts
is approved by a simple majority vote, the port district shall cease using
commissioner districts at all subsequent elections.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 53.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Port commissioners of port districts with populations of one million or more
who are holding office as of the effective date of this act shall retain their
positions for the remainder of their terms until their successors are elected
and qualified, and assume office in accordance with RCW 29.04.170.

(2)
The port commissioners shall divide the port district into five commissioner
districts prior to the first day of June in the year in which the next regular
election for commissioner shall be held. The new commissioner districts shall
be numbered one through five and shall be represented by the incumbent
commissioners. If, as a result of drawing the district boundaries more than
one of the incumbent commissioners reside in one of the new commissioner
districts, the commissioners who reside in the same commissioner district shall
determine by lot which of the commissioner districts they shall represent for
the remainder of their respective terms.

(3) If additional commissioners must be elected to increase the
number of commissioners to five, the procedures of RCW 53.12.130 shall be
followed.

---
END ---