BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
4.84.185 and 1991 c 70 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, in any civil action,
the court having jurisdiction may, upon written findings by the judge that the
action, counterclaim, cross-claim, third party claim, or defense was frivolous
and advanced without reasonable cause, require the nonprevailing party to pay the
prevailing party the reasonable expenses, including fees of attorneys, incurred
in opposing such action, counterclaim, cross-claim, third party claim, or
defense. This determination shall be made upon motion by the prevailing party
after a voluntary or involuntary order of dismissal, order on summary judgment,
final judgment after trial, or other final order terminating the action as to
the prevailing party. The judge shall consider all evidence presented at the
time of the motion to determine whether the position of the nonprevailing party
was frivolous and advanced without reasonable cause. In no event may such
motion be filed more than thirty days after entry of the order.

(2)
In any action against any past or present state legislator arising from an act
or omission made in the exercise of legislative power, the court having
jurisdiction shall find that the action, counterclaim, cross-claim, third party
claim, or defense was frivolous and advanced without reasonable cause, and
require the nonprevailing party to pay the prevailing party the reasonable
expenses, including fees of attorneys, incurred in opposing such action,
counterclaim, cross-claim, third party claim, or defense. This determination
shall be made upon motion by the prevailing party after a voluntary or
involuntary order of dismissal, order on summary judgment, final judgment after
trial, or other final order terminating the action as to the prevailing party.
In no event may such motion be filed more than thirty days after entry of the
order.

(3) The provisions of this section apply unless otherwise
specifically provided by statute.

---
END ---