BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
Voters of the unincorporated areas of the state are authorized to establish
unincorporated area councils as provided in this chapter.

It
is the purpose of this chapter to provide residents of unincorporated areas
with direct input in the preparation of a comprehensive plan for their
community by establishing a governmental mechanism to develop a proposed
subarea plan for a community that is consistent with the county's comprehensive
plan. In addition, it is the purpose of this chapter to have unincorporated
area councils serve as forums for the discussion of local issues.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
Unincorporated area councils may be established in the unincorporated area of a
county that is planning under chapter 36.70A RCW. A community for which an
unincorporated area council is created in a county with a population of less
than one million must have at least one thousand residents when the
unincorporated area council is created. A community for which an
unincorporated area council is created in a county with a population of one
million or more must have at least five thousand residents when the
unincorporated area council is created.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The process to create an unincorporated area council shall be initiated by the
filing of petitions with the county auditor of the county in which the
community is located which: (a) Call for the creation of an unincorporated
area council; (b) set forth proposed boundaries for the community; (c) indicate
the number of members on the unincorporated area council, which shall be five,
seven, or nine; and (d) contain signatures of voters residing within the
community equal in number to at least ten percent of the voters residing in the
community who voted at the last state general election. The county auditor shall
determine if the petitions contain a sufficient number of valid signatures and
certify to the county legislative authority the sufficiency of the petitions
within fifteen days of when the petitions were filed.

(2)
If the petitions are certified as having sufficient valid signatures, the
county legislative authority shall hold a public hearing within the community
on the creation of the proposed unincorporated area council no later than sixty
days after the certification. Notice of the public hearing shall be published
in a newspaper of general circulation in the community for at least once a week
for two consecutive weeks, with the last date of publication no more than ten
days prior to the date of the public hearing. At least ten days before the public
hearing, additional notice shall be posted conspicuously in at least five
places within the community in a manner designed to attract public attention.

(3)
After receiving testimony on the creation of the proposed unincorporated area
council, the county legislative authority must remove any area from the
proposed community that may not be included within a community and may
otherwise alter the boundaries of the proposed community, but such an
alteration may not reduce the number of persons living within the community by
more than ten percent or below the minimum number of residents who must reside
within the community at the time of the creation of the unincorporated area
council. If territory is added to the community, another public hearing on the
proposal shall be held.

(4)
The county legislative authority shall call a special election within the
community to determine whether the proposed unincorporated area council shall
be created, and to elect the initial unincorporated area councilmembers, at the
next state general election occurring seventy-five or more days after the
initial public hearing on the creation of the proposed unincorporated area council.
The unincorporated area council shall be created if the ballot proposition
authorizing the creation of the unincorporated area council is approved by a
simple majority vote of the voters of the community voting on the proposition.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
initial members of an unincorporated area council shall be elected at the same
election as the ballot proposition is submitted authorizing the creation of the
unincorporated area council. However, the election of the initial
councilmembers shall be null and void if the ballot proposition authorizing the
creation of the unincorporated area council is not approved by a simple
majority vote of the voters of the community voting on the proposition.

No
primary election shall be held to nominate candidates for initial council
positions. Candidates shall run for specific council positions. The person
receiving the greatest number of votes for each council position shall be
elected as an initial councilmember. Staggering of terms of office shall be
accomplished by having the simple majority of the persons who are elected
receiving the greatest number of votes being elected to four-year terms of
office, and the remaining persons who are elected being elected to two-year
terms of office, if the election was held in the same year as the year in which
members of the county legislative authority normally are elected, or the simple
majority of the persons who are elected receiving the greatest number of votes
being elected to three-year terms of office, and the remaining persons who are
elected being elected to one-year terms of office, if the election was held in
a year in which members of the county legislative authority normally are not
elected, with the terms of office being computed from the first day of January
in the year following the election. Initial councilmembers shall take office
immediately when qualified in accordance with RCW 29.01.135.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
Unincorporated area councilmembers shall be elected to staggered four-year
terms of office until their successors are elected and qualified. Each council
position shall be numbered separately. Candidates shall run for specific
council positions. The number of council positions shall be five, seven, or
nine, as specified in the petition calling for the creation of the
unincorporated area council. At every other general election when
councilmembers are elected, the number of councilmembers who are normally
elected shall vary by one.

Except
as provided in this chapter, unincorporated area councilmembers shall be
nominated and elected at nonpartisan elections pursuant to general election
laws. The county shall pay for the costs of all elections associated with
unincorporated area councils and the election of councilmembers.

The
terms of office of each councilmember shall be reduced by one year if the
voters of the county approve a county charter or an amendment to a county
charter altering the year in which members of the county legislative authority
normally are elected.

The
provisions of this section apply to the election and terms of office of the
initial unincorporated area councilmembers, except as provided in section 4 of
this act.

Vacancies
on an unincorporated area council occur as provided in RCW 42.12.010 and shall
be filled as provided in RCW 42.12.070.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. An
unincorporated area council may develop and transmit a proposed subarea plan to
the county legislative authority for its review. The proposed subarea plan
must be consistent with the county's comprehensive plan and the county
shoreline master program. An unincorporated area council shall have the same
powers and duties within its boundaries as a planning commission established
under RCW 36.70.030. In assisting the county planning agency in the
preparation or revision of a subarea plan and development regulations for the
area within its boundaries, the unincorporated area council shall address all
of the required elements of a comprehensive plan and any optional elements
selected by the county. The proposed subarea plan must be based on the growth
management population projection made for the county by the office of financial
management, as allocated to the area served by the unincorporated area council
by the county planning agency. Within ninety days of transmittal of the
subarea plan to the county legislative authority, the county legislative
authority or planning commission shall hold a public hearing. The subarea plan
shall be the only agenda item at the public hearing. The hearing shall be
conducted by the county legislative authority unless such hearing is
specifically delegated to the planning commission. To the extent possible, the
county legislative authority or planning commission shall hold any hearings on
the subarea plan within the boundaries of the unincorporated area council.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
Unincorporated area councils shall not have the authority to take
quasi-judicial actions nor to decide permit applications. Unincorporated area
councils shall serve as forums for the discussion of local issues. The county
may provide administrative and staff support for each unincorporated area
council within its boundaries.

Among
other general laws, unincorporated area councils are subject to chapter 42.30
RCW, the open public meetings act, and chapter 42.17 RCW, the public disclosure
act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. An
unincorporated area council may provide for the annexation of adjacent
unincorporated areas in the same county to the community that legally may be
included within the community that are not included within another community
for which an unincorporated area council has been established.

Annexations
shall be initiated by either resolution of the unincorporated area council
proposing the annexation or petition of voters residing in the adjacent area,
which petition: (1) Requests the annexation; (2) sets forth the boundaries of
the area proposed to be annexed; and (3) contains signatures of voters residing
within the area that is proposed to be annexed equal in number to at least ten
percent of the voters residing in that area who voted at the last state general
election. Annexation petitions shall be filed with the county auditor who
shall determine if the petitions contain a sufficient number of valid
signatures, certify the sufficiency of the petitions, and notify the
unincorporated area council of the sufficiency of the petitions within fifteen
days of when the petitions are submitted.

A
ballot proposition authorizing the annexation shall be submitted to the voters
of the area that is proposed to be annexed at a primary or general election in
either an odd-numbered or even-numbered year, if the unincorporated area
council initiated the annexation by resolution or if the unincorporated area
council concurs in an annexation that was initiated by the submission of
annexation petitions containing sufficient valid signatures. The annexation
shall occur if the ballot proposition authorizing the annexation is approved by
a simple majority vote of the voters of the area proposed to be annexed voting
on the proposition.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. An
unincorporated area council that is located in a county with a population of
less than one million shall be dissolved if the population of the community is
reduced to less than five hundred persons. An unincorporated area council that
is located in a county with a population of one million or more shall be
dissolved if the population of the community is reduced to less than two
thousand five hundred persons.

The
question of whether an unincorporated area council should be retained shall be
submitted to the voters of a community at the next general election at which
unincorporated area councilmembers would be elected that occur at least twelve
years after the creation or latest affirmative vote to retain the
unincorporated area council. The unincorporated area council shall be retained
if the proposition to retain the unincorporated area council is approved by a
simple majority vote of the voters of the community voting on the proposition.
The election for council positions shall be held as if the ballot proposition
on retaining the unincorporated area council were not submitted. If the
unincorporated area council is retained, the persons who are newly elected
members of the council and the other members of the council whose terms have
not expired shall constitute the members of the unincorporated area council.
If the unincorporated area council is not retained, the election of the new
councilmembers is null and void, and the unincorporated area council shall be
dissolved.

Sec.
10. RCW
36.70.040 and 1963 c 4 s 36.70.040 are each amended to read as follows:

By
ordinance a board may, as an alternative to and in lieu of the creation of a
planning commission as provided in RCW 36.70.030, create a planning department
which shall be organized and function as any other department of the county.
When such department is created, the board shall also create a planning
commission which shall assist the planning department in carrying out its
duties, including assistance in the preparation and execution of the
comprehensive plan and recommendations to the department for the adoption of
official controls and/or amendments thereto. To this end, the planning
commission shall conduct such hearings as are required by this chapter and
shall make findings and conclusions therefrom which shall be transmitted to the
department which shall transmit the same on to the board with such comments and
recommendations it deems necessary. However, hearings concerning a subarea
plan proposed by an unincorporated area council shall be conducted by the board
unless such hearings are specifically delegated to the planning commission.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
36.105.010 (Purpose) and 1991 c 363 s 99;

(2) RCW
36.105.020 (Definitions) and 1991 c 363 s 100;

(3) RCW
36.105.030 (Minimum requirements) and 1991 c 363 s 101;

(4) RCW
36.105.040 (Creation) and 1991 c 363 s 102;

(5) RCW
36.105.050 (Election of initial community councilmembers) and 1991
c 363 s 103;

(6) RCW
36.105.060 (Community councilmembers--Election--Terms) and 1991 c
363 s 104;

(7) RCW
36.105.070 (Responsibility of county legislative authority) and
1991 c 363 s 105;

(8) RCW
36.105.080 (Powers) and 1991 c 363 s 106;

(9) RCW
36.105.090 (Annexation) and 1991 c 363 s 107; and

(10) RCW
36.105.100 (Dissolution) and 1991 c 363 s 108.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12.
Sections 1 through 9 of this act are each added to chapter 36.105 RCW.

---
END ---