BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes that the department of corrections canine training
program is vital for preventing the use of illegal narcotics at department of
corrections facilities. However, by providing canine training to local
governments and other states at a substantially lower rate than private
industry, the department is in direct competition with private businesses
providing canine training.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A new
section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:

The department may provide canine training to meet the department's
internal needs. The department may not provide canine training to any other
correctional or law enforcement agency in the state of Washington or any other
state.

---
END ---