BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
Sections 1 through 11 of this act may be cited as the parental notification of
abortion act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The legislature finds that:

(a)
Unemancipated minor children and incompetent persons often lack the maturity or
ability to make fully informed choices that take into account both immediate
and long-range consequences;

(b)
The medical, emotional, and psychological consequences of abortion are
sometimes serious and can be lasting, particularly when the patient is an
immature or incompetent person;

(c)
The capacity to become pregnant and the capacity for mature judgment concerning
the wisdom of an abortion are not necessarily related;

(d)
Parents or guardians ordinarily possess information essential to a physician's
exercise of his or her best medical judgment concerning an unemancipated minor
child or an incompetent person;

(e)
Parents or guardians who are aware that an unemancipated minor daughter or
incompetent person is having or has had an abortion may ensure that she
receives adequate support, counseling, and medical attention before and after
her abortion;

(f)
Parental or guardian consultation and notification is usually desirable and in
the best interests of the unemancipated minor child or incompetent person.

(2)
The purpose of the legislature in enacting this parental notification law is to
further the important and compelling state interests of:

(a)
Protecting the constitutional rights of parents to rear children who are
members of their household;

(b)
Fostering family unity and preserving the family as a viable social unit; and

(c)
Reducing teenage pregnancy and unnecessary abortion.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section
apply throughout sections 1 through 11 of this act.

(1)
"Abortion" means the use or prescription of any instrument, medicine,
drug, or other substance or device to terminate the pregnancy of a woman for
any other purpose than producing a live birth.

(2)
"Actual notification" means the giving of notification directly by
conversing with the parent or guardian, either in person or by telephone.

(3)
"Constructive notice" means notice by certified mail to the last
known address of the parent or guardian with delivery deemed to have occurred
forty-eight hours after the certified notice is mailed.

(4)
"Coercion" means restraining or dominating the choice of an
unemancipated minor or incompetent person by use of force, threat of force, or
deprivation of necessary food and shelter or by use of fraud,
misrepresentation, or deceit.

(5)
"Emancipated minor" means a person under eighteen years of age who is
or has been married or who has been emancipated.

(6)
"Incompetent person" means a person who has been found to be legally
incompetent under chapter 11.88 RCW.

(7)
"Medical emergency" means a condition that, on the basis of the
physician's good-faith clinical judgment, so complicates the medical condition
of a pregnant woman as to necessitate the immediate termination of her
pregnancy to avert her death or for which a delay will create serious risk of
substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function.

(8)
"Neglect" means the failure of a parent or guardian to supply an
unemancipated minor or incompetent person with necessary food, clothing,
shelter, or medical care when reasonably able to do so or the failure to
protect an unemancipated minor or incompetent person from conditions or actions
that imminently and seriously endanger the unemancipated minor's or incompetent
person's physical health when reasonably able to do so.

(9)
"Physical abuse" means any physical injury that is intentionally
inflicted by a parent or guardian on an unemancipated minor child or
incompetent person and is medically significant as determined by a physician.

(10)
"Sexual abuse" means an offense involving sexual contact or sexual
intercourse as defined in RCW 9A.44.010 and committed against an unemancipated
minor or incompetent person by a family member or guardian.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) A
physician may not perform an abortion upon an unemancipated minor or upon an
incompetent person unless the physician has given forty-eight hours actual
notification to a custodial parent or to the guardian of the pregnant
unemancipated minor or pregnant incompetent person of his or her intention to
perform the abortion. The notification may be given by a referring physician.
The physician who performs the abortion must receive the written statement of
the referring physician certifying that the referring physician has provided
notification. If actual notice is not possible after a reasonable effort, the
physician or his or her agent must give forty-eight hours constructive notice.

(2)
Before notification is given under subsection (1) of this section, the
unemancipated minor or incompetent person must have signed a form prepared by
the department of health indicating that the unemancipated minor or incompetent
person has been fully informed of the options available under sections 1
through 11 of this act. The form must be made available to all physicians in
the state and must include information covering the following:

(a)
That notification of a parent or guardian is generally required before the
unemancipated minor or incompetent person may obtain an abortion;

(b)
That notification of a parent or guardian of the mother of the unborn child is
not required if the mother is emancipated;

(c)
That an alternative to providing notification to a parent or guardian of the
mother of the unborn child may be available under section 5 of this act if the
mother has been the victim of neglect or sexual or physical abuse by a parent
or guardian;

(d)
That notification to a parent or guardian of the mother of the unborn child may
not be required under section 6 of this act if a medical emergency exists and
there is insufficient time to obtain the required notification;

(e)
That the mother of the unborn child will be provided court-appointed counsel at
her request and that notification may be waived by a court under section 9 of
this act if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that: (i) She is
sufficiently mature to decide whether to have an abortion, (ii) there is
evidence of a pattern of sexual or physical abuse by a parent or guardian of
the mother, or (iii) notification to a parent or guardian would not be in her
best interest;

(f)
That in any circumstance the mother of the unborn child may choose to discuss
her situation with her parent or guardian; and

(g)
That it is a violation of the law for a person to coerce the mother of an
unborn child to have an abortion.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. If
the unemancipated minor or incompetent person declares in a signed written
statement that she is a victim of sexual abuse, neglect, or physical abuse by
either of her parents or her guardian, the attending physician shall provide
the notification required by sections 1 through 11 of this act to a brother or
sister of the unemancipated minor or incompetent person who is over twenty-one
years of age, or to a stepparent or grandparent specified by the unemancipated
minor or incompetent person. The physician who intends to perform the abortion
must certify in the unemancipated minor's or incompetent person's medical
record that he or she has received the written declaration of abuse or neglect.

A
physician relying in good faith on a written statement under this section is
not civilly liable under sections 1 through 11 of this act for failure to
provide notification to a parent or guardian. The physician must ensure the
written statement remains confidential.

Receipt
by a physician of a written statement under this section does not authorize the
physician to perform an abortion. The physician must not perform an abortion
unless authorized under sections 1 through 11 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
Notification is not required under section 4 or 5 of this act if:

(1)
The attending physician certifies in the unemancipated minor's or incompetent
person's medical record that a medical emergency exists and there is
insufficient time to provide the required notification;

(2)
Notification is waived in writing by the person who is entitled to
notification; or

(3)
Notification is waived under section 9 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
parent, guardian, or other person must not coerce an unemancipated minor or
incompetent person to have an abortion performed. If an unemancipated minor or
incompetent person is denied necessary food, clothing, or shelter by the
parents or guardian of the unemancipated minor or incompetent person related to
the minor's or incompetent person's refusal to have an abortion performed, the
unemancipated minor or incompetent person is considered dependent under chapter
13.34 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
monthly report indicating the number of notifications provided to a parent, the
number of notifications provided to a brother, sister, stepparent, or
grandparent, and the number of notifications provided to a guardian during the
preceding month under sections 1 through 11 of this act, and the number of
times in which exceptions were made to the notification requirement under
sections 1 through 11 of this act, as well as the type of exception, must be
filed by the physician providing the notification with the department of health
on forms prescribed by the department. No unemancipated minor's or incompetent
person's name is to be used on the forms. A compilation of the data reported
must be made by the department on an annual basis and must be available to the public.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. (1)
The requirements and procedures under this section are available to
unemancipated minors and incompetent persons whether or not they are residents
of this state.

(2)
The unemancipated minor or incompetent person may petition a superior court for
a waiver of the notification requirement and may participate in proceedings on
her own behalf. The petition must include a statement that the complainant is
pregnant and is an unemancipated minor or incompetent person. The court must
appoint a guardian ad litem for her. A guardian ad litem appointed under this
section must act to maintain the confidentiality of the proceedings.

The
court must advise the unemancipated minor or incompetent person that she has a
right to court-appointed counsel and provide the counsel upon request.

(3)
Court proceedings under this section are confidential and must ensure the
anonymity of the unemancipated minor or incompetent person. All court
proceedings under this section must be sealed. The unemancipated minor or
incompetent person has the right to file her petition in the court using a
pseudonym or using solely her initials. All documents related to this petition
are confidential and are not available to the public. These proceedings must
be given precedence over other pending matters to the extent necessary to
ensure that the court reaches a decision promptly. The court must rule, and
issue written findings of fact and conclusions of law, within four court days from
the time that the petition was filed, except that the four-day rule may be
extended at the request of the unemancipated minor or incompetent person.

(4)
In the case of a petition by an unemancipated minor or incompetent person who
is pregnant, if the court finds, by clear and convincing evidence, that the
petitioner is sufficiently mature or able to decide whether to have an
abortion, the court must issue an order authorizing the petitioner to consent
to the performance or inducement of an abortion without providing notification
to a parent or guardian. If the court does not make the finding specified in
this subsection or subsection (5) of this section, it must dismiss the
petition.

(5)
In the case of a petition by an unemancipated minor or incompetent person who
is pregnant, if the court finds, by clear and convincing evidence, that there
is evidence of a pattern of physical or sexual abuse by a parent or guardian of
the petitioner, or that notification to a parent or guardian is not in the best
interest of the petitioner, the court must issue an order authorizing the
petitioner to consent to the performance or inducement of an abortion without
notification to a parent or guardian. If the court does not make the finding
specified in this subsection or subsection (4) of this section, it must dismiss
the petition.

(6)
A court that conducts proceedings under this section must issue written and
specific factual findings and legal conclusions supporting its decision and
must order that a confidential record of the evidence and the judge's findings
and conclusions be maintained.

(7)
An expedited confidential appeal must be available, as the supreme court
provides by rule, to an unemancipated minor or incompetent person to whom the
court denies a waiver of notification. An order waiving the notification
requirement is not subject to appeal.

(8)
No filing fees are required of an unemancipated minor or incompetent person who
petitions a court for a waiver of parental notification under sections 1
through 11 of this act at either the trial or the appellate level.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. The
supreme court is respectfully requested to establish rules to ensure that
proceedings under sections 1 through 11 of this act are handled in an
expeditious and confidential manner and to satisfy requirements of federal
courts binding on this jurisdiction.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. (1)
Any physician who intentionally performs an abortion with knowledge that or
with reckless disregard as to whether the person upon whom the abortion is to
be performed is an unemancipated minor or an incompetent person without
providing the required notification is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(2)
Failure to provide the notification required under section 4 or 5 of this act
is prima facie evidence of failure to provide notification and of interference
with family relations in appropriate civil actions. The prima facie evidence
does not apply to an issue other than failure to provide notification to the
parents or guardian and interference with family relations in appropriate civil
actions. The civil action may be based on a claim that the act was a result of
simple negligence, gross negligence, wantonness, willfulness, intention, or other
legal standard of care. The law of this state must not be construed to
preclude the award of exemplary damages in an appropriate civil action relevant
to violations of sections 1 through 11 of this act. Nothing in sections 1
through 11 of this act may be construed to limit the common law rights of
parents.

(3)
A person not authorized to receive notification under sections 1 through 11 of
this act who signs a waiver of notification under section 6(2) of this act is
guilty of a misdemeanor.

(4)
A person who coerces a minor to have an abortion is guilty of a misdemeanor.

Sec.
12. RCW
9.02.100 and 1992 c 1 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
sovereign people hereby declare that every individual possesses a fundamental
right of privacy with respect to personal reproductive decisions.

Accordingly,
it is the public policy of the state of Washington that:

(1)
Every individual has the fundamental right to choose or refuse birth control;

(2)
Every woman has the fundamental right to choose or refuse to have an abortion,
except as specifically limited by RCW 9.02.100 through 9.02.170 ((and)),
sections 1 through 11 of this act, and 9.02.900 through 9.02.902;

(3)
Except as specifically permitted by RCW 9.02.100 through 9.02.170 ((and)),
sections 1 through 11 of this act, and 9.02.900 through 9.02.902, the state
shall not deny or interfere with a woman's fundamental right to choose or
refuse to have an abortion; and

(4)
The state shall not discriminate against the exercise of these rights in the
regulation or provision of benefits, facilities, services, or information.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. The
provisions of this act are to be liberally construed to effectuate the policies
and purposes of this act. In the event of conflict between this act and any
other provision of law, the provisions of this act shall govern.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. If any
provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. Sections
1 through 11 of this act are each added to chapter 9.02 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health,
morals, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---