BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 79.08 RCW to read as follows:

Prior
to any trade, transfer of management, or sale of five hundred acres or more of
state trust land, the board of natural resources shall require the new management
entity or owner to provide the following in perpetuity:

(1)
Law enforcement on such lands;

(2)
Fire protection on such lands;

(3)
Long-term management plans to the public for review and comment; and

(4)
Plans and programs to minimize negative local economic and social impacts of
the lands' management.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The
board of natural resources and the department of natural resources shall review
their authority to trade, sell, or transfer management authority for state
trust lands and shall report back to the legislature by December 1, 2000, on
recommendations for changes in or clarifications of law.

---
END ---