BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this
subsection apply throughout this section.

(a)
"Qualifying grant" means a grant provided directly to an organization
that has a contractual agreement with the department of community, trade, and
economic development to provide low-income energy assistance programs for a
specified service area.

(b)
"Low-income energy assistance programs" means energy assistance
programs for low-income households as defined on the effective date of this act
by the federal department of health and human services.

(c)
"Specified service area" means a service area designated by the
department of community, trade, and economic development in the state plan for
the low-income home energy assistance program.

(2)
Subject to the limits set forth in this section, a light and power business or
a gas distribution business whose application has been approved by the
department under this section may take a credit against tax imposed by this
chapter for qualifying grants made by the business. The organization shall
apply qualifying grants to the low-income energy related program that best
meets a community's needs as determined by the organization.

(3)
The department shall approve an application to the extent all qualifying grants
in a state fiscal year for the specified service area do not exceed two and one-half
percent of the amount of moneys allotted to nonprofit or governmental
organizations within the specified service area in federal fiscal year 1995
under the United States department of health and human services low-income home
energy assistance program. The department shall keep a running total of all
credits approved in each service area for each state fiscal year. The
businesses, the organizations, and the department shall work together to
develop a method to track the credit within service areas.

(4)
Applications for credits under this section shall be made to the department in
a form and manner as required by the department. The department shall approve
or deny application for credits using the criteria under this section.

(5)
Qualifying grants made by a light and power business or a gas distribution
business consisting in whole or in part of funds received from voluntary
customer contributions are eligible for credit as follows: (a) In an amount
equal to one hundred percent of company contributions granted from sources
other than voluntary customer contributions; and (b) in an amount equal to ten
percent of the voluntary customer contributions granted.

(6)
Taxpayers may carry forward to future years any credits granted under this
section not used due to the state-wide limitation in subsection (3) of this
section.

(7)
A person receiving approval must keep records necessary for the department to
verify eligibility under this section.

(8)
In the case of account closures by recipients of low-income energy assistance,
the unused portion of energy assistance from qualifying grants to low-income
utility customers shall either: (a) To the extent reasonable and
cost-effective, be transferred by the utility or organization to the customer's
next utility account; or (b) be returned to the organization's low-income
energy assistance programs. Organizations administering qualifying grants
shall notify recipients of the requirements of this subsection.

(9) No credit shall be approved for grants made before July 1,
2000.

---
END ---