BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. By
December 1, 1999, the natural heritage advisory council shall (1) define the
term "environmentally unique"; (2) create a list of what
environmentally unique areas now exist and what areas are needed; and (3)
develop a site specific list of areas which would complete the natural heritage
acquisition program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The
natural heritage advisory council shall develop legislative recommendations on
how natural area preserves and natural resources conservation areas can be
jointly managed and more effectively used by the public.

---
END ---