BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

Every
person engaging in this state in the business of trading natural gas and
electricity futures contracts, other than light and power businesses and gas
distribution businesses that are taxable under chapter 82.16 RCW, is taxable as
a service under RCW 82.04.290(2) upon the gross income of the business.

Sec.
2. RCW
82.04.080 and 1961 c 15 s 82.04.080 are each amended to read as follows:

"Gross income of the business" means the value proceeding
or accruing by reason of the transaction of the business engaged in and
includes gross proceeds of sales, compensation for the rendition of services,
gains realized from trading in stocks, bonds, or other evidences of indebtedness,
gains received from trading in natural gas and electricity futures
contracts, interest, discount, rents, royalties, fees, commissions,
dividends, and other emoluments however designated, all without any deduction
on account of the cost of tangible property sold, the cost of materials used,
labor costs, interest, discount, delivery costs, taxes, or any other expense
whatsoever paid or accrued and without any deduction on account of losses.

---
END ---