BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
35.58.570 and 1996 c 230 s 1602 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A metropolitan municipal corporation that is engaged in the transmission,
treatment, and disposal of sewage may impose a capacity charge on users of the
metropolitan municipal corporation's sewage facilities when the user connects,
reconnects, or establishes a new service to sewer facilities of a city,
county, or special purpose district that discharges into the metropolitan
municipal corporation's sewage facilities. ((The capacity charge shall
be approved by the council of the metropolitan municipal corporation and
reviewed and reapproved annually.

(2))) The
capacity charge shall be based upon the cost of the sewage facilities' excess
capacity that is necessary to provide sewerage treatment for new users to the
system. ((The capacity charge, which may be collected over a period of
fifteen years, shall not exceed:

(a)
Seven dollars per month per residential customer equivalent for connections and
reconnections occurring prior to January 1, 1996; and

(b)
Ten dollars and fifty cents per month per residential customer equivalent for
connections and reconnections occurring after January 1, 1996, and prior to
January 1, 2001.

For
connections and reconnections occurring after January 1, 2001, the capacity
charge shall not exceed fifty percent of the basic sewer rate per residential
customer equivalent established by the metropolitan municipal corporation at
the time of the connection or reconnection.

(3)
The capacity charge for a building other than a single-family residence shall
be based on the projected number of residential customer equivalents to be
represented by the building, considering its intended use.

(4))) (2)
The capacity charge is a monthly charge reviewed and approved annually by the
metropolitan council in order that such property owners shall bear their
equitable share of the cost of such system. The equitable share may include
interest charges applied from the date of construction of the sewage facilities
until the connection, or for a period not to exceed ten years, at a rate
commensurate with the rate of interest applicable to the metropolitan municipal
corporation at the time of construction or major rehabilitation of the sewage
facilities, or at the time of installation of the sewer lines to which the
property owner is seeking to connect but not to exceed ten percent per year:
PROVIDED, That the aggregate amount of interest shall not exceed the equitable share
of the cost of the sewage facilities allocated to such property owners.
Capacity charges collected shall be considered revenue of the sewage
facilities.

(3)
The metropolitan council ((of the metropolitan municipal corporation))
shall enforce the collection of the capacity charge in the same manner provided
for the collection, enforcement, and payment of rates and charges for
water-sewer districts provided in RCW 57.08.081. At least thirty days before
commencement of an action to foreclose a lien for a capacity charge, the
metropolitan municipal corporation shall send written notice of delinquency in
payment of the capacity charge to any first mortgage or deed of trust holder of
record at the address of record.

(((5) As used in this section, "sewage facilities"
means capital projects identified since January 1, 1982, to July 23, 1989, in
the metropolitan municipal corporation's comprehensive water pollution
abatement plan. "Residential customer equivalent" shall have the
same meaning used by the metropolitan municipal corporation in determining
rates and charges at the time the capacity charge is imposed.))

---
END ---