BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that competitiveness in Washington state suffers whenever any
worker is unable to achieve his or her maximum potential because of
discrimination in the workplace, regardless of whether the employer is large or
small. The legislature also finds that state discrimination laws must provide
greater certainty and predictability to employers and employees affected by the
requirements, and must recognize the unique needs of small businesses.
Employers and employees deserve a fair, expeditious, and cost-effective
resolution of disputes and also deserve to be made aware of their rights and
responsibilities under the laws.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) A
task force is created to study and make recommendations where applicable on the
following issues, relating to the subject of employment discrimination:

(a)
The historical evolution of laws in Washington state and laws enacted at the
federal level to address the issue of employment discrimination;

(b)
Existing laws and administrative procedures utilized at the federal, state, and
local levels to address the issue of employment discrimination;

(c)
Administrative practices and procedures employed by the state human rights
commission, and case trend data, employed by the commission to process claims
of discrimination and assist employers and employees;

(d)
An analysis of options in Washington state and other states which encourage
fair, expeditious, and cost-effective resolution of employment discrimination
cases;

(e)
Changes required in existing laws and procedures which will assure that all
workers alleging employment discrimination shall have a resolution of the
allegation and, where appropriate, a remedy which is fair, expeditious, and
cost-effective;

(f)
Changes to existing laws and procedures which: (i) Are fair, expeditious, and
cost-effective; (ii) will provide greater predictability and certainty to
employers; and (iii) address the unique needs and limitations of small
businesses; and

(g)
Education, training, and public relation options for assuring that employees
and employers have improved understanding of their rights and obligations under
the state employment discrimination laws.

(2)
The task force shall be composed of ten members as follows:

(a)
Two members each from the senate and the house of representatives, one each
from each of the two largest caucuses in each chamber. The president of the
senate shall appoint the two members of the task force from the senate. The
co-speakers of the house of representatives shall appoint the two members of
the task force from the house of representatives; and

(b)
Six members, to be appointed jointly by the president of the senate and the
co-speakers of the house of representatives, three of whom shall represent Washington
businesses, from a list of names recommended by major state-wide organizations
of employers representing a cross-section of businesses in the state, including
small businesses and three of whom shall represent protected classes of
workers, from a list submitted by major state-wide organizations representing
these classes.

(3)
All state and local government agencies, including the human rights commission,
shall provide information and assistance to the task force.

(4)
Senate committee services and the office of program research shall provide
staff to support the task force.

(5)
The task force shall submit its study and recommendations to the governor and
legislature not later than November 15, 1999.

---
END ---