BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 66.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A state liquor agency vendor retail outlet may be located within the limits of
cities and towns and is not affected by any incorporation or annexation of
territory in which such retail outlet is located by a city or town.

(2)
The board may not terminate a contract with an agency liquor vendor due to
sales volume. The board may not terminate a contract with an agency liquor
vendor in order to replace the liquor agency vendor retail outlet with a state
liquor store.

(3) An agency vendor who continues to be in compliance with all
terms of his or her contract with the board, meets minimum qualifications as
stated in board rules, and has not been convicted of a felony or a violation of
Washington state liquor laws, has the right to continue under the contract
until that contract expires.

---
END ---