BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9A.52.010 and 1985 c 289 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
((following)) definitions in this section apply ((in)) throughout
this chapter((:)) unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Premises" includes any building, dwelling, structure used for
commercial aquaculture, or any real property;

(2)
"Enter". The word "enter" when constituting an element or
part of a crime, shall include the entrance of the person, or the insertion of any
part of his or her body, or any instrument or weapon held in his or
her hand and used or intended to be used to threaten or intimidate a person
or to detach or remove property;

(3)
"Enters or remains unlawfully". A person "enters or remains
unlawfully" in or upon premises when he or she is not then
licensed, invited, or otherwise privileged to so enter or remain.

A
license or privilege to enter or remain in a building ((which)) that
is only partly open to the public is not a license or privilege to enter or
remain in that part of a building ((which)) that is not open to
the public. A person who enters or remains upon unimproved and apparently
unused land, which is neither fenced nor otherwise enclosed in a manner
designed to exclude intruders, does so with license and privilege unless notice
against trespass is personally communicated to him or her by the owner
of the land or some other authorized person, or unless notice is given by
posting in a conspicuous manner. Land that is used for commercial aquaculture
or for growing an agricultural crop or crops, other than timber, is not
unimproved and apparently unused land if a crop or any other sign of
cultivation is clearly visible or if notice is given by posting in a
conspicuous manner. Similarly, a field fenced in any manner ((is)) or
a railroad right of way on which rails exist are not unimproved and
apparently unused lands;

(4)
"Data" means a representation of information, knowledge, facts,
concepts, or instructions that are being prepared or have been prepared in a
formalized manner and are intended for use in a computer;

(5)
"Computer program" means an ordered set of data representing coded
instructions or statements that when executed by a computer cause the computer
to process data;

(6)
"Access" means to approach, instruct, communicate with, store data
in, retrieve data from, or otherwise make use of any resources of a computer,
directly or by electronic means;

(7)
"Railroad" means any form of nonhighway ground transportation that
runs on rails;

(8)
"Railroad carrier" means a person providing railroad transportation;

(9)
"Railroad right of way" means the rails over which a railroad can
operate, any structures that support the rails, the land within ten feet of any
rail, and the land outside that area that is owned, leased, or operated by a
railroad carrier and which is readily recognizable to a reasonable person as
being railroad property or is reasonably identified as such by fencing or
appropriate signs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 9A.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Every person who enters or remains unlawfully upon a railroad right of way is
guilty of a misdemeanor. The only circumstances in which a person may lawfully
enter a railroad right of way are specified in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section. RCW 9A.52.090 does not apply to this section.

(2)
The following persons have lawful authority to enter a railroad right of way
while engaged in the performance of their official duties: Employees of a
railroad carrier, police officers, fire fighters, peace officers, emergency
response personnel, representatives of the state department of transportation,
representatives of the state utilities and transportation commission,
representatives of the federal railroad administration, representatives of the
national transportation safety board, and union representatives who are
employees of the railroad and are present on the railroad's right of way for
official union or railroad business.

(3)
A person may enter railroad rights of way under the following circumstances:

(a)
When a person enters the right of way at a public crossing for the purpose of
crossing the right of way at that location;

(b)
When a person has the consent or written permission of the railroad carrier to
enter or remain on the right of way in question. This includes passengers, who
are persons traveling by rail with the express consent of the railroad carrier,
and have consent to be on the train and in areas designated by the railroad
carrier. The public has consent to be on the grounds of a railroad station in
those areas and at those times designated by the railroad carrier;

(c)
When a person or the person's family, invitee, employee, or independent
contractor enters the right of way at a private crossing site approved by the
railroad carrier for the purpose of crossing the right of way at the approved
crossing to obtain access to land that the person owns, leases, or operates; or

(d) When a person enters or remains on the right of way in an
emergency to rescue a person or animal or to remove an object that the person
reasonably believes to pose an imminent threat to life or limb.

---
END ---