BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
81.24.010 and 1996 c 196 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Every company subject to regulation by the commission, except auto
transportation companies, steamboat companies, wharfingers or warehousemen,
motor freight carriers, railroad companies, and storage warehousemen
shall, on or before the date specified by the commission for filing annual reports
under RCW 81.04.080, file with the commission a statement ((on oath))
showing its gross operating revenue from intrastate operations for the
preceding calendar year, or portion thereof, and pay to the commission a fee
equal to one-tenth of one percent of the first fifty thousand dollars of gross
operating revenue, plus two-tenths of one percent of any gross operating
revenue in excess of fifty thousand dollars((, except railroad companies
which shall each pay to the commission a fee equal to one and one-half percent
of its intrastate gross operating revenue)). However, the fee shall in no
case be less than one dollar. ((Any railroad association that qualifies as
a not‑for‑profit charitable organization under the federal internal
revenue code section 501(c)(3) is exempt from the fee required under this
subsection.))

(2)
The percentage rates of gross operating revenue to be paid in any one year may
be decreased by the commission for any class of companies subject to the
payment of such fees, by general order entered before March 1st of such year,
and for such purpose such companies shall be classified as follows: ((Railroad,))
Express, sleeping car, and toll bridge companies shall constitute class
two. Every other company subject to regulation by the commission, for which
regulatory fees are not otherwise fixed by law shall pay fees as herein
provided and shall constitute additional classes according to kinds of
businesses engaged in.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 81.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Each year every railroad company shall file a statement with the commission
showing its gross operating revenues derived within this state for the previous
calendar year. "Gross operating revenues" includes all revenues
collected from intrastate operations, and all revenues collected from
interstate transportation of freight and passengers apportioned on a mileage
basis for the portion of the transportation performed in the state of Washington.
Each railroad shall pay to the commission a fee equal to 0.2 percent of the
reported gross operating revenue. The statement and the fee must be submitted
and paid no later than May 1st of each year.

(2)
The percentage rate of gross operating revenue to be paid in any one year may
be decreased by the commission by order entered before March 1st of such year.

(3)
Any railroad association that qualifies as a not‑for‑profit
charitable organization under the federal internal revenue code section 501(c)(3)
is exempt from the fee required under subsection (1) of this section.

Sec.
3. RCW
81.24.050 and 1983 c 3 s 206 are each amended to read as follows:

In fixing the percentage rates of gross operating revenue to be
paid by companies under RCW 81.24.010, 81.24.020, ((and)) 81.24.030, and
section 2 of this act, the commission shall consider all moneys then in the
public service revolving fund and the fees currently to be paid into such fund,
to the end that the fees collected from the companies, or classes of companies,
covered by each respective section shall be approximately the same as the
reasonable cost of supervising and regulating such companies, or classes of
companies, respectively.

---
END ---