BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
74.13.285 and 1997 c 272 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Within available resources, the department shall prepare a passport containing
all known and available information concerning the mental, physical, health,
and educational status of the child for any child who has been in a foster home
for ninety consecutive days or more. The information about the educational
status of the child shall include, at a minimum, the name, address, and phone
number of each school attended by the child in the past three years. The
passport shall be provided to a foster parent at any placement of a child
covered by this section. The department shall update the passport during the
regularly scheduled court reviews required under chapter 13.34 RCW.

New
placements after July 1, 1997, shall have first priority in the preparation of
passports. Within available resources, the department may prepare passports
for any child in a foster home on July 1, 1997, provided that no time spent in
a foster home before July 1, 1997, shall be included in the computation of the
ninety days.

(2) In addition to the requirements of subsection (1) of this
section, the department shall, within available resources, notify a foster
parent before placement of a child of any known health conditions that pose a
serious threat to the child and any known behavioral history that presents a
serious risk of harm to the child or others.

---
END ---