BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
27.04.010 and 1943 c 207 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

There
shall be a state library, with a state library commission to serve as
the library's governing board, and a state librarian ((as the)) to
serve as its chief executive officer ((in charge thereof)).

Sec.
2. RCW
27.04.020 and 1984 c 287 s 58 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A state library commission is ((hereby)) created ((which)) and
shall consist of ((the superintendent of public instruction, who shall be ex
officio chairman of the commission, and four)) five commissioners
appointed by the governor((, one of whom shall be a library trustee at the
time of appointment and one a certified librarian actually engaged in library
work at the time of appointment)). The commission shall elect the chair
from its membership.

(2)
The ((first appointments shall be for terms of one, two, three, and four
years respectively, and thereafter one commissioner shall be appointed each
year to serve for a four year term)) commission appointment expiring in
July 1999 shall thereafter be filled by a certified librarian actually engaged
in library work at the time of appointment. The commission appointment
expiring in July 2000 shall thereafter be filled by a member of the general
public. The commission appointment expiring in July 2001 shall thereafter be
filled by a representative from an executive branch agency. The commission
appointment expiring in July 2002 shall thereafter be filled by a library
trustee at the time of appointment. The position held by the superintendent of
public instruction shall be filled by an educator with knowledge in library and
information technology policy, with an initial expiration date of 2003. A full
term is five years. Commissioners may serve until reappointed or replaced.
Vacancies shall be filled by appointments for the unexpired terms. An
unexpired term of more than two and one-half years is considered a full term
for purposes of reappointment. The governor may remove a commissioner for
cause, in accordance with RCW 43.06.070. Each commissioner shall be
compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses incurred in the actual performance of their duties in accordance with
RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec.
3. RCW
27.04.030 and 1987 c 330 s 401 are each amended to read as follows:

The
state library commission:

(1)
May make such rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as may be deemed necessary and
proper to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(2)
Shall set general policy and strategic directions pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter;

(3)
Shall monitor agency progress toward its goals and objectives;

(4)
Shall exert leadership in the development of information access and library
services;

(5)
Shall appoint a state librarian who shall serve at the pleasure of the
commission. The commission may delegate such responsibilities and duties to
the state librarian as it deems appropriate and shall regularly evaluate the
performance of the state librarian;

(((4)))
(6) Shall adopt ((a)) recommended budgets and submit ((it))
them to the governor;

(((5)
Shall have authority to contract with any agency of the state of Washington for
the purpose of providing library materials, supplies, and equipment and
employing assistants as needed for the development, growth, and operation of
any library facilities or services of such agency;

(6))) (7)
Shall have authority to contract with any public library in the state for that
library to render library service to the blind and/or physically handicapped
throughout the state. The state library commission shall have authority to
compensate such public library for the cost of the service it renders under
such contract;

(((7)))
(8) May adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW for the allocation of ((any))
grants of state, federal, or private funds ((for library purposes));

(((8)))
(9) Shall have authority to accept and to expend in accordance with the
terms thereof ((any)) grants of federal, state, local, or
private funds ((which may become available to the state for library purposes)).
For the purpose of qualifying to receive such grants, the state library commission
is authorized to make ((such)) applications and reports ((as may be))
required by the ((federal government or appropriate private entity as a
condition thereto)) grantor;

(((9)
Shall have the authority to provide for the sale of library material in
accordance with RCW 27.12.305;)) and

(10)
((Shall have authority to establish rules and regulations for, and prescribe
and hold examinations to test, the qualifications of those seeking certificates
as librarians.

(a)
The commission shall grant librarians' certificates without examination to
applicants who are graduates of library schools accredited by the American
library association for general library training, and shall grant certificates
to other applicants when it has satisfied itself by examination that the
applicant has attainments and abilities equivalent to those of a library school
graduate and is qualified to carry on library work ably and efficiently.

(b)
The commission shall require a fee of not less than one dollar nor greater than
that required to recover the costs associated with the application to be paid
by each applicant for a librarian's certificate. Money paid as fees shall be
deposited with the state treasurer.

(c)
A library serving a community having over four thousand population shall not
have in its employ, in the position of librarian or in any other full-time
professional library position, a person who does not hold a librarian's
certificate issued by the commission or its predecessor.

(d)
A full-time professional library position, as intended by this subsection, is
one that requires, in the opinion of the commission, a knowledge of books and
of library technique equivalent to that required for graduation from an
accredited library school.

(e)
The provisions of this subsection apply to every library serving a community
having over four thousand population and to every library operated by the state
or under its authority, including libraries of institutions of higher
learning: PROVIDED, That nothing in this subsection applies to the state law
library or to county law libraries)) Shall establish
content-related standards for common formats and agency indexes for state
agency-produced information. In developing these standards, the commission is
encouraged to seek involvement of, and comments from, public and private
entities with an interest in such standards.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 27.04 RCW to read as follows:

No
library serving a community having over four thousand population, nor any
library operated by the state or under its authority, may have in its employ,
in the position of librarian or in any other full-time professional library
position, a person who does not hold a librarian's certificate issued by the
commission or its predecessor. A full-time professional library position, is
one that requires, in the opinion of the commission, a knowledge of information
resources and library/information service delivery equivalent to that required
for graduation from an accredited library education program. This section does
not apply to the state law library or to county law libraries. The state
library commission shall:

(1)
Establish rules for, and prescribe and hold examinations to test, the
qualifications of those seeking certificates as librarians;

(2)
Grant librarians' certificates without examination to applicants who are
graduates of library schools programs accredited or otherwise officially
recognized by the American library association for general library training,
and grant certificates to other applicants when it has satisfied itself by
examination that the applicant has attainments and abilities equivalent to those
of a graduate of a library school program accredited or otherwise officially
recognized by the American library association; and

(3)
Charge a fee to recover the costs associated with the application to be paid by
each applicant for a librarian's certificate. Money paid as fees shall be
retained by the state library as a recovery of costs.

Sec.
5. RCW
27.04.045 and 1996 c 171 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
state ((library commission)) librarian shall be responsible and
accountable for the following functions:

(1)
Advising the commission and implementing policies, directions, and delegated
authority set by the commission;

(2)
Managing and administering the state library;

(3)
Exerting leadership in information access and the development of library
services;

(4)
Acquiring library materials, equipment, and supplies by purchase, exchange,
gift, or otherwise; and, as appropriate, assisting the legislature, other state
agencies, and other libraries in the cost- effective purchase of information
resources;

(5)
Employing and terminating personnel in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW as may
be necessary to implement the purposes of this chapter;

(6)
Entering into agreements with other public or private entities as a means of
implementing the mission, goals, and objectives of the state library and the
entity with which it enters such agreements. In agreements for services
between the library and other state agencies, the library may negotiate an
exchange of services in lieu of monetary reimbursement for the library's indirect
or overhead costs, when such an arrangement facilitates the delivery of library
services;

(7)
Maintaining a library at the state capitol grounds to effectively provide
library and information services to members of the legislature, state officials,
and state employees in connection with their official duties;

(((2)
Acquiring and making available information, publications, and source materials
that pertain to the history of the state;

(3))) (8)
Serving as the depository for newspapers published in the state of Washington
thus providing a central location for a valuable historical record for
scholarly, personal, and commercial reference and circulation;

(((4)))
(9) Promoting and facilitating electronic access to public information
and services, including providing, or providing for, a service that
identifies, describes, and provides location information for government
information through electronic means, and that assists government agencies in
making their information more readily available to the public;

(((5)
Establishing content-related standards for common formats and agency indexes
for state agency produced information. In developing these standards, the
commission is encouraged to include the state archives, the department of
information services, and public and academic libraries;

(6))) (10)
Collecting and distributing copies of state publications ((by ensuring that:

(a)
The state library collects and makes available as part of its collection copies
of any state publication)), as defined in RCW
40.06.010, prepared by any state agency ((whenever fifteen or more copies
are prepared)) for distribution. The state library shall maintain the
state publications distribution center, as provided in chapter 40.06 RCW.
The state library commission, on recommendation of the state librarian, may
provide by rule for deposit with the state library of up to three copies of ((such))
each publication;(( and

(b)
The state library maintains a division to serve as state publications
distribution center, as provided in chapter 40.06 RCW;

(7))) (11)
Providing for the sale of library material in accordance with RCW 27.12.305;

(12)
Providing advisory services to state agencies regarding their information
needs;

(((8)))
(13) Providing for library and information service to residents and
staff of state-supported residential institutions;

(((9)))
(14) Providing for library and information services to persons
throughout the state who are blind and/or physically handicapped;

(((10)))
(15) Assisting individuals and groups such as libraries, library boards,
governing bodies, and citizens throughout the state toward the establishment
and development of library services;

(((11)))
(16) Making studies and surveys of library needs in order to provide,
expand, enlarge, and otherwise improve access to library facilities and
services throughout the state; and

(((12)))
(17) Serving as ((a primary)) an interlibrary loan,
information, reference, and referral ((center)) resource for all
libraries in the state((;

(13)
Assisting in the provision of direct library and information services to
individuals;

(14)
Overseeing of the Washington library network in accordance with chapters 27.26
and 43.105 RCW. This subsection shall expire on June 30, 1997)). The
state library may charge lending fees to other libraries who charge the state
library for similar services. Money paid as fees shall be retained by the
state library as a recovery of costs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
27.04.050 (Duties of librarian) and 1984 c 152 s 3 & 1943 c
207 s 3; and

(2) RCW
27.04.110 (Learn-in-libraries program) and 1998 c 245 s 10, 1991
c 91 s 1, & 1990 c 290 s 2.

---
END ---