BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A new
section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

The
tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to charges made for labor and
services rendered with respect to repairing damaged residential buildings or
constructing new residential buildings to replace residential buildings
destroyed by inclement weather, if the buildings are located in a county that
the governor has declared to be in a disaster area as a result of the inclement
weather, or to sales of tangible personal property which becomes an ingredient
or component of such residential buildings during the course of such repair or
construction, but only if the buyer provides the seller with an exemption
certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department by rule.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

The
tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of tangible personal
property to a resident of a county that the governor has declared to be in a
disaster area as a result of inclement weather, if the property replaces
household goods, personal effects, or private automobiles, lost or destroyed in
the inclement weather, but only if the buyer provides the seller with an
exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department by
rule.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the use of tangible
personal property which becomes an ingredient or component of residential
buildings during the course of repairing residential buildings or constructing
new residential buildings to replace residential buildings damaged or destroyed
by inclement weather, if the buildings are located in a county that the
governor has declared to be in a disaster area as a result of the inclement
weather.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the
use of tangible personal property by a resident of a county that the governor
has declared to be in a disaster area as a result of inclement weather, if the
property replaces household goods, personal effects, or private automobiles,
lost or destroyed due to the inclement weather.

---
END ---