BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9A.88.010 and 1990 c 3 s 904 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of indecent exposure if he or she intentionally makes
any open and obscene exposure of his or her person or the person of
another knowing that such conduct is likely to cause reasonable affront or
alarm.

(2)
Indecent exposure is a gross misdemeanor ((unless such person exposes
himself to a person under the age of fourteen years in which case indecent
exposure is a gross misdemeanor on the first offense)) and, if such person
has previously been convicted under this subsection or of a sex offense as
defined in RCW 9.94A.030, then such person is guilty of a class C felony
punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

Sec.
2. RCW
9A.44.130 and 1998 c 220 s 1 and 1998 c 139 s 1 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
Any adult or juvenile residing, or who is a student, is employed, or carries on
a vocation in this state who has been found to have committed or has been
convicted of any sex offense or kidnapping offense, or who has been found not
guilty by reason of insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW of committing any sex
offense or kidnapping offense, shall register with the county sheriff for the
county of the person's residence, or if the person is not a resident of
Washington, the county of the person's school, or place of employment or
vocation. Where a person required to register under this section is in custody
of the state department of corrections, the state department of social and
health services, a local division of youth services, or a local jail or
juvenile detention facility as a result of a sex offense or kidnapping offense,
the person shall also register at the time of release from custody with an
official designated by the agency that has jurisdiction over the person. In
addition, any such adult or juvenile who is admitted to a public or private
institution of higher education shall, within ten days of enrolling or by the
first business day after arriving at the institution, whichever is earlier, notify
the sheriff for the county of the person's residence of the person's intent to
attend the institution. Persons required to register under this section who
are enrolled in a public or private institution of higher education on June 11,
1998, must notify the county sheriff immediately. The sheriff shall notify the
institution's department of public safety and shall provide that department
with the same information provided to a county sheriff under subsection (3) of
this section.

(2)
This section may not be construed to confer any powers pursuant to RCW 4.24.500
upon the public safety department of any public or private institution of
higher education.

(3)
The person shall provide the following information when registering: (a) Name;
(b) address; (c) date and place of birth; (d) place of employment; (e) crime
for which convicted; (f) date and place of conviction; (g) aliases used; (h)
social security number; (i) photograph; and (j) fingerprints.

(4)(a)
Offenders shall register with the county sheriff within the following
deadlines. For purposes of this section the term "conviction" refers
to adult convictions and juvenile adjudications for sex offenses or kidnapping
offenses:

(i)
OFFENDERS IN CUSTODY. (A) Sex offenders who committed a sex offense on,
before, or after February 28, 1990, and who, on or after July 28, 1991, are in
custody, as a result of that offense, of the state department of corrections,
the state department of social and health services, a local division of youth
services, or a local jail or juvenile detention facility, and (B) kidnapping
offenders who on or after July 27, 1997, are in custody of the state department
of corrections, the state department of social and health services, a local
division of youth services, or a local jail or juvenile detention facility,
must register at the time of release from custody with an official designated
by the agency that has jurisdiction over the offender. The agency shall within
three days forward the registration information to the county sheriff for the
county of the offender's anticipated residence. The offender must also
register within twenty-four hours from the time of release with the county
sheriff for the county of the person's residence, or if the person is not a
resident of Washington, the county of the person's school, or place of
employment or vocation. The agency that has jurisdiction over the offender
shall provide notice to the offender of the duty to register. Failure to
register at the time of release and within twenty-four hours of release
constitutes a violation of this section and is punishable as provided in
subsection (9) of this section.

When
the agency with jurisdiction intends to release an offender with a duty to
register under this section, and the agency has knowledge that the offender is
eligible for developmental disability services from the department of social
and health services, the agency shall notify the division of developmental
disabilities of the release. Notice shall occur not more than thirty days before
the offender is to be released. The agency and the division shall assist the
offender in meeting the initial registration requirement under this section.
Failure to provide such assistance shall not constitute a defense for any
violation of this section.

(ii)
OFFENDERS NOT IN CUSTODY BUT UNDER STATE OR LOCAL JURISDICTION. Sex offenders
who, on July 28, 1991, are not in custody but are under the jurisdiction of the
indeterminate sentence review board or under the department of correction's
active supervision, as defined by the department of corrections, the state
department of social and health services, or a local division of youth
services, for sex offenses committed before, on, or after February 28, 1990,
must register within ten days of July 28, 1991. Kidnapping offenders who, on
July 27, 1997, are not in custody but are under the jurisdiction of the
indeterminate sentence review board or under the department of correction's
active supervision, as defined by the department of corrections, the state
department of social and health services, or a local division of youth
services, for kidnapping offenses committed before, on, or after July 27, 1997,
must register within ten days of July 27, 1997. A change in supervision status
of a sex offender who was required to register under this subsection (4)(a)(ii)
as of July 28, 1991, or a kidnapping offender required to register as of July
27, 1997, shall not relieve the offender of the duty to register or to
reregister following a change in residence. The obligation to register shall
only cease pursuant to RCW 9A.44.140.

(iii)
OFFENDERS UNDER FEDERAL JURISDICTION. Sex offenders who, on or after July 23,
1995, and kidnapping offenders who, on or after July 27, 1997, as a result of
that offense are in the custody of the United States bureau of prisons or other
federal or military correctional agency for sex offenses committed before, on,
or after February 28, 1990, or kidnapping offenses committed on, before, or
after July 27, 1997, must register within twenty-four hours from the time of
release with the county sheriff for the county of the person's residence, or if
the person is not a resident of Washington, the county of the person's school,
or place of employment or vocation. Sex offenders who, on July 23, 1995, are
not in custody but are under the jurisdiction of the United States bureau of
prisons, United States courts, United States parole commission, or military
parole board for sex offenses committed before, on, or after February 28, 1990,
must register within ten days of July 23, 1995. Kidnapping offenders who, on
July 27, 1997, are not in custody but are under the jurisdiction of the United
States bureau of prisons, United States courts, United States parole
commission, or military parole board for kidnapping offenses committed before,
on, or after July 27, 1997, must register within ten days of July 27, 1997. A
change in supervision status of a sex offender who was required to register
under this subsection (4)(a)(iii) as of July 23, 1995, or a kidnapping offender
required to register as of July 27, 1997 shall not relieve the offender of the
duty to register or to reregister following a change in residence, or if the
person is not a resident of Washington, the county of the person's school, or
place of employment or vocation. The obligation to register shall only cease
pursuant to RCW 9A.44.140.

(iv)
OFFENDERS WHO ARE CONVICTED BUT NOT CONFINED. Sex offenders who are convicted
of a sex offense on or after July 28, 1991, for a sex offense that was committed
on or after February 28, 1990, and kidnapping offenders who are convicted on or
after July 27, 1997, for a kidnapping offense that was committed on or after
July 27, 1997, but who are not sentenced to serve a term of confinement
immediately upon sentencing, shall report to the county sheriff to register
immediately upon completion of being sentenced.

(v)
OFFENDERS WHO ARE NEW RESIDENTS OR RETURNING WASHINGTON RESIDENTS. Sex
offenders and kidnapping offenders who move to Washington state from another
state or a foreign country that are not under the jurisdiction of the state
department of corrections, the indeterminate sentence review board, or the
state department of social and health services at the time of moving to
Washington, must register within thirty days of establishing residence or
reestablishing residence if the person is a former Washington resident. The
duty to register under this subsection applies to sex offenders convicted under
the laws of another state or a foreign country, federal or military statutes,
or Washington state for offenses committed on or after February 28, 1990, and
to kidnapping offenders convicted under the laws of another state or a foreign
country, federal or military statutes, or Washington state for offenses
committed on or after July 27, 1997. Sex offenders and kidnapping offenders
from other states or a foreign country who, when they move to Washington, are
under the jurisdiction of the department of corrections, the indeterminate
sentence review board, or the department of social and health services must
register within twenty-four hours of moving to Washington. The agency that has
jurisdiction over the offender shall notify the offender of the registration
requirements before the offender moves to Washington.

(vi)
OFFENDERS FOUND NOT GUILTY BY REASON OF INSANITY. Any adult or juvenile who
has been found not guilty by reason of insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW of (A)
committing a sex offense on, before, or after February 28, 1990, and who, on or
after July 23, 1995, is in custody, as a result of that finding, of the state
department of social and health services, or (B) committing a kidnapping
offense on, before, or after July 27, 1997, and who on or after July 27, 1997,
is in custody, as a result of that finding, of the state department of social
and health services, must register within twenty-four hours from the time of
release with the county sheriff for the county of the person's residence. The
state department of social and health services shall provide notice to the
adult or juvenile in its custody of the duty to register. Any adult or
juvenile who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity of committing a
sex offense on, before, or after February 28, 1990, but who was released before
July 23, 1995, or any adult or juvenile who has been found not guilty by reason
of insanity of committing a kidnapping offense but who was released before July
27, 1997, shall be required to register within twenty-four hours of receiving
notice of this registration requirement. The state department of social and
health services shall make reasonable attempts within available resources to
notify sex offenders who were released before July 23, 1995, and kidnapping
offenders who were released before July 27, 1997. Failure to register within
twenty-four hours of release, or of receiving notice, constitutes a violation
of this section and is punishable as provided in subsection (9) of this
section.

(b)
Failure to register within the time required under this section constitutes a
per se violation of this section and is punishable as provided in subsection
(9) of this section. The county sheriff shall not be required to determine
whether the person is living within the county.

(c)
An arrest on charges of failure to register, service of an information, or a
complaint for a violation of this section, or arraignment on charges for a
violation of this section, constitutes actual notice of the duty to register.
Any person charged with the crime of failure to register under this section who
asserts as a defense the lack of notice of the duty to register shall register
immediately following actual notice of the duty through arrest, service, or
arraignment. Failure to register as required under this subsection (4)(c)
constitutes grounds for filing another charge of failing to register.
Registering following arrest, service, or arraignment on charges shall not
relieve the offender from criminal liability for failure to register prior to
the filing of the original charge.

(d)
The deadlines for the duty to register under this section do not relieve any
sex offender of the duty to register under this section as it existed prior to
July 28, 1991.

(5)(a)
If any person required to register pursuant to this section changes his or her
residence address within the same county, the person must send written notice
of the change of address to the county sheriff within seventy-two hours of
moving. If any person required to register pursuant to this section moves to a
new county, the person must send written notice of the change of address at
least fourteen days before moving to the county sheriff in the new county of
residence and must register with that county sheriff within twenty-four hours
of moving. The person must also send written notice within ten days of the
change of address in the new county to the county sheriff with whom the person
last registered. The county sheriff with whom the person last registered shall
promptly forward the information concerning the change of address to the county
sheriff for the county of the person's new residence. If any person required
to register pursuant to this section moves out of Washington state, the person
must also send written notice within ten days of moving to the new state or a
foreign country to the county sheriff with whom the person last registered in
Washington state. Upon receipt of notice of change of address to a new state,
the county sheriff shall promptly forward the information regarding the change
of address to the agency designated by the new state as the state's offender
registration agency.

(b)
It is an affirmative defense to a charge that the person failed to send a
notice at least fourteen days in advance of moving as required under (a) of
this subsection that the person did not know the location of his or her new
residence at least fourteen days before moving. The defendant must establish
the defense by a preponderance of the evidence and, to prevail on the defense,
must also prove by a preponderance that the defendant sent the required notice
within twenty-four hours of determining the new address.

(6)
A sex offender subject to registration requirements under this section who
applies to change his or her name under RCW 4.24.130 or any other law shall
submit a copy of the application to the county sheriff of the county of the
person's residence and to the state patrol not fewer than five days before the
entry of an order granting the name change. No sex offender under the
requirement to register under this section at the time of application shall be
granted an order changing his or her name if the court finds that doing so will
interfere with legitimate law enforcement interests, except that no order shall
be denied when the name change is requested for religious or legitimate
cultural reasons or in recognition of marriage or dissolution of marriage. A
sex offender under the requirement to register under this section who receives
an order changing his or her name shall submit a copy of the order to the
county sheriff of the county of the person's residence and to the state patrol
within five days of the entry of the order.

(7)
The county sheriff shall obtain a photograph of the individual and shall obtain
a copy of the individual's fingerprints.

(8)
For the purpose of RCW 9A.44.130, 10.01.200, 43.43.540, 70.48.470, and
72.09.330:

(a)
"Sex offense" means any offense defined as a sex offense by RCW
9.94A.030 and any violation of RCW 9.68A.040 (sexual exploitation of a minor),
9.68A.050 (dealing in depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit
conduct), 9.68A.060 (sending, bringing into state depictions of minor engaged
in sexually explicit conduct), 9.68A.090 (communication with minor for immoral
purposes), 9.68A.100 (patronizing juvenile prostitute), or 9A.44.096 (sexual
misconduct with a minor in the second degree), as well as any gross misdemeanor
that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or
criminal conspiracy to commit an offense that is classified as a sex offense
under RCW 9.94A.030, or any felony violation of RCW 9A.88.010 (indecent
exposure).

(b)
"Kidnapping offense" means the crimes of kidnapping in the first
degree, kidnapping in the second degree, and unlawful imprisonment as defined
in chapter 9A.40 RCW, where the victim is a minor and the offender is not the
minor's parent.

(c)
"Employed" or "carries on a vocation" means employment that
is full-time or part-time for a period of time exceeding fourteen days, or for
an aggregate period of time exceeding thirty days during any calendar year. A
person is employed or carries on a vocation whether the person's employment is
financially compensated, volunteered, or for the purpose of government or
educational benefit.

(d)
"Student" means a person who is enrolled, on a full-time or part-time
basis, in any public or private educational institution. An educational
institution includes any secondary school, trade or professional institution,
or institution of higher education.

(9) A person who knowingly fails to register with the county
sheriff or notify the county sheriff, or who changes his or her name without
notifying the county sheriff and the state patrol, as required by this section
is guilty of a class C felony if the crime for which the individual was
convicted was a felony or a federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense
that under the laws of this state would be a felony. If the crime was other
than a felony or a federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under
the laws of this state would be other than a felony, violation of this section
is a gross misdemeanor.

---
END ---