BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. RCW
36.93.065 (Boards in existence as of July 23, 1989--Staggering of
terms--Limitation of term of office) and 1989 c 84 s 20 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---