BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
15.44.060 and 1979 ex.s. c 238 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
commission shall have the power and duty to:

(1)
Elect a chairman and such other officers as it deems advisable, and adopt,
rescind, and amend rules, regulations, and orders for the exercise of its
powers, which shall have the effect of law when not inconsistent with existing
laws;

(2)
Administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter and perform all acts and
exercise all powers reasonably necessary to effectuate the purpose hereof;

(3)
Employ and discharge advertising counsel, advertising agents, and such
attorneys, agents, and employees as it deems necessary, and prescribe their
duties and powers and fix their compensation;

(4)
Establish offices, incur expenses, enter into contracts, and create such
liabilities as are reasonable and proper for the proper administration of this
chapter;

(5)
Investigate and prosecute violations of this chapter;

(6)
Conduct scientific research designed to improve milk production, quality,
transportation, processing, and distribution and to develop and discover uses
for products of milk and its derivatives;

(7)
Make in its name such advertising contracts and other agreements as are
necessary to promote the sale of dairy products on either a state, national, or
foreign basis;

(8)
Keep accurate records of all its dealings, which shall be open to public
inspection and audit by the regular agencies of the state; ((and))

(9)
Conduct the necessary research to develop more efficient and equitable methods
of marketing dairy products, and enter upon, singly or in participation with
others, the promotion and development of state, national, or foreign markets;
and

(10) Participate in federal and state agency hearings, meetings,
and other proceedings relating to the regulation of the production,
manufacture, distribution, sale, or use of dairy products, to provide
educational meetings and seminars for the dairy industry on such matters, and
to expend commission funds for such activities.

---
END ---