BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
48.66.045 and 1995 c 85 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
issuer of a medicare supplement insurance policy or certificate providing
coverage to a resident of this state issued on or after January 1, 1996, shall:

(1)
Issue coverage under its standardized benefit plans B, C, D, E, F, and G
without evidence of insurability to any resident of this state who is eligible
for both medicare hospital and physician services by reason of age or by reason
of disability or end-stage renal disease, if the medicare supplement policy
replaces another medicare supplement standardized benefit plan policy or
certificate B, C, D, E, F, or G, or other more comprehensive coverage than the
((replaced)) replacing policy;

(2)
Issue coverage under its standardized plans A, H, I, and J without evidence of
insurability to any resident of this state who is eligible for both medicare
hospital and physician services by reason of age or by reason of disability or
end-stage renal disease, if the medicare supplement policy replaces another
medicare supplement policy or certificate which is the same standardized plan
as the replaced policy; and

(3)
Set rates only on a community-rated basis. Premiums shall be equal for all
policyholders and certificate holders under a standardized medicare supplement
benefit plan form, except that an issuer may develop no more than two rating
pools that distinguish between an insured's eligibility for medicare by reason
of:

(a)
Age; or

(b)
Disability or end-stage renal disease.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---