BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
36.78.070 and 1993 c 65 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
county road administration board shall:

(1)
Establish by rule, standards of good practice for the administration of county
roads and the efficient movement of people and goods over county roads;

(2)
Establish reporting requirements for counties with respect to the standards of
good practice adopted by the board;

(3)
Receive and review reports from counties and reports from its executive
director to determine compliance with legislative directives and the standards
of good practice adopted by the board;

(4)
Advise counties on issues relating to county roads and the safe and efficient
movement of people and goods over county roads and assist counties in
developing uniform and efficient transportation-related information technology
resources;

(5)
Report annually before the fifteenth day of January, and throughout the year as
appropriate, to the state department of transportation and to the chairs of the
legislative transportation committee and the house and senate transportation
committees, and to other entities as appropriate on the status of county road
administration in each county, including one copy to the staff of each of the
committees. The annual report shall contain recommendations for improving
administration of the county road programs;

(6)
Administer the rural arterial program established by chapter 36.79 RCW and the program
funded by the county arterial preservation ((program)) account
established by RCW ((46.68.095)) 46.68.090, as well as any other
programs provided for in law.

Sec.
2. RCW
46.68.090 and 1994 c 225 s 2 and 1994 c 179 s 3 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
All moneys that have accrued or may accrue to the motor vehicle fund from the
motor vehicle fuel tax and special fuel tax shall be first expended for ((the
following)) purposes((:)) enumerated in (a) and (b) of this
subsection. The remaining net tax amount shall be distributed monthly by the
state treasurer in the proportions set forth in (c) through (l) of this
subsection.

(a)
For payment of refunds of motor vehicle fuel tax and special fuel tax that has
been paid and is refundable as provided by law;

(b)
For payment of amounts to be expended pursuant to appropriations for the
administrative expenses of the offices of state treasurer, state auditor, and
the department of licensing of the state of Washington in the administration of
the motor vehicle fuel tax and the special fuel tax, which sums shall be
distributed monthly;

(c)
((From April 1, 1992, through March 31, 1996, for distribution to the
transfer relief account, hereby created in the motor vehicle fund, an amount
not to exceed three hundred twenty-five one-thousandths of one percent;

(d)
For distribution to the rural arterial trust account in the motor vehicle fund,
an amount as provided in RCW 82.36.025(2) and 46.68.095(3);

(e)
For distribution to the urban arterial trust account in the motor vehicle fund,
an amount as provided in RCW 46.68.100(4) and 82.36.025(3);

(f)
For distribution to the transportation improvement account in the motor vehicle
fund, an amount as provided in RCW 46.68.095(1);

(g)
For distribution to the special category C account, hereby created in the motor
vehicle fund, an amount as provided in RCW 46.68.095(2);

(h)
For distribution to the county arterial preservation account, hereby created in
the motor vehicle fund, an amount as provided in RCW 46.68.095(4);

(i)
For distribution to the motor vehicle fund to be allocated to cities and towns
as provided in RCW 46.68.110, an amount as provided in RCW 46.68.095(5);

(j)
For distribution to the motor vehicle fund to be allocated to counties as
provided in RCW 46.68.120, an amount as provided in RCW 46.68.095(6);

(k)
For expenditure for highway purposes of the state as defined in RCW 46.68.130,
an amount as provided in RCW 82.36.025(4) and 46.68.095(7);

(l)
From July 1, 1994, through June 30, 1995, for distribution to the gasohol
exemption holding account, hereby created in the motor vehicle fund, an amount
equal to five and thirty-four one-hundredths of one percent of the amount
available prior to distributions provided under (a) through (k) of this
subsection, to be used only for highway construction;

(m)
For distribution to the small city account, hereby created in the motor vehicle
fund, an amount as provided for in RCW 46.68.095(1), 46.68.100(9), and
82.36.025(3).

(2)
The amount accruing to the motor vehicle fund by virtue of the motor vehicle
fuel tax and the special fuel tax and remaining after payments, distributions,
and expenditures as provided in this section shall, for the purposes of this
chapter, be referred to as the "net tax amount.")) For
distribution to the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 44.387 percent to be
expended for highway purposes of the state as defined in RCW 46.68.130;

(d)
For distribution to the special category C account, hereby created in the motor
vehicle fund, an amount equal to 3.2609 percent to be expended for special
category C projects. Special category C projects are category C projects that,
due to high cost only, will require bond financing to complete construction.

The
following criteria, listed in order of priority, shall be used in determining
which special category C projects have the highest priority:

(i)
Accident experience;

(ii)
Fatal accident experience;

(iii)
Capacity to move people and goods safely and at reasonable speeds without undue
congestion; and

(iv)
Continuity of development of the highway transportation network.

Moneys
deposited in the special category C account in the motor vehicle fund may be
used for payment of debt service on bonds the proceeds of which are used to
finance special category C projects under this subsection (1)(d);

(e)
For distribution to the Puget Sound ferry operations account in the motor
vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.3283 percent;

(f)
For distribution to the Puget Sound capital construction account in the motor
vehicle fund an amount equal to 2.3726 percent;

(g)
For distribution to the urban arterial trust account in the motor vehicle fund
an amount equal to 7.5597 percent;

(h)
For distribution to the transportation improvement account in the motor vehicle
fund an amount equal to 5.6739 percent and expended in accordance with RCW
47.26.086;

(i)
For distribution to the cities and towns from the motor vehicle fund an amount
equal to 10.6961 percent in accordance with RCW 46.68.110;

(j)
For distribution to the counties from the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to
19.2287 percent: (i) Out of which there shall be distributed from time to
time, as directed by the department of transportation, those sums as may be
necessary to carry out the provisions of RCW 47.56.725; and (ii) less any
amounts appropriated to the county road administration board to implement the
provisions of RCW 47.56.725(4), with the balance of such county share to be
distributed monthly as the same accrues for distribution in accordance with RCW
46.68.120;

(k)
For distribution to the county arterial preservation account, hereby created in
the motor vehicle fund an amount equal to 1.9565 percent. These funds shall be
distributed by the county road administration board to counties in proportions
corresponding to the number of paved arterial lane miles in the unincorporated
area of each county and shall be used for improvements to sustain the
structural, safety, and operational integrity of county arterials. The county
road administration board shall adopt reasonable rules and develop policies to
implement this program and to assure that a pavement management system is used;

(l)
For distribution to the rural arterial trust account in the motor vehicle fund
an amount equal to 2.5363 percent and expended in accordance with RCW
36.79.020.

(2)
Nothing in this section or in RCW 46.68.130 may be construed so as to violate
any terms or conditions contained in any highway construction bond issues now
or hereafter authorized by statute and whose payment is by such statute pledged
to be paid from any excise taxes on motor vehicle fuel and special fuels.

Sec.
3. RCW
46.68.110 and 1996 c 94 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Funds
credited to the incorporated cities and towns of the state as set forth in RCW
((46.68.100(1))) 46.68.090(1)(i) shall be subject to deduction
and distribution as follows:

(1)
One and one-half percent of such sums shall be deducted monthly as such sums
are credited and set aside for the use of the department of transportation for
the supervision of work and expenditures of such incorporated cities and towns
on the city and town streets thereof, including the supervision and
administration of federal-aid programs for which the department of
transportation has responsibility: PROVIDED, That any moneys so retained and
not expended shall be credited in the succeeding biennium to the incorporated
cities and towns in proportion to deductions herein made;

(2)
Thirty-three one-hundredths of one percent of such funds shall be deducted
monthly, as such funds accrue, and set aside for the use of the department of
transportation for the purpose of funding the cities' share of the costs of
highway jurisdiction studies and other studies. Any funds so retained and not
expended shall be credited in the succeeding biennium to the cities in
proportion to the deductions made;

(3)
One percent of such funds shall be deducted monthly, as such funds accrue, to
be deposited in the ((city hardship assistance)) urban arterial trust
account, ((hereby created in the motor vehicle fund,)) to implement the
city hardship assistance program, as provided in RCW 47.26.164. However, any
moneys so retained and not required to carry out the program as of ((July 1,
1996, and)) July 1st of each odd-numbered year thereafter, shall be
provided within sixty days to the treasurer and distributed in the manner
prescribed in subsection (((4))) (5) of this section;

(4)
31.86 percent of the fuel tax distributed to the cities and towns in RCW
46.68.090(1)(i) shall be allocated to the incorporated cities and towns in the
manner set forth in subsection (5) of this section and subject to deductions in
subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section, subject to RCW 35.76.050, to be
used exclusively for: The construction, improvement, chip sealing,
seal-coating, and repair for arterial highways and city streets as those terms
are defined in RCW 46.04.030 and 46.04.120; the maintenance of arterial
highways and city streets for those cities with a population of less than fifteen
thousand; or the payment of any municipal indebtedness which may be incurred in
the construction, improvement, chip sealing, seal-coating, and repair of
arterial highways and city streets; and

(5)
The balance remaining to the credit of incorporated cities and towns after such
deduction shall be apportioned monthly as such funds accrue among the several
cities and towns within the state ratably on the basis of the population last
determined by the office of financial management.

Sec.
4. RCW
46.68.130 and 1981 c 342 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The
((net)) tax amount distributed to the state in the manner provided by
RCW ((46.68.100)) 46.68.090, and all moneys accruing to the motor
vehicle fund from any other source, less such sums as are properly appropriated
and reappropriated for expenditure for costs of collection and administration
thereof, shall be expended, subject to proper appropriation and
reappropriation, solely for highway purposes of the state, including the
purposes of RCW 47.30.030. For the purposes of this section, the term
"highway purposes of the state" does not include those expenditures
of the Washington state patrol heretofore appropriated or reappropriated from
the motor vehicle fund. Nothing in this section or in RCW 46.68.090 may be
construed so as to violate terms or conditions contained in highway
construction bond issues authorized by statute as of the effective date of this
section or thereafter and whose payment is, by the statute, pledged to be paid
from excise taxes on motor vehicle fuel and special fuels.

Sec.
5. RCW
47.26.405 and 1977 ex.s. c 317 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
funds required to repay such bonds, or the interest thereon when due shall be
taken from that portion of the motor vehicle fund which results from the
imposition of excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels and which is
distributed to the state under the provisions of RCW ((46.68.100(6) as now
or hereafter amended)) 46.68.090(1)(c) for construction of state
highways in urban areas, and shall never constitute a charge against any
allocations of any other such funds to the state, counties, cities, and towns
unless and until the amount of the motor vehicle fund arising from the excise
taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels and available to the state for
construction of state highways in urban areas proves insufficient to meet the
requirements for bond retirement or interest on any such bonds.

Sec.
6. RCW
47.26.425 and 1994 c 179 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
funds required to repay the first authorization of two hundred million dollars
of bonds authorized by RCW 47.26.420, as amended by section 18, chapter 317,
Laws of 1977 ex. sess. or the interest thereon when due, shall be taken from
that portion of the motor vehicle fund which results from the imposition of
excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels and which is distributed to the
urban arterial trust account in the motor vehicle fund ((and the certain
sums received by the small city account in the motor vehicle fund imposed by))
pursuant to RCW ((82.36.025(3) and 46.68.100(9))) 46.68.090(1)(g),
and shall never constitute a charge against any allocations of any other such
funds in the motor vehicle fund to the state, counties, cities, and towns
unless and until the amount of the motor vehicle fund arising from the excise
tax on motor vehicle and special fuels and distributed to the urban arterial
trust account ((and the small city account)) proves insufficient to meet
the requirements for bond retirement or interest on any such bonds.

Sec.
7. RCW
47.26.4252 and 1995 c 274 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
funds required to repay the authorization of series II bonds authorized by RCW
47.26.420, as reenacted by section 3, chapter 5, Laws of 1979, or the interest
thereon when due, shall first be taken from that portion of the motor vehicle
fund which results from the imposition of excise taxes on motor vehicle and
special fuels imposed by chapters 82.36 and 82.38 RCW and which is distributed
to the urban arterial trust account in the motor vehicle fund ((and the
certain sums received by the small city account in the motor vehicle fund
imposed by)) pursuant to RCW ((82.36.025(3) and 46.68.100(9)))
46.68.090(1)(g), subject, however, to the prior lien of the first
authorization of bonds authorized by RCW 47.26.420, as reenacted by section 3,
chapter 5, Laws of 1979. If the moneys distributed to the urban arterial trust
account ((and the small city account)) shall ever be insufficient to
repay the first authorization bonds together with interest thereon, and the
series II bonds or the interest thereon when due, the amount required to make
such payments on such bonds or interest thereon shall next be taken from that
portion of the motor vehicle fund which results from the imposition of excise
taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels and which is distributed to the state,
counties, cities, and towns pursuant to RCW ((46.68.100 as now existing or
hereafter amended)) 46.68.090. Any payments on such bonds or
interest thereon taken from motor vehicle or special fuel tax revenues which
are distributable to the state, counties, cities, and towns, shall be repaid
from the first moneys distributed to the urban arterial trust account not
required for redemption of the first authorization bonds or series II and
series III bonds or interest on those bond issues.

Sec.
8. RCW
47.26.4254 and 1995 c 274 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any funds required to repay series III bonds authorized by RCW 47.26.420, or
the interest thereon, when due shall first be taken from that portion of the
motor vehicle fund that results from the imposition of excise taxes on motor
vehicle and special fuels imposed by chapters 82.36 and 82.38 RCW and that is
distributed to the urban arterial trust account in the motor vehicle fund ((and
the certain sums received by the small city account in the motor vehicle fund
imposed by)) pursuant to RCW ((82.36.025(3) and 46.68.100(9)))
46.68.090(1)(g), subject, however, to the prior lien of the first
authorization of bonds authorized by RCW 47.26.420. If the moneys so
distributed to the urban arterial trust account ((and the small city account)),
after first being applied to administrative expenses of the transportation
improvement board and to the requirements of bond retirement and payment of
interest on first authorization bonds and series II bonds as provided in RCW
47.26.425 and 47.26.4252, are insufficient to meet the requirements for bond
retirement or interest on any series III bonds, the amount required to make
such payments on series III bonds or interest thereon shall next be taken from
that portion of the motor vehicle fund that results from the imposition of
excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels and that is distributed to the
state, counties, cities, and towns pursuant to RCW ((46.68.100)) 46.68.090,
subject, however, to subsection (2) of this section.

(2)
To the extent that moneys so distributed to the urban arterial trust account ((and
the small city account)) are insufficient to meet the requirements for bond
retirement or interest on any series III bonds, sixty percent of the amount
required to make such payments when due shall first be taken from that portion
of the motor vehicle fund that results from the imposition of excise taxes on
motor vehicle and special fuels and that is distributed to the state. The
remaining forty percent shall first be taken from that portion of the motor
vehicle fund that results from the imposition of excise taxes on motor vehicle
and special fuels and that is distributed to the cities and towns pursuant to
RCW ((46.68.100(1))) 46.68.090(1)(i) and to the counties pursuant
to RCW ((46.68.100(3). Of the counties', cities', and towns' share of any
additional amounts required in the fiscal year ending June 30, 1984, fifteen
percent shall be taken from the counties' distributive share and eighty-five
percent from the cities' and towns' distributive share)) 46.68.090(1)(j).
Of the counties', cities', and towns' share of any additional amounts required
in each fiscal year ((thereafter)), the percentage thereof to be taken
from the counties' distributive share and from the cities' and towns'
distributive share shall correspond to the percentage of funds authorized for
specific county projects and for specific city and town projects, respectively,
from the proceeds of series III bonds, for the period through the first eleven
months of the prior fiscal year as determined by the chairman of the
transportation improvement board and reported to the state finance committee
and the state treasurer not later than the first working day of June.

(3)
Any payments on such bonds or interest thereon taken from motor vehicle or
special fuel tax revenues that are distributable to the state, counties,
cities, and towns shall be repaid from the first moneys distributed to the
urban arterial trust account ((and the small city account)) not required
for redemption of the first authorization bonds, series II bonds, or series III
bonds or interest on these bonds.

Sec.
9. RCW
47.26.505 and 1994 c 179 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
funds required to repay such bonds, or the interest thereon when due, shall be
taken from that portion of the motor vehicle fund which results from the
imposition of excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels and which is
distributed to the transportation improvement account in the motor vehicle fund
((and the sums received by the small city account in the motor vehicle fund))
under RCW ((46.68.095)) 46.68.090, and shall never constitute a
charge against any allocations of any other such funds in the motor vehicle
fund to the state, counties, cities, and towns unless and until the amount of
the motor vehicle fund arising from the excise tax on motor vehicle and special
fuels and distributed to the transportation improvement account proves
insufficient to meet the requirements for bond retirement or interest on any
such bonds.

Sec.
10. RCW
47.30.030 and 1979 ex.s. c 121 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Where
an existing highway severs, or where the right of way of an existing highway
accommodates a trail for pedestrians, equestrians, or bicyclists or where the
separation of motor vehicle traffic from pedestrians, equestrians, or
bicyclists will materially increase the motor vehicle safety, the provision of
facilities for pedestrians, equestrians, or bicyclists which are a part of a
comprehensive trail plan adopted by federal, state, or local governmental
authority having jurisdiction over the trail is hereby authorized. The
department of transportation, or the county or city having jurisdiction over
the highway, road, or street, or facility is further authorized to expend
reasonable amounts out of the funds made available to them, according to the
provisions of RCW ((46.68.100)) 46.68.090, as necessary for the
planning, accommodation, establishment, and maintenance of such facilities.

Sec.
11. RCW
47.30.050 and 1979 ex.s. c 121 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The amount expended by a city, town, or county as authorized by RCW 47.30.030((,
as now or hereafter amended,)) shall never in any one fiscal year be less
than ((one-half of one)) 0.42 percent of the total amount of
funds received from the motor vehicle fund according to ((the provisions of))
RCW ((46.68.100: PROVIDED, That)) 46.68.090. However, this
section does not apply to a city or town in any year in which the ((one-half
of one)) 0.42 percent equals five hundred dollars or less, or to a
county in any year in which the ((one-half of one)) 0.42 percent equals
three thousand dollars or less((: PROVIDED FURTHER, That)). Also,
a city, town, or county in lieu of expending the funds each year may credit the
funds to a financial reserve or special fund, to be held for not more than ten
years, and to be expended for the purposes required or permitted by RCW
47.30.030.

(2)
In each fiscal year the department of transportation shall expend, as a
minimum, for the purposes mentioned in RCW 47.30.030((, as now or hereafter
amended,)) a sum equal to three-tenths of one percent of all funds, both
state and federal, expended for the construction of state highways in such
year, or in order to more efficiently program trail improvements the department
may defer any part of such minimum trail or path expenditures for a fiscal year
for a period not to exceed four years after the end of such fiscal year. Any
fiscal year in which the department expends for trail or path purposes more
than the minimum sum required by this subsection, the amount of such excess
expenditure shall constitute a credit which may be carried forward and applied
to the minimum trail and path expenditure requirements for any of the ensuing
four fiscal years.

(3)
The department of transportation, a city, or a county in computing the amount
expended for trails or paths under their respective jurisdictions may include
the cost of improvements consistent with a comprehensive plan or master plan
for bicycle trails or paths adopted by a state or local governmental authority
either prior to such construction or prior to January 1, 1980.

Sec.
12. RCW
47.56.725 and 1991 c 310 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department is hereby authorized to enter into a continuing agreement with
Pierce, Skagit, and Whatcom counties pursuant to which the department shall,
from time to time, direct the distribution to each of the counties the amounts
authorized in subsection (2) of this section in accordance with RCW ((46.68.100))
46.68.090.

(2)
The department is authorized to include in each agreement a provision for the
distribution of funds to each county to reimburse the county for fifty percent
of the deficit incurred during each previous fiscal year in the operation and
maintenance of the ferry system owned and operated by the county. The total
amount to be reimbursed to Pierce, Skagit, and Whatcom counties collectively
shall not exceed one million dollars in any biennium. Each county agreement
shall contain a requirement that the county shall maintain tolls on its ferries
at least equal to tolls in place on January 1, 1990.

(3)
The annual fiscal year operating and maintenance deficit, if any, shall be
determined by Pierce, Skagit, and Whatcom counties subject to review and
approval of the department. The annual fiscal year operating and maintenance
deficit is defined as the total of operations and maintenance expenditures less
the sum of ferry toll revenues and that portion of fuel tax revenue
distributions which are attributable to the county ferry as determined by the
department. Distribution of the amounts authorized by subsection (2) of this
section by the state treasurer shall be directed by the department upon the
receipt of properly executed vouchers from each county.

(4)
The county road administration board may evaluate requests by Pierce, Skagit,
Wahkiakum, and Whatcom counties for county ferry capital improvement funds.
The board shall evaluate the requests and, if approved by a majority of the
board, submit the requests to the legislature for funding out of the amounts
available under RCW ((46.68.100(3))) 46.68.090(1)(j). Any county
making a request under this subsection shall first seek funding through the
public works trust fund, or any other available revenue source, where
appropriate.

Sec.
13. RCW
47.56.750 and 1995 c 274 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

There
is hereby created in the highway bond retirement fund in the state treasury a
special account to be known as the Columbia river toll bridge account into
which shall be deposited any capitalized interest from the proceeds of the
bonds, and at least monthly all of the tolls and other revenues received from
the operation of the toll bridge and from any interest which may be earned from
the deposit or investment of these revenues after the payment of costs of
operation, maintenance, management, and necessary repairs of the facility. The
principal of and interest on the bonds shall be paid first from money deposited
in the Columbia river toll bridge account in the highway bond retirement fund,
and then, to the extent that money deposited in that account is insufficient to
make any such payment when due, from the state excise taxes on motor vehicle
and special fuels deposited in the highway bond retirement fund. There is
hereby pledged the proceeds of state excise taxes on motor vehicle and special
fuels imposed under chapters 82.36 and 82.38 RCW to pay the bonds and interest
thereon, and the legislature hereby agrees to continue to impose the same
excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels in amounts sufficient to pay,
when due, the principal and interest on the bonds if the money deposited in the
Columbia river toll bridge account of the highway bond retirement fund is
insufficient to make such payments. Not less than fifteen days prior to the
date any interest or principal and interest payments are due, the state finance
committee shall certify to the state treasurer such amount of additional moneys
as may be required for debt service, and the treasurer shall thereupon transfer
from the motor vehicle fund such amount from the proceeds of such excise taxes
into the highway bond retirement fund. Any proceeds of such excise taxes
required for these purposes shall first be taken from that portion of the motor
vehicle fund which results from the imposition of the excise taxes on motor
vehicle and special fuels and which is distributed to the state. If the proceeds
from the excise taxes distributed to the state are ever insufficient to meet
the required payments on principal or interest on the bonds when due, the
amount required to make the payments on the principal or interest shall next be
taken from that portion of the motor vehicle fund which results from the
imposition of excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels and which is
distributed to the state, counties, cities, and towns pursuant to RCW ((46.68.100
as now existing or hereafter amended)) 46.68.090. Any payments of
the principal or interest taken from the motor vehicle or special fuel tax
revenues which are distributable to the counties, cities, and towns shall be
repaid from the first moneys distributed to the state not required for
redemption of the bonds or interest thereon. The legislature covenants and
pledges that it shall at all times provide sufficient revenues from the
imposition of such excise taxes to pay the principal and interest due on the
bonds.

Sec.
14. RCW
47.56.771 and 1995 c 274 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The refunding bonds authorized under RCW 47.56.770 shall be general obligation
bonds of the state of Washington and shall be issued in a total principal
amount not to exceed fifteen million dollars. The exact amount of refunding
bonds to be issued shall be determined by the state finance committee after
calculating the amount of money deposited with the trustee for the bonds to be
refunded which can be used to redeem or defease outstanding toll bridge
authority, ferry, and Hood Canal bridge revenue bonds after the setting aside
of sufficient money from that fund to pay the first interest installment on the
refunding bonds. The refunding bonds shall be serial in form maturing at such
time, in such amounts, having such denomination or denominations, redemption
privileges, and having such terms and conditions as determined by the state
finance committee. The last maturity date of the refunding bonds shall not be
later than January 1, 2002.

(2)
The refunding bonds shall be signed by the governor and the state treasurer
under the seal of the state, which signatures shall be made manually or in
printed facsimile. The bonds shall be registered in the name of the owner in
accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW. The refunding bonds shall distinctly state
that they are a general obligation of the state of Washington, shall pledge the
full faith and credit of the state, and shall contain an unconditional promise
to pay the principal thereof and the interest thereon when due. The refunding
bonds shall be fully negotiable instruments.

(3)
The principal and interest on the refunding bonds shall be first payable in the
manner provided in this section from the proceeds of state excise taxes on
motor vehicle and special fuels imposed by chapters 82.36 and 82.38 RCW.

(4)
The principal of and interest on the refunding bonds shall be paid first from
the state excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels deposited in the
ferry bond retirement fund. There is hereby pledged the proceeds of state
excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels imposed under chapters 82.36
and 82.38 RCW to pay the refunding bonds and interest thereon, and the
legislature hereby agrees to continue to impose the same excise taxes on motor
vehicle and special fuels in amounts sufficient to pay, when due, the principal
and interest on the refunding bonds. Not less than fifteen days prior to the
date any interest or principal and interest payments are due, the state finance
committee shall certify to the state treasurer such amount of additional money
as may be required for debt service, and the treasurer shall thereupon transfer
from the motor vehicle fund such amount from the proceeds of such excise taxes
into the ferry bond retirement fund. Any proceeds of such excise taxes
required for these purposes shall first be taken from that portion of the motor
vehicle fund which results from the imposition of the excise taxes on motor
vehicle and special fuels and which is distributed to the Puget Sound capital
construction account. If the proceeds from excise taxes distributed to the
state are ever insufficient to meet the required payments on principal or
interest on the refunding bonds when due, the amount required to make the
payments on the principal or interest shall next be taken from that portion of
the motor vehicle fund which results from the imposition of excise taxes on
motor vehicle and special fuels and which is distributed to the state,
counties, cities, and towns pursuant to RCW ((46.68.100 as now existing or
hereafter amended)) 46.68.090. Any payments of the principal or
interest taken from the motor vehicle or special fuel tax revenues which are
distributable to the counties, cities, and towns shall be repaid from the first
money distributed to the state not required for redemption of the refunding
bonds or interest thereon. The legislature covenants that it shall at all
times provide sufficient revenues from the imposition of such excise taxes to
pay the principal and interest due on the refunding bonds.

Sec.
15. RCW
47.60.420 and 1990 c 42 s 407 are each amended to read as follows:

To
the extent that all revenues from the Washington state ferry system available
therefor are insufficient to provide for the payment of principal and interest
on the bonds authorized and issued under RCW 47.60.400 through ((47.60.470))
47.60.450 and for sinking fund requirements established with respect
thereto and for payment into such reserves as the department has established
with respect to the securing of the bonds, there is imposed a first and prior
charge against the Puget Sound capital construction account of the motor
vehicle fund created by RCW 47.60.505 and, to the extent required, against all
revenues required by RCW ((46.68.100)) 46.68.090 to be deposited
in the Puget Sound capital construction account.

To
the extent that the revenues from the Washington state ferry system available
therefor are insufficient to meet required payments of principal and interest
on bonds, sinking fund requirements, and payments into reserves, the department
shall use moneys in the Puget Sound capital construction account for such
purpose.

Sec.
16. RCW
82.36.025 and 1994 c 179 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

((The
motor vehicle fuel tax rate shall be computed as the sum of the tax rate
provided in subsection (1) of this section and the additional tax rates
provided in subsections (2) through (5) of this section.

(1))) A
motor vehicle fuel tax rate of ((seventeen)) twenty-three cents
per gallon shall apply to the sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel.

(((2)
An additional motor vehicle fuel tax rate of one-third cent per gallon shall
apply to the sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel, and the proceeds
from this additional tax rate, reduced by an amount equal to the sum of the
payments under RCW 46.68.090(1) (a), (b), and (c) multiplied by the additional
tax rate prescribed by this subsection divided by the motor vehicle fuel tax
rate provided in this section, shall be deposited in the rural arterial trust
account in the motor vehicle fund for expenditures under RCW 36.79.020.

(3)
An additional motor vehicle fuel tax rate of one-third cent per gallon shall
apply to the sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel, and the proceeds
from this additional tax rate, reduced by an amount equal to the sum of the
payments under RCW 46.68.090(1) (a), (b), and (c) multiplied by the additional
tax rate prescribed by this subsection divided by the motor vehicle fuel tax
rate provided in this section, shall be deposited in the urban arterial trust
account in the motor vehicle fund. After June 30, 1995, ninety-five percent of
this revenue shall be deposited in the urban arterial trust account in the
motor vehicle fund and five percent shall be deposited in the small city
account in the motor vehicle fund.

(4)
An additional motor vehicle fuel tax rate of one-third cent per gallon shall be
applied to the sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel, and the
proceeds from this additional tax rate, reduced by an amount equal to the sum
of the payments under RCW 46.68.090(1) (a), (b), and (c) multiplied by the
additional tax rate prescribed by this subsection divided by the motor vehicle
fuel tax rate provided in this section, shall be deposited in the motor vehicle
fund to be expended for highway purposes of the state as defined in RCW
46.68.130.

(5)
An additional motor vehicle fuel tax rate of four cents per gallon from April
1, 1990, through March 31, 1991, and five cents per gallon from April 1, 1991,
applies to the sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel. The proceeds
from the additional tax rate under this subsection, reduced by an amount equal
to the sum of the payments under RCW 46.68.090(1) (a), (b), and (c) multiplied
by the additional tax rate prescribed by this subsection divided by the motor
fuel tax rate provided in this section, shall be deposited in the motor vehicle
fund and shall be distributed by the state treasurer according to RCW
46.68.095.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
46.68.095 (Distribution of additional state-wide taxes) and 1994
c 179 s 4 & 1990 c 42 s 103;

(2) RCW
46.68.100 (Allocation of net tax amount in motor vehicle fund)
and 1994 c 179 s 5, 1991 c 310 s 2, 1986 c 66 s 1, 1984 c 7 s 73, 1977 ex.s. c
317 s 9, 1977 c 51 s 1, 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 57 s 1, 1973 1st ex.s. c 124 s 1,
1972 ex.s. c 24 s 2, 1970 ex.s. c 85 s 4, 1967 ex.s. c 145 s 79, 1967 ex.s. c
83 s 8, 1961 ex.s. c 7 s 6, & 1961 c 12 s 46.68.100;

(3) RCW
46.68.115 (Allocation and use of amounts distributed to cities
and towns) and 1987 c 234 s 1, 1983 c 43 s 1, & 1977 ex.s. c 317 s 10;

(4) RCW
46.68.150 (Construction and improvements in urban
areas--Expenditure of motor vehicle fuel taxes and bond proceeds) and 1984 c 7
s 74, 1977 ex.s. c 317 s 11, & 1967 ex.s. c 83 s 9;

(5) RCW
47.26.060 (Apportionment of funds to regions--Manner and
basis--Biennial adjustment) and 1981 c 315 s 1 & 1967 ex.s. c 83 s 12;

(6) RCW
47.26.070 (Apportioned funds budgeted and expended for projects
in urban areas--Priority programming--Long-range objectives) and 1984 c 7 s 154
& 1967 ex.s. c 83 s 13; and

(7) RCW
47.26.410 (Expenditures from fuel taxes and bond proceeds for
urban state highways in excess of amount apportionable to a region authorized)
and 1984 c 7 s 162 & 1967 ex.s. c 83 s 44.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect July 1, 1999.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19. This
act is null and void if House Bill No. 1588, or similar legislation merging the
small city account and the city hardship assistance account into the urban arterial
trust account, does not become law by July 1, 1999.

---
END ---