BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
66.44.100 and 1981 1st ex.s. c 5 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

Except as permitted by this title, no person shall open the package
containing liquor or consume liquor in a public place. ((Every person who
violates)) A violation of any provision of this section ((shall
be guilty of)) is a ((misdemeanor, and on conviction therefor
shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars)) class 1 civil
infraction with a maximum penalty of two hundred fifty dollars, not including
statutory assessments, as provided in RCW 7.80.120.

---
END ---