BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
66.12.070 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 51 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Where a medicinal preparation contains liquor as one of the necessary
ingredients thereof, and also contains sufficient medication to prevent its use
as an alcoholic beverage, nothing in this title shall apply to or prevent its
composition or sale by a druggist when compounded from liquor purchased by the
druggist under a special permit held by him, nor apply to or prevent the
purchase or consumption of the preparation by any person for strictly medicinal
purposes.

(2)
Where a toilet or culinary preparation, that is to say, any perfume, lotion, or
flavoring extract or essence, or dietary supplement as defined by the
federal food and drug administration, contains liquor and also contains
sufficient ingredient or medication to prevent its use as a beverage, nothing
in this title shall apply to or prevent the sale or purchase of that
preparation by any druggist or other person who manufactures or deals in the
preparation, nor apply to or prevent the purchase or consumption of the
preparation by any person who purchases or consumes it for any toilet or
culinary purpose.

(3)
In order to determine whether any particular medicinal, toilet, dietary supplement,
or culinary preparation referred to in this section contains sufficient
ingredient or medication to prevent its use as an alcoholic beverage, the board
may cause a sample of the preparation, purchased or obtained from any person
whomsoever, to be analyzed by an analyst appointed or designated by the board;
and if it appears from a certificate signed by the analyst that he finds the
sample so analyzed by him did not contain sufficient ingredient or medication
to prevent its use as an alcoholic beverage, the certificate shall be
conclusive evidence that the preparation, the sample of which was so analyzed,
is not a preparation the sale or purchase of which is permitted by this
section.

(4) Dietary supplements that contain more than one-half of one percent
alcohol which are prepared and sold under this section shall be clearly labeled
and the ingredients listed on the label in accordance with the provisions of
the federal food, drug, and cosmetics act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 321) as now or
hereafter amended.

---
END ---