BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 19.27 RCW to read as follows:

The building code council shall adopt rules requiring installation
of permanent anchors for worker fall protection on all new commercial and residential
construction and when a roof is replaced on existing commercial and residential
structures. The council shall consider state department of labor and
industries' rules on fall restraint and fall arrest systems when determining
the design and placement of the permanent anchors.

---
END ---