BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. This
act may be known and cited as the "Deadly Highway Act of 1999."

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The legislature finds that:

(a)
The death toll on two-lane, undivided highways in Washington state is too
high. Many highways have high-risk sections where as many as two or more
deadly head-on collisions occur each year.

(b)
The past measures used to combat these deaths have proven to have little
effect. These past measures include installation of "rumble strips"
and the widening of these roads, both of which have failed to lower the number
of deadly collisions.

(c)
Concrete barriers are the most effective head-on collision deterrent.

(d)
This means of prevention is a feasible and effective option, yet it is not in
extensive use on two-lane highways at this time.

(e)
The funding for this measure is now available through Referendum Bill No. 49.

(f)
The reduction of head-on collisions after installation of the concrete barriers
will eliminate the estimated two thousand five hundred dollar cost of clearing
the roads and handling victims after each accident.

(2)
The purposes of this act are to:

(a)
Eliminate the risk of head-on collisions on the sections of highways that have
proved to be exceedingly dangerous in the past; and

(b)
Reduce the amount of money spent on accident cleanup on these sections of
highway.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
To eliminate head-on collisions on the high-risk sections of highways in
Washington state, the department of transportation shall install concrete
barriers as accident deterrents.

(2)
Exceptions to this requirement are:

(a)
Multilane highways that already have natural medians in place; and

(b)
The low-risk sections of these highways.

(3)
As used in this section:

(a)
"Dangerous highway" means all highways that have high-risk sections.

(b)
"High-risk section" means any portion of a two-lane, undivided
highway on which there are two or more head-on collisions within a six-mile
distance per year.

(c) "Low-risk" means all six-mile portions of a highway
on which fewer than two head-on collisions occur each year.

---
END ---