BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 47.79 RCW to read as follows:

Subject
to appropriation, the department is authorized to acquire by purchase, lease,
condemnation, gift, devise, bequest, grant, or exchange, title to or any
interests or rights in real property adjacent to or used in association with
state intercity passenger rail service which may include, but are not limited
to, depots, platforms, parking areas, and maintenance facilities. The
department is authorized to contract with a public or private entity for the
operation, maintenance, and/or management of these facilities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 47.79 RCW to read as follows:

Subject
to appropriation, the department is authorized to accept and expend or use
gifts, grants, and donations for the benefit of any depot, platform, parking
area, maintenance facility, or other associated rail facility. However, such
an expenditure shall be for the public benefit of the state's intercity
passenger rail service.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 47.79 RCW to read as follows:

Subject to appropriation, the department is authorized to exercise
all the powers and perform all the duties necessary, convenient, or incidental
to the planning, designing, constructing, improving, repairing, operating, and
maintaining real property adjacent to or used in association with the state
intercity passenger rail service which may include, but are not limited to,
depots, platforms, parking areas, and maintenance facilities, even if such real
property is owned or controlled by another entity. However, any expenditure of
public funds for these purposes shall be directly related to public benefit of
the state's intercity passenger rail service. The department shall enter into
a written contract with the affected real property owners to secure the
public's investment.

---
END ---