BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.20.091 and 1998 c 41 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Every application for an instruction permit or for an original driver's license
shall be made upon a form prescribed and furnished by the department which
shall be sworn to and signed by the applicant before a person authorized to
administer oaths. An applicant making a false statement under this subsection
is guilty of false swearing, a gross misdemeanor, under RCW 9A.72.040. ((Every))
An application for an instruction permit ((containing)) to be
issued with a photograph ((shall)) must be accompanied by a
fee of five dollars. An application for an instruction permit to be issued
without a photograph must be accompanied by a fee of four dollars. The
department shall forthwith transmit the fees collected for instruction permits
and temporary drivers' permits to the state treasurer.

(2)
Every such application shall state the name of record, date of birth, sex, and
Washington residence address of the applicant, and briefly describe the
applicant, and shall state whether the applicant has theretofore been licensed
as a driver or chauffeur, and, if so, when and by what state or country, and
whether any such license has ever been suspended or revoked, or whether an
application has ever been refused, and, if so, the date of and reason for such
suspension, revocation, or refusal, and shall state such additional information
as the department shall require, including a statement that identifying
documentation presented by the applicant is valid.

(3)
Whenever application is received from a person previously licensed in another
jurisdiction, the department shall request a copy of such driver's record from
such other jurisdiction. When received, the driving record shall become a part
of the driver's record in this state.

(4)
Whenever the department receives request for a driving record from another
licensing jurisdiction, the record shall be forwarded without charge if the
other licensing jurisdiction extends the same privilege to the state of
Washington. Otherwise there shall be a reasonable charge for transmittal of
the record, the amount to be fixed by the director of the department.

Sec.
2. RCW
46.20.289 and 1995 c 219 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department shall suspend all driving privileges of a person when the department
receives notice from a court under RCW 46.63.070(5), 46.63.110(5), or
46.64.025 that the person has failed to respond to a notice of traffic
infraction, failed to appear at a requested hearing, violated a written promise
to appear in court, or has failed to comply with the terms of a notice of
traffic infraction or citation, other than for a notice of a violation of RCW
46.55.105 or a standing, stopping, or parking violation. A suspension under
this section takes effect thirty days after the date the department mails
notice of the suspension, and remains in effect until the department has
received a certificate from the court showing that the case has been
adjudicated, and until the person meets the requirements of RCW 46.20.311. A
suspension under this section does not take effect if, prior to the effective
date of the suspension, the department receives a certificate from the court
showing that the case has been adjudicated.

Sec.
3. RCW
46.20.308 and 1998 c 213 s 1, 1998 c 209 s 1, 1998 c 207 s 7, and 1998 c 41 s 4
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any person who operates a motor vehicle within this state is deemed to have
given consent, subject to the provisions of RCW 46.61.506, to a test or tests
of his or her breath or blood for the purpose of determining the alcohol
concentration or presence of any drug in his or her breath or blood if arrested
for any offense where, at the time of the arrest, the arresting officer has
reasonable grounds to believe the person had been driving or was in actual
physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug or was in violation of RCW 46.61.503.

(2)
The test or tests of breath shall be administered at the direction of a law
enforcement officer having reasonable grounds to believe the person to have
been driving or in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or the person to
have been driving or in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while having
alcohol in a concentration in violation of RCW 46.61.503 in his or her system
and being under the age of twenty-one. However, in those instances where the
person is incapable due to physical injury, physical incapacity, or other
physical limitation, of providing a breath sample or where the person is being
treated in a hospital, clinic, doctor's office, emergency medical vehicle,
ambulance, or other similar facility in which a breath testing instrument is
not present or where the officer has reasonable grounds to believe that the
person is under the influence of a drug, a blood test shall be administered by
a qualified person as provided in RCW 46.61.506(4). The officer shall inform the
person of his or her right to refuse the breath or blood test, and of his or
her right to have additional tests administered by any qualified person of his
or her choosing as provided in RCW 46.61.506. The officer shall warn the
driver that:

(a)
His or her license, permit, or privilege to drive will be revoked or denied if
he or she refuses to submit to the test;

(b)
His or her license, permit, or privilege to drive will be suspended, revoked,
or denied if the test is administered and the test indicates the alcohol
concentration of the person's breath or blood is 0.08 or more, in the case of a
person age twenty-one or over, or in violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.503, or
46.61.504 in the case of a person under age twenty-one; and

(c)
His or her refusal to take the test may be used in a criminal trial.

(3)
Except as provided in this section, the test administered shall be of the
breath only. If an individual is unconscious or is under arrest for the crime
of vehicular homicide as provided in RCW 46.61.520 or vehicular assault as
provided in RCW 46.61.522, or if an individual is under arrest for the crime of
driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs as provided
in RCW 46.61.502, which arrest results from an accident in which there has been
serious bodily injury to another person, a breath or blood test may be
administered without the consent of the individual so arrested.

(4)
Any person who is dead, unconscious, or who is otherwise in a condition
rendering him or her incapable of refusal, shall be deemed not to have
withdrawn the consent provided by subsection (1) of this section and the test
or tests may be administered, subject to the provisions of RCW 46.61.506, and
the person shall be deemed to have received the warnings required under
subsection (2) of this section.

(5)
If, following his or her arrest and receipt of warnings under subsection (2) of
this section, the person arrested refuses upon the request of a law enforcement
officer to submit to a test or tests of his or her breath or blood, no test
shall be given except as authorized under subsection (3) or (4) of this
section.

(6)
If, after arrest and after the other applicable conditions and requirements of
this section have been satisfied, a test or tests of the person's blood or
breath is administered and the test results indicate that the alcohol
concentration of the person's breath or blood is 0.08 or more if the person is
age twenty-one or over, or is in violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.503, or 46.61.504
if the person is under the age of twenty-one, or the person refuses to submit
to a test, the arresting officer or other law enforcement officer at whose
direction any test has been given, or the department, where applicable, if the
arrest results in a test of the person's blood, shall:

(a)
Serve notice in writing on the person on behalf of the department of its
intention to suspend, revoke, or deny the person's license, permit, or
privilege to drive as required by subsection (7) of this section;

(b)
Serve notice in writing on the person on behalf of the department of his or her
right to a hearing, specifying the steps he or she must take to obtain a
hearing as provided by subsection (8) of this section;

(c)
Mark the person's Washington state driver's license or permit to drive, if any,
in a manner authorized by the department;

(d)
Serve notice in writing that the marked license or permit, if any, is a
temporary license that is valid for sixty days from the date of arrest or from
the date notice has been given in the event notice is given by the department
following a blood test, or until the suspension, revocation, or denial of the
person's license, permit, or privilege to drive is sustained at a hearing
pursuant to subsection (8) of this section, whichever occurs first. No
temporary license is valid to any greater degree than the license or permit
that it replaces; and

(e)
Immediately notify the department of the arrest and transmit to the department
within seventy-two hours, except as delayed as the result of a blood test, a
sworn report or report under a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 that
states:

(i)
That the officer had reasonable grounds to believe the arrested person had been
driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs, or both, or was
under the age of twenty-one years and had been driving or was in actual
physical control of a motor vehicle while having an alcohol concentration in
violation of RCW 46.61.503;

(ii)
That after receipt of the warnings required by subsection (2) of this section
the person refused to submit to a test of his or her blood or breath, or a test
was administered and the results indicated that the alcohol concentration of
the person's breath or blood was 0.08 or more if the person is age twenty-one
or over, or was in violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.503, or 46.61.504 if the
person is under the age of twenty-one; and

(iii)
Any other information that the director may require by rule.

(7)
The department of licensing, upon the receipt of a sworn report or report under
a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 under subsection (6)(e) of this
section, shall suspend, revoke, or deny the person's license, permit, or
privilege to drive or any nonresident operating privilege, as provided in RCW
46.20.3101, such suspension, revocation, or denial to be effective beginning
sixty days from the date of arrest or from the date notice has been given in
the event notice is given by the department following a blood test, or when
sustained at a hearing pursuant to subsection (8) of this section, whichever
occurs first.

(8)
A person receiving notification under subsection (6)(b) of this section may,
within thirty days after the notice has been given, request in writing a formal
hearing before the department. The person shall pay a fee of one hundred
dollars as part of the request. If the request is mailed, it must be
postmarked within thirty days after receipt of the notification. Upon timely
receipt of such a request for a formal hearing, including receipt of the
required one hundred dollar fee, the department shall afford the person an
opportunity for a hearing. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
hearing is subject to and shall be scheduled and conducted in accordance with
RCW 46.20.329 and 46.20.332. The hearing shall be conducted in the county of
the arrest, except that all or part of the hearing may, at the discretion of
the department, be conducted by telephone or other electronic means. The
hearing shall be held within sixty days following the arrest or following the
date notice has been given in the event notice is given by the department
following a blood test, unless otherwise agreed to by the department and the
person, in which case the action by the department shall be stayed, and any
valid temporary license marked under subsection (6)(c) of this section
extended, if the person is otherwise eligible for licensing. For the purposes
of this section, the scope of the hearing shall cover the issues of whether a
law enforcement officer had reasonable grounds to believe the person had been
driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or had been
driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state
while having alcohol in his or her system in a concentration in violation of
RCW 46.61.503 and was under the age of twenty-one, whether the person was placed
under arrest, and (a) whether the person refused to submit to the test or tests
upon request of the officer after having been informed that such refusal would
result in the revocation of the person's license, permit, or privilege to
drive, or (b) if a test or tests were administered, whether the applicable
requirements of this section were satisfied before the administration of the
test or tests, whether the person submitted to the test or tests, or whether a
test was administered without express consent as permitted under this section,
and whether the test or tests indicated that the alcohol concentration of the
person's breath or blood was 0.08 or more if the person was age twenty-one or
over at the time of the arrest, or was in violation of RCW 46.61.502,
46.61.503, or 46.61.504 if the person was under the age of twenty-one at the
time of the arrest. The sworn report or report under a declaration authorized
by RCW 9A.72.085 submitted by a law enforcement officer is prima facie evidence
that the officer had reasonable grounds to believe the person had been driving
or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs, or both, or the person had
been driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this
state while having alcohol in his or her system in a concentration in violation
of RCW 46.61.503 and was under the age of twenty-one and that the officer
complied with the requirements of this section.

A
hearing officer shall conduct the hearing, may issue subpoenas for the
attendance of witnesses and the production of documents, and shall administer
oaths to witnesses. The hearing officer shall not issue a subpoena for the
attendance of a witness at the request of the person unless the request is
accompanied by the fee required by RCW 5.56.010 for a witness in district
court. The sworn report or report under a declaration authorized by RCW
9A.72.085 of the law enforcement officer and any other evidence accompanying
the report shall be admissible without further evidentiary foundation and the
certifications authorized by the criminal rules for courts of limited
jurisdiction shall be admissible without further evidentiary foundation. The
person may be represented by counsel, may question witnesses, may present
evidence, and may testify. The department shall order that the suspension,
revocation, or denial either be rescinded or sustained.

(9)
If the suspension, revocation, or denial is sustained after such a hearing, the
person whose license, privilege, or permit is suspended, revoked, or denied has
the right to file a petition in the superior court of the county of arrest to
review the final order of revocation by the department in the same manner as an
appeal from a decision of a court of limited jurisdiction. Notice of appeal
must be filed within thirty days after the date the final order is served or
the right to appeal is waived. Notwithstanding RCW 46.20.334, RALJ 1.1, or
other statutes or rules referencing de novo review, the appeal shall be limited
to a review of the record of the administrative hearing. The appellant must
pay the costs associated with obtaining the record of the hearing before the
hearing officer. The filing of the appeal does not stay the effective date of
the suspension, revocation, or denial. A petition filed under this subsection
must include the petitioner's grounds for requesting review. Upon granting
petitioner's request for review, the court shall review the department's final
order of suspension, revocation, or denial as expeditiously as possible. The
review must be limited to a determination of whether the department has
committed any errors of law. The superior court shall accept those factual
determinations supported by substantial evidence in the record: (a) That were
expressly made by the department; or (b) that may reasonably be inferred from
the final order of the department. The superior court may reverse, affirm, or
modify the decision of the department or remand the case back to the department
for further proceedings. The decision of the superior court must be in writing
and filed in the clerk's office with the other papers in the case. The court
shall state the reasons for the decision. If judicial relief is sought for a
stay or other temporary remedy from the department's action, the court shall
not grant such relief unless the court finds that the appellant is likely to
prevail in the appeal and that without a stay the appellant will suffer
irreparable injury. If the court stays the suspension, revocation, or denial
it may impose conditions on such stay.

(10)
If a person whose driver's license, permit, or privilege to drive has been or
will be suspended, revoked, or denied under subsection (7) of this section,
other than as a result of a breath or blood test refusal, and who has not
committed an offense ((within the last five years)) for which he or she
was granted a deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW, petitions a court
for a deferred prosecution on criminal charges arising out of the arrest for
which action has been or will be taken under subsection (7) of this section,
the court may direct the department to stay any actual or proposed suspension,
revocation, or denial for at least forty-five days but not more than ninety
days. If the court stays the suspension, revocation, or denial, it may impose
conditions on such stay. If the person is otherwise eligible for licensing,
the department shall issue a temporary license, or extend any valid temporary
license marked under subsection (6) of this section, for the period of the
stay. If a deferred prosecution treatment plan is not recommended in the
report made under RCW 10.05.050, or if treatment is rejected by the court, or
if the person declines to accept an offered treatment plan, or if the person
violates any condition imposed by the court, then the court shall immediately
direct the department to cancel the stay and any temporary marked license or
extension of a temporary license issued under this subsection.

A
suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this section, other than as a
result of a breath or blood test refusal, shall be stayed if the person is
accepted for deferred prosecution as provided in chapter 10.05 RCW for the
incident upon which the suspension, revocation, or denial is based. If the
deferred prosecution is terminated, the stay shall be lifted and the
suspension, revocation, or denial reinstated. If the deferred prosecution is
completed, the stay shall be lifted and the suspension, revocation, or denial
canceled.

(11)
When it has been finally determined under the procedures of this section that a
nonresident's privilege to operate a motor vehicle in this state has been
suspended, revoked, or denied, the department shall give information in writing
of the action taken to the motor vehicle administrator of the state of the
person's residence and of any state in which he or she has a license.

Sec.
4. RCW
46.20.342 and 1993 c 501 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
It is unlawful for any person to drive a motor vehicle in this state while that
person is in a suspended or revoked status or when his or her privilege to
drive is suspended or revoked in this or any other state. Any person who has a
valid Washington driver's license is not guilty of a violation of this section.

(a)
A person found to be an habitual offender under chapter 46.65 RCW, who violates
this section while an order of revocation issued under chapter 46.65 RCW
prohibiting such operation is in effect, is guilty of driving while license
suspended or revoked in the first degree, a gross misdemeanor. Upon the first
such conviction, the person shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than
ten days. Upon the second conviction, the person shall be punished by
imprisonment for not less than ninety days. Upon the third or subsequent
conviction, the person shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one
hundred eighty days. If the person is also convicted of the offense defined in
RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, when both convictions arise from the same event,
the minimum sentence of confinement shall be not less than ninety days. The
minimum sentence of confinement required shall not be suspended or deferred. A
conviction under this subsection does not prevent a person from petitioning for
reinstatement as provided by RCW 46.65.080.

(b)
A person who violates this section while an order of suspension or revocation
prohibiting such operation is in effect and while the person is not eligible to
reinstate his or her driver's license or driving privilege, other than for a
suspension for the reasons described in (c) of this subsection, is guilty of
driving while license suspended or revoked in the second degree, a gross misdemeanor.
This subsection applies when a person's driver's license or driving privilege
has been suspended or revoked by reason of:

(i)
A conviction of a felony in the commission of which a motor vehicle was used;

(ii)
A previous conviction under this section;

(iii)
A notice received by the department from a court or diversion unit as provided
by RCW 46.20.265, relating to a minor who has committed, or who has entered a
diversion unit concerning an offense relating to alcohol, legend drugs,
controlled substances, or imitation controlled substances;

(iv)
A conviction of RCW 46.20.410, relating to the violation of restrictions of an
occupational driver's license;

(v)
A conviction of RCW 46.20.420, relating to the operation of a motor vehicle
with a suspended or revoked license;

(vi)
A conviction of RCW 46.52.020, relating to duty in case of injury to or death
of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;

(vii)
A conviction of RCW 46.61.024, relating to attempting to elude pursuing police
vehicles;

(viii)
A conviction of RCW 46.61.500, relating to reckless driving;

(ix)
A conviction of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, relating to a person under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;

(x)
A conviction of RCW 46.61.520, relating to vehicular homicide;

(xi)
A conviction of RCW 46.61.522, relating to vehicular assault;

(xii)
A conviction of RCW 46.61.527(4), relating to reckless endangerment of
roadway workers;

(xiii)
A conviction of RCW 46.61.530, relating to racing of vehicles on highways;

(((xiii)))
(xiv) A conviction of RCW 46.61.685, relating to leaving children in an
unattended vehicle with motor running;

(((xiv)))
(xv) A conviction of RCW 46.64.048, relating to attempting, aiding,
abetting, coercing, and committing crimes; ((or

(xv))) (xvi)
An administrative action taken by the department under chapter 46.20 RCW; or

(xvii)
A conviction of a local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution of a
political subdivision of this state, the federal government, or any other
state, of an offense substantially similar to a violation included in this
subsection.

(c)
A person who violates this section when his or her driver's license or driving
privilege is, at the time of the violation, suspended or revoked solely because
(i) the person must furnish proof of satisfactory progress in a required
alcoholism or drug treatment program, (ii) the person must furnish proof of
financial responsibility for the future as provided by chapter 46.29 RCW, (iii)
the person has failed to comply with the provisions of chapter 46.29 RCW
relating to uninsured accidents, (iv) the person has failed to respond to a
notice of traffic infraction, failed to appear at a requested hearing, violated
a written promise to appear in court, or has failed to comply with the terms of
a notice of traffic infraction or citation, as provided in RCW 46.20.289, (v)
the person has committed an offense in another state that, if committed in this
state, would not be grounds for the suspension or revocation of the person's
driver's license, or (vi) the person has been suspended or revoked by reason of
one or more of the items listed in (b) of this subsection, but was eligible to
reinstate his or her driver's license or driving privilege at the time of the
violation, or any combination of (i) through (vi), is guilty of driving while
license suspended or revoked in the third degree, a misdemeanor.

(2)
Upon receiving a record of conviction of any person or upon receiving an order
by any juvenile court or any duly authorized court officer of the conviction of
any juvenile under this section, the department shall:

(a)
For a conviction of driving while suspended or revoked in the first degree, as
provided by subsection (1)(a) of this section, extend the period of administrative
revocation imposed under chapter 46.65 RCW for an additional period of one year
from and after the date the person would otherwise have been entitled to apply
for a new license or have his or her driving privilege restored; or

(b)
For a conviction of driving while suspended or revoked in the second degree, as
provided by subsection (1)(b) of this section, not issue a new license or
restore the driving privilege for an additional period of one year from and
after the date the person would otherwise have been entitled to apply for a new
license or have his or her driving privilege restored; or

(c)
Not extend the period of suspension or revocation if the conviction was under
subsection (1)(c) of this section. If the conviction was under subsection (1)
(a) or (b) of this section and the court recommends against the extension and
the convicted person has obtained a valid driver's license, the period of
suspension or revocation shall not be extended.

Sec.
5. RCW
46.20.391 and 1998 c 209 s 4 and 1998 c 207 s 9 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
Any person licensed under this chapter who is convicted of an offense relating
to motor vehicles for which suspension or revocation of the driver's license is
mandatory, other than vehicular homicide or vehicular assault, or who has had
his or her license suspended under RCW 46.20.3101 (2)(a) or (3)(a), may submit
to the department an application for an occupational driver's license. The
department, upon receipt of the prescribed fee and upon determining that the
petitioner is engaged in an occupation or trade that makes it essential that
the petitioner operate a motor vehicle, may issue an occupational driver's
license and may set definite restrictions as provided in RCW 46.20.394. No
person may petition for, and the department shall not issue, an occupational
driver's license that is effective during the first thirty days of any
suspension or revocation imposed either for a violation of RCW 46.61.502
or 46.61.504 or ((pursuant to)) under RCW 46.20.3101 (2)(a) or
(3)(a), or for both a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and under RCW
46.20.3101 (2)(a) or (3)(a) where the action arises from the same incident.
A person aggrieved by the decision of the department on the application for an
occupational driver's license may request a hearing as provided by rule of the
department.

(2)
An applicant for an occupational driver's license is eligible to receive such
license only if:

(a)
Within one year immediately preceding the date of the offense that gave rise to
the present conviction, the applicant has not committed any offense relating to
motor vehicles for which suspension or revocation of a driver's license is
mandatory; and

(b)
Within seven years immediately preceding the date of the offense that gave rise
to the present conviction or incident, the applicant has not committed any of
the following offenses: (i) Driving or being in actual physical control of a
motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor; (ii) vehicular
homicide under RCW 46.61.520; or (iii) vehicular assault under RCW 46.61.522;
and

(c)
The applicant is engaged in an occupation or trade that makes it essential that
he or she operate a motor vehicle; and

(d)
The applicant files satisfactory proof of financial responsibility ((pursuant
to)) under chapter 46.29 RCW.

(3)
The director shall cancel an occupational driver's license upon receipt of
notice that the holder thereof has been convicted of operating a motor vehicle
in violation of its restrictions, or of ((an)) a separate offense
that ((pursuant to)) under chapter 46.20 RCW would warrant
suspension or revocation of a regular driver's license. The cancellation is
effective as of the date of the conviction, and continues with the same force
and effect as any suspension or revocation under this title.

Sec.
6. RCW
46.52.100 and 1998 c 204 s 1 and 1998 c 165 s 9 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

Every
district court, municipal court, and clerk of superior court shall keep or
cause to be kept a record of every traffic complaint, traffic citation, notice
of infraction, or other legal form of traffic charge deposited with or
presented to the court or a traffic violations bureau, and shall keep a record
of every official action by the court or its traffic violations bureau in
reference thereto, including but not limited to a record of every conviction,
forfeiture of bail, judgment of acquittal, finding that a traffic infraction
has been committed, dismissal of a notice of infraction, and the amount of
fine, forfeiture, or penalty resulting from every traffic complaint, citation,
or notice of infraction deposited with or presented to the district court,
municipal court, superior court, or traffic violations bureau. In the case of
a record of a conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, and
notwithstanding any other provision of law, the record shall be maintained by
the court permanently.

The
Monday following the conviction, forfeiture of bail, or finding that a traffic
infraction was committed for violation of any provisions of this chapter or
other law regulating the operating of vehicles on highways, every magistrate of
the court or clerk of the court of record in which such conviction was had,
bail was forfeited, or the finding made shall prepare and immediately forward
to the director of licensing at Olympia an abstract of the record of the court
covering the case((, which abstract must be certified by the person so
required to prepare the same to be true and correct)). Report need not be
made of any finding involving the illegal parking or standing of a vehicle.

The
abstract must be made upon a form or forms furnished by the director and shall
include the name and address of the party charged, the number, if any, of the
party's driver's or chauffeur's license, the registration number of the vehicle
involved if required by the director, the nature of the offense, the date of
hearing, the plea, the judgment, whether the offense was an alcohol-related
offense as defined in RCW 46.01.260(2), whether the incident that gave rise to
the offense charged resulted in any fatality, whether bail forfeited, whether
the determination that a traffic infraction was committed was contested, and
the amount of the fine, forfeiture, or penalty as the case may be.

Every
court of record shall also forward a like report to the director upon the
conviction of any person of a felony in the commission of which a vehicle was
used.

The
failure of any such judicial officer to comply with any of the requirements of
this section shall constitute misconduct in office and shall be grounds for
removal therefrom.

The
director shall keep all abstracts received hereunder at the director's office
in Olympia and the same shall be open to public inspection during reasonable
business hours.

Venue
in all district courts shall be before one of the two nearest district judges
in incorporated cities and towns nearest to the point the violation allegedly
occurred: PROVIDED, That in counties with populations of one hundred
twenty-five thousand or more such cases may be tried in the county seat at the
request of the defendant.

It
shall be the duty of the officer, prosecuting attorney, or city attorney
signing the charge or information in any case involving a charge of driving
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug immediately to make
request to the director for an abstract of convictions and forfeitures which
the director shall furnish.

Sec.
7. RCW
46.61.5055 and 1998 c 215 s 1, 1998 c 214 s 1, 1998 c 211 s 1, 1998 c 210 s 4,
1998 c 207 s 1, and 1998 c 206 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:

(1)
A person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who
has no prior offense within seven years shall be punished as follows:

(a)
In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for
whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered
pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's
alcohol concentration:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than one day nor more than one year. Twenty-four
consecutive hours of the imprisonment may not be suspended or deferred unless
the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would
impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being.
Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court
shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and
the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based. In lieu of the
mandatory minimum term of imprisonment required under this subsection (1)(a)(i),
the court may order not less than fifteen days of electronic home monitoring.
The offender shall pay the cost of electronic home monitoring. The county or
municipality in which the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost.
The court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device to
include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and the court may restrict the
amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on
electronic home monitoring; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than three hundred fifty dollars nor more than five
thousand dollars. Three hundred fifty dollars of the fine may not be suspended
or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; ((and

(iii)
By suspension of the offender's license or permit to drive, or suspension of
any nonresident privilege to drive, for a period of ninety days. The period of
license, permit, or privilege suspension may not be suspended. The court shall
notify the department of licensing of the conviction, and upon receiving
notification of the conviction the department shall suspend the offender's
license, permit, or privilege;)) or

(b)
In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for
whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW
46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol
concentration:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than two days nor more than one year. Two
consecutive days of the imprisonment may not be suspended or deferred unless
the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would
impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being.
Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall
state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the
facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based. In lieu of the mandatory
minimum term of imprisonment required under this subsection (1)(b)(i), the
court may order not less than thirty days of electronic home monitoring. The
offender shall pay the cost of electronic home monitoring. The county or
municipality in which the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost.
The court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device to
include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and the court may restrict the
amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on
electronic home monitoring; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand
dollars. Five hundred dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii)
((By revocation of the offender's license or permit to drive, or suspension
of any nonresident privilege to drive, for a period of one year. The period of
license, permit, or privilege suspension may not be suspended. The court shall
notify the department of licensing of the conviction, and upon receiving
notification of the conviction the department shall suspend the offender's
license, permit, or privilege; and

(iv))) By a
court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720.

(2)
A person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who
has one prior offense within seven years shall be punished as follows:

(a)
In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for
whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered
pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's
alcohol concentration:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than thirty days nor more than one year and sixty
days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay for the cost of the
electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being
imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's
electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer,
and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time
the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Thirty days of imprisonment and
sixty days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence
would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental
well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred,
the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or
deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand
dollars. Five hundred dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii)
((By revocation of the offender's license or permit to drive, or suspension
of any nonresident privilege to drive, for a period of two years. The period
of license, permit, or privilege revocation may not be suspended. The court
shall notify the department of licensing of the conviction, and upon receiving
notification of the conviction the department shall revoke the offender's
license, permit, or privilege; and

(iv))) By a
court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720; or

(b)
In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for
whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW
46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol
concentration:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than forty-five days nor more than one year and
ninety days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay for the cost
of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is
being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the
offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection
breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume
during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Forty-five days
of imprisonment and ninety days of electronic home monitoring may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of this
mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's
physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is
suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting
the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral
is based; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than seven hundred fifty dollars nor more than five
thousand dollars. Seven hundred fifty dollars of the fine may not be suspended
or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii)
((By revocation of the offender's license or permit to drive, or suspension
of any nonresident privilege to drive, for a period of nine hundred days. The
period of license, permit, or privilege revocation may not be suspended. The
court shall notify the department of licensing of the conviction, and upon
receiving notification of the conviction the department shall revoke the
offender's license, permit, or privilege; and

(iv))) By a
court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720.

(3)
A person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who
has two or more prior offenses within seven years shall be punished as follows:

(a)
In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for
whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant
to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol
concentration:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than ninety days nor more than one year and one
hundred twenty days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay for
the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the
penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require
the offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection
breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume
during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Ninety days of
imprisonment and one hundred twenty days of electronic home monitoring may not
be suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of this
mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's
physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is
suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting
the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral
is based; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than one thousand dollars nor more than five thousand
dollars. One thousand dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii)
((By revocation of the offender's license or permit to drive, or suspension
of any nonresident privilege to drive, for a period of three years. The period
of license, permit, or privilege revocation may not be suspended. The court
shall notify the department of licensing of the conviction, and upon receiving
notification of the conviction the department shall revoke the offender's
license, permit, or privilege; and

(iv))) By a
court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720; or

(b)
In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for
whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW
46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol
concentration:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than one hundred twenty days nor more than one
year and one hundred fifty days of electronic home monitoring. The offender
shall pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality
where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may
also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device include an
alcohol detection breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the
offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home
monitoring. One hundred twenty days of imprisonment and one hundred fifty days
of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred unless the court
finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a
substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the
mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in
writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon
which the suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than one thousand five hundred dollars nor more than five
thousand dollars. One thousand five hundred dollars of the fine may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii)
((By revocation of the offender's license or permit to drive, or suspension
of any nonresident privilege to drive, for a period of four years. The period
of license, permit, or privilege revocation may not be suspended. The court
shall notify the department of licensing of the conviction, and upon receiving
notification of the conviction the department shall revoke the offender's
license, permit, or privilege; and

(iv))) By a
court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720.

(4)
In exercising its discretion in setting penalties within the limits allowed by
this section, the court shall particularly consider the following:

(a)
Whether the person's driving at the time of the offense was responsible for
injury or damage to another or another's property; and

(b)
Whether the person was driving or in physical control of a vehicle with one or
more passengers at the time of the offense.

(5)
An offender punishable under this section is subject to the alcohol assessment
and treatment provisions of RCW 46.61.5056.

(6)
The license, permit, or nonresident privilege of a person convicted of
driving or being in physical control of a motor vehicle while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs must:

(a)
If the person's alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or if for reasons
other than the person's refusal to take a test offered under RCW 46.20.308
there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i)
Where there has been no prior offense within seven years, be suspended or
denied by the department for ninety days;

(ii)
Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied
by the department for two years; or

(iii)
Where there have been two or more prior offenses within seven years, be revoked
or denied by the department for three years;

(b)
If the person's alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or if by reason of the
person's refusal to take a test offered under RCW 46.20.308 there is no test
result indicating the person's alcohol concentration:

(i)
Where there has been no prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied
by the department for one year;

(ii)
Where there has been one prior offense within seven years, be revoked or denied
by the department for nine hundred days; or

(iii)
Where there have been two or more prior offenses within seven years, be revoked
or denied by the department for four years.

For
purposes of this subsection, the department shall refer to the driver's record
maintained under RCW 46.52.120 when determining the existence of prior
offenses.

(7)
After expiration of any period of suspension ((or)), revocation,
or denial of the offender's license, permit, or privilege to drive required
by this section, the department shall place the offender's driving privilege in
probationary status pursuant to RCW 46.20.355.

(((7)))
(8)(a) In addition to any nonsuspendable and nondeferrable jail sentence
required by this section, whenever the court imposes less than one year in
jail, the court shall also suspend but shall not defer a period of confinement
for a period not exceeding five years. The court shall impose conditions of
probation that include: (i) Not driving a motor vehicle within this state
without a valid license to drive and proof of financial responsibility for the
future; (ii) not driving a motor vehicle within this state while having an
alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more within two hours after driving; and (iii)
not refusing to submit to a test of his or her breath or blood to determine
alcohol concentration upon request of a law enforcement officer who has
reasonable grounds to believe the person was driving or was in actual physical
control of a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor. The court may impose conditions of probation that include
nonrepetition, installation of an ignition interlock or other biological or
technical device on the probationer's motor vehicle, alcohol or drug treatment,
supervised probation, or other conditions that may be appropriate. The
sentence may be imposed in whole or in part upon violation of a condition of
probation during the suspension period.

(b)
For each violation of mandatory conditions of probation under (a)(i) and (ii)
or (a)(i) and (iii) of this subsection, the court shall order the convicted
person to be confined for thirty days, which shall not be suspended or
deferred.

(c)
For each incident involving a violation of a mandatory condition of probation
imposed under this subsection, the license, permit, or privilege to drive of
the person shall be suspended by the court for thirty days or, if such license,
permit, or privilege to drive already is suspended, revoked, or denied at the
time the finding of probation violation is made, the suspension, revocation, or
denial then in effect shall be extended by thirty days. The court shall notify
the department of any suspension, revocation, or denial or any extension of a
suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this subsection.

(((8)))
(9) For purposes of this section:

(a)
"Electronic home monitoring" shall not be considered confinement as
defined in RCW 9.94A.030;

(b)
A "prior offense" means any of the following:

(i)
A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or an equivalent local ordinance;

(ii)
A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance;

(iii)
A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;

(iv)
A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;

(v)
A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, 46.61.500, or 9A.36.050 or an
equivalent local ordinance, if the conviction is the result of a charge that
was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an
equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW 46.61.520 or 46.61.522;

(vi)
An out-of-state conviction for a violation that would have been a violation of
(b)(i), (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of this subsection if committed in this
state;

(vii)
A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a prosecution for a
violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance; or

(viii)
A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a prosecution for a
violation of RCW 46.61.5249, or an equivalent local ordinance, if the charge
under which the deferred prosecution was granted was originally filed as a
violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or
of RCW 46.61.520 or 46.61.522; and

(c)
"Within seven years" means that the arrest for a prior offense
occurred within seven years of the arrest for the current offense.

Sec.
8. RCW
46.65.060 and 1985 c 101 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

If the department finds that such person is not an habitual offender
under this chapter, the proceeding shall be dismissed, but if the department
finds that such person is an habitual offender, the department shall revoke the
operator's license for a period of ((five)) seven years:
PROVIDED, That the department may stay the date of the revocation if it finds
that the traffic offenses upon which it is based were caused by or are the
result of alcoholism and/or drug addiction as evaluated by a program approved
by the department of social and health services, and that since his or her last
offense he or she has undertaken and followed a course of treatment for
alcoholism and/or drug treatment in a program approved by the department of
social and health services; such stay shall be subject to terms and conditions
as are deemed reasonable by the department. Said stay shall continue as long
as there is no further conviction for any of the offenses listed in RCW
46.65.020(1). Upon a subsequent conviction for any offense listed in RCW
46.65.020(1) or violation of any of the terms or conditions of the original
stay order, the stay shall be removed and the department shall revoke the
operator's license for a period of ((five)) seven years.

---
END ---