BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.94A.040 and 1997 c 365 s 2 and 1997 c 338 s 3 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
A sentencing guidelines commission is established as an agency of state
government.

(2)
The legislature finds that the commission, having accomplished its original
statutory directive to implement this chapter, and having expertise in
sentencing practice and policies, shall:

(a)
Evaluate state sentencing policy, to include whether the sentencing ranges and
standards are consistent with and further:

(i)
The purposes of this chapter as defined in RCW 9.94A.010; and

(ii)
The intent of the legislature to emphasize confinement for the violent offender
and alternatives to confinement for the nonviolent offender.

The
commission shall provide the governor and the legislature with its evaluation
and recommendations under this subsection not later than December 1, 1996, and
every two years thereafter;

(b)
Recommend to the legislature revisions or modifications to the standard
sentence ranges, state sentencing policy, prosecuting standards, and other
standards. If implementation of the revisions or modifications would result in
exceeding the capacity of correctional facilities, then the commission shall
accompany its recommendation with an additional list of standard sentence
ranges which are consistent with correction capacity;

(c)
Study the existing criminal code and from time to time make recommendations to
the legislature for modification;

(d)(i)
Serve as a clearinghouse and information center for the collection,
preparation, analysis, and dissemination of information on state and local
adult and juvenile sentencing practices; (ii) develop and maintain a
computerized adult and juvenile sentencing information system by individual
superior court judge consisting of offender, offense, history, and sentence
information entered from judgment and sentence forms for all adult felons; and
(iii) conduct ongoing research regarding adult and juvenile sentencing
guidelines, use of total confinement and alternatives to total confinement,
plea bargaining, and other matters relating to the improvement of the adult
criminal justice system and the juvenile justice system;

(e)
Assume the powers and duties of the juvenile disposition standards commission
after June 30, 1996;

(f)
Evaluate the effectiveness of existing disposition standards and related
statutes in implementing policies set forth in RCW 13.40.010 generally,
specifically review the guidelines relating to the confinement of minor and
first offenders as well as the use of diversion, and review the application of
current and proposed juvenile sentencing standards and guidelines for potential
adverse impacts on the sentencing outcomes of racial and ethnic minority youth;

(g)
Solicit the comments and suggestions of the juvenile justice community
concerning disposition standards, and make recommendations to the legislature
regarding revisions or modifications of the standards. The evaluations shall
be submitted to the legislature on December 1 of each odd-numbered year. The
department of social and health services shall provide the commission with
available data concerning the implementation of the disposition standards and
related statutes and their effect on the performance of the department's responsibilities
relating to juvenile offenders, and with recommendations for modification of
the disposition standards. The office of the administrator for the courts
shall provide the commission with available data on diversion and dispositions
of juvenile offenders under chapter 13.40 RCW; and

(h)
Not later than December 1, 1997, and at least every two years thereafter, based
on available information, report to the governor and the legislature on:

(i)
Racial disproportionality in juvenile and adult sentencing;

(ii)
The capacity of state and local juvenile and adult facilities and resources;
and

(iii)
Recidivism information on adult and juvenile offenders.

(3)
Each of the commission's recommended standard sentence ranges shall include one
or more of the following: Total confinement, partial confinement, community
supervision, community service, and a fine.

(4)
The standard sentence ranges of total and partial confinement under this
chapter are subject to the following limitations:

(a)
If the maximum term in the range is one year or less, the minimum term in the
range shall be no less than one-third of the maximum term in the range, except
that if the maximum term in the range is ninety days or less, the minimum term
may be less than one-third of the maximum;

(b)
If the maximum term in the range is greater than one year, the minimum term in
the range shall be no less than seventy-five percent of the maximum term in the
range, except that for murder in the second degree in seriousness ((category
XIII)) level XIV under RCW 9.94A.310, the minimum term in the range
shall be no less than fifty percent of the maximum term in the range; and

(c)
The maximum term of confinement in a range may not exceed the statutory maximum
for the crime as provided in RCW 9A.20.021.

(5)
The commission shall exercise its duties under this section in conformity with
chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec.
2. RCW
9.94A.310 and 1998 c 235 s 1 and 1998 c 211 s 3 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1) TABLE 1

Sentencing Grid

SERIOUSNESS

((SCORE))

LEVEL OFFENDER SCORE

9 or

0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 more

((XV))

XVI Life
Sentence without Parole/Death Penalty

((XIV))

XV 23y4m 24y4m 25y4m 26y4m 27y4m 28y4m 30y4m 32y10m 36y 40y

240- 250- 261- 271- 281- 291- 312- 338- 370- 411-

320
333 347 361 374 388 416 450 493 548

((XIII))

XIV 14y4m 15y4m 16y2m 17y 17y11m 18y9m 20y5m 22y2m 25y7m
29y

123- 134- 144- 154- 165- 175- 195- 216- 257- 298-

220 234 244 254 265 275 295 316 357 397

XIII 12y 13y 14y 15y 16y 17y 19y 21y 25y 29y

123- 134- 144- 154- 165- 175- 195- 216- 257- 298-

164 178 192 205 219 233 260 288 342 397

XII 9y 9y11m 10y9m 11y8m 12y6m 13y5m 15y9m 17y3m 20y3m 23y3m

93- 102- 111- 120- 129- 138- 162- 178- 209- 240-

123 136
147 160 171 184 216 236 277 318

XI 7y6m 8y4m 9y2m 9y11m 10y9m 11y7m 14y2m 15y5m 17y11m 20y5m

78- 86- 95- 102- 111- 120- 146- 159- 185- 210-

102
114 125 136 147 158 194 211 245 280

X 5y 5y6m 6y 6y6m 7y 7y6m 9y6m 10y6m 12y6m 14y6m

51- 57- 62- 67- 72- 77- 98- 108- 129- 149-

68 75 82 89 96 102 130 144 171 198

IX 3y 3y6m 4y 4y6m 5y 5y6m 7y6m 8y6m 10y6m 12y6m

31- 36- 41- 46- 51- 57- 77- 87- 108- 129-

41 48 54 61 68 75 102 116 144 171

VIII 2y 2y6m 3y 3y6m 4y 4y6m 6y6m 7y6m 8y6m 10y6m

21- 26- 31- 36- 41- 46- 67- 77- 87- 108-

27 34 41 48 54 61 89 102 116 144

VII 18m 2y 2y6m 3y 3y6m 4y 5y6m 6y6m 7y6m 8y6m

15- 21- 26- 31- 36- 41- 57- 67- 77- 87-

20 27 34 41 48 54 75 89 102 116

VI 13m 18m 2y 2y6m 3y 3y6m 4y6m 5y6m 6y6m 7y6m

12+- 15- 21- 26- 31- 36- 46- 57- 67- 77-

14
20 27 34 41 48 61 75 89 102

V 9m 13m 15m 18m 2y2m 3y2m 4y 5y 6y 7y

6- 12+- 13- 15- 22- 33- 41- 51- 62- 72-

12 14 17 20 29 43 54 68 82 96

IV 6m 9m 13m 15m 18m 2y2m 3y2m 4y2m 5y2m 6y2m

3- 6- 12+- 13- 15- 22- 33- 43- 53- 63-

9 12 14 17 20 29 43 57 70 84

III 2m 5m 8m 11m 14m 20m 2y2m 3y2m 4y2m 5y

1- 3- 4- 9- 12+- 17- 22- 33- 43- 51-

3
8 12 12 16 22 29 43 57 68

II 4m 6m 8m 13m 16m 20m 2y2m 3y2m 4y2m

0-90 2- 3- 4- 12+- 14- 17- 22- 33- 43-

Days 6
9 12 14 18 22 29 43 57

I 3m 4m 5m 8m 13m 16m 20m 2y2m

0-60 0-90 2- 2- 3- 4- 12+- 14- 17- 22-

Days Days 5 6 8 12 14 18 22 29

NOTE:
Numbers in the first horizontal row of each seriousness category represent
sentencing midpoints in years(y) and months(m). Numbers in the second and
third rows represent presumptive sentencing ranges in months, or in days if so
designated. 12+ equals one year and one day.

(2)
For persons convicted of the anticipatory offenses of criminal attempt,
solicitation, or conspiracy under chapter 9A.28 RCW, the presumptive sentence
is determined by locating the sentencing grid sentence range defined by the
appropriate offender score and the seriousness level of the completed crime,
and multiplying the range by 75 percent.

(3)
The following additional times shall be added to the presumptive sentence for
felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the offender or an accomplice
was armed with a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being
sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any
firearm enhancements based on the classification of the completed felony
crime. If the offender is being sentenced for more than one offense, the
firearm enhancement or enhancements must be added to the total period of
confinement for all offenses, regardless of which underlying offense is subject
to a firearm enhancement. If the offender or an accomplice was armed with a
firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for an
anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed
in this subsection as eligible for any firearm enhancements, the following
additional times shall be added to the presumptive sentence determined under
subsection (2) of this section based on the felony crime of conviction as
classified under RCW 9A.28.020:

(a)
Five years for any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or with a
maximum sentence of at least twenty years, or both, and not covered under (f)
of this subsection.

(b)
Three years for any felony defined under any law as a class B felony or with a
maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this
subsection.

(c)
Eighteen months for any felony defined under any law as a class C felony or
with a maximum sentence of five years, or both, and not covered under (f) of
this subsection.

(d)
If the offender is being sentenced for any firearm enhancements under (a), (b),
and/or (c) of this subsection and the offender has previously been sentenced
for any deadly weapon enhancements after July 23, 1995, under (a), (b), and/or
(c) of this subsection or subsection (4)(a), (b), and/or (c) of this section,
or both, any and all firearm enhancements under this subsection shall be twice
the amount of the enhancement listed.

(e)
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any and all firearm enhancements
under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total confinement, and
shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions, including other
firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for all offenses sentenced under this
chapter.

(f)
The firearm enhancements in this section shall apply to all felony crimes
except the following: Possession of a machine gun, possessing a stolen
firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful possession of a
firearm in the first and second degree, and use of a machine gun in a felony.

(g)
If the presumptive sentence under this section exceeds the statutory maximum
for the offense, the statutory maximum sentence shall be the presumptive
sentence unless the offender is a persistent offender as defined in RCW
9.94A.030. If the addition of a firearm enhancement increases the sentence so
that it would exceed the statutory maximum for the offense, the portion of the
sentence representing the enhancement may not be reduced.

(4)
The following additional times shall be added to the presumptive sentence for
felony crimes committed after July 23, 1995, if the offender or an accomplice
was armed with a deadly weapon as defined in this chapter other than a firearm
as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced for one of the
crimes listed in this subsection as eligible for any deadly weapon enhancements
based on the classification of the completed felony crime. If the offender is
being sentenced for more than one offense, the deadly weapon enhancement or
enhancements must be added to the total period of confinement for all offenses,
regardless of which underlying offense is subject to a deadly weapon
enhancement. If the offender or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon other
than a firearm as defined in RCW 9.41.010 and the offender is being sentenced
for an anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes
listed in this subsection as eligible for any deadly weapon enhancements, the
following additional times shall be added to the presumptive sentence
determined under subsection (2) of this section based on the felony crime of
conviction as classified under RCW 9A.28.020:

(a)
Two years for any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or with a
maximum sentence of at least twenty years, or both, and not covered under (f)
of this subsection.

(b)
One year for any felony defined under any law as a class B felony or with a
maximum sentence of ten years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this
subsection.

(c)
Six months for any felony defined under any law as a class C felony or with a
maximum sentence of five years, or both, and not covered under (f) of this
subsection.

(d)
If the offender is being sentenced under (a), (b), and/or (c) of this
subsection for any deadly weapon enhancements and the offender has previously
been sentenced for any deadly weapon enhancements after July 23, 1995, under
(a), (b), and/or (c) of this subsection or subsection (3)(a), (b), and/or (c)
of this section, or both, any and all deadly weapon enhancements under this
subsection shall be twice the amount of the enhancement listed.

(e)
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any and all deadly weapon
enhancements under this section are mandatory, shall be served in total
confinement, and shall run consecutively to all other sentencing provisions,
including other firearm or deadly weapon enhancements, for all offenses
sentenced under this chapter.

(f)
The deadly weapon enhancements in this section shall apply to all felony crimes
except the following: Possession of a machine gun, possessing a stolen
firearm, drive-by shooting, theft of a firearm, unlawful possession of a
firearm in the first and second degree, and use of a machine gun in a felony.

(g)
If the presumptive sentence under this section exceeds the statutory maximum
for the offense, the statutory maximum sentence shall be the presumptive
sentence unless the offender is a persistent offender as defined in RCW
9.94A.030. If the addition of a deadly weapon enhancement increases the
sentence so that it would exceed the statutory maximum for the offense, the
portion of the sentence representing the enhancement may not be reduced.

(5)
The following additional times shall be added to the presumptive sentence if
the offender or an accomplice committed the offense while in a county jail or
state correctional facility as that term is defined in this chapter and the
offender is being sentenced for one of the crimes listed in this subsection.
If the offender or an accomplice committed one of the crimes listed in this
subsection while in a county jail or state correctional facility as that term
is defined in this chapter, and the offender is being sentenced for an
anticipatory offense under chapter 9A.28 RCW to commit one of the crimes listed
in this subsection, the following additional times shall be added to the
presumptive sentence determined under subsection (2) of this section:

(a)
Eighteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (i) or (ii) or
69.50.410;

(b)
Fifteen months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(a)(1) (iii), (iv),
and (v);

(c)
Twelve months for offenses committed under RCW 69.50.401(d).

For
the purposes of this subsection, all of the real property of a state
correctional facility or county jail shall be deemed to be part of that
facility or county jail.

(6)
An additional twenty-four months shall be added to the presumptive sentence for
any ranked offense involving a violation of chapter 69.50 RCW if the offense
was also a violation of RCW 69.50.435.

(7)
An additional two years shall be added to the presumptive sentence for
vehicular homicide committed while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or
any drug as defined by RCW 46.61.502 for each prior offense as defined in RCW
46.61.5055.

Sec.
3. RCW
9.94A.320 and 1998 c 290 s 4, 1998 c 219 s 4, 1998 c 82 s 1, and 1998 c 78 s 1
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

((XV))

XVIAggravated Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

((XIV))

XVMurder 1 (RCW
9A.32.030)

Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

((XIII))

XIVMurder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

XIIIMalicious explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1 (RCW
70.74.270(1))

XIIAssault 1 (RCW
9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW
70.74.272(1)(a))

XIRape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

XKidnapping 1 (RCW
9A.40.020)

Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Over 18 and deliver heroin, methamphetamine,
a narcotic from Schedule I or II, or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone
under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Indecent Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW
9A.44.100(1)(a))

Manufacture of methamphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

IXAssault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Malicious placement of an explosive 2 (RCW
70.74.270(2))

Over 18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV,
or V or a nonnarcotic, except flunitrazepam or methamphetamine, from
Schedule I-V to someone under 18 and 3 years junior (RCW 69.50.406)

Controlled Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW
9.68A.040)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW
9A.82.060(1)(b))

Vehicular Homicide, by being under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)

Homicide by Watercraft, by being under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 88.12.029)

VIIIArson 1 (RCW
9A.48.020)

Promoting Prostitution 1
(RCW 9A.88.070)

Selling for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any
controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver heroin or cocaine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Deliver or possess with intent to deliver methamphetamine
(RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver amphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Possession of ephedrine or pseudoephedrine with
intent to manufacture methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle
in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

Homicide by Watercraft, by the operation of any
vessel in a reckless manner (RCW 88.12.029)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

VIIBurglary 1 (RCW
9A.52.020)

Vehicular Homicide, by
disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)

Homicide by Watercraft,
by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 88.12.029)

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible compulsion)
(RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Dealing in depictions of minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Sending, bringing into
state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.060)

Involving a minor in drug dealing (RCW
69.50.401(f))

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in the first
degree (RCW 9.41.040(1)(a))

Malicious placement of an explosive 3 (RCW
70.74.270(3))

VIBribery (RCW
9A.68.010)

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110,
9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW
70.74.272(1)(b))

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II (except heroin or cocaine) or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Intimidating a Judge
(RCW 9A.72.160)

Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(a))

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

VPersistent prison
misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Criminal Mistreatment 1
(RCW 9A.42.020)

Abandonment of dependent
person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Extortionate Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Advancing money or property for extortionate
extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Extortionate Means to Collect Extensions of Credit
(RCW 9A.82.040)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Bail Jumping with class A Felony (RCW
9A.76.170(2)(b))

Sexually Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

Delivery of imitation controlled substance by
person eighteen or over to person under eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

IVResidential Burglary
(RCW 9A.52.025)

Theft of Livestock 1
(RCW 9A.56.080)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Commercial Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW
9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Malicious Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Willful Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW
72.66.060)

Hit and Run‑-Injury Accident (RCW
46.52.020(4))

Hit and Run with Vessel‑-Injury Accident (RCW
88.12.155(3))

Vehicular Assault (RCW 46.61.522)

Assault by Watercraft (RCW 88.12.032)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V
(except marijuana, amphetamine, methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))

Influencing Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW
9A.82.070)

Use of Proceeds of
Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Knowingly Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW
9A.82.050(2))

IIICriminal Gang
Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Criminal Mistreatment 2
(RCW 9A.42.030)

Abandonment of dependent
person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Extortion 2 (RCW
9A.56.130)

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Assault 3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the second degree
(RCW 9.41.040(1)(b))

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Willful Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW
72.65.070)

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Communication with a Minor for Immoral Purposes
(RCW 9.68A.090)

Patronizing a Juvenile Prostitute (RCW 9.68A.100)

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW
9A.76.170(2)(c))

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Delivery of a material in lieu of a controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.401(c))

Manufacture, distribute, or possess with intent to
distribute an imitation controlled substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

Recklessly Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW
9A.82.050(1))

Theft of livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Securities Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

IIUnlawful Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Class B Felony Theft of Rental, Leased, or
Lease-purchased Property (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or Business
(RCW 18.130.190(7))

Health Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Possession of controlled substance that is either
heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV
(RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession of phencyclidine (PCP) (RCW
69.50.401(d))

Create, deliver, or possess a counterfeit
controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(b))

Computer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Escape from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

ITheft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Class C Felony Theft of
Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission (RCW
9A.56.070)

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW
46.61.024)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW
9A.56.060)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.140 (2) and
(3))

False Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forged Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged Prescription for a Controlled Substance (RCW
69.50.403)

Possess Controlled Substance that is a Narcotic from
Schedule III, IV, or V or Non-narcotic from Schedule I-V (except phencyclidine
or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Sec.
4. RCW
9.94A.030 and 1998 c 290 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit,"
or "collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department
of corrections, means that the department is responsible for monitoring and
enforcing the offender's sentence with regard to the legal financial
obligation, receiving payment thereof from the offender, and, consistent with
current law, delivering daily the entire payment to the superior court clerk
without depositing it in a departmental account.

(2)
"Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.

(3)
"Community corrections officer" means an employee of the department
who is responsible for carrying out specific duties in supervision of sentenced
offenders and monitoring of sentence conditions.

(4)
"Community custody" means that portion of an inmate's sentence of
confinement in lieu of earned early release time or imposed pursuant to RCW
9.94A.120 (6), (8), or (10) served in the community subject to controls placed
on the inmate's movement and activities by the department of corrections.

(5)
"Community placement" means that period during which the offender is
subject to the conditions of community custody and/or postrelease supervision, which
begins either upon completion of the term of confinement (postrelease
supervision) or at such time as the offender is transferred to community
custody in lieu of earned early release. Community placement may consist of
entirely community custody, entirely postrelease supervision, or a combination
of the two.

(6)
"Community service" means compulsory service, without compensation,
performed for the benefit of the community by the offender.

(7)
"Community supervision" means a period of time during which a
convicted offender is subject to crime-related prohibitions and other sentence
conditions imposed by a court pursuant to this chapter or RCW 16.52.200(6) or
46.61.524. For first-time offenders, the supervision may include crime-related
prohibitions and other conditions imposed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.120(5). For
purposes of the interstate compact for out-of-state supervision of parolees and
probationers, RCW 9.95.270, community supervision is the functional equivalent
of probation and should be considered the same as probation by other states.

(8)
"Confinement" means total or partial confinement as defined in this
section.

(9)
"Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to Titles 10 or
13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of guilty, and acceptance of
a plea of guilty.

(10)
"Court-ordered legal financial obligation" means a sum of money that
is ordered by a superior court of the state of Washington for legal financial
obligations which may include restitution to the victim, statutorily imposed
crime victims' compensation fees as assessed pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court
costs, county or interlocal drug funds, court-appointed attorneys' fees, and
costs of defense, fines, and any other financial obligation that is assessed to
the offender as a result of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for vehicular
assault while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW
46.61.522(1)(b), or vehicular homicide while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), legal financial
obligations may also include payment to a public agency of the expense of an
emergency response to the incident resulting in the conviction, subject to the
provisions in RCW 38.52.430.

(11)
"Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court prohibiting
conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the crime for which the
offender has been convicted, and shall not be construed to mean orders
directing an offender affirmatively to participate in rehabilitative programs
or to otherwise perform affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts
necessary to monitor compliance with the order of a court may be required by
the department.

(12)
"Criminal history" means the list of a defendant's prior convictions
and juvenile adjudications, whether in this state, in federal court, or
elsewhere. The history shall include, where known, for each conviction (a)
whether the defendant has been placed on probation and the length and terms
thereof; and (b) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and the length of
incarceration.

(13)
"Day fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing judge that equals
the difference between the offender's net daily income and the reasonable
obligations that the offender has for the support of the offender and any
dependents.

(14)
"Day reporting" means a program of enhanced supervision designed to
monitor the defendant's daily activities and compliance with sentence
conditions, and in which the defendant is required to report daily to a
specific location designated by the department or the sentencing judge.

(15)
"Department" means the department of corrections.

(16)
"Determinate sentence" means a sentence that states with exactitude
the number of actual years, months, or days of total confinement, of partial
confinement, of community supervision, the number of actual hours or days of
community service work, or dollars or terms of a legal financial obligation.
The fact that an offender through "earned early release" can reduce
the actual period of confinement shall not affect the classification of the
sentence as a determinate sentence.

(17)
"Disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings of an
individual remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any amount
required by law to be withheld. For the purposes of this definition,
"earnings" means compensation paid or payable for personal services,
whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or otherwise, and,
notwithstanding any other provision of law making the payments exempt from
garnishment, attachment, or other process to satisfy a court-ordered legal
financial obligation, specifically includes periodic payments pursuant to
pension or retirement programs, or insurance policies of any type, but does not
include payments made under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020
and 50.40.050, or Title 74 RCW.

(18)
"Drug offense" means:

(a)
Any felony violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of a controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.401(d)) or forged prescription for a controlled substance
(RCW 69.50.403);

(b)
Any offense defined as a felony under federal law that relates to the
possession, manufacture, distribution, or transportation of a controlled
substance; or

(c)
Any out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state
would be a felony classified as a drug offense under (a) of this subsection.

(19)
"Escape" means:

(a)
Escape in the first degree (RCW 9A.76.110), escape in the second degree (RCW
9A.76.120), willful failure to return from furlough (RCW 72.66.060), willful
failure to return from work release (RCW 72.65.070), or willful failure to be
available for supervision by the department while in community custody (RCW
72.09.310); or

(b)
Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of
this state would be a felony classified as an escape under (a) of this
subsection.

(20)
"Felony traffic offense" means:

(a)
Vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW 46.61.522), eluding
a police officer (RCW 46.61.024), or felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW
46.52.020(4)); or

(b)
Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of
this state would be a felony classified as a felony traffic offense under (a)
of this subsection.

(21)
"Fines" means the requirement that the offender pay a specific sum of
money over a specific period of time to the court.

(22)
"First-time offender" means any person who is convicted of a felony
(a) not classified as a violent offense or a sex offense under this chapter, or
(b) that is not the manufacture, delivery, or possession with intent to
manufacture or deliver a controlled substance classified in Schedule I or II
that is a narcotic drug or flunitrazepam classified in Schedule IV, nor the
manufacture, delivery, or possession with intent to deliver methamphetamine,
its salts, isomers, and salts of its isomers as defined in RCW 69.50.206(d)(2),
nor the selling for profit of any controlled substance or counterfeit substance
classified in Schedule I, RCW 69.50.204, except leaves and flowering tops of
marihuana, who previously has never been convicted of a felony in this state,
federal court, or another state, and who has never participated in a program of
deferred prosecution for a felony offense.

(23)
"Most serious offense" means any of the following felonies or a
felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies, as now existing or
hereafter amended:

(a)
Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or criminal solicitation
of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A felony;

(b)
Assault in the second degree;

(c)
Assault of a child in the second degree;

(d)
Child molestation in the second degree;

(e)
Controlled substance homicide;

(f)
Extortion in the first degree;

(g)
Incest when committed against a child under age fourteen;

(h)
Indecent liberties;

(i)
Kidnapping in the second degree;

(j)
Leading organized crime;

(k)
Manslaughter in the first degree;

(l)
Manslaughter in the second degree;

(m)
Promoting prostitution in the first degree;

(n)
Rape in the third degree;

(o)
Robbery in the second degree;

(p)
Sexual exploitation;

(q)
Vehicular assault;

(r)
Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by
any person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as
defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless
manner;

(s)
Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual motivation, as
"sexual motivation" is defined under this section;

(t)
Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW 9.94A.125;

(u)
Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to December 2, 1993, that is
comparable to a most serious offense under this subsection, or any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a most serious offense under this subsection;

(v)(i)
A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.88.100(1) (a), (b), and
(c), chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess. as it existed until July 1, 1979,
RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as it existed from July 1, 1979, until June
11, 1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11,
1986, until July 1, 1988;

(ii)
A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1)(c) as it
existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988, if: (A) The crime was
committed against a child under the age of fourteen; or (B) the relationship
between the victim and perpetrator is included in the definition of indecent
liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through
July 27, 1997, or RCW 9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993,
through July 27, 1997.

(24)
"Nonviolent offense" means an offense which is not a violent offense.

(25)
"Offender" means a person who has committed a felony established by
state law and is eighteen years of age or older or is less than eighteen years
of age but whose case is under superior court jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030
or has been transferred by the appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court
pursuant to RCW 13.40.110. Throughout this chapter, the terms
"offender" and "defendant" are used interchangeably.

(26)
"Partial confinement" means confinement for no more than one year in
a facility or institution operated or utilized under contract by the state or
any other unit of government, or, if home detention or work crew has been
ordered by the court, in an approved residence, for a substantial portion of
each day with the balance of the day spent in the community. Partial
confinement includes work release, home detention, work crew, and a combination
of work crew and home detention as defined in this section.

(27)
"Persistent offender" is an offender who:

(a)(i)
Has been convicted in this state of any felony considered a most serious
offense; and

(ii)
Has, before the commission of the offense under (a) of this subsection, been
convicted as an offender on at least two separate occasions, whether in this
state or elsewhere, of felonies that under the laws of this state would be
considered most serious offenses and would be included in the offender score
under RCW 9.94A.360; provided that of the two or more previous convictions, at
least one conviction must have occurred before the commission of any of the
other most serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or

(b)(i)
Has been convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape of a child in the
first degree, child molestation in the first degree, rape in the second degree,
rape of a child in the second degree, or indecent liberties by forcible
compulsion; (B) murder in the first degree, murder in the second degree,
homicide by abuse, kidnapping in the first degree, kidnapping in the second
degree, assault in the first degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a
child in the first degree, or burglary in the first degree, with a finding of
sexual motivation; or (C) an attempt to commit any crime listed in this
subsection (27)(b)(i); and

(ii)
Has, before the commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this subsection, been
convicted as an offender on at least one occasion, whether in this state or
elsewhere, of an offense listed in (b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for
rape of a child in the first degree constitutes a conviction under subsection
(27)(b)(i) only when the offender was sixteen years of age or older when the
offender committed the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in the second
degree constitutes a conviction under subsection (27)(b)(i) only when the
offender was eighteen years of age or older when the offender committed the
offense.

(28)
"Postrelease supervision" is that portion of an offender's community
placement that is not community custody.

(29)
"Restitution" means the requirement that the offender pay a specific
sum of money over a specific period of time to the court as payment of
damages. The sum may include both public and private costs. The imposition of
a restitution order does not preclude civil redress.

(30)
"Serious traffic offense" means:

(a)
Driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.502), actual physical control while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504), reckless driving (RCW 46.61.500), or
hit-and-run an attended vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5)); or

(b)
Any federal, out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be classified as a serious traffic offense
under (a) of this subsection.

(31)
"Serious violent offense" is a subcategory of violent offense and
means:

(a)
Murder in the first degree, homicide by abuse, murder in the second degree,
manslaughter in the first degree, assault in the first degree, kidnapping in
the first degree, or rape in the first degree, assault of a child in the first
degree, or an attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit
one of these felonies; or

(b)
Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of
this state would be a felony classified as a serious violent offense under (a)
of this subsection.

(32)
"Sentence range" means the sentencing court's discretionary range in
imposing a nonappealable sentence.

(33)
"Sex offense" means:

(a)
A felony that is a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW, other than RCW
9A.44.130(10), or RCW 9A.64.020 or 9.68A.090 or a felony that is, under
chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal
conspiracy to commit such crimes;

(b)
Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1,
1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a sex offense in (a) of this
subsection;

(c)
A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.127 or 13.40.135;
or

(((c)))
(d) Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the
laws of this state would be a felony classified as a sex offense under (a) of
this subsection.

(34)
"Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes for which the
defendant committed the crime was for the purpose of his or her sexual
gratification.

(35)
"Total confinement" means confinement inside the physical boundaries
of a facility or institution operated or utilized under contract by the state
or any other unit of government for twenty-four hours a day, or pursuant to RCW
72.64.050 and 72.64.060.

(36)
"Transition training" means written and verbal instructions and
assistance provided by the department to the offender during the two weeks
prior to the offender's successful completion of the work ethic camp program.
The transition training shall include instructions in the offender's
requirements and obligations during the offender's period of community custody.

(37)
"Victim" means any person who has sustained emotional, psychological,
physical, or financial injury to person or property as a direct result of the
crime charged.

(38)
"Violent offense" means:

(a)
Any of the following felonies, as now existing or hereafter amended: Any
felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an attempt to commit a
class A felony, criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a
class A felony, manslaughter in the first degree, manslaughter in the second
degree, indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion, kidnapping in
the second degree, arson in the second degree, assault in the second degree,
assault of a child in the second degree, extortion in the first degree, robbery
in the second degree, drive-by shooting, vehicular assault, and vehicular
homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW
46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;

(b)
Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1,
1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a violent offense in (a) of
this subsection; and

(c)
Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of
this state would be a felony classified as a violent offense under (a) or (b)
of this subsection.

(39)
"Work crew" means a program of partial confinement consisting of
civic improvement tasks for the benefit of the community of not less than
thirty-five hours per week that complies with RCW 9.94A.135. The civic
improvement tasks shall have minimal negative impact on existing private
industries or the labor force in the county where the service or labor is
performed. The civic improvement tasks shall not affect employment
opportunities for people with developmental disabilities contracted through
sheltered workshops as defined in RCW 82.04.385. Only those offenders
sentenced to a facility operated or utilized under contract by a county or the
state are eligible to participate on a work crew. Offenders sentenced for a
sex offense as defined in subsection (33) of this section are not eligible for
the work crew program.

(40)
"Work ethic camp" means an alternative incarceration program designed
to reduce recidivism and lower the cost of corrections by requiring offenders
to complete a comprehensive array of real-world job and vocational experiences,
character-building work ethics training, life management skills development,
substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling, literacy training, and basic adult
education.

(41)
"Work release" means a program of partial confinement available to
offenders who are employed or engaged as a student in a regular course of study
at school. Participation in work release shall be conditioned upon the
offender attending work or school at regularly defined hours and abiding by the
rules of the work release facility.

(42)
"Home detention" means a program of partial confinement available to
offenders wherein the offender is confined in a private residence subject to
electronic surveillance.

Sec.
5. RCW
9A.44.130 and 1998 c 220 s 1 and 1998 c 139 s 1 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
Any adult or juvenile residing, or who is a student, is employed, or carries on
a vocation in this state who has been found to have committed or has been
convicted of any sex offense or kidnapping offense, or who has been found not
guilty by reason of insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW of committing any sex offense
or kidnapping offense, shall register with the county sheriff for the county of
the person's residence, or if the person is not a resident of Washington, the
county of the person's school, or place of employment or vocation. Where a
person required to register under this section is in custody of the state
department of corrections, the state department of social and health services,
a local division of youth services, or a local jail or juvenile detention
facility as a result of a sex offense or kidnapping offense, the person shall
also register at the time of release from custody with an official designated
by the agency that has jurisdiction over the person. In addition, any such
adult or juvenile who is admitted to a public or private institution of higher
education shall, within ten days of enrolling or by the first business day
after arriving at the institution, whichever is earlier, notify the sheriff for
the county of the person's residence of the person's intent to attend the
institution. Persons required to register under this section who are enrolled
in a public or private institution of higher education on June 11, 1998, must
notify the county sheriff immediately. The sheriff shall notify the
institution's department of public safety and shall provide that department
with the same information provided to a county sheriff under subsection (3) of
this section.

(2)
This section may not be construed to confer any powers pursuant to RCW 4.24.500
upon the public safety department of any public or private institution of
higher education.

(3)
The person shall provide the following information when registering: (a) Name;
(b) address; (c) date and place of birth; (d) place of employment; (e) crime
for which convicted; (f) date and place of conviction; (g) aliases used; (h)
social security number; (i) photograph; and (j) fingerprints.

(4)(a)
Offenders shall register with the county sheriff within the following
deadlines. For purposes of this section the term "conviction" refers
to adult convictions and juvenile adjudications for sex offenses or kidnapping
offenses:

(i)
OFFENDERS IN CUSTODY. (A) Sex offenders who committed a sex offense on,
before, or after February 28, 1990, and who, on or after July 28, 1991, are in
custody, as a result of that offense, of the state department of corrections,
the state department of social and health services, a local division of youth
services, or a local jail or juvenile detention facility, and (B) kidnapping
offenders who on or after July 27, 1997, are in custody of the state department
of corrections, the state department of social and health services, a local
division of youth services, or a local jail or juvenile detention facility,
must register at the time of release from custody with an official designated
by the agency that has jurisdiction over the offender. The agency shall within
three days forward the registration information to the county sheriff for the
county of the offender's anticipated residence. The offender must also
register within twenty-four hours from the time of release with the county
sheriff for the county of the person's residence, or if the person is not a
resident of Washington, the county of the person's school, or place of
employment or vocation. The agency that has jurisdiction over the offender
shall provide notice to the offender of the duty to register. Failure to
register at the time of release and within twenty-four hours of release
constitutes a violation of this section and is punishable as provided in
subsection (9) of this section.

When
the agency with jurisdiction intends to release an offender with a duty to
register under this section, and the agency has knowledge that the offender is
eligible for developmental disability services from the department of social
and health services, the agency shall notify the division of developmental
disabilities of the release. Notice shall occur not more than thirty days
before the offender is to be released. The agency and the division shall
assist the offender in meeting the initial registration requirement under this
section. Failure to provide such assistance shall not constitute a defense for
any violation of this section.

(ii)
OFFENDERS NOT IN CUSTODY BUT UNDER STATE OR LOCAL JURISDICTION. Sex offenders
who, on July 28, 1991, are not in custody but are under the jurisdiction of the
indeterminate sentence review board or under the department of correction's
active supervision, as defined by the department of corrections, the state
department of social and health services, or a local division of youth
services, for sex offenses committed before, on, or after February 28, 1990,
must register within ten days of July 28, 1991. Kidnapping offenders who, on
July 27, 1997, are not in custody but are under the jurisdiction of the indeterminate
sentence review board or under the department of correction's active
supervision, as defined by the department of corrections, the state department
of social and health services, or a local division of youth services, for
kidnapping offenses committed before, on, or after July 27, 1997, must register
within ten days of July 27, 1997. A change in supervision status of a sex
offender who was required to register under this subsection (4)(a)(ii) as of
July 28, 1991, or a kidnapping offender required to register as of July 27,
1997, shall not relieve the offender of the duty to register or to reregister
following a change in residence. The obligation to register shall only cease
pursuant to RCW 9A.44.140.

(iii)
OFFENDERS UNDER FEDERAL JURISDICTION. Sex offenders who, on or after July 23,
1995, and kidnapping offenders who, on or after July 27, 1997, as a result of
that offense are in the custody of the United States bureau of prisons or other
federal or military correctional agency for sex offenses committed before, on,
or after February 28, 1990, or kidnapping offenses committed on, before, or
after July 27, 1997, must register within twenty-four hours from the time of
release with the county sheriff for the county of the person's residence, or if
the person is not a resident of Washington, the county of the person's school,
or place of employment or vocation. Sex offenders who, on July 23, 1995, are
not in custody but are under the jurisdiction of the United States bureau of
prisons, United States courts, United States parole commission, or military
parole board for sex offenses committed before, on, or after February 28, 1990,
must register within ten days of July 23, 1995. Kidnapping offenders who, on
July 27, 1997, are not in custody but are under the jurisdiction of the United
States bureau of prisons, United States courts, United States parole
commission, or military parole board for kidnapping offenses committed before,
on, or after July 27, 1997, must register within ten days of July 27, 1997. A
change in supervision status of a sex offender who was required to register
under this subsection (4)(a)(iii) as of July 23, 1995, or a kidnapping offender
required to register as of July 27, 1997 shall not relieve the offender of the
duty to register or to reregister following a change in residence, or if the
person is not a resident of Washington, the county of the person's school, or
place of employment or vocation. The obligation to register shall only cease
pursuant to RCW 9A.44.140.

(iv)
OFFENDERS WHO ARE CONVICTED BUT NOT CONFINED. Sex offenders who are convicted
of a sex offense on or after July 28, 1991, for a sex offense that was
committed on or after February 28, 1990, and kidnapping offenders who are
convicted on or after July 27, 1997, for a kidnapping offense that was
committed on or after July 27, 1997, but who are not sentenced to serve a term
of confinement immediately upon sentencing, shall report to the county sheriff
to register immediately upon completion of being sentenced.

(v)
OFFENDERS WHO ARE NEW RESIDENTS OR RETURNING WASHINGTON RESIDENTS. Sex
offenders and kidnapping offenders who move to Washington state from another
state or a foreign country that are not under the jurisdiction of the state
department of corrections, the indeterminate sentence review board, or the
state department of social and health services at the time of moving to
Washington, must register within thirty days of establishing residence or
reestablishing residence if the person is a former Washington resident. The
duty to register under this subsection applies to sex offenders convicted under
the laws of another state or a foreign country, federal or military statutes,
or Washington state for offenses committed on or after February 28, 1990, and
to kidnapping offenders convicted under the laws of another state or a foreign
country, federal or military statutes, or Washington state for offenses
committed on or after July 27, 1997. Sex offenders and kidnapping offenders
from other states or a foreign country who, when they move to Washington, are
under the jurisdiction of the department of corrections, the indeterminate
sentence review board, or the department of social and health services must
register within twenty-four hours of moving to Washington. The agency that has
jurisdiction over the offender shall notify the offender of the registration
requirements before the offender moves to Washington.

(vi)
OFFENDERS FOUND NOT GUILTY BY REASON OF INSANITY. Any adult or juvenile who
has been found not guilty by reason of insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW of (A)
committing a sex offense on, before, or after February 28, 1990, and who, on or
after July 23, 1995, is in custody, as a result of that finding, of the state
department of social and health services, or (B) committing a kidnapping
offense on, before, or after July 27, 1997, and who on or after July 27, 1997,
is in custody, as a result of that finding, of the state department of social
and health services, must register within twenty-four hours from the time of
release with the county sheriff for the county of the person's residence. The
state department of social and health services shall provide notice to the
adult or juvenile in its custody of the duty to register. Any adult or
juvenile who has been found not guilty by reason of insanity of committing a
sex offense on, before, or after February 28, 1990, but who was released before
July 23, 1995, or any adult or juvenile who has been found not guilty by reason
of insanity of committing a kidnapping offense but who was released before July
27, 1997, shall be required to register within twenty-four hours of receiving
notice of this registration requirement. The state department of social and
health services shall make reasonable attempts within available resources to
notify sex offenders who were released before July 23, 1995, and kidnapping
offenders who were released before July 27, 1997. Failure to register within
twenty-four hours of release, or of receiving notice, constitutes a violation
of this section and is punishable as provided in subsection (9) of this
section.

(b)
Failure to register within the time required under this section constitutes a
per se violation of this section and is punishable as provided in subsection
(9) of this section. The county sheriff shall not be required to determine
whether the person is living within the county.

(c)
An arrest on charges of failure to register, service of an information, or a
complaint for a violation of this section, or arraignment on charges for a
violation of this section, constitutes actual notice of the duty to register.
Any person charged with the crime of failure to register under this section who
asserts as a defense the lack of notice of the duty to register shall register
immediately following actual notice of the duty through arrest, service, or
arraignment. Failure to register as required under this subsection (4)(c)
constitutes grounds for filing another charge of failing to register.
Registering following arrest, service, or arraignment on charges shall not
relieve the offender from criminal liability for failure to register prior to
the filing of the original charge.

(d)
The deadlines for the duty to register under this section do not relieve any
sex offender of the duty to register under this section as it existed prior to
July 28, 1991.

(5)(a)
If any person required to register pursuant to this section changes his or her
residence address within the same county, the person must send written notice
of the change of address to the county sheriff within seventy-two hours of
moving. If any person required to register pursuant to this section moves to a
new county, the person must send written notice of the change of address at
least fourteen days before moving to the county sheriff in the new county of
residence and must register with that county sheriff within twenty-four hours
of moving. The person must also send written notice within ten days of the
change of address in the new county to the county sheriff with whom the person
last registered. The county sheriff with whom the person last registered shall
promptly forward the information concerning the change of address to the county
sheriff for the county of the person's new residence. If any person required
to register pursuant to this section moves out of Washington state, the person
must also send written notice within ten days of moving to the new state or a
foreign country to the county sheriff with whom the person last registered in
Washington state. Upon receipt of notice of change of address to a new state,
the county sheriff shall promptly forward the information regarding the change
of address to the agency designated by the new state as the state's offender
registration agency.

(b)
It is an affirmative defense to a charge that the person failed to send a
notice at least fourteen days in advance of moving as required under (a) of
this subsection that the person did not know the location of his or her new
residence at least fourteen days before moving. The defendant must establish
the defense by a preponderance of the evidence and, to prevail on the defense,
must also prove by a preponderance that the defendant sent the required notice
within twenty-four hours of determining the new address.

(6)
A sex offender subject to registration requirements under this section who
applies to change his or her name under RCW 4.24.130 or any other law shall
submit a copy of the application to the county sheriff of the county of the
person's residence and to the state patrol not fewer than five days before the
entry of an order granting the name change. No sex offender under the
requirement to register under this section at the time of application shall be
granted an order changing his or her name if the court finds that doing so will
interfere with legitimate law enforcement interests, except that no order shall
be denied when the name change is requested for religious or legitimate
cultural reasons or in recognition of marriage or dissolution of marriage. A
sex offender under the requirement to register under this section who receives
an order changing his or her name shall submit a copy of the order to the
county sheriff of the county of the person's residence and to the state patrol
within five days of the entry of the order.

(7)
The county sheriff shall obtain a photograph of the individual and shall obtain
a copy of the individual's fingerprints.

(8)
For the purpose of RCW 9A.44.130, 10.01.200, 43.43.540, 70.48.470, and
72.09.330:

(a)
"Sex offense" means any offense defined as a sex offense by RCW
9.94A.030 and any violation of RCW 9.68A.040 (sexual exploitation of a minor),
9.68A.050 (dealing in depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit
conduct), 9.68A.060 (sending, bringing into state depictions of minor engaged
in sexually explicit conduct), 9.68A.090 (communication with minor for immoral
purposes), 9.68A.100 (patronizing juvenile prostitute), or 9A.44.096 (sexual
misconduct with a minor in the second degree), as well as any gross misdemeanor
that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or
criminal conspiracy to commit an offense that is classified as a sex offense
under RCW 9.94A.030.

(b)
"Kidnapping offense" means the crimes of kidnapping in the first
degree, kidnapping in the second degree, and unlawful imprisonment as defined
in chapter 9A.40 RCW, where the victim is a minor and the offender is not the
minor's parent.

(c)
"Employed" or "carries on a vocation" means employment that
is full-time or part-time for a period of time exceeding fourteen days, or for
an aggregate period of time exceeding thirty days during any calendar year. A
person is employed or carries on a vocation whether the person's employment is
financially compensated, volunteered, or for the purpose of government or
educational benefit.

(d)
"Student" means a person who is enrolled, on a full-time or part-time
basis, in any public or private educational institution. An educational
institution includes any secondary school, trade or professional institution,
or institution of higher education.

(9)
A person who knowingly fails to register with the county sheriff or notify the
county sheriff, or who changes his or her name without notifying the county
sheriff and the state patrol, as required by this section is guilty of a class
C felony if the crime for which the individual was convicted was a felony sex
offense as defined in subsection (8)(a) of this section or a federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony sex offense as defined in subsection (8)(a) of this section.
If the crime was other than a felony or a federal or out-of-state conviction
for an offense that under the laws of this state would be other than a felony,
violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

(10)
A person who knowingly fails to register or who moves without notifying the
county sheriff as required by this section is guilty of a class C felony if the
crime for which the individual was convicted was a felony kidnapping offense as
defined in subsection (8)(b) of this section or a federal or out-of-state
conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would be a felony
kidnapping offense as defined in subsection (8)(b) of this section. If the
crime was other than a felony or a federal or out-of-state conviction for an
offense that under the laws of this state would be other than a felony,
violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec.
6. RCW
9.94A.360 and 1998 c 211 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
offender score is measured on the horizontal axis of the sentencing grid. The
offender score rules are as follows:

The
offender score is the sum of points accrued under this section rounded down to
the nearest whole number.

(1)
A prior conviction is a conviction which exists before the date of sentencing
for the offense for which the offender score is being computed. Convictions
entered or sentenced on the same date as the conviction for which the offender
score is being computed shall be deemed "other current offenses"
within the meaning of RCW 9.94A.400.

(2)
Class A and sex prior felony convictions shall always be included in the
offender score. Class B prior felony convictions other than sex offenses shall
not be included in the offender score, if since the last date of release from
confinement (including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a felony conviction,
if any, or entry of judgment and sentence, the offender had spent ten
consecutive years in the community without committing any crime that
subsequently results in a conviction. Class C prior felony convictions other
than sex offenses shall not be included in the offender score if, since the
last date of release from confinement (including full-time residential
treatment) pursuant to a felony conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and
sentence, the offender had spent five consecutive years in the community
without committing any crime that subsequently results in a conviction.
Serious traffic convictions shall not be included in the offender score if,
since the last date of release from confinement (including full-time
residential treatment) pursuant to a felony conviction, if any, or entry of
judgment and sentence, the offender spent five years in the community without
committing any crime that subsequently results in a conviction. This
subsection applies to both adult and juvenile prior convictions.

(3)
Out-of-state convictions for offenses shall be classified according to the
comparable offense definitions and sentences provided by Washington law.
Federal convictions for offenses shall be classified according to the
comparable offense definitions and sentences provided by Washington law. If
there is no clearly comparable offense under Washington law or the offense is
one that is usually considered subject to exclusive federal jurisdiction, the
offense shall be scored as a class C felony equivalent if it was a felony under
the relevant federal statute.

(4)
Score prior convictions for felony anticipatory offenses (attempts, criminal
solicitations, and criminal conspiracies) the same as if they were convictions
for completed offenses.

(5)(a)
In the case of multiple prior convictions, for the purpose of computing the
offender score, count all convictions separately, except:

(i)
Prior offenses which were found, under RCW 9.94A.400(1)(a), to encompass the
same criminal conduct, shall be counted as one offense, the offense that yields
the highest offender score. The current sentencing court shall determine with
respect to other prior adult offenses for which sentences were served
concurrently or prior juvenile offenses for which sentences were served
consecutively, whether those offenses shall be counted as one offense or as
separate offenses using the "same criminal conduct" analysis found in
RCW 9.94A.400(1)(a), and if the court finds that they shall be counted as one
offense, then the offense that yields the highest offender score shall be
used. The current sentencing court may presume that such other prior offenses
were not the same criminal conduct from sentences imposed on separate dates, or
in separate counties or jurisdictions, or in separate complaints, indictments,
or informations;

(ii)
In the case of multiple prior convictions for offenses committed before July 1,
1986, for the purpose of computing the offender score, count all adult
convictions served concurrently as one offense, and count all juvenile
convictions entered on the same date as one offense. Use the conviction for
the offense that yields the highest offender score.

(b)
As used in this subsection (5), "served concurrently" means that:
(i) The latter sentence was imposed with specific reference to the former; (ii)
the concurrent relationship of the sentences was judicially imposed; and (iii)
the concurrent timing of the sentences was not the result of a probation or
parole revocation on the former offense.

(6)
If the present conviction is one of the anticipatory offenses of criminal
attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy, count each prior conviction as if the
present conviction were for a completed offense.

(7)
If the present conviction is for a nonviolent offense and not covered by
subsection (11) or (12) of this section, count one point for each adult prior
felony conviction and one point for each juvenile prior violent felony
conviction and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior nonviolent felony conviction.

(8)
If the present conviction is for a violent offense and not covered in
subsection (9), (10), (11), or (12) of this section, count two points for each
prior adult and juvenile violent felony conviction, one point for each prior
adult nonviolent felony conviction, and 1/2 point for each prior juvenile
nonviolent felony conviction.

(9)
If the present conviction is for ((Murder 1 or 2, Assault 1, Assault of a
Child 1, Kidnapping 1, Homicide by Abuse, or Rape 1)) a serious violent
offense, count three points for prior adult and juvenile convictions for
crimes in ((these categories)) this category, two points for each
prior adult and juvenile violent conviction (not already counted), one point
for each prior adult nonviolent felony conviction, and 1/2 point for each prior
juvenile nonviolent felony conviction.

(10)
If the present conviction is for Burglary 1, count prior convictions as in
subsection (8) of this section; however count two points for each prior adult
Burglary 2 or residential burglary conviction, and one point for each prior
juvenile Burglary 2 or residential burglary conviction.

(11)
If the present conviction is for a felony traffic offense count two points for
each adult or juvenile prior conviction for Vehicular Homicide or Vehicular
Assault; for each felony offense ((or serious traffic offense,)) count
one point for each adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior conviction((.
This subsection shall not apply when additional time is added to a sentence
pursuant to RCW 46.61.520(2))); for each serious traffic offense, other
than those used for an enhancement pursuant to RCW 46.61.520(2), count one
point for each adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior conviction.

(12)
If the present conviction is for a drug offense count three points for each
adult prior felony drug offense conviction and two points for each juvenile
drug offense. All other adult and juvenile felonies are scored as in
subsection (8) of this section if the current drug offense is violent, or as in
subsection (7) of this section if the current drug offense is nonviolent.

(13)
If the present conviction is for Willful Failure to Return from Furlough, RCW
72.66.060, Willful Failure to Return from Work Release, RCW 72.65.070, or
Escape from Community Custody, RCW 72.09.310, count only prior escape convictions
in the offender score. Count adult prior escape convictions as one point and
juvenile prior escape convictions as 1/2 point.

(14)
If the present conviction is for Escape 1, RCW 9A.76.110, or Escape 2, RCW
9A.76.120, count adult prior convictions as one point and juvenile prior
convictions as 1/2 point.

(15)
If the present conviction is for Burglary 2 or residential burglary, count
priors as in subsection (7) of this section; however, count two points for each
adult and juvenile prior Burglary 1 conviction, two points for each adult prior
Burglary 2 or residential burglary conviction, and one point for each juvenile
prior Burglary 2 or residential burglary conviction.

(16)
If the present conviction is for a sex offense, count priors as in subsections
(7) through (15) of this section; however count three points for each adult and
juvenile prior sex offense conviction.

(17)
If the present conviction is for an offense committed while the offender was
under community placement, add one point.

Sec.
7. RCW
9.94A.400 and 1998 c 235 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
Except as provided in (b) or (c) of this subsection, whenever a person is to be
sentenced for two or more current offenses, the sentence range for each current
offense shall be determined by using all other current and prior convictions as
if they were prior convictions for the purpose of the offender score:
PROVIDED, That if the court enters a finding that some or all of the current
offenses encompass the same criminal conduct then those current offenses shall
be counted as one crime. Sentences imposed under this subsection shall be
served concurrently. Consecutive sentences may only be imposed under the
exceptional sentence provisions of RCW 9.94A.120 and 9.94A.390(2)(g) or any
other provision of RCW 9.94A.390. "Same criminal conduct," as used
in this subsection, means two or more crimes that require the same criminal
intent, are committed at the same time and place, and involve the same victim.
This definition applies in cases involving vehicular assault or vehicular
homicide even if the victims occupied the same vehicle.

(b)
Whenever a person is convicted of two or more serious violent offenses, as
defined in RCW 9.94A.030, arising from separate and distinct criminal conduct,
the sentence range for the offense with the highest seriousness level under RCW
9.94A.320 shall be determined using the offender's prior convictions and other
current convictions that are not serious violent offenses in the offender score
and the sentence range for other serious violent offenses shall be determined
by using an offender score of zero. The sentence range for any offenses that
are not serious violent offenses shall be determined according to (a) of this
subsection. All sentences imposed under (b) of this subsection shall be served
consecutively to each other and concurrently with sentences imposed under (a)
of this subsection.

(c)
If an offender is convicted under RCW 9.41.040 for unlawful possession of a
firearm in the first or second degree and for the felony crimes of theft of a
firearm or possession of a stolen firearm, or both, ((then)) the
sentence range for each of these current offenses shall be determined by using
all other current and prior convictions, except other current convictions for
the felony crimes listed in this subsection (1)(c), as if they were prior
convictions. The offender shall serve consecutive sentences for each
conviction of the felony crimes listed in this subsection (1)(c), and
for each firearm unlawfully possessed.

(2)(a)
Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, whenever a person while under
sentence of felony commits another felony and is sentenced to another term of
confinement, the latter term shall not begin until expiration of all prior
terms.

(b)
Whenever a second or later felony conviction results in community supervision
with conditions not currently in effect, under the prior sentence or sentences
of community supervision the court may require that the conditions of community
supervision contained in the second or later sentence begin during the
immediate term of community supervision and continue throughout the duration of
the consecutive term of community supervision.

(3)
Subject to subsections (1) and (2) of this section, whenever a person is
sentenced for a felony that was committed while the person was not under
sentence of a felony, the sentence shall run concurrently with any felony
sentence which has been imposed by any court in this or another state or by a
federal court subsequent to the commission of the crime being sentenced unless
the court pronouncing the current sentence expressly orders that they be served
consecutively.

(4)
Whenever any person granted probation under RCW 9.95.210 or 9.92.060, or both,
has the probationary sentence revoked and a prison sentence imposed, that
sentence shall run consecutively to any sentence imposed pursuant to this
chapter, unless the court pronouncing the subsequent sentence expressly orders
that they be served concurrently.

(5) However, in the case of consecutive sentences, all periods of
total confinement shall be served before any partial confinement, community
service, community supervision, or any other requirement or conditions of any
of the sentences. Except for exceptional sentences as authorized under RCW
9.94A.120(2), if two or more sentences that run consecutively include periods
of community supervision, the aggregate of the community supervision period
shall not exceed twenty-four months.

---
END ---