BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
26.09.175 and 1992 c 229 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A proceeding for the modification of an order of child support shall commence
with the filing of a petition and worksheets. The petition shall be in the
form prescribed by the administrator for the courts. There shall be a fee of
twenty dollars for the filing of a petition for modification of dissolution.

(2)
The petitioner shall serve upon the other party the summons, a copy of the
petition, and the worksheets in the form prescribed by the administrator for
the courts. If the modification proceeding is the first action filed in this
state, service shall be made by personal service. If the decree to be modified
was entered in this state, service shall be by personal service or by any form
of mail requiring a return receipt. If the support obligation has been
assigned to the state pursuant to RCW 74.20.330 or the state has a subrogated
interest under RCW 74.20A.030, the summons, petition, and worksheets shall also
be served on the attorney general or the prosecuting attorney, as set forth
in RCW 26.23.130. Proof of service shall be filed with the court.

(3)
The responding party's answer and worksheets shall be served and the answer
filed within twenty days after service of the petition or sixty days if served
out of state. The responding party's failure to file an answer within the time
required shall result in entry of a default judgment for the petitioner.

(4)
At any time after responsive pleadings are filed, either party may schedule the
matter for hearing.

(5)
Unless both parties stipulate to arbitration or the presiding judge authorizes
oral testimony pursuant to subsection (6) of this section, a petition for
modification of an order of child support shall be heard by the court on
affidavits, the petition, answer, and worksheets only.

(6)
A party seeking authority to present oral testimony on the petition to modify a
support order shall file an appropriate motion not later than ten days after
the time of notice of hearing. Affidavits and exhibits setting forth the
reasons oral testimony is necessary to a just adjudication of the issues shall
accompany the petition. The affidavits and exhibits must demonstrate the
extraordinary features of the case. Factors which may be considered include,
but are not limited to: (a) Substantial questions of credibility on a major
issue; (b) insufficient or inconsistent discovery materials not correctable by
further discovery; or (c) particularly complex circumstances requiring expert
testimony.

Sec.
2. RCW
26.18.170 and 1995 c 34 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever an obligor parent who has been ordered to provide health insurance
coverage for a dependent child fails to provide such coverage or lets it lapse,
the department or the obligee may seek enforcement of the coverage order as
provided under this section.

(2)(a)
If the obligor parent's order to provide health insurance coverage contains
language notifying the obligor that failure to provide such coverage or proof
that such coverage is unavailable may result in direct enforcement of the order
and orders payments through, or has been submitted to, the Washington state
support registry for enforcement, then the department may, without further
notice to the obligor, send a notice of enrollment to the obligor's employer or
union ((by certified mail, return receipt requested)). The notice
shall be served:

(i)
By regular mail;

(ii)
In the manner prescribed for the service of a summons in a civil action;

(iii)
By certified mail, return receipt requested; or

(iv)
By electronic means if there is an agreement between the secretary and the
person, firm, corporation, association, political subdivision, department of
the state, or agency, subdivision, or instrumentality of the United States to
accept service by electronic means.

(b)
The notice shall require the employer or union to enroll the child in the
health insurance plan as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(((b)))
(c) The returned answer to the division of child support by the employer
constitutes proof of service of the notice of enrollment in the case where the
notice was served by regular mail.

(d)
The division of child support may use uniform interstate forms adopted by the
United States department of health and human services to take insurance
enrollment actions under this section.

(e)
If the obligor parent's order to provide health insurance coverage does not
order payments through, and has not been submitted to, the Washington state
support registry for enforcement:

(i)
The obligee may, without further notice to the obligor send a certified copy of
the order requiring health insurance coverage to the obligor's employer or
union by certified mail, return receipt requested; and

(ii)
The obligee shall attach a notarized statement to the order declaring that the
order is the latest order addressing coverage entered by the court and require
the employer or union to enroll the child in the health insurance plan as
provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(3)
Upon receipt of an order that provides for health insurance coverage, or a
notice of enrollment:

(a)
The obligor's employer or union shall answer the party who sent the order or
notice within ((thirty-five)) twenty days and confirm that the
child:

(i)
Has been enrolled in the health insurance plan;

(ii)
Will be enrolled; or

(iii)
Cannot be covered, stating the reasons why such coverage cannot be provided;

(b)
The employer or union shall withhold any required premium from the obligor's
income or wages;

(c)
If more than one plan is offered by the employer or union, and each plan may be
extended to cover the child, then the child shall be enrolled in the obligor's
plan. If the obligor's plan does not provide coverage which is accessible to
the child, the child shall be enrolled in the least expensive plan otherwise
available to the obligor parent;

(d)
The employer or union shall provide information about the name of the health
insurance coverage provider or issuer and the extent of coverage available to the
obligee or the department and shall make available any necessary claim forms or
enrollment membership cards.

(4)
If the order for coverage contains no language notifying the obligor that
failure to provide health insurance coverage or proof that such coverage is
unavailable may result in direct enforcement of the order, the department or
the obligee may serve a written notice of intent to enforce the order on the
obligor by certified mail, return receipt requested, or by personal service.
If the obligor fails to provide written proof that such coverage has been
obtained or applied for or fails to provide proof that such coverage is
unavailable within twenty days of service of the notice, the department or the
obligee may proceed to enforce the order directly as provided in subsection (2)
of this section.

(5)
If the obligor ordered to provide health insurance coverage elects to provide
coverage that will not be accessible to the child because of geographic or
other limitations when accessible coverage is otherwise available, the
department or the obligee may serve a written notice of intent to purchase
health insurance coverage on the obligor by certified mail, return receipt
requested. The notice shall also specify the type and cost of coverage.

(6)
If the department serves a notice under subsection (5) of this section the
obligor shall, within twenty days of the date of service:

(a)
File an application for an adjudicative proceeding; or

(b)
Provide written proof to the department that the obligor has either applied
for, or obtained, coverage accessible to the child.

(7)
If the obligee serves a notice under subsection (5) of this section, within
twenty days of the date of service the obligor shall provide written proof to
the obligee that the obligor has either applied for, or obtained, coverage
accessible to the child.

(8)
If the obligor fails to respond to a notice served under subsection (5) of this
section to the party who served the notice, the party who served the notice may
purchase the health insurance coverage specified in the notice directly. The
amount of the monthly premium shall be added to the support debt and be
collectible without further notice. The amount of the monthly premium may be
collected or accrued until the obligor provides proof of the required coverage.

(9)
The signature of the obligee or of a department employee shall be a valid
authorization to the coverage provider or issuer for purposes of processing a
payment to the child's health services provider. An order for health insurance
coverage shall operate as an assignment of all benefit rights to the obligee or
to the child's health services provider, and in any claim against the coverage
provider or issuer, the obligee or the obligee's assignee shall be subrogated
to the rights of the obligor. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section
regarding assignment of benefits, this section shall not require a health care
service contractor authorized under chapter 48.44 RCW or a health maintenance
organization authorized under chapter 48.46 RCW to deviate from their
contractual provisions and restrictions regarding reimbursement for covered
services. If the coverage is terminated, the employer shall mail a notice of
termination to the department or the obligee at the obligee's last known
address within thirty days of the termination date.

(10)
This section shall not be construed to limit the right of the obligor or the
obligee to bring an action in superior court at any time to enforce, modify, or
clarify the original support order.

(11)
Where a child does not reside in the issuer's service area, an issuer shall
cover no less than urgent and emergent care. Where the issuer offers broader
coverage, whether by policy or reciprocal agreement, the issuer shall provide
such coverage to any child otherwise covered that does not reside in the
issuer's service area.

(12)
If an obligor fails to pay his or her portion of any deductible required under
the health insurance coverage or fails to pay his or her portion of medical
expenses incurred in excess of the coverage provided under the plan, the
department or the obligee may enforce collection of the obligor's portion of
the deductible or the additional medical expenses through a wage assignment
order. The amount of the deductible or additional medical expenses shall be
added to the support debt and be collectible without further notice if the
obligor's share of the amount of the deductible or additional expenses is
reduced to a sum certain in a court order.

Sec.
3. RCW
26.18.180 and 1989 c 416 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
An obligated parent's employer or union shall be liable for a fine of up to one
thousand dollars per occurrence, if the employer or union fails or refuses,
within ((thirty-five)) twenty days of receiving the order or
notice for health insurance coverage to:

(a)
Promptly enroll the obligated parent's child in the health insurance plan; or

(b)
Make a written answer to the person or entity who sent the order or notice for
health insurance coverage stating that the child:

(i)
Will be enrolled in the next available open enrollment period; or

(ii)
Cannot be covered and explaining the reasons why coverage cannot be provided.

(2)
Liability may be established and the fine may be collected by the office of
support enforcement under chapter 74.20A or 26.23 RCW using any of the remedies
contained in those chapters.

(3)
Any employer or union who enrolls a child in a health insurance plan in
compliance with chapter 26.18 RCW shall be exempt from liability resulting from
such enrollment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 26.18 RCW to read as follows:

If
this chapter requires service in the manner prescribed for service of a summons
in a civil action or by certified mail, valid service also includes delivery by
a parcel delivery service that requires signature or return receipt.

Sec.
5. RCW
26.23.130 and 1991 c 367 s 43 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department shall be given twenty calendar days prior notice of the entry of any
final order and five days prior notice of the entry of any temporary order in
any proceeding involving child support or maintenance if the department has a
financial interest based on an assignment of support rights under RCW 74.20.330
or the state has a subrogated interest under RCW 74.20A.030. Service of this
notice upon the department shall be by personal service on, or mailing by any
form of mail requiring a return receipt to, the office of the attorney general;
except that notice shall be given to the office of the prosecuting attorney for
the county in which the action is filed in lieu of the office of the attorney
general in those counties and in the types of cases as designated by the office
of the attorney general by letter sent to the presiding superior court judge of
that county. The department shall not be entitled to terms for a party's
failure to serve the department within the time requirements for this section,
unless the department proves that the party knew that the department had an
assignment of support rights or a subrogated interest and that the failure to
serve the department was intentional.

Sec.
6. RCW
74.20A.080 and 1998 c 160 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The secretary may issue to any person, firm, corporation, association,
political subdivision, department of the state, or agency, subdivision, or
instrumentality of the United States, an order to withhold and deliver property
of any kind, including but not restricted to earnings which are or might become
due, owing, or belonging to the debtor, when the secretary has reason to
believe that there is in the possession of such person, firm, corporation,
association, political subdivision, department of the state, or agency,
subdivision, or instrumentality of the United States property which is or might
become due, owing, or belonging to said debtor. Such order to withhold and
deliver may be issued:

(a)
At any time, if a responsible parent's support order:

(i)
Contains notice that withholding action may be taken against earnings, wages,
or assets without further notice to the parent; or

(ii)
Includes a statement that other income-withholding action under this chapter
may be taken without further notice to the responsible parent;

(b)
Twenty-one days after service of a notice of support debt under RCW 74.20A.040;

(c)
Twenty-one days after service of a notice and finding of parental
responsibility under RCW 74.20A.056;

(d)
Twenty-one days after service of a notice of support owed under RCW 26.23.110;

(e)
Twenty-one days after service of a notice and finding of financial responsibility
under RCW 74.20A.055; or

(f)
When appropriate under RCW 74.20A.270.

(2)
The order to withhold and deliver shall:

(a)
State the amount to be withheld on a periodic basis if the order to withhold
and deliver is being served to secure payment of monthly current support;

(b)
State the amount of the support debt accrued;

(c)
State in summary the terms of RCW 74.20A.090 and 74.20A.100;

(d)
Be served:

(i)
In the manner prescribed for the service of a summons in a civil action;

(ii)
By certified mail, return receipt requested;

(iii)
By electronic means if there is an agreement between the secretary and the
person, firm, corporation, association, political subdivision, department of
the state, or agency, subdivision, or instrumentality of the United States to
accept service by electronic means; or

(iv)
By regular mail to a responsible parent's employer unless the division of child
support reasonably believes that service of process in the manner prescribed in
(d)(i) or (ii) of this subsection is required for initiating an action to
ensure employer compliance with the withholding requirement.

(3)
The division of child support may use uniform interstate withholding forms
adopted by the United States department of health and human services to take
withholding actions under this section when the responsible parent is owed
money or property that is located in another state.

(4)
Any person, firm, corporation, association, political subdivision, department
of the state, or agency, subdivision, or instrumentality of the United States
upon whom service has been made is hereby required to:

(a)
Answer said order to withhold and deliver within twenty days, exclusive of the
day of service, under oath and in writing, and shall make true answers to the
matters inquired of therein; and

(b)
Provide further and additional answers when requested by the secretary.

(5)
The returned answer or a payment remitted to the division of child support by
the employer constitutes proof of service of the ((notice of payroll
deduction)) order to withhold and deliver in the case where the ((notice))
order was served by regular mail.

(6)
Any such person, firm, corporation, association, political subdivision,
department of the state, or agency, subdivision, or instrumentality of the
United States in possession of any property which may be subject to the claim
of the department shall:

(a)(i)
Immediately withhold such property upon receipt of the order to withhold and
deliver; and

(ii)
Within seven working days deliver the property to the secretary;

(iii)
Continue to withhold earnings payable to the debtor at each succeeding
disbursement interval as provided for in RCW 74.20A.090, and deliver amounts
withheld from earnings to the secretary within seven working days of the date
earnings are payable to the debtor;

(iv)
Deliver amounts withheld from periodic payments to the secretary within seven
working days of the date the payments are payable to the debtor;

(v)
Inform the secretary of the date the amounts were withheld as requested under
this section; or

(b)
Furnish to the secretary a good and sufficient bond, satisfactory to the
secretary, conditioned upon final determination of liability.

(7)
An order to withhold and deliver served under this section shall not expire
until:

(a)
Released in writing by the division of child support;

(b)
Terminated by court order; ((or))

(c)
((The)) A person or entity ((receiving)), other than an
employer as defined in Title 50 RCW, who has received the order to withhold
and deliver does not possess property of or owe money to the debtor; or

(d)
An employer who has received the order to withhold and deliver no longer
employs, contracts, or owes money to the debtor under a contract of employment,
express or implied.

(8)
Where money is due and owing under any contract of employment, express or
implied, or is held by any person, firm, corporation, or association, political
subdivision, or department of the state, or agency, subdivision, or
instrumentality of the United States subject to withdrawal by the debtor, such
money shall be delivered by remittance payable to the order of the secretary.

(9)
Delivery to the secretary of the money or other property held or claimed shall
satisfy the requirement and serve as full acquittance of the order to withhold
and deliver.

(10)
A person, firm, corporation, or association, political subdivision, department
of the state, or agency, subdivision, or instrumentality of the United States
that complies with the order to withhold and deliver under this chapter is not
civilly liable to the debtor for complying with the order to withhold and
deliver under this chapter.

(11)
The secretary may hold the money or property delivered under this section in
trust for application on the indebtedness involved or for return, without
interest, in accordance with final determination of liability or nonliability.

(12)
Exemptions contained in RCW 74.20A.090 apply to orders to withhold and deliver
issued under this section.

(13)
The secretary shall also, on or before the date of service of the order to
withhold and deliver, mail or cause to be mailed a copy of the order to
withhold and deliver to the debtor at the debtor's last known post office
address, or, in the alternative, a copy of the order to withhold and deliver
shall be served on the debtor in the same manner as a summons in a civil action
on or before the date of service of the order or within two days thereafter.
The copy of the order shall be mailed or served together with a concise
explanation of the right to petition for judicial review. This requirement is
not jurisdictional, but, if the copy is not mailed or served as in this section
provided, or if any irregularity appears with respect to the mailing or
service, the superior court, in its discretion on motion of the debtor promptly
made and supported by affidavit showing that the debtor has suffered
substantial injury due to the failure to mail the copy, may set aside the order
to withhold and deliver and award to the debtor an amount equal to the damages
resulting from the secretary's failure to serve on or mail to the debtor the
copy.

(14)
An order to withhold and deliver issued in accordance with this section has
priority over any other wage assignment, garnishment, attachment, or other
legal process.

(15)
The division of child support shall notify any person, firm, corporation,
association, or political subdivision, department of the state, or agency,
subdivision, or instrumentality of the United States required to withhold and
deliver the earnings of a debtor under this action that they may deduct a
processing fee from the remainder of the debtor's earnings, even if the
remainder would otherwise be exempt under RCW 74.20A.090. The processing fee
shall not exceed ten dollars for the first disbursement to the department and
one dollar for each subsequent disbursement under the order to withhold and
deliver.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 74.20A RCW to read as follows:

If this chapter requires service in the manner prescribed for
service of a summons in a civil action or by certified mail, valid service also
includes delivery by a parcel delivery service that requires signature or
return receipt.

---
END ---