BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
42.30.140 and 1990 c 98 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

If
any provision of this chapter conflicts with the provisions of any other
statute, the provisions of this chapter shall control((: PROVIDED, That)).
This chapter shall not apply to:

(1)
The proceedings concerned with the formal issuance of an order granting,
suspending, revoking, or denying any license, permit, or certificate to engage
in any business, occupation, or profession or to any disciplinary proceedings
involving a member of such business, occupation, or profession, or to receive a
license for a sports activity or to operate any mechanical device or motor
vehicle where a license or registration is necessary; ((or))

(2)
That portion of a meeting of a quasi-judicial body which relates to a
quasi-judicial matter between named parties as distinguished from a matter
having general effect on the public or on a class or group; ((or))

(3)
Matters governed by chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure Act; ((or))

(4)(a)
Collective bargaining sessions with employee organizations, including contract
negotiations, grievance meetings, and discussions relating to the
interpretation or application of a labor agreement; or (b) that portion of a
meeting during which the governing body is planning or adopting the strategy or
position to be taken by the governing body during the course of any collective
bargaining, professional negotiations, or grievance or mediation proceedings,
or reviewing the proposals made in the negotiations or proceedings while in
progress; or

(5) Discussions and actions by the state transportation
commission concerning security on or at transportation facilities.

---
END ---