BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
47.36.005 and 1991 c 94 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Erect" means to construct, build, raise, assemble, place, affix,
attach, create, paint, draw, or in any other way bring into being or establish.

(2)
"Interstate system" means a state highway that is or becomes part of
the national system of interstate and defense highways as described in section
103(d) of Title 23, United States Code.

(3)
"Maintain" means to allow to exist.

(4)
"Primary system" means a state highway that is or becomes part of the
federal-aid primary system as described in section 103(b) of title 23, United
States Code.

(5)
"Scenic system" means (a) a state highway within a public park,
federal forest area, public beach, public recreation area, or national
monument, (b) a state highway or portion of a highway outside the boundaries of
an incorporated city or town designated by the legislature as a part of the
scenic system, or (c) a state highway or portion of a highway outside the
boundaries of an incorporated city or town designated by the legislature as a
part of the scenic and recreational highway system except for the sections of
highways specifically excluded in RCW 47.42.025.

(6)
"((Specific)) Motorist information sign panel"
means a panel, rectangular in shape, located in the same manner as other
official traffic signs readable from the main traveled ways, and consisting of:

(a)
The words "GAS," "FOOD," ((or)) "LODGING,"
"CAMPING," "RECREATION," or "TOURIST ACTIVITIES"
and directional information; and

(b)
One or more individual business signs mounted on the panel.

(7)
"Business sign" means a separately attached sign mounted on the ((specific))
motorist information sign panel or roadside area information
panel to show the brand or trademark and name, or both, of the motorist service
available on the crossroad at or near the interchange. Nationally, regionally,
or locally known commercial symbols or trademarks for service stations,
restaurants, and motels shall be used when applicable. The brand or trademark
identification symbol used on the business sign shall be reproduced with the
colors and general shape consistent with customary use. Messages, trademarks,
or brand symbols that interfere with, imitate, or resemble an official warning
or regulatory traffic sign, signal, or device are prohibited.

(8)
"Roadside area information panel or display" means a panel or display
located so as not to be readable from the main traveled way, erected in a
safety rest area, scenic overlook, or similar roadside area, for providing
motorists with information in the specific interest of the traveling public.

(9)
"Tourist-oriented directional sign" means a sign on a ((specific))
motorist information sign panel on the state highway system to
provide directional information to a qualified tourist-oriented business,
service, or activity.

(10)
"Qualified tourist-oriented business" means a lawful cultural,
historical, recreational, educational, or entertaining activity or a unique or
unusual commercial or nonprofit activity, the major portion of whose income or
visitors are derived during its normal business season from motorists not
residing in the immediate area of the activity.

(11)
"Adopt-a-highway sign" means a sign on a state highway right of way
referring to the departments' adopt-a-highway litter control program.

Sec.
2. RCW
47.36.300 and 1986 c 114 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislative authority of any county, city, or town may erect, or permit the
erection of, supplemental directional signs directing motorists to motorist
service businesses qualified for ((specific)) motorist
information sign panels pursuant to RCW 47.36.310 or 47.36.320 in
any location on, or adjacent to, the right of way of any roads or streets
within their jurisdiction.

(2)
Appropriate fees may be charged to cover the cost of issuing permits,
installation, or maintenance of such signs.

(3)
Supplemental signs and their locations shall comply with all applicable
provisions of this chapter, ((sections 131 and 315 of Title 23 United States
Code)) the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices, and such rules
as may be adopted by the department ((including the manual on uniform
traffic control devices for streets and highways)).

Sec.
3. RCW
47.36.310 and 1987 c 469 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The department is authorized to erect and maintain ((specific))
motorist information sign panels within the right of way of the
interstate highway system to give the traveling public specific information as
to gas, food, ((or)) lodging, camping, or tourist-oriented business
available on a crossroad at or near an interchange. ((Specific)) Motorist
information sign panels shall include the words "GAS,"
"FOOD," ((or)) "LODGING," "CAMPING," or
"TOURIST ACTIVITIES" and directional information and may contain
one or more individual business signs maintained on the panel. ((Specific))
Motorist information sign panels are authorized within the
corporate limits of cities and towns and areas zoned for commercial or
industrial uses at locations where there is adequate distance between
interchanges to ensure compliance with the ((provisions of Title 23 C.F.R.
sec. 655.307(a))) Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices. The
erection and maintenance of ((specific)) motorist information sign
panels shall also conform to the ((national standards promulgated by
the United States secretary of transportation pursuant to sections 131 and 315
of Title 23, United States Code)) Manual on Uniform Traffic Control
Devices and rules adopted by the state department of transportation. A
motorist service or tourist-oriented business located within one mile of
((a state)) an interstate highway shall not be permitted to
display its name, brand, or trademark on a ((specific)) motorist
information sign panel unless its owner has first entered into an
agreement with the department limiting the height of its on-premise signs at
the site of its service installation to not more than fifteen feet higher than
the roof of its main building measured to the bottom of the on-premise
sign. The restriction for on-premise signs does not apply if the sign is not
visible from the highway. The department may, on a case-by-case basis, waive
the height restriction when an on-premise sign is visible from the rural
interstate system. The department shall charge reasonable fees for the
display of individual business signs to defray the costs of their installation
and maintenance, and may charge reasonable fees to recover costs for the
erection and maintenance of the motorist information sign panels. ((The
restriction for on-premise signs shall not apply if the sign is not visible
from the highway. The department may, on a case-by-case basis, waive the
height restriction when an on-premise sign is visible from the rural interstate
system.))

Sec.
4. RCW
47.36.320 and 1986 c 114 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department is authorized to erect and maintain ((specific)) motorist
information sign panels within the right of way of ((both the primary
system and the scenic system)) noninterstate highways to give the
traveling public specific information as to gas, food, lodging,
recreation, or ((lodging available off the primary or scenic highway)) tourist-oriented
businesses accessible by way of highways intersecting the ((primary or
scenic)) noninterstate highway. ((Such specific)) The
motorist information sign panels ((and tourist-oriented
directional signs shall be)) are permitted only at locations within
the corporate limits of cities and towns and areas zoned for commercial or
industrial uses where there is adequate distance between interchanges to ensure
compliance with the ((provisions of Title 23 C.F.R. secs. 655.308(a) and
655.309(a))) Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices. ((Specific))
Motorist information sign panels shall include the words
"GAS," "FOOD," "LODGING,"
"RECREATION," or "((LODGING)) TOURIST ACTIVITIES"
and directional information and may contain one or more individual business
signs maintained on the panel. The erection and maintenance of ((specific))
motorist information sign panels along ((primary or scenic))
noninterstate highways shall also conform to the ((national
standards promulgated by the United States secretary of transportation pursuant
to sections 131 and 315 of Title 23 United States Code)) Manual on
Uniform Traffic Control Devices and rules adopted by the state department
of transportation ((including the manual on uniform traffic control devices
for streets and highways)). A motorist service or tourist-oriented
business located within one mile of a ((state)) noninterstate
highway shall not be permitted to display its name, brand, or trademark on a ((specific))
motorist information sign panel unless its owner has first
entered into an agreement with the department limiting the height of its
on-premise signs at the site of its service installation to not more than
fifteen feet higher than the roof of its main building measured to the bottom
of the on-premise sign.

The
department shall adopt rules for the erection and maintenance of
tourist-oriented directional signs with the following restrictions:

(1)
Where installed, they shall be placed in advance of the "GAS,"
"FOOD," "LODGING," or "RECREATION((,"
or "LODGING" specific))" motorist information sign
panels previously described in this section;

(2)
Signs shall not be placed to direct a motorist to an activity visible from the
main traveled roadway;

(3)
Premises on which the qualified tourist-oriented business is located must be
within fifteen miles of the state highway, and necessary supplemental signing
on local roads must be provided before the installation of the signs on the
state highway.

The
department shall charge reasonable fees for the display of individual business
signs to defray the costs of their installation and maintenance, and may
charge reasonable fees for the erection and maintenance of the motorist
information sign panels.

Sec.
5. RCW
47.36.330 and 1985 c 142 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Not more than six business signs may be permitted on ((specific)) motorist
information sign panels authorized by RCW 47.36.310 and 47.36.320.

(2)
The maximum distance that eligible service facilities may be located on either
side of an interchange or intersection to qualify for a business sign are as
follows:

(a)
On ((fully-controlled, limited access)) interstate highways, gas,
food, or lodging activities shall be located within three miles. Camping or
tourist-oriented activities shall be within five miles.

(b)
On noninterstate highways ((with partial access control or no access
control)), gas, food, lodging, ((or camping)) recreation, or
tourist-oriented activities shall be located within five miles.

(3)
If no eligible services are located within the distance limits prescribed in
subsection (2) of this section, the distance limits shall be increased until an
eligible service of a type being considered is reached, up to a maximum of fifteen
miles.

Sec.
6. RCW
47.36.340 and 1985 c 376 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

To
be eligible for placement of a business sign on a ((specific)) motorist
information sign panel a lodging activity shall:

(1)
Be licensed or approved by the department of social and health services or
county health authority;

(2)
Provide adequate sleeping and bathroom accommodations available for rental on a
daily basis; and

(3) Provide public telephone facilities.

Sec.
7. RCW
47.36.350 and 1991 c 94 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The department shall ensure that ((specific)) motorist
information sign panels are installed within nine months of receiving
the request for installation.

---
END ---