BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW to read as follows:

"Lightweight
stud" means a stud intended for installation and use in a vehicle tire.
As used in this title, this means a stud that is recommended by the
manufacturer of the tire for the type and size of the tire and that:

(1)
Weighs no more than 1.5 grams if the stud conforms to Tire Stud Manufacturing
Institute (TSMI) stud size 14 or less;

(2)
Weighs no more than 2.3 grams if the stud conforms to TSMI stud size 15 or 16;
or

(3)
Weighs no more than 3.0 grams if the stud conforms to TSMI stud size 17 or
larger.

A
lightweight stud may contain any materials necessary to achieve the lighter
weight.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 46.37 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning
January 1, 2000, a person offering to sell to a tire dealer conducting business
in the state of Washington, a metal flange or cleat intended for installation
as a stud in a vehicle tire shall certify that the studs are lightweight studs
as defined in section 1 of this act. Certification must be accomplished by
clearly marking the boxes or containers used to ship and store studs with the
designation "lightweight." This section does not apply to tires or
studs in a wholesaler's existing inventory as of January 1, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 46.37 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning
July 1, 2001, a person may not sell a studded tire or sell a stud for
installation in a tire unless the stud qualifies as a lightweight stud under
section 1 of this act.

Sec.
4. RCW
46.37.420 and 1990 c 105 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
It is unlawful to operate a vehicle upon the public highways of this state
unless it is completely equipped with pneumatic rubber tires except vehicles
equipped with temporary-use spare tires that meet federal standards that are
installed and used in accordance with the manufacturer's instructions.

(2)
No tire on a vehicle moved on a highway may have on its periphery any block,
flange, cleat, or spike or any other protuberance of any material other than
rubber which projects beyond the tread of the traction surface of the tire,
except that it is permissible to use farm machinery with tires having
protuberances that will not injure the highway, and except also that it is
permissible to use tire chains or metal studs imbedded within the tire of
reasonable proportions and of a type conforming to rules adopted by the state
patrol in accordance with section 1 of this act, upon any vehicle when
required for safety because of snow, ice, or other conditions tending to cause
a vehicle to skid. It is unlawful to use metal studs imbedded within the tire
between April 1st and November 1st. The state department of transportation
may, from time to time, determine additional periods in which the use of tires
with metal studs imbedded therein is lawful.

(3)
The state department of transportation and local authorities in their
respective jurisdictions may issue special permits authorizing the operation
upon a highway of traction engines or tractors having movable tracks with
transverse corrugations upon the periphery of the movable tracks or farm
tractors or other farm machinery, the operation of which upon a highway would
otherwise be prohibited under this section.

(4)
Tires with metal studs imbedded therein may be used between November 1st and
April 1st upon school buses and fire department vehicles, any law or regulation
to the contrary notwithstanding.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5.
Section 4 of this act takes effect July 1, 2005.

---
END ---