BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
67.38.160 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 22 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

A
cultural arts, stadium and convention district established in accordance with
this chapter shall be dissolved and its affairs liquidated by either of the
following methods:

(1)
When so directed by a majority of persons in the district voting on such
question. An election placing such question before the voters may be called in
the following manner:

(((1)))
(a) By resolution of the cultural arts, stadium and convention district
governing authority;

(((2)))
(b) By resolution of the county legislative body or bodies with the
concurrence therein by resolution of the city council of a component city; or

(((3)))
(c) By petition calling for such election signed by at least ten percent
of the qualified voters residing within the district filed with the auditor of the
county wherein the largest portion of the district is located. The auditor
shall examine the same and certify to the sufficiency of the signatures
thereon: PROVIDED, That to be validated, signatures must have been collected
within a ninety-day period as designated by the petition sponsors.

With
dissolution of the district, any outstanding obligations and bonded
indebtedness of the district shall be satisfied or allocated by mutual
agreement to the county or counties and component cities of the cultural arts,
stadium and convention district.

(2) By submission of a petition for an order of dissolution
signed by a majority of each legislative authority of each county and component
city of the district and of each municipality that has a representative on the
governing body of the district to the superior court of a county of the
district. All of the signatures must have been collected within one hundred
twenty days of the date of submission to the court. The procedures for
dissolution provided in RCW 53.48.030 through 53.48.120 shall apply, except
that the balance of any assets, after payment of all costs and expenses, shall
be divided among the county or counties and component cities of the district on
a per capita basis. Any duties to be performed by a county official pursuant
to RCW 53.48.030 through 53.48.120 shall be performed by the relevant official
of the county in which the petition for dissolution is filed.

---
END ---