BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
Economic development programs are vital to the maintenance and expansion of
family wage employment, state revenue, and general economic well-being. These
programs include work force training, industrial modernization, business
recruitment and retention, infrastructure development, and export assistance.
The purpose of this act is to develop and maintain an economic plan, using
existing data and analyses, as well as developing new strategies to maximize
and coordinate public and private economic development initiatives.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a)
The department of community, trade, and economic development shall create and
maintain an economic development plan for the state of Washington. The initial
plan shall be delivered to the legislature by September 15, 2000, and shall be
updated every two years thereafter. As used in this section, "plan"
means the state plan for economic development required by this subsection.

(b)
The plan shall be based on a study and review of economic development issues,
including work force training, industrial modernization, business recruitment
and retention, technology diffusion, sustainable development, export
assistance, tourism, investment, and entrepreneurial development.

(c)
The plan shall also be based on a review of current state and local policies
and programs that promote or affect economic development and a determination of
their cost-effectiveness, level of cooperation with other public and private
programs, and consistency with sustainable development precepts.

(d)
The plan shall also be based on the comprehensive work force development plan
developed by the work force training and education coordinating board.

(2)
The department's research, analysis, and consultation in preparation of the
plan may include, but is not limited to:

(a)
An analysis of economic development policies and programs of other states and
nations;

(b)
An analysis of the impact of various business or industrial sectors on the
state's economy;

(c)
An analysis of economic trends within the state and with regional and primary
international trading partners; and

(d)
Consultation with key individuals and groups within the private sector
including representatives of business and labor, the nonprofit sector, and the
academic community.

(3) The plan shall include any proposals for legislation and
administrative actions and plans necessary for its implementation.

---
END ---