BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
27.34.210 and 1995 c 399 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

There
is hereby established the office of archaeology and historic preservation
within the ((department)) Washington state historical society.

The
director of the state historical society shall appoint the preservation
officer to assist the director in implementing this chapter. The preservation
officer shall have a background in program administration, an active
involvement in historic preservation, and a knowledge of the national, state,
and local preservation programs as they affect the state of Washington.

Sec.
2. RCW
27.34.220 and 1997 c 145 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director of the state historical society or the director's designee is
authorized:

(1)
To promulgate and maintain the Washington heritage register of districts,
sites, buildings, structures, and objects significant in American or Washington
state history, architecture, archaeology, and culture, and to prepare
comprehensive state-wide historic surveys and plans and research and evaluation
of surveyed resources for the preparation of nominations to the Washington
heritage register and the national register of historic places, in accordance
with criteria approved by the advisory council established under RCW
27.34.250. Nominations to the national register of historic places shall
comply with any standards and regulations promulgated by the United States
secretary of the interior for the preservation, acquisition, and development of
such properties. Nominations to the Washington heritage register shall comply
with rules adopted under this chapter.

(2)
To establish a program of matching grants-in-aid to public agencies, public or
private organizations, or individuals for projects having as their purpose the
preservation for public benefit of properties that are significant in American
or Washington state history, architecture, archaeology, and culture.

(3)
To promote historic preservation efforts throughout the state, including
private efforts and those of city, county, and state agencies.

(4)
To enhance the effectiveness of the state preservation program through the
initiation of legislation, the use of varied funding sources, the creation of
special purpose programs, and contact with state, county, and city officials,
civic groups, and professionals.

(5)
To spend funds, subject to legislative appropriation and the availability of
funds, where necessary to assist the Indian tribes of Washington state in
removing prehistoric human remains for scientific examination and reburial, if
the human remains have been unearthed inadvertently or through vandalism and if
no other public agency is legally responsible for their preservation.

(6)
To consult with the governor and the legislature on issues relating to the
conservation of the man-made environment and their impact on the well-being of
the state and its citizens.

(7)
To charge fees for professional and clerical services provided by the office.

(8) To adopt such rules, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, as
are necessary to carry out RCW 27.34.200 through 27.34.280.

Sec.
3. RCW
27.34.230 and 1986 c 266 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director of the state historical society or the director's designee
shall:

(1)
Submit the budget requests for the office to the heritage council for review
and comment;

(2)
Receive, administer, and disburse such gifts, grants, and endowments from private
sources as may be made in trust or otherwise for the purposes of RCW 27.34.200
through ((27.34.290)) 27.34.280 or the federal act; and

(3) Develop and implement a cultural resource management plan.

Sec.
4. RCW
27.34.240 and 1986 c 266 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

The
amounts made available for grants to the public agencies, public or private
organizations, or individuals for projects for each fiscal year shall be
apportioned among program applicants by the director of the state historical
society or the director's designee, with the advice of the preservation
officer, in accordance with needs as contained in state-wide archaeology and
historic preservation plans developed by the department.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
functions and personnel of the office of archaeology and historic preservation
shall be transferred from the department of community, trade, and economic
development without any change in personnel status or compensation by September
1, 1999.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This
act takes effect September 1, 1999.

---
END ---