BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

The
maternity care access system shall solely and exclusively provide for prenatal,
delivery, and postnatal care intended to achieve healthy birth outcomes. Any
medical or health or social-related services associated with the termination of
a pregnancy including but not limited to information, counseling, and referral
is prohibited from being provided or funded through this program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

Any funding for medical care services or medical assistance
associated with the termination of a pregnancy including information,
counseling, and referral shall be accounted for and identified in a separate
and discrete manner so that these funds are accounted for under a separate and
distinct funding allotment and program element in the budget.

---
END ---