BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

In
computing the tax imposed under this chapter, a credit is allowed against the
amount of tax otherwise due under this chapter equal to the amount of
scholarships granted during the tax year for educational expenses of students
incurred in attending private K-12 schools, subject to the following
limitations:

(1)
No credit may be taken in excess of four percent of the tax liability for the
year;

(2)
No more than one hundred scholarships may be given by the company in the year
and used as credit under this section;

(3)
No more than one-half of a company's scholarships may be used for students who
are children of proprietors, partners, directors, shareholders, or employees of
the company;

(4)
No credit may be taken unless annual tax liability is equal to or greater than
two thousand five hundred dollars;

(5)
No credit in excess of one hundred thousand dollars may be claimed by an
individual business for the year; and

(6)
No credit may carry over to a subsequent tax year.

The
department shall provide a simplified procedure for claiming the credit
authorized under this section, including a simple report form.

As used
in this section, "educational expenses" means tuition expenses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---