BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that:

(1)
The regulated community is composed largely of people who try to comply with
the rules they are aware of, but who are often frustrated by the complexity of
the regulatory system.

(2)
Agencies use old laws to adopt new rules without returning to the legislature
for authorization.

It
is the intent of the legislature to correct this problem by requiring agencies
to return to the legislature after two years for authorization to adopt new
rules.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW to read as follows:

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, an
agency's statutory authority to adopt new rules or amend previously adopted
rules expires two years after the effective date of any statute that the agency
cites as its authority for adopting the new or amended rule, or two years after
the effective date of this act, whichever is later.

---
END ---