BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
41.06.160 and 1993 c 281 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

In
preparing classification and salary schedules as set forth in RCW 41.06.150 as
now or hereafter amended the department of personnel shall give full
consideration to prevailing rates in other public employment and in private
employment in this state. For this purpose the department shall undertake
comprehensive salary and fringe benefit surveys, with such surveys to be
conducted in the year prior to the convening of every other one hundred five
day regular session of the state legislature. In the year prior to the
convening of each one hundred five day regular session during which a
comprehensive salary and fringe benefit survey is not conducted, the department
shall plan and conduct a trend salary and fringe benefit survey. This survey
shall measure average salary and fringe benefit movement for broad occupational
groups which has occurred since the last comprehensive salary and fringe
benefit survey was conducted. The results of each comprehensive and trend
salary and fringe benefit survey shall be completed and forwarded by September
30 with a recommended state salary schedule to the governor and director of
financial management for their use in preparing budgets to be submitted to the
succeeding legislature. A copy of the data and supporting documentation shall
be furnished by the department of personnel to the standing committees for
appropriations of the senate and house of representatives.

In
the case of comprehensive salary and fringe benefit surveys, the department
shall furnish the following supplementary data in support of its recommended
salary schedule:

(1)
A total dollar figure which reflects the recommended increase or decrease in
state salaries as a direct result of the specific salary and fringe benefit
survey that has been conducted and which is categorized to indicate what
portion of the increase or decrease is represented by salary survey data and
what portion is represented by fringe benefit survey data;

(2)
An additional total dollar figure which reflects the impact of recommended
increases or decreases to state salaries based on other factors rather than
directly on prevailing rate data obtained through the survey process and which
is categorized to indicate the sources of the requests for deviation from
prevailing rates and the reasons for the changes;

(3)
A list of class codes and titles indicating recommended monthly salary ranges
for all state classes under the control of the department of personnel with
those salary ranges which do not substantially conform to the prevailing rates
developed from the salary and fringe benefit survey distinctly marked and an
explanation of the reason for the deviation included;

(4)
A supplemental salary schedule which indicates the additional salary to be paid
state employees for hazardous duties or other considerations requiring extra
compensation under specific circumstances. Additional compensation for these
circumstances shall not be included in the basic salary schedule but shall be
maintained as a separate pay schedule for purposes of full disclosure and
visibility; and

(5)
A supplemental salary schedule which indicates those cases where the board
determines that prevailing rates do not provide similar salaries for positions
that require or impose similar responsibilities, judgment, knowledge, skills,
and working conditions. This supplementary salary schedule shall contain
proposed salary adjustments necessary to eliminate any such dissimilarities in
compensation. Additional compensation needed to eliminate such salary
dissimilarities shall not be included in the basic salary schedule but shall be
maintained as a separate salary schedule for purposes of full disclosure and
visibility.

It
is the intention of the legislature that requests for funds to support
recommendations for salary deviations from the prevailing rate survey data
shall be kept to a minimum, and that the requests be fully documented when
forwarded by the department of personnel.

Salary
and fringe benefit survey information collected from private employers which
identifies a specific employer with the salary and fringe benefit rates which
that employer pays to its employees shall not be subject to public disclosure
under chapter 42.17 RCW.

The
first comprehensive salary and fringe benefit survey required by this section
shall be completed and forwarded to the governor and the director of financial
management by September 30, 1986. The first trend salary and fringe benefit
survey required by this section shall be completed and forwarded to the
governor and the director of financial management by September 30, 1988.

Effective July 1, 1999, the legislature shall fund annual salary
increases of two and one-half percent to those employees identified in the
comprehensive salary and fringe benefits survey and the trend salary and fringe
benefit survey as being more than ten percent behind the prevailing wage
rates. The most recent survey, comprehensive or trend, adjusted for salary
increases that were given to employees, shall be used to determine those
employees greater than ten percent behind the prevailing wage. The 1996 trend
salary survey, adjusted for salary increases that were given to employees,
shall be used as the base for the July 1, 1999, two and one-half percent salary
increase.

---
END ---