BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.20.100 and 1990 c 250 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of licensing shall not consider an application of any minor under
the age of eighteen years for a driver's license or the issuance of a
motorcycle endorsement ((for a particular category)) unless:

(1)
The application is also signed by a parent or guardian having the custody of
such minor, or in the event a minor under the age of eighteen has no father,
mother, or guardian, then a driver's license shall not be issued to the minor
unless his or her application is also signed by the minor's employer; and

(2)
The applicant has satisfactorily completed a traffic safety education course as
defined in RCW 28A.220.020, conducted by a recognized secondary school, that
meets the standards established by the office of the state superintendent of
public instruction or the applicant has satisfactorily completed a traffic
safety education course, conducted by a commercial driving instruction
enterprise, that meets the standards established by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction and is officially approved by that office
on an annual basis: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the director may upon a showing
that an applicant was unable to take or complete a driver education course
waive that requirement if the applicant shows to the satisfaction of the
department that a need exists for the applicant to operate a motor vehicle and
he or she has the ability to operate a motor vehicle in such a manner as not to
jeopardize the safety of persons or property, under rules to be promulgated by
the department in concert with the supervisor of the traffic safety education
section, office of the superintendent of public instruction. For a person
under the age of eighteen years to obtain a motorcycle endorsement, he or she
must successfully complete a motorcycle safety education course that meets the
standards established by the department of licensing.

The
department may waive any education requirement under this subsection for an
applicant previously licensed to drive a motor vehicle or motorcycle outside
this state if the applicant provides proof satisfactory to the department that
he or she has had education equivalent to that required under this subsection.

Sec.
2. RCW
46.20.500 and 1997 c 328 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

No
person may drive a motorcycle or a motor-driven cycle unless such person has a
valid driver's license specially endorsed by the director to enable the holder
to drive such vehicles((, nor may a person drive a motorcycle of a larger
engine displacement than that authorized by such special endorsement or by an
instruction permit for such category)). However, a person sixteen years of
age or older, holding a valid driver's license of any class issued by the state
of the person's residence, may operate a moped without taking any special
examination for the operation of a moped. No driver's license is required for
operation of an electric-assisted bicycle if the operator is at least sixteen
years of age. Persons under sixteen years of age may not operate an
electric-assisted bicycle.

Sec.
3. RCW
46.20.505 and 1993 c 115 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Every person applying for a special endorsement ((or a new
category of endorsement)) of a driver's license authorizing such person to
drive a motorcycle or a motor-driven cycle shall pay an examination fee of two
dollars which is not refundable. In addition, the endorsement fee for the
initial ((or new category)) motorcycle endorsement shall be six dollars,
and the subsequent renewal endorsement fee shall be fourteen dollars. The
initial ((or new category)) and renewal endorsement fees shall be
deposited in the motorcycle safety education account of the highway safety
fund.

Sec.
4. RCW
46.20.510 and 1989 c 337 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1)
There shall be three categories for the special motorcycle endorsement of a
driver's license. Category one shall be for motorcycles or motor-driven cycles
having an engine displacement of one hundred fifty cubic centimeters or less.
Category two shall be for motorcycles having an engine displacement of five
hundred cubic centimeters or less. Category three shall include categories one
and two, and shall be for motorcycles having an engine displacement of five
hundred one cubic centimeters or more.

(2))) The department may issue a motorcyclist's
instruction permit to an individual who wishes to learn to ride a motorcycle ((or
obtain an endorsement of a larger endorsement category)) for a period not
to exceed ninety days. This motorcyclist's instruction permit may be renewed
for an additional ninety days. The director shall collect a two dollar and
fifty cent fee for the motorcyclist's instruction permit or renewal, and the
fee shall be deposited in the motorcycle safety education account of the highway
safety fund. This permit and a valid driver's license ((with current
endorsement, if any, shall)) must be carried when operating a
motorcycle. An individual with a motorcyclist's instruction permit may not
carry passengers, and may not operate a motorcycle during the hours of
darkness ((or on a fully-controlled, limited-access facility, and shall be
under the direct visual supervision of a person with a motorcycle endorsement
of the appropriate category and at least five years' riding experience)).

Sec.
5. RCW
46.20.515 and 1982 c 77 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The motorcycle endorsement examination ((for each displacement
category shall)) must emphasize maneuvers necessary for on-street
operation, including emergency braking and turning as may be required to avoid
an impending collision.

---
END ---