BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the health and well-being of children and young adults
is of critical importance to the public welfare. The legislature further finds
that eating disorders are more prevalent among adolescents and young adults,
and that the incidence of the disease has increased in recent decades. The
legislature further finds that persons with eating disorders often fail to
receive the comprehensive care that studies have shown to be most useful in
treating these illnesses. This lack of adequate coverage has a detrimental
effect on the men and women most commonly afflicted with these illnesses, and
can result in long-term emotional and physical damage, including death from
starvation and suicide.

It
is the intent of the legislature to improve the general welfare of children,
adolescents, and adults by ensuring that health carriers provide sufficient
health care coverage to effectively treat eating disorders.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout sections 3 through 5 of this act,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Eating disorder" means the eating disorders covered by the
diagnostic categories listed in the most current version of the diagnostic and
statistical manual of mental disorders on the effective date of this section,
or such subsequent date as may be provided by the commissioner by rule,
consistent with the purposes of chapter . . ., Laws of 1999 (this
act).

(2)
"Health carrier" or "carrier" includes disability insurers
regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, health care services contractors
regulated under chapter 48.44 RCW, health maintenance organizations regulated
under chapter 48.46 RCW, plans operating under the health care authority under
chapter 41.05 RCW, the state health insurance pool operating under chapter
48.41 RCW, and insuring entities regulated under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
Every health carrier that provides coverage for hospital or medical care shall
provide coverage for treatment for eating disorders. Where appropriate,
treatment may involve a comprehensive approach, which may include, but is not
limited to, a primary care physician, an internist, a nutritionist, a
dietician, a psychotherapist, a psychopharmacologist, and family counseling.

(2)
The schedule of services for the treatment of eating disorders required by
sections 2 through 5 of this act must be at least as favorable as the coverage
made available for services and benefits for other major illnesses and must
include the durational limits, amount limits, deductibles, coinsurance factors,
visits, or day limits that are at least as favorable as those for services and
benefits for other major illnesses. However, no health carrier is required to
initiate the use of such a deductible or limit.

(3)
This section does not prohibit an insuring entity from requiring the use of
preauthorization screening prior to authorizing the treatment of eating
disorders or the requirement that the treatment of eating disorders be
medically necessary as determined by its medical director or his or her
designee.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. Every
health carrier must provide notice to policyholders regarding the coverage
required under sections 2 through 5 of this act. The notice must be in writing
and must be transmitted to the policyholder when the yearly summary of benefits
is mailed to the policyholder, or July 31, 2000, whichever is earlier.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. All
health benefit plans issued or renewed by any health carrier after December 31,
1999, are required to be in accordance with sections 2 through 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6.
Sections 2 through 5 of this act are each added to chapter 48.43 RCW.

---
END ---