BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.94A.360 and 1998 c 211 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
offender score is measured on the horizontal axis of the sentencing grid. The
offender score rules are as follows:

The
offender score is the sum of points accrued under this section rounded down to
the nearest whole number.

(1)
A prior conviction is a conviction which exists before the date of sentencing
for the offense for which the offender score is being computed. Convictions
entered or sentenced on the same date as the conviction for which the offender
score is being computed shall be deemed "other current offenses"
within the meaning of RCW 9.94A.400.

(2)
Class A and sex prior felony convictions shall always be included in the
offender score. Class B prior felony convictions other than sex offenses shall
not be included in the offender score, if since the last date of release from
confinement (including full-time residential treatment) pursuant to a felony
conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and sentence, the offender had spent
ten consecutive years in the community without committing any crime that
subsequently results in a conviction. Class C prior felony convictions other
than sex offenses shall not be included in the offender score if, since the
last date of release from confinement (including full-time residential
treatment) pursuant to a felony conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and
sentence, the offender had spent five consecutive years in the community
without committing any crime that subsequently results in a conviction. Serious
traffic convictions shall not be included in the offender score if, since the
last date of release from confinement (including full-time residential
treatment) pursuant to a felony conviction, if any, or entry of judgment and
sentence, the offender spent five years in the community without committing any
crime that subsequently results in a conviction. This subsection applies to
both adult and juvenile prior convictions.

(3)
Out-of-state convictions for offenses shall be classified according to the
comparable offense definitions and sentences provided by Washington law.
Federal convictions for offenses shall be classified according to the
comparable offense definitions and sentences provided by Washington law. If
there is no clearly comparable offense under Washington law or the offense is
one that is usually considered subject to exclusive federal jurisdiction, the
offense shall be scored as a class C felony equivalent if it was a felony under
the relevant federal statute.

(4)
Score prior convictions for felony anticipatory offenses (attempts, criminal
solicitations, and criminal conspiracies) the same as if they were convictions
for completed offenses.

(5)(a)
In the case of multiple prior convictions, for the purpose of computing the
offender score, count all convictions separately, except:

(i)
Prior offenses which were found, under RCW 9.94A.400(1)(a), to encompass the
same criminal conduct, shall be counted as one offense, the offense that yields
the highest offender score. The current sentencing court shall determine with
respect to other prior adult offenses for which sentences were served
concurrently or prior juvenile offenses for which sentences were served
consecutively, whether those offenses shall be counted as one offense or as separate
offenses using the "same criminal conduct" analysis found in RCW
9.94A.400(1)(a), and if the court finds that they shall be counted as one
offense, then the offense that yields the highest offender score shall be
used. The current sentencing court may presume that such other prior offenses
were not the same criminal conduct from sentences imposed on separate dates, or
in separate counties or jurisdictions, or in separate complaints, indictments,
or informations;

(ii)
In the case of multiple prior convictions for offenses committed before July 1,
1986, for the purpose of computing the offender score, count all adult
convictions served concurrently as one offense, and count all juvenile
convictions entered on the same date as one offense. Use the conviction for
the offense that yields the highest offender score.

(b)
As used in this subsection (5), "served concurrently" means that:
(i) The latter sentence was imposed with specific reference to the former; (ii)
the concurrent relationship of the sentences was judicially imposed; and (iii)
the concurrent timing of the sentences was not the result of a probation or
parole revocation on the former offense.

(6)
If the present conviction is one of the anticipatory offenses of criminal
attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy, count each prior conviction as if the
present conviction were for a completed offense.

(7)
If the present conviction is for a nonviolent offense and not covered by
subsection (11) or (12) of this section, count one point for each adult prior
felony conviction and one point for each juvenile prior violent felony
conviction and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior nonviolent felony conviction.

(8)
If the present conviction is for a violent offense and not covered in
subsection (9), (10), (11), or (12) of this section, count two points for each
prior adult and juvenile violent felony conviction, one point for each prior
adult nonviolent felony conviction, and 1/2 point for each prior juvenile
nonviolent felony conviction.

(9)
If the present conviction is for Murder 1 or 2, Assault 1, Assault of a Child
1, Kidnapping 1, Homicide by Abuse, or Rape 1, count three points for prior
adult and juvenile convictions for crimes in these categories, two points for
each prior adult and juvenile violent conviction (not already counted), one
point for each prior adult nonviolent felony conviction, and 1/2 point for each
prior juvenile nonviolent felony conviction.

(10)
If the present conviction is for Burglary 1, count prior convictions as in
subsection (8) of this section; however count two points for each prior adult
Burglary 2 or residential burglary conviction, and one point for each prior
juvenile Burglary 2 or residential burglary conviction.

(11)
If the present conviction is for a felony traffic offense count two points for
each adult or juvenile prior conviction for Vehicular Homicide or Vehicular
Assault; for each felony offense ((or serious traffic offense,)) count
one point for each adult and 1/2 point for each juvenile prior conviction;
for each serious traffic offense, other than those used for an enhancement
pursuant to RCW 46.61.520(2), count one point for each adult and 1/2 point for
each juvenile prior conviction. ((This subsection shall not apply when
additional time is added to a sentence pursuant to RCW 46.61.520(2).))

(12)
If the present conviction is for a drug offense count three points for each
adult prior felony drug offense conviction and two points for each juvenile
drug offense. All other adult and juvenile felonies are scored as in
subsection (8) of this section if the current drug offense is violent, or as in
subsection (7) of this section if the current drug offense is nonviolent.

(13)
If the present conviction is for Willful Failure to Return from Furlough, RCW
72.66.060, Willful Failure to Return from Work Release, RCW 72.65.070, or
Escape from Community Custody, RCW 72.09.310, count only prior escape
convictions in the offender score. Count adult prior escape convictions as one
point and juvenile prior escape convictions as 1/2 point.

(14)
If the present conviction is for Escape 1, RCW 9A.76.110, or Escape 2, RCW
9A.76.120, count adult prior convictions as one point and juvenile prior
convictions as 1/2 point.

(15)
If the present conviction is for Burglary 2 or residential burglary, count
priors as in subsection (7) of this section; however, count two points for each
adult and juvenile prior Burglary 1 conviction, two points for each adult prior
Burglary 2 or residential burglary conviction, and one point for each juvenile
prior Burglary 2 or residential burglary conviction.

(16)
If the present conviction is for a sex offense, count priors as in subsections
(7) through (15) of this section; however count three points for each adult and
juvenile prior sex offense conviction.

(17)
If the present conviction is for an offense committed while the offender was
under community placement, add one point.

Sec.
2. RCW
46.20.720 and 1998 c 210 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The court may order that after a period of suspension, revocation, or denial of
driving privileges, and for up to as long as the court has jurisdiction, any
person convicted of any offense involving the use, consumption, or possession
of alcohol while operating a motor vehicle may drive only a motor vehicle
equipped with a functioning ignition interlock or other biological or technical
device.

(2)
If a person is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 or an
equivalent local ordinance and it is: (a) The person's first conviction or
a deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW and his or her alcohol
concentration was at least 0.15, or by reason of the person's refusal to take a
test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the
person's alcohol concentration; or (b) the person's second or subsequent
conviction; or (c) the person's first conviction and the person has a previous
deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW or it is a deferred prosecution
under chapter 10.05 RCW and the person has a previous conviction, the court
shall order that after ((a)) any applicable period of suspension,
revocation, or denial of driving privileges, the person may drive only a motor
vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock or other biological or
technical device. The court may waive the requirement for the use of such a
device if the court makes a specific finding in writing that such devices are
not reasonably available in the local area. Nothing in this section may be
interpreted as entitling a person to more than one deferred prosecution.

(3)
The court shall establish a specific calibration setting at which the ignition
interlock or other biological or technical device will prevent the motor
vehicle from being started and the period of time that the person shall be
subject to the restriction. In the case of a person under subsection (2) of
this section, the period of time of the restriction will be as follows:

(a)
For a person (i) who is subject to RCW 46.61.5055 (1)(b), (2), or (3),
or who is subject to a deferred prosecution program under chapter 10.05 RCW,
and (ii) who has not previously been restricted under this section, a
period of not less than one year;

(b)
For a person who has previously been restricted under (a) of this subsection, a
period of not less than five years;

(c)
For a person who has previously been restricted under (b) of this subsection, a
period of not less than ten years.

For
purposes of this section, "convicted" means being found guilty of an
offense or being placed on a deferred prosecution program under chapter 10.05
RCW.

Sec.
3. RCW
10.05.140 and 1997 c 229 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As
a condition of granting a deferred prosecution petition, the court shall order
that the petitioner shall not operate a motor vehicle upon the public highways
without a valid operator's license and proof of liability insurance. The amount
of liability insurance shall be established by the court at not less than that
established by RCW 46.29.490. As a condition of granting a deferred
prosecution petition, the court ((may)) shall also order the
installation of an interlock or other device under RCW 46.20.720 for a
petitioner who has previously been convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or
46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance or a petitioner who has been charged
with such an offense and had an alcohol concentration of at least .15, or by
reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW 46.20.308
there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol concentration. For any
other petitioner, the court may order the installation of an interlock device
under RCW 46.20.720(1) as a condition of granting a deferred prosecution
petition. As a condition of granting a deferred prosecution petition, the
court may order the petitioner to make restitution and to pay costs as defined
in RCW 10.01.160. The court may terminate the deferred prosecution program
upon violation of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---