BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.44.160 and 1995 c 28 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Before
distributing moneys to the cities and towns from the ((general fund)) city
police and fire protection assistance account, as provided in RCW
82.44.155, and from the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, as
provided in RCW 82.14.210, the state treasurer shall, on the first day of July
of each year, make an annual deduction therefrom of a sum equal to one-half of
the biennial appropriation made pursuant to this section, which amount shall be
at least seven cents per capita of the population of all cities or towns as
legally certified on that date, determined as provided in RCW 82.44.150, which
sum shall be apportioned and transmitted to the municipal research council,
herein created. Sixty-five percent of the annual deduction shall be from the
distribution to cities and towns under RCW 82.44.155, and thirty-five percent
of the annual deduction shall be from the distribution to the municipal sales
and use tax equalization account under RCW 82.14.210. The municipal research
council may contract with and allocate moneys to any state agency, educational
institution, or private consulting firm, which in its judgment is qualified to
carry on a municipal research and service program. Moneys may be utilized to
match federal funds available for technical research and service programs to
cities and towns. Moneys allocated shall be used for studies and research in
municipal government, publications, educational, conferences, and attendance
thereat, and in furnishing technical, consultative, and field services to
cities and towns in problems relating to planning, public health, municipal
sanitation, fire protection, law enforcement, postwar improvements, and public
works, and in all matters relating to city and town government. The programs
shall be carried on and all expenditures shall be made in cooperation with the
cities and towns of the state acting through the Association of Washington
Cities by its board of directors which is hereby recognized as their official
agency or instrumentality.

Funds
((appropriated to the municipal research council)) deducted under
this section shall be ((kept)) deposited in the treasury in
the general fund, and shall be disbursed by warrant or check to contracting
parties on invoices or vouchers certified by the chair of the municipal
research council or his or her designee. Payments to public agencies may be
made in advance of actual work contracted for, in the discretion of the
council.

Sixty-five
percent of any moneys remaining unexpended or uncontracted for by the municipal
research council at the end of any fiscal biennium shall be returned to the ((general
fund)) city police and fire protection assistance account and be
paid to cities and towns under RCW 82.44.155. The remaining thirty-five
percent shall be deposited into the municipal sales and use tax equalization
account.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---