BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.97 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a)
If the commission has zoned an existing property or parcel in such a way that
prohibits development of that property or parcel and the property or parcel is
within an incorporated city's limits or was purchased before January 1, 1987,
the commission shall:

(i)
Grant, by any process, a single building permit for that property or parcel; or

(ii)
Compensate the owner for the value of the property or parcel at its current,
residential, fair market value as if the permit had been granted.

(b)
The assessor of the county to which the property in question belongs shall
determine the compensatory amount.

(2) If the commission does not grant a permit or compensation as
required by subsection (1) of this section, then the legislature will not renew
the commission's appropriation for the next biennium.

---
END ---