BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
36.70A.300 and 1997 c 429 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The board shall issue a final order that shall be based exclusively on whether
or not a state agency, county, or city is in compliance with the requirements
of this chapter, chapter 90.58 RCW as it relates to adoption or amendment of
shoreline master programs, or chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates to adoption of
plans, development regulations, and amendments thereto, under RCW 36.70A.040 or
chapter 90.58 RCW.

(2)(a)
Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the final order shall be issued
within one hundred eighty days of receipt of the petition for review, or, if
multiple petitions are filed, within one hundred eighty days of receipt of the
last petition that is consolidated.

(b)
The board may extend the period of time for issuing a decision to enable the
parties to settle the dispute if additional time is necessary to achieve a
settlement, and (i) an extension is requested by all parties, or (ii) an
extension is requested by the petitioner and respondent and the board
determines that a negotiated settlement between the remaining parties could
resolve significant issues in dispute. The request must be filed with the
board not later than seven days before the date scheduled for the hearing on
the merits of the petition. The board may authorize one or more extensions for
up to ninety days each, subject to the requirements of this section.

(3)
In the final order, the board shall either:

(a)
Find that the state agency, county, or city is in compliance with the
requirements of this chapter, chapter 90.58 RCW as it relates to the adoption
or amendment of shoreline master programs, or chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates
to adoption of plans, development regulations, and amendments thereto, under
RCW 36.70A.040 or chapter 90.58 RCW; or

(b)
Find that the state agency, county, or city is not in compliance with the
requirements of this chapter, chapter 90.58 RCW as it relates to the adoption
or amendment of shoreline master programs, or chapter 43.21C RCW as it relates
to adoption of plans, development regulations, and amendments thereto, under
RCW 36.70A.040 or chapter 90.58 RCW, in which case the board shall remand the
matter to the affected state agency, county, or city. The board shall specify
a reasonable time not in excess of one hundred eighty days, or such longer
period as determined by the board in cases of unusual scope or complexity,
within which the state agency, county, or city shall comply with the
requirements of this chapter. The board may require periodic reports to the
board on the progress the jurisdiction is making towards compliance.

(4)
Unless the board makes a determination of invalidity as provided in RCW
36.70A.302, a finding of noncompliance and an order of remand shall not affect
the validity of comprehensive plans and development regulations during the
period of remand.

(5)
Any party aggrieved by a final decision of the hearings board may appeal the
decision to superior court as provided in RCW 34.05.514 or 36.01.050 within
thirty days of the final order of the board. Judicial review of any
decision of the hearings board shall be de novo.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.21B.170 and 1995 c 382 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

All
proceedings before the hearings board or any of its members shall be conducted
in accordance with such rules of practice and procedure as the hearings board
may prescribe. The rules must include the following provisions: (1) The
department must furnish the hearings board and the party appealing the
department's decision a copy of all evidence relied upon by the department in
making its decision. The party appealing the department's decision must be
provided this information at least one day prior to the hearing before the
hearings board; (2) the department may only submit evidence to the hearings
board which supports the findings set forth in the department's decision being
appealed; and (3) if the department relied upon the observations of individuals
in making its decision, those individuals must be identified and made available
for examination and cross-examination before the hearings board. The
department has the burden of proof in all proceedings before the hearings board
that its decision is justified, including the burden of moving forward with the
evidence. The hearings board shall publish such rules and arrange for the
reasonable distribution thereof.

Sec.
3. RCW
43.21B.180 and 1994 c 253 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Judicial review of a decision of the hearings board may be obtained
only pursuant to RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598, except that judicial
review of a decision of the hearings board in superior court shall be de novo
with the burden of proof placed on the department. The director shall have
the same right of review from a decision made pursuant to RCW 43.21B.110 as
does any person.

Sec.
4. RCW
75.20.140 and 1995 c 382 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In all appeals, the hydraulic appeals board shall have all powers relating to
administration of oaths, issuance of subpoenas, and taking of depositions, but
such powers shall be exercised in conformity with chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2)
In all appeals, the hydraulic appeals board, and each member thereof, shall be
subject to all duties imposed upon and shall have all powers granted to, an
agency by those provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW relating to adjudicative
proceedings.

(3)
All proceedings before the hydraulic appeals board or any of its members shall
be conducted in accordance with such rules of practice and procedure as the
board may prescribe. Such rules shall be published and distributed.

(4)
Judicial review of a decision of the hydraulic appeals board may be obtained
only pursuant to RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598.

(5) Judicial review of a decision of the hydraulic appeals board
shall be de novo with the burden of proof placed upon the department.

Sec.
5. RCW
76.09.230 and 1994 c 253 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In all appeals over which the appeals board has jurisdiction, upon request of
one or more parties and with the consent of all parties, the appeals board
shall promptly schedule a conference for the purpose of attempting to mediate
the case. The mediation conference shall be held prior to the hearing on not
less than seven days' advance written notice to all parties. All other
proceedings pertaining to the appeal shall be stayed until completion of
mediation, which shall continue so long as all parties consent: PROVIDED, That
this shall not prevent the appeals board from deciding motions filed by the
parties while mediation is ongoing: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That discovery may be
conducted while mediation is ongoing if agreed to by all parties. Mediation
shall be conducted by an administrative appeals judge or other duly authorized
agent of the appeals board who has received training in dispute resolution
techniques or has a demonstrated history of successfully resolving disputes, as
determined by the appeals board. A person who mediates in a particular appeal
shall not participate in a hearing on that appeal or in writing the decision
and order in the appeal. Documentary and other physical evidence presented and
evidence of conduct or statements made during the course of mediation shall be
treated by the mediator and the parties in a confidential manner and shall not
be admissible in subsequent proceedings in the appeal except in accordance with
the provisions of the Washington rules of evidence pertaining to compromise
negotiations.

(2)
In all appeals the appeals board shall have all powers relating to
administration of oaths, issuance of subpoenas, and taking of depositions, but
such powers shall be exercised in conformity with chapter 34.05 RCW.

(3)
In all appeals the appeals board, and each member thereof, shall be subject to
all duties imposed upon and shall have all powers granted to, an agency by
those provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW relating to adjudicative proceedings.

(4)
All proceedings before the appeals board or any of its members shall be
conducted in accordance with such rules of practice and procedure as the board
may prescribe. The appeals board shall publish such rules and arrange for the
reasonable distribution thereof.

(5)
Judicial review of a decision of the appeals board may be obtained only
pursuant to RCW 34.05.510 through 34.05.598, except that judicial review of
a decision of the appeals board shall be de novo with the burden of proof
placed upon the department.

Sec.
6. RCW
90.58.180 and 1997 c 199 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any person aggrieved by the granting, denying, or rescinding of a permit on
shorelines of the state pursuant to RCW 90.58.140 may seek review from the
shorelines hearings board by filing a petition for review within twenty-one
days of the date of filing as defined in RCW 90.58.140(6).

Within
seven days of the filing of any petition for review with the board as provided
in this section pertaining to a final decision of a local government, the
petitioner shall serve copies of the petition on the department, the office of
the attorney general, and the local government. The department and the
attorney general may intervene to protect the public interest and insure that
the provisions of this chapter are complied with at any time within fifteen
days from the date of the receipt by the department or the attorney general of
a copy of the petition for review filed pursuant to this section. ((The
shorelines hearings board shall schedule review proceedings on the petition for
review without regard as to whether the period for the department or the
attorney general to intervene has or has not expired.))

(2)
The department or the attorney general may obtain review of any final decision
granting a permit, or granting or denying an application for a permit issued by
a local government by filing a written petition with the shorelines hearings
board and the appropriate local government within twenty-one days from the date
the final decision was filed as provided in RCW 90.58.140(6).

(3)
The review proceedings authorized in subsections (1) and (2) of this section
are subject to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW pertaining to procedures in
adjudicative proceedings. Judicial review of such proceedings of the
shorelines hearings board is governed by chapter 34.05 RCW, except that
judicial review of a decision by the board shall be de novo with the burden of
proof on the department. The board shall issue its decision on the appeal
authorized under subsections (1) and (2) of this section within one hundred
eighty days after the date the petition is filed with the board or a petition
to intervene is filed by the department or the attorney general, whichever is
later. The time period may be extended by the board for a period of thirty
days upon a showing of good cause or may be waived by the parties.

(4)
Any person may appeal any rules, regulations, or guidelines adopted or approved
by the department within thirty days of the date of the adoption or approval.
The board shall make a final decision within sixty days following the hearing
held thereon.

(5)
The board shall find the rule, regulation, or guideline to be valid and enter a
final decision to that effect unless it determines that the rule, regulation,
or guideline:

(a)
Is clearly erroneous in light of the policy of this chapter; or

(b)
Constitutes an implementation of this chapter in violation of constitutional or
statutory provisions; or

(c)
Is arbitrary and capricious; or

(d)
Was developed without fully considering and evaluating all material submitted
to the department during public review and comment; or

(e)
Was not adopted in accordance with required procedures.

(6)
If the board makes a determination under subsection (5)(a) through (e) of this
section, it shall enter a final decision declaring the rule, regulation, or
guideline invalid, remanding the rule, regulation, or guideline to the
department with a statement of the reasons in support of the determination, and
directing the department to adopt, after a thorough consultation with the
affected local government and any other interested party, a new rule,
regulation, or guideline consistent with the board's decision.

(7) A decision of the board on the validity of a rule, regulation,
or guideline shall be subject to review in superior court, if authorized pursuant
to chapter 34.05 RCW. A petition for review of the decision of the shorelines
hearings board on a rule, regulation, or guideline shall be filed within thirty
days after the date of final decision by the shorelines hearings board.

---
END ---