BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
29.30.025 and 1990 c 59 s 80 are each amended to read as follows:

After
the close of business on the last day for candidates to file for office, the
filing officer shall, from among those filings made in person and by mail,
determine by lot the order in which the names of those candidates will appear
on all primary, sample, and absentee ballots. ((In the case
of candidates for city, town, and district office, this procedure shall also
determine the order for candidate names on the official primary ballot used at
the polling place.)) The determination shall be done publicly and may be
witnessed by the media and by any candidate. If no primary is required for any
nonpartisan office under RCW 29.15.150 or 29.21.015, the names shall appear on
the general election ballot in the order determined by lot.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW
29.30.040 and 1990 c 59 s 94, 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 54, & 1965 c
9 s 29.30.040 are each repealed.

---
END ---