BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.305.220 and 1984 c 178 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The state board of education shall develop for use by all public school
districts a standardized high school transcript. The state board of education
shall establish clear definitions for the terms "credits" and
"hours" so that school programs operating on the quarter, semester,
or trimester system can be compared.

(2)
When determining standardized grade points under subsection (1) of this
section, the state board of education shall adopt a weighting system for grades
earned in honors and advanced placement classes.

(3) Transcripts are important documents to students who will
apply for admission to postsecondary institutions of higher education.
Transcripts are also important to students who will seek employment upon or
prior to graduation from high school. It is recognized that student
transcripts may be the only record available to employers in their
decision-making processes regarding prospective employees. The superintendent
of public instruction shall require school districts to inform annually all
high school students that prospective employers may request to see transcripts
and that the prospective employee's decision to release transcripts can be an
important part of the process of applying for employment.

---
END ---