BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. There
is established a decoration of the state medal of valor with accompanying
certificate, ribbons, and appurtenances for award by the governor, in the name
of the state, to any person who has saved, or attempted to save, the life of
another at the risk of serious injury or death to himself or herself, upon the
selection of the governor's state medal of valor committee.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. There
is created the state medal of valor committee for selecting honorees for the
award of the state medal of valor. The committee membership consists of the
governor, president of the senate, speaker of the house of representatives, and
the chief justice of the supreme court, or their designees. The secretary of
state shall serve as a nonvoting ex officio member, and shall serve as
secretary to the committee. The committee shall meet annually to consider
candidates for this award. Any individual may nominate any resident of this
state for any act of valor covered by this section. The committee shall adopt
rules establishing the qualifications for the state medal of valor, the
protocol governing the decoration, the certificate, and appurtenances necessary
to the implementation of this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The award will be presented by the governor of the state of Washington to the
recipient only during a joint session of both houses of the legislature.

(2)
If the governor is unable to present the award due to the disability or illness
of the governor, the governor may delegate the presenting of the award to the
president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, or the
chief justice of the supreme court.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
state medal of valor may be awarded posthumously to be presented to such
representative of the deceased as may be deemed appropriate by the committee.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
state medal of valor will not be awarded to any individual who is acting as a
result of service given by any branch of law enforcement, fire fighting,
rescue, or other hazardous profession where the individual is employed by a
government entity within the state of Washington.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. (1)
The decoration of the state medal of valor shall be of .999 pure silver and
shall consist of the seal of the state of Washington, surrounded by a raised
laurel wreath and suspended from a silver bar device inscribed "For
Valor" which is suspended from a ring attached by a dark green ribbon,
bordered by silver. The reverse of the decoration within the raised laurel
wreath shall be inscribed with the recipient's name and the words: "For
exceptionally valorous service, given in the act of saving the life of
another."

(2)
The certificate accompanying the medal will prominently display: (a) The
title, "Washington State Medal of Valor"; (b) the recipient's name;
and (c) the phrase, "For exceptionally valorous service, given in the act
of saving the life of another." A seven-line citation will also be
included on the certificate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7.
Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 1 RCW.

---
END ---