BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.305.120 and 1984 c 287 s 60 are each amended to read as follows:

The state board of education shall hold an annual meeting and such
other regular meetings at such time and place within the state as the board
shall determine and may hold such special meetings as may be deemed necessary
for the transaction of public business, such special meetings to be called by
the superintendent of public instruction, or by a majority of the board. The
persons serving as members of the state board of education shall be compensated
in accordance with RCW ((43.03.240)) 43.03.250 and shall be
reimbursed by the superintendent of public instruction for travel expenses in accordance
with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 incurred in the performance of their duties
which expenses shall be paid by the state treasurer on warrants out of funds
appropriated or otherwise available, upon the order of the superintendent.

---
END ---