BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.79.465 and 1998 c 302 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
education savings account is created in the state treasury. The account shall
consist of all moneys appropriated to the account by the legislature.

(1)
Ten percent of legislative appropriations to the education savings account
shall be distributed as follows: (a) Fifty percent to the distinguished
professorship trust fund under RCW 28B.10.868; (b) seventeen percent to the
graduate fellowship trust fund under RCW 28B.10.882; and (c) thirty-three
percent to the college faculty awards trust fund under RCW 28B.50.837.

(2) The remaining moneys in the education savings account may be
appropriated solely for (a) common school construction projects that are
eligible for funding from the common school construction account, and (b)
technology improvements in the common schools including technology training
for administrators and certificated and classified staff.

---
END ---