BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds and declares:

(1)
Washington has a strong and continually improving system of teacher preparation
and certification;

(2)
Incorporating teacher assessment for certification into the system will
contribute both to public confidence and to maintaining an already high quality
system of teacher preparation and certification in Washington;

(3)
Teacher assessment for certification can guard against admission to the
teaching profession of persons who have not demonstrated that they are
competent in the basic skills of reading, writing, communications, and math;
knowledgeable about the skills required to teach; and knowledgeable in the
subjects they will be assigned to teach;

(4)
Teacher assessment for certification should be implemented as a complementary
element to the existing system of teacher preparation and certification and add
value to the candidate's professional growth journey; and

(5)
Incorporating teacher assessment for certification should be done in a manner
that is aligned with the direction of the improvement of student achievement
act of 1993, chapter 336, Laws of 1993.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.410 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a)
By September 1, 2000, the state board of education shall select an assessment
developed by a national educational testing company that assesses an
applicant's knowledge in basic academic skills. Beginning August 1, 2001,
passing this assessment shall be required for admission to state board of
education-approved teacher preparation programs and for out-of-state applicants
for a Washington residency teaching certificate.

(b)
State board of education-approved teacher preparation programs may, on an
individual student basis, admit into their programs a candidate who has not achieved
the minimum assessment score established by the state board. Individuals so
admitted cannot receive residency certification without passing the basic
skills assessment under this section.

(2)
Beginning not later than September 1, 2001, the state board shall make
available one or more means of assessing an applicant's knowledge of teaching
as determined by the state board. For purposes of this assessment,
"knowledge of teaching" means the knowledge of teaching skills and
theory that is supported by research as necessary to be an effective teacher,
which is not subject specific, and which includes skills in classroom
management and discipline, organization and delivery of lessons, assessment
strategies, and working and communicating with parents. Beginning May 1, 2002,
passing this assessment shall be required to receive a residency certificate.

(3)
Beginning not later than September 1, 2001, the state board shall provide for
the initial implementation of one or more means of assessing an applicant's
knowledge in the subjects for which the applicant has applied for an
endorsement. The assessment of subject knowledge shall not include
instructional methodology. Beginning May 1, 2002, passing this assessment for
the applicable endorsements shall be required to receive a residency
certificate.

(4)
On each of the assessments under subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section,
an applicant shall be required to achieve at least the minimum assessment score
or scores established by the state board as a condition to being admitted into
a Washington teacher preparation program and being issued a residency teaching
certificate.

(a)
The state board of education shall establish the minimum assessment score or
scores required on the assessment in subsection (1) of this section.

(b)
The advisory committee, created in subsection (9) of this section, shall
recommend to the state board of education the minimum assessment score or
scores required on the assessment in subsections (2) and (3) of this section.
The state board of education shall accept the recommendation or reject the
recommendation and request the advisory committee to develop new
recommendations.

(5)
The state board of education and superintendent of public instruction, as
determined by the state board, may contract with one or more third parties for:

(a)
The development, purchase, administration, scoring, and reporting of scores of
the assessments established by the state board under this section;

(b)
Related clerical and administrative activities; or

(c)
Any combination of the purposes in this subsection.

(6)
Unless funds are appropriated for the costs associated with any of the
assessments under this section, applicants for admission to a Washington
teacher preparation program and applicants for residency teaching certificates
shall pay fees established by the state board of education for initial
assessments, reassessments, scoring of assessments, reporting of assessment
scores, and clerical and administrative activities related thereto. Such fees
shall be reasonably related to the direct and indirect costs of the state board
and superintendent of public instruction in implementing this section,
including contractual costs.

(7)
Fee revenues received by the state board and superintendent of public
instruction under this section shall be deposited in the teacher assessment
account hereby created in the custody of the state treasurer. Moneys deposited
in the account shall be expended exclusively for the direct and indirect costs
of implementing this section. Only the superintendent of public instruction or
the superintendent's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The
account is subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for disbursement.

(8)
The superintendent of public instruction is responsible for supervision and
providing support services to administer this section.

(9)
The state board of education shall establish an advisory committee, comprised
mostly of certificated teachers, and including elementary and secondary school
administrators, and representatives of institutions of higher education. By
January 1, 2000, the advisory committee shall make recommendations to the state
board of education regarding the development or selection of the assessments
required in subsections (2) and (3) of this section. The state board of
education shall accept the recommendations or reject the recommendations and
request the advisory committee to make new recommendations.

(10)
The state board shall adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW that the board
determines are reasonably necessary for the effective and efficient
implementation of this section. The board may adopt rules allowing exceptions
from taking any of the assessments under this section on a case-by-case basis.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.410 RCW to read as follows:

By
December 1, 2001, and annually thereafter, the state board of education shall
prepare a report on the number and percentage of candidates who are successful
in passing the assessments required under section 2 of this act. The
information shall be reported for the individual public and private colleges
and universities in Washington as well as reported on an aggregate basis. The
report shall also include results disaggregated demographically. The report
shall be made available through the state library and over the internet and
placed on the legislative alert list.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. RCW
28A.410.020 (Requirements for admission to teacher preparation
programs‑-Rules) and 1996 c 309 s 1, 1991 c 116 s 20, 1988 c 251 s 4,
& 1987 c 525 s 202, as now or hereafter amended, are each repealed,
effective September 1, 2001.

---
END ---