BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
It is the intent of the legislature to create the children's health insurance
program, the benefits of which are not an entitlement, to provide health care
to children who are eligible for health care coverage under Title XXI of the
federal social security act.

(2)
For the purposes of this section, "children's health insurance program"
means the program established in compliance with Title XXI of the federal
social security act for health care coverage of children: (a) Who are under
the age of nineteen; (b) whose family income at the time of enrollment exceeds
two hundred percent, but does not exceed two hundred fifty percent, of the
federal poverty level as adjusted for family size and determined annually by
the federal department of health and human services; (c) who choose to obtain
health care coverage in return for periodic payments; and (d) who are otherwise
eligible under Title XXI.

(3)
Consistent with appropriated funds, the department shall design and administer
the children's health insurance program under Title XXI of the federal social
security act. The benefit and cost-sharing designs shall comply with Title
XXI. The primary mechanism for purchasing and delivery of health care for the
program shall be through contracts with managed health care systems as defined
in RCW 74.09.522. Consistent with Title XXI, the department may purchase
health coverage for uninsured children whose families have access to dependent
coverage.

(4)
The department shall: Accept applications for enrollment in the children's
health insurance program; establish appropriate minimum-enrollment periods, as
may be necessary; and determine, upon application and based on a reasonable
schedule defined by the department, eligibility due to current family income.
No assistance may be paid with respect to any children's health insurance
enrollee whose current family income is less than two hundred percent or
greater than two hundred fifty percent of the federal poverty level or, is not
otherwise eligible under Title XXI of the federal social security act.

(5) The department shall make every effort to obtain a change in
federal law such that the state of Washington is authorized to use its
children's health insurance program allotment to provide health care coverage
for children whose family income at the time of enrollment is less than two
hundred percent of the federal poverty level. By December 1, 1999, the
department shall report to the legislature describing its efforts and the
congressional response.

---
END ---