BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
51.52.010 and 1981 c 338 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be a "board of industrial insurance appeals,"
hereinafter called the "board," consisting of three members appointed
by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, as hereinafter
provided. One shall be a representative of the public and a lawyer, appointed
from a mutually agreed to list of not less than three active members of the
Washington state bar association, submitted to the governor by the two
organizations defined below, and such member shall be the chairperson of said
board. The second member shall be a representative of the majority of workers
engaged in employment under this title and selected from a list of not less
than three names submitted to the governor by an organization, state-wide in
scope, which through its affiliates embraces a cross section and a majority of
the organized labor of the state. The third member shall be a representative
of employers under this title, and appointed from a list of at least three
names submitted to the governor by a recognized state-wide organization of
employers, representing a majority of employers. The initial terms of office
of the members of the board shall be for six, four, and two years
respectively. Thereafter all terms shall be for a period of six years. Each
member of the board shall be eligible for reappointment and shall hold office
until his or her successor is appointed and qualified. In the event of a
vacancy the governor is authorized to appoint a successor to fill the unexpired
term of his or her predecessor. All appointments to the board shall be made in
conformity with the foregoing plan. In the event a board member becomes
incapacitated in excess of thirty days either due to his or her illness or that
of an immediate family member as determined by a request for family leave or as
certified by the affected member's treating physician, the governor shall
appoint an acting member to serve pro tem. Such an appointment shall be made
in conformity with the foregoing plan, except that the list of candidates shall
be submitted to the governor not more than fifteen days after the affected
organizations are notified of the incapacity and the governor shall make the
appointment within fifteen days after the list is submitted. The temporary
member shall serve until such time as the affected member is able to reassume
his or her duties by returning from requested family leave or as determined by
the treating physician or until the affected member's term expires, whichever
occurs first. Whenever the workload of the board and its orderly and
expeditious disposition shall necessitate, the governor may appoint two
additional pro-tem members in addition to the regular members. Such
appointments shall be for a definite period of time, and shall be made from
lists submitted respectively by labor and industry as in the case of regular
members. One pro-tem member shall be a representative of labor and one shall
be a representative of industry. Members shall devote their entire time to the
duties of the board and shall receive for their services a salary as fixed by
the governor in accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.040 which shall be
in addition to travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060
as now existing or hereafter amended. Headquarters for the board shall be
located in Olympia. The board shall adopt a seal which shall be judicially
recognized.

---
END ---