BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
fifty-fifth legislature appropriated over two hundred seventy-five million
dollars to the state board of education to finance school construction and
modernization projects for the 1997-1999 biennium with the intent of fully
funding the state's share of the school construction projects. The total
amount of state financial assistance requested by local school districts and
approved by the state board of education for the biennium is in excess of the
money appropriated. It is the intent of the legislature to provide a
supplemental appropriation to provide sufficient money to fund all the school
construction and modernization projects approved by the state board of
education for the 1997-1999 biennium.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The sum of thirteen million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June
30, 1999, from the general fund to the common school construction fund for the
purposes of this act.

(2)
The sum of thirteen million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June
30, 1999, from the common school construction fund to the state board of
education for public school construction and modernization projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---