BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the environmental, recreational, and aesthetic values of
many of the state's lakes are threatened by the invasion of noxious aquatic
weeds. Once established, these noxious aquatic weeds can colonize the shallow
shorelines of lakes with dense surface vegetation mats that degrade water
quality, pose a threat to swimmers, and restrict use of lakes. Many
commercially available herbicides have been demonstrated to be effective in
controlling noxious aquatic weeds and do not pose a risk to the environment or
public health. The purpose of this act is to allow the use of commercially
available herbicides that have been approved by the environmental protection
agency and the department of agriculture and subject to rigorous evaluation by
the department of ecology through an environmental impact statement for the
aquatic plant management program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW to read as follows:

The
department of ecology shall update the final supplemental environmental impact
statement completed in 1992 for the aquatic plant management program to reflect
new information on herbicides evaluated in 1992 and new, commercially available
herbicides. The department shall maintain the currency of the information on
herbicides and evaluate new herbicides as they become commercially available.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to restrictions in this section, a government entity seeking to control
a limited infestation of Eurasian water milfoil may use the pesticide 2,4-D to
treat the milfoil infestation, without obtaining a permit under RCW 90.48.445,
if the milfoil infestation is either recently documented or remaining after the
application of other control measures, and is limited to twenty percent or less
of the littoral zone of the lake. Any pesticide application made under this
section must be made according to all label requirements for the product and
must meet the public notice requirements of subsection (2) of this section.

(2)
Before applying 2,4-D, the government entity shall: (a) Provide at least
twenty-one days' notice to the department of ecology, the department of fish
and wildlife, the department of agriculture, the department of health, and all
lake residents; (b) post notices of the intent to apply 2,4-D at all public
access points; and (c) place informational buoys around the treatment area.

(3)
The department of fish and wildlife may impose timing restrictions on the use
of 2,4-D to protect salmon and other fish and wildlife.

(4)
The department may prohibit the use of 2,4-D if the department finds the
product contains dioxin.

(5)
Government entities using this section to apply 2,4-D may apply for funds from
the freshwater aquatic weeds account consistent with the freshwater aquatic
weeds management program as provided in RCW 43.21A.660.

(6)
Government entities using this section shall consider development of long-term
control strategies for eradication and control of the Eurasian water milfoil.

(7)
For the purpose of this section, "government entities" includes
cities, counties, state agencies, tribes, special purpose districts, and county
weed boards.

---
END ---