BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 84.55 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
In calculating the limit on the state property tax levy under RCW 84.55.010 for
any calendar year, state levies shall be set at the amount that would be
allowed otherwise under this chapter if the state levy for collection in 2000
and thereafter had been set without any reduction under subsection (3) of this
section.

(2)
The attorney general shall certify to the department of revenue by October 1st
of each year the amount of money to be received by the state in the following
calendar year under the December 1998 settlement of the state's litigation
against the major tobacco companies, exclusive of recoveries for costs and
fees.

(3)
The state property tax levy determined under subsection (1) of this section for
collection in calendar year 2000 and thereafter shall be reduced by the amount
certified to be received during that calendar year under subsection (2) of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act applies to taxes levied for collection in 2000 and thereafter.

---
END ---