BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.230.170 and 1985 c 341 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
study of the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of the
state of Washington shall be a condition prerequisite to graduation from the
public and private high schools of this state. The state board of education
acting upon the advice of the superintendent of public instruction shall
provide by rule or regulation for the implementation of this section. Before
beginning the study of the Constitution of the United States and the Washington
state Constitution, each school district shall provide for its students copies
of Our Constitution and What it Means, by William Kottmeyer and Thomas
F. Eagleton. State funds shall be used to purchase copies.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 1999, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

---
END ---