BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that declining opportunities to catch anadromous salmon and
steelhead trout have resulted in a need to improve trout fishing in order to
satisfy the public's demand for recreational fishing. The legislature intends
to satisfy this need using as a model the 1998 trout stocking program, in which
a private Okanogan county fish farm supplied sixty thousand one to two-pound
rainbow trout to the department of fish and wildlife, Colville confederated tribes,
and volunteer groups. These trophy trout provided enhanced recreational
fishing opportunities in central Washington lakes. Farmed rainbow trout have
the potential to grow to trophy size because they are sterile, feed
aggressively, and continue to grow through their life cycle. This program will
be called the "trophy trout partnership act."

A
relatively small investment by the legislature for purchasing privately grown
trophy triploid trout has the potential to be a major program for rural
economic development. Trophy-sized trout, approximately one and one-half
pounds each, can be produced by private sector fish farmers for approximately
two dollars per fish, delivered to the release site. Fish farmers can produce
these fish in a triploid genetic configuration for the purpose of certifying
that the fish are sterile and cannot interbreed with wild trout. These
privately produced trophy trout are ideal for planting into public lakes and
ponds, to provide immediate recreational fishing at a reasonable cost.

The
effect of planting trophy trout will be increased fishing license sales,
increased angler participation, increased tourism activities, and a boost to
local economies.

The
state purchase of privately produced trophy trout is not intended to replace
trout produced by hatcheries of the department of fish and wildlife. Rather,
the purchase is intended to supplement existing department trout hatchery
programs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The fish and wildlife commission may institute a program to purchase trophy
trout from private fish farmers in order to increase the recreational fishing
opportunities within state waters. For purposes of this section, "trophy
trout" means trout weighing approximately one and one-half pounds.

(2)
The fish and wildlife commission may purchase up to one hundred thousand trophy
trout during the 1999 calendar year from private fish farmers for the purpose
of planting by the contractee into department-identified public freshwater
lakes and ponds, to improve recreational fishing.

(3)
The fish and wildlife commission may purchase up to one million trophy trout
during the 2000 calendar year from private fish farmers for the purpose of
planting by the contractee into department-identified public freshwater lakes
and ponds, to improve recreational fishing.

(4)
Insofar as permitted by law, the fish and wildlife commission shall make the
purchases authorized under this section from private fish farmers located
within Washington state.

(5)
The fish and wildlife commission shall not make purchases of trophy trout under
this section unless the department of fish and wildlife hatchery system is
funded at the fiscal year 1997 equivalent level.

(6)
The fish and wildlife commission shall not, because of the purchase of trophy
trout, reduce the appropriation for hatcheries operated by the department of
fish and wildlife or reduce the number of hatchery employees.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 1999, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
Sections 1 and 2 of this act are each added to Title 77 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---