BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. Prior
to transferring six thousand four hundred acres or more of state trust land to
any status apart from the trust, the department of natural resources shall:

(1)
Make a full appraisal of land values, timber values, or any other values;

(2)
Contact all adjacent landowners to inform them of the proposed transfer;

(3)
Prepare a local economic and social impact statement at the expense of the
entity that would receive the land;

(4)
Develop an assessment of long-term community impacts;

(5)
Work with existing land users and lessees to encourage historical uses of the
land; and

(6)
Develop requirements for the new entity managing the land for the control of
noxious weeds and invasive nonindigenous species.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. Prior
to transferring state trust land to any status apart from the trust, the board
of natural resources shall:

(1)
Hold at least two public hearings in the area of the lands being traded and in
the area of the lands being acquired;

(2)
Publicize the trade with legal notices and with advertisements in local papers;
and

(3)
Provide supporting data with a recommendation to the legislature.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. If
the transfer of state trust land involves forest lands, the forest practices
board shall, prior to the transfer of the state trust land:

(1)
Review past forest practices on the lands to be transferred and prepare a
recommendation on future timber management options; and

(2)
Prepare special forest practice rules for the lands, if needed, to carry out
the intended uses of the future landowners.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. Prior
to the transfer of state trust land, the legislature shall:

(1)
Review the land transfers recommended by the board of natural resources;

(2)
Review funding for the transfer and economic and social impacts; and

(3)
Approve or disapprove the final proposal by concurrent resolution.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. All
costs of the transfer of state trust land, and the implementation of this act,
shall be paid by the entity receiving the land.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
board of natural resources must develop criteria to be considered when lands
are proposed for transfer and submit them to the legislature by January 1,
2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
board of natural resources must develop funding mechanisms to offset economic
impacts to local governments and local communities and submit its results to
the legislature by January 1, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 1 through 5 of this act are each added to chapter 79.08 RCW.

---
END ---