BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. Until
recently, little attention has been given to the detection, treatment, and
prevention of disease as specifically related to the unique needs and
experiences of women. The purpose of establishing the women's health advisory
committee is to provide input to the department in order to achieve equity in
policy considerations and decisions affecting women's health, including the
administration, funding, and delivery of medical care and health care-related
services, and additional opportunities for basic and applied research directly
affecting women's health.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
women's health advisory committee is created. The governor shall appoint the
ten members of the committee. Committee members shall serve for a term of two
years which may be renewed. The committee shall include one member from each
major caucus of the house of representatives and the senate, two
representatives from the department of health, one representative from the
department of social and health services, two representatives from state-wide
women's health advocacy organizations, and one representative from the
University of Washington school of public health.

The
committee shall elect one of its members as chair. In any situation requiring
a vote, the chair shall cast the deciding vote. The committee shall meet no
less than twice per calendar year at dates specified by the chair or a majority
of the members.

The
members of the committee shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.220
and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in carrying out the duties
of the committee in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

The
department shall provide administrative and clerical assistance to the
committee.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
women's health advisory committee shall advise the department with regard to:

(1)
Strategic planning to improve the department's public health services and
programs targeting women;

(2)
Analysis of departmental policies regarding specific issues related to women's
health;

(3)
Coordination of pilot projects and planning projects funded by the state that
are related to women's health;

(4)
Dispersing information to the public regarding women's health, data,
strategies, and programs that address women's health issues, including
pregnancy, breast and cervical cancers, AIDS, osteoporosis, and menopause, as
well as issues that impact women's health, including substance abuse, domestic
violence, housing, teenage pregnancy, and sexual assault;

(5)
The identification of public and private sources of funding for initiatives in
women's health; and

(6)
Ways to encourage innovative responses by public and private entities that seek
to address women's health issues.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
Sections 1 through 3 of this act are each added to chapter 43.70 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
The sum of ten thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the general fund to
the department of health for the purposes of this act.

(2) The sum of ten thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the
general fund to the department of health for the purposes of this act.

---
END ---