BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.300.090 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 34 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A vocational agriculture education service area within the office of the
superintendent of public instruction shall be established. ((Adequate
staffing of)) The office of the superintendent of public instruction
shall assign a minimum of one full-time equivalent employee who is an
individual((s)) trained or experienced in the field of vocational
agriculture ((shall be provided)) and one full-time equivalent
employee staff support member for the vocational agriculture education
service area for coordination of the state program and to provide ((assistance
to local school districts for the coordination of the activities of student
agricultural organizations and associations)) leadership, supervision,
and technical assistance to local agriculture education programs.

(2)
The vocational agriculture education service area shall:

(a)
Assess needs in vocational agriculture education, assist local school districts
in establishing vocational agriculture programs, review local school district
applications for approval of vocational agriculture programs, evaluate existing
programs, plan research and studies for the improvement of curriculum materials
for specialty areas of vocational agriculture. Standards and criteria
developed under this subsection shall satisfy the mandates of
federally-assisted vocational education;

(b)
Develop in-service programs for teachers and administrators of vocational
agriculture, review application for vocational agriculture teacher
certification, and assist in teacher recruitment and placement in vocational
agriculture programs;

(c)
Serve as a liaison with the Future Farmers of America, representatives of
business, industry, and appropriate public agencies, and institutions of higher
education in order to disseminate information, promote improvement of
vocational agriculture programs, and assist in the development of adult and
continuing education programs in vocational agriculture; and

(d) Establish an advisory task force committee of agriculturists,
who represent the diverse areas of the agricultural industry in Washington,
which shall make annual recommendations including, but not limited to, the development
of curriculum, staffing, strategies for the purpose of establishing a source of
trained and qualified individuals in agriculture, and strategies for
articulating the state program in vocational agriculture education, including
youth leadership throughout the state school system.

---
END ---