BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
41.40.052 and 1991 c 365 s 22 and 1991 c 35 s 92 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the right of a person to a
pension, an annuity, or retirement allowance, any optional benefit, any other
right accrued or accruing to any person under the provisions of this chapter,
the various funds created by this chapter, and all moneys and investments and
income thereof, are hereby exempt from any state, county, municipal, or other
local tax, and shall not be subject to execution, garnishment, attachment, the
operation of bankruptcy or insolvency laws, or other process of law whatsoever,
and shall be unassignable.

(2)(a)
This section shall not be deemed to prohibit a beneficiary of a retirement
allowance from authorizing deductions therefrom for payment of premiums due on
any group insurance policy or plan issued for the benefit of a group comprised
of public employees of the state of Washington or its political subdivisions
and which has been approved for deduction in accordance with rules that may be
adopted by the state health care authority and/or the department, and this
section shall not be deemed to prohibit a beneficiary of a retirement allowance
from authorizing deductions therefrom for payment of dues and other membership
fees to any retirement association or organization the membership of which is
composed of retired public employees, if a total of three hundred or more of
such retired employees have authorized such deduction for payment to the same
retirement association or organization.

(b)
This section does not prohibit a beneficiary of a retirement allowance from
authorizing deductions from that allowance for charitable purposes on the same
terms as employees and public officers under RCW 41.04.035 and 41.04.036.

(3) Subsection (1) of this section shall not prohibit the
department from complying with (a) a wage assignment order for child support
issued pursuant to chapter 26.18 RCW, (b) an order to withhold and deliver
issued pursuant to chapter 74.20A RCW, (c) a notice of payroll deduction issued
pursuant to RCW 26.23.060, (d) a mandatory benefits assignment order issued by
the department, (e) a court order directing the department of retirement
systems to pay benefits directly to an obligee under a dissolution order as
defined in RCW 41.50.500(3) which fully complies with RCW 41.50.670 and
41.50.700, or (f) any administrative or court order expressly authorized by
federal law.

---
END ---