BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the intent of the legislature that county and city solid waste management plans
incorporate a program for the safe handling of biomedical waste on the next
scheduled revision or update of the solid waste management plan.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.95.090 and 1991 c 298 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
county and city comprehensive solid waste management plan shall include the
following:

(1)
A detailed inventory and description of all existing solid waste handling
facilities including an inventory of any deficiencies in meeting current solid
waste handling needs.

(2)
The estimated long-range needs for solid waste handling facilities projected
twenty years into the future.

(3)
A program for the orderly development of solid waste handling facilities in a
manner consistent with the plans for the entire county which shall:

(a)
Meet the minimum functional standards for solid waste handling adopted by the
department and all laws and regulations relating to air and water pollution,
fire prevention, flood control, and protection of public health;

(b)
Take into account the comprehensive land use plan of each jurisdiction;

(c)
Contain a six year construction and capital acquisition program for solid waste
handling facilities; and

(d)
Contain a plan for financing both capital costs and operational expenditures of
the proposed solid waste management system.

(4)
A program for the safe handling, transport, and disposal of biomedical
waste, as defined in RCW 70.95K.010. The program may specify how biomedical
waste will be segregated from other solid waste if, in consultation with the
local health jurisdiction, segregation is determined to be necessary and
appropriate.

(5)
A program for surveillance and control.

(((5)))
(6) A current inventory and description of solid waste collection needs
and operations within each respective jurisdiction which shall include:

(a)
Any franchise for solid waste collection granted by the utilities and
transportation commission in the respective jurisdictions including the name of
the holder of the franchise and the address of his or her place of business and
the area covered by the franchise;

(b)
Any city solid waste operation within the county and the boundaries of such
operation;

(c)
The population density of each area serviced by a city operation or by a
franchised operation within the respective jurisdictions;

(d)
The projected solid waste collection needs for the respective jurisdictions for
the next six years.

(((6)))
(7) A comprehensive waste reduction and recycling element that, in
accordance with the priorities established in RCW 70.95.010, provides programs
that (a) reduce the amount of waste generated, (b) provide incentives and
mechanisms for source separation, and (c) establish recycling opportunities for
the source separated waste.

(((7)))
(8) The waste reduction and recycling element shall include the
following:

(a)
Waste reduction strategies;

(b)
Source separation strategies, including:

(i)
Programs for the collection of source separated materials from residences in
urban and rural areas. In urban areas, these programs shall include collection
of source separated recyclable materials from single and multiple family
residences, unless the department approves an alternative program, according to
the criteria in the planning guidelines. Such criteria shall include:
Anticipated recovery rates and levels of public participation, availability of
environmentally sound disposal capacity, access to markets for recyclable
materials, unreasonable cost impacts on the ratepayer over the six-year
planning period, utilization of environmentally sound waste reduction and
recycling technologies, and other factors as appropriate. In rural areas,
these programs shall include but not be limited to drop-off boxes, buy-back
centers, or a combination of both, at each solid waste transfer, processing, or
disposal site, or at locations convenient to the residents of the county. The
drop-off boxes and buy-back centers may be owned or operated by public,
nonprofit, or private persons;

(ii)
Programs to monitor the collection of source separated waste at nonresidential
sites where there is sufficient density to sustain a program;

(iii)
Programs to collect yard waste, if the county or city submitting the plan finds
that there are adequate markets or capacity for composted yard waste within or
near the service area to consume the majority of the material collected; and

(iv)
Programs to educate and promote the concepts of waste reduction and recycling;

(c)
Recycling strategies, including a description of markets for recyclables, a
review of waste generation trends, a description of waste composition, a
discussion and description of existing programs and any additional programs
needed to assist public and private sector recycling, and an implementation
schedule for the designation of specific materials to be collected for
recycling, and for the provision of recycling collection services;

(d)
Other information the county or city submitting the plan determines is
necessary.

(((8)))
(9) An assessment of the plan's impact on the costs of solid waste
collection. The assessment shall be prepared in conformance with guidelines
established by the utilities and transportation commission. The commission
shall cooperate with the Washington state association of counties and the
association of Washington cities in establishing such guidelines.

(((9))) (10) A review of potential areas that meet
the criteria as outlined in RCW 70.95.165.

---
END ---