BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
COMMISSION ON WASHINGTON ENVIRONMENT 21 CREATED. (1)
There is created the Washington environment 21 commission.

(2)
The commission shall consist of no fewer than fourteen members as follows:

(a)
Four members appointed by the governor as representatives of business and
industry, agriculture, local government, and environmental organizations;

(b)
Four members appointed jointly by the president of the senate and the speaker
of the house of representatives as representatives of business and industry,
agriculture, local government, and environmental organizations;

(c)
Four members of the house of representatives, two from each major caucus,
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

(d)
Four members of the senate, two from each major caucus, appointed by the
president of the senate;

(e)
The director of the office of financial management or the director's designee
and the director of the department of ecology; and

(f)
Representatives of tribal governments and the United States environmental
protection agency shall be invited to participate by the commission.

(3)
The chair and vice-chair shall be selected by the commission at its first
meeting, which shall be called by the governor within ninety days of the
effective date of this section.

(4)
Whenever the commission considers the subject of the relationship and
integration of the state's environmental and growth management programs, the
director of the department of community, trade, and economic development shall
participate on the commission. Whenever the commission considers subjects
relating to the management of state-owned natural resources, the commissioner
of public lands shall be invited to participate on the commission. Whenever
the commission considers the subject of drinking water quality or quantity the
secretary of the department of health shall participate on the commission.
Whenever the commission considers subjects relating to fish and wildlife and
their habitats, the director of the department of fish and wildlife shall
participate on the commission.

(5)
The commission may create such subcommittees and advisory bodies for technical,
fiscal, or other expertise as will facilitate the commission's performance of
its duties.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
COMMISSION DUTIES. The commission shall develop recommendations for
legislative and executive consideration and implementation that will:

(1)
Increase the reliance upon environmental strategies that emphasize market
incentives, pollution prevention, public education, and technical assistance;

(2)
Reduce inefficiency, duplication, and inconsistency in program implementation
by local, state, and federal agencies;

(3)
Achieve greater consistency among the goals, standards, and objectives of
existing environmental quality statutes, and assist the legislature in better
integrating new statutory goals and objectives to existing statutory
provisions;

(4)
Build upon the recommendations of the land use study commission for integrating
the state's environmental and growth management programs;

(5)
Ensure that the relative priority of environmental threats to the state is a
central consideration in the development of state operating and capital budgets
for environmental programs;

(6)
Achieve a uniform, consistent, and high-quality periodic assessment of the
state's environmental quality, improve monitoring and data management relating
to environmental quality, and establish a system to assess state-wide
environmental trends over time to assist in developing policies and budgets;
and

(7)
Reduce or eliminate environmental programs or activities that do not provide a
substantial contribution to maintaining the state's environmental quality.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY STATUTES‑-REVIEW‑-RECOMMENDATIONS. The
commission shall review the explicit goals and objectives of the state's major
environmental quality statutes and make recommendations to the legislature and
governor to reconcile conflicting or inconsistent provisions. The commission
shall also review and make recommendations for integrating and making
consistent environmental standards applicable to the same activities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
REVIEW OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROGRAMS. (1) In conducting its duties relating to
increasing reliance upon alternative environmental strategies, the commission
shall review existing environmental programs in the state of Washington to
assess their capability to address the threats to the state's environmental
quality anticipated in the state over the next twenty years. The commission
shall further review and make specific recommendations for legislative and
administrative action to implement alternative methods to achieve comparable or
greater environmental protection in a cost-efficient manner, considering both
public and private costs. Examples that the commission may consider include,
but are not limited to:

(a)
Market incentives, such as marketable permits or auctions of emission
allowances;

(b)
Consolidated permits that integrate two or more existing permit requirements
for a single land use or activity;

(c)
Expansion of pollution credit trading where allowed in existing programs, and
extension of such policies to other programs;

(d)
Pollution prevention programs;

(e)
Increased public and consumer education to achieve voluntary actions where
cumulative impacts of numerous activities make traditional regulatory methods
impractical;

(f)
Reduced permit requirements for closed-loop industrial processes;

(g)
Greater reliance upon technical assistance to businesses to achieve compliance
with regulatory requirements.

(2)
In conducting its review under this section the commission shall identify
obstacles to implementing recommended alternative environmental strategies due
to federal law constraints and shall make recommendations on methods to obtain
necessary federal approvals to remove the obstacles.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
ENVIRONMENTAL RISK REDUCTION‑-BUDGET DEVELOPMENT‑-TRUST FUNDS‑-REVIEW‑-RECOMMENDATIONS.
(1) The commission shall review the relative risk of those environmental
threats addressed by existing state programs, and compare this risk with the
relative levels of fiscal resources committed in the operating and capital
budgets of the programs. In determining the relative risk the commission may
rely upon existing reports such as those prepared under the department of
ecology's environment 2010 project and other relative risk reports prepared by
the department and the United States environmental protection agency. The
commission shall make recommendations on existing and future budgetary levels
to achieve greater total risk reduction when considering all environmental
threats addressed by state programs.

(2)
The commission shall also review and make recommendations for changes in budget
development procedures within state agencies and the office of financial
management to achieve greater consistency of budgetary levels with the relative
risk from different environmental threats. For this purpose the commission
shall review the restrictions within existing dedicated fund sources for
environmental programs and make recommendations for changes to such funds for
greater flexibility to address the most significant environmental threats.

(3)
The commission shall evaluate the role of state tax policy in protecting the
state's environmental quality and ecological resources. The commission shall
make recommendations for strengthening the utility of tax policy as an instrument
to achieve the goals and objectives of the state's environmental quality
statutes.

(4)
The commission shall analyze proposals for environmental trust funds and make
recommendations regarding the creation of such a fund or funds for the purpose
of providing comprehensive mechanisms to better address environmental threats
as they change over time.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
ENVIRONMENTAL STATISTICS AND TRENDS. The commission shall review existing
programs for the collection, maintenance, and dissemination of environmental
quality data, and shall make recommendations for the creation of a single,
state-wide, geographically based system for the maintenance of environmental
quality data, statistics, and trends. The program should be designed to be
administered by a single authority responsible for maintaining environmental
quality information based upon monitoring and other data collected by other
entities. The commission shall make recommendations on methodologies to establish
and maintain trend analyses for environmental parameters that will be useful
for program administration, policy development, and environmental budgeting, as
well as understandable to the public. The recommended program should ensure
high quality and objective data and analyses.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
STRENGTHENING THE ROLE OF SCIENCE IN PUBLIC POLICY DEVELOPMENT. The
commission shall make recommendations for strengthening the role of science in
the development of policies for protecting Washington's environmental quality.
The recommendations should address the means by which existing scientific
expertise in agencies within local and state government, within the state's
institutions of higher education, and in other public institutions may provide
scientific expertise and advice to:

(1)
Assist the legislature and state agencies in the formulation of environmental
quality policies, and in the adoption of program budgets, that address
significant threats to environmental quality, and to ensure that the limited
public and private resources available for environmental protection strategies
be allocated consistently with the relative magnitude of environmental threats;

(2)
Periodically evaluate and make recommendations to the legislature and the
governor on environmental monitoring and data management systems to assess
trends in different environmental parameters comprehensively;

(3)
Make recommendations for modifying existing policies and programs to address
new or increased environmental threats, as well as reduced or eliminated
environmental threats; and

(4)
Assist the legislature and state agencies in ensuring that laws and rules for
the protection of environmental quality take into account the relative risk
associated with the threat being addressed, and the nature and extent of such
risk assessed under sound scientific review.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
COMMISSION WORK PLAN. By December 1, 1999, the commission shall submit a work
plan to the legislative standing committees on the environment on carrying out
the duties of this chapter during the four-year period of the commission's
existence. The commission shall endeavor to set priorities under the work plan
to complete and submit reports requiring legislative action to coincide with
the commencement of the regular sessions of the legislature. Periodic reports
of the commission's progress in completing the three-year work plan shall be
provided to the legislative standing committees on the environment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9.
REIMBURSEMENT. Nonlegislative members of the commission shall be reimbursed
for travel expenses for attending meetings of the commission or any commission
subgroups as provided for in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Legislative members
shall be reimbursed for travel expenses for attending meetings of the
commission as provided for in RCW 44.04.120.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10.
STAFF. (1) The office of financial management and the legislature shall
provide staff as required by the commission to conduct its duties under this
chapter. The office of the attorney general shall provide advice and counsel
as required by the commission to conduct its duties under this chapter. All
agencies, the directors or chief executive officers of which serve on the
commission, shall provide staff as required by the commission to conduct its
duties under this chapter. All agencies of state and local government shall
cooperate fully with the commission in carrying out its duties under this
chapter, and to the extent permitted by law shall provide all information
requested by the commission.

(2)
The commission may contract for such services as are necessary to supplement
the staff as provided in this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11.
GIFTS, GRANTS, AND ENDOWMENTS. The commission may receive and spend gifts,
grants, and endowments from private or nonstate sources to carry out the
purposes of this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12.
CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this chapter are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13.
EXPIRATION OF CHAPTER. This chapter expires June 30, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14.
Sections 1 through 13 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

---
END ---