BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that:

(1)
Abandoned fishing nets are a problem that pose a risk to the state's precious
salmon resource;

(2)
Because these nets often exist below the surface of the water, they pose a
unique challenge to locate and require a dedicated effort to remove; and

(3)
There are private agencies interested in partnering with the state to remove
this threat.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 75.08 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall oversee and coordinate action to locate and remove abandoned
fishing nets that are adrift in the waters of the state. The department may
solicit assistance from private organizations to carry out efforts to locate
and remove abandoned nets in the most cost-effective manner possible. The
department may accept useful donations of private materials, funds, or labor in
order to locate and remove abandoned nets. The department shall report back to
the legislature before February 1, 2000, on the progress of this program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
sum of two hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the general fund to
the department of fish and wildlife for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---