BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
59.18.270 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 233 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

All moneys paid to the landlord by the tenant as a deposit as
security for performance of the tenant's obligations in a lease or rental
agreement shall promptly be deposited by the landlord in ((a)) an
interest-bearing trust account, maintained by the landlord for the purpose
of holding such security deposits for tenants of the landlord, in a bank,
savings and loan association, mutual savings bank, or licensed escrow agent
located in Washington. Unless otherwise agreed in writing, ((the)) a
landlord who owns fewer than five residential units within the state
shall be entitled to receipt of interest paid on such trust account deposits. Each
landlord who owns six or more residential units within the state shall direct
the depository institution to pay the interest on such trust account deposits
to the state treasurer to be placed in the housing trust fund established by
RCW 43.185.030. The landlord shall provide the tenant with a written
receipt for the deposit and shall provide written notice of the name and
address and location of the depository and any subsequent change thereof. If
during a tenancy the status of landlord is transferred to another, any sums in
the deposit trust account affected by such transfer shall simultaneously be
transferred to an equivalent trust account of the successor landlord, and the
successor landlord shall promptly notify the tenant of the transfer and of the
name, address and location of the new depository. The tenant's claim to any
moneys paid under this section shall be prior to that of any creditor of the
landlord, including a trustee in bankruptcy or receiver, even if such moneys
are commingled.

---
END ---