BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.20.308 and 1998 c 213 s 1, 1998 c 209 s 1, 1998 c 207 s 7, and 1998 c 41 s 4
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any person who operates a motor vehicle within this state is deemed to have
given consent, subject to the provisions of RCW 46.61.506, to a test or tests
of his or her breath or blood for the purpose of determining the alcohol
concentration or presence of any drug in his or her breath or blood if arrested
for any offense where, at the time of the arrest, the arresting officer has
reasonable grounds to believe the person had been driving or was in actual
physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug or was in violation of RCW 46.61.503.

(2)
The test or tests of breath shall be administered at the direction of a law
enforcement officer having reasonable grounds to believe the person to have
been driving or in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or the person to
have been driving or in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while having
alcohol in a concentration in violation of RCW 46.61.503 in his or her system
and being under the age of twenty-one. However, in those instances where the
person is incapable due to physical injury, physical incapacity, or other
physical limitation, of providing a breath sample or where the person is being
treated in a hospital, clinic, doctor's office, emergency medical vehicle,
ambulance, or other similar facility in which a breath testing instrument is
not present or where the officer has reasonable grounds to believe that the
person is under the influence of a drug, a blood test shall be administered by
a qualified person as provided in RCW 46.61.506(4). The officer shall inform
the person of his or her right to refuse the breath or blood test, and of his
or her right to have additional tests administered by any qualified person of
his or her choosing as provided in RCW 46.61.506. The officer shall warn the
driver that:

(a)
His or her license, permit, or privilege to drive will be revoked or denied if
he or she refuses to submit to the test;

(b)
His or her license, permit, or privilege to drive will be suspended, revoked,
or denied if the test is administered and the test indicates the alcohol
concentration of the person's breath or blood is 0.08 or more, in the case of a
person age twenty-one or over, or in violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.503, or
46.61.504 in the case of a person under age twenty-one; and

(c)
His or her refusal to take the test may be used in a criminal trial.

(3)
Except as provided in this section, the test administered shall be of the
breath only. If an individual is unconscious or is under arrest for the crime
of vehicular homicide as provided in RCW 46.61.520 or vehicular assault as
provided in RCW 46.61.522, or if an individual is under arrest for the crime of
driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs as provided
in RCW 46.61.502, which arrest results from an accident in which there has been
serious bodily injury to another person, a breath or blood test may be
administered without the consent of the individual so arrested.

(4)
Any person who is dead, unconscious, or who is otherwise in a condition
rendering him or her incapable of refusal, shall be deemed not to have
withdrawn the consent provided by subsection (1) of this section and the test or
tests may be administered, subject to the provisions of RCW 46.61.506, and the
person shall be deemed to have received the warnings required under subsection
(2) of this section.

(5)
If, following his or her arrest and receipt of warnings under subsection (2) of
this section, the person arrested refuses upon the request of a law enforcement
officer to submit to a test or tests of his or her breath or blood, no test
shall be given except as authorized under subsection (3) or (4) of this
section.

(6)
If, after arrest and after the other applicable conditions and requirements of
this section have been satisfied, a test or tests of the person's blood or
breath is administered and the test results indicate that the alcohol
concentration of the person's breath or blood is 0.08 or more if the person is
age twenty-one or over, or is in violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.503, or
46.61.504 if the person is under the age of twenty-one, or the person refuses
to submit to a test, the arresting officer or other law enforcement officer at
whose direction any test has been given, or the department, where applicable,
if the arrest results in a test of the person's blood, shall:

(a)
Serve notice in writing on the person on behalf of the department of its
intention to suspend, revoke, or deny the person's license, permit, or
privilege to drive as required by subsection (7) of this section;

(b)
Serve notice in writing on the person on behalf of the department of his or her
right to a hearing, specifying the steps he or she must take to obtain a
hearing as provided by subsection (8) of this section;

(c)
Mark the person's Washington state driver's license or permit to drive, if any,
in a manner authorized by the department;

(d)
Serve notice in writing that the marked license or permit, if any, is a
temporary license that is valid for sixty days from the date of arrest or from
the date notice has been given in the event notice is given by the department
following a blood test, or until the suspension, revocation, or denial of the
person's license, permit, or privilege to drive is sustained at a hearing
pursuant to subsection (8) of this section, whichever occurs first. No
temporary license is valid to any greater degree than the license or permit
that it replaces; and

(e)
Immediately notify the department of the arrest and transmit to the department
within seventy-two hours, except as delayed as the result of a blood test, a
sworn report or report under a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 that
states:

(i)
That the officer had reasonable grounds to believe the arrested person had been
driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs, or both, or was
under the age of twenty-one years and had been driving or was in actual
physical control of a motor vehicle while having an alcohol concentration in
violation of RCW 46.61.503;

(ii)
That after receipt of the warnings required by subsection (2) of this section
the person refused to submit to a test of his or her blood or breath, or a test
was administered and the results indicated that the alcohol concentration of
the person's breath or blood was 0.08 or more if the person is age twenty-one
or over, or was in violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.503, or 46.61.504 if the
person is under the age of twenty-one; and

(iii)
Any other information that the director may require by rule.

(7)
The department of licensing, upon the receipt of a sworn report or report under
a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 under subsection (6)(e) of this
section, shall suspend, revoke, or deny the person's license, permit, or
privilege to drive or any nonresident operating privilege, as provided in RCW
46.20.3101, such suspension, revocation, or denial to be effective beginning
sixty days from the date of arrest or from the date notice has been given in
the event notice is given by the department following a blood test, or when
sustained at a hearing pursuant to subsection (8) of this section, whichever
occurs first.

(8)
A person receiving notification under subsection (6)(b) of this section may,
within thirty days after the notice has been given, request in writing a formal
hearing before the department. The person shall pay a fee of one hundred
dollars as part of the request. If the request is mailed, it must be
postmarked within thirty days after receipt of the notification. Upon timely
receipt of such a request for a formal hearing, including receipt of the
required one hundred dollar fee, the department shall afford the person an
opportunity for a hearing. The department may waive the required one
hundred dollar fee if the person is an indigent as defined in RCW 10.101.010.
Except as otherwise provided in this section, the hearing is subject to and
shall be scheduled and conducted in accordance with RCW 46.20.329 and
46.20.332. The hearing shall be conducted in the county of the arrest, except
that all or part of the hearing may, at the discretion of the department, be
conducted by telephone or other electronic means. The hearing shall be held
within sixty days following the arrest or following the date notice has been
given in the event notice is given by the department following a blood test,
unless otherwise agreed to by the department and the person, in which case the
action by the department shall be stayed, and any valid temporary license
marked under subsection (6)(c) of this section extended, if the person is
otherwise eligible for licensing. For the purposes of this section, the scope
of the hearing shall cover the issues of whether a law enforcement officer had
reasonable grounds to believe the person had been driving or was in actual
physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence
of intoxicating liquor or any drug or had been driving or was in actual
physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while having alcohol in
his or her system in a concentration in violation of RCW 46.61.503 and was
under the age of twenty-one, whether the person was placed under arrest, and
(a) whether the person refused to submit to the test or tests upon request of
the officer after having been informed that such refusal would result in the
revocation of the person's license, permit, or privilege to drive, or (b) if a
test or tests were administered, whether the applicable requirements of this
section were satisfied before the administration of the test or tests, whether
the person submitted to the test or tests, or whether a test was administered
without express consent as permitted under this section, and whether the test
or tests indicated that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or
blood was 0.08 or more if the person was age twenty-one or over at the time of
the arrest, or was in violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.503, or 46.61.504 if
the person was under the age of twenty-one at the time of the arrest. The
sworn report or report under a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085
submitted by a law enforcement officer is prima facie evidence that the officer
had reasonable grounds to believe the person had been driving or was in actual
physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence
of intoxicating liquor or drugs, or both, or the person had been driving or was
in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while having
alcohol in his or her system in a concentration in violation of RCW 46.61.503
and was under the age of twenty-one and that the officer complied with the
requirements of this section.

A
hearing officer shall conduct the hearing, may issue subpoenas for the
attendance of witnesses and the production of documents, and shall administer
oaths to witnesses. The hearing officer shall not issue a subpoena for the
attendance of a witness at the request of the person unless the request is
accompanied by the fee required by RCW 5.56.010 for a witness in district
court. The sworn report or report under a declaration authorized by RCW
9A.72.085 of the law enforcement officer and any other evidence accompanying
the report shall be admissible without further evidentiary foundation and the
certifications authorized by the criminal rules for courts of limited
jurisdiction shall be admissible without further evidentiary foundation. The
person may be represented by counsel, may question witnesses, may present
evidence, and may testify. The department shall order that the suspension,
revocation, or denial either be rescinded or sustained.

(9)
If the suspension, revocation, or denial is sustained after such a hearing, the
person whose license, privilege, or permit is suspended, revoked, or denied has
the right to file a petition in the superior court of the county of arrest to
review the final order of revocation by the department in the same manner as an
appeal from a decision of a court of limited jurisdiction. Notice of appeal
must be filed within thirty days after the date the final order is served or
the right to appeal is waived. Notwithstanding RCW 46.20.334, RALJ 1.1, or
other statutes or rules referencing de novo review, the appeal shall be limited
to a review of the record of the administrative hearing. The appellant must
pay the costs associated with obtaining the record of the hearing before the
hearing officer. The filing of the appeal does not stay the effective date of
the suspension, revocation, or denial. A petition filed under this subsection
must include the petitioner's grounds for requesting review. Upon granting
petitioner's request for review, the court shall review the department's final
order of suspension, revocation, or denial as expeditiously as possible. The
review must be limited to a determination of whether the department has
committed any errors of law. The superior court shall accept those factual
determinations supported by substantial evidence in the record: (a) That were
expressly made by the department; or (b) that may reasonably be inferred from
the final order of the department. The superior court may reverse, affirm, or
modify the decision of the department or remand the case back to the department
for further proceedings. The decision of the superior court must be in writing
and filed in the clerk's office with the other papers in the case. The court
shall state the reasons for the decision. If judicial relief is sought for a
stay or other temporary remedy from the department's action, the court shall
not grant such relief unless the court finds that the appellant is likely to
prevail in the appeal and that without a stay the appellant will suffer
irreparable injury. If the court stays the suspension, revocation, or denial
it may impose conditions on such stay.

(10)
If a person whose driver's license, permit, or privilege to drive has been or
will be suspended, revoked, or denied under subsection (7) of this section,
other than as a result of a breath or blood test refusal, and who has not
committed an offense within the last five years for which he or she was granted
a deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW, petitions a court for a
deferred prosecution on criminal charges arising out of the arrest for which
action has been or will be taken under subsection (7) of this section, the
court may direct the department to stay any actual or proposed suspension,
revocation, or denial for at least forty-five days but not more than ninety
days. If the court stays the suspension, revocation, or denial, it may impose
conditions on such stay. If the person is otherwise eligible for licensing,
the department shall issue a temporary license, or extend any valid temporary
license marked under subsection (6) of this section, for the period of the
stay. If a deferred prosecution treatment plan is not recommended in the
report made under RCW 10.05.050, or if treatment is rejected by the court, or
if the person declines to accept an offered treatment plan, or if the person
violates any condition imposed by the court, then the court shall immediately
direct the department to cancel the stay and any temporary marked license or
extension of a temporary license issued under this subsection.

A
suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this section, other than as a
result of a breath or blood test refusal, shall be stayed if the person is
accepted for deferred prosecution as provided in chapter 10.05 RCW for the
incident upon which the suspension, revocation, or denial is based. If the
deferred prosecution is terminated, the stay shall be lifted and the
suspension, revocation, or denial reinstated. If the deferred prosecution is
completed, the stay shall be lifted and the suspension, revocation, or denial
canceled.

(11) When it has been finally determined under the procedures of
this section that a nonresident's privilege to operate a motor vehicle in this
state has been suspended, revoked, or denied, the department shall give
information in writing of the action taken to the motor vehicle administrator
of the state of the person's residence and of any state in which he or she has
a license.

---
END ---