BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
purpose of this act is to repeal the statutory authorization for the award of
attorneys' fees to prevailing parties in appeals of land use and shoreline
management decisions. This statute, enacted in 1995, has had a chilling effect
upon the exercise of the rights of individuals, organizations, and small
developers to seek judicial review of governmental decisions that may affect
their neighborhoods, communities, and development proposals. It is more
appropriate that the general American rule that each party bears its own
attorneys' fees should apply to these cases.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW
4.84.370 (Appeal of land use decisions--Fees and costs) and 1995
c 347 s 718 are each repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act applies to all causes of action pending on appeal on or after the effective
date of this act, regardless of when the cause of action arose. To this
extent, this act applies retroactively, but in all other respects it applies
prospectively.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---