BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
48.47.010 and 1997 c 412 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
otherwise specifically provided, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Appropriate committees of the legislature" or "committees"
means nonfiscal standing committees of the Washington state senate and house of
representatives that have jurisdiction over statutes that regulate health
carriers, health care facilities, health care providers, or health care
services.

(2)
"Department" means the Washington state department of health.

(3)
"Health care facility" or "facility" means hospices
licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, hospitals licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW,
rural health care facilities as defined in RCW 70.175.020, psychiatric
hospitals licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW, nursing homes licensed under
chapter 18.51 RCW, community mental health centers licensed under chapter 71.05
or 71.24 RCW, kidney disease treatment centers licensed under chapter 70.41
RCW, ambulatory diagnostic, treatment, or surgical facilities licensed under chapter
70.41 RCW, drug and alcohol treatment facilities licensed under chapter 70.96A
RCW, and home health agencies licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, and includes
such facilities if owned and operated by a political subdivision or
instrumentality of the state, and such other facilities as required by federal
law and implementing regulations.

(4)
"Health care provider" or "provider" means:

(a)
A person regulated under Title 18 or chapter 70.127 RCW, to practice health or
health-related services or otherwise practicing health care services in this
state consistent with state law; or

(b)
An employee or agent of a person described in (a) of this subsection, acting in
the course and scope of his or her employment.

(5)
"Health care service" or "service" means a service, drug,
or medical equipment offered or provided by a health care facility and a health
care provider relating to the prevention, cure, or treatment of illness,
injury, or disease.

(6)
"Health carrier" or "carrier" means a disability insurer regulated
under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, a health care service contractor as defined
in RCW 48.44.010, a health maintenance organization as defined in RCW
48.46.020, plans operating under the state health care authority under chapter
41.05 RCW, the state health insurance pool operating under chapter 48.41 RCW,
and insuring entities regulated in chapter 48.43 RCW.

(7)
"Mandated ((health benefit," "mandated benefit," or
")) benefit bill" means ((coverage or offering required
by law to be provided by a health carrier to)) legislation that would,
if it became law, require a health carrier to offer or provide coverage of:
(a) ((Cover)) A specific health care service or services; (b) ((cover))
the treatment of a specific condition or conditions; or (c) ((contract,
pay, or reimburse)) specific categories of health care providers for
specific services; however, it does not ((mean benefits established pursuant
to)) include legislation that would only affect benefits available under
chapter 74.09, 41.05, or 70.47 RCW, or scope of practice modifications pursuant
to chapter 18.120 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 48.47 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Where the chair of an appropriate committee of the legislature determines it is
in the public interest and consistent with the purposes of this chapter, the
chair may request that any mandated benefit bill that has been referred to the
committee be reviewed by the department under RCW 48.47.030.

(2)
In making the determination under subsection (1) of this section, the chair
shall consider:

(a)
The extent to which the public has demonstrated an interest in the mandated
benefit bill as evidenced by, among other things, testimony before or written
submissions to the committee;

(b)
The extent to which there is uncertainty regarding the costs and benefits of
the mandated benefit bill; and

(c)
The extent to which the review will yield new information that will assist the
committee in evaluating the mandated benefit bill.

(3)
The request for review shall be in writing, and may indicate special concerns
or interests the chair would like the department to address in performing the
review. Upon receipt of the request, the department shall respond to the chair
in writing within thirty days, indicating one of the following:

(a)
That the bill is not a mandated benefit bill as defined in RCW 48.47.010 and
therefore not appropriately reviewed under this chapter;

(b)
That insufficient funds were appropriated to the department for the purpose of
reviewing the bill, and therefore the review cannot be completed; or

(c)
That the bill will be reviewed and the report will be submitted to the
secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives at
least thirty days prior to the start of the next regular legislative session.

(4)
A request for review or completion of the report by the department under this
chapter is not a prerequisite to consideration and passage of a mandated
benefit bill by the legislature.

Sec.
3. RCW
48.47.030 and 1997 c 412 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Based on the availability of relevant information, the department shall
review a mandated benefit bill and report to the legislature regarding the
following ((criteria shall be used to assess the impact of proposed mandated
benefits)):

(a)
The social impact: (i) To what extent is the benefit generally utilized by a
significant portion of the population? (ii) To what extent is the benefit
already generally available? (iii) If the benefit is not generally available,
to what extent has its unavailability resulted in persons not receiving needed
services? (iv) If the benefit is not generally available, to what extent has
its unavailability resulted in unreasonable financial hardship? (v) What is
the level of public demand for the benefit? (vi) What is the level of interest
of collective bargaining agents in negotiating privately for inclusion of this
benefit in group contracts?

(b)
The financial impact: (i) To what extent will the benefit increase or decrease
the cost of treatment or service? (ii) To what extent will the coverage
increase the appropriate use of the benefit? (iii) To what extent will the
benefit be a substitute for a more expensive benefit? (iv) To what extent will
the benefit increase or decrease the administrative expenses of health carriers
and the premium and administrative expenses of policyholders? (v) What will be
the impact of this benefit on the total cost of health care services and on
premiums for health coverage? (vi) What will be the impact of this benefit on
costs for state-purchased health care? (vii) What will be the impact of this
benefit on affordability and access to coverage?

(c)
Evidence of health care service efficacy:

(i)
If a mandatory benefit of a specific service is sought, to what extent has
there been conducted professionally accepted controlled trials demonstrating
the health consequences of that service compared to no service or an
alternative service?

(ii)
If a mandated benefit of a category of health care provider is sought, to what
extent has there been conducted professionally accepted controlled trials
demonstrating the health consequences achieved by the mandated benefit of this
category of health care provider?

(iii)
To what extent will the mandated benefit enhance the general health status of
the state residents?

(2)
((The department shall consider the availability of relevant information in
assessing the completeness of the proposal.

(3))) The
department may supplement these criteria to reflect new relevant information or
additional significant issues.

(((4)))
(3) The department shall establish, where appropriate, ad hoc panels
composed of related experts, and representatives of carriers, consumers,
providers, and purchasers to assist in the proposal review process. Ad hoc
panel members shall serve without compensation.

(((5)))
(4) The health care authority shall evaluate the reasonableness and
accuracy of cost estimates associated with the proposed mandated benefit ((that
are provided to the department by the proposer or other interested parties,))
and shall provide comment to the department. Interested parties may, in
addition, submit data directly to the department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. RCW
48.47.020 and 1997 c 412 s 3, 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 221, 1987 c
150 s 79, & 1984 c 56 s 2 are each repealed.

---
END ---