BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
2.56.030 and 1997 c 41 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
administrator for the courts shall, under the supervision and direction of the
chief justice:

(1)
Examine the administrative methods and systems employed in the offices of the
judges, clerks, stenographers, and employees of the courts and make
recommendations, through the chief justice, for the improvement of the same;

(2)
Examine the state of the dockets of the courts and determine the need for
assistance by any court;

(3)
Make recommendations to the chief justice relating to the assignment of judges
where courts are in need of assistance and carry out the direction of the chief
justice as to the assignments of judges to counties and districts where the
courts are in need of assistance;

(4)
Collect and compile statistical and other data and make reports of the business
transacted by the courts and transmit the same to the chief justice to the end
that proper action may be taken in respect thereto;

(5)
Prepare and submit budget estimates of state appropriations necessary for the
maintenance and operation of the judicial system and make recommendations in
respect thereto;

(6)
Collect statistical and other data and make reports relating to the expenditure
of public moneys, state and local, for the maintenance and operation of the
judicial system and the offices connected therewith;

(7)
Obtain reports from clerks of courts in accordance with law or rules adopted by
the supreme court of this state on cases and other judicial business in which
action has been delayed beyond periods of time specified by law or rules of
court and make report thereof to supreme court of this state;

(8)
Act as secretary of the judicial conference referred to in RCW 2.56.060;

(9)
Submit annually, as of February 1st, to the chief justice, a report of the
activities of the administrator's office for the preceding calendar year
including activities related to courthouse security;

(10)
Administer programs and standards for the training and education of judicial
personnel;

(11)
Examine the need for new superior court and district judge positions under a
weighted caseload analysis that takes into account the time required to hear
all the cases in a particular court and the amount of time existing judges have
available to hear cases in that court. The results of the weighted caseload
analysis shall be reviewed by the board for judicial administration which shall
make recommendations to the legislature. It is the intent of the legislature
that weighted caseload analysis become the basis for creating additional
district court positions, and recommendations should address that objective;

(12)
Provide staff to the judicial retirement account plan under chapter 2.14 RCW;

(13)
Attend to such other matters as may be assigned by the supreme court of this
state;

(14)
Within available funds, develop a curriculum for a general understanding of
child development, placement, and treatment resources, as well as specific
legal skills and knowledge of relevant statutes including chapters 13.32A,
13.34, and 13.40 RCW, cases, court rules, interviewing skills, and special
needs of the abused or neglected child. This curriculum shall be completed and
made available to all juvenile court judges, court personnel, and service
providers and be updated yearly to reflect changes in statutes, court rules, or
case law;

(15)
Develop, in consultation with the entities set forth in RCW 2.56.150(3), a
comprehensive state-wide curriculum, training requirements, and continuing
education requirements for persons who act as guardians ad litem under
Title 13 or 26 RCW except these requirements do not apply to the attorney
general or any prosecuting attorney functioning as the guardian ad litem
pursuant to RCW 74.20.310. The curriculum, training requirements, and
continuing education requirements shall ((be made available July 1,
1997, and)) include specialty sections on child development, child sexual
abuse, child physical abuse, child neglect, clinical and forensic investigative
and interviewing techniques, family reconciliation and mediation services, and
relevant statutory and legal requirements. The curriculum, training
requirements, and continuing education requirements shall be made available
to all superior court judges, court personnel, and all persons who act as
guardians ad litem and be updated yearly to reflect changes in statutes,
court rules, or case law;

(16)
Develop a curriculum for a general understanding of crimes of malicious
harassment, as well as specific legal skills and knowledge of RCW 9A.36.080,
relevant cases, court rules, and the special needs of malicious harassment
victims. This curriculum shall be made available to all superior court and
court of appeals judges and to all justices of the supreme court;

(17)
Develop, in consultation with the criminal justice training commission and the
commissions established under chapters 43.113, 43.115, and 43.117 RCW, a
curriculum for a general understanding of ethnic and cultural diversity and its
implications for working with youth of color and their families. The
curriculum shall be available to all superior court judges and court
commissioners assigned to juvenile court, and other court personnel. Ethnic
and cultural diversity training shall be provided annually so as to incorporate
cultural sensitivity and awareness into the daily operation of juvenile courts
state-wide;

(18)
Authorize the use of closed circuit television and other electronic equipment
in judicial proceedings. The administrator shall promulgate necessary
standards and procedures and shall provide technical assistance to courts as
required;

(19)
Maintain a list of all guardians ad litem or investigators under RCW 26.09.220
appointed pursuant to Titles 11, 13, and 26 RCW, who have been removed from the
guardian ad litem registry in any superior court within the state pursuant to a
grievance action that orders removal from the registry. Superior courts shall
report to the administrator for the courts any order removing a guardian ad
litem, investigator under RCW 26.09.220 from the registry; and

(20)
Develop a model grievance procedure for use by the superior courts when dealing
with complaints against: A guardian ad litem under chapter 11.88, 13.34, or
26.12 RCW; a court-appointed special advocate appointed under chapter 13.34 or
26.12 RCW; or an investigator appointed under RCW 26.09.220.

Sec.
2. RCW
11.88.090 and 1996 c 249 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Nothing contained in RCW 11.88.080 through 11.88.120, 11.92.010 through
11.92.040, 11.92.060 through 11.92.120, 11.92.170, and 11.92.180 shall affect
or impair the power of any court to appoint a guardian ad litem to defend the
interests of any incapacitated person interested in any suit or matter pending
therein, or to commence and prosecute any suit in his or her behalf.

(2)
Upon receipt of a petition for appointment of guardian or limited guardian,
except as provided herein, the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem to
represent the best interests of the alleged incapacitated person, who shall be
a person found or known by the court to:

(a)
Be free of influence from anyone interested in the result of the proceeding;
and

(b)
Have the requisite knowledge, training, or expertise to perform the duties required
by this section.

The
guardian ad litem shall within five days of receipt of notice of appointment
file with the court and serve, either personally or by certified mail with
return receipt, each party with a statement including: His or her training relating
to the duties as a guardian ad litem; his or her criminal history as defined in
RCW 9.94A.030 for the period covering ten years prior to the appointment; his
or her hourly rate, if compensated; whether the guardian ad litem has had any
contact with a party to the proceeding prior to his or her appointment; and
whether he or she has an apparent conflict of interest. Within three days of
the later of the actual service or filing of the guardian ad litem's statement,
any party may set a hearing and file and serve a motion for an order to show
cause why the guardian ad litem should not be removed for one of the following
three reasons: (i) Lack of expertise necessary for the proceeding; (ii) an
hourly rate higher than what is reasonable for the particular proceeding; or
(iii) a conflict of interest. Notice of the hearing shall be provided to the
guardian ad litem and all parties. If, after a hearing, the court enters an
order replacing the guardian ad litem, findings shall be included, expressly stating
the reasons for the removal. If the guardian ad litem is not removed, the
court has the authority to assess to the moving party, attorneys' fees and
costs related to the motion. The court shall assess attorneys' fees and costs
for frivolous motions.

No
guardian ad litem need be appointed when a parent is petitioning for a guardian
or a limited guardian to be appointed for his or her minor child and the
minority of the child, as defined by RCW 11.92.010, is the sole basis of the
petition. The order appointing the guardian ad litem shall recite the duties
set forth in subsection (4) of this section. The appointment of a guardian ad
litem shall have no effect on the legal competency of the alleged incapacitated
person and shall not overcome the presumption of competency or full legal and
civil rights of the alleged incapacitated person.

(3)(a)
The superior court of each county shall develop and maintain a registry of
persons who are willing and qualified to serve as guardians ad litem in
guardianship matters. The court shall choose as guardian ad litem a person
whose name appears on the registry in a system of consistent rotation, except
in extraordinary circumstances such as the need for particular expertise. A
person appointed under exceptional circumstances because of a particular
expertise may be exempt from the training and continuing education requirements
by the court if the court limits the scope of the person's appointment and
finds the training and continuing education requirements are unrelated to the
tasks the court has assigned to the person. The court shall develop
procedures for periodic review of the persons on the registry and for
probation, suspension, or removal of persons on the registry for failure to
perform properly their duties as guardian ad litem. In the event the court
does not select the person next on the list, it shall include in the order of
appointment a written reason for its decision.

(b)
To be eligible for the registry a person shall:

(i)
Present a written statement outlining his or her background and
qualifications. The background statement shall include, but is not limited to,
the following information:

(A)
Level of formal education;

(B)
Training related to the guardian ad litem's duties;

(C)
Number of years' experience as a guardian ad litem;

(D)
Number of appointments as a guardian ad litem and the county or counties of
appointment;

(E)
Criminal history, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; and

(F)
Evidence of the person's knowledge, training, and experience in each of the
following: Needs of impaired elderly people, physical disabilities, mental
illness, developmental disabilities, and other areas relevant to the needs of
incapacitated persons, legal procedure, and the requirements of chapters 11.88
and 11.92 RCW.

The
written statement of qualifications shall include ((a statement of the
number of times the guardian ad litem has been removed for failure to perform
his or her duties as guardian ad litem)) the names of any counties in
which the person was removed from a guardian ad litem registry pursuant to a
grievance action that orders removal from the registry, and the cause number of
any case in which the court orders removal of the person because the person
fails to perform his or her duties as guardian ad litem; and

(ii)
Complete the ((model)) training ((program)) and continuing
educational requirements as described in (((d))) (e) of this
subsection. The training and continuing education requirements are not
applicable to guardians ad litem appointed pursuant to court rule solely for
the limited purpose of assessing a personal injury settlement.

(c)
Superior court shall remove any person from the guardian ad litem registry
who misrepresents his or her qualifications.

(d)
The background and qualification information shall be updated annually.

(((d)))
(e) The department of social and health services shall convene an
advisory group to develop a model guardian ad litem training program and establish
training and continuing educational requirements. The department, in
consultation with the advisory group, shall update the model training
program biennially. The advisory group shall consist of representatives from
consumer, advocacy, and professional groups knowledgeable in developmental
disabilities, neurological impairment, physical disabilities, mental illness,
aging, legal, court administration, the Washington state bar association, and
other interested parties.

(((e)))
(f) The superior court shall require ((utilization of the model
program developed by the advisory group as)) that any guardian ad litem
appointed pursuant to this chapter comply with the training and continuing
education requirements described in (((d))) (e) of this
subsection((, to assure that candidates applying for registration as a
qualified guardian ad litem shall have satisfactorily completed training to
attain these essential minimum qualifications to act as guardian ad litem)),
unless the guardian ad litem is appointed solely for the limited purposes of
assessing a personal injury settlement.

(4)
The guardian ad litem appointed pursuant to this section shall have the
following duties:

(a)
To meet and consult with the alleged incapacitated person as soon as
practicable following appointment and explain, in language which such person
can reasonably be expected to understand, the substance of the petition, the
nature of the resultant proceedings, the person's right to contest the
petition, the identification of the proposed guardian or limited guardian, the
right to a jury trial on the issue of his or her alleged incapacity, the right
to independent legal counsel as provided by RCW 11.88.045, and the right to be
present in court at the hearing on the petition;

(b)
To obtain a written report according to RCW 11.88.045; and such other written
or oral reports from other qualified professionals as are necessary to permit
the guardian ad litem to complete the report required by this section;

(c)
To meet with the person whose appointment is sought as guardian or limited
guardian and ascertain:

(i)
The proposed guardian's knowledge of the duties, requirements, and limitations
of a guardian; and

(ii)
The steps the proposed guardian intends to take or has taken to identify and
meet the needs of the alleged incapacitated person;

(d)
To consult as necessary to complete the investigation and report required by
this section with those known relatives, friends, or other persons the guardian
ad litem determines have had a significant, continuing interest in the welfare
of the alleged incapacitated person;

(e)
To investigate alternate arrangements made, or which might be created, by or on
behalf of the alleged incapacitated person, such as revocable or irrevocable
trusts, or durable powers of attorney, or blocked accounts in cases of
personal injury settlements; whether good cause exists for any such
arrangements to be discontinued; and why such arrangements should not be
continued or created in lieu of a guardianship;

(f)
To provide the court with a written report which shall include the following:

(i)
A description of the nature, cause, and degree of incapacity, and the basis
upon which this judgment was made;

(ii)
A description of the needs of the incapacitated person for care and treatment,
the probable residential requirements of the alleged incapacitated person and
the basis upon which these findings were made;

(iii)
An evaluation of the appropriateness of the guardian or limited guardian whose
appointment is sought and a description of the steps the proposed guardian has
taken or intends to take to identify and meet current and emerging needs of the
incapacitated person;

(iv)
A description of any alternative arrangements previously made by the alleged
incapacitated person or which could be made, and whether and to what extent
such alternatives should be used in lieu of a guardianship, and if the guardian
ad litem is recommending discontinuation of any such arrangements, specific
findings as to why such arrangements are contrary to the best interest of the
alleged incapacitated person;

(v)
A description of the abilities of the alleged incapacitated person and a
recommendation as to whether a guardian or limited guardian should be
appointed. If appointment of a limited guardian is recommended, the guardian
ad litem shall recommend the specific areas of authority the limited guardian
should have and the limitations and disabilities to be placed on the
incapacitated person;

(vi)
An evaluation of the person's mental ability to rationally exercise the right
to vote and the basis upon which the evaluation is made;

(vii)
Any expression of approval or disapproval made by the alleged incapacitated
person concerning the proposed guardian or limited guardian or guardianship or
limited guardianship;

(viii)
Identification of persons with significant interest in the welfare of the
alleged incapacitated person who should be advised of their right to request
special notice of proceedings pursuant to RCW 11.92.150; ((and))

(ix)
Unless independent counsel has appeared for the alleged incapacitated person,
an explanation of how the alleged incapacitated person responded to the advice
of the right to jury trial, to independent counsel and to be present at the
hearing on the petition; and

(x)
In cases of personal injury settlements, information relevant to the court's
analysis of the offered settlement. The information relevant to the court's
analysis may be specified by local court rule, and need not include information
specified in subsection (4)(f)(i) through (ix) of this section.

Within
forty-five days after notice of commencement of the guardianship proceeding has
been served upon the guardian ad litem, and at least fifteen days before the
hearing on the petition, unless an extension or reduction of time has been
granted by the court for good cause, the guardian ad litem shall file its
report and send a copy to the alleged incapacitated person and his or her
counsel, spouse, all children not residing with a notified person, those
persons described in (f)(viii) of this subsection, and persons who have filed a
request for special notice pursuant to RCW 11.92.150. If the guardian ad litem
needs additional time to finalize his or her report, then the guardian ad litem
shall petition the court for a postponement of the hearing or, with the consent
of all other parties, an extension or reduction of time for filing the report.
If the hearing does not occur within sixty days of filing the petition, then
upon the two-month anniversary of filing the petition and on or before the same
day of each following month until the hearing, the guardian ad litem shall file
interim reports summarizing his or her activities on the proceeding during that
time period as well as fees and costs incurred;

(g)
To advise the court of the need for appointment of counsel for the alleged incapacitated
person within five court days after the meeting described in (a) of this
subsection unless (i) counsel has appeared, (ii) the alleged incapacitated
person affirmatively communicated a wish not to be represented by counsel after
being advised of the right to representation and of the conditions under which
court-provided counsel may be available, or (iii) the alleged incapacitated
person was unable to communicate at all on the subject, and the guardian ad
litem is satisfied that the alleged incapacitated person does not affirmatively
desire to be represented by counsel.

(5)
If the petition is brought by an interested person or entity requesting the
appointment of some other qualified person or entity and a prospective guardian
or limited guardian cannot be found, the court shall order the guardian ad
litem to investigate the availability of a possible guardian or limited
guardian and to include the findings in a report to the court pursuant to
subsection (4)(f) of this section.

(6)
The parties to the proceeding may file responses to the guardian ad litem
report with the court and deliver such responses to the other parties and the
guardian ad litem at any time up to the second day prior to the hearing. If a
guardian ad litem fails to file his or her report in a timely manner, the
hearing shall be continued to give the court and the parties at least fifteen
days before the hearing to review the report. At any time during the
proceeding upon motion of any party or on the court's own motion, the court may
remove the guardian ad litem for failure to perform his or her duties as
specified in this chapter, provided that the guardian ad litem shall have five
days' notice of any motion to remove before the court enters such order. In
addition, the court in its discretion may reduce a guardian ad litem's fee for
failure to carry out his or her duties.

(7)
The court appointed guardian ad litem shall have the authority, in the event
that the alleged incapacitated person is in need of emergency life-saving medical
services, and is unable to consent to such medical services due to incapacity
pending the hearing on the petition to give consent for such emergency
life-saving medical services on behalf of the alleged incapacitated person.

(8)
The court-appointed guardian ad litem shall have the authority to move for
temporary relief under chapter 7.40 RCW to protect the alleged incapacitated
person from abuse, neglect, abandonment, or exploitation, as those terms are
defined in RCW 74.34.020, or to address any other emergency needs of the
alleged incapacitated person. Any alternative arrangement executed before
filing the petition for guardianship shall remain effective unless the court
grants the relief requested under chapter 7.40 RCW, or unless, following notice
and a hearing at which all parties directly affected by the arrangement are
present, the court finds that the alternative arrangement should not remain
effective.

(9)
The guardian ad litem shall receive a fee determined by the court. The fee
shall be charged to the alleged incapacitated person unless the court finds
that such payment would result in substantial hardship upon such person, in
which case the county shall be responsible for such costs: PROVIDED, That if
no guardian or limited guardian is appointed the court may charge such fee to
the petitioner or the alleged incapacitated person, or divide the fee, as it
deems just; and if the petition is found to be frivolous or not brought in good
faith, the guardian ad litem fee shall be charged to the petitioner. The court
shall not be required to provide for the payment of a fee to any salaried
employee of a public agency. In cases of personal injury settlements,
guardian ad litem fees shall be negotiated among the parties, and approved by
the court.

(10)
Upon the presentation of the guardian ad litem report and the entry of an order
either dismissing the petition for appointment of guardian or limited guardian
or appointing a guardian or limited guardian, the guardian ad litem shall be
dismissed and shall have no further duties or obligations unless otherwise
ordered by the court. If the court orders the guardian ad litem to perform
further duties or obligations, they shall not be performed at county expense.

(11)
The guardian ad litem shall appear in person at all hearings on the petition
unless all parties provide a written waiver of the requirement to appear.

(12)
At any hearing the court may consider whether any person who makes decisions
regarding the alleged incapacitated person or estate has breached a statutory
or fiduciary duty.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 11.88 RCW to read as follows:

The
court shall, in each order of appointment, specify the hourly rate the guardian
ad litem may charge for his or her services, and shall specify the maximum
amount the guardian ad litem may charge without additional court review and
approval.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 11.88 RCW to read as follows:

All
guardians ad litem are prohibited from engaging in ex parte communications with
any judicial officer regarding the matter for which he or she is appointed,
except as approved pursuant to a hearing conducted with appropriate notice to
all parties. All guardians ad litem may petition the court to shorten time to
hear any emergency motions pursuant to court rules. Unauthorized communication
shall be immediately reported to all parties and their attorneys. The court,
upon its own motion, or upon the motion of a party, may consider the removal of
any guardian ad litem who violates this section from any pending case or the
guardian ad litem rotational registry, and if so removed may require forfeiture
of any fees for professional services on any pending cases.

Sec.
5. RCW
13.34.100 and 1996 c 249 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for a child who is the subject of
an action under this chapter, unless a court for good cause finds the
appointment unnecessary. The requirement of a guardian ad litem may be deemed
satisfied if the child is represented by independent counsel in the
proceedings.

(2)
If the court does not have available to it a guardian ad litem program with a
sufficient number of volunteers, the court may appoint a suitable person to act
as guardian ad litem for the child under this chapter. Another party to the
proceeding or the party's employee or representative shall not be so appointed.

(3)
Each guardian ad litem program shall maintain a background information record
for each guardian ad litem in the program. The background file shall include,
but is not limited to, the following information:

(a)
Level of formal education;

(b)
Training related to the guardian's duties;

(c)
Number of years' experience as a guardian ad litem;

(d)
Number of appointments as a guardian ad litem and the county or counties of
appointment; ((and))

(e)
The name of any counties in which the person was removed from a guardian ad
litem registry pursuant to a grievance action that orders removal from the
registry, and the cause number of any case in which the court orders removal of
the person because the person fails to perform his or her duties as guardian ad
litem; and

(f)
Criminal history, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

The
background information report shall be updated annually. As a condition of
appointment, the guardian ad litem's background information record shall be
made available to the court. If the appointed guardian ad litem is not a
member of a guardian ad litem program the person shall provide the background
information to the court.

Upon
appointment, the guardian ad litem, or guardian ad litem program, shall provide
the parties or their attorneys with a statement containing: His or her
training relating to the duties as a guardian ad litem; the name of any
counties in which the person was removed from a guardian ad litem registry
pursuant to a grievance action that orders removal from the registry, and the
cause number of any case in which the court orders removal of the person
because the person fails to perform his or her duties as guardian ad litem;
and his or her criminal history as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 for the
period covering ten years prior to the appointment. The background statement
shall not include identifying information that may be used to harm a guardian
ad litem, such as home addresses and home telephone numbers, and for volunteer
guardians ad litem the court may allow the use of maiden names or pseudonyms as
necessary for their safety.

(4)
The appointment of the guardian ad litem shall remain in effect until the court
discharges the appointment or no longer has jurisdiction, whichever comes first.
The guardian ad litem may also be discharged upon entry of an order of
guardianship.

(5)
A guardian ad litem through counsel, or as otherwise authorized by the court,
shall have the right to present evidence, examine and cross-examine witnesses,
and to be present at all hearings. A guardian ad litem shall receive copies of
all pleadings and other documents filed or submitted to the court, and notice
of all hearings according to court rules. The guardian ad litem shall receive
all notice contemplated for a parent or other party in all proceedings under
this chapter.

(6)
If the child requests legal counsel and is age twelve or older, or if the
guardian ad litem or the court determines that the child needs to be
independently represented by counsel, the court may appoint an attorney to
represent the child's position.

(7)
For the purposes of child abuse prevention and treatment act (42 U.S.C. Secs.
5101 et seq.) grants to this state under P.L. 93-247, or any related state or
federal legislation, a person appointed pursuant to RCW 13.34.100 shall be
deemed a guardian ad litem to represent the best interests of the minor in
proceedings before the court.

(8)
When a court-appointed special advocate or volunteer guardian ad litem is
requested on a case, the program shall give the court the name of the person it
recommends and the appointment shall be effective immediately. The court shall
appoint the person recommended by the program. If a party in a case reasonably
believes the court-appointed special advocate or volunteer is inappropriate or
unqualified, the party may request a review of the appointment by the program.
The program must complete the review within five judicial days and remove any
appointee for good cause. If the party seeking the review is not satisfied
with the outcome of the review, the party may file a motion with the court for
the removal of the court-appointed special advocate on the grounds the advocate
or volunteer is inappropriate or unqualified.

Sec.
6. RCW
13.34.102 and 1997 c 41 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
All guardians ad litem((, who have not previously served or been trained as
a guardian ad litem in this state, who are appointed after January 1, 1998,))
must ((complete the curriculum developed by the office of the administrator
for the courts)) comply with the training requirements established
under RCW 2.56.030(15), prior to their appointment in cases under Title 13 RCW,
except that volunteer guardians ad litem or court-appointed special advocates
((accepted into a volunteer program after January 1, 1998,)) may ((complete
an alternative curriculum)) comply with alternative training
requirements approved by the office of the administrator for the courts
that meet((s)) or exceed((s)) the state-wide ((curriculum))
requirements.

(b)
All persons appointed as guardians ad litem or court-appointed special
advocates must comply with the continuing education requirements established
under RCW 2.56.030(15).

(2)(a)
Each guardian ad litem program for compensated guardians ad litem shall
establish a rotational registry system for the appointment of guardians ad
litem. If a judicial district does not have a program the court shall
establish the rotational registry system. Guardians ad litem shall be selected
from the registry except in exceptional circumstances as determined and
documented by the court. The parties may make a joint recommendation for the
appointment of a guardian ad litem from the registry.

(b)
In judicial districts with a population over one hundred thousand, a list of
three names shall be selected from the registry and given to the parties along
with the background information as specified in RCW 13.34.100(3), including
their hourly rate for services. Each party may, within three judicial days,
strike one name from the list. If more than one name remains on the list, the
court shall make the appointment from the names on the list. In the event all
three names are stricken the person whose name appears next on the registry
shall be appointed.

(c)
If a party reasonably believes that the appointed guardian ad litem lacks the
necessary expertise for the proceeding, charges an hourly rate higher than what
is reasonable for the particular proceeding, or has a conflict of interest, the
party may, within three judicial days from the appointment, move for
substitution of the appointed guardian ad litem by filing a motion with the
court.

(d)
Upon the motion of any party the court shall, if located in a judicial district
with a population over one hundred thousand, remove a compensated guardian ad
litem who was not selected from a rotational registry system. This subsection
(2)(d) does not apply when the guardian ad litem was appointed: (i) Under
exceptional circumstances authorized under (a) of this subsection; or (ii) as a
result of a joint recommendation of the parties.

(3)
The rotational registry system shall not apply to court-appointed special
advocate programs.

Sec.
7. RCW
13.34.105 and 1993 c 241 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Unless otherwise directed by the court, the duties of the guardian ad litem
include but are not limited to the following:

(a)
To ((represent)) investigate and ((be an advocate for)) report
to the court factual information regarding the best interests of the child;

(b)
To collect relevant information about the child's situation;

(c)
To monitor all court orders for compliance and to bring to the court's
attention any change in circumstances that may require a modification of the court's
order; ((and))

(d)
To report to the court information on: (i) The legal status of a
child's membership in any Indian tribe or band; and (ii) the facts relating
to the child's best interests; and

(e)
Court-appointed special advocates may make recommendations based upon an
independent investigation in the best interests of the child, which the court
may consider and weigh in conjunction with the recommendations of all of the
parties.

(2)
((The)) A guardian ad litem shall be deemed an officer of the
court for the purpose of immunity from civil liability.

(3)
Except for information or records specified in RCW 13.50.100(4), the guardian
ad litem shall have access to all information available to the state or agency
on the case. Upon presentation of the order of appointment by the guardian ad
litem, any agency, hospital, school organization, division or department of the
state, doctor, nurse, or other health care provider, psychologist,
psychiatrist, police department, or mental health clinic shall permit the
guardian ad litem to inspect and copy any records relating to the child or
children involved in the case, without the consent of the parent or guardian of
the child, or of the child if the child is under the age of thirteen years,
unless such access is otherwise specifically prohibited by law.

(4)
A guardian ad litem may release confidential information, records, and
reports to the office of the family and children's ombudsman for the purposes
of carrying out its duties under chapter 43.06A RCW.

(5)
The guardian ad litem shall release case information in accordance with the
provisions of RCW 13.50.100.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

The
court shall, in each order of appointment, specify the hourly rate the guardian
ad litem may charge for his or her services, and shall specify the maximum
amount the guardian ad litem may charge without additional court review and
approval.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. A
new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

All guardians ad litem and court-appointed special advocates are
prohibited from engaging in ex parte communications with any judicial officer
regarding the matter for which he or she is appointed, except as approved
pursuant to a hearing conducted with appropriate notice to all parties. All
guardians ad litem may petition the court to shorten time to hear any emergency
motions pursuant to court rules. Unauthorized communication shall be
immediately reported to all parties and their attorneys. The court, upon its
own motion, or upon the motion of a party, may consider the removal of any
guardian ad litem or court-appointed special advocate who violates this section
from any pending case or from any court-authorized registry, and if so removed
may require forfeiture of any fees for professional services on any pending
cases.

Sec.
10. RCW
26.12.175 and 1996 c 249 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
The court may appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the interests of a minor
or dependent child when the court believes the appointment of a guardian ad
litem is necessary to protect the best interests of the child in any proceeding
under this chapter. The family court services professionals may also make a
recommendation to the court regarding whether a guardian ad litem should be
appointed for the child. The court may appoint a guardian ad litem from the
court-appointed special advocate program, if that program exists in the county.

(b)
Unless otherwise ordered, the guardian ad litem's role is to investigate and
report to the court concerning parenting arrangements for the child((, and
to represent the child's best interests)). This should include factual
information regarding the best interests of the child. Additionally, if a
minor expresses his or her custody wishes, the guardian ad litem must report
the wishes to the court. The child's wishes do not determine placement.
The court may require the guardian ad litem to provide periodic reports to the
parties regarding the status of his or her investigation. The guardian ad
litem shall file his or her report at least sixty days prior to trial.

(c)
The court shall enter an order for costs, fees, and disbursements to cover the
costs of the guardian ad litem. The court may order either or both parents to
pay for the costs of the guardian ad litem, according to their ability to pay.
If both parents are indigent, the county shall bear the cost of the guardian,
subject to appropriation for guardians' ad litem services by the county
legislative authority. Guardians ad litem who are not volunteers shall provide
the parties with an itemized accounting of their time and billing for services
each month.

(2)(a)
If the guardian ad litem appointed is from the county court-appointed special
advocate program, the program shall supervise any guardian ad litem assigned to
the case. The court-appointed special advocate program shall be entitled to
notice of all proceedings in the case.

(b)
The legislative authority of each county may authorize creation of a
court-appointed special advocate program. The county legislative authority may
adopt rules of eligibility for court-appointed special advocate program
services.

(3)
Each guardian ad litem program shall maintain a background information record
for each guardian ad litem in the program. The background file shall include,
but is not limited to, the following information:

(a)
Level of formal education;

(b)
Training related to the guardian's duties;

(c)
Number of years' experience as a guardian ad litem;

(d)
Number of appointments as a guardian ad litem and county or counties of appointment;
((and))

(e)
The name of any counties in which the person was removed from a guardian ad
litem registry pursuant to a grievance action that orders removal from the
registry, and the cause number of any case in which the court orders removal of
the person because the person fails to perform his or her duties as guardian ad
litem; and

(f)
Criminal history, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

The
background information report shall be updated annually. As a condition of
appointment, the guardian ad litem's background information record shall be
made available to the court. If the appointed guardian ad litem is not a
member of a guardian ad litem program the person shall provide the background
information to the court.

Upon
appointment, the guardian ad litem, or guardian ad litem program, shall provide
the parties or their attorneys with a statement containing: His or her
training relating to the duties as a guardian ad litem; the name of any
counties in which the person was removed from a guardian ad litem registry
pursuant to a grievance action that orders removal from the registry, and the
cause number of any case in which the court orders removal of the person
because the person fails to perform his or her duties as guardian ad litem;
and his or her criminal history as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 for the
period covering ten years prior to the appointment. The background statement
shall not include identifying information that may be used to harm a guardian
ad litem, such as home addresses and home telephone numbers, and for volunteer
guardians ad litem the court may allow the use of maiden names or pseudonyms as
necessary for their safety.

(4)
When a court-appointed special advocate or volunteer guardian ad litem is
requested on a case, the program shall give the court the name of the person it
recommends and the appointment shall be effective immediately. The court shall
appoint the person recommended by the program. If a party in a case reasonably
believes the court-appointed special advocate or volunteer is inappropriate or
unqualified, the party may request a review of the appointment by the program.
The program must complete the review within five judicial days and remove any
appointee for good cause. If the party seeking the review is not satisfied
with the outcome of the review, the party may file a motion with the court for
the removal of the court-appointed special advocate on the grounds the advocate
or volunteer is inappropriate or unqualified.

Sec.
11. RCW
26.12.177 and 1997 c 41 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
All guardians ad litem((, who have not previously served or been trained as
a guardian ad litem in this state, who are appointed after January 1, 1998,))
and investigators appointed under RCW 26.09.220 must ((complete the
curriculum developed by the office of the administrator for the courts)) comply
with the training requirements established under RCW 2.56.030(15), prior to
their appointment in cases under Title 26 RCW, except that volunteer
guardians ad litem or court-appointed special advocates ((accepted into a
volunteer program after January 1, 1998,)) may ((complete an alternative
curriculum)) comply with alternative training requirements approved
by the office of the administrator for the courts that meet((s)) or
exceed((s)) the state-wide ((curriculum)) requirements.

(b)
All persons appointed as guardians ad litem, investigators under RCW 26.09.220,
or court-appointed special advocates must comply with the continuing education
requirements established under RCW 2.56.030(15).

(2)(a)
Each guardian ad litem program for compensated guardians ad litem shall
establish a rotational registry system for the appointment of guardians ad
litem and investigators under RCW 26.09.220. If a judicial district
does not have a program the court shall establish the rotational registry system.
Guardians ad litem and investigators under RCW 26.09.220 shall be
selected from the registry except in exceptional circumstances as determined
and documented by the court. The parties may make a joint recommendation for
the appointment of a guardian ad litem from the registry.

(b)
In judicial districts with a population over one hundred thousand, a list of
three names shall be selected from the registry and given to the parties along
with the background information as specified in RCW 26.12.175(3), including
their hourly rate for services. Each party may, within three judicial days,
strike one name from the list. If more than one name remains on the list, the
court shall make the appointment from the names on the list. In the event all
three names are stricken the person whose name appears next on the registry
shall be appointed.

(c)
If a party reasonably believes that the appointed guardian ad litem lacks the
necessary expertise for the proceeding, charges an hourly rate higher than what
is reasonable for the particular proceeding, or has a conflict of interest, the
party may, within three judicial days from the appointment, move for
substitution of the appointed guardian ad litem by filing a motion with the
court.

(d)
Upon the motion of any party the court shall, if located in a judicial district
with a population over one hundred thousand, remove a compensated guardian ad
litem who was not selected from a rotational registry system. This subsection
(2)(d) does not apply when the guardian ad litem was appointed: (i) Under
exceptional circumstances authorized under (a) of this subsection; or (ii) as a
result of a joint recommendation of the parties.

(e)
Under this section, within either registry referred to in (a) of this
subsection, a subregistry may be created that consists of guardians ad litem
under contract with the department of social and health services' division of
child support. Guardians ad litem on such a subregistry shall be selected and
appointed in state-initiated paternity cases only.

(3)
The rotational registry system shall not apply to court-appointed special
advocate programs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. A
new section is added to chapter 26.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
court shall, in each order of appointment, specify the hourly rate the guardian
ad litem or investigator under RCW 26.09.220 may charge for his or her
services, and shall specify the maximum amount the guardian ad litem or
investigator under RCW 26.09.220 may charge without additional court review and
approval.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. A
new section is added to chapter 26.12 RCW to read as follows:

All
guardians ad litem, court-appointed special advocates, and investigators under
RCW 26.09.220 are prohibited from engaging in ex parte communications with any
judicial officer regarding the matter for which he or she is appointed, except
as approved pursuant to a hearing conducted with appropriate notice to all
parties. All guardians ad litem or investigators under RCW 26.09.220 may
petition the court to shorten time to hear any emergency motions pursuant to
court rules. Unauthorized communication shall be immediately reported to all
parties and their attorneys. The court, upon its own motion, or upon the motion
of a party, may consider the removal of any guardian ad litem, court-appointed
special advocate, or investigator who violates this section from any pending
case or from any court-authorized registry, and if so removed may require
forfeiture of any fees for professional services on any pending cases.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. A
new section is added to chapter 26.12 RCW to read as follows:

All
information, records, and reports obtained or created by a guardian ad litem,
court-appointed special advocate, or investigator under RCW 26.09.220, shall be
discoverable pursuant to court rule to the parties and their attorneys. The
guardian ad litem, court-appointed special advocate, or investigator shall
maintain the privacy of the parties and the confidentiality of information
obtained, pursuant to the investigation, as to third parties. Any guardian ad
litem or investigator under RCW 26.09.220 can move the court to seal the court
file to protect information obtained by the guardian ad litem from disclosure
to third persons, particularly in cases where no evidentiary rulings have been
made on information introduced by affidavit, declaration, or other means.
Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to authorize disclosure of guardian
ad litem or investigator records in personal injury actions.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. A
new section is added to chapter 26.12 RCW to read as follows:

Any
guardian ad litem or investigator under RCW 26.09.220 appointed under this
chapter may release confidential information, records, and reports to the
office of the family and children's ombudsman for the purposes of carrying out
its duties under chapter 43.06A RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999, except for sections 6 and 11 of
this act, which take effect January 1, 2001.

---
END ---