BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.04.480 and 1995 c 332 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

"Revoke,"
in all its forms, means the invalidation for a period of one calendar year and
thereafter until reissue: PROVIDED, That under the provisions of section 4
of this act, RCW 46.20.285, 46.20.311, 46.20.265, or 46.61.5055, and
chapter 46.65 RCW the invalidation may last for a period other than one
calendar year.

Sec.
2. RCW
46.20.161 and 1998 c 41 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department, upon receipt of a fee of fourteen dollars, which includes the
fee for the required photograph, shall issue to every applicant qualifying
therefor a driver's license, which license shall bear thereon a distinguishing
number assigned to the licensee, the name of record, date of birth, Washington
residence address, photograph, and a brief description of the licensee, and
either a facsimile of the signature of the licensee or a space upon which the
licensee shall write his or her usual signature with pen and ink
immediately upon receipt of the license. No license is valid until it has been
so signed by the licensee.

(2)
A driver's license issued under this section to a person who is under eighteen
years of age, or to a person who has not held a valid driver's license issued
by this or any other state within the five years immediately preceding the
issuance of this license, is a provisional driver's license subject to the
provisions of sections 3 and 4 of this act. The department shall provide a
method to distinguish provisional drivers' licenses from the regular drivers'
licenses issued under this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW to read as follows:

A
person who has been issued a provisional driver's license and who has
maintained a satisfactory driving record for one year may, upon proper
application and payment of a five-dollar fee, be issued a regular driver's
license. For the purposes of this section, a person's driving record is deemed
satisfactory if he or she has not been found to have committed or been
convicted of more than one offense against traffic regulations governing the
movement of vehicles, has not been subject to the restrictions of section 4 of
this act, and has not had his or her provisional driver's license suspended,
revoked, or canceled.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
In addition to any other provision of law, if a person issued a provisional
driver's license under RCW 46.20.161:

(a)
Has been convicted of, found to have committed, or has failed to appear or
comply in response to two offenses against traffic regulations governing the
movement of vehicles, or has had his or her driver's license or driving
privilege revoked under RCW 46.20.265, or has been convicted of, found to have
committed, or has failed to appear or comply in response to any other
alcohol-related offense against traffic regulations, the department shall
require the person to attend an informal interview, and shall restrict the
person's provisional driver's license to use between the hours of 5:00 a.m. and
midnight, unless accompanied by a passenger who possesses a valid regular
Washington driver's license;

(b)
Has been convicted of, found to have committed, or has failed to appear or
comply in response to three offenses against traffic regulations governing the
movement of vehicles or has failed to appear for an informal interview under
(a) of this subsection, the department shall revoke the driving privilege of
the person for thirty days. Upon reinstatement from a revocation under this
subsection, the department shall restrict the person's provisional driver's license
to use between the hours of 5:00 a.m. and midnight;

(c)
Has been convicted of, found to have committed, or has failed to appear or
comply in response to four or more offenses against traffic regulations
governing the movement of vehicles, the department shall revoke the driving
privilege of the person for ninety days. Upon reinstatement from a revocation
under this subsection, the department shall restrict the person's provisional
driver's license to use between the hours of 5:00 a.m. and midnight; or

(d)
Violates any restriction placed on the person's driving privilege, the
department shall revoke the driving privilege of the person for an additional
ninety days. Upon reinstatement from a revocation under this subsection, the
department shall restrict the person's provisional driver's license to use
between the hours of 5:00 a.m. and midnight.

(2)
A restriction placed on the use of a person's provisional driver's license
remains in effect for one year from the date the restriction was imposed.

Sec.
5. RCW
46.20.311 and 1998 c 212 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
The department shall not suspend a driver's license or privilege to drive a
motor vehicle on the public highways for a fixed period of more than one year,
except as specifically permitted under RCW 46.20.342 or other provision of
law. Except for a suspension under RCW 46.20.289, 46.20.291(5), or 74.20A.320,
whenever the license or driving privilege of any person is suspended by reason
of a conviction, a finding that a traffic infraction has been committed,
pursuant to chapter 46.29 RCW, or pursuant to RCW 46.20.291 or 46.20.308, the
suspension shall remain in effect until the person gives and thereafter
maintains proof of financial responsibility for the future as provided in
chapter 46.29 RCW. If the suspension is the result of a violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the department shall determine the person's eligibility
for licensing based upon the reports provided by the alcoholism agency or
probation department designated under RCW 46.61.5056 and shall deny
reinstatement until enrollment and participation in an approved program has
been established and the person is otherwise qualified. Whenever the license
or driving privilege of any person is suspended as a result of certification of
noncompliance with a child support order under chapter 74.20A RCW or a
residential or visitation order, the suspension shall remain in effect until
the person provides a release issued by the department of social and health
services stating that the person is in compliance with the order.

(b)(i)
The department shall not issue to the person a new, duplicate, or renewal
license until the person pays a reissue fee of twenty dollars.

(ii)
If the suspension is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504,
or is the result of administrative action under RCW 46.20.308, the reissue fee
shall be one hundred fifty dollars.

(2)(a)
Any person whose license or privilege to drive a motor vehicle on the public highways
has been revoked, unless the revocation was for a cause which has been removed,
is not entitled to have the license or privilege renewed or restored until:
(i) After the expiration of one year from the date the license or privilege to
drive was revoked; (ii) after the expiration of the applicable revocation
period provided by RCW 46.20.3101 or 46.61.5055; (iii) after the expiration of
two years for persons convicted of vehicular homicide; or (iv) after the
expiration of the applicable revocation period provided by RCW 46.20.265 or
section 4 of this act.

(b)(i)
After the expiration of the appropriate period, the person may make application
for a new license as provided by law together with a reissue fee in the amount
of twenty dollars.

(ii)
If the revocation is the result of a violation of RCW 46.20.308, 46.61.502, or
46.61.504, the reissue fee shall be one hundred fifty dollars. If the
revocation is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the
department shall determine the person's eligibility for licensing based upon
the reports provided by the alcoholism agency or probation department
designated under RCW 46.61.5056 and shall deny reissuance of a license, permit,
or privilege to drive until enrollment and participation in an approved program
has been established and the person is otherwise qualified.

(c)
Except for a revocation under RCW 46.20.265 or section 4 of this act,
the department shall not then issue a new license unless it is satisfied after
investigation of the driving ability of the person that it will be safe to
grant the privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the public highways, and
until the person gives and thereafter maintains proof of financial
responsibility for the future as provided in chapter 46.29 RCW. For a
revocation under RCW 46.20.265 or section 4 of this act, the department
shall not issue a new license unless it is satisfied after investigation of the
driving ability of the person that it will be safe to grant that person the
privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the public highways.

(3)(a)
Whenever the driver's license of any person is suspended pursuant to Article IV
of the nonresident violators compact or RCW 46.23.020 or 46.20.289 or
46.20.291(5), the department shall not issue to the person any new or renewal
license until the person pays a reissue fee of twenty dollars.

(b)
If the suspension is the result of a violation of the laws of this or any other
state, province, or other jurisdiction involving (i) the operation or physical
control of a motor vehicle upon the public highways while under the influence
of intoxicating liquor or drugs, or (ii) the refusal to submit to a chemical
test of the driver's blood alcohol content, the reissue fee shall be one
hundred fifty dollars.

Sec.
6. RCW
46.20.342 and 1993 c 501 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
It is unlawful for any person to drive a motor vehicle in this state while that
person is in a suspended or revoked status or when his or her privilege to
drive is suspended or revoked in this or any other state. Any person who has a
valid Washington driver's license is not guilty of a violation of this section.

(a)
A person found to be an habitual offender under chapter 46.65 RCW, who violates
this section while an order of revocation issued under chapter 46.65 RCW
prohibiting such operation is in effect, is guilty of driving while license
suspended or revoked in the first degree, a gross misdemeanor. Upon the first
such conviction, the person shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than
ten days. Upon the second conviction, the person shall be punished by
imprisonment for not less than ninety days. Upon the third or subsequent
conviction, the person shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one
hundred eighty days. If the person is also convicted of the offense defined in
RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, when both convictions arise from the same event,
the minimum sentence of confinement shall be not less than ninety days. The
minimum sentence of confinement required shall not be suspended or deferred. A
conviction under this subsection does not prevent a person from petitioning for
reinstatement as provided by RCW 46.65.080.

(b)
A person who violates this section while an order of suspension or revocation
prohibiting such operation is in effect and while the person is not eligible to
reinstate his or her driver's license or driving privilege, other than for a
suspension for the reasons described in (c) of this subsection, is guilty of
driving while license suspended or revoked in the second degree, a gross
misdemeanor. This subsection applies when a person's driver's license or
driving privilege has been suspended or revoked by reason of:

(i)
A conviction of a felony in the commission of which a motor vehicle was used;

(ii)
A previous conviction under this section;

(iii)
A notice received by the department from a court or diversion unit as provided
by RCW 46.20.265, relating to a minor who has committed, or who has entered a
diversion unit concerning an offense relating to alcohol, legend drugs,
controlled substances, or imitation controlled substances;

(iv)
A conviction of RCW 46.20.410, relating to the violation of restrictions of an
occupational driver's license;

(v)
A conviction of RCW 46.20.420, relating to the operation of a motor vehicle
with a suspended or revoked license;

(vi)
A conviction of RCW 46.52.020, relating to duty in case of injury to or death
of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;

(vii)
A conviction of RCW 46.61.024, relating to attempting to elude pursuing police
vehicles;

(viii)
A conviction of RCW 46.61.500, relating to reckless driving;

(ix)
A conviction of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, relating to a person under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;

(x)
A conviction of RCW 46.61.520, relating to vehicular homicide;

(xi)
A conviction of RCW 46.61.522, relating to vehicular assault;

(xii)
A conviction of RCW 46.61.530, relating to racing of vehicles on highways;

(xiii)
A conviction of RCW 46.61.685, relating to leaving children in an unattended
vehicle with motor running;

(xiv)
A conviction of RCW 46.64.048, relating to attempting, aiding, abetting,
coercing, and committing crimes; ((or))

(xv)
An action taken under section 4 of this act; or

(xvi)
An administrative action taken by the department under chapter 46.20 RCW.

(c)
A person who violates this section when his or her driver's license or driving
privilege is, at the time of the violation, suspended or revoked solely because
(i) the person must furnish proof of satisfactory progress in a required
alcoholism or drug treatment program, (ii) the person must furnish proof of
financial responsibility for the future as provided by chapter 46.29 RCW, (iii)
the person has failed to comply with the provisions of chapter 46.29 RCW
relating to uninsured accidents, (iv) the person has failed to respond to a
notice of traffic infraction, failed to appear at a requested hearing, violated
a written promise to appear in court, or has failed to comply with the terms of
a notice of traffic infraction or citation, as provided in RCW 46.20.289, (v)
the person has committed an offense in another state that, if committed in this
state, would not be grounds for the suspension or revocation of the person's driver's
license, or (vi) the person has been suspended or revoked by reason of one or
more of the items listed in (b) of this subsection, but was eligible to
reinstate his or her driver's license or driving privilege at the time of the
violation, or any combination of (i) through (vi), is guilty of driving while
license suspended or revoked in the third degree, a misdemeanor.

(2)
Upon receiving a record of conviction of any person or upon receiving an order
by any juvenile court or any duly authorized court officer of the conviction of
any juvenile under this section, the department shall:

(a)
For a conviction of driving while suspended or revoked in the first degree, as
provided by subsection (1)(a) of this section, extend the period of
administrative revocation imposed under chapter 46.65 RCW for an additional
period of one year from and after the date the person would otherwise have been
entitled to apply for a new license or have his or her driving privilege
restored; or

(b)
For a conviction of driving while suspended or revoked in the second degree, as
provided by subsection (1)(b) of this section, not issue a new license or
restore the driving privilege for an additional period of one year from and
after the date the person would otherwise have been entitled to apply for a new
license or have his or her driving privilege restored; or

(c) Not extend the period of suspension or revocation if the
conviction was under subsection (1)(c) of this section. If the conviction was
under subsection (1) (a) or (b) of this section and the court recommends
against the extension and the convicted person has obtained a valid driver's
license, the period of suspension or revocation shall not be extended.

---
END ---