BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature has found that any intervention into the life of a child is also an
intervention in the life of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian, and that
the bond between child and parent is of paramount importance. The legislature
now also finds that children who cannot be with their parents, guardians, or
legal custodians are best cared for, whenever possible and appropriate, by family
members with whom they have a relationship. This is particularly important
when a child cannot be in the care of a parent, guardian, or legal custodian as
a result of a court intervention.

Furthermore,
the legislature has determined that it is important that families have
knowledge of their rights and responsibilities with regard to the child
protection laws. Parents, guardians, and legal custodians must also be able to
exercise their rights. The legislature has found that parents and children are
often unaware of their due process rights when they disagree with the findings
and decision made by a court commissioner at a hearing on the placement of
their children out of their home. The legislature finds that current law
allows for review by a superior court judge of a court commissioner's order to
maintain a child in placement and away from a parent, guardian, or legal
custodian. Parents should have the right to an expedited review of the
commissioner's ruling if they request a review.

Sec.
2. RCW
13.34.060 and 1998 c 328 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A child taken into custody pursuant to RCW 13.34.050 or 26.44.050 shall be
immediately placed in shelter care. A child taken by a relative of the child
in violation of RCW 9A.40.060 or 9A.40.070 shall be placed in shelter care only
when permitted under RCW 13.34.055. "Shelter care" means temporary
physical care in a facility licensed pursuant to RCW 74.15.030 or in a home not
required to be licensed pursuant to that section. Whenever a child is taken
into custody pursuant to this section, the supervising agency shall: (a) First
seek to place the child with any person related to the child as described in
RCW 74.15.020(2)(a), who is willing and available to care for the child, with
whom the child has a relationship, and with whom the child is comfortable; (b)
document its efforts to accomplish the requirements of (a) of this subsection;
and (c) if unable to accomplish the requirements of (a) of this subsection,
place the child in a shelter care facility. Whenever a child is taken into
such custody pursuant to this section, the supervising agency may authorize
evaluations of the child's physical or emotional condition, routine medical and
dental examination and care, and all necessary emergency care. In no case may
a child who is taken into custody pursuant to RCW 13.34.055, 13.34.050, or
26.44.050 be detained in a secure detention facility. No child may be held
longer than seventy-two hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and
holidays, after such child is taken into custody unless a court order has been
entered for continued shelter care. The child and his or her parent, guardian,
or custodian, and the parent's guardian if the parent has been declared incompetent,
shall be informed that they have a right to a shelter care hearing. The court
shall hold a shelter care hearing within seventy-two hours after the child is
taken into custody, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. If a parent or
the parent's guardian if the parent has been declared incompetent,
guardian, or legal custodian desires to waive the shelter care hearing, the
court shall determine, on the record and with the parties present, that such
waiver is knowing and voluntary.

(2)
Whenever a child is taken into custody by child protective services pursuant to
a court order issued under RCW 13.34.050 or when child protective services is
notified that a child has been taken into custody pursuant to RCW 26.44.050 or
26.44.056, child protective services shall make reasonable efforts to inform
the parents, guardian, or legal custodian, and the parent's guardian if the
parent has been declared incompetent, of the fact that the child has been
taken into custody, the reasons why the child was taken into custody, and their
legal rights under this title as soon as possible and in no event longer than
twenty-four hours after the child has been taken into custody or twenty-four
hours after child protective services has been notified that the child has been
taken into custody. The notice of custody and rights may be given by any means
reasonably certain of notifying the parents including, but not limited to,
written, telephone, or in person oral notification. If the initial
notification is provided by a means other than writing, child protective
services shall make reasonable efforts to also provide written notification.

The
written notice of custody and rights shall be in substantially the following
form:

"NOTICE

Your
child has been placed in temporary custody under the supervision of Child
Protective Services (or other person or agency). You have important legal
rights and you must take steps to protect your interests.

1.
A court hearing will be held before a judge within 72 hours of the time your
child is taken into custody. You should call the court at (insert
appropriate phone number here) for
specific information about the date, time, and location of the court hearing.

2.
You have the right to have a lawyer represent you at the hearing. You have the
right to records the department intends to rely upon. A lawyer can look at the
files in your case, talk to child protective services and other agencies, tell
you about the law, help you understand your rights, and help you at hearings. If
you cannot afford a lawyer, the court will appoint one to represent you. To
get a court-appointed lawyer you must contact: (explain
local procedure) .

If
your hearing occurs before a court commissioner, you have the right to have the
decision of the court commissioner reviewed by an elected superior court
judge. To obtain that review, you must, within ten days after the entry of the
decision of the court commissioner, file with the court a motion for revision
of the decision, as provided in RCW 2.24.050. If you file a written request
for an expedited hearing in addition to your motion for revision, the court
must hold the review hearing within three court days after you file both of
those documents.

3.
At the hearing, you have the right to speak on your own behalf, to introduce
evidence, to examine witnesses, and to receive a decision based solely on the
evidence presented to the judge.

You
should be present at this hearing. If you do not come, the judge will not hear
what you have to say.

You
may call the Child Protective Services' caseworker for more information about
your child. The caseworker's name and telephone number are: (insert
name and telephone number) ."

Upon
receipt of the written notice, the parent, guardian, or legal custodian, and
the parent's guardian if the parent has been declared incompetent, shall
acknowledge such notice by signing a receipt prepared by child protective services.
If the parent, guardian, or legal custodian does not sign the receipt, the
reason for lack of a signature shall be written on the receipt. The receipt
shall be made a part of the court's file in the dependency action.

If
after making reasonable efforts to provide notification, child protective
services is unable to determine the whereabouts of the parents, guardian, or
legal custodian, and the parent's guardian if the parent has been declared
incompetent, the notice shall be delivered or sent to the last known
address of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian, and the parent's
guardian if the parent has been declared incompetent.

(3)
If child protective services is not required to give notice under subsection
(2) of this section, the juvenile court counselor assigned to the matter shall
make all reasonable efforts to advise the parents, guardian, or legal custodian,
and the parent's guardian if the parent has been declared incompetent, of
the time and place of any shelter care hearing, request that they be present,
and inform them of their basic rights as provided in RCW 13.34.090.

(4)
Reasonable efforts to advise and to give notice, as required in subsections (2)
and (3) of this section, shall include, at a minimum, investigation of the
whereabouts of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian, and the parent's
guardian if the parent has been declared incompetent. If such reasonable
efforts are not successful, or the parent or the parent's guardian if the
parent has been declared incompetent, guardian, or legal custodian does not
appear at the shelter care hearing, the juvenile court counselor or caseworker
shall testify at the hearing or state in a declaration:

(a)
The efforts made to investigate the whereabouts of, and to advise, the parent,
guardian, or legal custodian; and

(b)
Whether actual advice of rights was made, to whom it was made, and how it was
made, including the substance of any oral communication or copies of written
materials used.

(5)
At the commencement of the shelter care hearing the court shall advise the
parties of their basic rights as provided in RCW 13.34.090 and shall appoint
counsel pursuant to RCW 13.34.090 if counsel has not been retained by the
parent or guardian and if the parent or guardian is indigent, unless the court
finds that the right to counsel has been expressly and voluntarily waived in
court.

(6)
The court shall hear evidence regarding notice given to, and efforts to notify,
the parent, guardian, or legal custodian, and the parent's guardian if the
parent has been declared incompetent, and efforts to place the child with a
relative, and shall examine the need for shelter care. The court shall
make an express finding as to whether the notice required under subsections (2)
and (3) of this section was given to the parent, guardian, or legal custodian,
and the parent's guardian if the parent has been declared incompetent, and
whether the child was placed in compliance with subsection (1) of this section.
All parties have the right to present testimony to the court regarding the need
or lack of need for shelter care. Hearsay evidence before the court regarding
the need or lack of need for shelter care must be supported by sworn testimony,
affidavit, or declaration of the person offering such evidence.

(7)
The juvenile court probation counselor shall submit a recommendation to the
court as to the further need for shelter care, except that such recommendation
shall be submitted by the department of social and health services in cases
where the petition alleging dependency has been filed by the department of
social and health services, unless otherwise ordered by the court.

(8)
The court shall release a child alleged to be dependent to the care, custody,
and control of the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian unless the
court finds there is reasonable cause to believe that:

(a)
After consideration of the specific services that have been provided,
reasonable efforts have been made to prevent or eliminate the need for removal
of the child from the child's home and to make it possible for the child to
return home; and

(b)(i)
The child has no parent, guardian, or legal custodian to provide supervision
and care for such child; or

(ii)
The release of such child would present a serious threat of substantial harm to
such child; or

(iii)
The parent, guardian, or custodian to whom the child could be released is
alleged to have violated RCW 9A.40.060 or 9A.40.070.

If
the court does not release the child to his or her parent, guardian, or legal
custodian, the court shall order continued shelter care or order placement with
another suitable person, and the court shall set forth its reasons for the
order. The court shall enter a finding as to whether subsections (1),
(2), and (3) of this section have been complied with. If actual notice
was not given to the parent, guardian, or legal custodian, and the parent's
guardian if the parent has been declared incompetent, and the whereabouts
of such person is known or can be ascertained, the court shall order the
supervising agency or the department of social and health services to make
reasonable efforts to advise the parent, guardian, or legal custodian, and
the parent's guardian if the parent has been declared incompetent, of the
status of the case, including the date and time of any subsequent hearings, and
their rights under RCW 13.34.090.

(9)
An order releasing the child on any conditions specified in this section may at
any time be amended, with notice and hearing thereon, so as to return the child
to shelter care for failure of the parties to conform to the conditions
originally imposed.

The
court shall consider whether nonconformance with any conditions resulted from
circumstances beyond the control of the parent and give weight to that fact
before ordering return of the child to shelter care.

(10)
A shelter care order issued pursuant to this section may be amended at any time
with notice and hearing thereon. The shelter care decision of placement shall
be modified only upon a showing of change in circumstances. No child may be
detained for longer than thirty days without an order, signed by the judge,
authorizing continued shelter care.

(11)
Any parent, guardian, or legal custodian, and the parent's guardian if the
parent has been declared incompetent, who for good cause is unable to
attend the initial shelter care hearing may request that a subsequent shelter
care hearing be scheduled. The request shall be made to the clerk of the court
where the petition is filed prior to the initial shelter care hearing. The
hearing shall be held within seventy-two hours of the request, excluding Saturdays,
Sundays, and holidays. The clerk shall notify all other parties of the hearing
by any reasonable means.

Sec.
3. RCW
2.24.050 and 1988 c 202 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All of the acts and proceedings of court commissioners hereunder shall be
subject to revision by the superior court. Any party in interest may have such
revision upon demand made by written motion, filed with the clerk of the
superior court, within ten days after the entry of any order or judgment of the
court commissioner. Such revision shall be upon the records of the case, and
the findings of fact and conclusions of law entered by the court commissioner,
and unless a demand for revision is made within ten days from the entry of the
order or judgment of the court commissioner, the orders and judgments shall be
and become the orders and judgments of the superior court, and appellate review
thereof may be sought in the same fashion as review of like orders and
judgments entered by the judge.

(2)(a)(i)
A parent, or the parent's guardian if the parent has been declared incompetent,
may file with the clerk of the superior court a request for an expedited
hearing on a motion for revision of any order, judgment, findings of fact, or
conclusions of law made by a commissioner at a shelter care hearing held under
RCW 13.34.060.

(ii)
A person related to the child as described in RCW 74.15.020(2)(a) who was
willing and available to care for the child and with whom the child was not
placed may file with the clerk of the superior court a request for an expedited
hearing on a motion for revision of any order, judgment, findings of fact, or
conclusions of law made by a commissioner at a shelter care hearing held under
RCW 13.34.060, but limited to the issue of whether placement with another
person presents a serious threat of substantial harm to the child.

(b)
The superior court shall hold the hearing on motion for revision within three
days after the filing of both the motion for revision and the request for an
expedited hearing.

(c)
If more than one party files a motion for revision, all such motions shall be
joined in one hearing.

Sec.
4. RCW
13.34.090 and 1998 c 328 s 3 and 1998 c 141 s 1 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
Any party has a right to be represented by an attorney in all proceedings under
this chapter, to introduce evidence, to be heard in his or her own behalf, to
examine witnesses, to receive a decision based solely on the evidence adduced
at the hearing, and to an unbiased fact-finder.

(2)
At all stages of a proceeding in which a child is alleged to be dependent as
defined in RCW 13.34.030(4), the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian
has the right to be represented by counsel, and if indigent, to have counsel
appointed for him or her by the court. Unless waived in court, counsel shall
be provided to the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian, if such person
(a) has appeared in the proceeding or requested the court to appoint counsel
and (b) is financially unable to obtain counsel because of indigency as defined
in chapter 10.101 RCW.

(3)
If a party to an action under this chapter is represented by counsel, no order
shall be provided to that party for his or her signature without prior notice
and provision of the order to counsel.

(4)
Copies of department of social and health services or supervising agency
records to which parents have legal access pursuant to chapter 13.50 RCW shall
be given to the child's parent, guardian, legal custodian, or his or her legal
counsel, prior to any shelter care hearing and within fifteen days after the
department or supervising agency receives a written request for such records
from the parent, guardian, legal custodian, or his or her legal counsel. These
records shall be provided to the child's parents, guardian, legal custodian, or
legal counsel a reasonable period of time prior to the shelter care hearing in
order to allow an opportunity to review the records prior to the hearing.
These records shall be legible and shall be provided at no expense to the
parents, guardian, legal custodian, or his or her counsel. When the records
are served on legal counsel, legal counsel shall have the opportunity to review
the records with the parents and shall review the records with the parents
prior to the shelter care hearing.

If a court commissioner presides at the shelter care hearing,
the child's parent, guardian, legal custodian, and the parent's guardian if the
parent has been declared incompetent, or any party in interest may file with
the clerk of the superior court a motion for revision of the decision, as
provided in RCW 2.24.050, and may file a request for an expedited hearing on
the motion for revision, whereupon the court must hold a hearing within three
days as further provided in RCW 2.24.050.

---
END ---