BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. There
is created an office of industrial insurance ombudsman within the office of the
governor for the purpose of identifying system issues and responses for the
governor and the legislature to act upon and monitoring and ensuring compliance
with relevant statutes, rules, and policies pertaining to Washington's
industrial insurance system. The ombudsman reports directly to the governor
and shall exercise his or her powers and duties independently of the director.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The governor must appoint an ombudsman who is a person of recognized judgment,
independence, objectivity, and integrity, and shall be qualified by training or
experience, or both, in industrial insurance law and policy.

(2)
The person appointed ombudsman shall hold office for a term of three years and
will continue to hold office until reappointed or until his or her successor is
appointed. The governor may remove the ombudsman only for neglect of duty,
misconduct, or inability to perform duties. Any vacancy shall be filled by
similar appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
ombudsman must perform the following duties:

(1)
Provide information as appropriate on the rights and responsibilities of
individuals receiving industrial insurance benefits and on the procedures for
obtaining these benefits;

(2)
Provide information as appropriate on the rights and responsibilities of
employers participating in the industrial insurance system;

(3)
Investigate, upon his or her own initiative or upon receipt of a complaint, an
administrative act alleged to be contrary to law, rule, or policy, imposed
without an adequate statement of reason, or based on irrelevant, immaterial, or
erroneous grounds. However, the ombudsman may decline to investigate any
complaint as provided by rules adopted under this chapter;

(4)
Monitor the procedures as established, implemented, and practiced by the
department of labor and industries to carry out its responsibilities in the
administration of industrial insurance claims;

(5)
Recommend changes in the procedures for addressing the needs of injured workers
and their employers;

(6)
Submit annually to the legislature and to the governor by November 1st a report
analyzing the complaints filed with the office and the results of its
investigations, including recommendations for legislation;

(7)
Adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The
ombudsman shall treat all matters under investigation, including the identities
of service recipients, complainants, and individuals from whom information is
acquired, as confidential, except as far as disclosures may be necessary to
enable the ombudsman to perform the duties of the office and to support any
recommendations resulting from an investigation. Upon receipt of information
that by law is confidential or privileged, the ombudsman shall maintain the
confidentiality of such information and shall not further disclose or
disseminate the information except as provided by applicable state or federal
law. Investigative records of the office of the ombudsman are confidential and
are exempt from public disclosure under chapter 42.17 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5.
Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 51 RCW.

---
END ---