BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislative authority of any town or city located in a county with a
population of less than one million may create a public facilities district.
The legislative authorities of any contiguous group of towns or cities located
in a county or counties each with a population of less than one million may
enter an agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW for the creation and joint operation
of a public facilities district.

(2)
A public facilities district shall be coextensive with the boundaries of the
city or town or contiguous group of cities or towns that created the district.

(3)
A public facilities district created by a single city or town shall be governed
by a board of directors consisting of the members of the legislative body of
the city that created the district. A district created by a contiguous group
of cities or towns shall be governed by a board of directors appointed in
accordance with the terms of the agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW for the
joint operation of the district.

(4)
A public facilities district is a municipal corporation, an independent taxing
"authority" within the meaning of Article VII, section 1 of the state
Constitution, and a "taxing district" within the meaning of Article
VII, section 2 of the state Constitution.

(5)
A public facilities district shall constitute a body corporate and shall
possess all the usual powers of a corporation for public purposes as well as
all other powers that may now or hereafter be specifically conferred by
statute, including, but not limited to, the authority to hire employees, staff,
and services, to enter into contracts, and to sue and be sued.

(6)
A public facilities district may acquire and transfer real and personal
property by lease, sublease, purchase, or sale. No direct or collateral attack
on any metropolitan facilities district purported to be authorized or created
in conformance with this chapter may be commenced more than thirty days after
creation by the city legislative authority.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) A
public facilities district is authorized to acquire, construct, own, remodel,
maintain, equip, reequip, repair, finance, and operate one or more regional
centers. For purposes of this chapter, "regional center" means a
convention, conference, or special events center, or any combination of
facilities, and related parking facilities, serving a regional population
constructed, improved, or rehabilitated after the effective date of this
section at a cost of at least ten million dollars, including debt service.
"Regional center" also includes an existing convention, conference,
or special events center, and related parking facilities, serving a regional
population, that is improved or rehabilitated after the effective date of this
section where the costs of improvement or rehabilitation are at least ten
million dollars, including debt service. A regional center is conclusively
presumed to serve a regional population if state and local government
investment in the construction, improvement, or rehabilitation of the regional
center is equal to or greater than ten million dollars.

(2)
A public facilities district may impose charges and fees for the use of its
facilities, and may accept and expend or use gifts, grants, and donations for
the purpose of a regional center.

(3)
A public facilities district may impose charges, fees, and taxes authorized in
section 4 of this act, and use revenues derived therefrom for the purpose of
paying principal and interest payments on bonds issued by the public facilities
district to construct a regional center.

(4)
Notwithstanding the establishment of a career, civil, or merit service system,
a public facilities district may contract with a public or private entity for
the operation or management of its public facilities.

(5)
A public facilities district is authorized to use the supplemental alternative
public works contracting procedures set forth in chapter 39.10 RCW in
connection with the design, construction, reconstruction, remodel, or
alteration of any regional center.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
To carry out the purpose of this chapter, a public facilities district may
issue general obligation bonds, not to exceed an amount, together with any
outstanding nonvoter-approved general obligation indebtedness, equal to
one-half of one percent of the value of the taxable property within the
district, as the term "value of the taxable property" is defined in
RCW 39.36.015. A facilities district additionally may issue general obligation
bonds for capital purposes only, together with any outstanding general
obligation indebtedness, not to exceed an amount equal to one and one-fourth
percent of the value of the taxable property within the district, as the term
"value of the taxable property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015, when
authorized by the voters of the public facilities district pursuant to Article
VIII, section 6 of the state Constitution, and to provide for the retirement
thereof by taxes authorized in this act.

(2)
General obligation bonds may be issued with a maturity of up to thirty years,
and shall be issued and sold in accordance with the provisions of chapter 39.46
RCW.

(3)
The general obligation bonds may be payable from the operating revenues of the
public facilities district in addition to the tax receipts of the district.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
The board of directors of the public facilities district may impose the
following for the purpose of funding a regional center:

(a)
Charges and fees for the use of any of its facilities;

(b)
Admission charges under section 10 of this act;

(c)
Vehicle parking charges under section 11 of this act; and

(d)
Sales and use taxes authorized under RCW 82.14.048 and section 13 of this act.

(2)
The board may accept and expend or use gifts, grants, and donations for the
purpose of a regional center. The revenue from the charges, fees, and taxes
imposed under this section shall be used only for the purposes authorized by
this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
board of directors of the public facilities district shall adopt a resolution
that may be amended from time to time that shall establish the basic
requirements governing methods and amounts of reimbursement payable to such
district officials and employees for travel and other business expenses
incurred on behalf of the district. The resolution shall, among other things,
establish procedures for approving such expenses; the form of the travel and
expense voucher; and requirements governing the use of credit cards issued in
the name of the district. The resolution may also establish procedures for
payment of per diem to board members. The state auditor shall, as provided by
general law, cooperate with the public facilities district in establishing
adequate procedures for regulating and auditing the reimbursement of all such
expenses.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
board of directors of the public facilities district shall have authority to
authorize the expenditure of funds for the public purposes of preparing and
distributing information to the general public and promoting, advertising,
improving, developing, operating, and maintaining a regional center. Nothing
contained in this section may be construed to authorize preparation and
distribution of information to the general public for the purpose of
influencing the outcome of a district election.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
public facilities district may secure services by means of an agreement with a
service provider. The public facilities district shall publish notice,
establish criteria, receive and evaluate proposals, and negotiate with
respondents under requirements set forth by district resolution.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. In
addition to provisions contained in chapter 39.04 RCW, the public facilities
district is authorized to follow procedures contained in RCW 43.19.1906 and
43.19.1911 for all purchases, contracts for purchase, and sales.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. (1) A
public facilities district may issue revenue bonds to fund revenue-generating
facilities, or portions of facilities, which it is authorized to provide or
operate. Whenever revenue bonds are to be issued, the board of directors of
the district shall create or have created a special fund or funds from which,
along with any reserves created pursuant to RCW 39.44.140, the principal and
interest on such revenue bonds shall exclusively be payable. The board may
obligate the district to set aside and pay into the special fund or funds a
fixed proportion or a fixed amount of the revenues from the public
improvements, projects, or facilities, and all related additions, that are
funded by the revenue bonds. This amount or proportion shall be a lien and
charge against these revenues, subject only to operating and maintenance
expenses. The board shall have due regard for the cost of operation and
maintenance of the public improvements, projects, or facilities, or additions,
that are funded by the revenue bonds, and shall not set aside into the special
fund or funds a greater amount or proportion of the revenues that in its
judgment will be available over and above the cost of maintenance and operation
and the amount or proportion, if any, of the revenue so previously pledged.
The board may also provide that revenue bonds payable out of the same source or
sources of revenue may later be issued on a parity with any revenue bonds being
issued and sold.

(2)
Revenue bonds issued under this section shall not be an indebtedness of the
district issuing the bonds, and the interest and principal on the bonds shall
only be payable from the revenues lawfully pledged to meet the principal and
interest requirements and any reserves created under RCW 39.44.140. The owner
or bearer of a revenue bond or any interest coupon issued under this section
shall not have any claim against the district arising from the bond or coupon
except for payment from the revenues lawfully pledged to meet the principal and
interest requirements and any reserves created under RCW 39.44.140. The
substance of the limitations included in this subsection shall be plainly
printed, written, or engraved on each bond issued under this section.

(3)
Revenue bonds with a maturity in excess of thirty years shall not be issued.
The board of directors of the district shall by resolution determine for each
revenue bond issue the amount, date, form, terms, conditions, denominations,
maximum fixed or variable interest rate or rates, maturity or maturities,
redemption rights, registration privileges, manner of execution, manner of
sale, callable provisions, if any, and covenants including the refunding of
existing revenue bonds. Facsimile signatures may be used on the bonds and any
coupons. Refunding revenue bonds may be issued in the same manner as revenue
bonds are issued.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. A
public facility district may levy and fix a tax of not more than one cent on
twenty cents or fraction thereof to be paid by the person who pays an admission
charge to a regional center. This includes a tax on persons who are admitted
free of charge or at reduced rates if other persons pay a charge or a regular
higher charge for the same privileges or accommodations.

The
term "admission charge" includes:

(1)
A charge made for season tickets or subscriptions;

(2)
A cover charge, or a charge made for use of seats and tables reserved or
otherwise, and other similar accommodations;

(3)
A charge made for food and refreshment if free entertainment, recreation, or
amusement is provided;

(4)
A charge made for rental or use of equipment or facilities for purposes of
recreation or amusement; if the rental of the equipment or facilities is
necessary to the enjoyment of a privilege for which a general admission is
charged, the combined charges shall be considered as the admission charge;

(5)
Automobile parking charges if the amount of the charge is determined according
to the number of passengers in the automobile.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. A
public facility district may levy and fix a tax on any vehicle parking charges
imposed at any parking facility that is owned or leased by the public facility
district as part of a regional center. No county or city or town within which
the regional center is located may impose a tax of the same or similar kind on
any vehicle parking charges at the facility. For the purposes of this section,
"vehicle parking charges" means only the actual parking charges
exclusive of taxes and service charges and the value of any other benefit
conferred. The tax authorized under this section shall be at the rate of not
more than ten percent.

Sec.
12. RCW
82.14.048 and 1995 c 396 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
governing board of a public facilities district under chapter 36.100 RCW or
chapter 35.‑-- RCW (sections 1 through 11 of this act) may submit an
authorizing proposition to the voters of the district, and if the proposition
is approved by a majority of persons voting, fix and impose a sales and use tax
in accordance with the terms of this chapter.

The
tax authorized in this section shall be in addition to any other taxes
authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by
the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable
event within the public facilities district. The rate of tax shall ((equal
one-tenth)) not exceed two-tenths of one percent of the selling
price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of
a use tax.

Moneys
received from any tax imposed under this section shall be used for the purpose
of providing funds for the costs associated with the financing, design,
acquisition, construction, equipping, operating, maintaining, remodeling,
repairing, and reequipping of its public facilities.

No
tax may be collected under this section by a public facilities district under
chapter 35.-- RCW (sections 1 through 11 of this act) before August 1, 2000,
and no tax in excess of one-tenth of one percent may be collected under this
section by a public facilities district under chapter 36.100 RCW before August
1, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. A
new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The governing body of a public facilities district created under chapter 35.---
RCW (sections 1 through 11 of this act) or chapter 36.100 RCW that commences
construction of a new regional facility, or improvement or rehabilitation of an
existing new regional facility, before January 1, 2003, may impose a sales and
use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is in addition
to other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons who
are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence
of any taxable event within the public facilities district. The rate of tax
shall not exceed 0.033 percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax
or value of the article used in the case of a use tax.

(2)
The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be deducted from the
amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department
of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department of revenue shall
perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the
public facilities district.

(3)
No tax may be collected under this section before August 1, 2000. The tax
imposed in this section shall expire when the bonds issued for the construction
of the regional center and related parking facilities are retired, but not more
than twenty-five years after the tax is first collected.

(4)
Moneys collected under this section shall only be used for the purposes set
forth in section 2 of this act.

(5)
The combined total tax levied under this section shall not be greater than
0.033 percent. If both a public facilities district created under chapter
35.-- RCW (sections 1 through 11 of this act) and a public facilities district
created under chapter 36.100 RCW impose a tax under this section, the tax
imposed by a public facilities district created under chapter 35.-- RCW
(sections 1 through 11 of this act) shall be credited against the tax imposed
by a public facilities district created under chapter 36.100 RCW.

Sec.
14. RCW
82.14.050 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

The
counties, cities, and transportation authorities under RCW 82.14.045 and public
facilities districts under chapter 36.100 RCW and chapter 35.‑-- RCW
(sections 1 through 11 of this act) shall contract, prior to the effective
date of a resolution or ordinance imposing a sales and use tax, the
administration and collection to the state department of revenue, which shall
deduct a percentage amount, as provided by contract, not to exceed two percent
of the taxes collected for administration and collection expenses incurred by
the department. The remainder of any portion of any tax authorized by this
chapter which is collected by the department of revenue shall be deposited by
the state department of revenue in the local sales and use tax account hereby
created in the state treasury. Moneys in the local sales and use tax account
may be spent only for distribution to counties, cities, transportation
authorities, and public facilities districts imposing a sales and use tax. All
administrative provisions in chapters 82.03, 82.08, 82.12, and 82.32 RCW, as
they now exist or may hereafter be amended, shall, insofar as they are
applicable to state sales and use taxes, be applicable to taxes imposed pursuant
to this chapter. Except as provided in RCW 43.08.190, all earnings of
investments of balances in the local sales and use tax account shall be
credited to the local sales and use tax account and distributed to the
counties, cities, transportation authorities, and public facilities districts
monthly.

Sec.
15. RCW
36.100.060 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 14 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
To carry out the purpose of this chapter, a public facilities district may
issue general obligation bonds, not to exceed an amount, together with any
outstanding nonvoter approved general obligation indebtedness, equal to
one-half of one percent of the value of taxable property within the district,
as the term "value of taxable property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015.
A facilities district additionally may issue general obligation bonds for
capital purposes only, together with any outstanding general obligation
indebtedness, not to exceed an amount equal to one and one-fourth percent of the
value of the taxable property within the district, as the term "value of
taxable property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015, when authorized by the
voters of the public facilities district pursuant to Article VIII, section 6 of
the state Constitution, and to provide for the retirement thereof by excess
property tax levies as provided in this chapter.

(2)
General obligation bonds may be issued with a maturity of up to thirty years,
and shall be issued and sold in accordance with the provisions of chapter 39.46
RCW.

(3)
The general obligation bonds may be payable from the operating revenues of the
public facilities district in addition to the tax receipts of the district.

(4)
The excise tax imposed pursuant to RCW 36.100.040 shall terminate upon final
payment of all bonded indebtedness for its public facilities, except that
the excise tax may be reauthorized by a public vote, in the same manner as
originally authorized, for funding of additional public facilities or a
regional center.

Sec.
16. RCW
36.100.030 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 14 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A public facilities district is authorized to acquire, construct, own, remodel,
maintain, equip, reequip, repair, and operate sports facilities, entertainment
facilities, ((or)) convention facilities, or ((any combination of
such facilities)) regional centers as defined in section 2 of this act,
together with contiguous parking facilities. The taxes that are provided for
in this chapter may only be imposed for these purposes.

(2)
A public facilities district may enter into agreements under chapter 39.34 RCW
for the joint provision and operation of such facilities and may enter into
contracts under chapter 39.34 RCW where any party to the contract provides and
operates such facilities for the other party or parties to the contract.

(3)
Notwithstanding the establishment of a career, civil, or merit service system,
a public facility [facilities] district may contract with a public or private
entity for the operation or management of its public facilities.

(4)
A public facilities district is authorized to use the supplemental alternative
public works contracting procedures set forth in chapter 39.10 RCW in
connection with the design, construction, reconstruction, remodel, or
alteration of any of its public facilities.

(5)
A public facilities district may impose charges and fees for the use of its
facilities, and may accept and expend or use gifts, grants, and donations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17. A
new section is added to chapter 36.100 RCW to read as follows:

A
public facility district may levy and fix a tax of not more than one cent on
twenty cents or fraction thereof to be paid by the person who pays an admission
charge to a regional center, as defined in section 2 of this act. This
includes a tax on persons who are admitted free of charge or at reduced rates
if other persons pay a charge or a regular higher charge for the same
privileges or accommodations.

The
term "admission charge" includes:

(1)
A charge made for season tickets or subscriptions;

(2)
A cover charge, or a charge made for use of seats and tables reserved or
otherwise, and other similar accommodations;

(3)
A charge made for food and refreshment if free entertainment, recreation, or
amusement is provided;

(4)
A charge made for rental or use of equipment or facilities for purposes of
recreation or amusement; if the rental of the equipment or facilities is
necessary to the enjoyment of a privilege for which a general admission is
charged, the combined charges shall be considered as the admission charge;

(5)
Automobile parking charges if the amount of the charge is determined according
to the number of passengers in the automobile.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. A
new section is added to chapter 36.100 RCW to read as follows:

A
public facility district may levy and fix a tax on any vehicle parking charges
imposed at any parking facility that is owned or leased by the public facility
district as part of a regional center, as defined in section 2 of this act. No
county or city or town within which the regional center is located may impose a
tax of the same or similar kind on any vehicle parking charges at the
facility. For the purposes of this section, "vehicle parking
charges" means only the actual parking charges exclusive of taxes and
service charges and the value of any other benefit conferred. The tax
authorized under this section shall be at the rate of not more than ten
percent.

Sec.
19. RCW
35.21.280 and 1995 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 202 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
city and town may levy and fix a tax of not more than one cent on twenty cents
or fraction thereof to be paid by the person who pays an admission charge to
any place: PROVIDED, No city or town shall impose such tax on persons paying
an admission to any activity of any elementary or secondary school or any
public facility of a public facility district under chapter 35.-- RCW (sections
1 through 11 of this act) or chapter 36.100 RCW for which a tax is imposed
under section 10 or 17 of this act. This includes a tax on persons who are
admitted free of charge or at reduced rates to any place for which other
persons pay a charge or a regular higher charge for the same privileges or
accommodations. A city that is located in a county with a population of one
million or more may not levy a tax on events in stadia constructed on or after
January 1, 1995, that are owned by a public facilities district under chapter
36.100 RCW and that have seating capacities over forty thousand. The city or
town may require anyone who receives payment for an admission charge to collect
and remit the tax to the city or town.

The
term "admission charge" includes:

(1)
A charge made for season tickets or subscriptions;

(2)
A cover charge, or a charge made for use of seats and tables reserved or
otherwise, and other similar accommodations;

(3)
A charge made for food and refreshment in any place where free entertainment,
recreation or amusement is provided;

(4)
A charge made for rental or use of equipment or facilities for purposes of
recreation or amusement; if the rental of the equipment or facilities is
necessary to the enjoyment of a privilege for which a general admission is
charged, the combined charges shall be considered as the admission charge;

(5)
Automobile parking charges if the amount of the charge is determined according
to the number of passengers in the automobile.

Sec.
20. RCW
36.38.010 and 1997 c 220 s 301 (Referendum Bill No. 48) are each amended to
read as follows:

(1)
Any county may by ordinance enacted by its county legislative authority, levy
and fix a tax of not more than one cent on twenty cents or fraction thereof to
be paid for county purposes by persons who pay an admission charge to any
place, including a tax on persons who are admitted free of charge or at reduced
rates to any place for which other persons pay a charge or a regular higher
charge for the same or similar privileges or accommodations; and require that
one who receives any admission charge to any place shall collect and remit the
tax to the county treasurer of the county: PROVIDED, No county shall impose
such tax on persons paying an admission to any activity of any elementary or
secondary school or any public facility of a public facility district under
chapter 35.-- RCW (sections 1 through 11 of this act) or chapter 36.100 RCW for
which a tax is imposed under section 10 or 17 of this act.

(2)
As used in this chapter, the term "admission charge" includes a
charge made for season tickets or subscriptions, a cover charge, or a charge
made for use of seats and tables, reserved or otherwise, and other similar
accommodations; a charge made for food and refreshments in any place where any
free entertainment, recreation, or amusement is provided; a charge made for
rental or use of equipment or facilities for purpose of recreation or
amusement, and where the rental of the equipment or facilities is necessary to
the enjoyment of a privilege for which a general admission is charged, the
combined charges shall be considered as the admission charge. It shall also
include any automobile parking charge where the amount of such charge is
determined according to the number of passengers in any automobile.

(3)
Subject to subsections (4) and (5) of this section, the tax herein authorized
shall not be exclusive and shall not prevent any city or town within the taxing
county, when authorized by law, from imposing within its corporate limits a tax
of the same or similar kind: PROVIDED, That whenever the same or similar kind
of tax is imposed by any such city or town, no such tax shall be levied within
the corporate limits of such city or town by the county.

(4)
Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, the legislative authority of a
county with a population of one million or more may exclusively levy taxes on
events in baseball stadiums constructed on or after January 1, 1995, that are
owned by a public facilities district under chapter 36.100 RCW and that have
seating capacities over forty thousand at the rates of:

(a)
Not more than one cent on twenty cents or fraction thereof, to be used for the
purpose of paying the principal and interest payments on bonds issued by a
county to construct a baseball stadium as defined in RCW 82.14.0485. If the
revenue from the tax exceeds the amount needed for that purpose, the excess
shall be placed in a contingency fund which may only be used to pay
unanticipated capital costs on the baseball stadium, excluding any cost
overruns on initial construction; and

(b)
Not more than one cent on twenty cents or fraction thereof, to be used for the
purpose of paying the principal and interest payments on bonds issued by a
county to construct a baseball stadium as defined in RCW 82.14.0485. The tax
imposed under this subsection (4)(b) shall expire when the bonds issued for the
construction of the baseball stadium are retired, but not later than twenty
years after the tax is first collected.

(5) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, the legislative
authority of a county that has created a public stadium authority to develop a
stadium and exhibition center under RCW 36.102.050 may levy and fix a tax on
charges for admission to events in a stadium and exhibition center, as defined
in RCW 36.102.010, constructed in the county on or after January 1, 1998, that
is owned by a public stadium authority under chapter 36.102 RCW. The tax shall
be exclusive and shall preclude the city or town within which the stadium and
exhibition center is located from imposing a tax of the same or similar kind on
charges for admission to events in the stadium and exhibition center, and shall
preclude the imposition of a general county admissions tax on charges for
admission to events in the stadium and exhibition center. For the purposes of
this subsection, "charges for admission to events" means only the
actual admission charge, exclusive of taxes and service charges and the value
of any other benefit conferred by the admission. The tax authorized under this
subsection shall be at the rate of not more than one cent on ten cents or
fraction thereof. Revenues collected under this subsection shall be deposited
in the stadium and exhibition center account under RCW 43.99N.060 until the
bonds issued under RCW 43.99N.020 for the construction of the stadium and
exhibition center are retired. After the bonds issued for the construction of
the stadium and exhibition center are retired, the tax authorized under this
section shall be used exclusively to fund repair, reequipping, and capital
improvement of the stadium and exhibition center. The tax under this
subsection may be levied upon the first use of any part of the stadium and
exhibition center but shall not be collected at any facility already in
operation as of July 17, 1997.

Sec.
21. RCW
82.29A.130 and 1997 c 220 s 202 (Referendum Bill No. 48) are each amended to
read as follows:

The
following leasehold interests shall be exempt from taxes imposed pursuant to
RCW 82.29A.030 and 82.29A.040:

(1)
All leasehold interests constituting a part of the operating properties of any
public utility which is assessed and taxed as a public utility pursuant to
chapter 84.12 RCW.

(2)
All leasehold interests in facilities owned or used by a school, college or
university which leasehold provides housing for students and which is otherwise
exempt from taxation under provisions of RCW 84.36.010 and 84.36.050.

(3)
All leasehold interests of subsidized housing where the fee ownership of such
property is vested in the government of the United States, or the state of
Washington or any political subdivision thereof but only if income
qualification exists for such housing.

(4)
All leasehold interests used for fair purposes of a nonprofit fair association
that sponsors or conducts a fair or fairs which receive support from revenues
collected pursuant to RCW 67.16.100 and allocated by the director of the
department of agriculture where the fee ownership of such property is vested in
the government of the United States, the state of Washington or any of its
political subdivisions: PROVIDED, That this exemption shall not apply to the
leasehold interest of any sublessee of such nonprofit fair association if such
leasehold interest would be taxable if it were the primary lease.

(5)
All leasehold interests in any property of any public entity used as a
residence by an employee of that public entity who is required as a condition
of employment to live in the publicly owned property.

(6)
All leasehold interests held by enrolled Indians of lands owned or held by any
Indian or Indian tribe where the fee ownership of such property is vested in or
held in trust by the United States and which are not subleased to other than to
a lessee which would qualify pursuant to this chapter, RCW 84.36.451 and
84.40.175.

(7)
All leasehold interests in any real property of any Indian or Indian tribe,
band, or community that is held in trust by the United States or is subject to
a restriction against alienation imposed by the United States: PROVIDED, That
this exemption shall apply only where it is determined that contract rent paid
is greater than or equal to ninety percent of fair market rental, to be
determined by the department of revenue using the same criteria used to
establish taxable rent in RCW 82.29A.020(2)(b).

(8)
All leasehold interests for which annual taxable rent is less than two hundred
fifty dollars per year. For purposes of this subsection leasehold interests
held by the same lessee in contiguous properties owned by the same lessor shall
be deemed a single leasehold interest.

(9)
All leasehold interests which give use or possession of the leased property for
a continuous period of less than thirty days: PROVIDED, That for purposes of
this subsection, successive leases or lease renewals giving substantially
continuous use of possession of the same property to the same lessee shall be
deemed a single leasehold interest: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no leasehold
interest shall be deemed to give use or possession for a period of less than
thirty days solely by virtue of the reservation by the public lessor of the
right to use the property or to allow third parties to use the property on an
occasional, temporary basis.

(10)
All leasehold interests under month-to-month leases in residential units rented
for residential purposes of the lessee pending destruction or removal for the
purpose of constructing a public highway or building.

(11)
All leasehold interests in any publicly owned real or personal property to the
extent such leasehold interests arises solely by virtue of a contract for
public improvements or work executed under the public works statutes of this
state or of the United States between the public owner of the property and a
contractor.

(12)
All leasehold interests that give use or possession of state adult correctional
facilities for the purposes of operating correctional industries under RCW
72.09.100.

(13)
All leasehold interests used to provide organized and supervised recreational
activities for disabled persons of all ages in a camp facility and for public
recreational purposes by a nonprofit organization, association, or corporation
that would be exempt from property tax under RCW 84.36.030(1) if it owned the
property. If the publicly owned property is used for any taxable purpose, the
leasehold excise taxes set forth in RCW 82.29A.030 and 82.29A.040 shall be
imposed and shall be apportioned accordingly.

(14)
All leasehold interests in the public or entertainment areas of a baseball
stadium with natural turf and a retractable roof or canopy that is in a county
with a population of over one million, that has a seating capacity of over
forty thousand, and that is constructed on or after January 1, 1995.
"Public or entertainment areas" include ticket sales areas, ramps and
stairs, lobbies and concourses, parking areas, concession areas, restaurants,
hospitality and stadium club areas, kitchens or other work areas primarily
servicing other public or entertainment areas, public rest room areas, press
and media areas, control booths, broadcast and production areas, retail sales
areas, museum and exhibit areas, scoreboards or other public displays, storage
areas, loading, staging, and servicing areas, seating areas and suites, the
playing field, and any other areas to which the public has access or which are
used for the production of the entertainment event or other public usage, and
any other personal property used for these purposes. "Public or
entertainment areas" does not include locker rooms or private offices
exclusively used by the lessee.

(15)
All leasehold interests in the public or entertainment areas of a stadium and
exhibition center, as defined in RCW 36.102.010, that is constructed on or
after January 1, 1998. For the purposes of this subsection, "public or
entertainment areas" has the same meaning as in subsection (14) of this
section, and includes exhibition areas.

(16)
All leasehold interests in public facilities districts, as provided in chapter
36.100 RCW or chapter 35.‑-- RCW (sections 1 through 11 of this act).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 22.
Sections 1 through 11 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 35 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 23. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---