BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
35.21.260 and 1984 c 7 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

The governing authority of each city and town on or before ((March))
May 31st of each year shall submit such records and reports regarding
street operations in the city or town to the secretary of transportation on
forms furnished by him as are necessary to enable him to compile an annual
report thereon.

Sec.
2. RCW
36.75.260 and 1984 c 7 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

Each county legislative authority shall on or before ((March))
May 31st of each year submit such records and reports to the secretary
of transportation, on forms furnished by the department, as are necessary to
enable the secretary to compile an annual report on county highway operations.

---
END ---