BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that it is necessary to employ multiple approaches to
revitalize the economy of Washington state's rural areas. The legislature also
finds that where possible, Washington state should develop programs that can
complement other private, state, and federal programs. It is the intent of
section 2 of this act to complement such rural economic development efforts by
creating a public utility tax offset program to help establish locally based
electric utility revolving fund programs to be used for economic development
and job creation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The following definitions apply to this section:

(a)
"Qualifying project" means a project designed to achieve job creation
or business retention, to add or upgrade nonelectrical infrastructure, to add
or upgrade health and safety facilities, to accomplish energy and water use
efficiency improvements, including renewable energy development, or to add or
upgrade emergency services in any designated qualifying rural area.

(b)
"Qualifying rural area" means:

(i)
A county with fewer than one hundred persons per square mile as determined
annually by the office of financial management and published by the department
of revenue effective for the period July 1st through June 30th; or

(ii)
Any geographic area in the state that receives electricity from a light and
power business with fewer than twenty-six meters per mile of distribution line
as determined and published by the department of revenue effective July 1st of
each year. The department shall use current data provided by the electricity
industry.

(c)
"Electric utility rural economic development revolving fund" means a
fund devoted exclusively to funding qualifying projects in qualifying rural
areas.

(d)
"Local board" is a board of directors with at least, but not limited
to, three members who have been appointed by the sponsoring electric utility to
oversee and direct the activities of the electric utility rural economic
development revolving fund.

(e)
"Geographic area" means any portion of a light and power business'
service territory, either in whole or any subdivision thereof.

(2)
A light and power business with fewer than twenty-six active meters per mile of
distribution line in any geographic area in the state shall be allowed a credit
against taxes due under this chapter in an amount equal to fifty percent of
contributions made in any calendar year directly to an electric utility rural
economic development revolving fund. The credit under this section shall not
exceed one hundred thousand dollars per calendar year. The credit may not
exceed the tax that would otherwise be due under this chapter. Refunds shall
not be granted in the place of credits and excess expenditures shall not be
carried over to subsequent years.

(3)
The right to claim tax credits under this section expires December 31, 2005.
However any credits claimed prior to that date remain available for use
indefinitely, subject to restrictions set forth in subsection (6) of this
section.

(4)
To qualify for the credit in subsection (2) of this section, the light and
power business shall establish an electric utility rural economic development
revolving fund which is governed by a local board whose members shall reside in
the qualifying rural area served by the light and power business. The local
board shall have authority to determine all criteria and conditions for the
expenditure of funds from the electric utility rural economic development fund,
and for the terms and conditions of repayment.

(5)
Any funds repaid to the electric utility rural economic development fund by
recipients shall be made available for additional qualifying projects.

(6) If at any time the electric utility rural economic development
fund is dissolved, any moneys claimed as a tax credit under this section shall
either be granted to a qualifying project or refunded to the state within two
years of termination.

---
END ---