BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
13.40.080 and 1997 c 338 s 70 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A diversion agreement shall be a contract between a juvenile accused of an
offense and a diversionary unit whereby the juvenile agrees to fulfill certain
conditions in lieu of prosecution. Such agreements may be entered into only
after the prosecutor, or probation counselor pursuant to this chapter, has
determined that probable cause exists to believe that a crime has been
committed and that the juvenile committed it. Such agreements shall be entered
into as expeditiously as possible.

(2)
A diversion agreement shall be limited to one or more of the following:

(a)
Community service not to exceed one hundred fifty hours, not to be performed
during school hours if the juvenile is attending school;

(b)
Restitution limited to the amount of actual loss incurred by the victim;

(c)
Attendance at up to ten hours of counseling and/or up to twenty hours of
educational or informational sessions at a community agency. The educational
or informational sessions may include sessions relating to respect for self,
others, and authority; victim awareness; accountability; self-worth;
responsibility; work ethics; good citizenship; literacy; and life skills. For
purposes of this section, "community agency" may also mean a
community-based nonprofit organization, if approved by the diversion unit. The
state shall not be liable for costs resulting from the diversionary unit
exercising the option to permit diversion agreements to mandate attendance at
up to ten hours of counseling and/or up to twenty hours of educational or
informational sessions;

(d)
A fine, not to exceed one hundred dollars. In determining the amount of the
fine, the diversion unit shall consider only the juvenile's financial resources
and whether the juvenile has the means to pay the fine. The diversion unit
shall not consider the financial resources of the juvenile's parents, guardian,
or custodian in determining the fine to be imposed; ((and))

(e)
Requirements to remain during specified hours at home, school, or work, and
restrictions on leaving or entering specified geographical areas; and

(f)
Upon request of the victim or witness, requirements to refrain from any contact
with victims or witnesses of offenses committed by the juvenile.

(3)
In assessing periods of community service to be performed and restitution to be
paid by a juvenile who has entered into a diversion agreement, the court
officer to whom this task is assigned shall consult with the juvenile's
custodial parent or parents or guardian and victims who have contacted the
diversionary unit and, to the extent possible, involve members of the
community. Such members of the community shall meet with the juvenile and
advise the court officer as to the terms of the diversion agreement and shall
supervise the juvenile in carrying out its terms.

(4)(a)
A diversion agreement may not exceed a period of six months and may include a
period extending beyond the eighteenth birthday of the divertee.

(b)
If additional time is necessary for the juvenile to complete restitution to the
victim, the time period limitations of this subsection may be extended by an
additional six months.

(c)
If the juvenile has not paid the full amount of restitution by the end of the
additional six-month period, then the juvenile shall be referred to the
juvenile court for entry of an order establishing the amount of restitution
still owed to the victim. In this order, the court shall also determine the
terms and conditions of the restitution, including a payment plan extending up
to ten years if the court determines that the juvenile does not have the means
to make full restitution over a shorter period. For the purposes of this
subsection (4)(c), the juvenile shall remain under the court's jurisdiction for
a maximum term of ten years after the juvenile's eighteenth birthday. Prior to
the expiration of the initial ten-year period, the juvenile court may extend
the judgment for restitution an additional ten years. The court may not
require the juvenile to pay full or partial restitution if the juvenile
reasonably satisfies the court that he or she does not have the means to make
full or partial restitution and could not reasonably acquire the means to pay
the restitution over a ten-year period. The county clerk shall make
disbursements to victims named in the order. The restitution to victims named
in the order shall be paid prior to any payment for other penalties or monetary
assessments. A juvenile under obligation to pay restitution may petition the
court for modification of the restitution order.

(5)
The juvenile shall retain the right to be referred to the court at any time
prior to the signing of the diversion agreement.

(6)
Divertees and potential divertees shall be afforded due process in all contacts
with a diversionary unit regardless of whether the juveniles are accepted for
diversion or whether the diversion program is successfully completed. Such due
process shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a)
A written diversion agreement shall be executed stating all conditions in
clearly understandable language;

(b)
Violation of the terms of the agreement shall be the only grounds for
termination;

(c)
No divertee may be terminated from a diversion program without being given a
court hearing, which hearing shall be preceded by:

(i)
Written notice of alleged violations of the conditions of the diversion
program; and

(ii)
Disclosure of all evidence to be offered against the divertee;

(d)
The hearing shall be conducted by the juvenile court and shall include:

(i)
Opportunity to be heard in person and to present evidence;

(ii)
The right to confront and cross-examine all adverse witnesses;

(iii)
A written statement by the court as to the evidence relied on and the reasons
for termination, should that be the decision; and

(iv)
Demonstration by evidence that the divertee has substantially violated the
terms of his or her diversion agreement.

(e)
The prosecutor may file an information on the offense for which the divertee
was diverted:

(i)
In juvenile court if the divertee is under eighteen years of age; or

(ii)
In superior court or the appropriate court of limited jurisdiction if the
divertee is eighteen years of age or older.

(7)
The diversion unit shall, subject to available funds, be responsible for
providing interpreters when juveniles need interpreters to effectively communicate
during diversion unit hearings or negotiations.

(8)
The diversion unit shall be responsible for advising a divertee of his or her
rights as provided in this chapter.

(9)
The diversion unit may refer a juvenile to community-based counseling or
treatment programs.

(10)
The right to counsel shall inure prior to the initial interview for purposes of
advising the juvenile as to whether he or she desires to participate in the
diversion process or to appear in the juvenile court. The juvenile may be
represented by counsel at any critical stage of the diversion process,
including intake interviews and termination hearings. The juvenile shall be
fully advised at the intake of his or her right to an attorney and of the
relevant services an attorney can provide. For the purpose of this section,
intake interviews mean all interviews regarding the diversion agreement
process.

The
juvenile shall be advised that a diversion agreement shall constitute a part of
the juvenile's criminal history as defined by RCW 13.40.020(((9))) (7).
A signed acknowledgment of such advisement shall be obtained from the juvenile,
and the document shall be maintained by the diversionary unit together with the
diversion agreement, and a copy of both documents shall be delivered to the
prosecutor if requested by the prosecutor. The supreme court shall promulgate
rules setting forth the content of such advisement in simple language.

(11)
When a juvenile enters into a diversion agreement, the juvenile court may
receive only the following information for dispositional purposes:

(a)
The fact that a charge or charges were made;

(b)
The fact that a diversion agreement was entered into;

(c)
The juvenile's obligations under such agreement;

(d)
Whether the alleged offender performed his or her obligations under such
agreement; and

(e)
The facts of the alleged offense.

(12)
A diversionary unit may refuse to enter into a diversion agreement with a
juvenile. When a diversionary unit refuses to enter a diversion agreement with
a juvenile, it shall immediately refer such juvenile to the court for action
and shall forward to the court the criminal complaint and a detailed statement
of its reasons for refusing to enter into a diversion agreement. The
diversionary unit shall also immediately refer the case to the prosecuting
attorney for action if such juvenile violates the terms of the diversion
agreement.

(13)
A diversionary unit may, in instances where it determines that the act or
omission of an act for which a juvenile has been referred to it involved no
victim, or where it determines that the juvenile referred to it has no prior
criminal history and is alleged to have committed an illegal act involving no
threat of or instance of actual physical harm and involving not more than fifty
dollars in property loss or damage and that there is no loss outstanding to the
person or firm suffering such damage or loss, counsel and release or release
such a juvenile without entering into a diversion agreement. A diversion
unit's authority to counsel and release a juvenile under this subsection shall
include the authority to refer the juvenile to community-based counseling or
treatment programs. Any juvenile released under this subsection shall be
advised that the act or omission of any act for which he or she had been
referred shall constitute a part of the juvenile's criminal history as defined
by RCW 13.40.020(((9))) (7). A signed acknowledgment of such
advisement shall be obtained from the juvenile, and the document shall be
maintained by the unit, and a copy of the document shall be delivered to the
prosecutor if requested by the prosecutor. The supreme court shall promulgate
rules setting forth the content of such advisement in simple language. A
juvenile determined to be eligible by a diversionary unit for release as
provided in this subsection shall retain the same right to counsel and right to
have his or her case referred to the court for formal action as any other
juvenile referred to the unit.

(14)
A diversion unit may supervise the fulfillment of a diversion agreement entered
into before the juvenile's eighteenth birthday and which includes a period
extending beyond the divertee's eighteenth birthday.

(15)
If a fine required by a diversion agreement cannot reasonably be paid due to a
change of circumstance, the diversion agreement may be modified at the request
of the divertee and with the concurrence of the diversion unit to convert an
unpaid fine into community service. The modification of the diversion
agreement shall be in writing and signed by the divertee and the diversion
unit. The number of hours of community service in lieu of a monetary penalty
shall be converted at the rate of the prevailing state minimum wage per hour.

(16)
Fines imposed under this section shall be collected and paid into the county
general fund in accordance with procedures established by the juvenile court
administrator under RCW 13.04.040 and may be used only for juvenile services.
In the expenditure of funds for juvenile services, there shall be a maintenance
of effort whereby counties exhaust existing resources before using amounts
collected under this section.

Sec.
2. RCW
13.40.160 and 1997 c 338 s 25 and 1997 c 265 s 1 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
The standard range disposition for a juvenile adjudicated of an offense is
determined according to RCW 13.40.0357.

(a)
When the court sentences an offender to a local sanction as provided in RCW
13.40.0357 option A, the court shall impose a determinate disposition within
the standard ranges, except as provided in subsections (2), (((4))) (3),
and (((5))) (4) of this section. The disposition may be
comprised of one or more local sanctions.

(b)
When the court sentences an offender to a standard range as provided in RCW
13.40.0357 option A that includes a term of confinement exceeding thirty days,
commitment shall be to the department for the standard range of confinement,
except as provided in subsections (2), (((4))) (3), and (((5)))
(4) of this section.

(2)
If the court concludes, and enters reasons for its conclusion, that disposition
within the standard range would effectuate a manifest injustice the court shall
impose a disposition outside the standard range, as indicated in option C of
RCW 13.40.0357. The court's finding of manifest injustice shall be supported
by clear and convincing evidence.

A
disposition outside the standard range shall be determinate and shall be comprised
of confinement or community supervision, or a combination thereof. When a
judge finds a manifest injustice and imposes a sentence of confinement
exceeding thirty days, the court shall sentence the juvenile to a maximum term,
and the provisions of RCW 13.40.030(2) shall be used to determine the range. A
disposition outside the standard range is appealable under RCW 13.40.230 by the
state or the respondent. A disposition within the standard range is not
appealable under RCW 13.40.230.

(3)
((Where a respondent is found to have committed an offense for which the
respondent declined to enter into a diversion agreement, the court shall impose
a term of community supervision limited to the conditions allowed in a
diversion agreement as provided in RCW 13.40.080(2).

(4))) When
a juvenile offender is found to have committed a sex offense, other than a sex
offense that is also a serious violent offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030, and
has no history of a prior sex offense, the court, on its own motion or the
motion of the state or the respondent, may order an examination to determine
whether the respondent is amenable to treatment.

The
report of the examination shall include at a minimum the following: The
respondent's version of the facts and the official version of the facts, the
respondent's offense history, an assessment of problems in addition to alleged
deviant behaviors, the respondent's social, educational, and employment
situation, and other evaluation measures used. The report shall set forth the
sources of the evaluator's information.

The
examiner shall assess and report regarding the respondent's amenability to
treatment and relative risk to the community. A proposed treatment plan shall
be provided and shall include, at a minimum:

(a)(i)
Frequency and type of contact between the offender and therapist;

(ii)
Specific issues to be addressed in the treatment and description of planned
treatment modalities;

(iii)
Monitoring plans, including any requirements regarding living conditions,
lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by family members, legal guardians, or
others;

(iv)
Anticipated length of treatment; and

(v)
Recommended crime-related prohibitions.

The
court on its own motion may order, or on a motion by the state shall order, a
second examination regarding the offender's amenability to treatment. The
evaluator shall be selected by the party making the motion. The defendant
shall pay the cost of any second examination ordered unless the court finds the
defendant to be indigent in which case the state shall pay the cost.

After
receipt of reports of the examination, the court shall then consider whether
the offender and the community will benefit from use of this special sex
offender disposition alternative and consider the victim's opinion whether the
offender should receive a treatment disposition under this section. If the
court determines that this special sex offender disposition alternative is
appropriate, then the court shall impose a determinate disposition within the standard
range for the offense, or if the court concludes, and enters reasons for its
conclusions, that such disposition would cause a manifest injustice, the court
shall impose a disposition under option C, and the court may suspend the
execution of the disposition and place the offender on community supervision
for at least two years. As a condition of the suspended disposition, the court
may impose the conditions of community supervision and other conditions,
including up to thirty days of confinement and requirements that the offender
do any one or more of the following:

(b)(i)
Devote time to a specific education, employment, or occupation;

(ii)
Undergo available outpatient sex offender treatment for up to two years, or
inpatient sex offender treatment not to exceed the standard range of
confinement for that offense. A community mental health center may not be used
for such treatment unless it has an appropriate program designed for sex
offender treatment. The respondent shall not change sex offender treatment
providers or treatment conditions without first notifying the prosecutor, the
probation counselor, and the court, and shall not change providers without
court approval after a hearing if the prosecutor or probation counselor object
to the change;

(iii)
Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the
probation counselor prior to any change in the offender's address, educational
program, or employment;

(iv)
Report to the prosecutor and the probation counselor prior to any change in a
sex offender treatment provider. This change shall have prior approval by the
court;

(v)
Report as directed to the court and a probation counselor;

(vi)
Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations, perform community service,
or any combination thereof;

(vii)
Make restitution to the victim for the cost of any counseling reasonably
related to the offense;

(viii)
Comply with the conditions of any court-ordered probation bond; or

(ix)
The court shall order that the offender may not attend the public or approved
private elementary, middle, or high school attended by the victim or the
victim's siblings. The parents or legal guardians of the offender are
responsible for transportation or other costs associated with the offender's
change of school that would otherwise be paid by the school district. The
court shall send notice of the disposition and restriction on attending the
same school as the victim or victim's siblings to the public or approved
private school the juvenile will attend, if known, or if unknown, to the
approved private schools and the public school district board of directors of
the district in which the juvenile resides or intends to reside. This notice
must be sent at the earliest possible date but not later than ten calendar days
after entry of the disposition.

The
sex offender treatment provider shall submit quarterly reports on the
respondent's progress in treatment to the court and the parties. The reports
shall reference the treatment plan and include at a minimum the following:
Dates of attendance, respondent's compliance with requirements, treatment
activities, the respondent's relative progress in treatment, and any other
material specified by the court at the time of the disposition.

At
the time of the disposition, the court may set treatment review hearings as the
court considers appropriate.

Except
as provided in this subsection (((4))) (3), after July 1, 1991,
examinations and treatment ordered pursuant to this subsection shall only be
conducted by sex offender treatment providers certified by the department of
health pursuant to chapter 18.155 RCW. A sex offender therapist who examines
or treats a juvenile sex offender pursuant to this subsection does not have to
be certified by the department of health pursuant to chapter 18.155 RCW if the
court finds that: (A) The offender has already moved to another state or plans
to move to another state for reasons other than circumventing the certification
requirements; (B) no certified providers are available for treatment within a
reasonable geographical distance of the offender's home; and (C) the evaluation
and treatment plan comply with this subsection (4) and the rules adopted by the
department of health.

If
the offender violates any condition of the disposition or the court finds that
the respondent is failing to make satisfactory progress in treatment, the court
may revoke the suspension and order execution of the disposition or the court
may impose a penalty of up to thirty days' confinement for violating conditions
of the disposition. The court may order both execution of the disposition and
up to thirty days' confinement for the violation of the conditions of the
disposition. The court shall give credit for any confinement time previously
served if that confinement was for the offense for which the suspension is
being revoked.

For
purposes of this section, "victim" means any person who has sustained
emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or property
as a direct result of the crime charged. "Victim" may also include a
known parent or guardian of a victim who is a minor child unless the parent or
guardian is the perpetrator of the offense.

A
disposition entered under this subsection (((4))) (3) is not
appealable under RCW 13.40.230.

(((5)))
(4) If the juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition
of local sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not committed an A-
or B+ offense, the court may impose the disposition alternative under RCW
13.40.165.

(((6)))
(5) RCW 13.40.193 shall govern the disposition of any juvenile
adjudicated of possessing a firearm in violation of RCW 9.41.040(1)(b)(iii) or
any crime in which a special finding is entered that the juvenile was armed
with a firearm.

(((7)))
(6) Whenever a juvenile offender is entitled to credit for time spent in
detention prior to a dispositional order, the dispositional order shall
specifically state the number of days of credit for time served.

(((8)))
(7) Except as provided under subsection (((4))) (3) or (((5)))
(4) of this section or RCW 13.40.127, the court shall not suspend or
defer the imposition or the execution of the disposition.

(((9))) (8) In no case shall the term of confinement
imposed by the court at disposition exceed that to which an adult could be
subjected for the same offense.

---
END ---