BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature intends with this act to increase the accuracy of jury verdicts, to
ensure just sentencing under the standards of the sentencing reform act for
offenders who are mentally ill but not insane, to ensure that offenders who are
mentally ill but not insane are kept securely confined and have access to
treatment within available resources, and to reduce the incentive for the
raising of meritless insanity pleas.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 9A.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A person who timely offers a defense of insanity pursuant to RCW 10.77.030 may
be found "guilty and mentally ill" at trial if the trier of fact
finds that:

(a)
The state has proven beyond a reasonable doubt that the defendant is guilty of
the crime charged;

(b)
The defendant has failed to prove by a preponderance of the evidence the
asserted insanity defense; and

(c)
The defendant has proven by a preponderance of the evidence that he or she was
mentally ill.

(2)
A person who waives the right to trial may plead guilty and mentally ill. No
plea of guilty and mentally ill may be accepted by the trial judge until the
defendant has undergone examination by a psychologist or psychiatrist and the
judge has examined the psychological or psychiatric report or reports, has held
a hearing on the issue of the defendant's mental condition, and is satisfied
that there is a factual basis that the defendant was mentally ill at the time
of the offense to which the plea is entered. If the trial judge refuses to
accept a plea of guilty and mentally ill, the defendant shall be permitted to
withdraw the plea.

(3)
For purposes of this section, "mental illness" and "mentally
ill" means a substantial disorder of thought, mood, or behavior that
afflicted a person at the time of the commission of the offense and that
impaired that person's judgment, but not rising to the level of insanity
pursuant to RCW 9A.12.010.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A defendant found guilty and mentally ill or whose plea of guilty and mentally
ill is accepted pursuant to section 2 of this act may have any sentence imposed
that may lawfully be imposed on a defendant convicted of the same offense.
Before imposing sentence, the court shall hear testimony and make findings as
to the degree of the defendant's mental illness at the time of sentencing and
the resulting need for treatment. A defendant found guilty and mentally ill or
whose plea of guilty and mentally ill is accepted pursuant to section 2 of this
act shall be considered guilty for all other purposes of law.

(2)
For an offender who is mentally ill and in need of treatment at the time of
sentencing, the department of corrections or the county having custody of the
offender shall make available, within available resources, such treatment as is
psychiatrically or psychologically indicated for the mental illness.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "mental illness"
and "mentally ill" have the same meaning as in section 2 of this act.

---
END ---