BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
79.90.465 and 1984 c 221 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
definitions in this section apply throughout chapters 79.90 through 79.96 RCW.

(1)
"Water-dependent use" means a use which cannot logically exist in any
location but on the water. Examples include, but are not limited to,
water-borne commerce; terminal and transfer facilities; ferry terminals;
watercraft sales in conjunction with other water-dependent uses; watercraft
construction, repair, and maintenance; moorage and launching facilities;
aquaculture; log booming; and public fishing piers and parks.

(2)
"Water-oriented use" means a use which historically has been
dependent on a waterfront location, but with existing technology could be
located away from the waterfront. Examples include, but are not limited to,
wood products manufacturing, watercraft sales, fish processing, petroleum
refining, sand and gravel processing, log storage, and house boats. For the
purposes of determining rent under this chapter, water-oriented uses shall be
classified as water-dependent uses if the activity either is conducted on
state-owned aquatic lands leased on October 1, 1984, or was actually conducted
on the state-owned aquatic lands for at least three years before October 1,
1984. If, after October 1, 1984, the activity is changed to a use other than a
water-dependent use, the activity shall be classified as a nonwater-dependent
use. If continuation of the existing use requires leasing additional
state-owned aquatic lands and is permitted under the shoreline management act
of 1971, chapter 90.58 RCW, the department may allow reasonable expansion of
the water-oriented use.

(3)
"Nonwater-dependent use" means a use which can operate in a location
other than on the waterfront. Examples include, but are not limited to,
hotels, condominiums, apartments, restaurants, retail stores, and warehouses
not part of a marine terminal or transfer facility.

(4)
"Log storage" means the water storage of logs in rafts or otherwise
prepared for shipment in water-borne commerce, but does not include the
temporary holding of logs to be taken directly into a vessel or processing
facility.

(5)
"Log booming" means placing logs into and taking them out of the
water, assembling and disassembling log rafts before or after their movement in
water-borne commerce, related handling and sorting activities taking place in
the water, and the temporary holding of logs to be taken directly into a
processing facility. "Log booming" does not include the temporary
holding of logs to be taken directly into a vessel.

(6)
"Department" means the department of natural resources.

(7)
"Port district" means a port district created under Title 53 RCW.

(8)
The "real rate of return" means the average for the most recent ten
calendar years of the average rate of return on conventional real property
mortgages as reported by the federal home loan bank board or any successor
agency, minus the average inflation rate for the most recent ten calendar
years.

(9)
The "inflation rate" for a given year is the percentage rate of
change in the previous calendar year's all commodity producer price index of
the bureau of labor statistics of the United States department of commerce. If
the index ceases to be published, the department shall designate by rule a
comparable substitute index.

(10)
"Public utility lines" means pipes, conduits, and similar facilities
for distribution of water, electricity, natural gas, telephone, other
electronic communication, and sewers, including sewer outfall lines.

(11)
"Terminal" means a point of interchange between land and water
carriers, such as a pier, wharf, or group of such, equipped with facilities for
care and handling of cargo and/or passengers.

(12)
"State-owned aquatic lands" means those aquatic lands and waterways
administered by the department of natural resources or managed under RCW
79.90.475 by a port district. "State-owned aquatic lands" does not
include aquatic lands owned in fee by, or withdrawn for the use of, state
agencies other than the department of natural resources.

(13)
"Commercial marina" means a marina that charges rent for moorage at
or near market rates and has six hundred or more lineal feet of moorage per
acre on leased state-owned aquatic lands.

(14)
"Revenue" means the annual sum of the total revenue that is generated
from the rental of moorage space on the state-owned aquatic lands, including
all rental payments and additional membership fees or dues required as a
condition of renting or using the moorage space.

Sec.
2. RCW
79.90.480 and 1998 c 185 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as otherwise provided by this chapter, annual rent rates for the lease of
state-owned aquatic lands for water-dependent uses shall be determined as
follows:

(1)(a)
The rent for commercial marinas shall be determined by multiplying the
revenue of the marina times three and one-half percent. The rent shall be
determined under this subsection annually subject to RCW 79.90.490 (2) and (3)
and section 4 of this act. The rent for all other water-dependent uses shall
be determined by the assessed land value, exclusive of improvements, as
determined by the county assessor, of the upland tax parcel used in conjunction
with the leased area or, if there are no such uplands, of the nearest upland
tax parcel used for water-dependent purposes divided by the parcel area equals
the upland value.

(b)
The upland value times the area of leased aquatic lands times thirty percent
equals the aquatic land value.

(2)
As of July 1, 1989, and each July 1 thereafter, the department shall determine
the real capitalization rate to be applied to water-dependent aquatic land
leases commencing or being adjusted under subsection (3)(a) of this section in
that fiscal year. The real capitalization rate shall be the real rate of
return, except that until June 30, 1989, the real capitalization rate shall be
five percent and thereafter it shall not change by more than one percentage
point in any one year or be more than seven percent or less than three percent.

(3)
The annual rent shall be:

(a)
Determined initially, and redetermined every four years or as otherwise
provided in the lease, by multiplying the aquatic land value times the real
capitalization rate; and

(b)
Adjusted by the inflation rate each year in which the rent is not determined
under subsection (3)(a) of this section.

(4)
If the upland parcel used in conjunction with the leased area is not assessed
or has an assessed value inconsistent with the purposes of the lease, the
nearest comparable upland parcel used for similar purposes shall be substituted
and the lease payment determined in the same manner as provided in this
section.

(5)
For the purposes of this section, "upland tax parcel" is a tax parcel,
some portion of which has upland characteristics. Filled tidelands or
shorelands with upland characteristics which abut state-owned aquatic land
shall be considered as uplands in determining aquatic land values.

(6)
The annual rent for filled state-owned aquatic lands that have the
characteristics of uplands shall be determined in accordance with RCW 79.90.500
in those cases in which the state owns the fill and has a right to charge for
the fill.

(7)
For leases for marina uses only, beginning on June 11, 1998, the annual rental
rates in effect on December 31, 1997, shall remain in effect until July 1,
1999, at which time the annual water-dependent rent shall be determined by the
method in effect at that time. In order to be eligible for the rate to remain
at this level, a marina lease must be in good standing, meaning that the lessee
must be current with payment of rent, the lease not expired or in approved
holdover status, and the lessee not in breach of other terms of the agreement.

(((8)
For all new leases for marinas, or any other water-dependent use, issued after
December 31, 1997, the initial annual water-dependent rent shall be determined
by the methods in subsections (1) through (6) of this section.))

Sec.
3. RCW
79.90.490 and 1984 c 221 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
For leases in effect on October 1, 1984, the rent shall remain at the annual
rate in effect on September 30, 1984, until the next lease anniversary date, at
which time rent established under RCW 79.90.480 or 79.90.485 shall become
effective. If the first rent amount established is an increase of more than
one hundred dollars and is more than thirty-three percent above the rent in
effect on September 30, 1984, the annual rent shall not increase in any year by
more than thirty-three percent of the difference between the previous rent and
the rent established under RCW 79.90.480 or 79.90.485. If the first rent
amount established under RCW 79.90.480 or 79.90.485 is more than thirty-three percent
below the rent in effect on September 30, 1984, the annual rent shall not
decrease in any year by more than thirty-three percent of the difference
between the previous rent and the rent established under RCW 79.90.480 or
79.90.485. Thereafter, ((notwithstanding any other provision of this title))
except for commercial marina leases, the annual rental established under
RCW 79.90.480 or 79.90.485 shall not increase more than fifty percent in any
year.

(2)
For commercial marina leases, the lessee may elect to convert to the rent
valuation method in RCW 79.90.480(1) as the next revaluation date of the lease
as a water-dependent use under RCW 79.90.480(2).

(3)
If the annual rent for commercial marinas determined under subsection (2) of
this section increases by five hundred dollars or more, the rent increase shall
be phased in relatively over four years until full rental rate determined under
subsection (1) of this section is attained.

(4)
This section applies only to leases of state-owned aquatic lands subject to RCW
79.90.480 or 79.90.485.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 79.90 RCW to read as follows:

For all new or renewed leases the annual rent may not be less than
five hundred dollars.

---
END ---