BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that homelessness is a significant problem in Washington.
Planning for and serving the shelter and housing needs of the homeless has been
and continues to be a responsibility of the department of community, trade, and
economic development. In order to adequately and effectively address the
complex issues confronting homeless families with children, planning for and
evaluating such services must be a collaborative effort between the department
of community, trade, and economic development, the department of social and
health services, other local, state, and federal government agencies, and
community organizations. It is the intent of the legislature that children
should not be placed in the foster care system if homelessness is the primary reason
for placement or the continuation of their placement.

---
END ---