BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
Washington state institute for public policy shall study the availability of
pro bono legal services for victims of domestic violence who have children.
The study shall include the following:

(1)
Any factors preventing victims of domestic violence who have children from
obtaining pro bono legal services;

(2)
Methods to increase the availability of pro bono legal services for victims of
domestic violence who have children including, but not limited to:

(a)
Providing a reduction of the state business and occupation tax for businesses
who provide pro bono legal services for victims of domestic violence who have
children; and

(b)
Increasing the availability of state-funded pro bono legal services to victims
of domestic violence who have children.

(3)
An examination, in both urban and rural areas, of the cost, feasibility, and
effectiveness of each method identified in subsection (2) of this section.

(4)
The cost savings to the state from the increased availability of pro bono legal
services for victims of domestic violence with children resulting from the
implementation of the methods identified in subsection (2) of this section.

The
Washington state institute for public policy shall report its findings to the
legislature by January 3, 2000.

This section expires January 31, 2000.

---
END ---