BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
13.40.320 and 1997 c 338 s 38 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of social and health services shall establish and operate a
medium security juvenile offender basic training camp program. The department
shall site a juvenile offender basic training camp facility in the most
cost-effective facility possible and shall review the possibility of using an
existing abandoned and/or available state, federally, or military-owned site or
facility.

(2)
The department may contract under this chapter with private companies, the
national guard, or other federal, state, or local agencies to operate the
juvenile offender basic training camp, notwithstanding the provisions of RCW
41.06.380. Requests for proposals from possible contractors shall not call for
payment on a per diem basis.

(3)
The juvenile offender basic training camp shall accommodate at least seventy
offenders. The beds shall count as additions to, and not be used as
replacements for, existing bed capacity at existing department of social and
health services juvenile facilities.

(4)
The juvenile offender basic training camp shall be a structured and regimented
model lasting one hundred twenty days emphasizing the building up of an
offender's self-esteem, confidence, and discipline. The juvenile offender
basic training camp program shall provide participants with basic education, prevocational
training, work-based learning, live work, work ethic skills, conflict
resolution counseling, substance abuse intervention, anger management
counseling, and structured intensive physical training. The juvenile offender
basic training camp program shall have a curriculum training and work schedule
that incorporates a balanced assignment of these or other rehabilitation and
training components for no less than sixteen hours per day, six days a week.

The
department shall adopt rules for the safe and effective operation of the
juvenile offender basic training camp program, standards for an offender's
successful program completion, and rules for the continued after-care
supervision of offenders who have successfully completed the program.

(5)
Offenders eligible for the juvenile offender basic training camp option shall
be those with a disposition of not more than sixty-five weeks. Violent and sex
offenders shall not be eligible for the juvenile offender basic training camp
program.

(6)
If the court determines that the offender is eligible for the juvenile offender
basic training camp option, the court may recommend that the department place
the offender in the program. The department shall evaluate the offender and
may place the offender in the program. The evaluation shall include, at a
minimum, a risk assessment developed by the department and designed to
determine the offender's suitability for the program. No juvenile who is
assessed as a high risk offender or suffers from any mental or physical
problems that could endanger his or her health or drastically affect his or her
performance in the program shall be admitted to or retained in the juvenile
offender basic training camp program.

(7)
All juvenile offenders eligible for the juvenile offender basic training camp
sentencing option shall spend one hundred twenty days of their disposition in a
juvenile offender basic training camp. If the juvenile offender's activities
while in the juvenile offender basic training camp are so disruptive to the
juvenile offender basic training camp program, as determined by the secretary
according to rules adopted by the department, as to result in the removal of
the juvenile offender from the juvenile offender basic training camp program,
or if the offender cannot complete the juvenile offender basic training camp
program due to medical problems, the secretary shall require that the offender
be committed to a juvenile institution to serve the entire remainder of his or
her disposition, less the amount of time already served in the juvenile
offender basic training camp program.

(8)
All offenders who successfully graduate from the one hundred twenty day
juvenile offender basic training camp program shall spend the remainder of
their disposition on parole in a ((division of)) juvenile rehabilitation
administration intensive aftercare program in the local community. A
violation of conditions of parole is subject to sanctions specified in RCW
13.40.210(4). The program shall provide for the needs of the offender based
on his or her progress in the aftercare program as indicated by ongoing
assessment of those needs and progress. The intensive aftercare program shall
monitor postprogram juvenile offenders and assist them to successfully
reintegrate into the community. In addition, the program shall develop a
process for closely monitoring and assessing public safety risks. The
intensive aftercare program shall be designed and funded by the department of
social and health services.

(9)
The department shall also develop and maintain a data base to measure
recidivism rates specific to this incarceration program. The data base shall
maintain data on all juvenile offenders who complete the juvenile offender
basic training camp program for a period of two years after they have completed
the program. The data base shall also maintain data on the criminal activity,
educational progress, and employment activities of all juvenile offenders who
participated in the program.

Sec.
2. RCW
13.40.210 and 1997 c 338 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The secretary shall, except in the case of a juvenile committed by a court to a
term of confinement in a state institution outside the appropriate standard
range for the offense(s) for which the juvenile was found to be guilty
established pursuant to RCW 13.40.030, set a release or discharge date for each
juvenile committed to its custody. The release or discharge date shall be
within the prescribed range to which a juvenile has been committed except as
provided in RCW 13.40.320 concerning offenders the department determines are
eligible for the juvenile offender basic training camp program. Such dates
shall be determined prior to the expiration of sixty percent of a juvenile's
minimum term of confinement included within the prescribed range to which the
juvenile has been committed. The secretary shall release any juvenile
committed to the custody of the department within four calendar days prior to
the juvenile's release date or on the release date set under this chapter.
Days spent in the custody of the department shall be tolled by any period of
time during which a juvenile has absented himself or herself from the
department's supervision without the prior approval of the secretary or the secretary's
designee.

(2)
The secretary shall monitor the average daily population of the state's
juvenile residential facilities. When the secretary concludes that
in-residence population of residential facilities exceeds one hundred five
percent of the rated bed capacity specified in statute, or in absence of such
specification, as specified by the department in rule, the secretary may
recommend reductions to the governor. On certification by the governor that
the recommended reductions are necessary, the secretary has authority to
administratively release a sufficient number of offenders to reduce
in-residence population to one hundred percent of rated bed capacity. The
secretary shall release those offenders who have served the greatest proportion
of their sentence. However, the secretary may deny release in a particular
case at the request of an offender, or if the secretary finds that there is no
responsible custodian, as determined by the department, to whom to release the
offender, or if the release of the offender would pose a clear danger to
society. The department shall notify the committing court of the release at
the time of release if any such early releases have occurred as a result of
excessive in-residence population. In no event shall an offender adjudicated
of a violent offense be granted release under the provisions of this
subsection.

(3)(a)
Following the juvenile's release under subsection (1) of this section, the
secretary may require the juvenile to comply with a program of parole to be
administered by the department in his or her community which shall last no
longer than eighteen months, except that in the case of a juvenile sentenced
for rape in the first or second degree, rape of a child in the first or second
degree, child molestation in the first degree, or indecent liberties with
forcible compulsion, the period of parole shall be twenty-four months and, in
the discretion of the secretary, may be up to thirty-six months when the
secretary finds that an additional period of parole is necessary and
appropriate in the interests of public safety or to meet the ongoing needs of
the juvenile. A parole program is mandatory for offenders released under
subsection (2) of this section. The decision to place an offender on parole
shall be based on an assessment by the department of the offender's risk for
reoffending upon release. The department shall prioritize available parole
resources to provide supervision and services to offenders at moderate to high
risk for reoffending.

(b)
The secretary shall, for the period of parole, facilitate the juvenile's
reintegration into his or her community and to further this goal shall require
the juvenile to refrain from possessing a firearm or using a deadly weapon and
refrain from committing new offenses and may require the juvenile to: (i)
Undergo available medical, psychiatric, drug and alcohol, sex offender, mental
health, and other offense-related treatment services; (ii) report as directed
to a parole officer and/or designee; (iii) pursue a course of study, vocational
training, or employment; (iv) notify the parole officer of the current address
where he or she resides; (v) be present at a particular address during
specified hours; (vi) remain within prescribed geographical boundaries; (vii) submit
to electronic monitoring; (viii) refrain from using illegal drugs and alcohol,
and submit to random urinalysis when requested by the assigned parole officer;
(ix) refrain from contact with specific individuals or a specified class of
individuals; (x) meet other conditions determined by the parole officer to
further enhance the juvenile's reintegration into the community; (xi) pay any
court-ordered fines or restitution; and (xii) perform community service.
Community service for the purpose of this section means compulsory service,
without compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by the
offender. Community service may be performed through public or private
organizations or through work crews.

(c)
The secretary may further require up to twenty-five percent of the highest risk
juvenile offenders who are placed on parole to participate in an intensive
supervision program. Offenders participating in an intensive supervision
program shall be required to comply with all terms and conditions listed in (b)
of this subsection and shall also be required to comply with the following
additional terms and conditions: (i) Obey all laws and refrain from any
conduct that threatens public safety; (ii) report at least once a week to an
assigned community case manager; and (iii) meet all other requirements imposed
by the community case manager related to participating in the intensive
supervision program. As a part of the intensive supervision program, the
secretary may require day reporting.

(d)
After termination of the parole period, the juvenile shall be discharged from
the department's supervision.

(4)(a)
The department may also modify parole for violation thereof. If, after
affording a juvenile all of the due process rights to which he or she would be
entitled if the juvenile were an adult, the secretary finds that a juvenile has
violated a condition of his or her parole, the secretary shall order one of the
following which is reasonably likely to effectuate the purpose of the parole
and to protect the public: (i) Continued supervision under the same conditions
previously imposed; (ii) intensified supervision with increased reporting
requirements; (iii) additional conditions of supervision authorized by this
chapter; (iv) except as provided in (a)(v) and (vi) of this subsection,
imposition of a period of confinement not to exceed thirty days in a facility
operated by or pursuant to a contract with the state of Washington or any city
or county for a portion of each day or for a certain number of days each week
with the balance of the days or weeks spent under supervision; ((and))
(v) the secretary may order any of the conditions or may return the offender to
confinement for the remainder of the sentence range if the offense for which
the offender was sentenced is rape in the first or second degree, rape of a
child in the first or second degree, child molestation in the first degree,
indecent liberties with forcible compulsion, or a sex offense that is also a
serious violent offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030; and (vi) the secretary
may order any of the conditions or may return the offender to confinement for
the remainder of the sentence range if the youth has completed the basic
training camp as described in RCW 13.40.320.

(b)
If the department finds that any juvenile in a program of parole has possessed
a firearm or used a deadly weapon during the program of parole, the department
shall modify the parole under (a) of this subsection and confine the juvenile
for at least thirty days. Confinement shall be in a facility operated by or
pursuant to a contract with the state or any county.

(5)
A parole officer of the department of social and health services shall have the
power to arrest a juvenile under his or her supervision on the same grounds as
a law enforcement officer would be authorized to arrest the person.

(6) If so requested and approved under chapter 13.06 RCW, the
secretary shall permit a county or group of counties to perform functions under
subsections (3) through (5) of this section.

---
END ---