BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.52.069 and 1995 c 318 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
As used in this section, "taxing district" means a county, emergency
medical service district, city or town, public hospital district, urban
emergency medical service district, or fire protection district.

(2)
A taxing district may impose additional regular property tax levies in an
amount equal to fifty cents or less per thousand dollars of the assessed value
of property in the taxing district in each year for ((six)) ten
consecutive years when specifically authorized so to do by a majority of at
least three-fifths of the registered voters thereof approving a proposition
authorizing the levies submitted at a general or special election, at which
election the number of persons voting "yes" on the proposition shall
constitute three-fifths of a number equal to forty percent of the total number
of voters voting in such taxing district at the last preceding general election
when the number of registered voters voting on the proposition does not exceed
forty percent of the total number of voters voting in such taxing district in
the last preceding general election; or by a majority of at least three-fifths
of the registered voters thereof voting on the proposition when the number of
registered voters voting on the proposition exceeds forty percent of the total
number of voters voting in such taxing district in the last preceding general
election. Ballot propositions shall conform with RCW 29.30.111.

(3)
Any tax imposed under this section shall be used only for the provision of
emergency medical care or emergency medical services, including related
personnel costs, training for such personnel, and related equipment, supplies,
vehicles and structures needed for the provision of emergency medical care or
emergency medical services.

(4)
If a county levies a tax under this section, no taxing district within the
county may levy a tax under this section. No other taxing district may levy a
tax under this section if another taxing district has levied a tax under this
section within its boundaries: PROVIDED, That if a county levies less than
fifty cents per thousand dollars of the assessed value of property, then any
other taxing district may levy a tax under this section equal to the difference
between the rate of the levy by the county and fifty cents: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That if a taxing district within a county levies this tax, and the voters of the
county subsequently approve a levying of this tax, then the amount of the
taxing district levy within the county shall be reduced, when the combined
levies exceed fifty cents. Whenever a tax is levied county-wide, the service
shall, insofar as is feasible, be provided throughout the county: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That no county-wide levy proposal may be placed on the ballot without
the approval of the legislative authority of each city exceeding fifty thousand
population within the county: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That this section and RCW
36.32.480 shall not prohibit any city or town from levying an annual excess
levy to fund emergency medical services: AND PROVIDED, FURTHER, That if a
county proposes to impose tax levies under this section, no other ballot proposition
authorizing tax levies under this section by another taxing district in the
county may be placed before the voters at the same election at which the county
ballot proposition is placed: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That any taxing district
emergency medical service levy that is authorized subsequent to a county
emergency medical service levy, shall expire concurrently with the county
emergency medical service levy.

(5)
The limitations in RCW 84.52.043 shall not apply to the tax levy authorized in
this section.

(6)
The limitation in RCW 84.55.010 shall not apply to the first levy imposed
pursuant to this section following the approval of such levy by the voters
pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act applies to levies authorized after the effective date of this section.

---
END ---