BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that sport shooting ranges in this state offer valuable
hunter and firearm safety training, legitimate and important forms of
recreation to the general public, and provide the opportunity for many law
enforcement agencies to maintain necessary firearms skills efficiently and at
little or no cost. The continued existence and viability of sport shooting
ranges is impacted by burdensome retroactive regulation and lawsuits, thereby
potentially threatening the availability of low‑cost firearms training to
some local law enforcement agencies, as well as hunter and firearms safety
training and recreation to the general public.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a)
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person who operates or uses a
sport shooting range in this state is not subject to civil liability or
criminal prosecution in a matter relating to noise or noise pollution resulting
from the operation or use of the range if the range is in compliance with any
noise control laws or ordinances that applied to the range and its operation at
the time of construction or initial operation of the range. However, nothing
in this section affects the ability of a local government to regulate noise
levels of a range between the hours of ten p.m. and six a.m.

(b)
A person who operates or uses a sport shooting range is not subject to an
action for nuisance, and a court of the state shall not enjoin the use or
operation of a range on the basis of noise or noise pollution, if the range is
in compliance with any noise control laws or ordinances that applied to the
range and its operation at the time of construction or initial operation of the
range.

(c)
Rules adopted by any state department or agency for limiting levels of noise in
terms of decibel level that may occur in the outdoor atmosphere do not apply to
a sport shooting range exempted from liability under this section.

(2)
A person who acquires title to or who owns real property adversely affected by
the use of property with a permanently located and improved sport shooting
range shall not maintain a nuisance action against the person who owns the
range to restrain, enjoin, or impede the use of the range where there has not
been a substantial change in the nature of the use of the range. This action
does not prohibit actions for negligence or recklessness in the operation of
the range or by a person using the range.

(3)
A sport shooting range that is operated and is not in violation of existing law
at the time of the enactment of an ordinance must be permitted to continue in
operation even if the operation of the sport shooting range at a later date
does not conform to the new ordinance or an amendment to an existing ordinance.

(4)
A person who participates in sport shooting at a sport shooting range accepts
the risks associated with the sport to the extent the risks are obvious and
inherent. Those risks include, but are not limited to, injuries that may
result from noise, discharge of a projectile or shot, malfunction of sport
shooting equipment not owned by the shooting range, natural variations in
terrain, surface or subsurface snow or ice conditions, bare spots, rocks,
trees, and other forms of natural growth or debris.

(5)
Except as otherwise provided in this section, this section does not prohibit a
local government from regulating the location and construction of a sport
shooting range after the effective date of this act.

(6)
As used in this section:

(a)
"Local government" means a county, city, or town.

(b)
"Person" means an individual, proprietorship, partnership,
corporation, club, or other legal entity.

(c) "Sport shooting range" or "range" means an
area designed and operated for the use of rifles, shotguns, pistols,
silhouettes, skeet, trap, black powder, or any other similar sport shooting.

---
END ---