BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that there has been perceived growth in occupational
disease and chemically related illness claims that arise from the workplace,
and that statistics kept by the department of labor and industries indicate
that a significant proportion of such claims may be rejected by the department
and self-insured employers. It is also recognized that workers suffering such
illnesses may have physical, psychological or financial burden from their
disorders.

(2)
The legislature recognizes that the department, in order to accept a claim for
chemically related illness, or any related occupational disease or injury, must
receive medical evidence of causality in the relationship between an exposure
and illness.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) A
study, subject to the confidentiality requirements under RCW 51.28.070, shall
be conducted of industrial insurance claims filed by an appropriate sample of
workers who have suffered chemically related illnesses or injuries and whose
claims were open any time during the period from January 1, 1995, through
December 31, 1999. At a minimum, the study shall review:

(a)
The nature and severity of the illnesses or injuries reported in these
industrial insurance claims;

(b)
The disposition of these industrial insurance claims by the department of labor
and industries or self-insured employers;

(c)
The degree to which the lives of these claimants have changed from the time of
exposure to the time of the study, including physical and financial condition;
and

(d)
The extent to which the chemically related injury center of excellence at
Harborview medical center was used for clinical assessment and to guide
adjudication of these claims.

(e)
The medical diagnosis made by physicians pertaining to these claims and an
analysis of the scientific adequacy of the tests and examinations used in the
diagnosis.

(2)
A study shall also be conducted to determine:

(a)
Which occupational diseases and injuries should be considered chemically
related illnesses so that an accurate annual count of such illnesses may be
reported;

(b)
The best method of reporting such illnesses annually, including the most
accurate set of available or obtainable data;

(c)
A review of other workers' compensation jurisdictions and relevant scientific
literature regarding the criteria for determining causality or work-relatedness
in occupational diseases and injuries. This review shall at least include:

(i)
Methods generally accepted in the medical determination of whether an exposure
or exposures are likely to be either toxic or causative, or both;

(ii)
Methods generally accepted in the medical determination of the presence or
absence of a definable clinical condition;

(iii)
Methods generally accepted in determining the medical relationship between the
exposure and the clinical condition.

(3)
The department of labor and industries must contract with an outside entity to
conduct the study. The contractor shall be selected by the director of the
department of labor and industries and two members of the workers' compensation
advisory committee who are designated for that purpose by the committee. The
study shall be funded within legislative appropriations from the medical aid
fund, with self-insured employers and the state fund each paying a pro rata
share, based on the number of worker hours, of the authorized expenditures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. A
special task force composed of four members or designees of the workers'
compensation advisory committee and four legislators, two from the house of
representatives and two from the senate, shall advise and provide oversight to
the studies in section 2 of this act. The task force shall report to the
legislature on an interim basis in December 2000, and with a final report in
December 2001. The final report shall make statutory and policy
recommendations including recommended changes to the criteria for determining
causality for chemically related occupational disease and injury.

---
END ---