BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.02.060 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 44 are each amended to read as follows:

The
local ordinance by which impact fees are imposed:

(1)
Shall include a schedule of impact fees which shall be adopted for each type of
development activity that is subject to impact fees, specifying the amount of
the impact fee to be imposed for each type of system improvement. The schedule
shall be based upon a formula or other method of calculating such impact fees.
In determining proportionate share, the formula or other method of calculating
impact fees shall incorporate, among other things, the following:

(a)
The cost of public facilities necessitated by new development;

(b)
An adjustment to the cost of the public facilities for past or future payments
made or reasonably anticipated to be made by new development to pay for
particular system improvements in the form of user fees, debt service payments,
taxes, or other payments earmarked for or proratable to the particular system
improvement;

(c)
The availability of other means of funding public facility improvements;

(d)
The cost of existing public facilities improvements; and

(e)
The methods by which public facilities improvements were financed;

(2)
May provide an exemption for low-income housing, and other development
activities with broad public purposes, from these impact fees, provided that
the impact fees for such development activity shall be paid from public funds
other than impact fee accounts;

(3)
Shall provide a credit for the value of any dedication of land for, improvement
to, or new construction of any system improvements provided by the developer,
to facilities that are identified in the capital facilities plan and that are
required by the county, city, or town as a condition of approving the
development activity;

(4)
Shall provide that impact fees for residential construction be collected at
the time of home title transfer to the occupant or twelve months after the
building permit is issued;

(5)
Shall provide that impact fees for nonresidential construction be identified on
an itemized basis for each planned public project, based upon adopted policies
and procedures, and shall set forth such itemized fees as a condition of
approval of the development project. Within ninety days prior to the scheduled
start of construction of any specific public project for which mitigation fees have
been set, the jurisdiction may require payment by the owner or owners of the
development project of the amount set forth for that public project in the
approval conditions;

(6)
Shall allow the county, city, or town imposing the impact fees to adjust the
standard impact fee at the time the fee is imposed to consider unusual
circumstances in specific cases to ensure that impact fees are imposed fairly;

(((5)))
(7) Shall include a provision for calculating the amount of the fee to
be imposed on a particular development that permits consideration of studies
and data submitted by the developer to adjust the amount of the fee;

(((6)))
(8) Shall establish one or more reasonable service areas within which it
shall calculate and impose impact fees for various land use categories per unit
of development;

(((7))) (9) May provide for the imposition of an
impact fee for system improvement costs previously incurred by a county, city,
or town to the extent that new growth and development will be served by the
previously constructed improvements provided such fee shall not be imposed to
make up for any system improvement deficiencies.

---
END ---