BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
35.43.180 and 1983 c 303 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
jurisdiction of the legislative authority of a city or town to proceed with any
local improvement initiated by resolution shall be divested by a protest filed
with the city or town council within thirty days from the date of passage of
the ordinance ordering the improvement, signed by the owners of the property
within the proposed local improvement district or utility local improvement
district subject to ((sixty)) fifty-one percent or more of the
total cost of the improvement including federally-owned or other nonassessable
property as shown and determined by the preliminary estimates and assessment
roll of the proposed improvement district or, if all or part of the local
improvement district or utility local improvement district lies outside of the
city or town, such jurisdiction shall be divested by a protest filed in the
same manner and signed by the owners of property which is within the proposed
local improvement district or utility local improvement district but outside
the boundaries of the city or town, and which is subject to ((sixty)) forty
percent or more of that part of the total cost of the improvement allocable to
property within the proposed local improvement district or utility local
improvement district but outside the boundaries of the city or town, including
federally-owned or other nonassessable property: PROVIDED, That such restraint
by protest shall not apply to any of the following local improvements, if the
legislative body finds and recites in the ordinance or resolution authorizing
the improvement that such improvement is necessary for the protection of the
public health and safety and such ordinance or resolution is passed by
unanimous vote of all members present: (1) Sanitary sewers or watermains where
the health officer of the city or town, or department of ecology, files with
the legislative authority a report showing the necessity for such improvement;
and (2) fire hydrants where the chief of the fire department files a report
showing the necessity for such improvement.

Sec.
2. RCW
87.03.480 and 1959 c 75 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
desired special construction, reconstruction, betterment or improvement or
purchase or acquisition of improvements already constructed, for any authorized
district service, including but not limited to the safeguarding of open canals
or ditches for the protection of the public therefrom, which are for the
special benefit of the lands tributary thereto and within an irrigation
district may be constructed or acquired and provision made to meet the cost
thereof as follows:

The
holders of title or evidence of title to one-quarter of the acreage proposed to
be assessed, may file with the district board their petition reciting the
nature and general plan of the desired improvement and specifying the lands
proposed to be specially assessed therefor. The petition shall be accompanied
by a bond in the sum of one hundred dollars with surety to be approved by the
board, conditioned that the petitioners will pay the cost of an investigation
of the project and of the hearing thereon if it is not established. The board
may at any time require a bond in an additional sum. Upon the filing of the
petition the board with the assistance of a competent engineer, shall make an
investigation of the feasibility, cost, and need of the proposed local
improvement together with the ability of the lands to pay the cost, and if it
appears feasible, they shall have plans and estimate of the cost prepared. If
a protest against the establishment of the proposed improvement signed by a
majority of the holders of title in the proposed local district is presented at
or before the hearing, or if the proposed improvement should be found not
feasible, too expensive, or the lands to be benefited insufficient security for
the costs, they shall dismiss the petition at the expense of the petitioners. If
any vote of the affected property owners is taken to determine acceptability of
the proposed improvement, only the votes of those owners actually present at
the meeting may be considered. The unexpressed opinions and positions of those
owners not present at the meeting may not affect such vote.

---
END ---