BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.19.010 and 1993 c 472 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

((The
department of general administration shall be organized into divisions, which shall
include (1) the division of capitol buildings, (2) the division of purchasing,
(3) the division of engineering and architecture, and (4) the division of motor
vehicle transportation service.))

The
director of general administration shall ((have charge and general
supervision)) be the executive head of the department of general
administration. ((He or she may appoint and deputize such clerical and
other assistants as may be necessary for the general administration of the
department.)) The director shall be appointed by the governor with the
consent of the senate, and shall serve at the pleasure of the governor.
The director ((of general administration)) shall receive a salary in an
amount fixed by the governor in accordance with RCW 43.03.040.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The director of general administration shall supervise and administer the
activities of the department of general administration and shall advise the
governor and the legislature with respect to matters under the jurisdiction of
the department.

(2)
In addition to other powers and duties granted to the director, the director
shall have the following powers and duties:

(a)
Enter into contracts on behalf of the state to carry out the purposes of this
chapter;

(b)
Accept and expend gifts and grants that are related to the purposes of this
chapter, whether such grants be of federal or other funds;

(c)
Appoint a deputy director and such assistant directors and special assistants
as may be needed to administer the department. These employees are exempt from
the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW;

(d)
Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW and perform all other
functions necessary and proper to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(e)
Delegate powers, duties, and functions as the director deems necessary for
efficient administration, but the director shall be responsible for the
official acts of the officers and employees of the department; and

(f)
Perform other duties as are necessary and consistent with law.

(3)
The director may establish additional advisory groups as may be necessary to
carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(4)
The internal affairs of the department shall be under the control of the
director in order that the director may manage the department in a flexible and
intelligent manner as dictated by changing contemporary circumstances. Unless
specifically limited by law, the director shall have complete charge and
supervisory powers over the department. The director may create such
administrative structures as the director deems appropriate, except as
otherwise specified by law, and the director may employ such personnel as may
be necessary in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW, except as otherwise provided
by law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. RCW
43.19.013 (Deputy director) and 1967 c 27 s 1 are each repealed.

---
END ---