BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW to read as follows:

The song, music, and lyrics, "Washington My Homeland,"
composed by Cary J. Sand, is hereby designated as the official centennial song
of the state of Washington.

---
END ---