BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
35.63.110 and 1965 c 7 s 35.63.110 are each amended to read as follows:

For
any or all of such purposes the council or board, on recommendation of its
commission, may divide the municipality or any portion thereof into districts
of such size, shape and area, or may establish such official maps, or
development plans for the whole or any portion of the municipality as may be
deemed best suited to carry out the purposes of this chapter and within such
districts it may regulate and restrict the erection, construction,
reconstruction, alteration, repair or use of buildings, structures, or
land.

However,
in any area in a zoning district for single-family residences that was annexed
or incorporated after April 1, 1992, and where manufactured housing was allowed
prior to annexation or incorporation, single-family designated manufactured
homes, as defined in RCW 35.63.160, that are thermally equivalent to the state
energy code and manufactured after April 1, 1992, shall be sited on individual
lots subject only to land use regulations applicable to all other single-family
residences on individual lots in such districts. This section does not prevent
the adoption of home design regulations to assure neighborhood compatibility
provided such regulations apply equally to homes regulated under the state
building code and designated manufactured homes as defined in RCW 35.63.160.

Sec.
2. RCW
35.63.160 and 1988 c 239 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
((Each comprehensive plan which does not allow for the siting of
manufactured homes on individual lots shall be subject to a review by the city
of the need and demand for such homes. The review shall be completed by
December 31, 1990.

(2)
For the purpose of providing an optional reference for cities which choose to
allow manufactured homes on individual lots,)) A
"designated manufactured home" is a manufactured home constructed
after June 15, 1976, in accordance with state and federal requirements for
manufactured homes, which:

(a)
Is comprised of at least two fully enclosed parallel sections each of not less
than twelve feet wide by thirty-six feet long;

(b)
Was originally constructed with and now has a composition or wood shake or
shingle, coated metal, or similar roof of ((not less than)) nominal
3:12 pitch; and

(c)
Has exterior siding similar in appearance to siding materials commonly used on
conventional site-built uniform building code single-family residences.

(((3)))
(2) Nothing in this section precludes cities from allowing any
manufactured home from being sited on individual lots through local standards
which differ from the designated manufactured home as described in this
section, except that the term "designated manufactured home" shall
not be used except as defined in subsection (((2))) (1) of this
section.

Sec.
3. RCW
35A.63.100 and 1979 ex.s. c 170 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

After
approval of the comprehensive plan, as set forth above, the legislative body,
in developing the municipality and in regulating the use of land, may implement
or give effect to the comprehensive plan or parts thereof by ordinance or other
action to such extent as the legislative body deems necessary or appropriate.
Such ordinances or other action may provide for:

(1)
Adoption of an official map and regulations relating thereto designating
locations and requirements for one or more of the following: Streets, parks,
public buildings, and other public facilities, and protecting such sites
against encroachment by buildings and other physical structures.

(2)
Dividing the municipality, or portions thereof, into appropriate zones within
which specific standards, requirements, and conditions may be provided for
regulating the use of public and private land, buildings, and structures, and
the location, height, bulk, number of stories, and size of buildings and
structures, size of yards, courts, open spaces, density of population, ratio of
land area to the area of buildings and structures, setbacks, area required for
off-street parking, protection of access to direct sunlight for solar energy
systems, and such other standards, requirements, regulations, and procedures as
are appropriately related thereto. The ordinance encompassing the matters of
this subsection is hereinafter called the "zoning ordinance". No
zoning ordinance, or amendment thereto, shall be enacted by the legislative
body without at least one public hearing, notice of which shall be given as set
forth in RCW 35A.63.070. Such hearing may be held before the planning agency
or the board of adjustment or such other body as the legislative body shall
designate.

However,
in any area in a zoning district for single-family residences that was annexed
or incorporated after April 1, 1992, and where manufactured housing was allowed
prior to annexation or incorporation, single-family designated manufactured
homes, as defined in RCW 35A.63.145, that are thermally equivalent to the state
energy code and manufactured after April 1, 1992, shall be sited on individual
lots subject only to land use regulations applicable to all other single-family
residences on individual lots in such districts. This section does not prevent
the adoption of home design regulations to assure neighborhood compatibility
provided such regulations apply equally to homes regulated under the state
building code and designated manufactured homes as defined in RCW 35A.63.145.

(3)
Adoption of design standards, requirements, regulations, and procedures for the
subdivision of land into two or more parcels, including, but not limited to,
the approval of plats, dedications, acquisitions, improvements, and reservation
of sites for public use.

(4)
Scheduling public improvements on the basis of recommended priorities over a
period of years, subject to periodic review.

(5)
Such other matters as may be otherwise authorized by law or as the legislative
body deems necessary or appropriate to effectuate the goals and objectives of
the comprehensive plan or parts thereof and the purposes of this chapter.

Sec.
4. RCW
35A.63.145 and 1988 c 239 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
((Each comprehensive plan which does not allow for the siting of
manufactured homes on individual lots shall be subject to a review by the city
of the need and demand for such homes. The review shall be completed by
December 31, 1990.

(2)
For the purpose of providing an optional reference for cities which choose to
allow manufactured homes on individual lots,)) A
"designated manufactured home" is a manufactured home constructed
after June 15, 1976, in accordance with state and federal requirements for
manufactured homes, which:

(a)
Is comprised of at least two fully enclosed parallel sections each of not less
than twelve feet wide by thirty-six feet long;

(b)
Was originally constructed with and now has a composition or wood shake or
shingle, coated metal, or similar roof of ((not less than)) nominal
3:12 pitch; and

(c)
Has exterior siding similar in appearance to siding materials commonly used on
conventional site-built uniform building code single-family residences.

(((3)))
(2) Nothing in this section precludes cities from allowing any
manufactured home from being sited on individual lots through local standards
which differ from the designated manufactured home as described in this
section, except that the term "designated manufactured home" shall
not be used except as defined in subsection (((2))) (1) of this
section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

Any
city that plans or elects to plan under this chapter must allow in any area in
a zoning district for single-family residences that was annexed or incorporated
after April 1, 1992, and where manufactured housing was allowed prior to
annexation or incorporation, single-family designated manufactured homes as
defined in RCW 43.63B.010, 35.63.160, or 35A.63.145, that are thermally
equivalent to the state energy code and manufactured after April 1, 1992, to be
sited on individual lots subject only to land use regulations applicable to all
other single-family residences on individual lots in such districts. This
section does not prevent the adoption of home design regulations to assure
neighborhood compatibility provided such regulations apply equally to homes
regulated under the state building code and designated manufactured homes as
defined in RCW 43.63B.010, 35.63.160, or 35A.63.145.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 35.02 RCW to read as follows:

Any
city or town incorporated under this chapter must allow in any area in a zoning
district for single-family residences where manufactured housing was allowed
prior to incorporation, single-family designated manufactured homes as defined
in RCW 43.63B.010, 35.63.160, or 35A.63.145, that are thermally equivalent to
the state energy code and manufactured after April 1, 1992, to be sited on
individual lots subject only to land use regulations applicable to all other
single-family residences on individual lots in such districts. This section
does not prevent the adoption of home design regulations to assure neighborhood
compatibility provided such regulations apply equally to homes regulated under
the state building code and designated manufactured homes as defined in RCW
43.63B.010, 35.63.160, or 35A.63.145.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 35.13 RCW to read as follows:

Any
city or town that annexes land under this chapter must allow in any area in a
zoning district for single-family residences where manufactured housing was
allowed prior to annexation, single-family designated manufactured homes as
defined in RCW 43.63B.010, 35.63.160, or 35A.63.145, that are thermally
equivalent to the state energy code and manufactured after April 1, 1992, to be
sited on individual lots subject only to land use regulations applicable to all
other single-family residences on individual lots in such districts. This
section does not prevent the adoption of home design regulations to assure
neighborhood compatibility provided such regulations apply equally to homes
regulated under the state building code and designated manufactured homes as
defined in RCW 43.63B.010, 35.63.160, or 35A.63.145.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
new section is added to chapter 35A.14 RCW to read as follows:

Any
code city that annexes under this chapter must allow in any area in a zoning
district for single-family residences where manufactured housing was allowed
prior to annexation, single-family designated manufactured homes as defined in
RCW 43.63B.010, 35.63.160, or 35A.63.145, that are thermally equivalent to the
state energy code and manufactured after April 1, 1992, to be sited on
individual lots subject only to land use regulations applicable to all other
single-family residences on individual lots in such districts. This section
does not prevent the adoption of home design regulations to assure neighborhood
compatibility provided such regulations apply equally to homes regulated under the
state building code and designated manufactured homes as defined in RCW
43.63B.010, 35.63.160, or 35A.63.145.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. This
act takes effect January 1, 2002.

---
END ---