BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

Disclosure of information available under the public disclosure
laws set forth in this chapter to health research organizations requesting
information in connection with a qualified medical or health research project
is required to protect the public health, safety, and welfare and shall be
considered a permissible use under the driver's privacy protection act of 1994,
18 U.S.C. Sec. 2721. For purposes of this section: (1) "Health research
organization" means a nonprofit corporation that is exempt under 501(c)(3)
of the internal revenue code and authorized under federal or state law to conduct
health or medical research; and (2) "qualified medical or health research
project" means a medical or health research project that has been reviewed
and approved by an institutional review board, as defined in RCW 70.02.010.

---
END ---