BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that studies show a correlation between learning disabilities
and the barriers to self-sufficiency experienced by long-term welfare
recipients. Learning disabilities, such as dyslexia and attention deficit
hyperactivity disorder, may make it difficult for some of those on public
assistance to develop the skills needed to maintain and progress in employment.

The
legislature also finds that recently, simpler and less costly screening tools
for learning disabilities have been identified. A basic, initial, brief
screening tool no longer requires a mental health professional to administer
it, and medical technology is rapidly developing the technology to screen for
attention deficit hyperactivity disorder with computerized scanning devices.

The
legislature finds that the early identification and appropriate referral to
treatment designed to help individuals cope with or overcome learning
disabilities, increases their chances of attaining self-sufficiency.

The
legislature intends that the department of social and health services screen
temporary assistance for needy families recipients for learning disabilities,
in order to customize and make meaningful their individual responsibility
plans, refer them to treatment as appropriate, or exempt them from work
activity requirements, benefit time limits, or other requirements of Title 74
RCW, as directed by the legislature.

Sec.
2. RCW
74.08A.260 and 1997 c 58 s 313 are each amended to read as follows:

Recipients
who have not obtained paid, unsubsidized employment by the end of the job
search component authorized in section 312 of this act shall be referred to a
work activity.

(1)
Each recipient shall be assessed immediately upon completion of the job search
component. Assessments shall be based upon factors that are critical to
obtaining employment, including but not limited to education, employment
strengths, and employment history. Special emphasis shall be placed on
performing a basic assessment to screen for learning disabilities, including
dyslexia and attention deficit hyperactivity disorder. Assessments,
including screening for learning disabilities, may be performed by the
department or by a contracted entity. The assessment shall be based on a
uniform, consistent, transferable format that will be accepted by all agencies
and organizations serving the recipient. Based on the assessment, an individual
responsibility plan shall be prepared that: (a) Sets forth an employment goal
and a plan for moving the recipient immediately into employment; (b) contains
the obligation of the recipient to become and remain employed; (c) moves the
recipient into whatever employment the recipient is capable of handling as
quickly as possible; and (d) describes the services available to the recipient
to enable the recipient to obtain and keep employment.

(2)
Recipients who are not engaged in work and work activities, and do not qualify
for a good cause exemption under RCW 74.08A.270, shall engage in self‑directed
service as provided in RCW 74.08A.330.

(3)
If a recipient refuses to engage in work and work activities required by the
department, the family's grant shall be reduced by the recipient's share, and
may, if the department determines it appropriate, be terminated.

(4)
The department may waive the penalties required under subsection (3) of this
section, subject to a finding that the recipient refused to engage in work for
good cause provided in RCW 74.08A.270.

(5)
In implementing this section, the department shall assign the highest priority
to the most employable clients, including adults in two-parent families and
parents in single-parent families that include older preschool or school-age
children to be engaged in work activities.

(6) In consultation with the recipient, the department or
contractor shall place the recipient into a work activity that is available in
the local area where the recipient resides.

---
END ---