BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
well‑trained work force is critical to the economic and social vitality
of the state of Washington. Recent studies of the state's work force highlight
population trends that, without a concerted effort to offset them, will lead to
an inadequate supply of skilled workers in the construction industry.
Apprenticeship training programs are particularly effective in providing
training and experience to individuals seeking to enter or advance in the work
force. Public works contracts can provide training and experience as a means
to increase the skills of the state's work force, and to help apprentices
become journeyworkers.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this act unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Apprentice" means an apprentice enrolled in a state-approved
apprenticeship training program.

(2)
"Apprentice utilization requirement" means the requirement that no
less than ten percent of the labor hours be performed by apprentices.

(3)
"Labor hours" means the total hours of workers receiving an hourly
wage who are directly employed on the site of the public works project.
"Labor hours" shall include hours performed by workers employed by
the contractor and all subcontractors working on the project. "Labor
hours" shall exclude hours worked by foremen, superintendents, owners, and
workers who are not subject to prevailing wage requirements.

(4)
"State-approved apprenticeship training program" means an
apprenticeship training program approved by the Washington state apprenticeship
and training council.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
All contracts for public works estimated to cost one million dollars or more
shall require that no less than ten percent of the labor hours be performed by
apprentices.

(2)
The failure by a contractor to comply with the apprentice utilization
requirements shall be deemed a breach of contract for which the state or the
municipality shall be entitled to all remedies allowed by law and under the
contract. Failure to comply with the apprentice utilization requirement may be
considered evidence bearing on a contractor's qualification for award of future
contracts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4.
Sections 1 through 3 of this act are each added to chapter 39.04 RCW.

---
END ---