BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
purpose of this chapter is to allow all state or local governmental entities
that award contracts for publicly funded projects to select contractors by the
lowest responsible bidder method.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) A
state or local governmental entity that awards contracts for publicly funded
projects must examine all general contractors and all electrical, mechanical,
and heating, ventilation, and air conditioning subcontractors bidding on a
project to determine which contractors are the lowest responsible bidders.

(2)
The governmental entity's contracting officer must make an affirmative
determination of responsibility.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
All contractors and affected subcontractors are required to submit information,
under oath, in the form of a questionnaire to the governmental entity to assist
the governmental entity in making a determination as to whether the contractor
or subcontractor is a responsible bidder. If the information is not provided,
or the information that is provided is false on a material point, then the bid
will be ruled nonresponsive. Information should be included for corporate or
business affiliates.

(2)
All information submitted on the questionnaire is subject to public
inspection. The required information must be submitted with the bid, or within
forty-eight hours after the submission of the bid.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
Governmental entities may create their own questionnaire, required under
section 3 of this act, or use a questionnaire created by the Washington state
department of general administration or the superintendent of public
instruction.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. In
the absence of information clearly indicating that the prospective contractor
is a responsible bidder, the governmental entity or the entity's contracting
officer shall make a determination that the bidder is not a responsible bidder,
and both the governmental entity and the contracting officer are immune from
any suit or litigation brought on behalf of a bidder found to be not
responsible.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. In
determining lowest responsible bidder, in addition to price, the governmental
entity awarding the contract must consider the following elements:

(1)
The ability, capacity, and skill of the bidder to perform the contract or
provide the service required;

(2)
The character, integrity, reputation, judgment, experience, and efficiency of
the bidder;

(3)
Whether the bidder can perform the contract within the time specified;

(4)
The quality of performance of previous contracts or services;

(5)
The previous and existing compliance by the bidder with laws relating to the
contract or services;

(6)
Other information as may be secured having a bearing on the decision to award
the contract. However, in considering bids for purchase, manufacture, or
lease, and in determining the lowest responsible bidder, whenever there is
reason to believe that applying the "life-cycle costing" technique to
bid evaluation would result in lowest total cost to the state, first
consideration shall be given by state purchasing activities to the bid with the
lowest life-cycle cost that complies with specifications. "Life-cycle
cost" means the total cost of an item to the state over its estimated
useful life, including costs of selection, acquisition, operation, maintenance,
and where applicable, disposal, as far as these costs can reasonably be
determined, minus the salvage value at the end of its estimated useful life.
The "estimated useful life" of an item means the estimated time from
the date of acquisition to the date of replacement or disposal, determined in
any reasonable manner. Nothing in this section shall prohibit any state
agency, department, board, commission, committee, or other state-level entity
from allowing for preferential purchase of products made from recycled
materials or products that may be recycled or reused.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7.
Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 39 RCW.

---
END ---