BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the intent of the legislature to allow the department of revenue to increase
its ability to provide timely and cost-effective service to taxpayers.

Sec.
2. RCW
82.32.080 and 1997 c 156 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Payment
of the tax may be made by uncertified check under such regulations as the
department shall prescribe, but, if a check so received is not paid by the bank
on which it is drawn, the taxpayer, by whom such check is tendered, shall
remain liable for payment of the tax and for all legal penalties, the same as
if such check had not been tendered.

Payment
of the tax shall be made by electronic funds transfer, as defined in RCW
82.32.085, if the amount of the tax due in a calendar year is one million eight
hundred thousand dollars or more. The department may by rule provide for tax
thresholds between two hundred forty thousand dollars and one million eight
hundred thousand dollars for mandatory use of electronic funds transfer. All
taxes administered by this chapter are subject to this requirement except the
taxes authorized by chapters 82.14A, 82.14B, 82.24, 82.27, 82.29A, and 84.33
RCW. It is the intent of this section to require electronic funds transfer for
those taxes reported on the department's combined excise tax return or any
successor return.

A
return or remittance which is transmitted to the department by United States
mail shall be deemed filed or received on the date shown by the post office
cancellation mark stamped upon the envelope containing it, except as otherwise
provided in this chapter. The department is authorized to allow electronic
filing of returns or remittances from any taxpayer. A return or remittance
which is transmitted to the department electronically shall be deemed filed or
received according to procedures set forth by the department.

The
department, for good cause shown, may extend the time for making and filing any
return, and may grant such reasonable additional time within which to make and
file returns as it may deem proper, but any permanent extension granting the
taxpayer a reporting date without penalty more than ten days beyond the due
date, and any extension in excess of thirty days shall be conditional on
deposit with the department of an amount to be determined by the department
which shall be approximately equal to the estimated tax liability for the reporting
period or periods for which the extension is granted. In the case of a
permanent extension or a temporary extension of more than thirty days the
deposit shall be deposited within the state treasury with other tax funds and a
credit recorded to the taxpayer's account which may be applied to taxpayer's
liability upon cancellation of the permanent extension or upon reporting of the
tax liability where an extension of more than thirty days has been granted.

The
department shall review the requirement for deposit at least annually and may
require a change in the amount of the deposit required when it believes that
such amount does not approximate the tax liability for the reporting period or
periods for which the extension is granted.

The
department shall keep full and accurate records of all funds received and
disbursed by it. Subject to the provisions of RCW 82.32.105 and 82.32.350, the
department shall apply the payment of the taxpayer first against penalties and
interest, and then upon the tax, without regard to any direction of the
taxpayer.

The department may refuse to accept any return which is not
accompanied by a remittance of the tax shown to be due thereon. When such
return is not accepted, the taxpayer shall be deemed to have failed or refused
to file a return and shall be subject to the procedures provided in RCW
82.32.100 and to the penalties provided in RCW 82.32.090. The above authority
to refuse to accept a return shall not apply when a return is timely filed and
a timely payment has been made by electronic funds transfer.

---
END ---