BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds and declares that the December 19, 1991, Washington state
conveyance of the Mt. St. Helens Recovery Program, LT-1 and Cook Ferry Road
Sites, to Cowlitz County, should be amended to enable Cowlitz County to use
dredge spoils revenues for recreational purposes throughout the county.

The
legislature further declares that the department of transportation shall
execute sufficient legal release to accomplish the following:

(1)
Dredge spoil revenues from either the LT-1 or Cook Ferry Road Site must be
dedicated for recreational facilities and recreational administration costs
throughout the county;

(2)
Any mining excavation must meet the requirements of the Shoreline Management
Act of 1971 as identified in chapter 90.58 RCW;

(3)
Both the LT-1 and Cook Ferry Road Site must be preserved as a long-term
dredging facility;

(4)
All other requirements in the December 19, 1991, conveyance between the state
of Washington and Cowlitz County will remain in effect; and

(5) The LT-1 and Cook Ferry Road Site remains subject to any
agreements with the United States Army Corps of Engineers and other agencies of
the federal government.

---
END ---