BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.127.010 and 1993 c 42 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
(("Branch office" means a location or site from which a home
health, hospice, or home care agency provides services within a portion of the
total geographic area served by the parent agency. The branch office is part
of the agency and is located sufficiently close to share administration,
supervision, and services.

(2)))
"Department" means the department of health.

(((3)))
(2) "Home care agency" means a private or public agency or
organization that administers or provides home care services directly or through
a contract arrangement to ill, disabled, or infirm persons in places of
temporary or permanent residence.

(((4)))
(3) "Home care services" means personal care services,
homemaker services, respite care services, or any other nonmedical services
provided to ill, disabled, or infirm persons which services enable these
persons to remain in their own residences consistent with their desires,
abilities, and safety.

(((5)))
(4) "Home health agency" means a private or public agency or
organization that administers or provides home health aide services or two or
more home health services directly or through a contract arrangement to ill,
disabled, or infirm persons in places of temporary or permanent residence. A
private or public agency or organization that administers or provides nursing
services only may elect to be designated a home health agency for purposes of
licensure.

(((6)))
(5) "Home health services" means health or medical services
provided to ill, disabled, or infirm persons. These services may be of an
acute or maintenance care nature, and include but are not limited to nursing
services, home health aide services, physical therapy services, occupational
therapy services, speech therapy services, respiratory therapy services,
nutritional services, medical social services, and medical supplies or
equipment services.

(((7)))
(6) "Home health aide services" means services provided by a
home health agency or a hospice agency under the supervision of a registered
nurse, physical therapist, occupational therapist, or speech therapist. Such
care includes ambulation and exercise, assistance with self-administered
medications, reporting changes in patients' conditions and needs, completing
appropriate records, and personal care or homemaker services.

(((8)))
(7) "Homemaker services" means services that assist ill,
disabled, or infirm persons with household tasks essential to achieving
adequate household and family management.

(((9)))
(8) "Hospice agency" means a private or public agency or
organization administering or providing hospice care directly or through a
contract arrangement to terminally ill persons in places of temporary or
permanent residence by using an interdisciplinary team composed of at least
nursing, social work, physician, and pastoral or spiritual counseling.

(((10)))
(9) "Hospice care" means: (a) Palliative care provided to a
terminally ill person in a place of temporary or permanent residence that
alleviates physical symptoms, including pain, as well as alleviates the
emotional and spiritual discomfort associated with dying; and (b) bereavement
care provided to the family of a terminally ill person that alleviates the
emotional and spiritual discomfort associated with the death of a family
member. Hospice care may include health and medical services and personal
care, respite, or homemaker services. Family means individuals who are
important to and designated by the patient, and who need not be relatives.

(((11)))
(10) "Ill, disabled, or infirm persons" means persons who need
home health, hospice, or home care services in order to maintain themselves in
their places of temporary or permanent residence.

(((12)))
(11) "Personal care services" means services that assist ill,
disabled, or infirm persons with dressing, feeding, and personal hygiene to
facilitate self-care.

(((13)))
(12) "Public or private agency or organization" means an
entity that employs or contracts with two or more persons who provide care in
the home.

(((14)))
(13) "Respite care services" means services that assist or
support the primary care giver on a scheduled basis.

(14)
"Service area" means the geographic area in which the department has
given prior approval to a licensee to provide home health, hospice, or home
care services.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.127.080 and 1993 c 42 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
An applicant for a home health, hospice, or home care agency license shall:

(a)
File a written application on a form provided by the department;

(b)
Demonstrate ability to comply with this chapter and the rules adopted under
this chapter;

(c)
Cooperate with on-site review conducted by the department prior to licensure or
renewal except as provided in RCW 70.127.085;

(d)
Provide evidence of and maintain professional liability insurance in the amount
of one hundred thousand dollars per occurrence or adequate self-insurance as
approved by the department. This subsection shall not apply to hospice agency
applicants that provide hospice care without receiving compensation for
delivery of services;

(e)
Provide evidence of and maintain public liability and property damage insurance
coverage in the sum of fifty thousand dollars for injury or damage to property
per occurrence and fifty thousand dollars for injury or damage, including
death, to any one person and one hundred thousand dollars for injury or damage,
including death, to more than one person, or evidence of adequate
self-insurance for public liability and property damage as approved by the
department. This subsection shall not apply to hospice agency applicants that
provide hospice care without receiving compensation for delivery of services;

(f)
Provide such proof as the department may require concerning organizational
structure, and the identity of the applicant, officers, directors, partners,
managing employees, or owners of ten percent or more of the applicant's assets;

(g)
File with the department for approval a ((list of the counties)) description
of the service area in which the applicant will operate. The department
shall adopt rules necessary to establish criteria for approval;

(h)
File with the department a list of the services offered;

(i)
Pay to the department a license fee as provided in RCW 70.127.090; and

(j)
Provide any other information that the department may reasonably require.

(2)
A certificate of need under chapter 70.38 RCW is not required for licensure.

(3)
A license or renewal shall not be granted pursuant to this chapter if the
applicant, officers, directors, partners, managing employees, or owners of ten
percent or more of the applicant's assets, within the last five years have been
found in a civil or criminal proceeding to have committed any act which
reasonably relates to the person's fitness to establish, maintain, or
administer an agency or to provide care in the home of another.

(((4)
A separate license is not required for a branch office.))

Sec.
3. RCW
70.127.090 and 1993 c 42 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

An
application for a license or any renewal shall be accompanied by a fee as
established by the department under RCW 43.70.250. The department shall
adopt by rule licensure fees ((shall be)) based on a sliding scale
using such factors as the number of agency full-time equivalents, ((with
agencies with the highest number of full-time equivalents paying the highest
fee. Full-time equivalent is a measurement based on a forty-hour work week and
is applicable to paid agency employees or contractors)) geographic area
served, number of locations, or type and volume of services provided. For
agencies receiving a licensure survey that requires more than ((one)) two
on-site reviews by the department per licensure period, an additional
fee ((of fifty percent of the base licensure fee)) as determined by
the department by rule shall be charged for each additional on-site
review. The department shall charge a reasonable fee for processing changes in
ownership. The department may set different licensure fees for each licensure
category.

Sec.
4. RCW
70.127.110 and 1988 c 245 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department shall adopt rules providing for the combination of applications and
licenses, and the reduction of individual license fees if an applicant applies
for more than one category of license under this chapter. The department shall
provide for combined licensure inspections and audits for licensees holding
more than one license under this chapter. The department may prorate
licensure fees to facilitate combined licensure inspections and audits.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
department of health shall submit a report to the health care committees of the
legislature with recommendations for any changes needed to the home health,
hospice, and home care licensure law, chapter 70.127 RCW, in order to allow the
department to regulate this fast-growing and evolving industry. The report, at
a minimum, shall specifically address the following questions:

(1)
Does the scope of the licensure law need to be revised in order to enhance
protection for persons receiving home health, hospice, and home care services?

(2)
Does the department of health need additional compliance strategies in order to
provide protection for persons receiving home health, hospice, and home care
services?

(3)
Does chapter 70.126 RCW need to be retained in statute, or is it simply
duplicative and confusing?

A report shall be submitted by November 1, 1999, together with any
recommendations for legislation necessary to implement the findings and
recommendations of the department of health. The department of health shall
prepare the report with existing funds.

---
END ---