BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that students could get a quick start on the next school year
if they had the opportunity to spend time learning during the summer. The
legislature further finds that school districts are often only able to provide
limited summer school opportunities due to limited resources. The legislature
further finds that some students in sixth, seventh, and eighth grade face
difficult academic challenges during the middle school years and that future
academic problems can be prevented through academic help during the summer
months.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.630 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
To the extent funds are appropriated, the summer school jump start program is
created to give students a jump start on the next school year.

(2)
The program shall be designed to provide funds, to the extent funds are
appropriated, for eligible school districts to provide summer school programs
to students who would be entering grades six, seven, or eight.

(3)
A school district or group of school districts are eligible for funds if the
district or districts:

(a)
Provide the summer school services in the summer school jump start program to
students, who would be entering grades six through eight in the fall, without
charge;

(b)
Provide a minimum of fifty percent of the cost of the summer school program
from other funds including but not limited to private donations, contributions
from other public entities, or from district sources;

(c)
Design the summer school jump start program to help students better meet the
academic learning standards and learning goals; and

(d)
Develop and implement a plan to assess the effect of the jump start program on
students' achievements in school.

(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall administer the
program and may adopt rules as necessary for the administration of the program.

---
END ---