BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
47.64.220 and 1989 c 327 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Prior to collective bargaining, the marine employees' commission shall conduct
a salary survey. The results of the survey shall be published in a report
which shall be a public document comparing wages, hours, employee benefits, and
conditions of employment of involved ferry employees with those of public and
private sector employees in states along the west coast of the United States,
including Alaska, and in British Columbia doing directly comparable but not
necessarily identical work, giving consideration to factors peculiar to the
area and the classifications involved. Such survey report shall be for
the purpose of disclosing generally prevailing levels of compensation,
benefits, and conditions of employment. It shall be used to guide generally
but not to define or limit collective bargaining between the parties. The
commission shall make such other findings of fact as the parties may request
during bargaining or impasse.

(2)
Salary and employee benefit information collected from private employers that
identifies a specific employer with the salary and employee benefit rates which
that employer pays to its employees is not subject to public disclosure under chapter
42.17 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

Salary
and employee benefit information collected under RCW 47.64.220(1) and described
in RCW 47.64.220(2) is exempt from disclosure under this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3.
Section 1, chapter . . ., Laws of 1999 (section 1 of this act) is a
clarification of existing law and applies retroactively.

---
END ---