BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.04.312 and 1998 c 316 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
This chapter does not apply to amounts received for water or sewer
services supplied by a water-sewer district established under Title 57 RCW or
by an irrigation district established under Title 87 RCW that:

(a)
Has less than one thousand five hundred connections; and

(b)
Charges residential water or sewer rates that exceed one hundred twenty-five
percent of the state-wide average residential water or sewer rate
published on or before July 1st of each year by the department of health.

(2)
This chapter does not apply to amounts received for water or sewer
services supplied by a water or sewer system that:

(a)
Is operated or owned by a qualified satellite management agency under RCW
70.116.134;

(b)
Has less than two hundred connections; and

(c)
Charges residential water or sewer rates that exceed one hundred
twenty-five percent of the state-wide average residential water or sewer
rate published on or before July 1st of each year by the department of health.

(3)
This chapter does not apply to amounts received for sewerage collection
services supplied by a water-sewer district established under Title 57 RCW or
by an irrigation district established under Title 87 RCW that:

(a)
Has less than one thousand five hundred connections; and

(b)
Charges residential sewer rates that exceed one hundred twenty-five percent of
the state-wide average residential sewer rate published on or before July 1st
of each year by the department of ecology.

(4)
To receive an exemption under this section, the water-sewer district,
the water or sewer system or irrigation district shall supply to the
department of revenue proof that an amount equal to at least ninety percent of
the value of the exemption shall be expended to repair, equip, maintain, and
upgrade the water or sewer system.

(((4)))
(5) The department of health and ecology may use rate information
provided in surveys and reports produced by the association of Washington
cities, an association of elected officials, or other municipal association to
estimate a state-wide average residential water and sewer rate.

(((5)))
(6) This section expires July 1, 2004.

Sec.
2. RCW
82.16.042 and 1998 c 316 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
This chapter does not apply to amounts received for water or sewer
services supplied by a water-sewer district established under Title 57 RCW or
by an irrigation district established under Title 87 RCW that:

(a)
Has less than one thousand five hundred connections; and

(b)
Charges residential water or sewer rates that exceed one hundred
twenty-five percent of the state-wide average residential water or sewer
rate published on or before July 1st of each year by the department of health.

(2)
This chapter does not apply to amounts received for water services supplied by
a water or sewer system that:

(a)
Is operated or owned by a qualified satellite management agency under RCW
70.116.134;

(b)
Has less than two hundred connections; and

(c)
Charges residential water or sewer rates that exceed one hundred
twenty-five percent of the state-wide average residential water or sewer
rate.

(3)
This chapter does not apply to amounts received for sewerage collection
services supplied by a water-sewer district established under Title 57 RCW or
by an irrigation district established under Title 87 RCW that:

(a)
Has less than one thousand five hundred connections; and

(b)
Charges residential sewer rates that exceed one hundred twenty-five percent of
the state-wide average residential sewer rate published on or before July 1st
of each year by the department of ecology.

(4)
To receive an exemption under this section, the water-sewer district,
the water or sewer system, or irrigation district shall supply to
the department of revenue proof that an amount equal to at least ninety percent
of the value of the exemption shall be expended to repair, equip, maintain, and
upgrade the water or sewer system.

(((4)))
(5) For the purposes of this section, "state-wide average
residential water rate and state-wide average residential sewer rate"
means the state-wide average residential water or sewer rate published
under RCW 82.04.312.

(((5))) (6) This section expires July 1, ((2004))
2005.

---
END ---