BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 41.56 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A public employer covered by this chapter shall not enter into any contract or
agreement whereby a private entity provides services to a public employer, if:

(a)
The services provided under the contract are of the type typically or
historically provided by public passenger transportation system employees
covered by RCW 41.56.492; and

(b)
The wages, pension, sick leave, vacation time, and other benefits to be
provided to employees of the private entity are less than those provided to
public passenger transportation system employees with the same or similar
duties.

(2)
Prior to entering into any contract or agreement whereby a private entity
provides services to a public employer, the public employer shall notify all
affected labor organizations of its intent to enter into such contract or
agreement, and provide the affected labor organizations with all relevant
information regarding the proposed contract or agreement.

(3)
Nothing in this section may be construed as limiting public employers' duties
to bargain with labor organizations, as provided by this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---