BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
90.03.340 and 1987 c 109 s 90 are each amended to read as follows:

After
January 1, 2000, the priority date of the right acquired by appropriation
((shall relate back to)) is the date ((of filing of)) the
((original)) completed application form for the right is filed
with the department. For the purposes of this section and RCW 90.03.270, a
completed application form is one that contains all of the information
requested on the form and is accompanied by the application fee.

Sec.
2. RCW
90.03.270 and 1987 c 109 s 85 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon
receipt of ((an)) a completed water right application form,
it shall be the duty of the department to ((make an endorsement thereon of
the)) date ((of its receipt,)) stamp and ((to)) keep a
record of ((same)) it. If ((upon examination,)) an
application form is filed with the department but the information
requested on the application form is ((found to be defective,))
not complete or the form is not accompanied by the proper application fee,
the form and any application fee filed with it shall be returned to the
applicant ((for correction or completion,)) and the date and the reasons
for the return thereof shall be ((endorsed thereon and made a record in his
office. No application shall lose its priority of filing on account of such
defects, provided acceptable maps, drawings and such data as is required by the
department shall be filed with the department within such reasonable time as it
shall require)) noted in the department's records and in a letter returning
the form. The department may not require an applicant to provide information
in support of an application for a water right permit that is not directly
necessary for the department's investigations, determinations, or findings
regarding that particular application.

Sec.
3. RCW
90.03.280 and 1994 c 264 s 83 are each amended to read as follows:

((Upon
receipt of a proper application,)) The department shall instruct the
applicant to publish notice ((thereof)) in a form and within a time
prescribed by the department in a newspaper of general circulation published in
the county or counties in which the storage, diversion or withdrawal,
and use is to be made, and in such other newspapers as the department may
direct, once a week for two consecutive weeks. The notice must include
information pertinent to the proposed appropriation, including the location,
the source, the purpose or purposes of use, and the quantity proposed to be
diverted or withdrawn. The notice must state that persons wishing to protest
the proposed application must do so in writing to the department within thirty
days of the last date of publication of the notice. In order to be considered
by the department, a protest must be received by the department within thirty
days of the last date of publication of the notice. Upon receipt by the
department of an application it shall send notice thereof containing pertinent
information to the director of fish and wildlife.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 43.21B RCW to read as follows:

In
a proceeding before the pollution control hearings board challenging a decision
of the department related to the issuance, conditioning, transfer, amendment,
or denial of a water right permit under Title 90 RCW, the burden of proof is on
the person filing the appeal.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 43.21B RCW to read as follows:

Only
a person with standing as defined in RCW 34.05.530 may appeal to the pollution
control hearings board a decision of the department to issue, condition,
transfer, amend, or deny a water right under Title 90 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 43.21B RCW to read as follows:

If
the department proposes to issue a water right permit or transfer or change
authorization under Title 90 RCW and:

(1)
The decision of the department is appealed to the pollution control hearings
board within thirty days of the date of filing;

(2)
The hearings board upholds the department's decision; and

(3)
An appeal for judicial review of the hearings board decision is filed under
chapter 34.05 RCW,

the
applicant for the water right may request, within ten days of the filing of the
appeal with the court, a hearing before the court to determine whether
construction and operation may begin under the water right permit or
authorization. If at the conclusion of the hearing the court finds that
construction and operation under the permit or authorization would not involve
a significant damaging of the environment or impair existing water rights, the
court may allow the permittee to begin construction and operation under the
permit or authorization as the court deems appropriate. The court may require
the permittee to post bonds, in the name of the department, sufficient to
remove the construction or to restore the environment if the permit or
authorization is ultimately disapproved by the courts, or to alter the
construction or operation if the alteration is ultimately ordered by the
courts. In the hearing before the court, the burden of proving whether the
construction or operation might involve significant damage to the environment
or impair existing water rights and demonstrating whether the construction
would or would not be appropriate is on the appellant.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 43.21B RCW to read as follows:

One
member of the pollution control hearings board may hear and render a decision
on an appeal from a water right applicant regarding the nature and extent of
the information needed to make determinations regarding the application for or
the processing of a water right permit.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
water right applicant may appeal to the pollution control hearings board a
determination by the department regarding the nature and extent of the
information needed to make determinations regarding the application for or the
processing of a water right permit.

Sec.
9. RCW
90.03.290 and 1994 c 264 s 84 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
When ((an)) a completed application complying with the provisions
of this chapter and with the rules ((and regulations)) of the department
has been filed, the ((same)) application shall be placed on
record with the department, and it shall be ((its)) the department's
duty to ((investigate the application, and)) determine what water, if
any, is available for appropriation, and find and determine to what beneficial
use or uses it can be applied.

The
department shall investigate the application. It is the duty of the applicant
to provide a completed application form. In addition to providing the
information requested on the form, however, the applicant shall also provide
such information as may be required for the department's investigation,
determinations, and findings regarding the application and may provide
additional information. The information provided by the applicant must satisfy
the protocols, that is, study plans and criteria, established by the department
for obtaining and providing the information. If an applicant provides the
information and the protocols set by the department for obtaining and providing
it have been satisfied, the department shall review the information and may
take actions to verify that the information is accurate, but it may not, except
to replace inaccurate information, take actions that would constitute obtaining
major portions of the information anew.

(2)
With regard to an application:

(a)
If it is proposed to appropriate water for irrigation purposes, the department
shall investigate, determine and find what lands are capable of irrigation by
means of water found available for appropriation.

(b)
If it is proposed to appropriate water for the purpose of power development,
the department shall investigate, determine and find whether the proposed
development is likely to prove detrimental to the public interest, having in
mind the highest feasible use of the waters belonging to the public.

(3)
If the application does not contain, and the applicant does not promptly
furnish sufficient information on which to base such findings, the department
may issue a preliminary permit, for a period of not to exceed three years,
requiring the applicant to make such surveys, investigations, studies, and
progress reports, as in the opinion of the department may be necessary. If the
applicant fails to comply with the conditions of the preliminary permit, it and
the application or applications on which it is based shall be automatically
canceled and the applicant so notified. If the holder of a preliminary permit
shall, before its expiration, file with the department a verified report of
expenditures made and work done under the preliminary permit, which, in the
opinion of the department, establishes the good faith, intent and ability of
the applicant to carry on the proposed development, the preliminary permit may,
with the approval of the governor, be extended, but not to exceed a maximum
period of five years from the date of the issuance of the preliminary permit.

(4)
The department shall make and file as part of the record in the matter, written
findings of fact concerning all things investigated, and if it shall find that
there is water available for appropriation for a beneficial use, and the
appropriation thereof as proposed in the application will not impair existing
rights or be detrimental to the public welfare, it shall issue a permit stating
the amount of water to which the applicant shall be entitled and the beneficial
use or uses to which it may be applied: PROVIDED, That where the water applied
for is to be used for irrigation purposes, it shall become appurtenant only to
such land as may be reclaimed thereby to the full extent of the soil for
agricultural purposes. But where there is no unappropriated water in the
proposed source of supply, or where the proposed use conflicts with existing
rights, or threatens to prove detrimental to the public interest, having due
regard to the highest feasible development of the use of the waters belonging
to the public, it shall be duty of the department to reject such application
and to refuse to issue the permit asked for. If the permit is refused because
of conflict with existing rights and such applicant shall acquire same by
purchase or condemnation under RCW 90.03.040, the department may thereupon
grant such permit. Any application may be approved for a less amount of water
than that applied for, if there exists substantial reason therefor, and in any
event shall not be approved for more water than can be applied to beneficial
use for the purposes named in the application. In determining whether or not a
permit shall issue upon any application, it shall be the duty of the department
to investigate all facts relevant and material to the application. After the
department approves said application in whole or in part and before any permit
shall be issued thereon to the applicant, such applicant shall pay the fee
provided in RCW 90.03.470 or section 20 of this act: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That in the event a permit is issued by the department upon any application, it
shall be its duty to notify the director of fish and wildlife and affected
federally recognized Indian tribes of such issuance.

Sec.
10. RCW
90.03.320 and 1997 c 445 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Actual construction work shall be commenced on any project for which permit has
been granted within such reasonable time as shall be prescribed by the
department, and shall thereafter be prosecuted with diligence and completed
within the time prescribed by the department. The department, in fixing the
time for the commencement of the work, or for the completion thereof and the
application of the water to the beneficial use prescribed in the permit, shall
take into consideration the cost and magnitude of the project and the
engineering and physical features to be encountered, and shall allow such time
as shall be reasonable and just under the conditions then existing, having due
regard for the public welfare and public interests affected: and, for good
cause shown, it shall extend the time or times fixed as aforesaid, and shall
grant such further period or periods as may be reasonably necessary, having due
regard to the good faith of the applicant and the public interests affected.
In fixing construction schedules and the time, or extension of time, for
application of water to beneficial use for municipal water supply purposes, the
department shall also take into consideration the term and amount of financing
required to complete the project, delays that may result from planned and
existing conservation and water use efficiency measures implemented by the
public water system, and the supply needs of the public water system's service
area, consistent with an approved comprehensive plan under chapter 36.70A RCW,
or in the absence of such a plan, a county-approved comprehensive plan under
chapter 36.70 RCW or a plan approved under chapter 35.63 RCW, and related water
demand projections prepared by public water systems in accordance with state
law. An existing comprehensive plan under chapter 36.70A or 36.70 RCW, plan
under chapter 35.63 RCW, or demand projection may be used. If the terms of the
permit or extension thereof, are not complied with the department shall give
notice by registered mail that such permit will be canceled unless the holders
thereof shall show cause within sixty days why the same should not be so
canceled. If cause is not shown, the permit shall be canceled.

(2)
For the purposes of this section, "good cause" includes but is not
limited to the following circumstances:

(a)
Active service in the armed forces of the United States during a military
crisis;

(b)
Nonvoluntary service in the armed forces of the United States;

(c)
The operation of legal proceedings;

(d)
Delays in securing other permits necessary to proceed with the development;

(e)
Implementation of water efficiency measures, including water conservation and
reclaimed use;

(f)
A single transfer in ownership of the property;

(g)
Encountering unanticipated physical impediments to construction; and

(h)
Encountering generally depressed economic conditions.

Sec.
11. RCW
90.03.380 and 1997 c 442 s 801 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The right to the use of water which has been applied to a beneficial use in the
state shall be and remain appurtenant to the land or place upon which the same
is used((: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the)). However, all or a portion
of a water right may be transferred to another ((or to others)) person
or persons and become appurtenant to any other land or place of use without
loss of priority of right ((theretofore established)) if ((such
change)) the transfer can be made without detriment or injury to
existing rights.

(2)
The point of diversion or withdrawal of water for beneficial use or the
purpose of use under an existing water right or permit may be changed((,))
if ((such)) the change or changes can be made without
detriment or injury to existing water rights.

(3)
The season of use under an existing water right or permit may be changed if the
change involves the same general category of water use and the change can be
made without detriment or injury to existing water rights. An example of a
general category of water use for the purposes of this subsection, but not a
limit to the categories, is an agricultural use of water.

(4)
The source of water for an existing water right or permit may be changed from a
surface water diversion to a ground water withdrawal or vice versa if the two
sources are in direct hydraulic continuity and if the change can be made
without detriment or injury to existing water rights.

(5)
A change in the place of use, point of diversion, and/or purpose of use of a
water right to enable irrigation of additional acreage or the addition of new
uses may be permitted if such change results in no increase in the annual
consumptive quantity of water used under the water right. For purposes of this
section, "annual consumptive quantity" means the estimated or actual
annual amount of water diverted pursuant to the water right, reduced by the
estimated annual amount of return flows, averaged over the most recent
five-year period of continuous beneficial use of the water right.

(6)
Except as provided in subsection (9) of this section, before any transfer
of such right to use water or change of the point of diversion of water or
change of purpose of use can be made, any person having an interest in the
transfer or change((,)) shall file a written application therefor with
the department((, and the application)). Authorization for the
requested transfer or change shall not be granted until notice of the
application is published as provided in RCW 90.03.280. If it ((shall))
appears that ((such)) the transfer or ((such))
change may be made without injury or detriment to existing rights, the
department shall issue to the applicant ((a certificate in duplicate
granting the right for such transfer or for such change of point of diversion or
of use)) an authorization to proceed with the transfer or change. The
department may include in its authorization necessary conditions or limitations
under which the transfer or change may be made, including a reasonable time for
completion. The time may be extended upon request and a showing of good cause
in accordance with RCW 90.03.320 and 90.03.470. If the person authorized to
make a transfer or change of right fails to do so within the time allowed,
including extensions granted for good cause, the department shall cancel the
authorization and the water right or permit reverts to its original form and
substance.

(7)
If the department determines that the proposed transfer or change may
periodically operate to impair an existing right, the department's
authorization may be made contingent on the proponent's willingness to
subordinate the use to the potentially impaired right or rights and the
authorization must be so conditioned.

(8)
The person authorized to make the transfer or change shall notify the
department upon completion of the transfer or change. After verifying that the
transfer or change has been completed in accordance with the authorization, the
department shall issue to those persons having an interest in the resulting
water right or rights a certificate, certificate of change, or superseding
certificate, as appropriate, in duplicate that reflects the nature of the water
right or rights transferred or changed. The certificate or certificates
so issued shall be filed and be made a record with the department and the
duplicate certificate issued to the applicant ((may)) must be
filed with the county auditor in like manner and with the same effect as
provided in the original certificate or permit to divert water.

(((2)))
(9) A person proposing to relocate a point of diversion of surface water is
not required to file an application if the diversion point is moved no more
than one-quarter mile from its original location, no diversions exist between
the original point of diversion and the new point of diversion, and no other
water rights will be impaired. At least fifteen days before construction of a
replacement diversion point, the water right holder shall inform the department
in writing of the intention to move the diversion point and shall submit
documentation that the change is in compliance with RCW 75.20.100 or 75.20.103.

(10)
If an application for change proposes to transfer water rights from one
irrigation district to another, the department shall, before publication of
notice, receive concurrence from each of the irrigation districts that such
transfer or change will not adversely affect the ability to deliver water to
other landowners or impair the financial integrity of either of the districts.

(((3)))
(11) A change in place of use by an individual water user or users of
water provided by an irrigation district need only receive approval for the
change from the board of directors of the district if the use of water
continues within the irrigation district, and when water is provided by an
irrigation entity that is a member of a board of joint control created under
chapter 87.80 RCW, approval need only be received from the board of joint
control if the use of water continues within the area of jurisdiction of the
joint board and the change can be made without detriment or injury to existing
rights.

(((4)))
(12) This section shall not apply to trust water rights acquired by the
state through the funding of water conservation projects under chapter 90.38
RCW or RCW 90.42.010 through 90.42.070.

Sec.
12. RCW
90.03.390 and 1991 c 350 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

((RCW
90.03.380 shall not be construed to prevent)) (1) A water ((users
from making)) right holder may make a seasonal or temporary change
of ((point of diversion or place of use of water)) a water right
when ((such)) the change can be made without detriment to
existing rights, but in no case shall such change be made without the
permission of ((the water master of the district in which such proposed
change is located, or of)) the department. Nor shall RCW 90.03.380 be
construed to prevent construction of emergency interties between public water
systems to permit exchange of water during short-term emergency situations, or
rotation in the use of water for bringing about a more economical use of the
available supply, provided however, that the department of health in
consultation with the department of ecology shall adopt rules or develop
written guidelines setting forth standards for determining when a short-term
emergency exists and the circumstances in which emergency interties are
permitted. The rules or guidelines shall be consistent with the procedures
established in RCW 43.83B.400 through 43.83B.420. Water users owning lands to
which water rights are attached may rotate in the use of water to which they
are collectively entitled, or an individual water user having lands to which
are attached water rights of a different priority, may in like manner rotate in
use when ((such)) rotation can be made without detriment to other
existing water rights, and has the approval of the ((water master or))
department.

(2)
A person or persons wishing to make a seasonal or temporary change or to rotate
use in the manner provided in this section must file an application with the
department on a form adopted and provided by the department. The department
shall waive the notice provisions of RCW 90.03.280 unless it has reason to
believe that fish habitat or the water rights of other persons are likely to be
affected by the proposed change. The department shall respond to the request
by letter setting forth its approval or denial, including the reason for
denial. The department shall retain a record of its decision as part of the
records of the water right or rights being changed. To the extent practicable,
the department shall expedite its consideration of requests under this section.

Sec.
13. RCW
90.03.260 and 1987 c 109 s 84 are each amended to read as follows:

((Each
application for permit to appropriate water shall set forth the name and post
office address of the applicant, the source of water supply, the nature and
amount of the proposed use, the time during which water will be required each
year, the location and description of the proposed ditch, canal, or other work,
the time within which the completion of the construction and the time for the
complete application of the water to the proposed use. If for agricultural
purposes, it shall give the legal subdivision of the land and the acreage to be
irrigated, as near as may be, and the amount of water expressed in acre feet to
be supplied per season. If for power purposes, it shall give the nature of the
works by means of which the power is to be developed, the head and amount of
water to be utilized, and the uses to which the power is to be applied. If for
construction of a reservoir, it shall give the height of the dam, the capacity
of the reservoir, and the uses to be made of the impounded waters. If for municipal
water supply, it shall give the present population to be served, and, as near
as may be, the future requirement of the municipality. If for mining purposes,
it shall give the nature of the mines to be served and the method of supplying
and utilizing the water; also their location by legal subdivisions. All
applications shall be accompanied by such maps and drawings, in duplicate, and
such other data, as may be required by the department, and such accompanying
data shall be considered as a part of the application.)) The department
shall adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW by January 1, 2000, that
specify the contents of completed water right application forms. The rules
must include specific timelines for the department to follow in making a
determination as to whether an application is complete and notifying the
applicant of its determination. The rules must also identify the kinds of
inaccuracies that render an application incomplete.

Sec.
14. RCW
90.44.060 and 1987 c 109 s 109 are each amended to read as follows:

Applications
for permits for appropriation of underground water shall be made in the same
form and manner provided in RCW 90.03.250 through 90.03.340, as amended, the
provisions of which sections are hereby extended to govern and to apply to
ground water, or ground water right certificates and to all permits that shall
be issued pursuant to such applications, and the rights to the withdrawal of
ground water acquired thereby shall be governed by RCW 90.03.250 through
90.03.340, inclusive((: PROVIDED, That each application to withdraw public
ground water by means of a well or wells shall set forth the following
additional information: (1) the name and post office address of the applicant;
(2) the name and post office address of the owner of the land on which such
well or wells or works will be located; (3) the location of the proposed well
or wells or other works for the proposed withdrawal; (4) the ground water area,
sub-area, or zone from which withdrawal is proposed, provided the department
has designated such area, sub-area, or zone in accord with RCW 90.44.130; (5)
the amount of water proposed to be withdrawn, in gallons a minute and in acre
feet a year, or millions of gallons a year; (6) the depth and type of
construction proposed for the well or wells or other works: AND PROVIDED
FURTHER, That)). The department shall adopt rules in accordance with
chapter 34.05 RCW by January 1, 2000, that specify the contents of completed
water right application forms. The rules must include specific timelines for
the department to follow in making a determination as to whether an application
is complete and notifying the applicant of its determination. The rules must
also identify the kinds of inaccuracies that render an application incomplete.
Any permit issued pursuant to an application for constructing a well or
wells to withdraw public ground water may specify an approved type and manner
of construction for the purposes of preventing waste of said public waters and
of conserving their head.

Sec.
15. RCW
90.03.250 and 1987 c 109 s 83 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
person, municipal corporation, firm, irrigation district, association,
corporation or water users' association hereafter desiring to appropriate water
for a beneficial use shall make an application to the department for a permit
to make such appropriation, and shall not use or divert such waters until he
has received a permit from the department as in this chapter provided. The
construction of any ditch, canal or works, or performing any work in connection
with said construction or appropriation, or the use of any waters, shall not be
an appropriation of such water nor an act for the purpose of appropriating
water unless a permit to make said appropriation has first been granted by the
department: PROVIDED, That a temporary permit may be granted upon a proper
showing made to the department to be valid only during the pendency of such
application for a permit unless sooner revoked by the department: PROVIDED,
FURTHER, That nothing in this chapter contained shall be deemed to affect RCW
90.40.010 through 90.40.080 except that the notice and certificate therein
provided for in RCW 90.40.030 shall be addressed to the department, and the
department shall exercise the powers and perform the duties prescribed by RCW
90.40.030.

The
department shall encourage the filing of a consolidated application for a
complex project under a single ownership that proposes to divert or withdraw
water from more than one source, including a combination of surface and ground
water sources. The filing of a consolidated application for transfer or change
of one or more water rights involving multiple sources must also be encouraged
if all of the affected diversions or withdrawals are intended to serve a single
project with a single ownership. The department shall adopt and provide forms
for consolidated applications.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. (1)
Future de minimis appropriations of surface water may be developed under
streamlined procedures if the department has adopted a reservation of water for
such uses under RCW 90.54.050.

(2)
For purposes of this chapter, "de minimis appropriation" means
diversion and use of surface water in an amount not exceeding four hundred
fifty gallons per day and not exceeding an instantaneous diversion rate of two
one-hundredths cubic feet per second.

(3)
Applications for appropriating water under this section must be made on a form
adopted and provided by the department. Within sixty days of the publication
of a notice in accordance with RCW 90.03.280, the department shall issue or
deny a permit for the requested appropriation. If the department denies the application,
it shall explain its determination in writing.

(4)
The department shall waive the evaluation and report requirements of RCW
90.03.290 if during the establishment of the reservation it was conclusively
determined that water is available and that no impairment of existing water
rights or the public interest will occur.

(5)
This section may not be utilized in areas that are within urban growth areas as
designated under RCW 36.70A.110 or within the service areas of an existing
public water system as defined in RCW 70.119A.020 that has an available water
supply.

(6)
The department shall develop, in cooperation with the department of health,
informational materials regarding the risks of drinking untreated surface
water. This informational material may be provided to prospective applicants.
The department shall attach the informational materials to any permit that is
approved under subsection (3) of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17. (1)
The department may authorize short-term uses of water without publication of
the notice required under RCW 90.03.280 and without the report required under
RCW 90.03.290. However, before approving a short-term use, the department
shall determine to its satisfaction that the substantive criteria in RCW
90.03.290 are met and that a stream affected by a short-term use will be
retained with sufficient flows to maintain instream uses and to protect
existing water rights. The department shall adopt and provide application
forms for persons applying for a short-term use and shall expedite its
consideration of short-term use requests to the extent practicable.

(2)
For the purposes of this chapter, "short-term use" means a use of
water that will not exceed one year in duration. Short-term uses include but
are not limited to use in construction, dust control, dewatering, and
short-term planned fire suppression activities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. The
department shall establish a register that identifies, by water resource
inventory area, applications for new water rights and applications for water
right transfers and changes. The applications appearing in the register must
be limited to those requesting a new appropriation or change or transfer of
more than three cubic feet per second of water. The register must identify:
The location of the proposed use, change, or transfer; whether the application
is for surface or ground water; and, for surface water applications, the water
source. The department shall produce the register once every two weeks and
shall make the register available to interested parties for a fee that is based
on the cost of producing and mailing the register. One year after the
effective date of this section, the department may cease production of the
register if the number of requests for the register are not adequate to cover
the costs of producing and mailing it.

Sec.
19. RCW
90.03.470 and 1993 c 495 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

((Except
as otherwise provided in subsection (15) of this section,)) The
following fees shall be collected by the department ((in advance)):

(1)
((For the examination of an application for permit to appropriate water or
on application to change point of diversion, withdrawal, purpose or place of
use, a minimum of ten dollars, to be paid with the application. For each
second foot between one and five hundred second feet, two dollars per second
foot; for each second foot between five hundred and two thousand second feet,
fifty cents per second foot; and for each second foot in excess thereof, twenty
cents per second foot. For each acre foot of storage up to and including one
hundred thousand acre feet, one cent per acre foot, and for each acre foot in
excess thereof, one-fifth cent per acre foot. The ten dollar fee payable with
the application shall be a credit to that amount whenever the fee for direct
diversion or storage totals more than ten dollars under the above schedule and
in such case the further fee due shall be the total computed amount less ten
dollars.

Within
five days from receipt of an application the department shall notify the
applicant by registered mail of any additional fees due under the above
schedule and any additional fees shall be paid to and received by the
department within thirty days from the date of filing the application, or the
application shall be rejected.

(2)
For filing and recording a permit to appropriate water for irrigation purposes,
forty cents per acre for each acre to be irrigated up to and including one
hundred acres, and twenty cents per acre for each acre in excess of one hundred
acres up to and including one thousand acres, and ten cents for each acre in
excess of one thousand acres; and also twenty cents for each theoretical
horsepower up to and including one thousand horsepower, and four cents for each
theoretical horsepower in excess of one thousand horsepower, but in no instance
shall the minimum fee for filing and recording a permit to appropriate water be
less than five dollars. For all other beneficial purposes the fee shall be
twice the amount of the examination fee except that for individual household
and domestic use, which may include water for irrigation of a family garden,
the fee shall be five dollars.

(3)
For filing and recording any other water right instrument, four dollars for the
first hundred words and forty cents for each additional hundred words or
fraction thereof.

(4)
For making a copy of any document recorded or filed in his office, forty cents
for each hundred words or fraction thereof, but when the amount exceeds twenty
dollars, only the actual cost in excess of that amount shall be charged.

(5)
For certifying to copies, documents, records or maps, two dollars for each
certification.

(6)
For blueprint copies of a map or drawing, or, for such other work of a similar
nature as may be required of the department, at actual cost of the work.

(7))) For
granting each extension of time for beginning construction work under a permit
to appropriate water((, an amount equal to one-half of the filing and
recording fee, except that the minimum fee shall be not less than five dollars
for each year that an extension is granted,)) and for granting an extension
of time for completion of construction work or for completing application of
water to a beneficial use, ((five)) one hundred dollars ((for
each year that an extension is granted)).

(((8)))
(2) For the inspection of any hydraulic works to insure safety to life
and property, the actual cost of the inspection, including the expense incident
thereto.

(((9)))
(3) For the examination of plans and specifications as to safety of
controlling works for storage of ten acre feet or more of water, a minimum fee
of ((ten)) fifty dollars, or the actual cost.

(((10)))
(4) For recording an assignment either of a permit to appropriate water
or of an application for such a permit, a fee of ((five)) one hundred
dollars.

(((11)
For preparing and issuing all water right certificates, five dollars.

(12))) (5)
For filing and recording a protest against granting any application, ((two))
fifty dollars.

(((13)
The department shall provide timely notification by certified mail with return
receipt requested to applicants that fees are due. No action may be taken
until the fee is paid in full. Failure to remit fees within sixty days of the
department's notification shall be grounds for rejecting the application or canceling
the permit. Cash shall not be accepted. Fees must be paid by check or money
order and are nonrefundable.

(14))) (6)
For filing an application for and authorizing a seasonal change or rotation,
one hundred dollars.

(7)
For filing an application for and authorizing a temporary or short‑term
water use, one hundred dollars.

(8)
For a consolidated application covering multiple sources or changes:

(a)
The filing fee must be based upon either the total amount of water or the total
number of changes requested, or both;

(b)
The examination fee is the total of the examination fees calculated for the
individual applications and changes; and

(c)
The certificate fee is as is appropriate for the individual certificates, since
separate permits would issue and, therefore, separate certificates would
result.

For
purposes of calculating fees for ground water filings, one cubic foot per
second shall be regarded as equivalent to four hundred fifty gallons per
minute.

(((15)
For the period beginning July 1, 1993, and ending June 30, 1994, there is
imposed and the department shall collect a one hundred dollar surcharge on all
water rights applications or changes filed under this section, and upon all
water rights applications or changes pending as of July 1, 1993. This charge
shall be in addition to any other fees imposed under this section.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 20. (1)
The department shall collect the following fees in advance of each of the three
stages of the permitting process:

(a)
Application filing fees for the following:

(i)
Surface water and ground water applications:

(A)
Greater than 0.0 and less than or equal

to 0.02 cubic feet per second $ 100

(B)
Greater than 0.02 and less than or equal to

0.1 cubic feet per second $ 150

(C)
Greater than 0.1 and less than or equal to

0.2 cubic feet per second $ 200

(D)
Greater than 0.2 and less than or equal to

0.5 cubic feet per second $ 250

(E)
Greater than 0.5 and less than or equal to 1

cubic feet per second $ 300

(F)
Greater than 1 and less than or equal to 3

cubic feet per second $ 900

(G)
Greater than 3 and less than or equal to 5

cubic feet per second $ 1500

(H)
Greater than 5 and less than or equal to 20

cubic feet per second $ 1700

(I)
Greater than 20 and less than or equal to 100

cubic feet per second $ 2,000

(J)
Greater than 100 cubic feet per second $ 2,200

(ii)
Reservoir applications:

(A)
Greater than 0.0 and less than or equal to

10 acre‑feet $ 100

(B)
Greater than 10 and less than or equal to

100 acre‑feet $ 200

(C)
Greater than 100 and less than or equal to

1,000 acre‑feet $ 600

(D)
Greater than 1,000 acre‑feet $ 1,500

(iii)
Change applications:

(A)
Changing a single element $ 150

(B)
Changing multiple elements $ 250

(b)
Examination fees for the following:

(i)
Surface water applications:

(A)
Greater than 0.0 and less than or equal to

0.02 cubic feet per second $ 100

(B)
Greater than 0.02 and less than or equal to

0.1 cubic feet per second $ 200

(C)
Greater than 0.01 and less than or equal to

0.2 cubic feet per second $ 250

(D)
Greater than 0.2 and less than or equal to

0.5 cubic feet per second $ 300

(E)
Greater than 0.5 and less than or equal to

1 cubic feet per second $ 400

(F)
Greater than 1 and less than or equal to 3

cubic feet per second $ 1,300

(G)
Greater than 3 and less than or equal to 5

cubic feet per second $ 2,200

(H)
Greater than 5 and less than or equal to 20

cubic feet per second $ 2,500

(I)
Greater than 20 and less than or equal to 100

cubic feet per second $ 2,800

(J)
Greater than 100 cubic feet per second $ 3,200

(ii)
Ground water applications:

(A)
Greater than 0.0 and less than or equal to

0.02 cubic feet per second $ 100

(B)
Greater than 0.02 and less than or equal to

0.1 cubic feet per second $ 250

(C)
Greater than 0.1 and less than or equal to

0.2 cubic feet per second $ 300

(D)
Greater than 0.2 and less than or equal to

0.5 cubic feet per second $ 400

(E)
Greater than 0.5 and less than or equal to 1

cubic feet per second $ 500

(F)
Greater than 1 or less than or equal to 3

cubic feet per second $ 1,500

(G)
Greater than 3 and less than or equal to 5

cubic feet per second $ 2,600

(H)
Greater than 5 and less than or equal to 20

cubic feet per second $ 3,000

(I)
Greater than 20 and less than or equal to 100

cubic feet per second $ 3,400

(J)
Greater than 100 cubic feet per second $ 3,800

(iii)
Reservoir applications:

(A)
Greater than 0.0 and less than or equal to 10

acre‑feet $ 100

(B)
Greater than 10 and less than or equal to 100

acre‑feet $ 250

(C)
Greater than 100 and less than or equal to

1,000 acre‑feet $ 900

(D)
Greater than 1,000 acre‑feet $ 2,200

(iv)
Changes to permits and certificates:

(A)
Changing a single element $ 200

(B)
Changing multiple elements $ 300

(c)
Certificate fees:

(i)
Surface water and ground water applications:

(A)
Greater than 0.0 and less than or equal to

0.02 cubic feet per second $ 100

(B)
Greater than 0.02 and less than or equal to

0.1 cubic feet per second $ 150

(C)
Greater than 0.1 and less than or equal to

0.2 cubic feet per second $ 200

(D)
Greater than 0.2 and less than or equal to

0.5 cubic feet per second $ 250

(E)
Greater than 0.5 and less than or equal to 1

cubic feet per second $ 300

(F)
Greater than 1 and less than or equal to 3

cubic feet per second $ 900

(G)
Greater than 3 and less than or equal to 5

cubic feet per second $ 1,500

(H)
Greater than 5 and less than or equal to 20

cubic feet per second $ 1,700

(I)
Greater than 20 and less than or equal to 100

cubic feet per second $ 2,000

(J)
Greater than 100 cubic feet per second $ 2,200

(ii)
Reservoir applications:

(A)
Greater than 0.0 and less than or equal to 10

acre‑feet $ 200

(B)
Greater than 10 and less than or equal to 100

acre‑feet $ 300

(C)
Greater than 100 and less than or equal to

1,000 acre‑feet $ 1,000

(D)
Greater than 1,000 acre‑feet $ 1,500

(iii)
Changes to permits and certificates:

(A)
Changing a single element $ 150

(B)
Changing multiple elements $ 250

For
purposes of calculating fees for ground water filings, one cubic foot per
second shall be regarded as equivalent to four hundred fifty gallons per
minute.

A
schedule of the water right fees shall be included with the water right
application.

(2)
The application fee shall be paid at the time the application is submitted to
the department.

(3)
By certified mail with return receipt requested, the department shall include
with an approved change application, reservoir permit, or permit to appropriate
water, notice of the amount of the examination fee that is due and payable.
The examination fee shall be due and payable to the department within thirty
days after the approved change application, reservoir permit, or permit to
appropriate water is received by the applicant. A late fee of ten percent
shall be assessed on any delinquent payments of the examination fee. The
approved change application, reservoir permit, or permit to appropriate water
shall be deemed cancelled if there is a failure to remit fees within ninety
days of the department's notice.

(4)
The certificate fee shall be collected before the issuance of the water right
certificate.

(5)
The water right permit processing account is created in the state treasury.
All receipts collected under RCW 90.03.470 and this section shall be deposited
into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for functions of
the department of ecology related to: Filing, examination, and certification
of water right permits, changes to water right permits, and transfer of water
rights; and a proportionate share of indirect costs allocated to these
functions necessary to fund the general administrative functions of the
department. The goal is for the department to expend funds from the water
right permit processing account to supplement the funds appropriated from the
general fund for water right permit processing.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 21. (1)
There is created a water rights programs review task force. The task force
shall be comprised of eight members, who are appointed as follows:

(a)
Four members of the house of representatives, two from each major caucus, to be
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; and

(b)
Four members of the senate, two from each major caucus, to be appointed by the
president of the senate.

(2)
The task force may conduct a review, including but not limited to the following
matters:

(a)
Periodically review the number of water right permit decisions that have been
made, the reasons for conditioning and denial of permit applications, and the
number of new applications that have been filed;

(b)
Review and evaluate appeals that have been filed and decisions that have been
rendered regarding the issuance, conditioning, or denial of water right permit
applications;

(c)
Conduct work sessions or public hearings on issues that relate to the
processing of water right permit applications; and

(d)
Monitor the efficiency of the water right permit processing program and
recommend changes to the department and the legislature on funding and the
related water right permit process.

(3)
The office of program research and senate committee services shall jointly
provide for the staff support of the task force.

(4)
Task force members may adopt rules for conducting the business of the task
force.

(5)
This section expires December 31, 2000.

Sec.
22. RCW
89.30.001 and 1933 c 149 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Reclamation
districts including an area of not less than one million acres of land may be
created and maintained in this state, as herein provided, for the reclamation
and improvement of arid and semiarid lands situated in such districts, and for
the generation and/or sale of hydroelectric energy((: PROVIDED, That no
appropriation, license, filing, recording, examination or other fee or fees, as
provided in RCW 90.16.050 through 90.16.090 or in RCW 90.03.470 shall be
applicable to a district or districts created under this chapter)).

Sec.
23. RCW
90.40.090 and 1988 c 127 s 83 are each amended to read as follows:

An
application filed by the department of ecology or its assignee, the United
States Bureau of Reclamation, for a permit to appropriate waters of the
Columbia River under chapter 90.03 RCW, for the development of the Grand Coulee
project shall be perfected in the same manner and to the same extent as though
such appropriation had been made by a private person, corporation or
association((, but no fees, as provided for in RCW 90.03.470, shall be
required)).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 24. RCW
90.03.471 and 1987 c 109 s 99 & 1925 ex.s. c 161 s 3 are each
repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 25.
Sections 8, 16 through 18, and 20 of this act are each added to chapter 90.03
RCW.

---
END ---