BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the department of fish and wildlife manages the
recreational crab fishery through an imprecise system of catch estimation.
Increased harvest data accuracy is needed for the recreational crab fishery and
this goal can be accomplished through the establishment of a crab catch record
card system.

The
department shall utilize data from the crab catch record cards in preparing
catch reports and in catch-sharing negotiations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 77.32 RCW to read as follows:

In
addition to a combination fishing license, saltwater fishing license, temporary
fishing license, personal use shellfish and seaweed license, or a family
fishing weekend license, a crab catch record card is required to fish for and
harvest Dungeness crabs (Cancer magister) in the recreational fishery.
The crab catch record card shall be administered under the rules of the
commission.

---
END ---