BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
INTENT. (1) The legislature recognizes the existence of
allegations that certain insurers doing business in the state of Washington,
either directly or through related companies and affiliates, have failed to
honor insurance policies issued during the World War II era. Although such
policies were issued outside of the state of Washington, Washington has a clear
obligation to seek justice for its citizens and residents.

(2)
The legislature recognizes that allegations regarding a failure to pay
legitimate insurance claims threaten the integrity of the insurance market.
The basic commodity that insurers sell is trust. Policyholders pay substantial
sums to insurers trusting that at a future date, perhaps decades later, the
insurer will protect them and their loved ones. An insurer that violates this
trust should not be authorized to do business in this state or own or control
insurers doing business in this state, lest the integrity of this state's
insurance market be compromised.

(3)
The legislature recognizes that hundreds of Holocaust survivors and heirs of
Holocaust victims are citizens or residents of the state of Washington. The
legislature is concerned by allegations that citizens or residents of the state
of Washington may have been deprived of their contractual entitlement to
benefits under insurance policies issued by insurance companies operating in
Europe prior to and during World War II. The state of Washington has a public
policy interest in assuring that all of its citizens and residents, including
Holocaust survivors, their families, and the heirs of Holocaust victims, who
are entitled to proceeds of insurance policies are treated reasonably and
fairly and that any contractual obligations are honored.

(4)
The legislature recognizes that the business of insurance is one affected by
the public interest, requiring that all persons conducting it be actuated by
good faith, abstain from deception, and practice honesty and equity in all
insurance matters. The insurance commissioner is currently authorized to
refuse, suspend, or revoke the certificate of authority of insurers that are
affiliated directly or indirectly through ownership, control, reinsurance or
other insurance or business relations with any person, persons, or entities
whose business operations are or have been marked, to the detriment of
policyholders or the public, or by bad faith. The insurance commissioner is
also currently authorized to provide assistance to members of the public in
resolving complaints involving insurers. It is the intent of the legislature
to provide additional resources to the insurance commissioner to implement this
authority, to authorize the insurance commissioner to cooperate with other
state regulators with regard to such policies, and to authorize the insurance
commissioner to cooperate with and act through the international commission
concerning World War II era policies established under the efforts of the
national association of insurance commissioners.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
FINDINGS. The legislature finds the following:

(1)
In addition to the many atrocities that befell the victims of the Nazi regime,
in many cases insurance policy proceeds were not paid to the victims and their
families.

(2)
In many instances, insurance company records are the only proof of insurance
policies held. In some cases, recollection of those policies' very existence
may have perished along with the Holocaust victims.

(3)
Several hundred Holocaust survivors and their families, or the heirs of
Holocaust victims live in Washington today.

(4)
Insurance companies doing business in the state of Washington have a
responsibility to ensure that any involvement they or their related companies
had with insurance policies of Holocaust victims are disclosed to the state to
ensure the rapid payment to victims and their survivors of any proceeds to
which they may be entitled.

(5)
There has been established an international commission to investigate and
facilitate the payment of insurance policies to victims of the Holocaust and
their survivors. It is in the best interest of the people of the state of
Washington to authorize the insurance commissioner to cooperate with and
coordinate his or her activities with the international commission.

(6)
Other states are establishing Holocaust survivor assistance offices and
registries of insurance policies and Holocaust victims in order to identify
policyholders and their survivors to whom policy proceeds may be payable. It
is in the best interest of the people of the state of Washington to authorize
the insurance commissioner to cooperate with and coordinate his or her
activities with those other states.

(7)
In addition to unpaid insurance policies, Holocaust victims lost unknown
billions of dollars of assets seized by Nazi Germany and its allies and
collaborators in Germany and Nazi-occupied Europe between 1933 and 1945.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Holocaust survivor" or "Holocaust victim" means any person
who was persecuted, imprisoned or liable to imprisonment, or had property taken
or confiscated during the period of 1933 to 1945, inclusive, by Nazi Germany,
its allies, or sympathizers based on that person's race, religion, ethnicity,
physical or mental disability, sexual orientation, or similar class or
group-based animus.

(2)
"Related company" means any parent, subsidiary, successor in
interest, managing general agent, or other person or company affiliated
directly or indirectly through ownership, control, common ownership or control,
or other business or insurance relationship with another company or insurer.

(3)
"Insurer" means an entity holding a certificate of authority or
license to conduct the business of insurance in this state, or whose contacts
with this state satisfy the constitutional requirements for jurisdiction, that
sold life, property, liability, health, annuities, dowry, educational,
casualty, or any other insurance covering persons or property to persons in
Europe at any time before 1945, whether directly or through or as result of
sales by a related company, or is itself a related company to any person,
entity, or insurance company that sold such policies, whether the sale of the
insurance occurred before or after becoming related.

(4)
"Proceeds" means the face or other payout value of policies and
annuities plus reasonable interest to date of payments without diminution for
wartime or immediate postwar currency devaluation legally due under any
insurance policy issued by an insurer or any related company.

(5)
"International commission" means the international commission on
Holocaust era insurance claims, referenced in and established under a
memorandum of understanding originally dated April 8, 1998, between and among
the insurance commissioner, various other state insurance regulators, various
alien insurance companies, and world-wide Jewish groups, which commission held
its first meeting in New York on October 21, 1998, and any successor.

(6)
"Other assets" means the proceeds of bank accounts, gold, art,
houses, businesses, other real estate properties or land, or the contents of
homes, businesses, or other real estate properties of Holocaust survivors or
victims.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
HOLOCAUST SURVIVOR ASSISTANCE OFFICE. (1) To assist Holocaust victims, their
heirs, or their beneficiaries to recover proceeds from insurance policies that
were improperly denied or processed, or from other assets, or both, the
insurance commissioner may establish a Holocaust survivor assistance office.

(2)
The insurance commissioner may appoint or deputize personnel to be engaged or
employed by the Holocaust survivor assistance office and utilize insurance
department personnel to resolve or settle claims of Holocaust victims. The
insurance commissioner may also engage outside auditors or other qualified
personnel to assist in the investigation of claims made by Holocaust victims,
their heirs, or their beneficiaries.

(3)
The insurance commissioner may cooperate and exchange information with other
states establishing similar Holocaust survivor assistance offices and with the
international commission, and may enter into agreements whereby a single
processing office may be established on behalf of, and to provide services to
the residents of, several states.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
HOLOCAUST INSURANCE COMPANY REGISTRY. (1) To facilitate the work of the
Holocaust survivor assistance office, the insurance commissioner may establish
and maintain a central registry containing records and information relating to
insurance policies, as described in section 6 of this act, of victims, living
and deceased, of the Holocaust. The registry shall be known as the Holocaust
insurance company registry. The insurance commissioner shall establish
standards and procedures to make the information in the registry available to
the public to the extent necessary and appropriate to determine the existence
of insurance polices and to identify beneficiaries, successors in interest, or
other persons entitled to the proceeds of such polices, and to enable such
persons to claim proceeds to which they may be entitled, while protecting the
privacy of policyholders, their survivors, and their family members. All
information received by the Holocaust insurance company registry or Holocaust
survivor assistance office from any insurer, related company, or foreign government
or regulator shall be considered and deemed to be matters and information
relating to an examination and part of an examination report that the insurance
commissioner may treat as confidential and withhold from public inspection
under RCW 48.03.040(6)(c) and 48.03.050. To the extent necessary and
appropriate to secure access to documents and information located in or subject
to the jurisdiction of other states and countries, the insurance commissioner
is authorized to enter into agreements or to provide assurances that any or all
documents and information received from an entity regulated by or subject to
the laws of such other state or country, or received from any agency of the
government of any such state or country, will be treated as confidential by the
insurance commissioner and will not be disclosed to any person except with the
approval of the appropriate authority of such state or country or except as
permitted or authorized by the laws of such state or country, and any such
agreement shall be binding and enforceable notwithstanding chapter 42.17 RCW.
To the extent necessary and appropriate to secure access to documents and
information from or in the possession of the international commission as to
which the international commission has given assurances of confidentiality or
privacy, the insurance commissioner is authorized to enter into agreements or
to provide assurances that any or all such documents and information will be
treated as confidential by the insurance commissioner and will not be disclosed
to any person except with the approval of the international commission or as
permitted by any agreement or assurances given by the international commission,
and any such agreement shall be binding and enforceable notwithstanding chapter
42.17 RCW.

(2)
The insurance commissioner may cooperate and exchange information with other
states establishing similar registries and with the international commission,
and may enter into agreements whereby a single registry may be established on
behalf of, and to provide services to the citizens and residents of, several
states.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
OPERATIONS OF HOLOCAUST INSURANCE COMPANY REGISTRY. (1) Any insurer that sold
life, property, liability, health, annuities, dowry, educational, or casualty
insurance policies, to persons in Europe, that were in effect any time between
1933 and 1945, regardless of when the policy was initially purchased or
written, shall within ninety days following the effective date of this act, or
such later date as the insurance commissioner may establish, file or cause to
be filed the following information with the insurance commissioner to be
entered into the Holocaust insurance company registry:

(a)
A list of such insurance policies;

(b)
The insureds, beneficiaries, and face amounts of such policies;

(c)
A comparison of the names and other available identifying information of
insureds and beneficiaries of such policies and the names and other identifying
information of the victims of the Holocaust. The names and other identifying
information of victims of the Holocaust shall be provided by the office of the
insurance commissioner and may be obtained from the United States Holocaust
museum and the Yad Vashem repository in Israel, or other sources;

(d)
For each such policy, whichever of the following that may apply:

(i)
That the proceeds of the policy have been paid to the designated beneficiaries
or their heirs where that person or persons, after diligent search, could be
located and identified;

(ii)
That the proceeds of the policies where the beneficiaries or heirs could not,
after diligent search, be located or identified, have been distributed to
Holocaust survivors or to qualified charitable nonprofit organizations for the
purpose of assisting Holocaust survivors;

(iii)
That a court of law has certified in a legal proceeding resolving the rights of
unpaid policyholders, their heirs, and beneficiaries, a plan for the
distribution of the proceeds;

(iv)
That the proceeds have not been distributed and the amount of those proceeds.

(2)
The destruction of any records or other materials pertaining to such policies shall
be a class C felony according to chapter 9A.20 RCW. Evidence of the
destruction of such material shall be admissible in both administrative and
judicial proceedings as evidence in support of any claim being made against the
insurer involving the destroyed material.

(3)
An insurer currently doing business in the state that did not sell any
insurance policies in Europe prior to 1945 except through or as a result of
sales by a related company shall not be subject to this section if a related
company, whether or not authorized and currently doing business in the state,
has made a filing with the insurance commissioner under this section.

(4)
The insurance commissioner may fund the costs of operating both the Holocaust
survivor assistance office and the Holocaust claims registry by assessments
upon those insurers providing information to the Holocaust insurance company
registry. The insurance commissioner shall establish standards and procedures
to fairly allocate the costs of the Holocaust insurance company registry and
Holocaust survivor assistance office among such insurers. The insurance
commissioner is expressly authorized to allocate such costs based on the number
of policies reported or, based on the total monetary amount of the policies as
determined by their face amounts without regard to inflation, interest, or
depreciation.

(5)
The insurance commissioner is authorized to conduct investigations and
examinations of insurers for the purpose of determining compliance with this
chapter, verifying the accuracy and completeness of any and all information
furnished to the Holocaust insurance company registry and the Holocaust
survivor assistance office, and developing and securing such additional
information as may be necessary or appropriate to determine those entitled to
payment under any policy and the proceeds to which such person may be entitled,
if any. Any such investigation shall be considered to be an examination under
chapter 48.03 RCW. The costs of any such examination will be borne by the insurer
investigated, or the insurer to whom the related company is related, pursuant
to RCW 48.03.060(2). Examinations may be conducted in this state, or in the
state or country of residence of the insurer or related company, or at such
other place or country where the records to be examined may be located.

(6)
The insurance commissioner may permit the Holocaust insurance company registry
or the Holocaust survivor assistance office or both to accept information and
to assist claimants with regard to the location and recovery of property or
assets taken or confiscated from Holocaust victims other than insurance
policies if the insurance commissioner finds that doing so would not adversely
affect the operations of the registry or Holocaust survivor assistance office
with regard to insurance policies. However, all costs and expenses, including
that of personnel, attributable to such noninsurance assets shall be separately
accounted for and shall not be assessed against insurers under subsections (4)
and (5) of this section and shall not be paid from the general funds of the
office of the insurance commissioner, but shall be paid solely from
contributions or donations received for that purpose.

(a)
The insurance commissioner may accept contributions from any other person
wishing to fund the operations of the Holocaust survivor assistance office or
the Holocaust insurance company registry to facilitate the resolution of claims
involving Holocaust victims.

(b)
The insurance commissioner is authorized to assist in the creation of an entity
to accept tax deductible contributions to support activities conducted by the
Holocaust survivor assistance office and the Holocaust insurance company
registry.

(c)
The insurance commissioner, through the Holocaust survivor assistance office,
is authorized, with the consent of the parties, to act as mediator of any
dispute involving the claim of a Holocaust victim or his or her heirs or
beneficiaries arising from an occurrence during the period between January 1,
1933, and December 31, 1945.

(7)
The insurance commissioner is authorized to cooperate with and exchange
information with other states with similar Holocaust insurance company
registries or Holocaust survivor assistance offices, with the national
association of insurance commissioners, with foreign countries and with the
international commission. The insurance commissioner is authorized to enter
into agreements to handle the processing of claims and registry functions of
other states, and to have other states handle all or part of the registry and
claims processing functions for this state, as the insurance commissioner may
determine to be appropriate. The insurance commissioner is authorized to enter
into agreements with other states and the international commission to treat and
consider information submitted to them as submitted to this state for purpose
of complying with this chapter. As part of any such agreement, the insurance
commissioner may agree to reimburse any other state for expenses or costs
incurred and such reimbursement shall be recovered by the insurance
commissioner as an expense of operating the Holocaust insurance company
registry and Holocaust survivor assistance office under subsections (4) and (5)
of this section, and to accept reimbursement from any other state for services
with regard to residents of such other state.

(8)
A finding by the insurance commissioner that a claim subject to the provisions
of this section should be paid shall be regarded by any court as highly
persuasive evidence that such claim should be paid.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
PENALTIES. Any insurer that knowingly files information required by this
chapter that is false shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed ten
thousand dollars for each violation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
SUSPENSION OF CERTIFICATE OF AUTHORITY FOR FAILURE TO COMPLY WITH CHAPTER. The
insurance commissioner is authorized to suspend the certificate of authority to
conduct insurance business in the state of Washington of any insurer that fails
to comply with the requirements of this chapter by or after one hundred twenty
days after the effective date of this act, until the time that the insurer
complies with this chapter. Such suspension shall not affect or relieve the
insurer from its obligations to service its existing insureds, and shall not
permit the insurer to terminate its existing insureds, except pursuant to the
terms of the insurance contract, but shall prohibit the insurer from writing new
business in this state until the suspension is lifted by the insurance
commissioner.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9.
COOPERATION WITH INTERNATIONAL COMMISSION. The insurance commissioner may
suspend the application of this chapter to any insurer that is participating in
the international commission process in good faith and is working through the
international commission to resolve all outstanding claims with offers of fair
settlements in a reasonable time frame. If, however, the international
commission fails to establish a mechanism to accomplish identification,
adjudication, and payment of insurance policy claims of Holocaust survivors or
victims within a reasonable time, then all provisions of this chapter shall
come into effect as to any such insurer. For purposes of this section, a
reasonable time shall mean by January 1, 2000, or such later date as the
insurance commissioner may establish by rule.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10.
PRIVATE RIGHTS OF ACTION PRESERVED; VENUE. Any Holocaust survivor, or heir or
beneficiary of a Holocaust survivor or victim, who resides in this state and
has a claim against an insurer arising out of an insurance policy or policies
purchased or in effect in Europe before 1945 from that insurer may bring a
legal action against that insurer to recover on that claim in the superior
court of the county in which any plaintiff resides, which court shall be vested
with jurisdiction over that action.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11.
EXTENSION OF STATUTE OF LIMITATIONS. Any action brought by a Holocaust
survivor or the heir or beneficiary of a Holocaust survivor or victim, seeking
proceeds of the insurance policies issued or in effect before 1945 shall not be
dismissed for failure to comply with the applicable statute of limitations,
provided the action is commenced on or before December 31, 2010.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12.
ADOPTION OF RULES. The insurance commissioner may adopt rules to implement
this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13.
REPORT TO LEGISLATURE. The insurance commissioner shall report to the
legislature one year from the effective date of this act and annually
thereafter on the implementation of this law and resolution of Holocaust
claims.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. SHORT
TITLE. This chapter shall be known and cited as the Holocaust victim insurance
relief act of 1999.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15.
CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this chapter are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16.
Sections 1 through 15, 17, and 18 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title
48 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17. If any
provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18. This
chapter expires December 31, 2010.

---
END ---