BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.32.265 and 1987 c 80 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department may retain, by written contract, collection agencies licensed
under chapter 19.16 RCW or licensed under the laws of another state or the
District of Columbia for the purpose of collecting ((from sources outside
the state of Washington)) taxes including interest and penalties thereon
imposed under this title and RCW 84.33.041.

(2)
Only accounts represented by tax warrants filed in the superior court of a
county in the state as provided by RCW 82.32.210 may be assigned to a
collection agency, and no such assignment may be made unless the department has
previously notified or has attempted to notify the taxpayer of his or her right
to petition for correction of assessment within the time provided and in
accordance with the procedures set forth in chapter 82.32 RCW.

(3)
Collection agencies assigned accounts for collection under this section shall
have only those remedies and powers that would be available to them as
assignees of private creditors. However, nothing in this section limits the
right to enforce the liability for taxes lawfully imposed under the laws of
this state in the courts of another state or the District of Columbia as provided
by the laws of such jurisdictions and RCW 4.24.140 and 4.24.150.

(4)
The account of the taxpayer shall be credited with the amounts collected by a
collection agency before reduction for reasonable collection costs, including
attorneys fees, that the department is authorized to negotiate on a contingent
fee or other basis.

Sec.
2. RCW
82.32.210 and 1998 c 311 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If any fee, tax, increase, or penalty or any portion thereof is not paid within
fifteen days after it becomes due, the department of revenue may issue a
warrant in the amount of such unpaid sums, together with interest thereon from
the date the warrant is issued until the date of payment. If, however, the
department of revenue believes that a taxpayer is about to cease business,
leave the state, or remove or dissipate the assets out of which fees, taxes or
penalties might be satisfied and that any tax or penalty will not be paid when
due, it may declare the fee, tax or penalty to be immediately due and payable
and may issue a warrant immediately. The department may include in any such
warrant any reasonable fee paid or to be paid to a collection agency retained
under RCW 82.32.265 or other authority.

(a)
Interest imposed before January 1, 1999, shall be computed at the rate of one
percent of the amount of the warrant for each thirty days or portion thereof.

(b)
Interest imposed after December 31, 1998, shall be computed on a daily basis on
the amount of outstanding tax or fee at the rate as computed under RCW
82.32.050(2). The rate so computed shall be adjusted on the first day of
January of each year for use in computing interest for that calendar year. As
used in this subsection, "fee" does not include an administrative filing
fee such as a court filing fee and warrant fee.

(2)
The department shall file a copy of the warrant with the clerk of the superior
court of any county of the state in which real and/or personal property of the
taxpayer may be found. Upon filing, the clerk shall enter in the judgment
docket, the name of the taxpayer mentioned in the warrant and in appropriate
columns the amount of the fee, tax or portion thereof and any increases and
penalties for which the warrant is issued and the date when the copy is filed,
and thereupon the amount of the warrant so docketed shall become a specific
lien upon all goods, wares, merchandise, fixtures, equipment, or other personal
property used in the conduct of the business of the taxpayer against whom the
warrant is issued, including property owned by third persons who have a
beneficial interest, direct or indirect, in the operation of the business, and
no sale or transfer of the personal property in any way affects the lien.

(3)
The lien shall not be superior, however, to bona fide interests of third
persons which had vested prior to the filing of the warrant when the third
persons do not have a beneficial interest, direct or indirect, in the operation
of the business, other than the securing of the payment of a debt or the
receiving of a regular rental on equipment. The phrase "bona fide
interests of third persons" does not include any mortgage of real or
personal property or any other credit transaction that results in the mortgagee
or the holder of the security acting as trustee for unsecured creditors of the
taxpayer mentioned in the warrant who executed the chattel or real property
mortgage or the document evidencing the credit transaction.

(4) The amount of the warrant so docketed shall thereupon also
become a lien upon the title to and interest in all other real and personal
property of the taxpayer against whom it is issued the same as a judgment in a
civil case duly docketed in the office of the clerk. The warrant so docketed
shall be sufficient to support the issuance of writs of garnishment in favor of
the state in the manner provided by law in the case of judgments wholly or
partially unsatisfied.

---
END ---