BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that: (1) Over half of all pregnancies are unintended; (2)
by reducing rates of unintended pregnancy, contraceptives help reduce the need
for abortion; (3) unintended pregnancies lead to higher rates of infant
mortality, low birth weight, and maternal morbidity, and threaten the economic
viability of families; (4) contraceptive services are part of basic health
care, allowing families to both adequately space desired pregnancies and avoid
unintended pregnancy; (5) many health carriers cover prescription drugs and
devices but exclude prescription contraceptives and contraceptive devices; (6)
women of child-bearing age spend significantly more than men on out-of-pocket
health care costs, with contraceptives and reproductive health care services
accounting for most of this disparity; (7) lack of contraceptive coverage in
health plans places many effective forms of contraceptives beyond the financial
reach of many women, leading to unintended pregnancies; and (8) the ability to
plan her childbearing is central to a woman's ability to participate on an
equal basis in education and employment.

The
legislature intends to reduce the number of unintended pregnancies and ensure
access to contraceptive services in health plans that cover prescription drugs
and outpatient health services. The legislature also intends to further the
goal of eliminating sex discrimination in health benefits for women.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.

(a)
"Prescription contraceptive drugs and devices" means prescription
contraceptive drugs and devices approved by the federal food and drug
administration, including oral contraceptives, intrauterine devices (IUDs),
injectables, hormonal implants, diaphragms, cervical caps, and emergency
contraception.

(b)
"Outpatient contraceptive services" means services necessary for the
effective use of contraception, including family planning consultations,
examinations, procedures for inserting, removing, or dispensing prescription
contraceptive methods, and laboratory services provided on an outpatient basis
and related to the use of contraceptive methods, including natural family
planning.

(2)
Health carriers shall not exclude or restrict an enrollee's access to:

(a)
Prescription contraceptive drugs and devices approved by the federal food and
drug administration if the enrollee's health plan provides benefits for
prescription drugs; or

(b)
Outpatient contraceptive services, if the enrollee's health plan provides
benefits for outpatient health services.

(3)
Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a health carrier shall
not create or impose disincentives for utilization of the benefits required by
subsection (2) of this section.

(4)
Nothing in this section shall be construed as:

(a)
Preventing a health carrier from imposing deductibles, coinsurance, other
cost-sharing requirements, or other limitations in relation to providing
prescription contraceptive drugs and devices, or outpatient contraceptive
services, provided that such deductible, coinsurance, other cost-sharing
requirement, or other limitation is not greater than or different from the
deductible, coinsurance, other cost-sharing requirement, or other limitation
for other prescription drugs, devices, or outpatient health care services
covered under the plan;

(b)
Requiring a health carrier to cover experimental or investigative prescription
contraceptive drugs and devices, or outpatient contraceptive services, except
to the extent that a plan provides coverage for other experimental or
investigative prescription drugs, devices, or outpatient health care services;
or

(c)
Allowing a health carrier to limit a health care provider's ability to
prescribe contraceptive drugs for medical purposes such as decreasing risk of
ovarian cysts or eliminating symptoms of menopause.

(5)
This section applies to health plans issued or renewed on or after the
effective date of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature recognizes that every individual possesses a fundamental right
to exercise their religious beliefs. The legislature further recognizes that
in developing public policy, conflicting religious beliefs must be respected.
Therefore, while recognizing the right of religious objection to participating
in the provision of contraceptive health care services, the state shall also
recognize the right of individuals to access the prescription contraceptive
drugs and devices and outpatient contraceptive health care services required by
this section and section 2 of this act.

(2)(a)
No individual health care provider, religiously sponsored health carrier, or
health care facility may be required by law or contract in any circumstances to
participate in the provision of or payment for prescription contraceptive drugs
and devices and outpatient contraceptive services if they object to doing so
for reason of conscience or religion. No person may be discriminated against
in employment or professional privileges because of such an objection.

(b)
The provisions of (a) of this subsection are not intended to result in an
enrollee being denied timely access to prescription contraceptive drugs and
devices and outpatient contraceptive services.

(3)(a)
Health carriers that are not religiously sponsored shall allow enrollees whose
health care provider or plan-designated health care facility declines to
participate in the provision of contraceptive health care services to use
another health care provider or health care facility with whom the plan
contracts to ensure timely access to qualified providers within the local
community. If all of the providers or facilities with whom the carrier
contracts within the enrollee's local community decline to participate in the
provision of contraceptive health care services, the carrier shall contract with
a provider or facility within the enrollee's local community that will provide
such services.

(b)
Each religiously sponsored health carrier that invokes the religious exemption
provided under subsection (2)(a) of this section shall: (i) Provide written
notice to enrollees upon enrollment with the plan, listing the contraceptive
health services they refuse to cover for reason of conscience or religion; (ii)
provide written information describing how an enrollee may directly access
prescription drugs and devices and outpatient contraceptive health care
services in an expeditious manner; and (iii) ensure that enrollees refused
services under this section have prompt access to the information developed
under (b)(ii) of this subsection.

(4)(a)
No individual or religious organization may be required to purchase coverage
for contraceptive health care services if they object to doing so for reason of
conscience or religion. The provision of this subsection shall not result in
an enrollee being denied coverage of, and timely access to, prescription
contraceptive drugs and devices and outpatient contraceptive services.

(b)
Health carriers that are not religiously sponsored shall allow religious
organizations opposed to contraceptive health services to refuse to pay for
coverage of such benefits in a group plan. Health carriers shall allow
enrollees in a health plan exempted under this subsection to directly purchase
coverage of prescription drugs and devices and outpatient contraceptive
services from the carrier. The enrollee's cost of purchasing such coverage
shall not exceed the enrollee's pro rata share of the price the group purchaser
would have paid for such coverage had the group plan not invoked a religious
exemption.

(5)
Nothing in this section requires a health carrier, health care facility, or
health care provider to provide any health care services without appropriate
payment of premium or fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---