BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The tobacco prevention and control program is created within the department of
health and shall be administered in consultation with the tobacco prevention
and control advisory board created in section 2 of this act.

(2)
The tobacco prevention and control program shall design and implement public
health projects relating to tobacco, including but not limited to enforcing
prohibitions on tobacco sales to minors, countermarketing and advertising
efforts relating to tobacco.

The
department in consultation with the tobacco prevention and control advisory
board shall develop a sustainable, long-term, comprehensive tobacco control
program that integrates public education, community-based programs, treatment
of tobacco addiction, school-based programs, and enforcement of laws
prohibiting illegal sales of cigarettes, with a mechanism for ongoing
monitoring and evaluation.

The
department shall develop an inventory of current state, federally funded and
other national programs which address substance abuse in youth under age
eighteen in school-based and community programs, with the goal of designing a
state-wide tobacco prevention and control program that builds on and does not
duplicate current programs.

The
department shall develop a plan that uses and enhances the state's public
health system, community programs, and community coalitions along with schools,
health care providers, and the private sector to implement the state's tobacco
control program. Funding for school health services shall be included to
address health in youth.

The
department shall review research into tobacco control programs in other states
and in the private sector which have had success rates comparable to the
smoking reduction goals developed by the department. The department shall
pursue information from the files of the tobacco companies named in the master settlement.

The
plan authorized under this section and section 2 of this act shall include
long-term outcome measures including but not limited to: Reducing overall
smoking prevalence; reducing cigarette smoking by children and youth;
increasing smoking cessation during pregnancy; reducing smokeless tobacco by
youth ages twelve through twenty-four; establishing tobacco-free environments;
and increasing the proportion of smoke-free work sites. All outcome goals will
be based on nationally accepted outcome measures in order to compare Washington
state success rates with those of other states. The department shall integrate
ongoing evaluation and accountability measures into the plan.

The
department shall plan for increasing access to smoking cessation programs,
especially for high risk populations including but not limited to pregnant
women and adolescents.

The
department shall report back to the legislature by December 1, 1999, on the
initial phase of the tobacco control plan with projected expenditures through
June 30, 2001. The department shall report back to the legislature on
September 30, 2000, with the long-range plan for tobacco prevention and
cessation in Washington state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

There
is hereby created the tobacco prevention and control advisory board to advise
and assist the secretary of the department of health in developing, selecting,
and evaluating strategies for the tobacco prevention and control efforts that
are administered by the tobacco prevention and control program. The board
shall consist of eighteen members designated or appointed as provided in this
section.

(1)
The attorney general or the attorney general's designee.

(2)
Two members of the senate, designated by the president of the senate.

(3)
Two members of the house of representatives, designated by the speaker of the
house of representatives.

(4)
One member of the governor's policy staff, designated by the governor.

(5)
Two members representing populations at risk for tobacco use, appointed by the
governor. The initial term of appointment for one member is two years and for
the other member, three years.

Two
members representing youth under age eighteen, appointed by the governor. The
initial term of appointment for one member is two years and for the other
member, three years.

(6)
Three representatives of nongovernmental voluntary tobacco control
organizations, appointed by the governor. The initial term of appointment for
two members is two years and for the remaining member, three years.

(7)
One tribal representative, appointed by the governor. The initial term of
appointment is two years.

(8)
Two members of the local public health community, appointed by the secretary of
the department of health. The initial term of appointment for one member is
two years and for the second member, three years.

(9)
The secretary of the department of health or the secretary's designee.

(10)
The superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee.

Any
appointed member of the board remains a board member until his or her successor
is appointed. Appointed members of the board may be reappointed for additional
terms. Appointments for vacancies are made for the unexpired term, in the same
manner as the original appointment. After the term of initial appointment, the
term of appointed members of the board is three years. Any appointed member of
the board may be removed for cause by the authority appointing that member.

The
attorney general or the attorney general's designee shall serve as chair of the
board for an initial two-year term. Thereafter, the board shall select a chair
from among its members. The board shall adopt procedures for conducting its
affairs and accomplishing its duties. Necessary administrative support for the
board shall be provided by the department of health.

Members
of the board who are state officers or employees shall serve without additional
compensation or reimbursement for expenses. Such members shall be compensated
and reimbursed for expenses by their employer and according to their regular
position or employment. Members of the board who are not state officers or
employees shall be reimbursed for expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.220.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---