BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that families in Washington need community outdoor
athletic fields for both youth and adults. The legislature recognizes that
coordinated funding efforts are needed to maintain, develop, and improve the
state's community outdoor athletic fields. Rapid population growth and
increased urbanization have caused a decline in suitable outdoor fields for
community athletic activities and have resulted in overcrowding and
deterioration of existing surfaces. Lack of adequate community outdoor
athletic fields directly affects the health and well-being of all citizens of
the state, reduces the state's economic viability, and prevents Washington from
maintaining and achieving the quality of life that it deserves. Therefore, it
is the policy of the state and its agencies to maintain, develop, fund, and
improve community outdoor athletic fields and provide loans and grants for
local governments, school districts, and nonprofit organizations to provide the
same.

(2)
In carrying out this policy, the legislature intends to promote the building of
new community outdoor athletic fields and upgrade existing community outdoor
athletic fields across Washington state by providing loans and grants for local
governments, school districts, and nonprofit organizations.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.155.020 and 1996 c 168 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section shall
apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Board" means the public works board created in RCW 43.155.030.

(2)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(3)
"Financing guarantees" means the pledge of money in the public works
assistance account, or money to be received by the public works assistance
account, to the repayment of all or a portion of the principal of or interest
on obligations issued by local governments to finance public works projects,
or repayment of all or a portion of principal or interest on loans incurred by
qualified nonprofit organizations.

(4)
"Local governments" means cities, towns, counties, special purpose
districts, and any other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations
in the state excluding school districts and port districts unless there is a
partnership formed between a school district and a qualified nonprofit
organization or a municipal corporation; or a port district and a qualified
nonprofit organization or a municipal corporation.

(5)
"Public works project" means a project of a local government, or
qualified nonprofit organization, for the planning, acquisition,
construction, repair, reconstruction, replacement, rehabilitation, or
improvement of streets and roads, bridges, water systems, or storm and sanitary
sewage systems and solid waste facilities, including recycling facilities and
community outdoor athletic fields.

(6)
"Solid waste or recycling project" means remedial actions necessary
to bring abandoned or closed landfills into compliance with regulatory
requirements and the repair, restoration, and replacement of existing solid
waste transfer, recycling facilities, and landfill projects limited to the
opening of landfill cells that are in existing and permitted landfills.

(7)
"Technical assistance" means training and other services provided to
local governments to: (a) Help such local governments and qualified
nonprofit organizations plan, apply, and qualify for loans and financing
guarantees from the board, and (b) help local governments improve their ability
to plan for, finance, acquire, construct, repair, replace, rehabilitate, and maintain
public facilities and community outdoor athletic fields.

(8)
"Qualified nonprofit" means those nonprofit organizations qualified
to receive funds from the youth athletic facilities account as established in
RCW 43.99N.060(4).

Sec.
3. RCW
43.155.030 and 1985 c 446 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The public works board is hereby created.

(2)
The board shall be composed of thirteen members appointed by the governor for
terms of four years, except that five members initially shall be appointed for
terms of two years. The board shall include: (a) Three members, two of whom
shall be elected officials and one shall be a public works manager, appointed
from a list of at least six persons nominated by the association of Washington
cities or its successor; (b) three members, two of whom shall be elected
officials and one shall be a public works manager, appointed from a list of at
least six persons nominated by the Washington state association of counties or
its successor; (c) three members appointed from a list of at least six persons
nominated jointly by the Washington state association of water districts, the
Washington public utility districts association, and the Washington state
association of sewer districts or their successors; and (d) four members
appointed from the general public. In appointing the four general public
members, the governor shall endeavor to balance the geographical composition of
the board and to include members with special expertise in relevant fields such
as public finance, architecture and civil engineering, youth athletics,
and public works construction, and outdoor athletic fields for both youth
and adults. The governor shall appoint one of the general public members
of the board as chair. The term of the chair shall coincide with the term of
the governor. There shall be one additional member of the board, nominated
by the chair of the community outdoor athletic fields advisory council, and
shall be advisory only.

(3)
Staff support to the board shall be provided by the department.

(4)
Members of the board shall receive no compensation but shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(5)
If a vacancy on the board occurs by death, resignation, or otherwise, the
governor shall fill the vacant position for the unexpired term. Each vacancy
in a position appointed from lists provided by the associations under
subsection (2) of this section shall be filled from a list of at least three
persons nominated by the relevant association or associations. Any members of
the board, appointive or otherwise, may be removed by the governor for cause in
accordance with RCW 43.06.070 and 43.06.080.

Sec.
4. RCW
43.155.040 and 1985 c 446 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board may:

(1)
Accept from any state or federal agency, loans or grants for the planning or financing
of any public works project and enter into agreements with any such agency
concerning the loans or grants;

(2)
Provide technical assistance to local governments, or qualified nonprofit
organizations;

(3)
Accept any gifts, grants, or loans of funds, property, or financial or other
aid in any form from any other source on any terms and conditions which are not
in conflict with this chapter;

(4)
Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to carry out the purposes of
this chapter;

(5)
Do all acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers
expressly granted or implied under this chapter.

Sec.
5. RCW
43.155.050 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 918 and 1995 c 376 s 11 are each reenacted
and amended to read as follows:

The
public works assistance account is hereby established in the state treasury.
Money may be placed in the public works assistance account from the proceeds of
bonds when authorized by the legislature or from any other lawful source.
Money in the public works assistance account shall be used to make loans and to
give financial guarantees to local governments, and qualified nonprofit
organizations for public works projects. Moneys in the account may also be
appropriated to provide for state match requirements under federal law for
projects and activities conducted and financed by the board under the drinking
water assistance account. During the 1995-97 fiscal biennium, moneys in the
public works assistance account may be appropriated for transfer to the flood
control assistance account to be used for flood control assistance, including
grants under chapter 86.26 RCW. To the extent that moneys in the public works
assistance account are not appropriated during the 1995-97 fiscal biennium for public
works or flood control assistance, the legislature may direct their transfer to
the state general fund. In awarding grants under chapter 86.26 RCW, the
department of ecology shall give strong preference to local governments that
have: (1) Implemented, or are in the process of implementing, an ordinance
that establishes a flood plain policy that is substantially more stringent than
minimum federal requirements; (2) completed a comprehensive flood control plan
meeting the requirements of RCW 86.12.200; or (3) constructed, or are in the
process of constructing, a system of overtopping dikes or levees that allow
public access.

Sec.
6. RCW
43.155.060 and 1988 c 93 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

In
order to aid the financing of public works projects, the board may:

(1)
Make low-interest or interest-free loans to local governments and qualified
nonprofit organizations, from the public works assistance account or other
funds and accounts for the purpose of assisting local governments and
qualified nonprofit organizations in financing public works projects. The
board may require such terms and conditions and may charge such rates of
interest on its loans as it deems necessary or convenient to carry out the
purposes of this chapter. Money received from local governments or
qualified nonprofit organizations, in repayment of loans made under this
section shall be paid into the public works assistance account for uses
consistent with this chapter.

(2)
Pledge money in the public works assistance account, or money to be received by
the public works assistance account, to the repayment of all or a portion of
the principal of or interest on obligations issued by local governments and
qualified nonprofit organizations to finance public works projects. The
board shall not pledge any amount greater than the sum of money in the public
works assistance account plus money to be received from the payment of the debt
service on loans made from that account, nor shall the board pledge the faith
and credit or the taxing power of the state or any agency or subdivision
thereof to the repayment of obligations issued by any local government and
qualified nonprofit organizations.

(3)
Create such subaccounts in the public works assistance account as the board
deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(4)
Provide a method for the allocation of grants, loans, and
financing guarantees and the provision of technical assistance under this
chapter.

All
local public works projects aided in whole or in part under the provisions of
this chapter shall be put out for competitive bids, except for emergency public
works under RCW 43.155.065 for which the recipient jurisdiction shall comply
with this requirement to the extent feasible and practicable. The competitive
bids called for shall be administered in the same manner as all other public
works projects put out for competitive bidding by the local governmental entity
aided under this chapter.

Sec.
7. RCW
43.155.068 and 1995 c 363 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The board may make low-interest or interest-free loans to local governments,
or qualified nonprofit organizations, for preconstruction activities on
public works projects before the legislature approves the construction phase of
the project. Preconstruction activities include design, engineering,
bid-document preparation, environmental studies, right of way acquisition, and
other preliminary phases of public works projects as determined by the board.
The purpose of the loans authorized in this section is to accelerate the
completion of public works projects by allowing preconstruction activities to
be performed before the approval of the construction phase of the project by
the legislature.

(2)
Projects receiving loans for preconstruction activities under this section must
be evaluated using the priority process and factors in RCW 43.155.070(2). The
receipt of a loan for preconstruction activities does not ensure the receipt of
a construction loan for the project under this chapter. Construction loans for
projects receiving a loan for preconstruction activities under this section are
subject to legislative approval under RCW 43.155.070 (4) and (5). The board
shall adopt a single application process for local governments seeking both a
loan for preconstruction activities under this section and a construction loan
for the project.

(3)
Preconstruction activity loans under this section may be made only from those
funds specifically appropriated from the public works assistance account for
such a purpose by the legislature.

Sec.
8. RCW
43.155.070 and 1997 c 429 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
To qualify for loans or pledges under this chapter the board must determine
that a local government meets all of the following conditions:

(a)
The city or county must be imposing a tax under chapter 82.46 RCW at a rate of
at least one-quarter of one percent;

(b)
The local government must have developed a long-term plan for financing public
works needs;

(c)
The local government must be using all local revenue sources which are
reasonably available for funding public works, taking into consideration local
employment and economic factors; and

(d)
Except where necessary to address a public health need or substantial
environmental degradation, a county, city, or town that is required or chooses
to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 must have adopted a comprehensive plan in
conformance with the requirements of chapter 36.70A RCW, after it is required
that the comprehensive plan be adopted, and must have adopted development
regulations in conformance with the requirements of chapter 36.70A RCW, after
it is required that development regulations be adopted.

(2)
The board shall develop a priority process for public works projects as
provided in this section. The intent of the priority process is to maximize
the value of public works projects accomplished with assistance under this
chapter. The board shall attempt to assure a geographical balance in assigning
priorities to projects. The board shall consider at least the following
factors in assigning a priority to a project:

(a)
Whether the local government receiving assistance has experienced severe fiscal
distress resulting from natural disaster or emergency public works needs;

(b)
Whether the project is critical in nature and would affect the health and
safety of a great number of citizens;

(c)
The cost of the project compared to the size of the local government and amount
of loan money available;

(d)
The number of communities served by or funding the project;

(e)
Whether the project is located in an area of high unemployment, compared to the
average state unemployment;

(f)
Whether the project is the acquisition, expansion, improvement, or renovation
by a local government of a public water system that is in violation of health
and safety standards, including the cost of extending existing service to such
a system;

(g)
The relative benefit of the project to the community, considering the present
level of economic activity in the community and the existing local capacity to
increase local economic activity in communities that have low economic growth;
and

(h)
Other criteria that the board considers advisable.

(3)
Existing debt or financial obligations of local governments, or qualified
nonprofit organizations shall not be refinanced under this chapter. Each
local government, or qualified nonprofit organization applicant shall
provide documentation of attempts to secure additional local or other sources
of funding for each public works project for which financial assistance is
sought under this chapter.

(4)
Before November 1 of each year, the board shall develop and submit to the
appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives a
description of the loans made under RCW 43.155.065, 43.155.068, and subsection
(7) of this section during the preceding fiscal year and a prioritized list of
projects which are recommended for funding by the legislature, including one
copy to the staff of each of the committees. The list shall include, but not
be limited to, a description of each project and recommended financing, the
terms and conditions of the loan or financial guarantee, the local government
jurisdiction and unemployment rate, demonstration of the jurisdiction's
critical need for the project and documentation of local funds being used to
finance the public works project. The list shall also include measures of
fiscal capacity for each jurisdiction recommended for financial assistance,
compared to authorized limits and state averages, including local government
sales taxes; real estate excise taxes; property taxes; and charges for or taxes
on sewerage, water, garbage, and other utilities.

(5)
The board shall not sign contracts or otherwise financially obligate funds from
the public works assistance account before the legislature has appropriated
funds for a specific list of public works projects. The legislature may remove
projects from the list recommended by the board. The legislature shall not
change the order of the priorities recommended for funding by the board.

(6)
Subsection (5) of this section does not apply to loans made under RCW
43.155.065, 43.155.068, and subsection (7) of this section.

(7)(a)
Loans made for the purpose of capital facilities plans shall be exempted from
subsection (5) of this section. In no case shall the total amount of funds
utilized for capital facilities plans and emergency loans exceed the limitation
in RCW 43.155.065.

(b)
For the purposes of this section "capital facilities plans" means
those plans required by the growth management act, chapter 36.70A RCW, and
plans required by the public works board for local governments not subject to
the growth management act.

(8) To qualify for loans or pledges for solid waste or recycling
facilities under this chapter, a city or county must demonstrate that the solid
waste or recycling facility is consistent with and necessary to implement the
comprehensive solid waste management plan adopted by the city or county under
chapter 70.95 RCW.

---
END ---