BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
36.70B.090 and 1995 c 347 s 413 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, a local
government planning under RCW 36.70A.040 shall issue its notice of final
decision on a project permit application within one hundred twenty days after
the local government notifies the applicant that the application is complete,
as provided in RCW 36.70B.070. In determining the number of days that have
elapsed after the local government has notified the applicant that the
application is complete, the following periods shall be excluded:

(a)(i)
Any period during which the applicant has been requested by the local
government to correct plans, perform required studies, or provide additional
required information. The period shall be calculated from the date the local
government notifies the applicant of the need for additional information until
the earlier of the date the local government determines whether the additional
information satisfies the request for information or fourteen days after the
date the information has been provided to the local government.

(ii)
If the local government determines that the information submitted by the
applicant under (a)(i) of this subsection is insufficient, it shall notify the
applicant of the deficiencies and the procedures under (a)(i) of this
subsection shall apply as if a new request for studies had been made;

(b)
Any period during which an environmental impact statement is being prepared
following a determination of significance pursuant to chapter 43.21C RCW, if
the local government by ordinance or resolution has established time periods
for completion of environmental impact statements, or if the local government
and the applicant in writing agree to a time period for completion of an
environmental impact statement;

(c)
Any period for administrative appeals of project permits, if an open record
appeal hearing or a closed record appeal, or both, are allowed. The local
government by ordinance or resolution shall establish a time period to consider
and decide such appeals. The time period shall not exceed: (i) Ninety days
for an open record appeal hearing; and (ii) sixty days for a closed record
appeal. The parties to an appeal may agree to extend these time periods; ((and))

(d)
Any extension of time mutually agreed upon by the applicant and the local
government; and

(e)
With respect to any application that is subject to the authority of a community
municipal corporation council under RCW 35.14.040, the time between the date of
the final decision by the local government and the date of decision by the
community municipal corporation council, but not to exceed sixty days.

(2)
The time limits established by subsection (1) of this section do not apply if a
project permit application:

(a)
Requires an amendment to the comprehensive plan or a development regulation;

(b)
Requires approval of a new fully contained community as provided in RCW
36.70A.350, a master planned resort as provided in RCW 36.70A.360, or the
siting of an essential public facility as provided in RCW 36.70A.200; or

(c)
Is substantially revised by the applicant, in which case the time period shall
start from the date at which the revised project application is determined to
be complete under RCW 36.70B.070.

(3)
If the local government is unable to issue its final decision within the time
limits provided for in this section, it shall provide written notice of this
fact to the project applicant. The notice shall include a statement of reasons
why the time limits have not been met and an estimated date for issuance of the
notice of final decision.

(4) This section shall apply to project permit applications filed
on or after April 1, 1996.

---
END ---