BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
13.40.0357 and 1998 c 290 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

DESCRIPTION AND OFFENSE CATEGORY

juvenile juvenile
disposition

disposition category
for attempt,

offense bailjump,
conspiracy,

category description (rcw citation) or
solicitation

........................................

Arson and Malicious Mischief

A Arson 1 (9A.48.020) B+

B Arson 2 (9A.48.030) C

C Reckless Burning 1 (9A.48.040) D

D Reckless Burning 2 (9A.48.050) E

B Malicious Mischief 1 (9A.48.070) C

C Malicious Mischief 2 (9A.48.080) D

D Malicious
Mischief 3 (<$50 is

E class) (9A.48.090) E

E Tampering with
Fire Alarm

Apparatus (9.40.100) E

A Possession of
Incendiary Device

(9.40.120) B+

Assault and
Other Crimes

Involving
Physical Harm

A Assault 1 (9A.36.011) B+

B+ Assault 2 (9A.36.021) C+

C+ Assault 3 (9A.36.031) D+

D+ Assault 4 (9A.36.041) E

B+ Drive-By
Shooting

(9A.36.045) C+

D+ Reckless
Endangerment

(9A.36.050) E

C+ Promoting
Suicide Attempt

(9A.36.060) D+

D+ Coercion (9A.36.070) E

C+ Custodial Assault (9A.36.100) D+

Burglary and Trespass

B+ Burglary 1 (9A.52.020) C+

B Residential
Burglary

(9A.52.025) C

B Burglary 2 (9A.52.030) C

D Burglary Tools
(Possession of)

(9A.52.060) E

D Criminal Trespass 1 (9A.52.070) E

E Criminal
Trespass 2 (9A.52.080) E

C Vehicle
Prowling 1 (9A.52.095) D

D Vehicle Prowling 2 (9A.52.100) E

Drugs

E Possession/Consumption
of Alcohol

(66.44.270) E

C Illegally
Obtaining Legend Drug

(69.41.020) D

C+ Sale, Delivery,
Possession of Legend

Drug with
Intent to Sell

(69.41.030) D+

E Possession of
Legend Drug

(69.41.030) E

B+ Violation of
Uniform Controlled

Substances Act
- Narcotic,

Methamphetamine,
or Flunitrazepam

Sale (69.50.401(a)(1) (i) or (ii)) B+

C Violation of
Uniform Controlled

Substances Act
- Nonnarcotic Sale

(69.50.401(a)(1)(iii)) C

E Possession of
Marihuana <40 grams

(69.50.401(e)) E

C Fraudulently
Obtaining Controlled

Substance (69.50.403) C

C+ Sale of
Controlled Substance

for Profit (69.50.410) C+

E Unlawful Inhalation (9.47A.020) E

B Violation of
Uniform Controlled

Substances Act
- Narcotic,

Methamphetamine, or Flunitrazepam

Counterfeit
Substances

(69.50.401(b)(1) (i) or (ii)) B

C Violation of
Uniform Controlled

Substances Act - Nonnarcotic

Counterfeit
Substances

(69.50.401(b)(1) (iii), (iv), (v)) C

C Violation of
Uniform Controlled

Substances Act - Possession of a

Controlled
Substance

(69.50.401(d)) C

C Violation of
Uniform Controlled

Substances Act - Possession of a

Controlled
Substance

(69.50.401(c)) C

Firearms and Weapons

B Theft of Firearm (9A.56.300) C

B Possession of
Stolen Firearm

(9A.56.310) C

E Carrying Loaded
Pistol Without

Permit (9.41.050) E

C Possession of
Firearms by Minor (<18)

(9.41.040(1)(b)(iii)) C

D+ Possession of
Dangerous Weapon

(9.41.250) E

D Intimidating
Another Person by use

of Weapon (9.41.270) E

Homicide

A+ Murder 1 (9A.32.030) A

A+ Murder 2 (9A.32.050) B+

B+ Manslaughter 1 (9A.32.060) C+

C+ Manslaughter 2 (9A.32.070) D+

B+ Vehicular Homicide (46.61.520) C+

Kidnapping

A Kidnap 1 (9A.40.020) B+

B+ Kidnap 2 (9A.40.030) C+

C+ Unlawful
Imprisonment

(9A.40.040) D+

Obstructing
Governmental Operation

D Obstructing a
Law Enforcement

Officer (9A.76.020) E

E Resisting Arrest (9A.76.040) E

B Introducing
Contraband 1

(9A.76.140) C

C Introducing
Contraband 2

(9A.76.150) D

E Introducing
Contraband 3

(9A.76.160) E

B+ Intimidating a
Public Servant

(9A.76.180) C+

B+ Intimidating a
Witness

(9A.72.110) C+

Public
Disturbance

C+ Riot with Weapon (9A.84.010) D+

D+ Riot Without
Weapon

(9A.84.010) E

E Failure to
Disperse (9A.84.020) E

E Disorderly Conduct (9A.84.030) E

Sex Crimes

A Rape 1 (9A.44.040) B+

A- Rape 2 (9A.44.050) B+

C+ Rape 3 (9A.44.060) D+

A- Rape of a Child 1 (9A.44.073) B+

B+ Rape of a Child 2 (9A.44.076) C+

B Incest 1 (9A.64.020(1)) C

C Incest 2 (9A.64.020(2)) D

D+ Indecent
Exposure

(Victim <14) (9A.88.010) E

E Indecent Exposure

(Victim 14 or over) (9A.88.010) E

B+ Promoting Prostitution 1

(9A.88.070) C+

C+ Promoting
Prostitution 2

(9A.88.080) D+

E O & A (Prostitution) (9A.88.030) E

B+ Indecent Liberties (9A.44.100) C+

A- Child Molestation 1 (9A.44.083) B+

B Child Molestation 2 (9A.44.086) C+

Theft, Robbery,
Extortion, and Forgery

B Theft 1 (9A.56.030) C

C Theft 2 (9A.56.040) D

D Theft 3 (9A.56.050) E

B Theft of Livestock (9A.56.080) C

C Forgery (9A.60.020) D

A Robbery 1 (9A.56.200) B+

B+ Robbery 2 (9A.56.210) C+

B+ Extortion 1 (9A.56.120) C+

C+ Extortion 2 (9A.56.130) D+

B Possession of
Stolen Property 1

(9A.56.150) C

C Possession of
Stolen Property 2

(9A.56.160) D

D Possession of
Stolen Property 3

(9A.56.170) E

C Taking Motor
Vehicle Without

Owner's Permission (9A.56.070) D

Motor Vehicle
Related Crimes

E Driving Without
a License

(46.20.005) E

C Hit and Run -
Injury

(46.52.020(4)) D

D Hit and
Run-Attended

(46.52.020(5)) E

E Hit and
Run-Unattended

(46.52.010) E

C Vehicular Assault (46.61.522) D

C Attempting to
Elude Pursuing

Police Vehicle (46.61.024) D

E Reckless Driving (46.61.500) E

D Driving While
Under the Influence

(46.61.502 and 46.61.504) E

Other

B Bomb Threat (9.61.160) C

C Escape 11 (9A.76.110) C

C Escape 21 (9A.76.120) C

D Escape 3 (9A.76.130) E

E Obscene,
Harassing, Etc.,

Phone Calls (9.61.230) E

A Other Offense
Equivalent to an

Adult Class A Felony B+

B Other Offense
Equivalent to an

Adult Class B Felony C

C Other Offense
Equivalent to an

Adult Class C Felony D

D Other Offense
Equivalent to an

Adult Gross Misdemeanor E

E Other Offense
Equivalent to an

Adult Misdemeanor E

V Violation of
Order of Restitution,

Community
Supervision, or

Confinement (13.40.200)2 V

1Escape 1 and 2 and Attempted Escape 1 and 2 are
classed as C offenses and the standard range is established as follows:

1st
escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 4 weeks confinement

2nd
escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 8 weeks confinement

3rd
and subsequent escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 12 weeks
confinement

2If the
court finds that a respondent has violated terms of an order, it may impose a
penalty of up to 30 days of confinement.

JUVENILE SENTENCING STANDARDS

This schedule must be used for juvenile offenders.
The court may select sentencing option A, B, ((or)) C, or D.

OPTION
A

JUVENILE
OFFENDER SENTENCING GRID

STANDARD
RANGE

A+ 180 WEEKS TO AGE 21 YEARS

A 103 WEEKS TO 129 WEEKS

A- 15-36 |52-65 |80-100 |103-129

WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS|WEEKS

EXCEPT | | |

30-40 | | |

WEEKS FOR | | |

15-17 | | |

YEAR OLDS | | |

Current B+ 15-36 |52-65 |80-100 |103-129

Offense WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS

Category

B LOCAL | |52-65

SANCTIONS (LS) |15-36 WEEKS |WEEKS

C+ LS |

|15-36 WEEKS

C LS |15-36 WEEKS

Local Sanctions: |

0 to 30 Days

D+ LS 0 to 12 Months Community Supervision

0 to 150 Hours Community Service

D LS $0 to $500 Fine

E LS

0 1 2 3 4 or more

PRIOR ADJUDICATIONS

NOTE:
References in the grid to days or weeks mean periods of confinement.

(1)
The vertical axis of the grid is the current offense category. The current
offense category is determined by the offense of adjudication.

(2)
The horizontal axis of the grid is the number of prior adjudications included
in the juvenile's criminal history. Each prior felony adjudication shall count
as one point. Each prior violation, misdemeanor, and gross misdemeanor
adjudication shall count as 1/4 point. Fractional points shall be rounded
down.

(3)
The standard range disposition for each offense is determined by the
intersection of the column defined by the prior adjudications and the row
defined by the current offense category.

(4)
RCW 13.40.180 applies if the offender is being sentenced for more than one
offense.

(5)
A current offense that is a violation is equivalent to an offense category of
E. However, a disposition for a violation shall not include confinement.

OR

OPTION
B

CHEMICAL
DEPENDENCY DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE

If
the juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition of local
sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not committed an A- or B+
offense, the court may impose a disposition under RCW 13.40.160(((5))) (4)
and 13.40.165.

OR

OPTION
C

MANIFEST
INJUSTICE

If the court determines that a disposition under
option A or B would effectuate a manifest injustice, the court shall impose a
disposition outside the standard range under RCW 13.40.160(2).

OR

OPTION
D

COMMUNITY
SANCTION DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE

If
the juvenile offender has not been previously committed to a state institution,
but is presently subject to a standard range disposition of confinement in a
state institution and has not committed a sex offense, a serious violent
offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, or other violent category A felony as
defined in this section, the court may impose a disposition under RCW
13.40.160(5) and section 4 of this act.

Sec.
2. RCW
13.40.077 and 1997 c 338 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

RECOMMENDED PROSECUTING STANDARDS

FOR
CHARGING AND PLEA DISPOSITIONS

INTRODUCTION:
These standards are intended solely for the guidance of prosecutors in the
state of Washington. They are not intended to, do not, and may not be relied
upon to create a right or benefit, substantive or procedural, enforceable at
law by a party in litigation with the state.

Evidentiary
sufficiency.

(1)
Decision not to prosecute.

STANDARD:
A prosecuting attorney may decline to prosecute, even though technically
sufficient evidence to prosecute exists, in situations where prosecution would
serve no public purpose, would defeat the underlying purpose of the law in
question, or would result in decreased respect for the law. The decision not
to prosecute or divert shall not be influenced by the race, gender, religion,
or creed of the suspect.

GUIDELINES/COMMENTARY:

Examples

The
following are examples of reasons not to prosecute which could satisfy the
standard.

(a)
Contrary to Legislative Intent - It may be proper to decline to charge where
the application of criminal sanctions would be clearly contrary to the intent
of the legislature in enacting the particular statute.

(b)
Antiquated Statute - It may be proper to decline to charge where the statute in
question is antiquated in that:

(i)
It has not been enforced for many years;

(ii)
Most members of society act as if it were no longer in existence;

(iii)
It serves no deterrent or protective purpose in today's society; and

(iv)
The statute has not been recently reconsidered by the legislature.

This
reason is not to be construed as the basis for declining cases because the law
in question is unpopular or because it is difficult to enforce.

(c)
De Minimis Violation - It may be proper to decline to charge where the
violation of law is only technical or insubstantial and where no public
interest or deterrent purpose would be served by prosecution.

(d)
Confinement on Other Charges - It may be proper to decline to charge because
the accused has been sentenced on another charge to a lengthy period of
confinement; and

(i)
Conviction of the new offense would not merit any additional direct or
collateral punishment;

(ii)
The new offense is either a misdemeanor or a felony which is not particularly
aggravated; and

(iii)
Conviction of the new offense would not serve any significant deterrent
purpose.

(e)
Pending Conviction on Another Charge - It may be proper to decline to charge
because the accused is facing a pending prosecution in the same or another
county; and

(i)
Conviction of the new offense would not merit any additional direct or
collateral punishment;

(ii)
Conviction in the pending prosecution is imminent;

(iii)
The new offense is either a misdemeanor or a felony which is not particularly
aggravated; and

(iv)
Conviction of the new offense would not serve any significant deterrent
purpose.

(f)
High Disproportionate Cost of Prosecution - It may be proper to decline to
charge where the cost of locating or transporting, or the burden on,
prosecution witnesses is highly disproportionate to the importance of
prosecuting the offense in question. The reason should be limited to minor
cases and should not be relied upon in serious cases.

(g)
Improper Motives of Complainant - It may be proper to decline charges because
the motives of the complainant are improper and prosecution would serve no
public purpose, would defeat the underlying purpose of the law in question, or
would result in decreased respect for the law.

(h)
Immunity - It may be proper to decline to charge where immunity is to be given
to an accused in order to prosecute another where the accused information or
testimony will reasonably lead to the conviction of others who are responsible
for more serious criminal conduct or who represent a greater danger to the
public interest.

(i)
Victim Request - It may be proper to decline to charge because the victim
requests that no criminal charges be filed and the case involves the following
crimes or situations:

(i)
Assault cases where the victim has suffered little or no injury;

(ii)
Crimes against property, not involving violence, where no major loss was
suffered;

(iii)
Where doing so would not jeopardize the safety of society.

Care
should be taken to insure that the victim's request is freely made and is not
the product of threats or pressure by the accused.

The
presence of these factors may also justify the decision to dismiss a
prosecution which has been commenced.

Notification

The
prosecutor is encouraged to notify the victim, when practical, and the law
enforcement personnel, of the decision not to prosecute.

(2)
Decision to prosecute.

STANDARD:

Crimes
against persons will be filed if sufficient admissible evidence exists, which,
when considered with the most plausible, reasonably foreseeable defense that
could be raised under the evidence, would justify conviction by a reasonable
and objective fact-finder. With regard to offenses prohibited by RCW
9A.44.040, 9A.44.050, 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.079, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086,
9A.44.089, and 9A.64.020 the prosecutor should avoid prefiling agreements or
diversions intended to place the accused in a program of treatment or
counseling, so that treatment, if determined to be beneficial, can be proved
under RCW 13.40.160(((4))) (3).

Crimes
against property/other crimes will be filed if the admissible evidence is of
such convincing force as to make it probable that a reasonable and objective
fact-finder would convict after hearing all the admissible evidence and the
most plausible defense that could be raised.

The
categorization of crimes for these charging standards shall be the same as
found in RCW 9.94A.440(2).

The
decision to prosecute or use diversion shall not be influenced by the race,
gender, religion, or creed of the respondent.

(3)
Selection of Charges/Degree of Charge

(a)
The prosecutor should file charges which adequately describe the nature of the
respondent's conduct. Other offenses may be charged only if they are necessary
to ensure that the charges:

(i)
Will significantly enhance the strength of the state's case at trial; or

(ii)
Will result in restitution to all victims.

(b)
The prosecutor should not overcharge to obtain a guilty plea. Overcharging
includes:

(i)
Charging a higher degree;

(ii)
Charging additional counts.

This
standard is intended to direct prosecutors to charge those crimes which
demonstrate the nature and seriousness of a respondent's criminal conduct, but
to decline to charge crimes which are not necessary to such an indication.
Crimes which do not merge as a matter of law, but which arise from the same
course of conduct, do not all have to be charged.

(4)
Police Investigation

A
prosecuting attorney is dependent upon law enforcement agencies to conduct the
necessary factual investigation which must precede the decision to prosecute.
The prosecuting attorney shall ensure that a thorough factual investigation has
been conducted before a decision to prosecute is made. In ordinary
circumstances the investigation should include the following:

(a)
The interviewing of all material witnesses, together with the obtaining of
written statements whenever possible;

(b)
The completion of necessary laboratory tests; and

(c)
The obtaining, in accordance with constitutional requirements, of the suspect's
version of the events.

If
the initial investigation is incomplete, a prosecuting attorney should insist
upon further investigation before a decision to prosecute is made, and specify
what the investigation needs to include.

(5)
Exceptions

In
certain situations, a prosecuting attorney may authorize filing of a criminal
complaint before the investigation is complete if:

(a)
Probable cause exists to believe the suspect is guilty; and

(b)
The suspect presents a danger to the community or is likely to flee if not
apprehended; or

(c)
The arrest of the suspect is necessary to complete the investigation of the
crime.

In
the event that the exception to the standard is applied, the prosecuting
attorney shall obtain a commitment from the law enforcement agency involved to
complete the investigation in a timely manner. If the subsequent investigation
does not produce sufficient evidence to meet the normal charging standard, the
complaint should be dismissed.

(6)
Investigation Techniques

The
prosecutor should be fully advised of the investigatory techniques that were
used in the case investigation including:

(a)
Polygraph testing;

(b)
Hypnosis;

(c)
Electronic surveillance;

(d)
Use of informants.

(7)
Prefiling Discussions with Defendant

Discussions
with the defendant or his or her representative regarding the selection or
disposition of charges may occur prior to the filing of charges, and potential
agreements can be reached.

(8)
Plea dispositions:

STANDARD

(a)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a respondent will
normally be expected to plead guilty to the charge or charges which adequately
describe the nature of his or her criminal conduct or go to trial.

(b)
In certain circumstances, a plea agreement with a respondent in exchange for a
plea of guilty to a charge or charges that may not fully describe the nature of
his or her criminal conduct may be necessary and in the public interest. Such
situations may include the following:

(i)
Evidentiary problems which make conviction of the original charges doubtful;

(ii)
The respondent's willingness to cooperate in the investigation or prosecution
of others whose criminal conduct is more serious or represents a greater public
threat;

(iii)
A request by the victim when it is not the result of pressure from the
respondent;

(iv)
The discovery of facts which mitigate the seriousness of the respondent's conduct;

(v)
The correction of errors in the initial charging decision;

(vi)
The respondent's history with respect to criminal activity;

(vii)
The nature and seriousness of the offense or offenses charged;

(viii)
The probable effect of witnesses.

(c)
No plea agreement shall be influenced by the race, gender, religion, or creed
of the respondent. This includes but is not limited to the prosecutor's
decision to utilize such disposition alternatives as the Special Sex Offender
Disposition Alternative, the Chemical Dependency Disposition Alternative, and
manifest injustice.

(9)
Disposition recommendations:

STANDARD

The
prosecutor may reach an agreement regarding disposition recommendations.

The
prosecutor shall not agree to withhold relevant information from the court
concerning the plea agreement.

Sec.
3. RCW
13.40.160 and 1997 c 338 s 25 and 1997 c 265 s 1 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
The standard range disposition for a juvenile adjudicated of an offense is
determined according to RCW 13.40.0357.

(a)
When the court sentences an offender to a local sanction as provided in RCW
13.40.0357 option A, the court shall impose a determinate disposition within
the standard ranges, except as provided in subsections (2), (((4))) (3),
and (5) of this section. The disposition may be comprised of one or more local
sanctions.

(b)
When the court sentences an offender to a standard range as provided in RCW
13.40.0357 option A that includes a term of confinement exceeding thirty days,
commitment shall be to the department for the standard range of confinement,
except as provided in subsections (2), (((4))) (3), and (5) of
this section.

(2)
If the court concludes, and enters reasons for its conclusion, that disposition
within the standard range would effectuate a manifest injustice the court shall
impose a disposition outside the standard range, as indicated in option C of
RCW 13.40.0357. The court's finding of manifest injustice shall be supported
by clear and convincing evidence.

A
disposition outside the standard range shall be determinate and shall be
comprised of confinement or community supervision, or a combination thereof.
When a judge finds a manifest injustice and imposes a sentence of confinement
exceeding thirty days, the court shall sentence the juvenile to a maximum term,
and the provisions of RCW 13.40.030(2) shall be used to determine the range. A
disposition outside the standard range is appealable under RCW 13.40.230 by the
state or the respondent. A disposition within the standard range is not
appealable under RCW 13.40.230.

(3)
((Where a respondent is found to have committed an offense for which the
respondent declined to enter into a diversion agreement, the court shall impose
a term of community supervision limited to the conditions allowed in a
diversion agreement as provided in RCW 13.40.080(2).

(4))) When
a juvenile offender is found to have committed a sex offense, other than a sex
offense that is also a serious violent offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030, and
has no history of a prior sex offense, the court, on its own motion or the
motion of the state or the respondent, may order an examination to determine
whether the respondent is amenable to treatment.

The
report of the examination shall include at a minimum the following: The
respondent's version of the facts and the official version of the facts, the
respondent's offense history, an assessment of problems in addition to alleged
deviant behaviors, the respondent's social, educational, and employment
situation, and other evaluation measures used. The report shall set forth the
sources of the evaluator's information.

The
examiner shall assess and report regarding the respondent's amenability to
treatment and relative risk to the community. A proposed treatment plan shall
be provided and shall include, at a minimum:

(a)(i)
Frequency and type of contact between the offender and therapist;

(ii)
Specific issues to be addressed in the treatment and description of planned
treatment modalities;

(iii)
Monitoring plans, including any requirements regarding living conditions,
lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by family members, legal guardians, or
others;

(iv)
Anticipated length of treatment; and

(v)
Recommended crime-related prohibitions.

The
court on its own motion may order, or on a motion by the state shall order, a
second examination regarding the offender's amenability to treatment. The
evaluator shall be selected by the party making the motion. The defendant
shall pay the cost of any second examination ordered unless the court finds the
defendant to be indigent in which case the state shall pay the cost.

After
receipt of reports of the examination, the court shall then consider whether
the offender and the community will benefit from use of this special sex
offender disposition alternative and consider the victim's opinion whether the
offender should receive a treatment disposition under this section. If the court
determines that this special sex offender disposition alternative is
appropriate, then the court shall impose a determinate disposition within the
standard range for the offense, or if the court concludes, and enters reasons
for its conclusions, that such disposition would cause a manifest injustice,
the court shall impose a disposition under option C, and the court may suspend
the execution of the disposition and place the offender on community
supervision for at least two years. As a condition of the suspended
disposition, the court may impose the conditions of community supervision and
other conditions, including up to thirty days of confinement and requirements
that the offender do any one or more of the following:

(b)(i)
Devote time to a specific education, employment, or occupation;

(ii)
Undergo available outpatient sex offender treatment for up to two years, or
inpatient sex offender treatment not to exceed the standard range of
confinement for that offense. A community mental health center may not be used
for such treatment unless it has an appropriate program designed for sex
offender treatment. The respondent shall not change sex offender treatment
providers or treatment conditions without first notifying the prosecutor, the
probation counselor, and the court, and shall not change providers without
court approval after a hearing if the prosecutor or probation counselor object
to the change;

(iii)
Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the
probation counselor prior to any change in the offender's address, educational
program, or employment;

(iv)
Report to the prosecutor and the probation counselor prior to any change in a
sex offender treatment provider. This change shall have prior approval by the
court;

(v)
Report as directed to the court and a probation counselor;

(vi)
Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations, perform community service,
or any combination thereof;

(vii)
Make restitution to the victim for the cost of any counseling reasonably
related to the offense;

(viii)
Comply with the conditions of any court-ordered probation bond; or

(ix)
The court shall order that the offender may not attend the public or approved
private elementary, middle, or high school attended by the victim or the
victim's siblings. The parents or legal guardians of the offender are
responsible for transportation or other costs associated with the offender's
change of school that would otherwise be paid by the school district. The court
shall send notice of the disposition and restriction on attending the same
school as the victim or victim's siblings to the public or approved private
school the juvenile will attend, if known, or if unknown, to the approved
private schools and the public school district board of directors of the
district in which the juvenile resides or intends to reside. This notice must
be sent at the earliest possible date but not later than ten calendar days
after entry of the disposition.

The
sex offender treatment provider shall submit quarterly reports on the
respondent's progress in treatment to the court and the parties. The reports
shall reference the treatment plan and include at a minimum the following:
Dates of attendance, respondent's compliance with requirements, treatment
activities, the respondent's relative progress in treatment, and any other
material specified by the court at the time of the disposition.

At
the time of the disposition, the court may set treatment review hearings as the
court considers appropriate.

Except
as provided in this subsection (((4))) (3), after July 1, 1991,
examinations and treatment ordered pursuant to this subsection shall only be
conducted by sex offender treatment providers certified by the department of
health pursuant to chapter 18.155 RCW. A sex offender therapist who examines
or treats a juvenile sex offender pursuant to this subsection does not have to
be certified by the department of health pursuant to chapter 18.155 RCW if the
court finds that: (A) The offender has already moved to another state or plans
to move to another state for reasons other than circumventing the certification
requirements; (B) no certified providers are available for treatment within a
reasonable geographical distance of the offender's home; and (C) the evaluation
and treatment plan comply with this subsection (((4))) (3) and
the rules adopted by the department of health.

If
the offender violates any condition of the disposition or the court finds that
the respondent is failing to make satisfactory progress in treatment, the court
may revoke the suspension and order execution of the disposition or the court
may impose a penalty of up to thirty days' confinement for violating conditions
of the disposition. The court may order both execution of the disposition and
up to thirty days' confinement for the violation of the conditions of the
disposition. The court shall give credit for any confinement time previously
served if that confinement was for the offense for which the suspension is being
revoked.

For
purposes of this section, "victim" means any person who has sustained
emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or property
as a direct result of the crime charged. "Victim" may also include a
known parent or guardian of a victim who is a minor child unless the parent or
guardian is the perpetrator of the offense.

A
disposition entered under this subsection (((4))) (3) is not
appealable under RCW 13.40.230.

(((5)))
(4) If the juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition
of local sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not committed an A-
or B+ offense, the court may impose the disposition alternative under RCW
13.40.165.

(5)
If the juvenile offender has not been previously committed to a state
institution, but is presently subject to a standard range disposition of
confinement to a state institution and has not committed a sex offense, a
serious violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, or other violent category
A felony as defined in RCW 13.40.0357, the court may impose a community
sanction disposition alternative under section 4 of this act.

(6)
RCW 13.40.193 shall govern the disposition of any juvenile adjudicated of
possessing a firearm in violation of RCW 9.41.040(1)(b)(iii) or any crime in
which a special finding is entered that the juvenile was armed with a firearm.

(7)
Whenever a juvenile offender is entitled to credit for time spent in detention
prior to a dispositional order, the dispositional order shall specifically state
the number of days of credit for time served.

(8)
Except as provided under subsection (3), (4), or (5) of this
section or RCW 13.40.127, the court shall not suspend or defer the imposition
or the execution of the disposition.

(9)
In no case shall the term of confinement imposed by the court at disposition
exceed that to which an adult could be subjected for the same offense.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
When a juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition of
confinement to a state institution and has not been previously committed to a
state institution, the court, on its own motion or on the motion of the state
or the respondent may order a community sanction disposition alternative in
lieu of confinement in a state institution if the offender has not committed a
sex offense, a serious violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, or other
violent category A felony as defined in RCW 13.40.0357.

(2)
In determining whether to order a community sanction disposition, the court
shall assess the risk to the public safety and the probability of the
offender's rehabilitation in the community. If a victim wishes to voice his or
her opinion regarding the appropriateness of a community sanction disposition,
the court shall hear and give great weight to the testimony of any victim who
expresses the opinion. The court may not impose the community sanction
disposition alternative unless a finding of mitigating circumstances under RCW
13.40.150 is entered. If the court determines that a community sanction
disposition alternative is appropriate, the court shall impose the standard
range for the offense, suspend execution of the disposition, and place the
offender on community supervision for a term not to exceed twelve months.

(3)
As a condition of the suspended disposition, the court shall impose conditions
of community sanctions including 0 to 30 days of confinement, up to one hundred
fifty hours of community service, and the payment of legal financial
obligations and restitution. The court may also require the offender to
participate in rehabilitation programming in the community including school,
employment, vocational programs, or outpatient mental health or substance abuse
treatment. Required rehabilitative programs should be research-based and use
the best practices available.

(4)
At the time of the disposition, the court may set review hearings as the court
deems appropriate.

(5)
If the offender violates any conditions of the community sanction disposition,
the court may impose sanctions under RCW 13.40.200, or may revoke the suspended
disposition and order execution of the standard range disposition.

(6)
If the court revokes the suspended sentence, the court shall give credit for
any confinement time previously served. Whenever a juvenile offender is
entitled to credit for time spent in detention, the dispositional order shall
specifically state the number of days of credit for time served.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW to read as follows:

The
juvenile rehabilitation administration, in consultation with the Washington
association of juvenile courts administrators, shall develop a methodology for
distributing to the counties for the purpose of providing financial assistance
in meeting the processes and services required by chapter 13.32A RCW, and RCW
28A.225.030 and 28A.225.035 from the savings realized by the use of the
community sanction disposition alternative authorized under RCW 13.40.160(5)
and section 4 of this act based on each county's use of that alternative. The
implementation of the distribution established in this section is subject to
appropriation by the legislature. Funding distributed under this section must
be credited to any liability the state has under chapter 43.135 RCW for any
claims resulting from county costs in implementing amendments to chapter 13.32A
RCW and RCW 28A.225.030 and 28A.225.035 enacted during fiscal years 1995
through 1998.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
Sections 1 through 4 of this act apply to crimes committed on or after July 1,
1999.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---