BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
Sections 1 through 9 of this act apply to an order regarding residential time
with a child issued:

(1)
After the effective date of this act; and

(2)
Before the effective date of this act, if the court has modified the parenting
plan to require the notification required in section 5 of this act. A party
may move to modify a parenting plan to comply with section 5 of this act
without a showing of substantial change of circumstances.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
Except as provided in section 4 of this act, a party entitled to residential
time with a child under a temporary or permanent parenting plan shall notify
every other party entitled to residential time with the child of an intended
change of residence as required in section 3 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section or section 4 of this act,
notice of an intended change of residence must be given:

(a)
By personal service or by any form of mail requiring a return receipt to the
last known address of the party to be notified; and

(b)
No later than:

(i)
Sixty days before the date of the intended change of residence; or

(ii)
Ten days after the date that the party knows the information required to be
furnished under subsection (2) of this section, if the party did not know and
could not reasonably have known the information in sufficient time to comply
with the sixty-day notice.

(2)
Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section and section 4 of this act,
the following information, if available, shall be included with the notice of
intended change of residence:

(a)
The intended new residence, including the specific address, if known. However,
the physical location of any confidential shelter shall not be disclosed;

(b)
The mailing address, if not the same as that of the intended new residence;

(c)
The home telephone number, if known;

(d)
The date of the intended move;

(e)
A proposal for a revised schedule of residential time with the child, if
necessary; and

(f)
A warning to the nonrelocating parent that a proceeding objecting to the
proposed relocation must be filed with the court within thirty days or the
relocation will go forward.

(3)
A party required to give notice of an intended change of residence under this
section has a continuing duty to provide notice of a change in or addition to
the information required by this section as that information becomes known.

(4)
If a party required to give notice of an intended change of residence already
has a court-authorized confidential address or other court order which permits
that party to withhold some or all of the required information listed in this
section, or if under the parenting plan a party is permitted to keep some of
this information confidential from the other party, that party's notice of
intended change of residence need only include that information to which the
other party is entitled.

(5)
Failure to provide every other party with notice of information regarding an
intended change of residence may result in a finding of contempt of court. A
finding of contempt may be punished by state law regarding penalties for
contempt.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
Notice under section 3 of this act shall not be required if:

(1)
The health or safety of a person or a child would be unreasonably placed at
risk by notice;

(2)
The party is entering a domestic violence shelter because of the danger posed
by the other party; or

(3)
The intended change of residence would not affect the residential schedule.
However, a party must provide notice on or before the date of the intended
change of residence by any reasonable means.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. After
the effective date of this act, a parenting plan must include the following
notice:

"Each
party in this action is ordered to notify every other party to this action of
an intended change of residence and the following information:

(1)
The intended new residence, including the specific address, if known. However,
the physical location of any confidential shelter shall not be disclosed;

(2)
The mailing address, if not the same as that of the intended new residence;

(3)
The home telephone number, if known;

(4)
The date of the intended move;

(5)
A proposal for a revised schedule of residential time with the child, if
necessary; and

(6)
A warning which states: THE RELOCATION WILL GO FORWARD UNLESS YOU FILE A
PROCEEDING WITH THE COURT WITHIN THIRTY DAYS.

If,
under this parenting plan, you are permitted to keep some of this information
confidential from the other party, or you have a court-authorized confidential
address or other court order which permits you to withhold some or all of the
required information listed above, your notice of the intended change of
residence need only include that information to which the other party is
entitled.

Notice
of an intended change of residence and disclosure of the above-listed
information shall not be required if: (a) The health or safety of yourself or
your child would be unreasonably placed at risk by notice; (b) you are entering
a domestic violence shelter because of the danger posed by the other party; or
(c) the intended change of residence would not affect the residential
schedule. However, you must provide notice on or before the date of the
intended change of residence by any reasonable means.

Each
party is ordered to give notice no later than sixty days before an intended
change of residence. If you do not know and could not reasonably have known of
the change in sufficient time to provide sixty days' notice, you are ordered to
give notice of the change no later than ten days after the date that you know
of the change.

The
obligation to furnish this information to every other party continues as long
as a party is entitled to residential time with a child covered by this order.

Failure
to obey the order of this court to provide every other party with notice of
information regarding an intended change of residence may result in a finding
of contempt of court. A finding of contempt may be punished by state law
regarding penalties for contempt."

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. (1)
Within thirty days after receiving notice under section 3 of this act, the
parent opposing relocation may file a petition to prevent relocation of the
parent and child.

(2)
STANDARD TO BE APPLIED BY COURTS.

(a)
If the parent proposing relocation of a child has sole decision-making authority
or shares joint decision making and has primary residential time, the court
shall restrict a proposed relocation of that parent and child only if the
parent opposing the relocation demonstrates and the court finds that:

(i)
The disruption in contact with the nonprimary residential care provider would
be more detrimental to the child than the disruption in contact with the
primary residential care provider that would result if the child were not
permitted to relocate with that parent; and

(ii)(A)
The purpose of the proposed relocation is to thwart the relationship between
the nonprimary residential parent and the child; or

(B)
The detriment to the child of the proposed relocation is beyond the normal
distress suffered because of travel, infrequent contact of a parent, or other
hardships which predictably result from a dissolution of marriage or
relocation.

(b)
If the party proposing relocation of a child has joint decision-making
authority and has substantially equal residential time, in determining whether
to restrict a parent's right to relocate with a child or in determining a
modification of the parenting plan based on the proposed relocation, the court
shall make a determination in the best interests of the child considering the
factors set forth in RCW 26.09.187(3)(a) as well as following factors:

(i)
The existence of a limitation under RCW 26.09.191;

(ii)
The relative detriment to be suffered by the child if separated from either
parent;

(iii)
Whether the purpose of the move is to thwart the relationship between the other
parent and child;

(iv)
The nature and extent of the child's relationship with each parent, and the
disruption that the proposed relocation of the child or the prevention of the
relocation of the child will have on that relationship;

(v)
The availability of alternative arrangements to foster and continue the child's
relationship with and access to the other parent; and

(vi)
The resources and opportunities available to the relocating party, the
objecting party, and the child in each geographic location.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
Pending the determination by the court of a petition to prevent relocation of
the parent and child:

(1)
A parent with sole decision-making authority or a parent with joint decision
making and primary residential time shall be allowed to temporarily relocate
with the child unless the court issues an order preventing the temporary
relocation using the standard set forth in section 6(2)(a) of this act.

(2)
A parent who shares joint decision making and has substantially equal
residential time may temporarily relocate with the child only if both parents
execute a written agreement to permit relocation of the child or the court
issues an order permitting the temporary relocation using the standard set
forth in section 6(2)(b) of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. If no
objection is filed under section 6 of this act and no subsequent order is
entered modifying the residential schedule, the relocating parent's compliance
with the schedule proposed under section 3(2)(e) of this act shall be evidence
of good faith and a defense to any claim of contempt or custodial interference.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. (1)
Within thirty days after receiving notice under section 3 of this act, a third
party entitled to visitation under a court order may file a petition in court
to modify visitation based on the relocation of the parent.

(2)
When considering modification of third-party visitation based on a parent's
relocation, the court shall make a determination in the best interests of the
child considering the following factors:

(a)
The reasonableness of the proposed revised visitation schedules of both
parties; and

(b)
The amount of contact and nature of relationship between the child and the
third party.

The
court should not interfere with the autonomy and relationship between the
parent and the child except to the limited extent necessary to preserve the
relationship between the child and third party.

(3)
Nothing in this section allows a court to restrict the right of a parent to
relocate with the child based on the objection of a third party entitled to
visitation with the child.

(4)
Pending the determination by the court of a petition to modify a third-party
visitation schedule, the parent may relocate with the child.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. The
time for hearing cases involving relocations or proposed relocations of
children, including any pending related matters, shall be given priority by the
court, and trial dates for such cases shall be expedited.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11.
Sections 1 through 10 of this act are each added to chapter 26.09 RCW.

---
END ---