BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.77.270 and 1997 c 182 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The governing body of a city or county, or a designee, shall grant an
application for a permit under RCW 70.77.260(1) if the application meets the
standards under this chapter, and the applicable ordinances of the city or
county. The permit shall be granted by June 10, or no less than thirty days
after receipt of an application whichever date occurs first, for sales
commencing on June 28 and on December 27; or by December 10, or no less than thirty
days after receipt of an application whichever date occurs first, for sales
commencing only on December 27.

(2)
The chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire
protection, shall prescribe ((uniform)) minimum, state-wide standards
for retail fireworks stands including, but not limited to, the location of the
stands, setback requirements and siting of the stands, types of buildings and
construction material that may be used for the stands, use of the stands and
areas around the stands, cleanup of the area around the stands, transportation
of fireworks to and from the stands, and temporary storage of fireworks
associated with the retail fireworks stands. However, tents, canopies, and
temporary membrane materials may not be used for temporary fireworks stands,
and customers may not be permitted in a temporary or permanent fireworks stand.
All cities and counties which allow retail fireworks sales shall comply with
these standards.

(3)
No retail fireworks permit may be issued to any applicant unless the retail
fireworks stand is covered by a liability insurance policy with coverage of not
less than fifty thousand dollars and five hundred thousand dollars for bodily
injury liability for each person and occurrence, respectively, and not less
than fifty thousand dollars for property damage liability for each occurrence,
unless such insurance is not readily available from at least three approved
insurance companies. If insurance in this amount is not offered, each
fireworks permit shall be covered by a liability insurance policy in the
maximum amount offered by at least three different approved insurance
companies.

No
wholesaler may knowingly sell or supply fireworks to any retail fireworks stand
unless the wholesaler determines that the retail fireworks stand is covered by
liability insurance in the same amount as provided in this subsection.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect June 1, 1999.

---
END ---