BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
76.09.030 and 1995 c 399 s 207 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is hereby created the forest practices board of the state of Washington
as an agency of state government consisting of members as follows:

(a)
The commissioner of public lands or the commissioner's designee;

(b)
The director of the department of community, trade, and economic development or
the director's designee;

(c)
The director of the department of agriculture or the director's designee;

(d)
The director of the department of ecology or the director's designee;

(e) An
elected member of a county legislative authority appointed by the governor exclusively
from one list of three persons provided by the Washington state association of
counties: PROVIDED, That such member's service on the board shall be
conditioned on the member's continued service as an elected county official;
and

(f)
Six members of the general public appointed by the governor, one of whom shall
be an owner of not more than five hundred acres of forest land, and one of whom
shall be an independent logging contractor.

(2) ((The
members of the initial board appointed by the governor shall be appointed so
that the term of one member shall expire December 31, 1975, the term of one
member shall expire December 31, 1976, the term of one member shall expire
December 31, 1977, the terms of two members shall expire December 31, 1978, and
the terms of two members shall expire December 31, 1979. Thereafter,)) Each
member shall be appointed for a term of four years. Vacancies on the board
shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments. Each member
of the board shall continue in office until his or her successor is appointed
and qualified. The commissioner of public lands or the commissioner's designee
shall be the chairman of the board.

(3)
The board shall meet at such times and places as shall be designated by the
chairman or upon the written request of the majority of the board. The
principal office of the board shall be at the state capital.

(4)
Members of the board, except public employees and elected officials, shall be
compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250. Each member shall be entitled to
reimbursement for travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties
as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(5)
The board may employ such clerical help and staff pursuant to chapter 41.06 RCW
as is necessary to carry out its duties.

---
END ---