BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.180 RCW to read as follows:

Prevailing
wages, as set forth under chapter 39.12 RCW, are required on all commission
construction projects regardless of the source of funding. The commission
shall require that all bidders on commission construction projects certify in
writing that the submitted bid includes the cost of paying prevailing wages,
and that the bidder understands that prevailing wages are required under this
section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 39.12 RCW to read as follows:

Housing finance commission construction projects, authorized under
chapter 43.180 RCW, are public works for the purpose of requiring prevailing
wages.

---
END ---