BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
10.97.060 and 1977 ex.s. c 314 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Criminal history record information which consists of nonconviction data only
shall be ((subject to deletion)) deleted from all criminal
justice agency files ((which are available and generally searched for the
purpose of responding to inquiries)) concerning the criminal history of a
named or otherwise identified individual ((when two years or longer have
elapsed since)):

(a)
Ninety days after the finding or judgment that makes the record ((became))
nonconviction data as a result of the entry of a disposition favorable to the
defendant((, or)); or

(b)
Upon the passage of three years from the date of arrest or issuance of a
citation or warrant for an offense for which a conviction was not obtained,
unless the defendant is a fugitive((,)) or the case is under active
prosecution according to a current certification made by the prosecuting
attorney.

The
court shall transmit the order to the arresting agency. The arresting agency
shall be responsible for transmitting the order of deletion to any other agency
to which the arresting agency has transmitted the nonconviction data.

(2)
Such criminal history record information consisting of nonconviction data shall
be deleted ((upon the request of the person who is the subject of the record))
ninety days after the finding or judgment that makes the information
nonconviction data: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the criminal justice agency
maintaining the data may, at its option, refuse to make the deletion if:

(((1)))
(a) The disposition was a deferred prosecution or similar diversion of
the alleged offender;

(((2)))
(b) The person who is the subject of the record has had a prior
conviction for a felony or gross misdemeanor;

(((3)))
(c) The individual who is the subject of the record has been arrested
for or charged with another crime during the intervening period.

(3) Nothing in this chapter is intended to restrict the
authority of any court, through appropriate judicial proceedings, to order the
modification or deletion of a record in a particular cause or concerning a
particular individual or event.

---
END ---