BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
LEGISLATIVE INTENT. The legislature finds that part-time workers
are increasing in numbers. Part-time workers often fall outside the state's
basic safety net of job protections. In particular, part-time workers are
excluded from benefit eligibility under state unemployment insurance laws. The
legislature further finds that part-time workers are entitled to benefit
eligibility under state unemployment insurance laws.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
PURPOSE. The purpose of this act is to extend benefit eligibility under state
unemployment insurance laws to part-time workers.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 50.20 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
An individual who limits his or her availability to less than full-time work
shall be eligible for benefits when:

(a)
The individual has been performing less than full-time work during a
substantial portion of the base year or has good cause for such a limitation;
and

(b)
A sufficient amount of suitable work exists in the labor market area to justify
such a limitation.

(2)
For purposes of making a determination of availability under this section, and
deciding any appeal therefrom:

(a)
The individual has the burden of proving that he or she had been performing
less than full-time work during a substantial portion of the base year or had
good cause for any limitation on his or her availability for full-time work;
and

(b)
If the individual meets the burden set forth in (a) of this subsection, the
commissioner has the burden of proving that a sufficient amount of suitable
work did not exist in the labor market area.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
commissioner of the employment security department may adopt rules as necessary
to implement this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. If
any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state or
the eligibility of employers in this state for federal unemployment tax
credits, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent
of the conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the operation
of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by
the state or the granting of federal unemployment tax credits to employers in this
state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6.
Captions used in this act are not part of the law.

---
END ---