BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
19.27.031 and 1995 c 343 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as otherwise provided in this chapter, there shall be in effect in all counties
and cities the state building code, which shall consist of the following
codes ((which are hereby adopted by reference)):

(1)
Uniform Building Code and Uniform Building Code Standards, published by the
International Conference of Building Officials, or a building code published
by a nationally recognized code organization;

(2)
Uniform Mechanical Code, including Chapter 13, fuel gas piping,
((Appendix B,)) published by the International Conference of Building
Officials, or a mechanical code and fuel gas code published by a nationally
recognized code organization;

(3)
The Uniform Fire Code and Uniform Fire Code Standards, published by the
International Fire Code Institute, or a fire code published by a nationally
recognized code organization: PROVIDED, That, notwithstanding any wording
in this code, participants in religious ceremonies shall not be precluded from
carrying hand-held candles;

(4)
Except as provided in RCW 19.27.170, the Uniform Plumbing Code and Uniform
Plumbing Code Standards, published by the International Association of Plumbing
and Mechanical Officials, or a plumbing code published by a nationally
recognized code organization: PROVIDED, That chapters ((11 and 12))
of such code affecting building sewers or fuel gas piping are not
adopted; and

(5)
The rules and regulations adopted by the council establishing standards for
making buildings and facilities accessible to and usable by the physically
handicapped or elderly persons as provided in RCW 70.92.100 through 70.92.160.

In
case of conflict among the codes enumerated in subsections (1), (2), (3), and
(4) of this section, the first named code shall govern over those following.

The
codes enumerated in this section shall be adopted by the council as provided in
RCW 19.27.074.

The council may issue opinions relating to the codes at the request
of a local official charged with the duty to enforce the enumerated codes.

Sec.
2. RCW
19.27.074 and 1989 c 266 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The state building code council shall:

(a)
Adopt and maintain the codes to which reference is made in RCW 19.27.031,
and appropriate standards, in a status which is consistent with the state's
interest as set forth in RCW 19.27.020. In maintaining these codes, the
council shall regularly review updated versions of ((the codes referred to
in RCW 19.27.031)) nationally recognized code publications and other
pertinent information and shall amend the codes as deemed appropriate by the
council;

(b)
Approve or deny all county or city amendments to any code referred to in RCW
19.27.031 to the degree the amendments apply to single family or multifamily residential
buildings;

(c)
As required by the legislature, develop and adopt any codes relating to
buildings; and

(d)
Propose a budget for the operation of the state building code council to be
submitted to the office of financial management pursuant to RCW 43.88.090.

(2)
The state building code council may:

(a)
Appoint technical advisory committees which may include members of the council;

(b)
Employ permanent and temporary staff and contract for services; and

(c)
Conduct research into matters relating to any code or codes referred to in RCW
19.27.031 or any related matter.

All
meetings of the state building code council shall be open to the public under
the open public meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW. All actions of the state
building code council which adopt or amend any code of state-wide applicability
shall be pursuant to the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

All
council decisions relating to the codes enumerated in RCW 19.27.031 shall
require approval by at least a majority of the members of the council.

All decisions to adopt or amend codes of state-wide application
shall be made prior to December 1 of any year and shall not take effect before
the end of the regular legislative session in the next year.

---
END ---