BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.36.025 and 1994 c 179 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

The
motor vehicle fuel tax rate shall be computed as the sum of the tax rate
provided in subsection (1) of this section and the additional tax rates
provided in subsections (2) through (5) of this section.

(1)
A motor vehicle fuel tax rate of seventeen cents per gallon shall apply to the
sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel.

(2)
An additional motor vehicle fuel tax rate of one-third cent per gallon shall
apply to the sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel, and the proceeds
from this additional tax rate, reduced by an amount equal to the sum of the
payments under RCW 46.68.090(1) (a), (b), and (c) multiplied by the additional
tax rate prescribed by this subsection divided by the motor vehicle fuel tax
rate provided in this section, shall be deposited in the rural arterial trust
account in the motor vehicle fund for expenditures under RCW 36.79.020.

(3)
An additional motor vehicle fuel tax rate of one-third cent per gallon shall
apply to the sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel, and the proceeds
from this additional tax rate, reduced by an amount equal to the sum of the
payments under RCW 46.68.090(1) (a), (b), and (c) multiplied by the additional
tax rate prescribed by this subsection divided by the motor vehicle fuel tax
rate provided in this section, shall be deposited in the urban arterial trust
account in the motor vehicle fund. After June 30, 1995, ninety-five percent of
this revenue shall be deposited in the urban arterial trust account in the motor
vehicle fund and five percent shall be deposited in the small city account in
the motor vehicle fund.

(4)
An additional motor vehicle fuel tax rate of one-third cent per gallon shall be
applied to the sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel, and the
proceeds from this additional tax rate, reduced by an amount equal to the sum
of the payments under RCW 46.68.090(1) (a), (b), and (c) multiplied by the
additional tax rate prescribed by this subsection divided by the motor vehicle
fuel tax rate provided in this section, shall be deposited in the motor vehicle
fund to be expended for highway purposes of the state as defined in RCW
46.68.130.

(5)
An additional motor vehicle fuel tax rate of four cents per gallon from April
1, 1990, through March 31, 1991, and five cents per gallon from April 1, 1991,
applies to the sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel. The proceeds
from the additional tax rate under this subsection, reduced by an amount equal
to the sum of the payments under RCW 46.68.090(1) (a), (b), and (c) multiplied
by the additional tax rate prescribed by this subsection divided by the motor
fuel tax rate provided in this section, shall be deposited in the motor vehicle
fund and shall be distributed by the state treasurer according to RCW
46.68.095.

(6) An additional motor vehicle fuel tax rate of one cent per
gallon applies to the sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel. The
proceeds from this additional tax rate shall be distributed to the Washington
state patrol and Washington state department of transportation for the purposes
of achieving employee salary and benefits equalization with the private and
public sectors that perform similar duties. The department of personnel shall
conduct and determine the salary and benefits equalization. The proceeds from
this motor vehicle fuel tax are in addition to and do not supplant existing
funding for Washington state patrol and Washington state department of
transportation employee salaries and benefits.

---
END ---