BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.94A.320 and 1998 c 290 s 4, 1998 c 219 s 4, 1998 c 82 s 1, and 1998 c 78 s 1
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVAggravated Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XIVMurder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

Homicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

XIIIMurder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

Malicious explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1 (RCW
70.74.270(1))

XIIAssault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW
70.74.272(1)(a))

XIRape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

Manslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)

XKidnapping 1 (RCW
9A.40.020)

Child Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Over 18 and deliver heroin, a narcotic from Schedule
I or II, or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Indecent Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW
9A.44.100(1)(a))

Manufacture of methamphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

IXAssault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Malicious placement of an explosive 2 (RCW
70.74.270(2))

Over 18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV,
or V or a nonnarcotic, except flunitrazepam, from Schedule I-V to someone under
18 and 3 years junior (RCW 69.50.406)

Controlled Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW
9.68A.040)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Vehicular Homicide, by being under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)

Homicide by Watercraft, by being under the influence
of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 88.12.029)

VIIIArson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Promoting Prostitution 1
(RCW 9A.88.070)

Selling for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any
controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver heroin or cocaine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Deliver or possess with intent to deliver
methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver amphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Possession of ephedrine or pseudoephedrine with
intent to manufacture methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle
in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

Homicide by Watercraft, by the operation of any
vessel in a reckless manner (RCW 88.12.029)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

VIIBurglary 1 (RCW
9A.52.020)

Vehicular Homicide, by
disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)

Homicide by Watercraft, by
disregard for the safety of others (RCW 88.12.029)

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible compulsion)
(RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Dealing in depictions of minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Sending, bringing into
state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.060)

Involving a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.401(f))

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in the first degree
(RCW 9.41.040(1)(a))

Malicious placement of an explosive 3 (RCW
70.74.270(3))

Use of a Machine Gun in Commission of a Felony
(RCW 9.41.225)

VIBribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110,
9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW
70.74.272(1)(b))

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II (except heroin or cocaine) or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW
9A.72.160)

Bail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(a))

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

VPersistent prison
misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW
9A.42.020)

Abandonment of dependent
person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Extortionate Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Advancing money or property for extortionate
extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Extortionate Means to Collect Extensions of Credit
(RCW 9A.82.040)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Bail Jumping with class A Felony (RCW
9A.76.170(2)(b))

Sexually Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

Delivery of imitation controlled substance by person
eighteen or over to person under eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

No-Contact Order Violation: Domestic Violence
Pretrial Condition (RCW 10.99.040(4) (b) and (c))

No-Contact Order Violation: Domestic Violence
Sentence Condition (RCW 10.99.050(2))

Protection Order Violation: Domestic Violence
Civil Action (RCW 26.50.110 (4) and (5))

IVResidential Burglary (RCW
9A.52.025)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW
9A.56.080)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Commercial Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW
9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Malicious Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Willful Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW
72.66.060)

Hit and Run‑-Injury Accident (RCW
46.52.020(4))

Hit and Run with Vessel‑-Injury Accident (RCW
88.12.155(3))

Vehicular Assault (RCW 46.61.522)

Assault by Watercraft (RCW 88.12.032)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V
(except marijuana, amphetamine, methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))

Influencing Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW
9A.82.070)

Use of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW
9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Knowingly Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW
9A.82.050(2))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under Age Fourteen
(subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

IIICriminal Gang
Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Criminal Mistreatment 2
(RCW 9A.42.030)

Abandonment of dependent
person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Extortion 2 (RCW
9A.56.130)

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Assault 3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the second degree
(RCW 9.41.040(1)(b))

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)

Willful Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW
72.65.070)

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Communication with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Patronizing a Juvenile Prostitute (RCW 9.68A.100)

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW
9A.76.170(2)(c))

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Tampering with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Delivery of a material in lieu of a controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.401(c))

Manufacture, distribute, or possess with intent to
distribute an imitation controlled substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

Recklessly Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW
9A.82.050(1))

Theft of livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Securities Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)

Maintaining a Dwelling or Place for
Controlled Substances (RCW 69.50.402(a)(6))

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property (RCW
81.60.070)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled
Shotgun or Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent conviction or
threat of death) (RCW 9.61.230)

Unlawful Use of Building for Drug Purposes (RCW
69.53.010)

IIUnlawful Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

((Class B Felony)) Theft of Rental, Leased,
or Lease-purchased Property (valued at one thousand five hundred dollars or
more) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW
18.130.190(7))

Health Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Possession of controlled substance that is either
heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV
(RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession of phencyclidine (PCP) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Create, deliver, or possess a counterfeit controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.401(b))

Computer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Escape from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

ITheft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

((Class C Felony))
Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property (valued at two hundred
fifty dollars or more but less than one thousand five hundred dollars) (RCW
9A.56.096(4))

Possession of Stolen
Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission (RCW
9A.56.070)

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Attempting to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW
46.61.024)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW
9A.56.060)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.140 (2) and
(3))

False Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forged Prescription (RCW 69.41.020)

Forged Prescription for a Controlled Substance (RCW
69.50.403)

Possess Controlled Substance that is a Narcotic from
Schedule III, IV, or V or Non-narcotic from Schedule I-V (except phencyclidine
or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Sec.
2. RCW
81.60.070 and 1992 c 7 s 60 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
person who, in such manner as might, if not discovered, endanger the safety of
any engine, motor, car or train, or any person thereon, shall in any manner
interfere or tamper with or obstruct any switch, frog, rail, roadbed, sleeper,
viaduct, bridge, trestle, culvert, embankment, structure, or appliance pertaining
to or connected with any railway, or any train, engine, motor, or car on such
railway, and every person who shall discharge any firearm or throw any
dangerous missile at any train, engine, motor, or car on any railway, shall be
punished by imprisonment in a state correctional facility for not more than ((twenty-five))
ten years.

Sec.
3. RCW
9.40.120 and 1971 ex.s. c 302 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
person who possesses, manufactures, or disposes of an incendiary device knowing
it to be such is guilty of a felony, and upon conviction, shall be punished by
imprisonment in a state prison for a term of not more than ((twenty-five))
ten years.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
code reviser shall alphabetize the offenses within each seriousness level in
RCW 9.94A.320, including any offenses added in the 1999 legislative session.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
amendments made by this act shall apply to offenses committed on or after July
1, 1999.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---