BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.19A.010 and 1992 c 174 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Compost products" means mulch, soil amendments, ground cover, or
other landscaping material derived from the biological or mechanical conversion
of biosolids or cellulose-containing waste materials.

(2)
"Department" means the department of general administration.

(3)
"Director" means the director of the department of general
administration.

(4)
"Local government" means a city, town, county, special purpose
district, school district, or other municipal corporation.

(5)
"Lubricating oil" means petroleum-based oils for reducing friction in
engine parts and other mechanical parts.

(6)
"Mixed waste paper" means assorted low-value grades of paper that
have not been separated into individual grades of paper at the point of
collection.

(7)
"Municipal sewage sludge" means a semisolid substance consisting of
settled sewage solids combined with varying amounts of water and dissolved
materials generated from a publicly owned wastewater treatment plant.

(8)
"Biosolids" means municipal sewage sludge or septic tank septage
sludge that meets the requirements of chapter 70.95J RCW.

(9)
"Paper and paper products" means all items manufactured from paper or
paperboard.

(10)
"Postconsumer waste" means a material or product that has served its
intended use and has been discarded for disposal or recovery by a final
consumer.

(11)
"Procurement officer" means the person that has the primary
responsibility for procurement of materials or products.

(12)
"State agency" means all units of state government, including
divisions of the governor's office, the legislature, the judiciary, state
agencies and departments, correctional institutions, vocational technical institutions,
and universities and colleges.

(13)
"Recycled content product" or "recycled product" means a
product containing recycled materials.

(14)
"Recycled materials" means waste materials and by-products that have
been recovered or diverted from solid waste and that can be utilized in place
of a raw or virgin material in manufacturing a product and consists of
materials derived from postconsumer waste, manufacturing waste, industrial
scrap, agricultural wastes, and other items, all of which can be used in the
manufacture of new or recycled products.

(15)
"Re-refined oils" means used lubricating oils from which the physical
and chemical contaminants acquired through previous use have been removed
through a refining process. Re-refining may include distillation,
hydrotreating, or treatments employing acid, caustic, solvent, clay, or other
chemicals, or other physical treatments other than those used in reclaiming.

(16)
"State procurement officer" or "officer" means the
person designated by the director under section 7 of this act.

(17)
"USEPA product standards" means the product standards of the United
States environmental protection agency for recycled content published in the
code of federal regulations.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.19A.020 and 1996 c 198 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The USEPA product standards, as now or hereafter amended, are adopted as the
minimum standards for the state of Washington. These standards shall be
implemented for at least the products listed in (a) and (b) of this subsection
by the dates indicated, unless the ((director)) state procurement
officer finds that a different standard would significantly increase
recycled product availability or competition.

(a)
By July 1, 1997:

(i)
Paper and paper products;

(ii)
Organic recovered materials; and

(iii)
Latex paint products;

(b)
By July 1, 1997:

(i)
Products for lower value uses containing recycled plastics;

(ii)
Retread and remanufactured tires;

(iii)
Lubricating oils;

(iv)
Automotive batteries;

(v)
Building insulation;

(vi)
Panelboard; and

(vii)
Compost products.

(2)
The standards required by this section shall be applied to recycled product
purchasing by the department and other state agencies. The standards may be
adopted or applied by any other local government in product procurement. The
standards shall provide for exceptions under appropriate circumstances to allow
purchases of recycled products that do not meet the minimum content
requirements of the standards.

Sec.
3. RCW
43.19A.030 and 1998 c 245 s 57 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
By January 1, 1993, each local government shall review its existing procurement
policies and specifications to determine whether recycled products are
intentionally or unintentionally excluded. The policies and specifications
shall be revised to include such products unless a recycled content product
does not meet an established performance standard of the agency.

(2)
By fiscal year 1994, each local government shall adopt a minimum purchasing
goal for recycled content as a percentage of the total dollar value of supplies
purchased. To assist in achieving this goal each local government shall adopt
a strategy by January 1, 1993, and shall submit a description of the strategy
to the department. All public agencies shall respond to requests for information
from the department for the purpose of its reporting requirements under this
section.

(3)
Each local government shall designate a procurement officer who shall serve as
the primary contact with the department for compliance with the requirements of
this chapter.

(4)
This section shall apply only to local governments with expenditures for
supplies exceeding five hundred thousand dollars for fiscal year 1989.
Expenditures for capital goods and for electricity, water, or gas for resale
shall not be considered a supply expenditure.

(5)
The state procurement officer shall conduct a survey of those local governments
to which this section applies regarding revisions in procurement policies and
specifications, adoption of recycled content product procurement goals, and
adoption of preferential purchase policies authorized by RCW 43.19A.040. The
officer shall ensure that the survey includes current procurement policies and
experience in reaching the local government's goals. The officer shall report
the results of the survey to the environmental and state and local government
committees of the house of representatives and the senate not later than
December 31, 2000.

Sec.
4. RCW
43.19A.050 and 1996 c 198 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
((department)) state procurement officer shall prepare a strategy
to increase purchases of recycled-content products by the department and all
state agencies, including higher education institutions. The strategy shall
include purchases from public works contracts. The strategy shall address the
purchase of plastic products, retread and remanufactured tires, motor vehicle
lubricants, latex paint, and lead acid batteries having recycled content. In
addition, the strategy shall incorporate actions to achieve the following
purchase level goals of recycled content paper and compost products:

(1)
Paper products as a percentage of the total dollar amount purchased on an
annual basis:

(a)
At least sixty percent by 1996;

(b)
At least seventy percent by 1997;

(c)
At least eighty percent by 1998.

(2)
Compost products as a percentage of the total dollar amount on an annual basis:

(a)
At least forty percent by 1996;

(b)
At least sixty percent by 1997;

(c)
At least eighty percent by 1998.

Sec.
5. RCW
43.19A.070 and 1991 c 297 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The ((department)) state procurement officer shall implement an
education program to encourage maximum procurement of recycled products by
state and local government entities. The program shall include at least the
following:

(a)
Technical assistance to all state and local governments and their designated
procurement officers on the requirements of this chapter, including preparation
of model purchase contracts, the preparation of procurement plans, and the
availability of recycled products;

(b)
Two or more workshops annually in which all state and local government entities
are invited;

(c)
Information on intergovernmental agreements to facilitate procurement of
recycled products.

(2)
The ((director)) state procurement officer shall, in consultation
with the department of ecology, make available to the public, local
jurisdictions, and the private sector, a comprehensive list of substitutes for extremely
hazardous, hazardous, toxic, and nonrecyclable products, and disposable
products intended for a single use. The department and all state agencies
exercising the purchasing authorities of the department shall include the
substitute products on bid notifications, except where the department allows an
exception based upon product availability, price, suitability for intended use,
or similar reasons.

(3)
The ((department)) state procurement officer shall prepare model
procurement guidelines for use by local governments.

Sec.
6. RCW
43.19A.060 and 1991 c 297 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall develop a data base of available products with
recycled-content products, and vendors supplying such products. The data base
shall incorporate information regarding product consistency with the content
standards adopted under RCW 43.19A.020. The data base shall incorporate
information developed through state and local government procurement of recycled-content
products. The state procurement officer shall survey existing research and
literature on product performance and use such information to periodically
update the data base.

(2)
By December 1, 1992, the department shall report to the appropriate standing
committees of the legislature on the cost of making the data base accessible to
all state and local governments and to the private sector.

(3)
The department shall compile information on purchases made by the department or
pursuant to the department's purchasing authority, and information provided by
local governments, regarding:

(a)
The percentage of recycled content and, if known, the amount of postconsumer
waste in the products purchased;

(b)
Price;

(c)
Agency experience with the performance of recycled products and the supplier
under the terms of the purchase; and

(d)
Any other information deemed appropriate by the department.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 43.19A RCW to read as follows:

From within existing staff of the department on the effective date
of this act, the director shall designate a state procurement officer. The
officer shall be responsible for administering the department's recycled
content product procurement duties under this chapter.

---
END ---