BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales, after April 21, 1997,
of machinery and equipment, as described in 47 C.F.R. Part 73 as it exists on
the effective date of this section, designed to enable a television station to
originate and broadcast or to receive and broadcast digital television signals
and if the machinery and equipment is purchased to comply with the
telecommunications act of 1996, 47 U.S.C. Sec. 336 as it exists on the
effective date of this section. In addition the tax levied by RCW 82.08.020
shall not apply to charges made for labor and services rendered in respect to
installing machinery and equipment exempted under this section.

(2)
The exemption in this section does not apply to the following:

(a)
Repair or replacement parts purchased for machinery or equipment exempt under
this section;

(b)
Machinery and equipment purchased to replace machinery or equipment previously
exempted under this section; or

(c)
Machinery or equipment purchased after the television station has ceased analog
broadcasting.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The tax imposed by this chapter shall not apply to the use, after April 21,
1997, of machinery and equipment, as described in 47 C.F.R. Part 73 as it
exists on the effective date of this section, designed to enable a television
station to originate and broadcast or to receive and broadcast digital
television signals and to comply with the telecommunications act of 1996, 47
U.S.C. Sec. 336 as it exists on the effective date of this section.

(2)
The exemption in this section does not apply to the following:

(a)
Repair or replacement parts used for the machinery or equipment exempt under
this section;

(b)
Machinery and equipment used to replace machinery or equipment previously
exempted under this section; or

(c)
Machinery or equipment used after the television station has ceased analog
broadcasting.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act expires June 30, 2006.

---
END ---