BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 35.13A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Prior to a city legislative body adopting a resolution or ordinance assuming
all or part of a district, the city shall prepare a study which discusses
financial, operational, and physical aspects of the proposed full or partial
assumption. Within thirty days of a city's request, the district shall provide
copies of all documents, including but not limited to drafts and interagency
memoranda, records, information, and data identified by the city as necessary
for preparation of the study. The public disclosure act, including the
exemptions from disclosure, does not apply to a city's request under this
section.

(2)
Following completion, the city shall make the study available for public review
by providing copies at public offices and libraries designated by the city and
located within or near the proposed assumption area. Prior to adoption of a
resolution or ordinance under this chapter assuming all or part of a district,
the legislative body of the city shall hold a public hearing to gather public
comments on the proposed assumption. Upon conclusion of the public hearing,
the city's legislative body may adopt a resolution or ordinance assuming all or
part of a district, as provided by this chapter.

(3)
The procedures in this chapter shall be the only process applicable to a city
or town's assumption of jurisdiction over a water-sewer district. The action
of a city council adopting a resolution or ordinance assuming jurisdiction
shall be final and conclusive unless a vote is required under RCW 35.13A.050 or
pursuant to a referendum petition where the assuming city or town has provided
for a referendum under RCW 35.17.230, 35.22.200, 35A.11.080, or 35A.29.170.

Sec.
2. RCW
35.13A.020 and 1998 c 326 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever all of the territory of a water‑sewer district is included
within the corporate boundaries of a city, the city legislative body may adopt
a resolution or ordinance to assume jurisdiction over all of the district.

(2)
Upon the effective date of the assumption ordinance or resolution,
the district shall be dissolved to the same extent as if pursuant to a
superior court order of dissolution under RCW 35.13A.080. Furthermore, upon
the effective date of the assumption ordinance or resolution, all real and
personal property, franchises, rights, assets, taxes levied but not collected
for the district for other than indebtedness, water, sewer, and drainage
facilities, and all other facilities and equipment of the district shall become
the property of the city subject to all financial, statutory, or contractual
obligations of the district for the security or performance of which the
property may have been pledged. The city, in addition to its other powers,
shall have the power to manage, control, maintain, and operate the property,
facilities and equipment and to fix and collect service and other charges from
owners and occupants of properties so served by the city, subject, however, to
any outstanding indebtedness, bonded or otherwise, of the district payable from
taxes, assessments, or revenues of any kind or nature and to any other
contractual obligations of the district.

(((3)
The city may by resolution or ordinance of its legislative body, assume the
obligation of paying such district indebtedness and of levying and of
collecting or causing to be collected the district taxes, assessments, and
utility rates and charges of any kind or nature to pay and secure the payment
of the indebtedness, according to all of the terms, conditions and covenants
incident to the indebtedness, and shall assume and perform all other
outstanding contractual obligation of the district in accordance with all of
their terms, conditions, and covenants. An assumption shall not be deemed to
impair the obligation of any indebtedness or other contractual obligation.
During the period until the outstanding indebtedness of the district has been
discharged, the territory of the district and the owners and occupants of
property therein, shall continue to be liable for its and their proportionate
share of the indebtedness, including any outstanding assessments levied within
any local improvement district or utility local improvement district thereof.
The city shall assume the obligation of causing the payment of the district's
indebtedness, collecting the district's taxes, assessments, and charges, and
observing and performing the other district contractual obligations. The
legislative body of the city shall act as the officers of the district for the
purpose of certifying the amount of any property tax to be levied and collected
therein, and causing service and other charges and assessments to be collected
from the property or owners or occupants thereof, enforcing the collection and
performing all other acts necessary to ensure performance of the district's
contractual obligations in the same manner and by the same means as if the
territory of the district had not been included within the boundaries of a city.

When
a city assumes the obligation of paying the outstanding indebtedness, and if
property taxes or assessments have been levied and service and other charges
have accrued for this purpose but have not been collected by the district prior
to the assumption, the same when collected shall belong and be paid to the city
and be used by the city so far as necessary for payment of the indebtedness of
the district existing and unpaid on the date the city assumes the
indebtedness. Any funds received by the city which have been collected for the
purpose of paying any bonded or other indebtedness of the district, shall be
used for the purpose for which they were collected and for no other purpose.
Any outstanding indebtedness shall be paid as provided in the terms,
conditions, and covenants of the indebtedness. All funds of the district on
deposit with the county treasurer at the time of title transfer shall be used
by the city solely for the benefit of the assumed utility and shall not be
transferred to or used for the benefit of the city's general fund.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 35.13A RCW to read as follows:

When
a city assumes the full and complete jurisdiction for an entire district, the
city shall by resolution or ordinance of its legislative body, assume the
obligation of paying any district indebtedness and of levying and collecting or
causing to be collected the district taxes, assessments, and utility rates and
charges of any kind or nature to pay and secure the payment of the
indebtedness, according to all of the terms, conditions, and covenants incident
to the indebtedness, and shall assume and perform all other outstanding
contractual obligations of the district in accordance with all of their terms,
conditions, and covenants, except as provided by the following: A district may
not take any action that would establish or have the effect of establishing
different contractual obligations, requirements for retiring indebtedness,
authority to issue debt in parity with the district's existing outstanding
indebtedness, rates of compensation, or terms of employment contracts, if a
city assumes jurisdiction of all or a portion of the district. Should any such
obligations, requirements, terms or provisions be enacted by a district, they
shall not be binding on a city which assumes or attempts to assume the
district. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a district
from issuing obligations on a parity with its outstanding obligations, to
repeat terms and conditions of obligations provided with respect to earlier
parity obligations, or to provide covenants that are customary for obligations
of similar utilities whether those utilities are operated by cities or special
purpose districts, provided such obligations do not establish or have the
effect of establishing different contractual obligations, requirements for
retiring indebtedness, authority to issue debt, rates of compensation, or terms
of contracts or covenants in the event the district is assumed by a city.

When
a city assumes only a portion of a district under this chapter, it shall assume
the responsibility for the proportionate share of district indebtedness for the
area and properties which are assumed. Following the effective date of the
assumption, the district may not issue new debt or contractual obligations that
would be binding on the property, its owners, and occupants within the area
that has been assumed by the city under this provision.

An
assumption shall not be deemed to impair the obligation of any indebtedness or
other contractual obligation, except as provided in this section. During the
period until the outstanding indebtedness of the district has been discharged,
the territory of the district, and the owners and occupants of property
therein, shall continue to be liable for it and their proportionate share of
the indebtedness, including any outstanding assessments levied within any local
improvement district or utility local improvement district thereof. The city
shall assume the obligation of causing the full or proportionate share of the
payment of the district's indebtedness, collecting the district's taxes,
assessments, and charges, and observing and performing the other district's
contractual obligations. The legislative body of the city shall act as the
officers of the district for the purpose of certifying the amount of any
property tax to be levied within the assumed area and collected therein, and
causing service and other charges and assessments to be collected from the
property or owners or occupants thereof, enforcing the collection, and
performing all other acts necessary to ensure performance of the district's
contractual obligations in the same manner and by the same means as if the
territory of the district had not been included within the boundaries of a
city.

When
a city assumes the obligation of paying the outstanding indebtedness, and if
property taxes or assessments have been levied and service and other charges
have accrued for this purpose, but have not been collected by the district
prior to the assumption, the same when collected shall belong and be paid to
the city and be used by the city so far as necessary for payment of the
indebtedness of the district existing and unpaid on the date the city assumes
the indebtedness. Any funds received by the city which have been collected for
the purpose of paying any bond or other indebtedness of the district shall be
used for the purpose for which they were collected and for no other purpose.
Except as otherwise provided in this section, any outstanding indebtedness
shall be paid as provided in the terms, conditions, and covenants of the
indebtedness. All funds of the district on deposit with the county treasurer
on the effective date of the assumption shall be used by the city solely for
the benefit of the assumed utility and shall not be transferred into the city's
general fund.

If one or more cities initiates an assumption by taking any actions
provided for in this chapter, the district or districts proposed to be assumed
may not spend any district funds on a public relations campaign or lobbying
effort the purpose of which is to generate individual or public opposition to:
(1) Approval of the assumption by a boundary review board or a board of county
commissioners; or (2) the outcome of an election under RCW 35.13A.050 or a
referendum petition, if available. This section shall not be construed as
prohibiting the district or districts from including factual information about
the assumption in monthly bills sent to district ratepayers: PROVIDED, That as
part of any such factual information the district or districts must, at their
own cost, provide the assuming city or cities equal time and space to provide
such supplemental factual information deemed appropriate by the city or cities.

Sec.
4. RCW
35.13A.030 and 1971 ex.s. c 95 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever
a portion of a water-sewer district ((or sewer district)) equal
to at least sixty percent of the area or sixty percent of the assessed
valuation of the real property lying within such district, is included within
the corporate boundaries of a city, the city may assume by ordinance the full
and complete management and control of that portion of the entire district not
included within another city((, whereupon)) or cities or, at the
assuming city's discretion, that portion of the entire district included within
the assuming city or cities and their urban growth area designated under RCW
36.70A.210. If prior to the effective date of the assumption, the cities in which
the district is located have reached an agreement approving of the full and
complete assumption of the district by the city initiating the assumption,
the provisions of RCW 35.13A.020 and section 3 of this act shall be
operative((; or)). In the alternative, the assuming city
may, at its option, proceed directly under the provisions of RCW
35.13A.050.

Sec.
5. RCW
35.13A.050 and 1971 ex.s. c 95 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

When
electing under RCW 35.13A.030 or 35.13A.040 to proceed under this section, the
city may assume, by ordinance, jurisdiction of the district's responsibilities,
property, facilities and equipment within the corporate limits of the city:
PROVIDED, That if on the effective date of such an ordinance the territory of
the district included within the city contains any facilities serving or
designed to serve any portion of the district outside the corporate limits of
the city or if the territory lying within the district and outside the city contains
any facilities serving or designed to serve territory included within the city
(which facilities are hereafter in this section called the "serving
facilities"), the city or district shall for the economically useful life
of any such serving facilities make available sufficient capacity therein to
serve the sewage or water requirements of such territory, to the extent that
such facilities were designed to serve such territory at a rate charged to the
municipality being served which is reasonable to all parties.

Alternatives
and provisions for serving facilities and rates charged to the municipality
being served shall be evaluated in the study required in section 1 of this
act. The city and the district shall enter into a contract, consistent with
RCW 35.13A.070, for the operation, maintenance, and cost sharing for the
serving facilities as well as for the division of assets, liabilities,
employees, debt, and other contractual obligations relative to the area being
assumed by the city. In the event that no agreement by good faith
negotiations, including mediation where appropriate, can be reached between the
city and the district within one hundred eighty calendar days from the adoption
of the ordinance, the matter shall be resolved by a board of arbitrators, to be
convened at the request of either party; such board of arbitrators to consist
of a representative from the city or town involved, a representative of the
district, and a third representative to be appointed by the other two
representatives. If no agreement can be reached with regard to the third
representative, the third representative shall be appointed by a judge of the
superior court of the county of jurisdiction. The determination by the board
of arbitrators shall be binding on all parties. Each party shall pay the costs
of their individual representatives on the board of arbitrators and they shall
pay one‑half of the cost of the third representative.

In
the event a city proceeds under this section, the district may elect upon a
favorable vote of a majority of all voters within the district voting upon such
propositions to require the city to assume ((responsibility for the
operation and maintenance of the district's property, facilities and equipment
throughout the entire district and to pay the city a charge for such operation
and maintenance which is reasonable under all of the circumstances)) the
full and complete management and control of the entire district, whereupon the
provisions of RCW 35.13A.020 and section 3 of this act shall be operative.
Such a vote may not invalidate an assumption of the portion of the district
within the corporate limits by the city under the provisions of this chapter.

A
city acquiring property, facilities and equipment under the provisions of this
section shall ((acquire such property, facilities and equipment, and fix and
collect service and other charges from owners and occupants of properties
served by the city, subject, to any contractual obligations of the district
which relate to the property, facilities, or equipment so acquired by the city
or which are secured by taxes, assessments or revenues from the territory of
the district included within the city. In such cases, the property included
within the city and the owners and occupants thereof shall continue to be
liable for payment of its and their proportionate share of any outstanding
district indebtedness. The district and its officers shall continue to levy
taxes and assessments on and to collect service and other charges from such
property, or owners or occupants thereof, to enforce such collections, and to
perform all other acts necessary to insure performance of the district's
contractual obligations in the same manner and by the same means as if the
territory of the district had not been included within the boundaries of a city))
be subject to the outstanding indebtedness and contractual obligation
requirements of section 3 of this act.

Sec.
6. RCW
35.13A.060 and 1971 ex.s. c 95 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever
more than one city, in whole or in part, is included within a ((water
district or sewer)) water-sewer district, the city which has within
its boundaries sixty percent or more of the area of the assessed valuation of
the district (in this section referred to as the "principal city")
may, with the approval of any other city containing part of such district,
assume responsibility for operation and maintenance of the district's property,
facilities and equipment within such other city and make and enforce such
charges for operation, maintenance and retirement of indebtedness as may be
reasonable under all the circumstances.

Whenever
more than sixty percent of the area or assessed valuation of any water-sewer
district is included within the boundaries of more than one city, the cities
may enter into a contract under the provisions of RCW 35.13A.070 to mutually
assume by ordinances of each city the full and complete management and control
of the entire district, whereupon the provisions of RCW 35.13A.020 and section
3 of this act shall be operative.

Any
other city having less than sixty percent in area or assessed valuation of such
district, within its boundaries may install facilities and create local
improvement districts or otherwise finance the cost of installation of such
facilities and if such facilities have been installed in accordance with
reasonable standards fixed by the principal city, such other city may connect
such facilities to the utility system of such district operated by the
principal city upon providing for payment by the owners or occupants of
properties served thereby, of such charges established by the principal city as
may be reasonable under the circumstances.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 35.13A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
In the event a city or cities elect to assume jurisdiction over all or a
portion of a district that is only partially included within any city's
corporate boundaries, then upon the completion of all reports required by
section 1 of this act, the assuming city shall adopt a resolution to submit to
a ballot proposition to district voters residing outside of any city
boundaries, which, if approved, requires the district outside of any city
boundaries to be assumed by the city or cities. The result of the proposition
shall not affect an assumption of district territory located within city
boundaries. The cost of the election shall be paid for by the assuming city or
cities.

(2)
A ballot proposition shall not be submitted to voters if all of the territory
of the district is located within the corporate boundaries of a city and a city
assumes a district under RCW 35.13A.020.

(3)
A ballot proposition shall not be required when all of the territory of a
district is located within the corporate boundaries of more than one city when
the cities have entered into agreements in accordance with RCW 35.13A.070.

(4)
Within twenty-four months after the effective date of an assumption by a city
over part of the territory of a district, the district customers remaining
outside of any city boundaries may deliver a petition for assumption declaring
their intent to require the assuming city to assume jurisdiction of all remaining
territory of the district, to assume the district indebtedness, and to provide
for the dissolution of the district. The petition must be signed by the
owners, as defined by RCW 35A.01.040(9) (a) through (d) of not less than sixty
percent in value, according to the assessed valuation for general taxation of
the property. After the completion of all reports required by section 1 of
this act and the city receiving the petition for assumption, the city shall
submit a ballot proposition to district voters residing outside of any city
corporate boundaries which, if approved, provides for the city assuming
jurisdiction over the remaining territory in the district under RCW 35.13A.020,
including assumption of all indebtedness, and dissolution of the district. In
the event the proposition is approved, the city shall assume jurisdiction over
the remaining district territory. All costs of the election shall be paid for
by the district.

(5)
These ballot propositions shall be submitted to eligible voters at either a
general municipal or special election which shall be held within one hundred
eighty days of the city's adoption of its election resolution or receipt of the
petition for assumption. The request for a special election, if any, the
notices of the election, and the conduct of the election shall be in accordance
with general election laws. The proposition must be approved by a majority of
the voters to be effective.

(6)
The requirement for an election set forth in RCW 35.92.070 does not apply to
assumption actions commenced under this chapter.

(7)
Pursuant to RCW 42.17.130, no public facilities of the city or of the district
may be used to support or oppose the proposed assumption following the city's
adoption of a resolution to submit a ballot proposition to the district voters
residing outside any city proposing to assume the district.

(8)
In the event of a vote under subsection (1) of this section resulting in an
assumption by the city of the entire district, the rates charged for
water-sewer service shall be and remain the same for both the area of what was
formerly the district inside the boundaries of the city and the service area of
the city that was formerly the area of the district that was outside the
boundaries of the city.

(9)
In the event that a district is assumed by a city under subsection (4) of this
section, the rates for water-sewer service shall be the same as provided in
subsection (8) of this section.

(10)
In the event that the portion of a district outside the boundaries of the city
elects to remain outside the service area of the city's water-sewer service by
voting against assumption under subsection (1) of this section and does not
petition for assumption and vote to be assumed under subsection (4) of this
section, then the rates for water-sewer service may not be equalized as
provided by subsection (8) of this section if the district is assumed at a time
more than two years after the effective date of the assumption by the city over
part of the district.

Sec.
8. RCW
35.13A.070 and 1997 c 426 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding
any provision of this chapter to the contrary, one or more cities and one or
more districts may, through their legislative authorities, authorize a
contract with respect to the rights, powers, duties, and obligation of such
cities, or districts with regard to the use and ownership of property, the
providing of services, the maintenance and operation of facilities, allocation
of cost, financing and construction of new facilities, application and use of
assets, disposition of liabilities and debts, the performance of contractual
obligations, and any other matters arising out of the inclusion, in whole or in
part, of the district or districts within any city or cities, or the assumption
by the city of jurisdiction of a district under RCW 35.13A.110. The contract
may provide for the furnishing of services by any party thereto and the use of
city or district facilities or real estate for such purpose, and may also provide
for the time during which such district or districts may continue to exercise
any rights, privileges, powers, and functions provided by law for such district
or districts as if the district or districts or portions thereof were not
included within a city or were not subject to an assumption of jurisdiction
under RCW 35.13A.110, including but not by way of limitation, the right to
promulgate rules and regulations, to levy and collect special assessments,
rates, charges, service charges, and connection fees, to adopt and carry out
the provisions of a comprehensive plan, and amendments thereto, for a system of
improvements, and to issue general obligation bonds or revenue bonds in the
manner provided by law. The contract may provide for the transfer to a city of
district facilities, property, rights, and powers as provided in RCW
35.13A.030, 35.13A.050, and 35.13A.110, whether or not ((sixty percent or))
any of the area or assessed valuation of real estate lying within the district
or districts is included within such city. The contract may provide that any
party thereto may authorize, issue, and sell revenue bonds to provide funds for
new water or sewer improvements or to refund any water revenue, sewer revenue,
or combined water and sewer revenue bonds outstanding of any city, or district
which is a party to such contract if such refunding is deemed necessary,
providing such refunding will not increase interest costs. The contract may
provide that any party thereto may authorize and issue, in the manner provided
by law, general obligation or revenue bonds of like amounts, terms, conditions,
and covenants as the outstanding bonds of any other party to the contract, and
such new bonds may be substituted or exchanged for such outstanding bonds.
However, no such exchange or substitution shall be effected in such a manner as
to impair the obligation or security of any such outstanding bonds.

Sec.
9. RCW
35.13A.090 and 1971 ex.s. c 95 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever
a city ((acquires all of the facilities of a water district or sewer
district, pursuant to this chapter, such a city)) or cities assume
jurisdiction over an entire water-sewer district pursuant to RCW 35.13A.020,
35.13A.030, or section 3 of this act, the assuming city or cities shall
offer to employ every full time employee of the district who, as of the
effective date of the assumption, is engaged in the operation of ((such
a)) the district's facilities ((on the date on which such city
acquires the district facilities)). When a city ((acquires any portion
of the facilities of such a district, such a city)) or cities assume
jurisdiction over only a portion of the district, the assuming city or cities
shall offer to employ those full time employees of the district ((as
of the date of the acquisition of the facilities of the district who are not
longer needed by the district)) who, as of the effective date of the
assumption, are engaged in the operation of those facilities over which the
city or cities have assumed jurisdiction. This section shall not require an
assuming city to extend offers of employment to employees engaged in management
functions as opposed to operation of facilities, unless required by the terms
of a collective bargaining agreement.

Whenever
a city employs a person who was employed immediately prior thereto by the
district, arrangements shall be made:

(1)
((For the retention of service credits under the pension plan of the
district pursuant to RCW 41.04.070 through 41.04.110.

(2))) For
the retention of all sick leave standing to the employee's credit in the plan
of such district.

(((3)))
(2) For a vacation with pay during the first year of employment
equivalent to that to which he would have been entitled if he had remained in
the employment of the district.

If
one or more cities initiates an assumption by taking any actions provided for
in this chapter, the district or districts may not enter into any written
employment contracts with any person who, on the date the assumption was
initiated, was an employee of the district or districts, unless the employee's
position was not an "at will" position prior to the initiation of the
assumption and a written employment contract for the position was previously in
effect. Furthermore, any written employment contracts entered into within
sixty days prior to the initiation of the assumption, where the position was
not an "at will" position prior to execution of the written
employment contract, are voidable upon the effective date of the assumption at
the discretion of the assuming city or cities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. A
new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

The
policies required to be addressed pursuant to RCW 36.70A.210(3)(b) shall
include policies providing for assumptions of an urban service or urban
services by a general local government from a special district government in
those cases where that local government is willing and able to assume such services
and the area to be served lies wholly or partially within the local
government's corporate or urban growth boundaries.

Sec.
11. RCW
36.70A.030 and 1997 c 429 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Adopt a comprehensive land use plan" means to enact a new
comprehensive land use plan or to update an existing comprehensive land use
plan.

(2)
"Agricultural land" means land primarily devoted to the commercial
production of horticultural, viticultural, floricultural, dairy, apiary,
vegetable, or animal products or of berries, grain, hay, straw, turf, seed,
Christmas trees not subject to the excise tax imposed by RCW 84.33.100 through
84.33.140, finfish in upland hatcheries, or livestock, and that has long-term
commercial significance for agricultural production.

(3)
"Capital facilities owned by public entities" means capital
facilities owned or managed by any agency, local government, or special purpose
district and which must be sited consistent with the terms of the comprehensive
plan and development regulations of the county, city, or town in which they
are, or are proposed to be, located.

(4)
"City" means any city or town, including a code city.

(((4)))
(5) "Comprehensive land use plan," "comprehensive
plan," or "plan" means a generalized coordinated land use policy
statement of the governing body of a county or city that is adopted pursuant to
this chapter.

(((5)))
(6) "Critical areas" include the following areas and
ecosystems: (a) Wetlands; (b) areas with a critical recharging effect on
aquifers used for potable water; (c) fish and wildlife habitat conservation
areas; (d) frequently flooded areas; and (e) geologically hazardous areas.

(((6)))
(7) "Department" means the department of community, trade, and
economic development.

(((7)))
(8) "Development regulations" or "regulation" means
the controls placed on development or land use activities by a county or city,
including, but not limited to, zoning ordinances, critical areas ordinances,
shoreline master programs, official controls, planned unit development
ordinances, subdivision ordinances, and binding site plan ordinances together
with any amendments thereto. A development regulation does not include a
decision to approve a project permit application, as defined in RCW 36.70B.020,
even though the decision may be expressed in a resolution or ordinance of the
legislative body of the county or city.

(((8)))
(9) "Forest land" means land primarily devoted to growing
trees for long-term commercial timber production on land that can be
economically and practically managed for such production, including Christmas
trees subject to the excise tax imposed under RCW 84.33.100 through 84.33.140,
and that has long-term commercial significance. In determining whether forest
land is primarily devoted to growing trees for long-term commercial timber
production on land that can be economically and practically managed for such
production, the following factors shall be considered: (a) The proximity of
the land to urban, suburban, and rural settlements; (b) surrounding parcel size
and the compatibility and intensity of adjacent and nearby land uses; (c)
long-term local economic conditions that affect the ability to manage for
timber production; and (d) the availability of public facilities and services
conducive to conversion of forest land to other uses.

(((9)))
(10) "Geologically hazardous areas" means areas that because
of their susceptibility to erosion, sliding, earthquake, or other geological
events, are not suited to the siting of commercial, residential, or industrial
development consistent with public health or safety concerns.

(((10)))
(11) "Long-term commercial significance" includes the growing
capacity, productivity, and soil composition of the land for long-term
commercial production, in consideration with the land's proximity to
population areas, and the possibility of more intense uses of the land.

(((11)))
(12) "Minerals" include gravel, sand, and valuable metallic
substances.

(((12)))
(13) "Public facilities" include streets, roads, highways,
sidewalks, street and road lighting systems, traffic signals, domestic water
systems, storm and sanitary sewer systems, parks and recreational facilities,
and schools.

(((13)))
(14) "Public services" include fire protection and
suppression, law enforcement, public health, education, recreation,
environmental protection, and other governmental services.

(((14)))
(15) "Rural character" refers to the patterns of land use and
development established by a county in the rural element of its comprehensive
plan:

(a)
In which open space, the natural landscape, and vegetation predominate over the
built environment;

(b)
That foster traditional rural lifestyles, rural-based economies, and
opportunities to both live and work in rural areas;

(c)
That provide visual landscapes that are traditionally found in rural areas and
communities;

(d)
That are compatible with the use of the land by wildlife and for fish and
wildlife habitat;

(e)
That reduce the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land into sprawling,
low‑density development;

(f)
That generally do not require the extension of urban governmental services; and

(g)
That are consistent with the protection of natural surface water flows and
ground water and surface water recharge and discharge areas.

(((15)))
(16) "Rural development" refers to development outside the
urban growth area and outside agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands
designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. Rural development can consist of a
variety of uses and residential densities, including clustered residential
development, at levels that are consistent with the preservation of rural character
and the requirements of the rural element. Rural development does not refer to
agriculture or forestry activities that may be conducted in rural areas.

(((16)))
(17) "Rural governmental services" or "rural
services" include those public services and public facilities historically
and typically delivered at an intensity usually found in rural areas, and may
include domestic water systems, fire and police protection services,
transportation and public transit services, and other public utilities associated
with rural development and normally not associated with urban areas. Rural
services do not include storm or sanitary sewers, except as otherwise
authorized by RCW 36.70A.110(4).

(((17)))
(18) "Urban growth" refers to growth that makes intensive use
of land for the location of buildings, structures, and impermeable surfaces to
such a degree as to be incompatible with the primary use of land for the
production of food, other agricultural products, or fiber, or the extraction of
mineral resources, rural uses, rural development, and natural resource lands
designated pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. A pattern of more intensive rural
development, as provided in RCW 36.70A.070(5)(d), is not urban growth. When
allowed to spread over wide areas, urban growth typically requires urban
governmental services. "Characterized by urban growth" refers to
land having urban growth located on it, or to land located in relationship to
an area with urban growth on it as to be appropriate for urban growth.

(((18)))
(19) "Urban growth areas" means those areas designated by a
county pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110.

(((19)))
(20) "Urban governmental services" or "urban
services" include those public services and public facilities at an
intensity historically and typically provided in cities, specifically including
storm and sanitary sewer systems, domestic water systems, street cleaning
services, fire and police protection services, public transit services, and
other public utilities associated with urban areas and normally not associated
with rural areas.

(((20)))
(21) "Wetland" or "wetlands" means areas that are
inundated or saturated by surface water or ground water at a frequency and
duration sufficient to support, and that under normal circumstances do support,
a prevalence of vegetation typically adapted for life in saturated soil
conditions. Wetlands generally include swamps, marshes, bogs, and similar
areas. Wetlands do not include those artificial wetlands intentionally created
from nonwetland sites, including, but not limited to, irrigation and drainage
ditches, grass-lined swales, canals, detention facilities, wastewater treatment
facilities, farm ponds, and landscape amenities, or those wetlands created
after July 1, 1990, that were unintentionally created as a result of the
construction of a road, street, or highway. Wetlands may include those
artificial wetlands intentionally created from nonwetland areas created to
mitigate conversion of wetlands.

Sec.
12. RCW
36.70A.215 and 1997 c 429 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to the limitations in subsection (7) of this section, a county shall
adopt, in consultation with its cities, county-wide planning policies to
establish a review and evaluation program. This program shall be in addition
to the requirements of RCW 36.70A.110, 36.70A.130, and 36.70A.210. In
developing and implementing the review and evaluation program required by this
section, the county and its cities shall consider information from other
appropriate jurisdictions and sources. The purpose of the review and
evaluation program shall be to:

(a)
Determine whether a county and its cities are achieving urban densities within
urban growth areas by comparing growth and development assumptions, targets,
and objectives contained in the county-wide planning policies and the county
and city comprehensive plans with actual growth and development that has
occurred in the county and its cities; ((and))

(b)
Determine whether special purpose districts and their comprehensive plans
are in compliance with and are implementing the terms of comprehensive plans
for those counties, cities, and towns included in whole or in part within the
corporate boundaries of the districts, and whether the provisions of section 10
of this act have been incorporated within county-wide planning policies; and

(c)
Identify reasonable measures, other than adjusting urban growth areas, that
will be taken to comply with the requirements of this chapter.

(2)
The review and evaluation program shall:

(a)
Encompass land uses and activities both within and outside of urban growth
areas and provide for annual collection of data on urban and rural land uses,
development, critical areas, and capital facilities to the extent necessary to
determine the quantity and type of land suitable for development, both for
residential and employment-based activities;

(b)
Provide for evaluation of the data collected under (a) of this subsection every
five years as provided in subsection (3) of this section. The first evaluation
shall be completed not later than September 1, 2002. The county and its cities
may establish in the county-wide planning policies indicators, benchmarks, and
other similar criteria to use in conducting the evaluation;

(c)
Provide for methods to resolve disputes among jurisdictions relating to the
county-wide planning policies required by this section and procedures to
resolve inconsistencies in collection and analysis of data; and

(d)
Provide for the amendment of the county-wide policies and county and city
comprehensive plans as needed to remedy an inconsistency identified through the
evaluation required by this section, or to bring these policies into compliance
with the requirements of this chapter.

(3)
At a minimum, the evaluation component of the program required by subsection
(1) of this section shall:

(a)
Determine whether there is sufficient suitable land to accommodate the
county-wide population projection established for the county pursuant to RCW
43.62.035 and the subsequent population allocations within the county and
between the county and its cities and the requirements of RCW 36.70A.110;

(b)
Determine the actual density of housing that has been constructed and the
actual amount of land developed for commercial and industrial uses within the
urban growth area since the adoption of a comprehensive plan under this chapter
or since the last periodic evaluation as required by subsection (1) of this
section; and

(c)
Based on the actual density of development as determined under (b) of this
subsection, review commercial, industrial, and housing needs by type and
density range to determine the amount of land needed for commercial,
industrial, and housing for the remaining portion of the twenty-year planning
period used in the most recently adopted comprehensive plan.

(4)
If the evaluation required by subsection (3) of this section demonstrates an
inconsistency between what has occurred since the adoption of the county-wide
planning policies and the county and city comprehensive plans and development
regulations and what was envisioned in those policies and plans and the
planning goals and the requirements of this chapter, as the inconsistency
relates to the evaluation factors specified in subsection (3) of this section,
the county and its cities shall adopt and implement measures that are
reasonably likely to increase consistency during the subsequent five-year
period. If necessary, a county, in consultation with its cities as required by
RCW 36.70A.210, shall adopt amendments to county-wide planning policies to
increase consistency. The county and its cities shall annually monitor the
measures adopted under this subsection to determine their effect and may revise
or rescind them as appropriate.

(5)(a)
Not later than July 1, 1998, the department shall prepare a list of methods
used by counties and cities in carrying out the types of activities required by
this section. The department shall provide this information and appropriate
technical assistance to counties and cities required to or choosing to comply
with the provisions of this section.

(b)
By December 31, 2007, the department shall submit to the appropriate committees
of the legislature a report analyzing the effectiveness of the activities
described in this section in achieving the goals envisioned by the county-wide
planning policies and the comprehensive plans and development regulations of
the counties and cities.

(6)
From funds appropriated by the legislature for this purpose, the department
shall provide grants to counties, cities, and regional planning organizations
required under subsection (7) of this section to conduct the review and perform
the evaluation required by this section.

(7)
The provisions of this section shall apply to counties, and the cities within
those counties, that were greater than one hundred fifty thousand in population
in 1995 as determined by office of financial management population estimates
and that are located west of the crest of the Cascade mountain range. Any
other county planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may carry out the review,
evaluation, and amendment programs and procedures as provided in this section.

Sec.
13. RCW
36.93.090 and 1996 c 230 s 1608 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever
any of the following described actions are proposed in a county in which a
board has been established, the initiators of the action shall file within one
hundred eighty days a notice of intention with the board: PROVIDED, That when
the initiator is the legislative body of a governmental unit, the notice of
intention may be filed immediately following the body's first acceptance or
approval of the action. The board may review any such proposed actions
pertaining to:

(1)
The: (a) Creation, incorporation, or change in the boundary, other than a
consolidation, of any city, town, or special purpose district; (b)
consolidation of special purpose districts, but not including consolidation of
cities and towns; or (c) dissolution or disincorporation of any city, town, or
special purpose district, except that a board may not review the dissolution or
disincorporation of a special purpose district which was dissolved or disincorporated
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 36.96 RCW: PROVIDED, That the change in
the boundary of a city or town arising from the annexation of contiguous city
or town owned property held for a public purpose shall be exempted from the
requirements of this section; or

(2)
The assumption by any city or town of all or part of the assets, facilities, or
indebtedness of a special purpose district which lies partially within such
city or town, except for water-sewer districts; or

(3)
The establishment of or change in the boundaries of a mutual water and sewer
system or separate sewer system by a water-sewer district pursuant to RCW
57.08.065 ((or chapter 57.40 RCW)); or

(4) The extension of permanent water or sewer service outside of
its existing service area by a city, town, or special purpose district. The
service area of a city, town, or special purpose district shall include all of
the area within its corporate boundaries plus, (a) for extensions of water
service, the area outside of the corporate boundaries which it is designated to
serve pursuant to a coordinated water system plan approved in accordance with
RCW 70.116.050; and (b) for extensions of sewer service, the area outside of
the corporate boundaries which it is designated to serve pursuant to a
comprehensive sewerage plan approved in accordance with chapter 36.94 RCW and
RCW 90.48.110.

Sec.
14. RCW
57.16.010 and 1997 c 447 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

Before
ordering any improvements or submitting to vote any proposition for incurring
any indebtedness, the district commissioners shall adopt a general
comprehensive plan for the type or types of facilities the district proposes to
provide. A district may prepare a separate general comprehensive plan for each
of these services and other services that districts are permitted to provide,
or the district may combine any or all of its comprehensive plans into a single
general comprehensive plan.

(1)
For a general comprehensive plan of a water supply system, the commissioners
shall investigate the several portions and sections of the district for the
purpose of determining the present and reasonably foreseeable future needs ((thereof))
and household and employment targets set forth in the comprehensive plans
adopted pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW by each city, town, or county in which
the district provides water service; shall examine and investigate,
determine, and select a water supply or water supplies for such district
suitable and adequate for present and reasonably foreseeable future needs
thereof set forth in the comprehensive plans adopted pursuant to chapter
36.70A RCW by each city, town, or county in which the district provides water
service; and shall consider and ((determine)) adopt a general
system or plan for acquiring such water supply or water supplies, and the
lands, waters, and water rights and easements necessary therefor, and for
retaining and storing any such waters, and erecting dams, reservoirs,
aqueducts, and pipe lines to convey the same throughout such district. There
may be included as part of the system the installation of fire hydrants at
suitable places throughout the district. The commissioners shall determine and
adopt a general comprehensive plan providing for the present and future
water supply or supplies necessary to meet present and future needs determined
as set forth herein, for distributing such water throughout such portion of
the district as may then reasonably be served by means of subsidiary aqueducts
and pipe lines, and a long-term plan for financing the planned projects and the
method of distributing the cost and expense thereof, including the creation of
local improvement districts ((or utility local improvement districts, and
shall determine)) and provide whether the whole or part of the cost
and expenses shall be paid from revenue or general obligation bonds. In
addition, the general comprehensive plan shall be consistent with and implement
the comprehensive plans adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW by each city and
county in which the district provides service, shall identify the household and
employment targets contained in each of the land use elements of those
jurisdictions' comprehensive plans and discuss how water supplies and services
will be provided to each of those targets, shall comply with the requirements
of RCW 36.70A.070 (3) (a) through (d) and (4), and shall be updated as needed
to comply with the requirements of this section and to maintain consistency
with the comprehensive plans of the cities and county in which the district
provides service. Furthermore, the district shall maintain a docket and
consider and adopt changes to its general comprehensive plan in the manner
provided for in RCW 36.70A.470.

(2)
For a general comprehensive plan for a sewer system, the commissioners shall
investigate all portions and sections of the district and select and adopt
a general comprehensive plan for a sewer system for the district suitable and
adequate for present and reasonably foreseeable future needs ((thereof))
and household and employment targets set forth in the comprehensive plans
adopted pursuant to chapter 36.70A RCW by each city, town, or county in which
the district provides sewer service. The general comprehensive plan shall
provide for treatment plants and other methods and services, if any, for the
prevention, control, and reduction of water pollution and for the treatment and
disposal of sewage and industrial and other liquid wastes now produced or which
may reasonably be expected to be produced within the district and shall, for
such portions of the district as may then reasonably be served or must
reasonably be served in the future in order to provide service to household or
employment targets contained in the comprehensive plans adopted pursuant to
chapter 36.70A RCW by each city, town, or county in which the district provides
sewer service, provide for the acquisition or construction and installation
of laterals, trunk sewers, intercepting sewers, syphons, pumping stations or
other sewage collection facilities, septic tanks, septic tank systems or
drainfields, and systems for the transmission and treatment of wastewater. The
general comprehensive plan shall provide a long-term plan for financing the
planned projects and the method of distributing the cost and expense of the
sewer system and services, including the creation of local improvement
districts or utility local improvement districts; and provide whether the whole
or some part of the cost and expenses shall be paid from revenue or general
obligation bonds. In addition, the general comprehensive plan shall be
consistent with and implement the comprehensive plans adopted under chapter
36.70A RCW by each city and county in which the district provides service,
shall identify the household and employment targets contained in each of the
land use elements of those jurisdictions' comprehensive plans and discuss how
sewer service will be provided to each of those targets, shall comply with the
requirements of RCW 36.70A.070 (3) (a) through (d) and (4), and shall be
updated as needed to comply with the requirements of this section and to
maintain consistency with the comprehensive plans of the cities and county in
which the district provides service. Furthermore, the district shall maintain
a docket and consider and adopt changes to its general comprehensive plan in
the manner provided for in RCW 36.70A.470.

(3)
For a general comprehensive plan for a drainage system, the commissioners shall
investigate all portions and sections of the district and adopt a general
comprehensive plan for a drainage system for the district suitable and adequate
for present and future needs ((thereof)) and household and employment
targets set forth in the comprehensive plans adopted pursuant to chapter 36.70A
RCW by each city, town, or county in which the district maintains a drainage
system. The general comprehensive plan shall provide for a system to
collect, treat, and dispose of storm water or surface waters, including use of
natural systems and the construction or provision of culverts, storm water
pipes, ponds, and other systems. The general comprehensive plan shall provide
for a long-term plan for financing the planned projects and provide for a
method of distributing the cost and expense of the drainage system, including
local improvement districts or utility local improvement districts, and provide
whether the whole or some part of the cost and expenses shall be paid from
revenue or general obligation bonds. In addition, the general comprehensive
plan shall be consistent with and implement the comprehensive plans adopted
under chapter 36.70A RCW by each city and county in which the district provides
service, shall identify the household and employment targets contained in each
of the land use elements of those jurisdictions' comprehensive plans and
discuss how drainage will be provided for those targets, shall comply with the
requirements of RCW 36.70A.070 (3) (a) through (d) and (4), and shall be
updated as needed to comply with the requirements of this section and to
maintain consistency with the comprehensive plans of the cities and county in
which the district provides service. Furthermore, the district shall maintain
a docket and consider and adopt changes to its general comprehensive plan in
the manner provided for in RCW 36.70A.470.

(4)
For a general comprehensive plan for street lighting, the commissioners shall
investigate all portions and sections of the district and adopt a general
comprehensive plan for street lighting for the district suitable and adequate
for present and future needs ((thereof)) and household and employment
targets set forth in the comprehensive plans adopted pursuant to chapter 36.70A
RCW by each city, town, or county in which the district maintains a drainage
system. The general comprehensive plan shall provide for a system or
systems of street lighting, provide for a long-term plan for financing the
planned projects, and provide for a method of distributing the cost and expense
of the street lighting system, including local improvement districts or utility
local improvement districts, and provide whether the whole or some part of the
cost and expenses shall be paid from revenue or general obligation bonds. In
addition, the general comprehensive plan shall be consistent with and implement
the comprehensive plans adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW by each city and
county in which the district provides service, shall identify the household and
employment targets contained in each of the land use elements of those
jurisdictions' comprehensive plans and discuss how street lighting will be
provided for those targets, shall comply with the requirements of RCW
36.70A.070 (3) (a) through (d) and (4), and shall be updated as needed to
comply with the requirements of this section and to maintain consistency with
the comprehensive plans of the cities and county in which the district provides
service. Furthermore, the district shall maintain a docket and consider and
adopt changes to its general comprehensive plan in the manner provided for in
RCW 36.70A.470.

(5)
The commissioners may employ such engineering and legal service as in their
discretion is necessary in carrying out their duties.

(6)
Any general comprehensive plan or plans shall be adopted by resolution and
submitted to an engineer designated by the legislative authority of the county
in which fifty-one percent or more of the area of the district is located, and
to the director of health of the county in which the district or any portion
thereof is located, and must be approved in writing by the engineer and
director of health, except that a comprehensive plan relating to street
lighting shall not be submitted to or approved by the director of health. The
general comprehensive plan shall be approved, conditionally approved, or
rejected by the director of health and by the designated engineer within sixty
days of their respective receipt of the plan. However, this sixty-day time
limitation may be extended by the director of health or engineer for up to an
additional sixty days if sufficient time is not available to review adequately
the general comprehensive plans.

Before
becoming effective, the general comprehensive plan shall also be submitted to,
and approved by resolution of, the legislative authority of every county within
whose boundaries all or a portion of the district lies. The general
comprehensive plan shall be approved, conditionally approved, or rejected by
each of the county legislative authorities pursuant to the criteria in RCW
57.02.040 for approving the formation, reorganization, annexation,
consolidation, or merger of districts. The resolution, ordinance, or motion of
the legislative body that rejects the comprehensive plan or a part thereof
shall specifically state in what particular the comprehensive plan or part
thereof rejected fails to meet these criteria. The general comprehensive plan
shall not provide for the extension or location of facilities that are
inconsistent with the requirements of RCW 36.70A.110. Nothing in this chapter
shall preclude a county from rejecting a proposed plan because it is in
conflict with the criteria in RCW 57.02.040. Each general comprehensive plan
shall be deemed approved if the county legislative authority fails to reject or
conditionally approve the plan within ninety days of the plan's submission to
the county legislative authority or within thirty days of a hearing on the plan
when the hearing is held within ninety days of submission to the county
legislative authority. However, a county legislative authority may extend this
ninety-day time limitation by up to an additional ninety days where a finding
is made that ninety days is insufficient to review adequately the general
comprehensive plan. In addition, the commissioners and the county legislative
authority may mutually agree to an extension of the deadlines in this section.

If
the district includes portions or all of one or more cities or towns, the
general comprehensive plan shall be submitted also to, and approved by
resolution of, the legislative authorities of the cities and towns before
becoming effective. The general comprehensive plan shall be deemed approved by
the city or town legislative authority if the city or town legislative
authority fails to reject or conditionally approve the plan within ninety days
of the plan's submission to the city or town or within thirty days of a hearing
on the plan when the hearing is held within ninety days of submission to the ((county))
city or town legislative authority. However, a city or town legislative
authority may extend this time limitation by up to an additional ninety days
where a finding is made that insufficient time exists to adequately review the
general comprehensive plan within these time limitations. In addition, the
commissioners and the city or town legislative authority may mutually agree to
an extension of the deadlines in this section.

Before
becoming effective, the general comprehensive plan shall be approved by any
state agency whose approval may be required by applicable law. Before becoming
effective, any amendment to, alteration of, or addition to, a general
comprehensive plan shall also be subject to such approval as if it were a new
general comprehensive plan. However, only if the amendment, alteration, or
addition affects a particular city or town, shall the amendment, alteration, or
addition be subject to approval by such particular city or town governing body.

(7)
A water-sewer district that fails to comply with subsections (1) through (4) of
this section, or that fails within ninety days to amend its comprehensive plan
to correct deficiencies identified by the decision of any city, county, or town
rejecting or conditionally approving a comprehensive plan under subsection (6)
of this section, shall be ineligible to receive any grant, loan, or assistance
administered under chapter 43.330 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15. RCW
35.13A.0301 (Assumption of water-sewer district before July 1,
1999--Limitations) and 1998 c 326 s 3 are each repealed.

---
END ---