BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
federal clean water act requires the development of a total maximum daily load
for those waters of the state that are impaired with pollutants and are listed
subject to section 303(d) of the clean water act. In 1998, the federal
environmental protection agency settled a lawsuit challenging the failure to
develop total maximum daily loads under section 303(d) of the clean water act.
The resulting consent decree established a fifteen-year timeline for the state
of Washington to complete development of total maximum daily loads. It is the
intent of the legislature to meet the water quality standards within the
established timeline or more quickly if possible by meeting established
standards.

In
addition to developing total maximum daily loads, the legislature supports
efforts of the state to attain water quality standards using other water
pollution control programs that will result in meeting water quality standards
sooner than the fifteen-year schedule under the consent decree.

There
are many benefits to the state of the department of ecology's ability to
achieve water quality standards and make progress on the schedule described in
the settlement agreement. The benefits include improved water quality; greater
certainty for regulated industry and businesses; the ability to address needs
under the federal endangered species act, 16 U.S.C. Secs. 1531 through 1534;
and the confidence the state's citizens have gained that the state is making
progress in attaining fishable, swimmable, drinkable waters.

It
is the intent of the legislature that the state maintain high water quality
standards and that the list of impaired and polluted waters in the state not
grow in number. The legislature intends that the waters on the 303(d) list be
cleaned up and that clean waters not be allowed to become impaired or
polluted. Waters not currently on the list should not be allowed to degrade to
the point that they must be added to the list.

It
is further the intent that the actions of the state, local government, and the
private sector should not cause further deterioration of water quality.

Sec.
2. RCW
90.48.260 and 1988 c 220 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of ecology is hereby designated as the State Water Pollution Control
Agency for all purposes of the federal clean water act as it exists on February
4, 1987, and is hereby authorized to participate fully in the programs of the
act as well as to take all action necessary to secure to the state the benefits
and to meet the requirements of that act. With regard to the national estuary
program established by section 320 of that act, the department shall exercise
its responsibility jointly with the Puget Sound ((water quality authority))
action team. The powers granted herein include, among others, and
notwithstanding any other provisions of chapter 90.48 RCW or otherwise, the
following:

(1)
Complete authority to establish and administer a comprehensive state point
source waste discharge or pollution discharge elimination permit program which
will enable the department to qualify for full participation in any national
waste discharge or pollution discharge elimination permit system and will allow
the department to be the sole agency issuing permits required by such national
system operating in the state of Washington subject to the provisions of RCW
90.48.262(2). Program elements authorized herein may include, but are not
limited to: (a) Effluent treatment and limitation requirements together with
timing requirements related thereto; (b) applicable receiving water quality
standards requirements; (c) requirements of standards of performance for new
sources; (d) pretreatment requirements; (e) termination and modification of
permits for cause; (f) requirements for public notices and opportunities for
public hearings; (g) appropriate relationships with the secretary of the army
in the administration of his responsibilities which relate to anchorage and
navigation, with the administrator of the environmental protection agency in
the performance of his duties, and with other governmental officials under the
federal clean water act; (h) requirements for inspection, monitoring, entry,
and reporting; (i) enforcement of the program through penalties, emergency
powers, and criminal sanctions; (j) a continuing planning process; and (k) user
charges.

(2)
The power to establish and administer state programs in a manner which will
insure the procurement of moneys, whether in the form of grants, loans, or
otherwise; to assist in the construction, operation, and maintenance of various
water pollution control facilities and works; and the administering of various
state water pollution control management, regulatory, and enforcement programs.

(3)
The power to develop and implement appropriate programs pertaining to
continuing planning processes, area-wide waste treatment management plans, and
basin planning, and complete authority to implement the consent decree in Northwest
Environmental Advocates, et al. v. Environmental Protection Agency entered
in the United States district court for the western district of Washington on
January 20, 1998.

The
governor shall have authority to perform those actions required of him or her
by the federal clean water act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall develop and implement a plan for soliciting public comment
on the development and implementation of total maximum daily loads required by
section 303(d) of the federal clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec. 1313(d). The
purpose of the plan is to solicit public comment that: (a) Is consistent with
the complexity of the pollution problems causing the water quality impairment;
and (b) reflects the extent of community and public participation the
department deems necessary to implement the total maximum daily load
successfully. The plan shall consider the formation or use of watershed
committees, public meetings, and other avenues to obtain public input.

(2) The department shall publish in the Washington State Register,
the list required by section 303(d) of the clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec.
1313(d)(1). The department shall also publish in the Washington State Register
a notice and summary of any total maximum daily load established for such
waters as required by section 303(d) of the clean water act, 33 U.S.C. Sec.
1313(d)(1). Such lists and total maximum daily loads need not be adopted as
rules under the state administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

---
END ---