BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
90.03.290 and 1994 c 264 s 84 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
When an application complying with the provisions of this chapter and with the
rules and regulations of the department has been filed, the same shall be
placed on record with the department, and it shall be its duty to investigate
the application, and determine what water, if any, is available for
appropriation, and find and determine to what beneficial use or uses it can be
applied. If it is proposed to appropriate water for irrigation purposes, the
department shall investigate, determine and find what lands are capable of
irrigation by means of water found available for appropriation. If it is
proposed to appropriate water for the purpose of power development, the
department shall investigate, determine and find whether the proposed
development is likely to prove detrimental to the public interest, having in
mind the highest feasible use of the waters belonging to the public.

(2)
If the application does not contain, and the applicant does not promptly furnish
sufficient information on which to base such findings, the department may issue
a preliminary permit, for a period of not to exceed three years, requiring the
applicant to make such surveys, investigations, studies, and progress reports,
as in the opinion of the department may be necessary. If the applicant fails
to comply with the conditions of the preliminary permit, it and the application
or applications on which it is based shall be automatically canceled and the
applicant so notified. If the holder of a preliminary permit shall, before its
expiration, file with the department a verified report of expenditures made and
work done under the preliminary permit, which, in the opinion of the
department, establishes the good faith, intent and ability of the applicant to
carry on the proposed development, the preliminary permit may, with the
approval of the governor, be extended, but not to exceed a maximum period of
five years from the date of the issuance of the preliminary permit.

(3)
The department shall make and file as part of the record in the matter, written
findings of fact concerning all things investigated, and if it shall find that
there is water available for appropriation for a beneficial use, and the
appropriation thereof as proposed in the application will not impair existing
rights or be detrimental to the public welfare, it shall issue a permit stating
the amount of water to which the applicant shall be entitled and the beneficial
use or uses to which it may be applied: PROVIDED, That where the water applied
for is to be used for irrigation purposes, it shall become appurtenant only to
such land as may be reclaimed thereby to the full extent of the soil for
agricultural purposes. But where there is no unappropriated water in the
proposed source of supply, or where the proposed use conflicts with existing
rights, or threatens to prove detrimental to the public interest, having due
regard to the highest feasible development of the use of the waters belonging
to the public, it shall be duty of the department to reject such application
and to refuse to issue the permit asked for. If the permit is refused because
of conflict with existing rights and such applicant shall acquire same by
purchase or condemnation under RCW 90.03.040, the department may thereupon
grant such permit.

(4)
Any application may be approved for a less amount of water than that applied
for, if there exists substantial reason therefor, and in any event shall not be
approved for more water than can be applied to beneficial use for the purposes
named in the application.

(5)
In determining whether or not a permit shall issue upon any application, it
shall be the duty of the department to investigate all facts relevant and
material to the application. The department shall make a summary of the
record of investigation and the proposed permit, if the department proposes to
issue the permit, available to the public and provide a period of at least
sixty days for the public to submit comments on it. The department shall
consider the comments received and the entire record.

(6)
After the department approves said application in whole or in part and before
any permit shall be issued thereon to the applicant, such applicant shall pay
the fee provided in RCW 90.03.470: PROVIDED FURTHER, That in the event a
permit is issued by the department upon any application, it shall be its duty
to notify the director of fish and wildlife of such issuance.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

The
department may establish and maintain a stream keeper volunteer program.
Stream keeper volunteers shall be appointed by the director to assist with
administration and enforcement of the water code and be assigned to any water
resource in the state, including but not limited to designated water master
districts. The duties of stream keeper volunteers shall be limited to
providing information and assistance regarding water use, facilitating
cooperative arrangements among water right holders during periods of shortage,
making visual inspections and documenting and reporting perceived potential
violations of the water code, collecting and reporting data from metering and
measuring devices, and other duties as determined by the department. The
department may consult with the Washington State University cooperative
extension service regarding recruitment of stream keeper volunteers, as well as
enter into agreements for education and training of volunteers.

Sec.
3. RCW
43.27A.190 and 1987 c 109 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, notwithstanding and
in addition to any other powers granted to the department of ecology, whenever
it appears to the department that a person is violating or is about to violate
any of the provisions of the following:

(((1)))
(a) Chapter 90.03 RCW; or

(((2)))
(b) Chapter 90.44 RCW; or

(((3)))
(c) Chapter 86.16 RCW; or

(((4)))
(d) Chapter 43.37 RCW; or

(((5)))
(e) Chapter 43.27A RCW; or

(((6)))
(f) Any other law relating to water resources administered by the
department; or

(((7)))
(g) A rule or regulation adopted, or a directive or order issued by the
department relating to ((subsections (1))) (a) through (((6)))
(f) of this ((section)) subsection; the department may
cause a written regulatory order to be served upon said person either
personally, or by registered or certified mail delivered to addressee only with
return receipt requested and acknowledged by him. The order shall specify the
provision of the statute, rule, regulation, directive or order alleged to be or
about to be violated, and the facts upon which the conclusion of violating or
potential violation is based, and shall order the act constituting the
violation or the potential violation to cease and desist or, in appropriate
cases, shall order necessary corrective action to be taken with regard to such
acts within a specific and reasonable time. The regulation of a headgate or
controlling works as provided in RCW 90.03.070, by a watermaster, stream
patrolman, or other person so authorized by the department shall constitute a
regulatory order within the meaning of this section. A regulatory order issued
hereunder shall become effective immediately upon receipt by the person to whom
the order is directed, except for regulations under RCW 90.03.070 which shall
become effective when a written notice is attached as provided therein.

(2)
If the department finds that a person is adversely affecting rights senior to
that person, the department shall issue a regulatory order according to this
subsection.

(a)
If there is no existing water rights determination decree, the department shall
find seniority based on the relevant facts and records.

(b)
Before issuing a regulatory order the department shall notify the person
alleged to be in violation. The notice shall specify the provision of the law
alleged to be or about to be violated, the facts upon which the conclusion of a
violation or potential violation is based, and any necessary corrective action
to be taken to avoid the entry of a regulatory order. The notice shall state
that the order shall be issued no sooner than five days after receipt of the
notice, unless the recipient notifies the department that it intends to contest
the order and requests a hearing before the department before its issuance.

(c)
The order shall be effective immediately upon issuance, unless otherwise stated
in the order.

(3)
Any person aggrieved by such order may appeal the order pursuant to RCW
43.21B.310.

Sec.
4. RCW
43.21A.064 and 1997 c 443 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject
to RCW 43.21A.068, the director of the department of ecology shall have the
following powers and duties:

(1)
The supervision of public waters within the state and their appropriation,
diversion, and use, and of the various officers connected therewith;

(2)
Insofar as may be necessary to assure safety to life or property, the director
shall inspect the construction of all dams, canals, ditches, irrigation
systems, hydraulic power plants, and all other works, systems, and plants
pertaining to the use of water, and may require such necessary changes in the
construction or maintenance of said works, to be made from time to time, as
will reasonably secure safety to life and property;

(3)
The director shall regulate and control the diversion of water in accordance
with the rights thereto and in accordance with RCW 43.27A.190;

(4)
The director shall determine the discharge of streams and springs and other
sources of water supply, and the capacities of lakes and of reservoirs whose
waters are being or may be utilized for beneficial purposes;

(5)
The director shall, if requested, provide assistance to an applicant for a
water right in obtaining or developing an adequate and appropriate supply of
water consistent with the land use permitted for the area in which the water is
to be used and the population forecast for the area under RCW 43.62.035. If
the applicant is a public water supply system, the supply being sought must be
used in a manner consistent with applicable land use, watershed and water
system plans, and the population forecast for that area provided under RCW
43.62.035;

(6)
The director shall keep such records as may be necessary for the recording of
the financial transactions and statistical data thereof, and shall procure all
necessary documents, forms, and blanks. The director shall keep a seal of the
office, and all certificates covering any of the director's acts or the acts of
the director's office, or the records and files of that office, under such
seal, shall be taken as evidence thereof in all courts;

(7)
The director shall render when required by the governor, a full written report
of the office's work with such recommendations for legislation as the director
deems advisable for the better control and development of the water resources
of the state;

(8)
The director and duly authorized deputies may administer oaths;

(9)
The director shall establish and promulgate rules governing the administration
of chapter 90.03 RCW;

(10)
The director shall perform such other duties as may be prescribed by law.

Sec.
5. RCW
90.14.130 and 1987 c 109 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

When it appears to the department of ecology that a person entitled
to the use of water has ((not)) failed to beneficially ((used
his)) use the water right or some portion thereof((,)) through
nonuse or waste and it appears that said right has or may have reverted to
the state because of such ((nonuse)) failure, as provided by RCW
90.14.160, 90.14.170, or 90.14.180, the department of ecology shall notify such
person by order: PROVIDED, That where a company, association, district, or the
United States has filed a blanket claim under the provisions of RCW 90.14.060
for the total benefits of those served by it, the notice shall be served on
such company, association, district or the United States and not upon any of
its individual water users who may not have used the water or some portion
thereof which they were entitled to use. The order shall contain: (1) A
description of the water right, including the approximate location of the point
of diversion, the general description of the lands or places where such waters
were used, the water source, the amount involved, the purpose of use, and the
apparent authority upon which the right is based; (2) a statement that unless
sufficient cause be shown on appeal the water right will be declared
relinquished; and (3) a statement that such order may be appealed to the
pollution control hearings board. Any person aggrieved by such an order may
appeal it to the pollution control hearings board pursuant to RCW 43.21B.310.
The order shall be served by registered or certified mail to the last known
address of the person and be posted at the point of division or withdrawal.
The order by itself shall not alter the recipient's right to use water, if any.

---
END ---