BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
1.16.050 and 1993 c 129 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
following are legal holidays: Sunday; the first day of January, commonly
called New Year's Day; the third Monday of January, being celebrated as the
anniversary of the birth of Martin Luther King, Jr.; the third Monday of
February to be known as Presidents' Day and to be celebrated as the anniversary
of the births of Abraham Lincoln and George Washington; the last Monday of May,
commonly known as Memorial Day; the fourth day of July, being the anniversary
of the Declaration of Independence; the first Monday in September, to be known
as Labor Day; the eleventh day of November, to be known as Veterans' Day; the
fourth Thursday in November, to be known as Thanksgiving Day; the day
immediately following Thanksgiving Day; and the twenty-fifth day of December,
commonly called Christmas Day.

Employees
of the state and its political subdivisions, except employees of school
districts and except those nonclassified employees of institutions of higher
education who hold appointments or are employed under contracts to perform
services for periods of less than twelve consecutive months, shall be entitled
to one paid holiday per calendar year in addition to those specified in this
section. However, nothing in this section prevents school district
employees from receiving personal holidays or sharing those personal holidays
pursuant to RCW 28A.400.380 and 41.04.650 through 41.04.665. Each employee
of the state or its political subdivisions may select the day on which the
employee desires to take the additional holiday provided for herein after
consultation with the employer pursuant to guidelines to be promulgated by rule
of the appropriate personnel authority, or in the case of local government by
ordinance or resolution of the legislative authority.

If
any of the above specified state legal holidays are also federal legal holidays
but observed on different dates, only the state legal holidays shall be
recognized as a paid legal holiday for employees of the state and its political
subdivisions except that for port districts and the law enforcement and public
transit employees of municipal corporations, either the federal or the state
legal holiday, but in no case both, may be recognized as a paid legal holiday
for employees.

Whenever
any legal holiday, other than Sunday, falls upon a Sunday, the following Monday
shall be the legal holiday.

Whenever
any legal holiday falls upon a Saturday, the preceding Friday shall be the
legal holiday.

Nothing
in this section shall be construed to have the effect of adding or deleting the
number of paid holidays provided for in an agreement between employees and
employers of political subdivisions of the state or as established by ordinance
or resolution of the local government legislative authority.

The
legislature declares that the twelfth day of October shall be recognized as
Columbus Day but shall not be considered a legal holiday for any purposes.

The
legislature declares that the ninth day of April shall be recognized as former
prisoner of war recognition day but shall not be considered a legal holiday for
any purposes.

The
legislature declares that the twenty-sixth day of January shall be recognized
as Washington army and air national guard day but shall not be considered a
legal holiday for any purposes.

The
legislature declares that the seventh day of August shall be recognized as
purple heart recipient recognition day but shall not be considered a legal
holiday for any purposes.

The legislature declares that the second Sunday in October be
recognized as Washington state children's day but shall not be considered a
legal holiday for any purposes.

---
END ---