BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.94A.120 and 1998 c 260 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

When
a person is convicted of a felony, the court shall impose punishment as
provided in this section.

(1)
Except as authorized in subsections (2), (4), (5), (6), and (8) of this
section, the court shall impose a sentence within the sentence range for the
offense.

(2)
The court may impose a sentence outside the standard sentence range for that
offense if it finds, considering the purpose of this chapter, that there are
substantial and compelling reasons justifying an exceptional sentence.

(3)
Whenever a sentence outside the standard range is imposed, the court shall set
forth the reasons for its decision in written findings of fact and conclusions
of law. A sentence outside the standard range shall be a determinate sentence.

(4)
A persistent offender shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement for
life without the possibility of parole or, when authorized by RCW 10.95.030 for
the crime of aggravated murder in the first degree, sentenced to death,
notwithstanding the maximum sentence under any other law. An offender
convicted of the crime of murder in the first degree shall be sentenced to a
term of total confinement not less than twenty years. An offender convicted of
the crime of assault in the first degree or assault of a child in the first
degree where the offender used force or means likely to result in death or
intended to kill the victim shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement
not less than five years. An offender convicted of the crime of rape in the
first degree shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement not less than
five years. The foregoing minimum terms of total confinement are mandatory and
shall not be varied or modified as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
In addition, all offenders subject to the provisions of this subsection shall
not be eligible for community custody, earned early release time, furlough,
home detention, partial confinement, work crew, work release, or any other form
of early release as defined under RCW 9.94A.150 (1), (2), (3), (5), (7), or
(8), or any other form of authorized leave of absence from the correctional facility
while not in the direct custody of a corrections officer or officers during
such minimum terms of total confinement except in the case of an offender in
need of emergency medical treatment or for the purpose of commitment to an
inpatient treatment facility in the case of an offender convicted of the crime
of rape in the first degree.

(5)
In sentencing a first-time offender the court may waive the imposition of a
sentence within the sentence range and impose a sentence which may include up
to ninety days of confinement in a facility operated or utilized under contract
by the county and a requirement that the offender refrain from committing new
offenses. The sentence may also include up to two years of community
supervision, which, in addition to crime-related prohibitions, may include
requirements that the offender perform any one or more of the following:

(a)
Devote time to a specific employment or occupation;

(b)
Undergo available outpatient treatment for up to two years, or inpatient
treatment not to exceed the standard range of confinement for that offense;

(c)
Pursue a prescribed, secular course of study or vocational training;

(d)
Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the
community corrections officer prior to any change in the offender's address or
employment;

(e)
Report as directed to the court and a community corrections officer; or

(f)
Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations as provided in RCW 9.94A.030
and/or perform community service work.

(6)(a)
An offender is eligible for the special drug offender sentencing alternative
if:

(i)
The offender is convicted of the manufacture, delivery, or possession with
intent to manufacture or deliver a controlled substance classified in Schedule
I or II that is a narcotic drug or a felony that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW or
RCW 69.50.407, a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal
conspiracy to commit such crimes, and the violation does not involve a sentence
enhancement under RCW 9.94A.310 (3) or (4);

(ii)
The offender has no prior convictions for a felony in this state, another
state, or the United States; and

(iii)
The offense involved only a small quantity of the particular controlled
substance as determined by the judge upon consideration of such factors as the
weight, purity, packaging, sale price, and street value of the controlled
substance.

(b)
If the midpoint of the standard range is greater than one year and the
sentencing judge determines that the offender is eligible for this option and
that the offender and the community will benefit from the use of the special
drug offender sentencing alternative, the judge may waive imposition of a
sentence within the standard range and impose a sentence that must include a
period of total confinement in a state facility for one-half of the midpoint of
the standard range. During incarceration in the state facility, offenders
sentenced under this subsection shall undergo a comprehensive substance abuse
assessment and receive, within available resources, treatment services
appropriate for the offender. The treatment services shall be designed by the
division of alcohol and substance abuse of the department of social and health
services, in cooperation with the department of corrections. If the midpoint
of the standard range is twenty-four months or less, no more than three months
of the sentence may be served in a work release status. The court shall also impose
one year of concurrent community custody and community supervision that must
include appropriate outpatient substance abuse treatment, crime-related
prohibitions including a condition not to use illegal controlled substances,
and a requirement to submit to urinalysis or other testing to monitor that
status. The court may require that the monitoring for controlled substances be
conducted by the department or by a treatment alternatives to street crime
program or a comparable court or agency-referred program. The offender may be
required to pay thirty dollars per month while on community custody to offset
the cost of monitoring. In addition, the court shall impose three or more of
the following conditions:

(i)
Devote time to a specific employment or training;

(ii)
Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the
community corrections officer before any change in the offender's address or
employment;

(iii)
Report as directed to a community corrections officer;

(iv)
Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations;

(v)
Perform community service work;

(vi)
Stay out of areas designated by the sentencing judge.

(c)
If the offender violates any of the sentence conditions in (b) of this
subsection, the department shall impose sanctions administratively, with notice
to the prosecuting attorney and the sentencing court. Upon motion of the court
or the prosecuting attorney, a violation hearing shall be held by the court.
If the court finds that conditions have been willfully violated, the court may
impose confinement consisting of up to the remaining one-half of the midpoint
of the standard range. All total confinement served during the period of
community custody shall be credited to the offender, regardless of whether the
total confinement is served as a result of the original sentence, as a result
of a sanction imposed by the department, or as a result of a violation found by
the court. The term of community supervision shall be tolled by any period of
time served in total confinement as a result of a violation found by the court.

(d)
The department shall determine the rules for calculating the value of a day
fine based on the offender's income and reasonable obligations which the
offender has for the support of the offender and any dependents. These rules
shall be developed in consultation with the administrator for the courts, the
office of financial management, and the commission.

(7)
If a sentence range has not been established for the defendant's crime, the
court shall impose a determinate sentence which may include not more than one
year of confinement, community service work, a term of community supervision
not to exceed one year, and/or other legal financial obligations. The court
may impose a sentence which provides more than one year of confinement if the
court finds, considering the purpose of this chapter, that there are
substantial and compelling reasons justifying an exceptional sentence.

(8)(a)(i)
When an offender is convicted of a sex offense other than a violation of RCW
9A.44.050 or a sex offense that is also a serious violent offense and has no
prior convictions for a sex offense or any other felony sex offenses in this or
any other state, the sentencing court, on its own motion or the motion of the
state or the defendant, may order an examination to determine whether the
defendant is amenable to treatment.

The
report of the examination shall include at a minimum the following: The
defendant's version of the facts and the official version of the facts, the
defendant's offense history, an assessment of problems in addition to alleged
deviant behaviors, the offender's social and employment situation, and other
evaluation measures used. The report shall set forth the sources of the
evaluator's information.

The
examiner shall assess and report regarding the defendant's amenability to
treatment and relative risk to the community. A proposed treatment plan shall
be provided and shall include, at a minimum:

(A)
Frequency and type of contact between offender and therapist;

(B)
Specific issues to be addressed in the treatment and description of planned
treatment modalities;

(C)
Monitoring plans, including any requirements regarding living conditions,
lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by family members and others;

(D)
Anticipated length of treatment; and

(E)
Recommended crime-related prohibitions.

The
court on its own motion may order, or on a motion by the state shall order, a
second examination regarding the offender's amenability to treatment. The
evaluator shall be selected by the party making the motion. The defendant
shall pay the cost of any second examination ordered unless the court finds the
defendant to be indigent in which case the state shall pay the cost.

(ii)
After receipt of the reports, the court shall consider whether the offender and
the community will benefit from use of this special sex offender sentencing
alternative and consider the victim's opinion whether the offender should
receive a treatment disposition under this subsection. If the court determines
that this special sex offender sentencing alternative is appropriate, the court
shall then impose a sentence within the sentence range. If this sentence is
less than eleven years of confinement, the court may suspend the execution of
the sentence and impose the following conditions of suspension:

(A)
The court shall place the defendant on community custody for the length of the
suspended sentence or three years, whichever is greater, and require the
offender to comply with any conditions imposed by the department of corrections
under subsection (14) of this section;

(B)
The court shall order treatment for any period up to three years in duration.
The court in its discretion shall order outpatient sex offender treatment or
inpatient sex offender treatment, if available. A community mental health
center may not be used for such treatment unless it has an appropriate program
designed for sex offender treatment. The offender shall not change sex
offender treatment providers or treatment conditions without first notifying
the prosecutor, the community corrections officer, and the court, and shall not
change providers without court approval after a hearing if the prosecutor or
community corrections officer object to the change. In addition, as conditions
of the suspended sentence, the court may impose other sentence conditions including
up to six months of confinement, not to exceed the sentence range of
confinement for that offense, crime-related prohibitions, and requirements that
the offender perform any one or more of the following:

(I)
Devote time to a specific employment or occupation;

(II)
Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the
community corrections officer prior to any change in the offender's address or
employment;

(III)
Report as directed to the court and a community corrections officer;

(IV)
Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations as provided in RCW 9.94A.030,
perform community service work, or any combination thereof; or

(V)
Make recoupment to the victim for the cost of any counseling required as a
result of the offender's crime; and

(C)
Sex offenders sentenced under this special sex offender sentencing alternative
are not eligible to accrue any earned early release time while serving a
suspended sentence.

(iii)
The sex offender therapist shall submit quarterly reports on the defendant's
progress in treatment to the court and the parties. The report shall reference
the treatment plan and include at a minimum the following: Dates of
attendance, defendant's compliance with requirements, treatment activities, the
defendant's relative progress in treatment, and any other material as specified
by the court at sentencing.

(iv)
At the time of sentencing, the court shall set a treatment termination hearing
for three months prior to the anticipated date for completion of treatment.
Prior to the treatment termination hearing, the treatment professional and
community corrections officer shall submit written reports to the court and
parties regarding the defendant's compliance with treatment and monitoring
requirements, and recommendations regarding termination from treatment,
including proposed community supervision conditions. Either party may request
and the court may order another evaluation regarding the advisability of
termination from treatment. The defendant shall pay the cost of any additional
evaluation ordered unless the court finds the defendant to be indigent in which
case the state shall pay the cost. At the treatment termination hearing the
court may: (A) Modify conditions of community custody, and either (B) terminate
treatment, or (C) extend treatment for up to the remaining period of community
custody.

(v)
If a violation of conditions occurs during community custody, the department
shall either impose sanctions as provided for in RCW 9.94A.205(2)(a) or refer
the violation to the court and recommend revocation of the suspended sentence
as provided for in (a)(vi) of this subsection.

(vi)
The court may revoke the suspended sentence at any time during the period of
community custody and order execution of the sentence if: (A) The defendant
violates the conditions of the suspended sentence, or (B) the court finds that
the defendant is failing to make satisfactory progress in treatment. All
confinement time served during the period of community custody shall be credited
to the offender if the suspended sentence is revoked.

(vii)
Except as provided in (a)(viii) of this subsection, after July 1, 1991,
examinations and treatment ordered pursuant to this subsection shall only be
conducted by sex offender treatment providers certified by the department of
health pursuant to chapter 18.155 RCW.

(viii)
A sex offender therapist who examines or treats a sex offender pursuant to this
subsection (8) does not have to be certified by the department of health
pursuant to chapter 18.155 RCW if the court finds that: (A) The offender has
already moved to another state or plans to move to another state for reasons
other than circumventing the certification requirements; (B) no certified
providers are available for treatment within a reasonable geographical distance
of the offender's home; and (C) the evaluation and treatment plan comply with
this subsection (8) and the rules adopted by the department of health.

(ix)
For purposes of this subsection (8), "victim" means any person who
has sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to person
or property as a result of the crime charged. "Victim" also means a
parent or guardian of a victim who is a minor child unless the parent or
guardian is the perpetrator of the offense.

(x)
If the defendant was less than eighteen years of age when the charge was filed,
the state shall pay for the cost of initial evaluation and treatment.

(b)
When an offender commits any felony sex offense on or after July 1, 1987, and
is sentenced to a term of confinement of more than one year but less than six
years, the sentencing court may, on its own motion or on the motion of the
offender or the state, request the department of corrections to evaluate
whether the offender is amenable to treatment and the department may place the
offender in a treatment program within a correctional facility operated by the
department.

Except
for an offender who has been convicted of a violation of RCW 9A.44.040 or
9A.44.050, if the offender completes the treatment program before the
expiration of his or her term of confinement, the department of corrections may
request the court to convert the balance of confinement to community
supervision and to place conditions on the offender including crime-related prohibitions
and requirements that the offender perform any one or more of the following:

(i)
Devote time to a specific employment or occupation;

(ii)
Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the
community corrections officer prior to any change in the offender's address or
employment;

(iii)
Report as directed to the court and a community corrections officer;

(iv)
Undergo available outpatient treatment.

If
the offender violates any of the terms of his or her community supervision, the
court may order the offender to serve out the balance of his or her community
supervision term in confinement in the custody of the department of
corrections.

Nothing
in this subsection (8)(b) shall confer eligibility for such programs for
offenders convicted and sentenced for a sex offense committed prior to July 1,
1987. This subsection (8)(b) does not apply to any crime committed after July
1, 1990.

(c)
Offenders convicted and sentenced for a sex offense committed prior to July 1,
1987, may, subject to available funds, request an evaluation by the department
of corrections to determine whether they are amenable to treatment. If the
offender is determined to be amenable to treatment, the offender may request
placement in a treatment program within a correctional facility operated by the
department. Placement in such treatment program is subject to available funds.

(9)(a)
When a court sentences a person to a term of total confinement to the custody
of the department of corrections for an offense categorized as a sex offense or
a serious violent offense committed after July 1, 1988, but before July 1,
1990, ((assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the second degree))
a violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, any crime against a
person ((where it is determined in accordance with RCW 9.94A.125 that the
defendant or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon at the time of
commission)) under RCW 9.94A.440(2), or any felony offense under
chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW not sentenced under subsection (6) of this section,
committed on or after July 1, 1988, the court shall, in addition to the
other terms of the sentence, sentence the offender to a one-year term of community
placement beginning either upon completion of the term of confinement or at
such time as the offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of earned
early release in accordance with RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2). When the court
sentences an offender under this subsection to the statutory maximum period of
confinement then the community placement portion of the sentence shall consist
entirely of such community custody to which the offender may become eligible,
in accordance with RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2). Any period of community custody
actually served shall be credited against the community placement portion of
the sentence.

(b)
When a court sentences a person to a term of total confinement to the custody
of the department of corrections for an offense categorized as a sex offense
committed on or after July 1, 1990, but before June 6, 1996, a serious violent
offense, vehicular homicide, or vehicular assault, committed on or after July
1, 1990, the court shall in addition to other terms of the sentence, sentence
the offender to community placement for two years or up to the period of earned
early release awarded pursuant to RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2), whichever is
longer. The community placement shall begin either upon completion of the term
of confinement or at such time as the offender is transferred to community
custody in lieu of earned early release in accordance with RCW 9.94A.150 (1)
and (2). When the court sentences an offender under this subsection to the
statutory maximum period of confinement then the community placement portion of
the sentence shall consist entirely of the community custody to which the
offender may become eligible, in accordance with RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2).
Any period of community custody actually served shall be credited against the
community placement portion of the sentence. Unless a condition is waived by
the court, the terms of community placement for offenders sentenced pursuant to
this section shall include the following conditions:

(i)
The offender shall report to and be available for contact with the assigned
community corrections officer as directed;

(ii)
The offender shall work at department of corrections-approved education,
employment, and/or community service;

(iii)
The offender shall not possess or consume controlled substances except pursuant
to lawfully issued prescriptions;

(iv)
The offender shall pay supervision fees as determined by the department of
corrections;

(v)
The residence location and living arrangements are subject to the prior approval
of the department of corrections during the period of community placement; and

(vi)
The offender shall submit to affirmative acts necessary to monitor compliance
with the orders of the court as required by the department.

(c)
As a part of any sentence imposed under (a) or (b) of this subsection, the
court may also order any of the following special conditions:

(i)
The offender shall remain within, or outside of, a specified geographical
boundary;

(ii)
The offender shall not have direct or indirect contact with the victim of the
crime or a specified class of individuals;

(iii)
The offender shall participate in crime-related treatment or counseling
services;

(iv)
The offender shall not consume alcohol;

(v)
The offender shall comply with any crime-related prohibitions; or

(vi)
For an offender convicted of a felony sex offense against a minor victim after
June 6, 1996, the offender shall comply with any terms and conditions of
community placement imposed by the department of corrections relating to contact
between the sex offender and a minor victim or a child of similar age or
circumstance as a previous victim.

(d)
Prior to transfer to, or during, community placement, any conditions of
community placement may be removed or modified so as not to be more restrictive
by the sentencing court, upon recommendation of the department of corrections.

(10)(a)
When a court sentences a person to the custody of the department of corrections
for an offense categorized as a sex offense committed on or after June 6, 1996,
the court shall, in addition to other terms of the sentence, sentence the
offender to community custody for three years or up to the period of earned
early release awarded pursuant to RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2), whichever is
longer. The community custody shall begin either upon completion of the term
of confinement or at such time as the offender is transferred to community
custody in lieu of earned early release in accordance with RCW 9.94A.150 (1)
and (2).

(b)
Unless a condition is waived by the court, the terms of community custody shall
be the same as those provided for in subsection (9)(b) of this section and may
include those provided for in subsection (9)(c) of this section. As part of
any sentence that includes a term of community custody imposed under this
subsection, the court shall also require the offender to comply with any
conditions imposed by the department of corrections under subsection (14) of
this section.

(c)
At any time prior to the completion of a sex offender's term of community
custody, if the court finds that public safety would be enhanced, the court may
impose and enforce an order extending any or all of the conditions imposed
pursuant to this section for a period up to the maximum allowable sentence for
the crime as it is classified in chapter 9A.20 RCW, regardless of the
expiration of the offender's term of community custody. If a violation of a
condition extended under this subsection occurs after the expiration of the
offender's term of community custody, it shall be deemed a violation of the
sentence for the purposes of RCW 9.94A.195 and may be punishable as contempt of
court as provided for in RCW 7.21.040.

(11)
If the court imposes a sentence requiring confinement of thirty days or less,
the court may, in its discretion, specify that the sentence be served on
consecutive or intermittent days. A sentence requiring more than thirty days
of confinement shall be served on consecutive days. Local jail administrators
may schedule court-ordered intermittent sentences as space permits.

(12)
If a sentence imposed includes payment of a legal financial obligation, the
sentence shall specify the total amount of the legal financial obligation owed,
and shall require the offender to pay a specified monthly sum toward that legal
financial obligation. Restitution to victims shall be paid prior to any other
payments of monetary obligations. Any legal financial obligation that is
imposed by the court may be collected by the department, which shall deliver
the amount paid to the county clerk for credit. The offender's compliance with
payment of legal financial obligations shall be supervised by the department
for ten years following the entry of the judgment and sentence or ten years
following the offender's release from total confinement. All monetary payments
ordered shall be paid no later than ten years after the last date of release
from confinement pursuant to a felony conviction or the date the sentence was
entered unless the superior court extends the criminal judgment an additional
ten years. If the legal financial obligations including crime victims'
assessments are not paid during the initial ten-year period, the superior court
may extend jurisdiction under the criminal judgment an additional ten years as
provided in RCW 9.94A.140, 9.94A.142, and 9.94A.145. If jurisdiction under the
criminal judgment is extended, the department is not responsible for
supervision of the offender during the subsequent period. Independent of the
department, the party or entity to whom the legal financial obligation is owed
shall have the authority to utilize any other remedies available to the party
or entity to collect the legal financial obligation. Nothing in this section
makes the department, the state, or any of its employees, agents, or other
persons acting on their behalf liable under any circumstances for the payment
of these legal financial obligations. If an order includes restitution as one
of the monetary assessments, the county clerk shall make disbursements to
victims named in the order.

(13)
Except as provided under RCW 9.94A.140(1) and 9.94A.142(1), a court may not
impose a sentence providing for a term of confinement or community supervision
or community placement which exceeds the statutory maximum for the crime as
provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(14)
All offenders sentenced to terms involving community supervision, community
service, community placement, or legal financial obligation shall be under the
supervision of the department of corrections and shall follow explicitly the
instructions and conditions of the department of corrections. The department
may require an offender to perform affirmative acts it deems appropriate to
monitor compliance with the conditions of the sentence imposed.

(a)
The instructions shall include, at a minimum, reporting as directed to a
community corrections officer, remaining within prescribed geographical
boundaries, notifying the community corrections officer of any change in the offender's
address or employment, and paying the supervision fee assessment.

(b)
For offenders sentenced to terms involving community custody for crimes
committed on or after June 6, 1996, the department may include, in addition to
the instructions in (a) of this subsection, any appropriate conditions of
supervision, including but not limited to, prohibiting the offender from having
contact with any other specified individuals or specific class of individuals.
The conditions authorized under this subsection (14)(b) may be imposed by the
department prior to or during an offender's community custody term. If a
violation of conditions imposed by the court or the department pursuant to
subsection (10) of this section occurs during community custody, it shall be
deemed a violation of community placement for the purposes of RCW 9.94A.207 and
shall authorize the department to transfer an offender to a more restrictive
confinement status as provided in RCW 9.94A.205. At any time prior to the
completion of a sex offender's term of community custody, the department may
recommend to the court that any or all of the conditions imposed by the court
or the department pursuant to subsection (10) of this section be continued
beyond the expiration of the offender's term of community custody as authorized
in subsection (10)(c) of this section.

The
department may require offenders to pay for special services rendered on or
after July 25, 1993, including electronic monitoring, day reporting, and
telephone reporting, dependent upon the offender's ability to pay. The
department may pay for these services for offenders who are not able to pay.

(15)
All offenders sentenced to terms involving community supervision, community
service, or community placement under the supervision of the department of
corrections shall not own, use, or possess firearms or ammunition. Offenders
who own, use, or are found to be in actual or constructive possession of
firearms or ammunition shall be subject to the appropriate violation process
and sanctions. "Constructive possession" as used in this subsection
means the power and intent to control the firearm or ammunition.
"Firearm" as used in this subsection means a weapon or device from
which a projectile may be fired by an explosive such as gunpowder.

(16)
The sentencing court shall give the offender credit for all confinement time
served before the sentencing if that confinement was solely in regard to the
offense for which the offender is being sentenced.

(17)
A departure from the standards in RCW 9.94A.400 (1) and (2) governing whether
sentences are to be served consecutively or concurrently is an exceptional
sentence subject to the limitations in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
and may be appealed by the defendant or the state as set forth in RCW 9.94A.210
(2) through (6).

(18)
The court shall order restitution whenever the offender is convicted of a
felony that results in injury to any person or damage to or loss of property,
whether the offender is sentenced to confinement or placed under community
supervision, unless extraordinary circumstances exist that make restitution
inappropriate in the court's judgment. The court shall set forth the
extraordinary circumstances in the record if it does not order restitution.

(19)
As a part of any sentence, the court may impose and enforce an order that
relates directly to the circumstances of the crime for which the offender has
been convicted, prohibiting the offender from having any contact with other
specified individuals or a specific class of individuals for a period not to
exceed the maximum allowable sentence for the crime, regardless of the
expiration of the offender's term of community supervision or community
placement.

(20)
The court may order an offender whose sentence includes community placement or
community supervision to undergo a mental status evaluation and to participate
in available outpatient mental health treatment, if the court finds that
reasonable grounds exist to believe that the offender is a mentally ill person
as defined in RCW 71.24.025, and that this condition is likely to have
influenced the offense. An order requiring mental status evaluation or
treatment must be based on a presentence report and, if applicable, mental
status evaluations that have been filed with the court to determine the
offender's competency or eligibility for a defense of insanity. The court may
order additional evaluations at a later date if deemed appropriate.

(21)
In any sentence of partial confinement, the court may require the defendant to
serve the partial confinement in work release, in a program of home detention,
on work crew, or in a combined program of work crew and home detention.

(22)
All court-ordered legal financial obligations collected by the department and
remitted to the county clerk shall be credited and paid where restitution is
ordered. Restitution shall be paid prior to any other payments of monetary
obligations.

Sec.
2. RCW
9.94A.440 and 1996 c 93 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Decision not to prosecute.

STANDARD:
A prosecuting attorney may decline to prosecute, even though technically
sufficient evidence to prosecute exists, in situations where prosecution would
serve no public purpose, would defeat the underlying purpose of the law in
question or would result in decreased respect for the law.

GUIDELINE/COMMENTARY:

Examples

The
following are examples of reasons not to prosecute which could satisfy the
standard.

(a)
Contrary to Legislative Intent - It may be proper to decline to charge where
the application of criminal sanctions would be clearly contrary to the intent
of the legislature in enacting the particular statute.

(b)
Antiquated Statute - It may be proper to decline to charge where the statute in
question is antiquated in that:

(i)
It has not been enforced for many years; and

(ii)
Most members of society act as if it were no longer in existence; and

(iii)
It serves no deterrent or protective purpose in today's society; and

(iv)
The statute has not been recently reconsidered by the legislature.

This
reason is not to be construed as the basis for declining cases because the law
in question is unpopular or because it is difficult to enforce.

(c)
De Minimus Violation - It may be proper to decline to charge where the
violation of law is only technical or insubstantial and where no public
interest or deterrent purpose would be served by prosecution.

(d)
Confinement on Other Charges - It may be proper to decline to charge because
the accused has been sentenced on another charge to a lengthy period of
confinement; and

(i)
Conviction of the new offense would not merit any additional direct or
collateral punishment;

(ii)
The new offense is either a misdemeanor or a felony which is not particularly
aggravated; and

(iii)
Conviction of the new offense would not serve any significant deterrent
purpose.

(e)
Pending Conviction on Another Charge - It may be proper to decline to charge
because the accused is facing a pending prosecution in the same or another
county; and

(i)
Conviction of the new offense would not merit any additional direct or
collateral punishment;

(ii)
Conviction in the pending prosecution is imminent;

(iii)
The new offense is either a misdemeanor or a felony which is not particularly
aggravated; and

(iv)
Conviction of the new offense would not serve any significant deterrent
purpose.

(f)
High Disproportionate Cost of Prosecution - It may be proper to decline to
charge where the cost of locating or transporting, or the burden on,
prosecution witnesses is highly disproportionate to the importance of
prosecuting the offense in question. This reason should be limited to minor
cases and should not be relied upon in serious cases.

(g)
Improper Motives of Complainant - It may be proper to decline charges because
the motives of the complainant are improper and prosecution would serve no
public purpose, would defeat the underlying purpose of the law in question or
would result in decreased respect for the law.

(h)
Immunity - It may be proper to decline to charge where immunity is to be given
to an accused in order to prosecute another where the accused's information or
testimony will reasonably lead to the conviction of others who are responsible
for more serious criminal conduct or who represent a greater danger to the
public interest.

(i)
Victim Request - It may be proper to decline to charge because the victim
requests that no criminal charges be filed and the case involves the following
crimes or situations:

(i)
Assault cases where the victim has suffered little or no injury;

(ii)
Crimes against property, not involving violence, where no major loss was
suffered;

(iii)
Where doing so would not jeopardize the safety of society.

Care
should be taken to insure that the victim's request is freely made and is not
the product of threats or pressure by the accused.

The
presence of these factors may also justify the decision to dismiss a
prosecution which has been commenced.

Notification

The
prosecutor is encouraged to notify the victim, when practical, and the law
enforcement personnel, of the decision not to prosecute.

(2)
Decision to prosecute.

(a)
STANDARD:

Crimes
against persons will be filed if sufficient admissible evidence exists, which,
when considered with the most plausible, reasonably foreseeable defense that
could be raised under the evidence, would justify conviction by a reasonable
and objective fact-finder. With regard to offenses prohibited by RCW
9A.44.040, 9A.44.050, 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, 9A.44.079, 9A.44.083, 9A.44.086,
9A.44.089, and 9A.64.020 the prosecutor should avoid prefiling agreements or
diversions intended to place the accused in a program of treatment or
counseling, so that treatment, if determined to be beneficial, can be provided
pursuant to RCW 9.94A.120(8).

Crimes
against property/other crimes will be filed if the admissible evidence is of
such convincing force as to make it probable that a reasonable and objective
fact-finder would convict after hearing all the admissible evidence and the
most plausible defense that could be raised.

See
table below for the crimes within these categories.

CATEGORIZATION OF CRIMES FOR PROSECUTING STANDARDS

CRIMES AGAINST PERSONS

Aggravated Murder

1st
Degree Murder

2nd
Degree Murder

1st
Degree Kidnaping

1st
Degree Assault

1st
Degree Assault of a Child

1st
Degree Rape

1st
Degree Robbery

1st
Degree Rape of a Child

1st
Degree Arson

2nd
Degree Kidnaping

2nd
Degree Assault

2nd
Degree Assault of a Child

2nd
Degree Rape

2nd
Degree Robbery

1st
Degree Burglary

1st
Degree Manslaughter

2nd
Degree Manslaughter

1st
Degree Extortion

Indecent
Liberties

Incest

2nd
Degree Rape of a Child

Vehicular
Homicide

Vehicular
Assault

3rd
Degree Rape

3rd
Degree Rape of a Child

1st
Degree Child Molestation

2nd
Degree Child Molestation

3rd
Degree Child Molestation

2nd
Degree Extortion

1st
Degree Promoting Prostitution

Intimidating
a Juror

Communication
with a Minor

Intimidating
a Witness

Intimidating
a Public Servant

Bomb
Threat (if against person)

3rd
Degree Assault

3rd
Degree Assault of a Child

Unlawful
Imprisonment

Promoting
a Suicide Attempt

Riot
(if against person)

Stalking

Custodial
Assault

No-Contact Order-Domestic Violence Pretrial (RCW 10.99.040(4)
(b) and (c))

No-Contact Order-Domestic Violence Sentence (RCW 10.99.050(2))

Protection
Order-Domestic Violence Civil (RCW 26.50.110 (4) and (5))

CRIMES AGAINST PROPERTY/OTHER CRIMES

2nd Degree Arson

1st
Degree Escape

2nd
Degree Burglary

1st
Degree Theft

1st
Degree Perjury

1st
Degree Introducing Contraband

1st
Degree Possession of Stolen Property

Bribery

Bribing
a Witness

Bribe
received by a Witness

Bomb
Threat (if against property)

1st
Degree Malicious Mischief

2nd
Degree Theft

2nd
Degree Escape

2nd
Degree Introducing Contraband

2nd
Degree Possession of Stolen Property

2nd
Degree Malicious Mischief

1st
Degree Reckless Burning

Taking
a Motor Vehicle without Authorization

Forgery

2nd
Degree Perjury

2nd
Degree Promoting Prostitution

Tampering
with a Witness

Trading
in Public Office

Trading
in Special Influence

Receiving/Granting
Unlawful Compensation

Bigamy

Eluding
a Pursuing Police Vehicle

Willful
Failure to Return from Furlough

Escape
from Community Custody

Riot
(if against property)

Thefts
of Livestock

ALL
OTHER UNCLASSIFIED FELONIES

Selection
of Charges/Degree of Charge

(((1)))
(i) The prosecutor should file charges which adequately describe the
nature of defendant's conduct. Other offenses may be charged only if they are
necessary to ensure that the charges:

(((a)))
(A) Will significantly enhance the strength of the state's case at
trial; or

(((b)))
(B) Will result in restitution to all victims.

(((2))) (ii) The prosecutor should not overcharge to
obtain a guilty plea. Overcharging includes:

(((a))) (A) Charging a higher degree;

(((b)))
(B) Charging additional counts.

This
standard is intended to direct prosecutors to charge those crimes which
demonstrate the nature and seriousness of a defendant's criminal conduct, but
to decline to charge crimes which are not necessary to such an indication.
Crimes which do not merge as a matter of law, but which arise from the same
course of conduct, do not all have to be charged.

(b) GUIDELINES/COMMENTARY:

(i) Police Investigation

A
prosecuting attorney is dependent upon law enforcement agencies to conduct the
necessary factual investigation which must precede the decision to prosecute.
The prosecuting attorney shall ensure that a thorough factual investigation has
been conducted before a decision to prosecute is made. In ordinary
circumstances the investigation should include the following:

(((1)))
(A) The interviewing of all material witnesses, together with the
obtaining of written statements whenever possible;

(((2)))
(B) The completion of necessary laboratory tests; and

(((3)))
(C) The obtaining, in accordance with constitutional requirements, of
the suspect's version of the events.

If
the initial investigation is incomplete, a prosecuting attorney should insist
upon further investigation before a decision to prosecute is made, and specify
what the investigation needs to include.

(ii)
Exceptions

In
certain situations, a prosecuting attorney may authorize filing of a criminal
complaint before the investigation is complete if:

(((1)))
(A) Probable cause exists to believe the suspect is guilty; and

(((2)))
(B) The suspect presents a danger to the community or is likely to flee
if not apprehended; or

(((3)))
(C) The arrest of the suspect is necessary to complete the investigation
of the crime.

In
the event that the exception to the standard is applied, the prosecuting
attorney shall obtain a commitment from the law enforcement agency involved to
complete the investigation in a timely manner. If the subsequent investigation
does not produce sufficient evidence to meet the normal charging standard, the
complaint should be dismissed.

(iii)
Investigation Techniques

The
prosecutor should be fully advised of the investigatory techniques that were
used in the case investigation including:

(((1)))
(A) Polygraph testing;

(((2)))
(B) Hypnosis;

(((3)))
(C) Electronic surveillance;

(((4)))
(D) Use of informants.

(iv)
Pre-Filing Discussions with Defendant

Discussions
with the defendant or his/her representative regarding the selection or
disposition of charges may occur prior to the filing of charges, and potential
agreements can be reached.

(v)
Pre-Filing Discussions with Victim(s)

Discussions with the victim(s) or victims' representatives
regarding the selection or disposition of charges may occur before the filing
of charges. The discussions may be considered by the prosecutor in charging
and disposition decisions, and should be considered before reaching any
agreement with the defendant regarding these decisions.

---
END ---