BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 50.40 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
An individual filing a new claim for unemployment compensation shall, at the
time of filing such claim, disclose whether he or she owes an uncollected
overissuance of food stamp coupons. The commissioner shall notify the state
food stamp agency enforcing such obligation of any such individual who is
determined to be eligible for unemployment compensation.

(2)
The commissioner shall deduct and withhold from any unemployment compensation
payable to an individual who owes an uncollected overissuance:

(a)
The amount specified by the individual to be deducted and withheld under this
section;

(b)
The amount determined pursuant to an agreement submitted to the state food
stamp agency under section 13(c)(3)(A) of the food stamp act of 1977, as
existing on the effective date of this section; or

(c)
Any amount otherwise required to be deducted and withheld from unemployment
compensation pursuant to section 13(c)(3)(B) of the food stamp act of 1977, as
existing on the effective date of this section.

(3)
Any amount deducted and withheld under this section shall be paid by the
commissioner to the appropriate state food stamp agency.

(4)
Any amount deducted and withheld under subsection (2) of this section shall for
all purposes be treated as if it were paid to the individual as unemployment
compensation and paid by such individual to the state food stamp agency as
repayment of the individual's uncollected overissuance.

(5)
For the purposes of this section, the term "unemployment
compensation" means any compensation payable under this act including
amounts payable by the commissioner pursuant to an agreement under any federal
law providing for compensation, assistance, or allowances with respect to
unemployment.

(6)
This section applies only if arrangements have been made for reimbursement by
the state food stamp agency for the administrative costs incurred by the
commissioner under this section which are attributable to the repayment of
uncollected overissuances to the state food stamp agency.

Sec.
2. RCW
50.16.030 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 7 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Moneys shall be requisitioned from this state's account in the unemployment
trust fund solely for the payment of benefits and repayment of loans from the federal
government to guarantee solvency of the unemployment compensation fund in
accordance with regulations prescribed by the commissioner, except that money
credited to this state's account pursuant to section 903 of the social security
act, as amended, shall be used exclusively as provided in RCW 50.16.030(5).
The commissioner shall from time to time requisition from the unemployment
trust fund such amounts, not exceeding the amounts standing to its account
therein, as he deems necessary for the payment of benefits for a reasonable
future period. Upon receipt thereof the treasurer shall deposit such moneys in
the benefit account and shall issue his or her warrants for the payment
of benefits solely from such benefits account.

(2)
Expenditures of such moneys in the benefit account and refunds from the
clearing account shall not be subject to any provisions of law requiring
specific appropriations or other formal release by state officers of money in
their custody, and RCW 43.01.050, as amended, shall not apply. All warrants
issued by the treasurer for the payment of benefits and refunds shall bear the
signature of the treasurer and the countersignature of the commissioner, or his
or her duly authorized agent for that purpose.

(3)
Any balance of moneys requisitioned from the unemployment trust fund which
remains unclaimed or unpaid in the benefit account after the expiration of the
period for which sums were requisitioned shall either be deducted from
estimates for, and may be utilized for the payment of, benefits during
succeeding periods, or in the discretion of the commissioner, shall be
redeposited with the secretary of the treasury of the United States of America
to the credit of this state's account in the unemployment trust fund.

(4)
Money credited to the account of this state in the unemployment trust fund by
the secretary of the treasury of the United States of America pursuant to
section 903 of the social security act, as amended, may be requisitioned and
used for the payment of expenses incurred for the administration of this title
pursuant to a specific appropriation by the legislature, provided that the
expenses are incurred and the money is requisitioned after the enactment of an
appropriation law which:

(a)
Specifies the purposes for which such money is appropriated and the
amounts appropriated therefor((,));

(b)
Limits the period within which such money may be obligated to a period
ending not more than two years after the date of the enactment of the
appropriation law((,)); and

(c)
Limits the amount which may be obligated during a twelve-month period
beginning on July 1st and ending on the next June 30th to an amount which does
not exceed the amount by which (i) the aggregate of the amounts credited to the
account of this state pursuant to section 903 of the social security act, as
amended, during the same twelve-month period and the thirty-four preceding
twelve-month periods, exceeds (ii) the aggregate of the amounts obligated
pursuant to RCW 50.16.030(4), (5) and (6) and charged against the amounts
credited to the account of this state during any of such thirty-five
twelve-month periods. For the purposes of RCW 50.16.030(4), (5) and (6),
amounts obligated during any such twelve-month period shall be charged against
equivalent amounts which were first credited and which are not already so
charged; except that no amount obligated for administration during any such
twelve-month period may be charged against any amount credited during such a
twelve-month period earlier than the thirty-fourth twelve-month period
preceding such period: PROVIDED, That any amount credited to this state's
account under section 903 of the social security act, as amended, which has
been appropriated for expenses of administration, whether or not withdrawn from
the trust fund shall be excluded from the unemployment compensation fund
balance for the purpose of experience rating credit determination.

(5)
Money credited to the account of this state pursuant to section 903 of the
social security act, as amended, may not be withdrawn or used except for the
payment of benefits and for the payment of expenses of administration and of
public employment offices pursuant to RCW 50.16.030 (4), (5) and (6). However,
moneys credited because of excess amounts in federal accounts in federal fiscal
years 1999, 2000, and 2001 shall be used solely for the administration of the
unemployment compensation program and are not subject to appropriation by the
legislature for any other purpose.

(6)
Money requisitioned as provided in RCW 50.16.030 (4), (5) and (6) for the
payment of expenses of administration shall be deposited in the unemployment
compensation fund, but until expended, shall remain a part of the unemployment
compensation fund. The commissioner shall maintain a separate record of the
deposit, obligation, expenditure and return of funds so deposited. Any money
so deposited which either will not be obligated within the period specified by
the appropriation law or remains unobligated at the end of the period, and any
money which has been obligated within the period but will not be expended,
shall be returned promptly to the account of this state in the unemployment
trust fund.

Sec.
3. RCW
50.40.020 and 1982 1st ex.s. c 18 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
assignment, pledge, or encumbrance of any right to benefits which are or may
become due or payable under this title shall be void. Such rights to benefits
shall be exempt from levy, execution, attachment, or any other remedy
whatsoever provided for the collection of debts, except as provided in RCW
50.40.050 and section 1 of this act. Benefits received by any
individual, so long as they are not commingled with other funds of the
recipient, shall be exempt from any remedy whatsoever for collection of all
debts except debts incurred for necessaries furnished such individual or his
spouse or dependents during the time when such individual was unemployed. Any
waiver of any exemption provided for in this section shall be void.

Sec.
4. RCW
50.44.050 and 1998 c 233 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as otherwise provided in subsections (1) through (4) of this section, benefits
based on services in employment covered by or pursuant to this chapter shall be
payable on the same terms and subject to the same conditions as compensation
payable on the basis of other service subject to this title.

(1)
Benefits based on any service in an instructional, research, or
principal administrative capacity for ((an)) any educational
institution shall not be paid to an individual for any week of unemployment which
commences during the period between two successive academic years or between
two successive academic terms within an academic year (or, when an agreement
provides instead for a similar period between two regular but not successive
terms within an academic year, during such period) if such individual performs
such services in the first of such academic years or terms and if there is a
contract or reasonable assurance that such individual will perform services in
any such capacity for any educational institution in the second of such
academic years or terms. Any employee of a common school district who is
presumed to be reemployed pursuant to RCW 28A.405.210 shall be deemed to have a
contract for the ensuing term.

(2)
Benefits shall not be paid based on any services in any other capacity
for ((an)) any educational institution for any week of
unemployment which commences during the period between two successive academic
years or between two successive academic terms within an academic year, if such
individual performs such services in the first of such academic years or terms
and there is a reasonable assurance that such individual will perform such
services in the second of such academic years or terms: PROVIDED, That if
benefits are denied to any individual under this subsection and that individual
was not offered an opportunity to perform such services for the educational
institution for the second of such academic years or terms, the individual is
entitled to a retroactive payment of benefits for each week for which the
individual filed a timely claim for benefits and for which benefits were denied
solely by reason of this subsection.

(3)
Benefits shall not be paid based on any services described in subsections (1)
and (2) of this section for any week of unemployment which commences during an
established and customary vacation period or holiday recess if such individual
performs such services for any educational institution in the period
immediately before such vacation period or holiday recess, and there is a
reasonable assurance that such individual will perform such services for any
educational institution in the period immediately following such vacation
period or holiday recess.

(4)
Benefits shall not be paid (as specified in subsections (1), (2), or (3) of
this section) based on any services described in subsections (1) or (2) of this
section to any individual who performed such services in ((an)) any
educational institution while in the employ of an educational service district
which is established pursuant to chapter 28A.310 RCW and exists to provide
services to local school districts.

(5)
As used in this section, "academic year" means: Fall, winter,
spring, and summer quarters or comparable semesters unless, based upon
objective criteria including enrollment and staffing, the quarter or comparable
semester is not in fact a part of the academic year for the particular
institution.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. If
any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state or
the eligibility of employers in this state for federal unemployment tax
credits, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent
of the conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the operation
of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by
the state or the granting of federal unemployment tax credits to employers in
this state.

---
END ---