BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.99.070 and 1995 c 166 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon
expiration of the time limited by RCW 82.36.330 for claiming of refunds of tax
on marine fuel, the state of Washington shall succeed to the right to such
refunds. The director of licensing, after taking into account past and
anticipated claims for refunds from and deposits to the marine fuel tax refund
account and the costs of carrying out the provisions of RCW 43.99.030, shall
request the state treasurer to transfer ((monthly from the marine fuel tax
refund account an amount equal to the proportion of the moneys in the account
representing the motor vehicle fuel tax rate under RCW 82.36.025 in effect on
January 1, 1990, to the recreation resource account and the remainder to the motor
vehicle fund)) to the recreation resource account such of the moneys in
the marine fuel tax refund account that are not required for payment of the
refund claims or costs, and the state treasurer shall make the transfer.

Sec.
2. RCW
46.09.170 and 1995 c 166 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
From time to time, but at least once each year, the state treasurer shall
refund from the motor vehicle fund one percent of the motor vehicle fuel tax
revenues collected under chapter 82.36 RCW, ((based on the tax rate in
effect January 1, 1990,)) less proper deductions for refunds and costs of
collection as provided in RCW 46.68.090. The treasurer shall place these funds
in the general fund as follows:

(a)
Forty percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway vehicle account and
administered by the department of natural resources solely for planning,
maintenance, and management of ORV recreation facilities, nonhighway roads, and
nonhighway road recreation facilities. The funds under this subsection shall
be expended in accordance with the following limitations:

(i)
Not more than five percent may be expended for information programs under this
chapter;

(ii)
Not less than ten percent and not more than fifty percent may be expended for
ORV recreation facilities;

(iii)
Not more than twenty-five percent may be expended for maintenance of nonhighway
roads;

(iv)
Not more than fifty percent may be expended for nonhighway road recreation
facilities;

(v)
Ten percent shall be transferred to the interagency committee for outdoor
recreation for grants to law enforcement agencies in those counties where the
department of natural resources maintains ORV facilities. This amount is in
addition to those distributions made by the interagency committee for outdoor
recreation under (d)(i) of this subsection;

(b)
Three and one-half percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway vehicle
account and administered by the department of fish and wildlife solely for the
acquisition, planning, development, maintenance, and management of nonhighway
roads and recreation facilities;

(c)
Two percent shall be credited to the ORV and nonhighway vehicle account and
administered by the parks and recreation commission solely for the maintenance
and management of ORV use areas and facilities; and

(d)
Fifty-four and one-half percent, together with the funds received by the
interagency committee for outdoor recreation under RCW 46.09.110, shall be
credited to the nonhighway and off-road vehicle activities program account to
be administered by the committee for planning, acquisition, development,
maintenance, and management of ORV recreation facilities and nonhighway road
recreation facilities; ORV user education and information; and ORV law
enforcement programs. The funds under this subsection shall be expended in
accordance with the following limitations:

(i)
Not more than twenty percent may be expended for ORV education, information,
and law enforcement programs under this chapter;

(ii)
Not less than an amount equal to the funds received by the interagency
committee for outdoor recreation under RCW 46.09.110 and not more than sixty
percent may be expended for ORV recreation facilities;

(iii)
Not more than twenty percent may be expended for nonhighway road recreation
facilities.

(2)
On a yearly basis an agency may not, except as provided in RCW 46.09.110,
expend more than ten percent of the funds it receives under this chapter for
general administration expenses incurred in carrying out this chapter.

(3)
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, funds disbursed for grants awarded
after December 1, 2001, from the accounts in subsection (1)(d) of this section
shall be spent on motorized and nonmotorized users in proportion to their
actual contributions to such funds as determined by the legislature pursuant to
the study authorized by section 4 of this act.

Sec.
3. RCW
46.10.170 and 1994 c 262 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

From
time to time, but at least once each four years, the department shall determine
the amount of moneys paid to it as motor vehicle fuel tax that is tax on
snowmobile fuel. Such determination shall use one hundred thirty-five gallons
as the average yearly fuel usage per snowmobile((,)) and the
number of registered snowmobiles during the calendar year under determination((,
and the fuel tax rate in effect January 1, 1990)).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
The Washington state interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall
contract with an independent entity to study the source and determine the
distribution and use of funds provided to off-road vehicle and nonhighway road
recreational activities under RCW 46.09.170. The study shall analyze and
determine the relative portion of the motor vehicle fuel tax revenues deposited
to the general fund under RCW 46.09.170 that are attributable to:

(a)
Nonhighway road recreational use for the purpose of trailhead access by hikers,
skiers, and other nonmotorized recreational uses; and

(b)
Nonhighway road recreational use and associated off-road vehicle trail use by
off-road vehicle recreational users.

(2)
The Washington state interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall review
the analysis and submit a report to the standing committees of the legislature,
including recommendations regarding amendments to RCW 46.09.170 to allocate
revenues consistent with the relative proportion of the uses generating such
revenues. The report shall be submitted no later than September 30, 2001.

(3)
The Washington state interagency committee for outdoor recreation shall
establish a technical advisory committee composed of a cross-section of
nonhighway road recreational trail users to advise the agency regarding the
study and report required by this act.

(4) Funds appropriated from the nonhighway and off-road vehicle
account for the purposes of this act shall be in addition to the agency general
administration expenditure limitations of RCW 46.09.170(2).

---
END ---