BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
71.24.310 and 1989 c 205 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that administration of chapter 71.05 RCW and this chapter can
be most efficiently and effectively implemented as part of the regional support
network defined in RCW 71.24.025. For this reason, the legislature intends
that any enhanced program funding for implementation of chapter 71.05 RCW or
this chapter, except for funds allocated for implementation of mandatory
state-wide programs as required by federal statute, and except for funds
appropriated for the purposes under section 2 of this act, be made
available primarily to those counties participating in regional support
networks.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 71.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature finds that specific appropriations for atypical antipsychotic
medications used in community settings are more effectively administered
centrally by the mental health division of the department of social and health
services. It is the intent of the legislature that the mental health division
shall establish a mechanism separate from the regional support network funding
formula for distributing specific appropriations for atypical antipsychotic
medications to the regional support networks. It is the further intent of the
legislature that this mechanism will maximize federal funding opportunities,
and that specific appropriations for these medications shall be targeted toward
underserved groups.

(2) The department shall establish a methodology to assure that
specific appropriations for atypical antipsychotic medications used in
community settings are directed toward each of the following groups: (a)
Persons in crisis who are not medicaid qualified; (b) working poor who are not
medicaid eligible; (c) persons transitioning from jail to medicaid eligibility;
and (d) persons in jail. The department shall establish data mechanisms to
assure that all persons who are medicaid qualified achieve medicaid
eligibility. Lack of medicaid eligibility shall not be a criteria for
exclusion from benefiting from specific appropriations for atypical
antipsychotic medications.

---
END ---