BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec. 1. 1997
c 287 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that the rate of unemployment among ((persons)) individuals
with developmental disabilities or other significant disabilities is
high due to the limited employment opportunities available to ((disabled
persons)) them. Given that ((persons)) individuals
with developmental disabilities or other significant disabilities are
capable of filling employment positions in the general work force population,
supported employment is an effective way of integrating such individuals into
the general work force population. The creation of supported employment
programs can increase the types and availability of employment positions for ((persons))
individuals with developmental disabilities or other significant
disabilities.

Sec.
2. RCW
41.04.750 and 1997 c 287 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise the definitions in this section apply
throughout RCW 41.04.760 through 41.04.780.

(1)
"Developmental disability" means a disability as defined in RCW
71A.10.020.

(2)
"Significant disability" means a disability as defined in 29
U.S.C. Sec. 705.

(3)
"Supported employment" means employment for individuals with
developmental disabilities or other significant disabilities who ((may))
require on-the-job training and long-term support in order to fulfill their job
duties successfully. Supported employment offers the same wages and benefits
as similar nonsupported employment positions.

(((3)))
(4) "State agency" means any office, department, division,
bureau, board, commission, community college or institution of higher
education, or agency of the state of Washington.

Sec.
3. RCW
41.04.760 and 1997 c 287 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

State
agencies are encouraged to participate in supported employment activities. The
department of social and health services, in conjunction with the department of
personnel and the office of financial management, shall identify agencies that
have positions and funding conducive to implementing supported employment. An
agency may only participate in supported employment activities pursuant to this
section if the agency is able to operate the program within its existing
budget. These agencies shall:

(1)
Designate a coordinator who will be responsible for information and resource
referral regarding the agency's supported employment program. The coordinator
shall serve as a liaison between the agency and the department of personnel
regarding supported employment;

(2) Submit an annual update to the department of social and health
services, the department of personnel, and the office of financial management.
The annual update shall include: A description of the agency's supported
employment efforts, the number of ((persons)) individuals placed
in supported employment positions by type of disability, ((recommendations
concerning expanding the supported employment program to include people with
mental disabilities or other disabilities,)) and an overall evaluation of
the effectiveness of supported employment for the agency.

---
END ---