BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
27.24.070 and 1992 c 54 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

In each county pursuant to this chapter, the county treasurer shall
deposit in the county or regional law library fund a sum equal to twelve
dollars for every new probate or civil filing fee, including appeals,
collected by the clerk of the superior court and six dollars for every fee
collected for the commencement of a civil action in district court for the
support of the law library in that county or the regional law library to which
the county belongs: PROVIDED, That upon a showing of need the twelve dollar
contribution may be increased up to fifteen dollars upon the request of the law
library board of trustees and with the approval of the county legislative body
or bodies: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That in each county, upon a showing of
need by the law library board of trustees, a county legislative body or bodies
may impose an additional surcharge not to exceed the maximum amount established
in this section for every new probate or civil filing in superior court and an
additional surcharge not to exceed the maximum amount established in this
section for every fee collected for the commencement of a civil action in
district court for the purpose of funding the county law library. Any
surcharge imposed shall be collected by the clerk of the court and remitted to
the county treasurer for deposit in the county or regional law library fund.

---
END ---