BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.50.530 and 1993 c 32 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

No
mobile home, travel trailer, or camper which is a part of the inventory of
mobile homes, travel trailers, or campers held for sale by a dealer in the
course of his or her business and no travel trailer or camper as defined in RCW
82.50.010 shall be listed and assessed for ad valorem taxation. However, if a
park trailer as defined in RCW 46.04.622 has substantially lost its identity as
a mobile unit by virtue of its being permanently ((fixed)) sited
in location ((upon land owned or leased by the owner of the park trailer))
and placed on a ((permanent)) foundation of either posts or blocks with
((fixed pipe)) connections with sewer, water, or other utilities for
the operation of installed fixtures and appliances, it will be considered
real property and will be subject to ad valorem property taxation imposed in
accordance with the provisions of Title 84 RCW, including the provisions with
respect to omitted property, except that a park trailer located on land ((leased))
not owned by the owner of the park trailer shall be subject to the
personal property provisions of chapter 84.56 RCW and RCW 84.60.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is effective for taxes levied in 1999 for collection in 2000 and
thereafter.

---
END ---