BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
64.06.020 and 1996 c 301 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In a transaction for the sale of residential real property, the seller shall,
unless the buyer has expressly waived the right to receive the disclosure statement,
or unless the transfer is exempt under RCW 64.06.010, deliver to the buyer a
completed real property transfer disclosure statement in the following format
and that contains, at a minimum, the following information:

INSTRUCTIONS
TO THE SELLER

Please
complete the following form. Do not leave any spaces blank. If the question
clearly does not apply to the property write "NA". If the answer is
"yes" to any * items, please explain on attached sheets. Please
refer to the line number(s) of the question(s) when you provide your
explanation(s). For your protection you must date and sign each page of this
disclosure statement and each attachment. Delivery of the disclosure statement
must occur not later than five business days, unless otherwise agreed, after
mutual acceptance of a written contract to purchase between a buyer and a
seller.

NOTICE
TO THE BUYER

THE
FOLLOWING DISCLOSURES ARE MADE BY THE SELLER(S), CONCERNING THE CONDITION OF
THE PROPERTY LOCATED AT.............................

("THE
PROPERTY"), OR AS LEGALLY DESCRIBED ON ATTACHED EXHIBIT A.

DISCLOSURES
CONTAINED IN THIS FORM ARE PROVIDED BY THE SELLER ON THE BASIS OF SELLER'S
ACTUAL KNOWLEDGE OF THE PROPERTY AT THE TIME THIS DISCLOSURE FORM IS COMPLETED
BY THE SELLER. YOU HAVE THREE BUSINESS DAYS, UNLESS OTHERWISE AGREED, FROM THE
SELLER'S DELIVERY OF THIS SELLER'S DISCLOSURE STATEMENT TO RESCIND YOUR
AGREEMENT BY DELIVERING YOUR SEPARATE SIGNED WRITTEN STATEMENT OF RESCISSION TO
THE SELLER, UNLESS YOU WAIVE THIS RIGHT AT OR PRIOR TO ENTERING INTO A SALE
AGREEMENT. THE FOLLOWING ARE DISCLOSURES MADE BY THE SELLER AND ARE NOT THE
REPRESENTATIONS OF ANY REAL ESTATE LICENSEE OR OTHER PARTY. THIS INFORMATION
IS FOR DISCLOSURE ONLY AND IS NOT INTENDED TO BE A PART OF ANY WRITTEN AGREEMENT
BETWEEN THE BUYER AND THE SELLER.

FOR A
MORE COMPREHENSIVE EXAMINATION OF THE SPECIFIC CONDITION OF THIS PROPERTY YOU
ARE ADVISED TO OBTAIN AND PAY FOR THE SERVICES OF A QUALIFIED SPECIALIST TO
INSPECT THE PROPERTY ON YOUR BEHALF, FOR EXAMPLE, ARCHITECTS, ENGINEERS, LAND
SURVEYORS, PLUMBERS, ELECTRICIANS, ROOFERS, BUILDING INSPECTORS, OR PEST AND
DRY ROT INSPECTORS. THE PROSPECTIVE BUYER AND THE OWNER MAY WISH TO OBTAIN
PROFESSIONAL ADVICE OR INSPECTIONS OF THE PROPERTY AND TO PROVIDE FOR APPROPRIATE
PROVISIONS IN A CONTRACT BETWEEN THEM WITH RESPECT TO ANY ADVICE, INSPECTION,
DEFECTS OR WARRANTIES.

Seller
. . . . is/ . . . . is not occupying the
property.

I. SELLER'S
DISCLOSURES:

*If
"Yes" attach a copy or explain. If necessary use an attached sheet.

1.
TITLE

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't knowA. Do you have
legal authority to sell the property?

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know*B. Is title to
the property subject to any of the following?

(1)
First right of refusal

(2)
Option

(3)
Lease or rental agreement

(4)
Life estate?

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know*C. Are there
any encroachments, boundary agreements, or boundary disputes?

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know*D. Are there
any rights of way, easements, or access limitations that may affect the owner's
use of the property?

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know*E. Are there
any written agreements for joint maintenance of an easement or right of way?

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know*F. Is there
any study, survey project, or notice that would adversely affect the property?

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know*G. Are there
any pending or existing assessments against the property?

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know*H. Are there
any zoning violations, nonconforming uses, or any unusual restrictions on the
subject property that would affect future construction or remodeling?

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know*I. Is there a
boundary survey for the property?

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know*J. Are there
any covenants, conditions, or restrictions which affect the property?

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know*K. Are there
any written agreements that may have future financial implications to a buyer
of the property, including but not limited to agreements regarding local
improvement districts under chapter 35.43 RCW, or transportation impact fees
under chapter 39.92 RCW?

2.
WATER

A.
Household Water

(1) The source of the
water is [ ]Public [ ]Community [ ]Private [ ]Shared

(2) Water source
information:

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know *a.
Are there any written agreements for shared water source?

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know *b.
Is there an easement (recorded or unrecorded) for access to and/or maintenance
of the water source?

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know *c.
Are any known problems or repairs needed?

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know *d.
Does the source provide an adequate year round supply of potable water?

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know *(3) Are
there any water treatment systems for the property? [ ]Leased
[ ]Owned

B.
Irrigation

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know (1) Are
there any water rights for the property?

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know *(2) If
they exist, to your knowledge, have the water rights been used during the last
five-year period?

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know *(3) If so,
is the certificate available?

C.
Outdoor Sprinkler System

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know (1) Is
there an outdoor sprinkler system for the property?

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know *(2) Are
there any defects in the outdoor sprinkler system?

3.
SEWER/SEPTIC SYSTEM

A. The property is served by:
[ ]Public sewer main, [ ]Septic tank system [ ]Other disposal
system (describe)

...................................

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't knowB. If the
property is served by a public or community sewer main, is the house connected
to the main?

C. Is the property currently
subject to a sewer capacity charge?

D. If the property is connected
to a septic system:

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know (1) Was a
permit issued for its construction, and was it approved by the city or county
following its construction?

(2) When was it last
pumped:

...................... ,
19. . .

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know *(3) Are
there any defects in the operation of the septic system?

[ ]Don't know (4) When was it last
inspected?

...................... ,
19. . .

By
Whom: ......................

[ ]Don't know (5) How many bedrooms
was the system approved for?

....................... bedrooms

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know *E. Do all
plumbing fixtures, including laundry drain, go to the septic/sewer system? If
no, explain: ......

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know *F. Are you
aware of any changes or repairs to the septic system?

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know G. Is the
septic tank system, including the drainfield, located entirely within the
boundaries of the property?

4.
STRUCTURAL

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know *A. Has the
roof leaked?

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know If yes, has
it been repaired?

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know *B. Have
there been any conversions, additions, or remodeling?

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know *1. If
yes, were all building permits obtained?

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know *2. If
yes, were all final inspections obtained?

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know C. Do you
know the age of the house? If yes, year of original construction:

...............................

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know *D. Do you
know of any settling, slippage, or sliding of either the house or other
structures/improvements located on the property? If yes, explain:

...............................

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know *E. Do you
know of any defects with the following: (Please check applicable items)

G Foundations G Decks G Exterior Walls

G Chimneys G
Interior Walls G Fire
Alarm

G Doors G
Windows G Patio

G Ceilings G Slab
Floors G
Driveways

G Pools G Hot
Tub G Sauna

G Sidewalks G
Outbuildings G
Fireplaces

G Garage Floors G
Walkways

G Other G Wood
Stoves

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know *F. Was a
pest or dry rot, structural or "whole house" inspection done? When
and by whom was the inspection completed?

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know *G. Since
assuming ownership, has your property had a problem with wood destroying
organisms and/or have there been any problems with pest control, infestations,
or vermin?

5.
SYSTEMS AND FIXTURES

If the following systems or
fixtures are included with the transfer, do they have any existing defects:

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know *A.
Electrical system, including wiring, switches, outlets, and service

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know *B.
Plumbing system, including pipes, faucets, fixtures, and toilets

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know *C. Hot
water tank

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know *D. Garbage
disposal

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know *E.
Appliances

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know *F. Sump
pump

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know *G. Heating
and cooling systems

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know *H.
Security system [ ] Owned [ ] Leased

*I. Other......................

6.
COMMON INTEREST

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know A. Is there
a Home Owners' Association? Name of Association ................

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know B. Are
there regular periodic assessments:

$. . . per
[ ] Month [ ] Year

[ ]
Other......................

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know *C. Are
there any pending special assessments?

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know *D. Are
there any shared "common areas" or any joint maintenance agreements
(facilities such as walls, fences, landscaping, pools, tennis courts, walkways,
or other areas co-owned in undivided interest with others)?

7.
GENERAL

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know *A. Is
there any settling, soil, standing water, or drainage problems on the property?

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know *B. Does
the property contain fill material?

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know *C. Is
there any material damage to the property or any of the structure from fire,
wind, floods, beach movements, earthquake, expansive soils, or landslides?

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know D. Is the
property in a designated flood plain?

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know *E. Are
there any substances, materials, or products that may be an environmental
hazard such as, but not limited to, asbestos, formaldehyde, radon gas,
lead-based paint, fuel or chemical storage tanks, and contaminated soil or
water on the subject property?

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know *F. Are
there any tanks or underground storage tanks (e.g., chemical, fuel, etc.) on
the property?

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know *G. Has the
property ever been used as an illegal drug manufacturing site?

8.
FULL DISCLOSURE BY SELLERS

A. Other conditions or defects:

[ ]Yes [ ]No [ ]Don't know*Are there any
other material defects affecting this property or its value that a prospective
buyer should know about?

B. Verification:

The foregoing answers and
attached explanations (if any) are complete and correct to the best of my/our
knowledge and I/we have received a copy hereof. I/we authorize all of my/our
real estate licensees, if any, to deliver a copy of this disclosure statement
to other real estate licensees and all prospective buyers of the property.

DATE . . . . . . .
SELLER . . . . . . . . . SELLER...............

II. BUYER'S
ACKNOWLEDGMENT

A.As buyer(s), I/we acknowledge the duty
to pay diligent attention to any material defects which are known to me/us or
can be known to me/us by utilizing diligent attention and observation.

B.Each buyer acknowledges and understands
that the disclosures set forth in this statement and in any amendments to this
statement are made only by the seller.

C.Buyer (which term includes all persons
signing the "buyer's acceptance" portion of this disclosure statement
below) hereby acknowledges receipt of a copy of this disclosure statement
(including attachments, if any) bearing seller's signature.

DISCLOSURES
CONTAINED IN THIS FORM ARE PROVIDED BY THE SELLER ON THE BASIS OF SELLER'S
ACTUAL KNOWLEDGE OF THE PROPERTY AT THE TIME OF DISCLOSURE. YOU, THE BUYER,
HAVE THREE BUSINESS DAYS, UNLESS OTHERWISE AGREED, FROM THE SELLER'S DELIVERY
OF THIS SELLER'S DISCLOSURE STATEMENT TO RESCIND YOUR AGREEMENT BY DELIVERING
YOUR SEPARATE SIGNED WRITTEN STATEMENT OF RESCISSION TO THE SELLER UNLESS YOU
WAIVE THIS RIGHT OF RESCISSION.

BUYER
HEREBY ACKNOWLEDGES RECEIPT OF A COPY OF THIS REAL PROPERTY TRANSFER DISCLOSURE
STATEMENT AND ACKNOWLEDGES THAT THE DISCLOSURES MADE HEREIN ARE THOSE OF THE
SELLER ONLY, AND NOT OF ANY REAL ESTATE LICENSEE OR OTHER PARTY.

DATE
. . . . . . . BUYER
. . . . . . . . . BUYER.................

(2)
The real property transfer disclosure statement shall be for disclosure only,
and shall not be considered part of any written agreement between the buyer and
seller of residential real property. The real property transfer disclosure
statement shall be only a disclosure made by the seller, and not any real
estate licensee involved in the transaction, and shall not be construed as a
warranty of any kind by the seller or any real estate licensee involved in the
transaction.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act takes effect January 1, 2000.

---
END ---