BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 36.01 RCW to read as follows:

The county legislative authority of any county that receives
payment in lieu of taxes and payment equal to tax funds from the United States
department of energy under section 168 of the federal atomic energy act of 1954
and nuclear waste policy act of 1982 and that has an agreed settlement or a
joint stipulation dated before January 1, 1998, which agreed settlement or
joint stipulation includes funds designated for state schools, may direct the
county treasurer to distribute those designated funds to reduce the outstanding
debt of the school districts within the county. Any such funds shall be
divided among the school districts based upon the same percentages that each
district's current assessed valuation is of the total assessed value for all
eligible school districts if the district has outstanding debt that equals or
exceeds the amount of its distribution. If the district does not have
outstanding debt that equals or exceeds the amount of its distribution, any
amount above the outstanding debt shall be reallocated to the remaining
eligible districts. Any funds received before January 1, 1999, shall be
distributed using the percentages calculated for 1998. The county treasurer
shall apply the funds to any outstanding debt obligation selected by the
respective school districts.

---
END ---