BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. Under
federal law, the legislature may establish a self-employment assistance program
as part of its unemployment insurance program. The legislature finds that the
establishment of a self‑employment assistance program would assist
unemployed individuals and create new businesses and job opportunities in
Washington state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Self‑employment assistance activities" means activities that
are approved by the commissioner, in which an individual, who is identified
through a worker profiling system as likely to exhaust regular benefits,
participates for the purpose of establishing a business and becoming
self-employed. Self-employment assistance activities include entrepreneurial
training, business counseling, and technical assistance.

(2)
"Self‑employment assistance allowance" means an allowance,
payable in lieu of regular benefits and from the unemployment compensation fund
established under RCW 50.16.010, to an individual participating in self‑employment
assistance activities who meets the requirements of this chapter.

(3)
"Regular benefits" means benefits payable to an individual under this
title (including benefits payable to federal civilian employees and to
ex-service members pursuant to 5 U.S.C. chapter 85) other than additional and
extended benefits.

(4)
"Full-time basis" has the meaning contained in regulations prescribed
by the commissioner.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
weekly allowance payable under this chapter to an individual will be equal to
the weekly benefit amount for

regular
benefits otherwise payable under this title. The sum of the allowance paid
under this chapter, and regular benefits paid under this title, with respect to
any benefit year, shall not exceed the maximum benefit amount as established by
RCW 50.20.120 with respect to the benefit year.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. In
every week that an individual is paid a self-employment assistance allowance,
the individual must participate in either entrepreneurial training or business
counseling. In any week that an individual fails to participate in either
entrepreneurial training or business counseling, the individual shall be
disqualified for the week the failure occurs and the individual shall not
receive either a self-employment assistance allowance or regular benefits for
the week the failure occurs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
allowance described in this chapter is payable to an individual at the same
interval, on the same terms, and subject to the same conditions as regular
benefits under this title, except that:

(1)
The requirements of RCW 50.20.010 and 50.20.080 relating to availability for
work, active search for work, and refusal to accept work are not applicable to
the individual;

(2)
An individual who meets the requirements of this chapter is considered to be
unemployed under RCW 50.04.310 and 50.20.010; and

(3)
An individual who fails to participate in self‑employment assistance
activities or who fails to actively engage on a full‑time basis in
activities, which may include training, relating to the establishment of a
business and becoming self‑employed shall be disqualified for the week
the failure occurs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
aggregate number of individuals receiving the allowance under this chapter at
any time may not exceed two percent of the number of individuals receiving
regular benefits.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
Allowances paid under this chapter are charged to employers as provided under
the provisions of this title that relate to the charging of regular benefits.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. This
chapter applies after the effective date of this act or after any plan required
by the United States department of labor is approved by the United States
department of labor, whichever date is later.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. The
commissioner shall take all steps necessary in carrying out this chapter to
assure collaborative involvement of interested parties in program development,
and to ensure that the self‑employment assistance program meets all
federal criteria for withdrawal from the unemployment compensation fund. The
commissioner may include, as part of the self‑employment assistance
program, existing entrepreneurial training programs available through community
colleges, private industry councils, or other organizations, and is not
obligated by this chapter to expend any departmental funds for the operation of
entrepreneurial training programs, unless specific funding is provided to the
department for that purpose through federal or state appropriations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. The
commissioner may adopt rules as necessary to implement this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. If
any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state or
the eligibility of employers in this state for federal unemployment tax
credits, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent
of the conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the operation
of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by
the state or the granting of federal unemployment tax credits to employers in
this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12.
Sections 1 through 11 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 50 RCW.

---
END ---