BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
50.20.090 and 1988 c 83 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
An individual shall be disqualified for benefits for any week with respect to
which the commissioner finds that the individual's unemployment is:

(a)
Due to a strike at the factory, establishment, or other premises at which the
individual is or was last employed; or

(b)
Due to a lockout by his or her employer who is a member of a multi-employer
bargaining unit and who has locked out the employees at the factory,
establishment, or other premises at which the individual is or was last
employed after one member of the multi-employer bargaining unit has been struck
by its employees as a result of the multi-employer bargaining process.

(2)
Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply if it is shown to the
satisfaction of the commissioner that:

(a)
The individual is not participating in or financing or directly interested in
the strike or lockout that caused the individual's unemployment; and

(b)
The individual does not belong to a grade or class of workers of which,
immediately before the commencement of the strike or lockout, there were
members employed at the premises at which the strike or lockout occurs, any of
whom are participating in or financing or directly interested in the strike or
lockout: PROVIDED, That if in any case separate branches of work which are
commonly conducted as separate businesses in separate premises are conducted in
separate departments of the same premises, each such department shall, for the
purpose of this subdivision, be deemed to be a separate factory, establishment,
or other premises.

(3)
Subsection (1) of this section does not apply if it is shown to the
satisfaction of the commissioner that the individual is participating in a
strike which the regional director of the national labor relations board has
considered and has made an initial determination that: (a) The strike was
called due to an unfair labor practice of the employer; and (b) the employer
engaged in an unfair labor practice. Individuals engaged in a strike meeting
those criteria are eligible for benefits from the date the national labor
relations board receives the unfair labor practice complaint. After the
regional director's determination of an unfair labor practice, conditional
payment shall be made for all benefits accruing from the date of eligibility.
If a later ruling overturns the regional director's initial determination,
benefit payments shall cease and any benefit payments made shall be subject to
recoupment.

(4) Any disqualification imposed under this section shall
end when the strike or lockout is terminated.

---
END ---