BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.32.100 and 1998 c 172 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to all other penalties provided by law, a commercial motor vehicle
that is subject to terminal safety audits under this chapter and an officer,
agent, or employee of a company operating a commercial motor vehicle who
violates or who procures, aids, or abets in the violation of this title or any
order or rule of the state patrol is liable for a penalty of one hundred
dollars for each violation, except for each violation of 49 C.F.R. Pt. 382,
controlled substances and alcohol use and testing, 49 C.F.R. Sec. 391.15,
disqualification of drivers, and 49 C.F.R. Sec. 396.9(c)(2), moving a vehicle
placed out of service before the out of service defects have been
satisfactorily repaired, for which the person is liable for a penalty of five
hundred dollars. Each violation is a separate and distinct offense, and in
case of a continuing violation every day's continuance is a separate and
distinct violation.

The penalty provided in this section is due and payable when the
person incurring it receives a notice in writing from the patrol describing the
violation and advising the person that the penalty is due. The patrol may,
upon written application for review, received within fifteen days, remit or
mitigate a penalty provided for in this section or discontinue a prosecution to
recover the penalty upon such terms it deems proper and may ascertain the facts
upon all such applications in such manner and under such rules as it deems
proper. If the amount of the penalty is not paid to the patrol within fifteen
days after receipt of the notice imposing the penalty, or application for
remission or mitigation has not been made within fifteen days after the
violator has received notice of the disposition of the application, the
attorney general shall bring an action in the name of the state of Washington
in the superior court of Thurston county or of some other county in which the
violator does business, to recover the penalty. In all such actions the
procedure and rules of evidence are the same as an ordinary civil action except
as otherwise provided in this chapter. All penalties recovered under this
section shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the state patrol
highway account of the motor vehicle fund. In addition to the recovered
penalties, the court shall award to the patrol the attorneys' fees and costs
incurred by the patrol in recovering the penalties.

---
END ---