BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
19.27.070 and 1995 c 399 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

There
is hereby established a state building code council to be appointed by the
governor.

(1)
The state building code council shall consist of fifteen members, two of whom
shall be county elected legislative body members or elected executives and two
of whom shall be city elected legislative body members or mayors. One of the
members shall be a local government building code enforcement official,
and one of the members shall be a local government fire service official. Of
the remaining nine members, one member shall represent general construction,
specializing in commercial and industrial building construction; one member
shall represent general construction, specializing in residential and
multifamily building construction; one member shall represent the architectural
design profession; one member shall represent the structural engineering
profession; one member shall represent the mechanical engineering profession;
one member shall represent the construction building trades; one member shall
represent manufacturers, installers, or suppliers of building materials and
components; one member shall be a person with a physical disability and shall
represent the disability community; and one member shall represent the general
public. At least six of these fifteen members shall reside east of the crest
of the Cascade mountains. The council shall also include: Two members
of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house, one from
each caucus; two members of the senate appointed by the president of the
senate, one from each caucus; the state director of fire protection; and
an employee of the electrical division of the department of labor and
industries, as ex officio, nonvoting members with all other privileges and
rights of membership. Terms of office shall be for three years. The council
shall elect a member to serve as chair of the council for one-year terms of
office. Any member who is appointed by virtue of being an elected official or
holding public employment shall be removed from the council if he or she ceases
being such an elected official or holding such public employment. Before
making any appointments to the building code council, the governor shall seek
nominations from recognized organizations which represent the entities or
interests listed in this subsection. Members serving on the council on July
28, 1985, may complete their terms of office. Any vacancy shall be filled by
alternating appointments from governmental and nongovernmental entities or
interests until the council is constituted as required by this subsection.

(2)
Members shall not be compensated but shall receive reimbursement for travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(3) The department of community, trade, and economic development
shall provide administrative and clerical assistance to the building code
council.

---
END ---