BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
51.52.050 and 1987 c 151 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever the department has made any order, decision, or award, it shall
promptly serve the worker, beneficiary, employer, or other person affected
thereby, with a copy thereof by mail, which shall be addressed to such person
at his or her last known address as shown by the records of the department. The
copy, in case the same is a final order, decision, or award, shall bear on the
same side of the same page on which is found the amount of the award, a
statement, set in black faced type of at least ten point body or size, that
such final order, decision, or award shall become final within sixty days from
the date the order is communicated to the parties unless a written request for
reconsideration is filed with the department of labor and industries, Olympia,
or an appeal is filed with the board of industrial insurance appeals, Olympia((:
PROVIDED, That)). However, a department order or decision making
demand, whether with or without penalty, for repayment of sums paid to a
provider of medical, dental, vocational, or other health services rendered to an
industrially injured worker, shall state that such order or decision shall
become final within twenty days from the date the order or decision is
communicated to the parties unless a written request for reconsideration is
filed with the department of labor and industries, Olympia, or an appeal is
filed with the board of industrial insurance appeals, Olympia.

(2)
Whenever the department has taken any action or made any decision relating to
any phase of the administration of this title, the worker, beneficiary,
employer, or other person aggrieved thereby may request reconsideration of the
department, or may appeal to the board. If an employer requests
reconsideration of a department order in favor of an injured worker, temporary
total disability compensation or medical aid benefits granted to the worker by
the order under reconsideration shall continue while the reconsideration is
pending, subject to the requirements of RCW 51.32.240(3).

(3)
In an appeal before the board, the appellant shall have the burden of
proceeding with the evidence to establish a prima facie case for the relief
sought in such appeal((: PROVIDED, That)). However, in an
appeal from an order of the department that alleges fraud, the department or
self-insured employer shall initially introduce all evidence in its case in
chief. ((Any such)) A person aggrieved by the decision and order
of the board may thereafter appeal to the superior court, as prescribed in this
chapter.

Sec.
2. RCW
51.52.060 and 1995 c 253 s 1 and 1995 c 199 s 7 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)(a)
Except as otherwise specifically provided in this section, a worker,
beneficiary, employer, health services provider, or other person aggrieved by
an order, decision, or award of the department must, before he or she appeals
to the courts, file with the board and the director, by mail or personally,
within sixty days from the day on which a copy of the order, decision, or award
was communicated to such person, a notice of appeal to the board. However, a
health services provider or other person aggrieved by a department order or
decision making demand, whether with or without penalty, solely for repayment
of sums paid to a provider of medical, dental, vocational, or other health
services rendered to an industrially injured worker must, before he or she
appeals to the courts, file with the board and the director, by mail or
personally, within twenty days from the day on which a copy of the order or
decision was communicated to the health services provider upon whom the
department order or decision was served, a notice of appeal to the board.

(b)
Failure to file a notice of appeal with both the board and the department shall
not be grounds for denying the appeal if the notice of appeal is filed with
either the board or the department.

(2)
Within ten days of the date on which an appeal has been granted by the board,
the board shall notify the other interested parties to the appeal of the
receipt of the appeal and shall forward a copy of the notice of appeal to the
other interested parties. Within twenty days of the receipt of such notice of
the board, the worker or the employer may file with the board a cross-appeal
from the order of the department from which the original appeal was taken.

(3)
If within the time limited for filing a notice of appeal to the board from an
order, decision, or award of the department, the department directs the
submission of further evidence or the investigation of any further fact, the
time for filing the notice of appeal shall not commence to run until the person
has been advised in writing of the final decision of the department in the
matter. In the event the department directs the submission of further evidence
or the investigation of any further fact, as provided in this section, the
department shall render a final order, decision, or award within ninety days
from the date further submission of evidence or investigation of further fact
is ordered which time period may be extended by the department for good cause
stated in writing to all interested parties for an additional ninety days.

(4)
The department, either within the time limited for appeal, or within thirty
days after receiving a notice of appeal, may:

(a)
Modify, reverse, or change any order, decision, or award; or

(b)(i)
Except as provided in (b)(ii) of this subsection, hold an order, decision, or
award in abeyance for a period of ninety days which time period may be extended
by the department for good cause stated in writing to all interested parties
for an additional ninety days pending further investigation in light of the
allegations of the notice of appeal; or

(ii)
Hold an order, decision, or award issued under RCW 51.32.160 in abeyance for a
period not to exceed ninety days from the date of receipt of an application
under RCW 51.32.160. The department may extend the ninety-day time period for
an additional sixty days for good cause.

For
purposes of this subsection, good cause includes delay that results from
conduct of the claimant that is subject to sanction under RCW 51.32.110.

The
board shall deny the appeal upon the issuance of an order under (b)(i) or (ii)
of this subsection holding an earlier order, decision, or award in abeyance,
without prejudice to the appellant's right to appeal from any subsequent
determinative order issued by the department.

This
subsection (4)(b) does not apply to applications deemed granted under RCW 51.32.160.

(5)
An employer shall have the right to appeal an application deemed granted under
RCW 51.32.160 on the same basis as any other application adjudicated pursuant
to that section.

(6)
A provision of this section shall not be deemed to change, alter, or modify the
practice or procedure of the department for the payment of awards pending
appeal. However, if an employer appeals to the board a department order
granting temporary total disability compensation or medical aid benefits to a
worker, the worker shall be entitled to the compensation or medical aid
benefits while the appeal is pending before the board, subject to the
requirements of RCW 51.32.240(3).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 51.16 RCW to read as follows:

All
employers shall pay an assessment for the benefit repayment account established
in section 5 of this act. Every employer not qualifying as a self-insurer
shall pay, on the schedule required for payment of premiums under RCW 51.16.060,
a quarterly assessment of one-half of one percent of the premium deduction made
under RCW 51.16.140(1)(a)(i). Self-insurers shall pay a pro rata assessment in
a manner to be determined by the director. However, no assessments may be made
under this section in any calendar quarter if, on the first day of the
immediately preceding calendar quarter, the amount in the benefit payment
account is one hundred thousand dollars or more.

Sec.
4. RCW
51.16.140 and 1989 c 385 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, every employer who is not a
self-insurer shall deduct from the pay of each of his or her workers:

(i)
One-half of the ((amount he or she)) premium the employer is
required to pay, for medical benefits within each risk classification. Such
amount shall be periodically determined by the director and reported by him or
her to all employers under this title((: PROVIDED, That)); and

(ii)
Except as limited by subsection (2) of this section, one-half of one percent of
the premium deduction made under (a)(i) of this subsection.

(b)
The state governmental unit shall pay the entire ((amount)) premium,
without deduction, into the medical aid fund for volunteers, as defined in
RCW 51.12.035, and the state apprenticeship council shall pay the entire ((amount))
premium, without deduction, into the medical aid fund for registered
apprentices or trainees, for the purposes of RCW 51.12.130. The deductions
under this section ((is)) are not authorized for premiums
assessed under RCW 51.16.210.

(2)
The amount deducted under subsection (1)(a)(ii) of this section shall be
paid by the employer along with the employer premiums and assessments required
under this title. The amounts remitted shall be deposited into the benefit
repayment account established under section 5 of this act. However, no
deduction may be made under subsection (1)(a)(ii) of this section in any
calendar quarter if, on the first day of the immediately preceding calendar
quarter, the amount in the benefit payment account is one hundred thousand
dollars or more.

(3)
It shall be unlawful for the employer, unless specifically authorized by this
title, to deduct or obtain any part of the premium or other costs required to
be by him or her paid from the wages or earnings of any of his or her workers,
and the making of or attempt to make any such deduction shall be a gross
misdemeanor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A new
section is added to chapter 51.44 RCW to read as follows:

The
benefit repayment account is created in the custody of the state treasurer.
All receipts from the deductions required under RCW 51.16.140(1)(a)(ii) and
assessments under section 3 of this act shall be deposited into the account.
Transfers from the benefit repayment account to the medical aid fund or the
accident fund, or payments from the account to self-insured employers, as
applicable, shall be made when benefits are paid under RCW 51.52.050(2) or
51.52.060(6), the department order granting benefits is reversed or modified
resulting in an overpayment of benefits to the worker, and the director has
exercised his or her discretion to waive recovery of the overpayment under RCW
51.32.240(3).

Sec.
6. RCW
43.79A.040 and 1998 c 268 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested, and reinvested
by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and
to the same extent as if the money were in the state treasury.

(2)
All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust fund shall be set
aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment
income account.

(3)
The investment income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased
banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not
limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state
treasurer or affected state agencies. The investment income account is subject
in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution
of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4)(a)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
investment income account to the state general fund except under (b) and (c) of
this subsection.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the
Washington international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the energy
account, the fair fund, the game farm alternative account, the grain inspection
revolving fund, the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition
center account, the youth athletic facility grant account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, ((and)) the
children's trust fund, and the benefit repayment account. However, the
earnings to be distributed shall first be reduced by the allocation to the
state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(c)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way revolving fund, the
advanced environmental mitigation revolving account, the federal narcotics
asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle account, the local rail
service assistance account, and the miscellaneous transportation programs
account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no trust
accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative
directive of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
Sections 3 and 4 of this act apply to premiums and assessments for calendar
quarters beginning on or after July 1, 1999.

---
END ---