BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
76.48.050 and 1995 c 366 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Specialized forest products permits shall consist of properly completed permit
forms validated by the sheriff of the county in which the specialized forest
products are to be harvested. Each permit shall be separately numbered and the
permits shall be issued by consecutive numbers. All specialized forest
products permits shall expire at the end of the calendar year in which issued,
or sooner, at the discretion of the permittor. A properly completed
specialized forest products permit form shall include:

(((1)))
(a) The date of its execution and expiration;

(((2)))
(b) The name, address, telephone number, if any, and signature of the
permittor;

(((3)))
(c) The name, address, telephone number, if any, and signature of the
permittee;

(((4)))
(d) The type of specialized forest products to be harvested or
transported;

(((5)))
(e) The approximate amount or volume of specialized forest products to
be harvested or transported;

(((6)))
(f) The legal description of the property from which the specialized
forest products are to be harvested or transported, including the name of the
county, or the state or province if outside the state of Washington;

(((7)))
(g) A description by local landmarks of where the harvesting is to
occur, or from where the specialized forest products are to be transported;

(((8)))
(h) The number from some type of valid picture identification; and

(((9)))
(i) Any other condition or limitation which the permittor may specify.

(2)
Except for the harvesting of Christmas trees, the permit or true copy thereof
must be carried by the permittee and available for inspection at all times.
For the harvesting of Christmas trees only a single permit or true copy thereof
is necessary to be available at the harvest site.

(3)
The holder of a permit must also obtain a specialized forest products buyers
license.

Sec.
2. RCW
76.48.085 and 1995 c 366 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

Buyers
who purchase specialized forest products are required to record (1) the permit
number; (2) the type of forest product purchased; (3) the permit holder's name;
and (4) the amount of forest product purchased. The buyer shall keep a record
of this information for a period of one year from the date of purchase and make
the records available for inspection by authorized enforcement officials.

The
buyer of specialized forest products must record the license plate number of
the vehicle transporting the forest products on the bill of sale, as well as
the seller's permit number on the bill of sale. This section shall not apply
to transactions involving Christmas trees.

((The
[This])) This section shall not apply to buyers of specialized
forest products at the retail sales level.

Buyers
who purchase specialized forest products are required to obtain a specialized
forest products buyers license. The department of licensing shall issue the
license. The fee for the license is five hundred dollars. The department of
licensing may retain an amount of the fee equal to the department's cost for
the administration and distribution of the license. The remainder of the fee
must be deposited in the specialized forest products enforcement account
created in section 5 of this act.

Buyers
of specialized forest products must obtain a performance bond valued at not
less than one hundred thousand dollars.

A
violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 76.48 RCW to read as follows:

A
person who harvests specialized forest products must obtain a specialized
forest products harvest license from the department of licensing. The fee for
the specialized forest products harvest license is one hundred dollars. The
department of licensing may deduct its costs for the production of the license
from the one hundred dollar fee, and the remainder of the fee must be deposited
in the specialized forest products enforcement account created in section 5 of
this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 76.48 RCW to read as follows:

The
department of natural resources is authorized to provide grants to county
sheriffs to hire enforcement personnel whose sole duty is to exclusively
enforce this chapter. Moneys for the grants shall be appropriated by the
legislature from the specialized forest products enforcement account, created
in section 5 of this act. County sheriffs are encouraged to contract with
state agencies and tribes for enforcement on lands that the agencies or tribes
manage.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 76.48 RCW to read as follows:

The
specialized forest products enforcement account is created in the state
treasury. All receipts from fees collected under RCW 76.48.050 and 76.48.085
must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only
after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the
purposes of section 4 of this act, and to repay the initial loan, plus
interest, from the forest development account as specified in section 6 of this
act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 76.48 RCW to read as follows:

The state treasurer is authorized and required to transfer as a
loan three hundred thousand dollars from the forest development account,
created in RCW 76.12.110, to the specialized forest products enforcement
account, created in section 5 of this act, in order to provide initial funding
for the enforcement grant program created in section 4 of this act. The
treasurer must repay the loan to the forest development account, plus interest,
from the specialized forest products enforcement account. The loan must be
repaid within ten years from the effective date of this section.

---
END ---