BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

A
health carrier shall not engage in unfair methods of competition or in unfair
or deceptive acts or practices as such methods, acts, or practices are defined
under chapter 48.30 RCW. Such activities are matters vitally affecting the
public interest for purposes of applying the consumer protection act, chapter
19.86 RCW. A violation of this section is not reasonable in relation to the
development and preservation of business and is an unfair or deceptive act in
trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of
applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

Sec.
2. RCW
48.44.020 and 1990 c 120 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any health care service contractor may enter into contracts with or for the
benefit of persons or groups of persons which require prepayment for health
care services by or for such persons in consideration of such health care
service contractor providing one or more health care services to such persons
and, except as provided in section 1 of this act, such activity shall
not be subject to the laws relating to insurance if the health care services
are rendered by the health care service contractor or by a participating
provider.

(2)
The commissioner may on examination, subject to the right of the health care
service contractor to demand and receive a hearing under chapters 48.04 and
34.05 RCW, disapprove any contract form for any of the following grounds:

(a)
If it contains or incorporates by reference any inconsistent, ambiguous or
misleading clauses, or exceptions and conditions which unreasonably or
deceptively affect the risk purported to be assumed in the general coverage of
the contract; or

(b)
If it has any title, heading or other indication of its provisions which is
misleading; or

(c)
If purchase of health care services thereunder is being solicited by deceptive
advertising; or

(d)
If, the benefits provided therein are unreasonable in relation to the amount
charged for the contract;

(e)
If it contains unreasonable restrictions on the treatment of patients;

(f)
If it violates any provision of this chapter;

(g)
If it fails to conform to minimum provisions or standards required by
regulation made by the commissioner pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW;

(h)
If any contract for health care services with any state agency, division,
subdivision, board or commission or with any political subdivision, municipal
corporation, or quasi-municipal corporation fails to comply with state law.

(3)(a)
Every contract between a health care service contractor and a participating
provider of health care services shall be in writing and shall state that in
the event the health care service contractor fails to pay for health care
services as provided in the contract, the enrolled participant shall not be liable
to the provider for sums owed by the health care service contractor. Every
such contract shall provide that this requirement shall survive termination of
the contract.

(b) No participating provider, agent, trustee or assignee may
maintain any action against an enrolled participant to collect sums owed by the
health care service contractor.

---
END ---