BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 49.04 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that apprenticeship programs offer individuals valuable
training in high-skilled occupations and prepare people for family wage jobs.
The legislature further finds that many industries in the state are
experiencing a shortage of skilled labor, shortages they are attempting to meet
through apprenticeship programs, but that entry into apprenticeship programs is
difficult for low-income individuals because of enrollment fees, tool expenses,
and other costs associated with training and transportation. The legislature
intends to assist low-income individuals, particularly recipients of temporary
assistance for needy families, by establishing a program to cover costs associated
with entering high-demand apprenticeship programs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 49.04 RCW to read as follows:

There
is created in the department of labor and industries an apprenticeship assistance
program. The program shall be administered by the supervisor of
apprenticeship. In administering the program the supervisor shall:

(1)
Award grants to low-income individuals who have been accepted into a state
approved apprenticeship program. The grants may be used to cover enrollment
fees, purchase of necessary tools and training materials, and transportation
and child-care costs;

(2)
Encourage entry by low-income individuals into apprenticeship programs in
industries experiencing shortages of skilled labor;

(3)
Ensure that the awarding of grants results in a net increase in the number of
low-income individuals and in temporary assistance for needy families
recipients entering apprenticeship programs;

(4)
Adopt necessary rules and guidelines; and

(5)
Solicit and accept grants and donations from public and private sources for the
program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 49.04 RCW to read as follows:

The
department of social and health services shall:

(1)
Work with the supervisor of apprenticeship to encourage recipients of temporary
assistance for needy families to enter apprenticeships or preapprenticeship
training and apply for assistance from the program established under section 2
of this act; and

(2)
Ensure that no department rule prevents recipients of temporary assistance for
needy families from entering apprenticeships or preapprenticeship training or
from receiving assistance from the program established under section 2 of this
act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The
sum of five hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary,
is appropriated from the general fund to the department of labor and industries
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, to carry out the purposes of this
act. The sum of five hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated from the general fund to the department of labor and
industries for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, to carry out the purposes
of this act.

---
END ---