BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
INTENT. The legislature finds and declares:

(1)
Public school educators and administrators should be afforded the
decision-making authority over preparation, licensing, and standards of their
practice, a responsibility long held by members of other professions including
law, medicine, nursing, engineering, and real estate;

(2)
Creation of a public, rule-making body whose sole focus is educator
preparation, licensure, assessment, and standards of practice will bring
greater public focus and attention to the profession;

(3)
Professional educator standards boards are consumer protection boards,
establishing policies to ensure the public that its practitioners are
competent;

(4)
The highest possible standards for all educators are essential in ensuring
attainment of high standards by all students;

(5)
Professional educator standards boards in other states have increased the rigor
of standards for preparation, admission to, and continuation in the profession;
and

(6)
Professional educator standards boards are responsible to their state
legislatures, and thus to all citizens.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.410 RCW to read as follows:

WASHINGTON
PROFESSIONAL EDUCATOR STANDARDS BOARD. (1) The Washington professional
educator standards board is created, consisting of sixteen members to be
appointed by the governor to four-year terms. No person may serve as a member
of the board for more than two consecutive full terms.

(2)
Seven of the members shall be public school teachers, one shall be a private
school teacher, two shall represent higher education educator preparation
programs, three shall be public school administrators, one shall be a parent,
and one shall be a member of the public. The superintendent of public
instruction shall be an ex officio, nonvoting member.

(3)
Public school teachers appointed to the board must:

(a)
Have at least three years' teaching experience in a Washington public school;

(b)
Be currently certificated and actively employed in a teaching position; and

(c)
Include one teacher currently teaching at the elementary school level, one at
the middle school level, and one at the high school level.

(4)
Appointees from higher education educator preparation programs must include one
representative from an institution of higher education as defined in RCW
28B.10.016 and one representative from a Washington private institution of
higher education.

(5)
School administrators appointed to the board must:

(a)
Have at least three years' administrative experience in a Washington public
school district;

(b)
Be currently certificated and actively employed in a school administrator
position; and

(c)
Include at least two school principals.

(6)
In appointing the initial members of the board, it is the intent of the
legislature that, to the extent possible, the governor appoint the existing
members of the Washington advisory council for professional teaching
standards. The governor may appoint initial members of the board to staggered
terms of from one to four years. Thereafter, all members shall be appointed to
four-year terms. Members of the board shall hold office until their successors
are appointed.

(7)
The governor shall appoint the members of the board from a list of qualified
nominees submitted to the governor by the organizations representative of the
constituencies of the board. The Washington education association shall submit
nominations to the governor for qualified teachers to serve on the board. The
association of Washington school principals and the Washington association of
school administrators shall nominate school administrators. The Washington
association of colleges of teacher education shall nominate representatives
from teacher preparation institutions.

(8)
Board members shall represent the racial, geographic, and gender diversity of
the state.

(9)
Each member of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and
shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in carrying out the duties of
the board in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.030.060.

(10)
The governor may remove a member of the board for neglect of duty, misconduct,
malfeasance or misfeasance in office, or for incompetency or unprofessional
conduct as defined in chapter 18.130 RCW. In such a case, the governor shall
file with the secretary of state a statement of the causes for and the order of
removal from office, and the secretary of state shall send a certified copy of
the statement of causes and order of removal to the last known post office
address of the member.

(11)
If a vacancy occurs on the board, the governor shall appoint a replacement
member from nominees as specified in subsection (7) of this section to fill the
remainder of the unexpired term.

(12)
Members of the board shall hire an executive director and an administrative
assistant to reside in the office of the superintendent of public instruction
for administrative purposes only.

(13)
Members of the board are immune from suit in an action, civil or criminal,
based on its disciplinary proceedings or other official acts performed in good
faith as members of the board.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.410 RCW to read as follows:

POWERS
AND DUTIES OF THE BOARD. In addition to any other powers and duties as
provided by law, the Washington professional educator standards board shall:

(1)
Approve or disapprove the program of courses leading to teacher, school
administrator, and school specialized personnel certification offered by all
institutions of higher education in Washington state that may be accredited and
whose graduates may become entitled to receive such certification;

(2)
Every five years beginning in 2004, conduct a review of the program approval
standards, including the minimum standards for teachers, administrators, and
educational staff associates, to reflect research findings and assure continued
improvement of preparation programs for teachers, administrators, and
educational staff associates;

(3)
Investigate the character of the work required to be performed as a condition
of entrance to and graduation from any institution of higher education as defined
in RCW 28B.10.016 relative to such certification as provided for in subsection
(1) of this section, and prepare a list of accredited institutions of higher
education of this and other states whose graduates may be awarded such
certificates;

(4)(a)
Adopt rules to allow a teacher certification candidate to fulfill, in part,
teacher preparation program requirements through work experience as a
classified teacher's aide in a public school or private school meeting the
requirements of RCW 28A.195.010. The rules shall include, but are not limited
to, limitations based upon the recency of the teacher preparation candidate's
teacher aide work experience, and limitations based on the amount of work
experience that may apply toward teacher preparation program requirements under
this chapter;

(b)
Require that at the time of the individual's enrollment in a teacher
preparation program, the supervising teacher and the building principal shall
jointly provide to the teacher preparation program of the institution of higher
education at which the teacher candidate is enrolled, a written assessment of
the performance of the teacher candidate. The assessment shall contain such
information as determined by the Washington professional educator standards
board and shall include: Evidence that at least fifty percent of the
candidate's work as a classified teacher's aide was involved in instructional
activities with children under the supervision of a certificated teacher and
that the candidate worked a minimum of six hundred thirty hours for one school
year; the type of work performed by the candidate; and a recommendation of
whether the candidate's work experience as a classified teacher's aide should
be substituted for teacher preparation program requirements. In compliance
with such rules as may be established under this section, the teacher
preparation programs of the institution of higher education where the candidate
is enrolled shall make the final determination as to what teacher preparation
program requirements may be fulfilled by teacher aide work experience;

(5)
Supervise the issuance of such certificates as provided for in subsection (1)
of this section and specify the types and kinds of certificates necessary for
the several departments of the common schools by rule in accordance with RCW
28A.410.010.

(6)
Adopt rules for nontraditional educator preparation programs;

(7)
Issue and renew teaching certificates;

(8)
Adopt a professional code of ethics;

(9)
Select and evaluate the executive director and administrative assistant to the
board;

(10)
Establish criteria and enter into agreements with other states to acquire
reciprocal approval of teacher preparation programs and certification,
including certification from the national board for professional teaching standards;

(11)
Apply for and receive federal or other funds on behalf of the state for
purposes related to the duties of the board;

(12)
Adopt any rules necessary to implement this chapter. Any rules adopted by the
board pertaining directly to the preparation, assessment, certification, and
standards of practice of administrators shall require the approval of the
majority of administrators on the board;

(13)
Maintain data and submit annual reports to the governor, the legislature, and
the superintendent of public instruction concerning employment trends, teacher
supply and demand data by certificate, the quality of the professional
preparation programs, and other data deemed relevant by the board; and

(14)
Submit to the governor, the legislature, and the superintendent of public
instruction each year a report detailing the findings and activities of the
board and including any recommendations developed by the board.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
All powers, duties, and functions of the state board of education pertaining to
establishing and maintaining standards and processes for approving college,
university, and school district programs for the preparation of educators and
administrators, and educator and administrator assessment, certification, and
standards of practice are transferred to the Washington professional educator
standards board. All references to the state board of education in the Revised
Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the Washington professional educator
standards board when referring to the functions transferred in this section.

(2)(a)
All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written
material in the possession of the state board of education pertaining to the
powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be delivered to the custody of
the Washington professional educator standards board.

(b)
Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any funds, books, documents,
records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in
the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions
transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as
to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3)
All rules and all pending business before the state board of education
pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be continued
and acted upon by the Washington professional educator standards board. All
existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be
performed by the Washington professional educator standards board.

(4)
The transfer of the powers, duties, and functions of the state board of
education shall not affect the validity of any act performed before the
effective date of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. In
the 2000 supplemental budget for the 1999-2001 biennium, the budget for the
state board of education shall be adjusted by an appropriate amount that reflects
the reduction in its duties as a result of sections 3 and 4 of this act.

Sec.
2. RCW
28A.410.010 and 1992 c 159 s 3 and 1992 c 60 s 2 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

The
((state board of education)) Washington professional educator
standards board shall establish, publish, and enforce rules ((and
regulations)) determining eligibility for and certification of personnel
employed in the common schools of this state, including certification for
emergency or temporary, substitute or provisional duty and under such
certificates or permits as the board shall deem proper or as otherwise
prescribed by law. The rules shall require that the initial application for
certification shall require a record check of the applicant through the
Washington state patrol criminal identification system and through the federal
bureau of investigation at the applicant's expense. The record check shall
include a fingerprint check using a complete Washington state criminal
identification fingerprint card. The superintendent of public instruction may
waive the record check for any applicant who has had a record check within the
two years before application.

In
establishing rules pertaining to the qualifications of instructors of American
sign language the ((state)) board shall consult with the national
association of the deaf, "sign instructors guidance network"
(s.i.g.n.), and the Washington state association of the deaf for evaluation and
certification of sign language instructors.

The
superintendent of public instruction shall act as the administrator of any such
rules ((and regulations)) and have the power to issue any certificates
or permits and revoke the same in accordance with board rules ((and
regulations)).

Sec.
3. RCW
28A.410.020 and 1996 c 309 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No person may be admitted to a professional teacher preparation program within
Washington state without first demonstrating by one of the following options
that he or she is competent in the basic skills required for oral and written
communication, reading, and computation:

(a)
Successful completion of an examination in the basic skills required for oral
and written communication, reading, and computation; or

(b)
Completion of a baccalaureate degree program; or

(c)
Completion of a graduate degree program; or

(d)
Completion of two or more years of college level course work and demonstrated
basic skills competency through college level course work and a written essay;
or

(e)
Earning a combined score of more than the state-wide median score for the prior
school year scored by all persons taking tests of general achievement selected
by the ((state board of education)) Washington professional educator
standards board.

(2)
The ((state board of education)) Washington professional educator
standards board shall adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec.
4. RCW
28A.410.040 and 1992 c 141 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

The
((state board of education)) Washington professional educator
standards board shall adopt rules providing that, except as provided in
this section, all individuals qualifying for an initial-level teaching
certificate ((after August 31, 1992,)) shall possess a baccalaureate
degree in the arts, sciences, and/or humanities and have fulfilled the
requirements for teacher certification pursuant to RCW 28A.305.130 (1) and
(2). However, candidates for grades preschool through eight certificates shall
have fulfilled the requirements for a major as part of their baccalaureate
degree. If the major is in early childhood education, elementary education, or
special education, the candidate must have at least thirty quarter hours or
twenty semester hours in one academic field.

Sec.
5. RCW
28A.410.050 and 1992 c 141 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

The
((state board of education)) Washington professional educator
standards board shall develop and adopt rules establishing baccalaureate
and masters degree equivalency standards for vocational instructors performing
instructional duties and acquiring certification ((after August 31, 1992)).

Sec.
6. RCW
28A.410.060 and 1990 c 33 s 407 are each amended to read as follows:

The
fee for any certificate, or any renewal thereof, issued by the authority of the
state of Washington, and authorizing the holder to teach or perform other
professional duties in the public schools of the state shall be not less than
one dollar or such reasonable fee therefor as the ((state board of education))
Washington professional educator standards board by rule ((or
regulation)) shall deem necessary therefor. The fee must accompany the
application and cannot be refunded unless the application is withdrawn before
it is finally considered. The educational service district superintendent, or
other official authorized to receive such fee, shall within thirty days
transmit the same to the treasurer of the county in which the office of the
educational service district superintendent is located, to be by him or her
placed to the credit of said school district or educational service district:
PROVIDED, That if any school district collecting fees for the certification of
professional staff does not hold a professional training institute separate
from the educational service district then all such moneys shall be placed to
the credit of the educational service district.

Such
fees shall be used solely for the purpose of precertification professional
preparation, program evaluation, and professional in-service training programs
in accord with rules ((and regulations)) of the ((state board of
education herein)) Washington professional educator standards board
authorized under this chapter.

Sec.
7. RCW
28A.410.100 and 1992 c 159 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
teacher whose certificate to teach has been questioned under RCW 28A.410.090
shall have a right to be heard by the issuing authority before his or her
certificate is revoked. Any teacher whose certificate to teach has been
revoked shall have a right of appeal to the ((state board of education))
Washington professional educator standards board if notice of appeal is
given by written affidavit to the board within thirty days after the
certificate is revoked.

An appeal to the ((state board of education)) Washington
professional educator standards board within the time specified shall
operate as a stay of revocation proceedings until the next regular or special
meeting of ((said)) the board and until the board's decision has
been rendered.

Sec.
8. RCW
28A.410.120 and 1990 c 33 s 411 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding
any other provision of this title, the ((state board of education)) Washington
professional educator standards board or superintendent of public
instruction shall not require any professional certification or other
qualifications of any person elected superintendent of a local school district
by that district's board of directors, or any person hired in any manner to
fill a position designated as, or which is, in fact, deputy superintendent, or
assistant superintendent.

Sec.
9. RCW
28A.305.130 and 1997 c 13 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to any other powers and duties as provided by law, the state board of
education shall:

(1)
((Approve or disapprove the program of courses leading to teacher, school
administrator, and school specialized personnel certification offered by all
institutions of higher education within the state which may be accredited and
whose graduates may become entitled to receive such certification.

(2)
Conduct every five years a review of the program approval standards, including
the minimum standards for teachers, administrators, and educational staff
associates, to reflect research findings and assure continued improvement of
preparation programs for teachers, administrators, and educational staff
associates.

(3)
Investigate the character of the work required to be performed as a condition
of entrance to and graduation from any institution of higher education in this
state relative to such certification as provided for in subsection (1) above,
and prepare a list of accredited institutions of higher education of this and
other states whose graduates may be awarded such certificates.

(4)(a)
The state board of education shall adopt rules to allow a teacher certification
candidate to fulfill, in part, teacher preparation program requirements through
work experience as a classified teacher's aide in a public school or private
school meeting the requirements of RCW 28A.195.010. The rules shall include,
but are not limited to, limitations based upon the recency of the teacher
preparation candidate's teacher aide work experience, and limitations based on
the amount of work experience that may apply toward teacher preparation program
requirements under this chapter.

(b)
The state board of education shall require that at the time of the individual's
enrollment in a teacher preparation program, the supervising teacher and the building
principal shall jointly provide to the teacher preparation program of the
higher education institution at which the teacher candidate is enrolled, a
written assessment of the performance of the teacher candidate. The assessment
shall contain such information as determined by the state board of education
and shall include: Evidence that at least fifty percent of the candidate's
work as a classified teacher's aide was involved in instructional activities
with children under the supervision of a certificated teacher and that the
candidate worked a minimum of six hundred thirty hours for one school year; the
type of work performed by the candidate; and a recommendation of whether the
candidate's work experience as a classified teacher's aide should be
substituted for teacher preparation program requirements. In compliance with
such rules as may be established by the state board of education under this
section, the teacher preparation programs of the higher education institution
where the candidate is enrolled shall make the final determination as to what
teacher preparation program requirements may be fulfilled by teacher aide work
experience.

(5)
Supervise the issuance of such certificates as provided for in subsection (1)
above and specify the types and kinds of certificates necessary for the several
departments of the common schools by rule or regulation in accordance with RCW
28A.410.010.

(6)))
Accredit, subject to such accreditation standards and procedures as may be
established by the state board of education, all schools that apply for
accreditation, and approve, subject to the provisions of RCW 28A.195.010,
private schools carrying out a program for any or all of the grades
kindergarten through twelve: PROVIDED, That no private school may be approved
that operates a kindergarten program only: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no public or
private schools shall be placed upon the list of accredited schools so long as
secret societies are knowingly allowed to exist among its students by school
officials: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the state board may elect to require all or
certain classifications of the public schools to conduct and participate in
such preaccreditation examination and evaluation processes as may now or
hereafter be established by the board.

(((7)))
(2) Make rules ((and regulations)) governing the establishment in
any existing nonhigh school district of any secondary program or any new grades
in grades nine through twelve. Before any such program or any new grades are
established the district must obtain prior approval of the state board.

(((8)))
(3) Prepare such outline of study for the common schools as the board
shall deem necessary, and prescribe such rules for the general government of
the common schools, as shall seek to secure regularity of attendance, prevent
truancy, secure efficiency, and promote the true interest of the common
schools.

(((9)))
(4) Continuously reevaluate courses and adopt and enforce ((regulations))
rules within the common schools so as to meet the educational needs of
students and articulate with the institutions of higher education and unify the
work of the public school system.

(((10)))
(5) Carry out board powers and duties relating to the organization and
reorganization of school districts under RCW 28A.315.010 through 28A.315.680
and 28A.315.900.

(((11)))
(6) By rule ((or regulation promulgated)) adopted upon the
advice of the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of
fire protection, provide for instruction of pupils in the public and private
schools carrying out a K through 12 program, or any part thereof, so that in
case of sudden emergency they shall be able to leave their particular school
building in the shortest possible time or take such other steps as the
particular emergency demands, and without confusion or panic; such rules ((and
regulations)) shall be published and distributed to certificated personnel
throughout the state whose duties shall include a familiarization therewith as
well as the means of implementation thereof at their particular school.

(((12)))
(7) Hear and decide appeals as otherwise provided by law.

The
state board of education is given the authority to promulgate information and
rules dealing with the prevention of child abuse for purposes of curriculum use
in the common schools.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10.
CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11.
Sections 1, 2 and 14 of this act take effect July 1, 1999. Sections 3 through
13 of this act take effect January 1, 2000.

---
END ---