BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that while Washington's economy is currently prospering,
economic growth continues to be uneven, particularly as between metropolitan
and rural areas. This has created in effect two Washingtons. One afflicted by
inadequate infrastructure to support and attract investment, another suffering
from congestion and soaring housing prices. In order to address these
problems, the legislature intends to use resources strategically to build on
our state's strengths while addressing threats to our prosperity.

PART
I

RURAL
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Enhanced
Flexibility for Use of Community Economic

Revitalization
Board Funds

Sec.
101. RCW
43.160.010 and 1996 c 51 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature finds that it is the public policy of the state of Washington
to direct financial resources toward the fostering of economic development
through the stimulation of investment and job opportunities and the retention
of sustainable existing employment for the general welfare of the inhabitants
of the state. Reducing unemployment and reducing the time citizens remain
jobless is important for the economic welfare of the state. A valuable means
of fostering economic development is the construction of public facilities
which contribute to the stability and growth of the state's economic base.
Strengthening the economic base through issuance of industrial development
bonds, whether single or umbrella, further serves to reduce unemployment. Consolidating
issues of industrial development bonds when feasible to reduce costs
additionally advances the state's purpose to improve economic vitality.
Expenditures made for these purposes as authorized in this chapter are declared
to be in the public interest, and constitute a proper use of public funds. A
community economic revitalization board is needed which shall aid the
development of economic opportunities. The general objectives of the board
should include:

(a)
Strengthening the economies of areas of the state which have experienced or are
expected to experience chronically high unemployment rates or below average
growth in their economies;

(b)
Encouraging the diversification of the economies of the state and regions
within the state in order to provide greater seasonal and cyclical stability of
income and employment;

(c)
Encouraging wider access to financial resources for both large and small
industrial development projects;

(d)
Encouraging new economic development or expansions to maximize employment;

(e)
Encouraging the retention of viable existing firms and employment; and

(f)
Providing incentives for expansion of employment opportunities for groups of
state residents that have been less successful relative to other groups in
efforts to gain permanent employment.

(2)
The legislature also finds that the state's economic development efforts can be
enhanced by, in certain instances, providing funds to improve state highways ((in
the vicinity of new)), county roads, or city streets for industries
considering locating or expanding in this state ((or existing
industries that are considering significant expansion)).

(a)
The legislature finds it desirable to provide a process whereby the need for
diverse public works improvements necessitated by planned economic development
can be addressed in a timely fashion and with coordination among all
responsible governmental entities.

(b)
((It is the intent of the legislature to create an economic development
account within the motor vehicle fund from which expenditures can be made by
the department of transportation for state highway improvements necessitated by
planned economic development.)) All ((such)) transportation
improvements on state highways must first be approved by the state
transportation commission and the community economic revitalization board in
accordance with the procedures established by RCW 43.160.074 and 47.01.280. ((It
is further the intent of the legislature that such improvements not jeopardize
any other planned highway construction projects. The improvements are intended
to be of limited size and cost, and to include such items as additional turn lanes,
signalization, illumination, and safety improvements.))

(3)
The legislature also finds that the state's economic development efforts can
be enhanced by, in certain instances, providing funds to assist development of
telecommunications infrastructure that supports business development,
retention, and expansion in rural natural resources impact areas and rural
counties of the state.

(4)
The legislature also finds that the state's economic development efforts can be
enhanced by providing funds to improve markets for those recyclable materials
representing a large fraction of the waste stream. The legislature finds that
public facilities which result in private construction of processing or
remanufacturing facilities for recyclable materials are eligible for
consideration from the board.

(((4)))
(5) The legislature finds that sharing economic growth state-wide is
important to the welfare of the state. Rural counties and rural natural
resources impact areas do not share in the economic vitality of the Puget
Sound region. The ability of these communities to pursue business and job
retention, expansion, and development opportunities depends on their capacity
to ready necessary economic development project plans, sites, permits, and
infrastructure for private investments. Project-specific planning,
predevelopment, and infrastructure ((is one of several)) are
critical ingredients ((that are critical)) for economic
development. Rural counties and rural natural resources impact
areas generally lack ((the infrastructure)) these necessary tools
and resources to diversify and revitalize their economies. It is,
therefore, the intent of the legislature to increase the ((availability of
funds to help provide infrastructure to rural natural resource impact areas))
amount of funding available through the community economic revitalization
board for rural counties and rural natural resources impact areas, and to
authorize flexibility for available resources in these areas to help fund
planning, predevelopment, and construction costs of infrastructure and
facilities and sites that foster economic vitality and diversification.

Sec.
102. RCW
43.160.020 and 1997 c 367 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Board" means the community economic revitalization board.

(2)
"Bond" means any bond, note, debenture, interim certificate, or other
evidence of financial indebtedness issued by the board pursuant to this
chapter.

(3)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(4)
"Financial institution" means any bank, savings and loan association,
credit union, development credit corporation, insurance company, investment
company, trust company, savings institution, or other financial institution
approved by the board and maintaining an office in the state.

(5)
"Industrial development facilities" means "industrial
development facilities" as defined in RCW 39.84.020.

(6)
"Industrial development revenue bonds" means tax-exempt revenue bonds
used to fund industrial development facilities.

(7)
"Local government" or "political subdivision" means any
port district, county, city, town, special purpose district, and any other
municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations in the state providing
for public facilities under this chapter.

(8)
"Sponsor" means any of the following entities which customarily
provide service or otherwise aid in industrial or other financing and are
approved as a sponsor by the board: A bank, trust company, savings bank,
investment bank, national banking association, savings and loan association,
building and loan association, credit union, insurance company, or any other financial
institution, governmental agency, or holding company of any entity specified in
this subsection.

(9)
"Umbrella bonds" means industrial development revenue bonds from
which the proceeds are loaned, transferred, or otherwise made available to two
or more users under this chapter.

(10)
"User" means one or more persons acting as lessee, purchaser,
mortgagor, or borrower under a financing document and receiving or applying to
receive revenues from bonds issued under this chapter.

(11)
"Public facilities" means bridges, roads, domestic and industrial
water, sanitary sewer, storm sewer, railroad, electricity, telecommunications,
transportation, natural gas, buildings or structures, and port facilities.

(12)
"Rural county" means a county with a population density of less
than one hundred persons per square mile.

(13)
"Rural natural resources impact area" means:

(a)
A nonmetropolitan county, as defined by the 1990 decennial census, that meets
three of the five criteria set forth in subsection (((13))) (14)
of this section;

(b)
A nonmetropolitan county with a population of less than forty thousand in the
1990 decennial census, that meets two of the five criteria as set forth in
subsection (((13))) (14) of this section; or

(c)
A nonurbanized area, as defined by the 1990 decennial census, that is located
in a metropolitan county that meets three of the five criteria set forth in
subsection (((13))) (14) of this section.

(((13)))
(14) For the purposes of designating rural natural resources impact
areas, the following criteria shall be considered:

(a)
A lumber and wood products employment location quotient at or above the state
average;

(b)
A commercial salmon fishing employment location quotient at or above the state
average;

(c)
Projected or actual direct lumber and wood products job losses of one hundred
positions or more;

(d)
Projected or actual direct commercial salmon fishing job losses of one hundred
positions or more; and

(e)
An unemployment rate twenty percent or more above the state average. The
counties that meet these criteria shall be determined by the employment
security department for the most recent year for which data is available. For
the purposes of administration of programs under this chapter, the United
States post office five-digit zip code delivery areas will be used to determine
residence status for eligibility purposes. For the purpose of this definition,
a zip code delivery area of which any part is ten miles or more from an
urbanized area is considered nonurbanized. A zip code totally surrounded by
zip codes qualifying as nonurbanized under this definition is also considered
nonurbanized. The office of financial management shall make available a zip
code listing of the areas to all agencies and organizations providing services
under this chapter.

Sec.
103. RCW
43.160.060 and 1996 c 51 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board is authorized to make direct loans to political subdivisions of the state
for the purposes of assisting the political subdivisions in financing the cost
of public facilities, including development of land and improvements for public
facilities, project-specific environmental, capital facilities, land use,
permitting, feasibility and marketing studies and plans; project design, site
planning, and analysis; project debt and revenue impact analysis; as well
as the construction, rehabilitation, alteration, expansion, or improvement of
the facilities. A grant may also be authorized for purposes designated in this
chapter, but only when, and to the extent that, a loan is not reasonably
possible, given the limited resources of the political subdivision and the
finding by the board that ((unique)) financial circumstances ((exist.
The board shall not obligate more than twenty percent of its biennial
appropriation as grants)) require grant assistance to enable the project
to move forward.

Application
for funds shall be made in the form and manner as the board may prescribe. In
making grants or loans the board shall conform to the following requirements:

(1)
The board shall not provide financial assistance:

(a)
For a project the primary purpose of which is to facilitate or promote a retail
shopping development or expansion.

(b)
For any project that evidence exists would result in a development or expansion
that would displace existing jobs in any other community in the state,
except a project that would relocate a business from a nondistressed urban area
to a rural county or rural natural resources impact area.

(c)
For the acquisition of real property, including buildings and other fixtures
which are a part of real property.

(d)
For a construction project to any local government applicant that is not, at
the time of application for financial assistance, in compliance with the
provisions of chapter 36.70A RCW.

(2)
The board shall only provide financial assistance:

(a)
For those projects which would result in specific private developments or
expansions (i) in manufacturing, production, food processing, assembly,
warehousing, advanced technology, research and development, and
industrial distribution; (ii) for processing recyclable materials or for
facilities that support recycling, including processes not currently provided
in the state, including but not limited to, de-inking facilities, mixed waste
paper, plastics, yard waste, and problem-waste processing; (iii) for
manufacturing facilities that rely significantly on recyclable materials,
including but not limited to waste tires and mixed waste paper; (iv) which
support the relocation of businesses from nondistressed urban areas to ((distressed))
rural counties or rural natural resources impact areas; or (v)
which substantially support the trading of goods or services outside of the
state's borders.

(b)
For projects which it finds will improve the opportunities for the successful
maintenance, establishment, or expansion of industrial or commercial plants or
will otherwise assist in the creation or retention of long-term economic
opportunities.

(c)
When the application includes convincing evidence that a specific private
development or expansion is ready to occur and will occur only if the public
facility improvement is made.

(3)
The board shall prioritize each proposed project according to the relative
benefits provided to the community by the jobs the project would create, not
just the total number of jobs it would create after the project is completed
and according to the unemployment rate in the area in which the jobs would be
located. As long as there is more demand for financial assistance than there
are funds available, the board is instructed to fund projects in order of their
priority.

(4)
A responsible official of the political subdivision shall be present during
board deliberations and provide information that the board requests.

Before
any financial assistance application is approved, the political subdivision
seeking the assistance must demonstrate to the community economic
revitalization board that no other timely source of funding is available to it
at costs reasonably similar to financing available from the community economic
revitalization board.

Sec.
104. RCW
43.160.076 and 1998 c 321 s 28 (Referendum Bill No. 49) and 1998 c 55 s 4 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as authorized to the contrary under subsection (2) of this section, from
all funds available to the board for financial assistance in a biennium under
this chapter without reference to financial assistance provided under RCW
43.160.220, the board shall spend at least seventy-five percent for financial
assistance for projects in ((distressed)) rural counties or rural
natural resources impact areas. ((For purposes of this section, the term
"distressed counties" includes any county, in which the average level
of unemployment for the three years before the year in which an application for
financial assistance is filed, exceeds the average state unemployment for those
years by twenty percent.))

(2)
If at any time during the last six months of a biennium the board finds that
the actual and anticipated applications for qualified projects in ((distressed))
rural counties or rural natural resources impact areas are clearly
insufficient to use up the seventy-five percent allocation under subsection (1)
of this section, then the board shall estimate the amount of the insufficiency
and during the remainder of the biennium may use that amount of the allocation
for financial assistance to projects not located in ((distressed)) rural
counties or rural natural resources impact areas.

(((3)
This section expires June 30, 2000.))

Sec.
105. RCW
43.160.200 and 1996 c 51 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The economic development account is created within the public facilities construction
loan revolving fund under RCW 43.160.080. Moneys in the account may be spent
only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
the purposes of RCW 43.160.010(((3))) (5) and this section. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.

(2)
Applications under this section for assistance from the economic development
account are subject to all of the applicable criteria set forth under this
chapter, as well as procedures and criteria established by the board, except as
otherwise provided.

(3)
Eligible applicants under this section are limited to political subdivisions of
the state in rural natural resources impact areas ((that demonstrate, to the
satisfaction of the board, the local economy's dependence on the forest
products and salmon fishing industries)) and rural counties.

(4)
Applicants must demonstrate that their request is part of an economic
development plan consistent with applicable state planning requirements.
Applicants must demonstrate that tourism projects have been approved by the
local government. Industrial projects must be approved by the local government
and the associate development organization.

(5)
Publicly owned projects may be financed under this section upon proof by the
applicant that the public project is a necessary component of, or constitutes
in whole, a tourism project.

(6)
Applications must demonstrate local match and participation. Such match may
include: Land donation, other public or private funds or both, or other means
of local commitment to the project.

(7)
Board financing for project-specific environmental, capital facilities, land
use, permitting, feasibility and marketing studies and plans;
project engineering, design, and site planning and analysis; and project debt
and revenue impact analysis shall not exceed ((twenty-five)) fifty
thousand dollars per study. Board funds for ((feasibility studies)) these
purposes may be provided as a grant and require a ((dollar for dollar))
match ((with up to one-half in-kind match allowed)).

(8)
Board financing for tourism projects shall not exceed two hundred fifty
thousand dollars. Other public facility construction projects under
this section shall not exceed ((five hundred thousand)) one million
dollars. Loans with flexible terms and conditions to meet the needs of the
applicants shall be provided. Grants may also be authorized, but only when,
and to the extent that, a loan is not reasonably possible, given the limited
resources of the political subdivision.

(9)
The board shall develop guidelines for allowable local match and ((feasibility
studies)) planning and predevelopment activities.

(10)
The board may allow de minimis general system improvements to be funded if
they are critically linked to the viability of the economic development project
assisted under this section.

(11)
Applications under this section need not demonstrate evidence that specific
private development or expansion is ready to occur or will occur if funds are
provided.

(((11)))
(12) The board shall establish guidelines for providing financial
assistance under this section to ensure that the requirements of this chapter
are complied with. The guidelines shall include:

(a)
A process to equitably compare and evaluate applications from competing
communities.

(b)
Criteria to ensure that approved projects will have a high probability of
success and are likely to provide long-term economic benefits to the
community. The criteria shall include: (i) A minimum amount of local
participation, determined by the board per application, to verify community
support for the project; (ii) an analysis that establishes the project is
feasible using standard economic principles; and (iii) an explanation from the
applicant regarding how the project is consistent with the communities'
economic strategy and goals.

(c)
A method of evaluating the impact of the financial assistance on the economy of
the community and whether the financial assistance achieved its purpose.

PART
II

HOUSING

Increasing the Housing
Finance Commission's Debt Limit

Sec.
201. RCW
43.180.160 and 1996 c 310 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
total amount of outstanding indebtedness of the commission may not exceed ((two))
three billion dollars at any time. The calculation of outstanding
indebtedness shall include the initial principal amount of an issue and shall
not include interest that is either currently payable or that accrues as a part
of the face amount of an issue payable at maturity or earlier redemption.
Outstanding indebtedness shall not include notes or bonds as to which the
obligation of the commission has been satisfied and discharged by refunding or
for which payment has been provided by reserves or otherwise.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 202. A
new section is added to chapter 43.63A RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall establish and administer a "one-stop clearinghouse"
to coordinate state assistance for growers and nonprofit organizations in
developing housing for agricultural employees. Growers, housing authorities,
and nonprofit organizations shall have direct access to the one-stop
clearinghouse. The department one-stop clearinghouse shall provide assistance
on planning and design, building codes, temporary worker housing regulations,
financing options, and management to growers and nonprofit organizations
interested in farmworker construction. The department one-stop clearinghouse
shall also provide educational materials and services to local government
authorities on Washington state law concerning farmworker housing.

PART
III

RURAL
DEVELOPMENT COUNCIL

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 301. A
new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The rural development council executive committee and the department are
authorized to establish a successor organization to the rural development
council executive committee created under RCW 43.31.855. The purpose of the
successor organization is, at least in part, to improve the delivery and
accessibility of public and private resources for meeting the needs of rural
communities in Washington.

(2)
For purposes of this section, "successor organization" means a
private nonprofit corporation created specifically to assume responsibility for
administering funds provided by the federal government and other sources to
carry out the purpose state in subsection (1) of this section. A successor
organization must qualify as a tax-exempt nonprofit corporation under section
501(c) of the federal internal revenue code.

(3)
This section expires June 30, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 302. A
new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The executive committee and the department are authorized to take all steps
reasonably necessary and proper to effect the orderly transition of the rural
development council executive committee to the successor organization. This
authorization includes, but is not necessarily limited to, the authority to:

(a)
Transfer any equipment, records, other assets, or contracts for services to the
successor organization under appropriate terms and conditions, including
reasonable compensation for assets acquired with state funds;

(b)
Assist in the establishment of a successor organization, including entering
into contracts preparatory to the establishment of the organization; and

(c)
Unless otherwise provided by agreement, assign to the successor organization
any membership agreements, contracts, license, and other duties and obligations
related to the rural development council.

(2)
This section expires June 30, 2002.

Sec.
303. RCW
42.52.080 and 1994 c 154 s 108 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No former state officer or state employee may, within a period of one year from
the date of termination of state employment, accept employment or receive
compensation from an employer if:

(a)
The officer or employee, during the two years immediately preceding termination
of state employment, was engaged in the negotiation or administration on behalf
of the state or agency of one or more contracts with that employer and was in a
position to make discretionary decisions affecting the outcome of such
negotiation or the nature of such administration;

(b)
Such a contract or contracts have a total value of more than ten thousand
dollars; and

(c)
The duties of the employment with the employer or the activities for which the
compensation would be received include fulfilling or implementing, in whole or
in part, the provisions of such a contract or contracts or include the
supervision or control of actions taken to fulfill or implement, in whole or in
part, the provisions of such a contract or contracts. This subsection shall
not be construed to prohibit a state officer or state employee from accepting
employment with a state employee organization.

(2)
No person who has served as a state officer or state employee may, within a
period of two years following the termination of state employment, have a
direct or indirect beneficial interest in a contract or grant that was
expressly authorized or funded by specific legislative or executive action in
which the former state officer or state employee participated.

(3)
No former state officer or state employee may accept an offer of employment or
receive compensation from an employer if the officer or employee knows or has
reason to believe that the offer of employment or compensation was intended, in
whole or in part, directly or indirectly, to influence the officer or employee
or as compensation or reward for the performance or nonperformance of a duty by
the officer or employee during the course of state employment.

(4)
No former state officer or state employee may accept an offer of employment or
receive compensation from an employer if the circumstances would lead a
reasonable person to believe the offer has been made, or compensation given,
for the purpose of influencing the performance or nonperformance of duties by
the officer or employee during the course of state employment.

(5)
No former state officer or state employee may at any time subsequent to his or
her state employment assist another person, whether or not for compensation, in
any transaction involving the state in which the former state officer or state
employee at any time participated during state employment. This subsection
shall not be construed to prohibit any employee or officer of a state employee
organization from rendering assistance to state officers or state employees in
the course of employee organization business.

(6)
As used in this section, "employer" means a person as defined in RCW
42.52.010 or any other entity or business that the person owns or in which the
person has a controlling interest. For purposes of subsection (1) of this
section, the term "employer" does not include a successor
organization to the rural development council under chapter 43.31 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 304. A
new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW to read as follows:

Notwithstanding
anything to the contrary in chapter 41.06 RCW or any other provision of law,
the department may contract to provide funding to a successor organization
under section 301 of this act to carry out activities of the organization that
are consistent with the department's powers and duties. All moneys for
contracts entered into under this section are subject to appropriation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 305. The
following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each
repealed, effective June 30, 2000:

(1) RCW
43.31.855 (Rural development council) and 1997 c 377 s 1;

(2) RCW
43.31.857 (Rural development council‑-Financial
contributions encouraged) and 1997 c 377 s 2; and

(3) 1997 c
377 s 3 (uncodified).

PART
IV

ECONOMIC
VITALITY COMMITTEE

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 401. (1)
The legislature shall establish an ad hoc economic development group to analyze
potential economic development projects of state-wide significance and
recommend appropriate administrative or legislative actions.

(2)
The group shall include one representative each from the department of
community, trade, and economic development, the department of agriculture, and
the department of revenue as well as two representatives from rural economic
development councils appointed by the legislature.

(3)
The group shall promote economic development and business diversification
throughout the state with special attention given to the economic difficulties
of rural counties.

(4)
In order to expedite coordinated responses, the governor may direct the group
to meet on an emergency basis when projects of state-wide significance arise.

(5)
The department of community, trade, and economic development shall establish
criteria to determine whether a project meets the standards of a "project
of state-wide significance." These criteria may include such economic
indicators as local unemployment and personal income levels and project scope
indicators such as the assessed value of the project in relation to the
assessed value of the county.

PART
V

LOCAL
OPTION SALES AND USE TAX

Sec.
501. RCW
82.14.370 and 1998 c 55 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislative authority of a distressed county may impose a sales and use tax
in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is in addition to other
taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons who are
taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of
any taxable event within the county. The rate of tax shall not exceed ((0.04))
0.06 percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of
the article used in the case of a use tax.

(2)
The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be deducted from the
amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department
of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department of revenue shall
perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the
county.

(3)
Moneys collected under this section shall only be used for the purpose of
financing public facilities in rural counties. The public facility must be
listed as an item in the officially adopted county overall economic development
plan, or the economic development section of the county's comprehensive plan,
or the comprehensive plan of a city or town located within the county for those
counties planning under RCW 36.70A.040. For those counties that do not have an
adopted overall economic development plan and do not plan under the growth management
act, the public facility must be listed in the county's capital facilities plan
or the capital facilities plan of a city or town located within the county. In
implementing this section, the county shall consult with cities, towns, and
port districts located within the county. For the purposes of this section,
"public facilities" means bridges, roads, and domestic and industrial
water, sanitary sewer, storm sewer, railroad, electricity, natural gas,
buildings or structures, telecommunications, transportation, or commercial
infrastructure, and port facilities in the state of Washington.

(4)
No tax may be collected under this section before July 1, 1998. No tax may be
collected under this section by a county more than twenty-five years after the
date that a tax is first imposed under this section.

(5)
For purposes of this section, "distressed county" means ((a county
in which the average level of unemployment for the three years before the year
in which a tax is first imposed under this section exceeds the average state
unemployment for those years by twenty percent)) an eligible area as
defined in RCW 82.60.020.

PART
VI

DISTRESSED
COUNTY ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

Sec.
601. RCW
82.14.380 and 1998 c 321 s 10 (Referendum Bill No. 49) are each amended to read
as follows:

(1)
The distressed county assistance account is created in the state treasury.
Into this account shall be placed a portion of all motor vehicle excise tax
receipts as provided in RCW 82.44.110. At such times as distributions are made
under RCW 82.44.150, the state treasurer shall distribute the funds in the
distressed county assistance account to each county imposing the sales and use
tax authorized under RCW 82.14.370 as of January 1, 1999, in the same
proportions as distributions of the tax imposed under RCW 82.14.370 for
these counties for the previous quarter.

(2)
Funds distributed from the distressed county assistance account shall be
expended by the counties for criminal justice and other purposes.

PART
VII

DISTRESSED AREA
SALES AND USE TAX DEFERRAL

Sec.
701. RCW
82.60.020 and 1996 c 290 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Applicant" means a person applying for a tax deferral under this
chapter.

(2)
"Department" means the department of revenue.

(3)
"Eligible area" means((: (a) A county in which the average level
of unemployment for the three years before the year in which an application is
filed under this chapter exceeds the average state unemployment for those years
by twenty percent; (b) a county that has a median household income that is less
than seventy-five percent of the state median household income for the previous
three years; (c) a metropolitan statistical area, as defined by the office of
federal statistical policy and standards, United States department of commerce,
in which the average level of unemployment for the calendar year immediately
preceding the year in which an application is filed under this chapter exceeds
the average state unemployment for such calendar year by twenty percent; (d) a designated
community empowerment zone approved under RCW 43.63A.700 or a county containing
such a community empowerment zone; (e) a town with a population of less than
twelve hundred persons in those counties that are not covered under (a) of this
subsection that are timber impact areas as defined in RCW 43.31.601; (f) a
county designated by the governor as an eligible area under RCW 82.60.047; or
(g) a county that is contiguous to a county that qualifies as an eligible area
under (a) or (f) of this subsection)) a county with fewer than one
hundred persons per square mile as determined annually by the office of
financial management and published by the department of revenue effective for
the period July 1st through June 30th.

(4)(a)
"Eligible investment project" means((:

(i))) an
investment project in an eligible area as defined in subsection (3)(((a),
(b), (c), (e), or (f))) of this section((; or

(ii)
That portion of an investment project in an eligible area as defined in
subsection (3)(d) or (g) of this section which is directly utilized to create
at least one new full-time qualified employment position for each three hundred
thousand dollars of investment on which a deferral is requested in an
application approved before July 1, 1994, and for each seven hundred fifty
thousand dollars of investment on which a deferral is requested in an
application approved after June 30, 1994)).

(b)
The lessor/owner of a qualified building is not eligible for a deferral unless
the underlying ownership of the buildings, machinery, and equipment vests
exclusively in the same person, or unless the lessor by written contract agrees
to pass the economic benefit of the deferral to the lessee in the form of
reduced rent payments.

(c)
((For purposes of (a)(ii) of this subsection:

(i)
The department shall consider the entire investment project, including any
investment in machinery and equipment that otherwise qualifies for exemption
under RCW 82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565, for purposes of determining the portion
of the investment project that qualifies for deferral as an eligible investment
project; and

(ii)
The number of new full-time qualified employment positions created by an
investment project shall be deemed to be reduced by the number of full-time
employment positions maintained by the recipient in any other community in this
state that are displaced as a result of the investment project.

(d)))
"Eligible investment project" does not include any portion of an
investment project undertaken by a light and power business as defined in RCW
82.16.010(5), other than that portion of a cogeneration project that is used to
generate power for consumption within the manufacturing site of which the
cogeneration project is an integral part, or investment projects which have
already received deferrals under this chapter.

(5)
"Investment project" means an investment in qualified buildings or
qualified machinery and equipment, including labor and services rendered in the
planning, installation, and construction of the project.

(6)
"Manufacturing" means ((all activities of a commercial or
industrial nature wherein labor or skill is applied, by hand or machinery, to
materials so that as a result thereof a new, different, or useful substance or
article of tangible personal property is produced for sale or commercial or
industrial use and shall include the production or fabrication of specially
made or custom made articles)) the same as defined in RCW 82.04.120.
"Manufacturing" also includes computer programming, the production of
computer software, and other computer-related services, and the activities
performed by research and development laboratories and commercial testing
laboratories.

(7)
"Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.

(8)
"Qualified buildings" means construction of new structures, and
expansion or renovation of existing structures for the purpose of increasing
floor space or production capacity used for manufacturing and research and
development activities, including plant offices and warehouses or other
facilities for the storage of raw material or finished goods if such facilities
are an essential or an integral part of a factory, mill, plant, or laboratory
used for manufacturing or research and development. If a building is used
partly for manufacturing or research and development and partly for other
purposes, the applicable tax deferral shall be determined by apportionment of
the costs of construction under rules adopted by the department.

(9)
(("Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time
employee employed in the eligible investment project during the entire tax
year.

(10)))
"Qualified machinery and equipment" means all new industrial and
research fixtures, equipment, and support facilities that are an integral and
necessary part of a manufacturing or research and development operation.
"Qualified machinery and equipment" includes: Computers; software;
data processing equipment; laboratory equipment; manufacturing components such
as belts, pulleys, shafts, and moving parts; molds, tools, and dies; operating
structures; and all equipment used to control or operate the machinery.

(((11)))
(10) "Recipient" means a person receiving a tax deferral under
this chapter.

(((12)))
(11) "Research and development" means the development,
refinement, testing, marketing, and commercialization of a product, service, or
process before commercial sales have begun. As used in this subsection,
"commercial sales" excludes sales of prototypes or sales for market
testing if the total gross receipts from such sales of the product, service, or
process do not exceed one million dollars.

Sec.
702. RCW
82.60.040 and 1997 c 156 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall issue a sales and use tax deferral certificate for state
and local sales and use taxes due under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW on
each eligible investment project that((:

(a))) is
located in an eligible area as defined in RCW 82.60.020(((3) (a), (b), (c),
(e), or (f);

(b)
Is located in an eligible area as defined in RCW 82.60.020(3)(g) if
seventy-five percent of the new qualified employment positions are to be filled
by residents of a contiguous county that is an eligible area as defined in RCW
82.60.020(3) (a) or (f); or

(c)
Is located in an eligible area as defined in RCW 82.60.020(3)(d) if
seventy-five percent of the new qualified employment positions are to be filled
by residents of a designated community empowerment zone approved under RCW
43.63A.700 located within the county in which the eligible investment project
is located)).

(2)
The department shall keep a running total of all deferrals granted under this
chapter during each fiscal biennium.

(3)
This section expires July 1, 2004.

Sec.
703. RCW
82.60.070 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 3 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
((Each recipient of a deferral granted under this chapter prior to July 1,
1994, shall submit a report to the department on December 31st of each year
during the repayment period until the tax deferral is repaid.)) Each
recipient of a deferral granted under this chapter after June 30, 1994, shall
submit a report to the department on December 31st of the year in which the investment
project is certified by the department as having been operationally completed,
and on December 31st of each of the seven succeeding calendar years. The
report shall contain information, as required by the department, from which the
department may determine whether the recipient is meeting the requirements of
this chapter. If the recipient fails to submit a report or submits an
inadequate report, the department may declare the amount of deferred taxes
outstanding to be immediately assessed and payable.

(2)
If, on the basis of a report under this section or other information, the
department finds that an investment project is not eligible for tax deferral
under this chapter ((for reasons other than failure to create the required
number of qualified employment positions)), the amount of deferred taxes
outstanding for the project shall be immediately due.

(3)
((If, on the basis of a report under this section or other information, the
department finds that an investment project for which a deferral has been
granted under this chapter prior to July 1, 1994, has been operationally
complete for three years and has failed to create the required number of
qualified employment positions, the department shall assess interest, but not
penalties, on the deferred taxes for the project. The interest shall be
assessed at the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes, shall be assessed
retroactively to the date of deferral, and shall accrue until the deferred
taxes are repaid.

(4)
If, on the basis of a report under this section or other information, the
department finds that an investment project for which a deferral has been
granted under this chapter after June 30, 1994, has been operationally complete
for three years and has failed to create the required number of qualified
employment positions, the amount of taxes not eligible for deferral shall be
immediately due. The department shall assess interest at the rate provided for
delinquent excise taxes, but not penalties, retroactively to the date of
deferral.

(5)
If, on the basis of a report under this section or other information, the
department finds that an investment project qualifying for deferral under RCW
82.60.040(1) (b) or (c) has failed to comply with any requirement of RCW
82.60.045 for any calendar year for which reports are required under subsection
(1) of this section, twelve and one-half percent of the amount of deferred
taxes shall be immediately due. The department shall assess interest at the
rate provided for delinquent excise taxes, but not penalties, retroactively to
the date of deferral.

(6)))
Notwithstanding any other subsection of this section, deferred taxes need not
be repaid on machinery and equipment for lumber and wood products industries,
and sales of or charges made for labor and services, of the type which
qualifies for exemption under RCW 82.08.02565 or 82.12.02565 to the extent the
taxes have not been repaid before July 1, 1995.

(((7)))
(4) Notwithstanding any other subsection of this section, deferred taxes
on the following need not be repaid:

(a)
Machinery and equipment, and sales of or charges made for labor and services,
which at the time of purchase would have qualified for exemption under RCW
82.08.02565; and

(b)
Machinery and equipment which at the time of first use would have qualified for
exemption under RCW 82.12.02565.

PART
VIII

DISTRESSED AREA
BUSINESS AND OCCUPATION TAX JOB CREDIT

Sec.
801. RCW
82.62.010 and 1996 c 290 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Applicant" means a person applying for a tax credit under this
chapter.

(2)
"Department" means the department of revenue.

(3)
"Eligible area" means((: (a) A county in which the average level
of unemployment for the three years before the year in which an application is
filed under this chapter exceeds the average state unemployment for those years
by twenty percent; (b) a county that has a median household income that is less
than seventy-five percent of the state median household income for the previous
three years; (c) a metropolitan statistical area, as defined by the office of
federal statistical policy and standards, United States department of commerce,
in which the average level of unemployment for the calendar year immediately
preceding the year in which an application is filed under this chapter exceeds
the average state unemployment for such calendar year by twenty percent; (d) a designated
community empowerment zone approved under RCW 43.63A.700; or (e) subcounty
areas in those counties that are not covered under (a) of this subsection that
are timber impact areas as defined in RCW 43.31.601)) an area as defined
in RCW 82.60.020.

(4)(a)
"Eligible business project" means manufacturing or research and
development activities which are conducted by an applicant in an eligible area
at a specific facility, provided the applicant's average full-time qualified
employment positions at the specific facility will be at least fifteen percent
greater in the year for which the credit is being sought than the applicant's
average full-time qualified employment positions at the same facility in the
immediately preceding year.

(b)
"Eligible business project" does not include any portion of a
business project undertaken by a light and power business as defined in RCW
82.16.010(5) or that portion of a business project creating qualified full-time
employment positions outside an eligible area or those recipients of a sales
tax deferral under chapter 82.61 RCW.

(5)
"Manufacturing" means ((all activities of a commercial or
industrial nature wherein labor or skill is applied, by hand or machinery, to
materials so that as a result thereof a new, different, or useful substance or
article of tangible personal property is produced for sale or commercial or
industrial use and shall include the production or fabrication of specially
made or custom made articles)) the same as defined in RCW 82.04.120.
"Manufacturing" also includes computer programming, the production of
computer software, and other computer-related services, and the activities
performed by research and development laboratories and commercial testing
laboratories.

(6)
"Person" has the meaning given in RCW 82.04.030.

(7)
"Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time employee
employed in the eligible business project during the entire tax year.

(8)
"Tax year" means the calendar year in which taxes are due.

(9)
"Recipient" means a person receiving tax credits under this chapter.

(10)
"Research and development" means the development, refinement,
testing, marketing, and commercialization of a product, service, or process
before commercial sales have begun. As used in this subsection, "commercial
sales" excludes sales of prototypes or sales for market testing if the
total gross receipts from such sales of the product, service, or process do not
exceed one million dollars.

Sec.
802. RCW
82.62.030 and 1997 c 366 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person shall be allowed a credit against the tax due under chapter 82.04 RCW
as provided in this section. ((For an application approved before January
1, 1996, the credit shall equal one thousand dollars for each qualified
employment position directly created in an eligible business project. For an
application approved on or after January 1, 1996, the credit shall equal two
thousand dollars for each qualified employment position directly created in an
eligible business project. For an application approved on or after July 1,
1997,)) The credit shall equal: (a) Four thousand dollars
for each qualified employment position with wages and benefits greater than
forty thousand dollars annually that is directly created in an eligible
business((. For an application approved on or after July 1, 1997, the
credit shall equal)) and (b) two thousand dollars for each qualified
employment position with wages and benefits less than or equal to forty
thousand dollars annually that is directly created in an eligible business.

(2)
The department shall keep a running total of all credits granted under this
chapter during each fiscal year. The department shall not allow any credits
which would cause the tabulation to exceed ((five million five hundred
thousand dollars in fiscal year 1998 or 1999 or)) seven million five
hundred thousand dollars in any fiscal year ((thereafter)). If all or
part of an application for credit is disallowed under this subsection, the
disallowed portion shall be carried over for approval the next fiscal year.
However, the applicant's carryover into the next fiscal year is only permitted
if the tabulation for the next fiscal year does not exceed the cap for that
fiscal year as of the date on which the department has disallowed the
application.

(3)
No recipient may use the tax credits to decertify a union ((or to displace
existing jobs in any community in the state)).

(4)
No recipient may receive a tax credit on taxes which have not been paid during
the taxable year.

PART
IX

TECHNOLOGY-BASED
BUSINESSES

Software

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 901. It is
the intent of the legislature to attract and retain technology-based businesses
in distressed counties. Section 902 of this act provides a tax incentive to
those businesses that develop or manufacture software in distressed counties.
Section 903 of this act provides a tax incentive to those businesses that are
engaged in the business of providing technical support services from distressed
counties. Encouragement of these types of business will stimulate the
information technology industry and be of benefit to the state economy in
general. To further the impact and benefit of this program, this incentive is
limited to those counties of the state that are characterized by unemployment
or low income. The legislature finds that providing this targeted incentive
will both increase its effectiveness and create a high technology work force in
distressed counties.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 902. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to the limits and provisions of this section, a credit is authorized
against the tax otherwise due under this chapter for persons engaged in a
distressed county in the business of manufacturing or programming of software,
as those terms are defined in this section.

(2)
A person who partially or totally relocates a business from one distressed
county to another distressed county is eligible for any qualifying new jobs
created as a result of the relocation but is not eligible to receive credit for
the jobs moved from one county to the other.

(3)(a)
To qualify for the credit, the qualifying activity of the person must be
conducted in a distressed county and the qualified employment position must be
located in the distressed county.

(b)
If an activity is conducted both from a distressed county and outside of a
distressed county, the credit is available if at least ninety percent of the
qualifying activity takes place within a distressed county. If the qualifying
activity is a service taxable activity, the place where the work is performed
is the place at which the activity is conducted.

(4)(a)
The credit under this section shall equal one thousand dollars for each
qualified employment position created after July 1, 1999, in an eligible area.
A credit is earned for the calendar year the person is hired to fill the
position. Additionally a credit is earned for each year the position is
maintained over the subsequent consecutive years, up to six years. The county
must meet the definition of a distressed county at the time the position is
filled. If the county does not have a distressed county status the following
year or years, the position is still eligible for the remaining years if all
other conditions are met.

(b)
Credit may not be taken for hiring of persons into positions that exist before
July 1, 1999. Credit is authorized for new employees hired for new positions
created on or after July 1, 1999. New positions filled by existing employees
are eligible for the credit under this section only if the position vacated by
the existing employee is filled by a new hire. A business that is a sole
proprietorship without any employees is equivalent to one employee position and
this type of business is eligible to receive credit for one position.

(c)
If a position is filled before July 1st, this position is eligible for the full
yearly credit. If it is filled after June 30th, this position is eligible for
half of the credit.

(d)
A person that has engaged in qualifying activities in the distressed county before
the effective date of this section qualifies for the credit under this section
for positions created and filled after the effective date of this section.

(5)
No application is necessary for the tax credit. The person must keep records
necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this section. This
information includes information relating to description of qualifying activity
engaged in the distressed county and outside the distressed county by the
person as well as detailed records on positions and employees. The department
shall, in consultation with a representative group of affected taxpayers,
develop a method of segregating activity and related income so that those
persons who engage in multiple activities can determine eligibility for credit
under this section.

(6)
If at any time the department finds that a person is not eligible for tax
credit under this section, the amount of taxes for which a credit has been
claimed shall be immediately due. The department shall assess interest, but
not penalties, on the taxes for which the person is not eligible. The interest
shall be assessed at the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under
chapter 82.32 RCW, shall be assessed retroactively to the date the tax credit
was taken, and shall accrue until the taxes for which a credit has been used
are repaid.

(7)
The credit under this section may be used against any tax due under this
chapter, but in no case may a credit earned during one calendar year be carried
over to be credited against taxes incurred in a subsequent calendar year. A
person is not eligible to receive a credit under this section if the person is
receiving credit for the same position under chapter 82.62 RCW or RCW
82.04.44525 or is taking the credit under section 903 of this act. No refunds
may be granted for credits under this section.

(8)
County eligibility under this section shall be based on the same list as
published by the department under chapter 82.60 RCW. The eligibility period is
from July 1st of each year to June 30th of the next year.

(9)
A person taking tax credits under this section shall make an annual report to
the department. The report shall be in a letter form and shall include the
following information: Number of positions for which credit is being claimed,
type of position for which credit is being claimed, type of activity in which
the person is engaged in the county, and how long the person has been located
in the county. The report must be filed by January 30th of each year for which
credit was claimed during the previous year.

(10)
Transfer of ownership does not affect credit eligibility; however, the credit
is available to the successor for remaining periods in the seven years only if
the eligibility conditions of this section are met.

(11)
As used in this section:

(a)
"Distressed county" means an eligible area as defined in RCW
82.60.020.

(b)
"Manufacturing" means the same as "to manufacture" under
RCW 82.04.120. Manufacturing includes the activities of both manufacturers and
processors for hire.

(c)
"Programming" means the activities that involve the creation or
modification of software, as that term is defined in this chapter, and that are
taxable as a service under RCW 82.04.290(2) or as a retail sale under RCW
82.04.050.

(d)
"Qualifying activity" means manufacturing or programming of software.

(e)
"Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time position
doing programming of software or manufacturing of software. This excludes
administrative, professional, service, executive, and other similar positions.
If an employee is either voluntarily or involuntarily separated from
employment, the employment position is considered filled on a full-time basis
if the employer is either training or actively recruiting a replacement
employee. Full-time means a position for at least thirty-five hours a week.

(f)
"Software" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 82.04.215.

Help
Desk Services

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 903. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to the limits and provisions of this section, a credit is authorized
against the tax otherwise due under this chapter for persons engaged in a
distressed county in the business of providing information technology help desk
services to third parties.

(2)
To qualify for the credit, the help desk services must be conducted from a
distressed county.

(3)(a)
For the first eighty-four months in which the person is engaged in the activity
of providing information technology help desk services in the distressed
county, the amount of the credit shall be equal to one hundred percent of the
amount of tax due under this chapter that is attributable to providing the
services from the distressed county. In order to qualify for the credit under
this subsection (3)(a), the county must meet the definition of "distressed
county" at the time the person begins to conduct qualifying business in
the county. If the county subsequently does not qualify for distressed county
status, the person may continue to take the credit for the remaining time in
the eighty-four months if all other conditions are met. A person who locates
in a county during a period of time for which the county does not meet the
distressed county status is not eligible to receive the credit under this
subsection (3)(a).

(b)
A person who is not eligible for the credit under (a) of this subsection is potentially
eligible for credit under this subsection (3)(b). If the person is engaged in
the activity of providing information technology help desk services in a
distressed county, the amount of the credit shall equal sixty-eight percent of
the amount of tax due under this chapter that is attributable to providing the
service from the distressed county. In order to qualify for the credit under
this subsection, the county must meet the definition of "distressed
county" during the period of time for which the credit is being claimed.
A person is not eligible for a credit under this subsection (3)(b) for activity
conducted during any period of time the county does not have a distressed
county status.

(c)
A person who has engaged in providing information technology help desk services
in the distressed county before the effective date of this section qualifies
for the credit under (a) of this subsection for any remaining time in the
eighty-four months, after which time the person is potentially eligible for the
credit under (b) of this subsection. A person who has engaged in providing
information technology help desk services in the distressed county before the
effective date of this section for more than eighty-four months is potentially
eligible for the credit under (b) of this subsection.

(4)
No application is necessary for the tax credit. The person must keep records
necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this section. These
records include information relating to description of activity engaged in a
distressed county by the person.

(5)
If at any time the department finds that a person is not eligible for tax
credit under this section, the amount of taxes for which a credit has been used
is immediately due. The department shall assess interest, but not penalties,
on the credited taxes for which the person is not eligible. The interest shall
be assessed at the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under chapter
82.32 RCW, shall be assessed retroactively to the date the tax credit was
taken, and shall accrue until the taxes for which a credit has been used are
repaid.

(6)
The credit under this section may be used against any tax due under this
chapter, but in no case may a credit earned during one calendar year be carried
over to be credited against taxes incurred in a subsequent calendar year. A
person is not eligible to receive a credit under this section if the person is
receiving credit under section 902 of this act or RCW 82.04.44525 or chapter
82.62 RCW. No refunds may be granted for credits under this section.

(7)
County eligibility under this section shall be based on the same list as
published by the department under chapter 82.60 RCW. The eligibility period is
from July 1st of each year to June 30th of the next year.

(8)
A person taking tax credits under this section shall make an annual report to
the department. The report shall be in a letter form and shall include the
following information: Type of activity in which the person is engaged in the
county, number of employees in the distressed county, and how long the person
has been located in the county. The report must be filed by January 30th of
each year for which credit was claimed during the previous year.

(9)
Transfer of ownership does not affect credit eligibility; however, the credit
is available to the successor only if the eligibility conditions of this
section are met.

(10)
As used in this section:

(a)
"Distressed county" means an eligible area as defined in RCW
82.60.020.

(b)
"First eighty-four months" means the eighty-four months of operation
in a county following commencement of business activity. Business activity is
deemed to commence upon the act of engaging in the business of providing the
help desk services from the county.

(c)
"Information technology help desk services" means the following
inbound technical or customer support services performed using electronic and
telephonic communication:

(i)
Hardware and software maintenance;

(ii)
Hardware and software diagnostics and troubleshooting;

(iii)
Hardware and software installation;

(iv)
Hardware and software repair;

(v)
Hardware and software information and training; and

(vi)
Hardware and software upgrade.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 904. A
new section is added to chapter 82.62 RCW to read as follows:

A
person is not eligible to receive a credit under this chapter if the person is
receiving credit for the same position under section 902 of this act or RCW
82.04.44525 or is receiving a credit under section 903 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 905. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
82.60.045 (Eligible projects--Additional requirements) and 1995
1st sp.s. c 3 s 7 & 1994 sp.s. c 1 s 4; and

(2) RCW
82.60.047 (Governor designation of county as eligible area‑-Natural
disaster, business closure, military base closure, mass layoff) and 1994 sp.s.
c 1 s 9.

PART
X

ELECTRIC
UTILITIES

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1001. The
legislature finds that it is necessary to employ multiple approaches to
revitalize the economy of Washington state's rural areas. The legislature also
finds that where possible, Washington state should develop programs which can
complement other private, state, and federal programs. It is the intent of
section 1002 of this act to complement such rural economic development efforts by
creating a public utility tax offset program to help establish locally based
electric utility revolving fund programs to be used for economic development
and job creation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1002. A
new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The following definitions apply to this section:

(a)
"Qualifying project" means a project designed to achieve job creation
or business retention, to add or upgrade nonelectrical infrastructure, to add
or upgrade health and safety facilities, to accomplish energy and water use
efficiency improvements, including renewable energy development, or to add or
upgrade emergency services in any designated qualifying rural area.

(b)
"Qualifying rural area" means:

(i)
An eligible area as defined in RCW 82.60.020; or

(ii)
Any geographic area in the state that receives electricity from a light and
power business with fewer than twenty-six meters per mile of distribution line
as determined and published by the department of revenue effective July 1st of
each year. The department shall use current data provided by the electricity
industry.

(c)
"Electric utility rural economic development revolving fund" means a
fund devoted exclusively to funding qualifying projects in qualifying rural
areas.

(d)
"Local board" is a board of directors with at least, but not limited
to, three members who have been appointed by the sponsoring electric utility to
oversee and direct the activities of the electric utility rural economic
development revolving fund.

(e)
"Geographic area" means any portion of a light and power business'
service territory, either in whole or any subdivision thereof.

(2)
A light and power business with fewer than twenty-six active meters per mile of
distribution line in any geographic area in the state shall be allowed a credit
against taxes due under this chapter in an amount equal to fifty percent of
contributions made in any calendar year directly to an electric utility rural
economic development revolving fund. The credit under this section shall not
exceed one hundred thousand dollars per calendar year. The credit may not
exceed the tax that would otherwise be due under this chapter. Refunds shall
not be granted in the place of credits and excess expenditures shall not be
carried over to subsequent years.

(3)
The right to claim tax credits under this section expires December 31, 2005.
However any credits claimed prior to that date remain available for use
indefinitely, subject to restrictions set forth in subsection (6) of this
section.

(4)
To qualify for the credit in subsection (2) of this section, the light and
power business shall establish an electric utility rural economic development
revolving fund which is governed by a local board whose members shall reside in
the qualifying rural area served by the light and power business. The local
board shall have authority to determine all criteria and conditions for the
expenditure of funds from the electric utility rural economic development fund,
and for the terms and conditions of repayment.

(5)
Any funds repaid to the electric utility rural economic development fund by
recipients shall be made available for additional qualifying projects.

(6)
If at any time the electric utility rural economic development fund is
dissolved, any moneys claimed as a tax credit under this section shall either
be granted to a qualifying project or refunded to the state within two years of
termination.

(7)
The total amount of credits granted under this section shall not exceed seven
hundred fifty thousand dollars in any fiscal year.

PART
XI

COMMUNITY
EMPOWERMENT ZONES

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1101. A
new section is added to chapter 82.60 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
For the purposes of this section:

(a)
"Eligible area" also means a designated community empowerment zone
approved under RCW 43.63A.700.

(b)
"Eligible investment project" also means an investment project in an
eligible area as defined in this section.

(2)
In addition to the provisions of RCW 82.60.040, the department shall issue a
sales and use tax deferral certificate for state and local sales and use taxes
due under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW, on each eligible investment
project that is located in an eligible area, if the applicant establishes that
at the time the project is operationally complete:

(a)
The applicant will hire at least one qualified employment position for each
seven hundred fifty thousand dollars of investment on which a deferral is
requested; and

(b)
The positions will be filled by persons who at the time of hire are residents
of the community empowerment zone in which the project is located. As used in
this subsection, "resident" means the person makes his or her home in
the community empowerment zone. A mailing address alone is insufficient to
establish that a person is a resident for the purposes of this section. The
persons must be hired after the date the application is filed with the
department.

(3)
All other provisions and eligibility requirements of this chapter apply to
applicants eligible under this section.

(4)
If a person does not meet the requirements of this section by the end of the
calendar year following the year in which the project is certified as operationally
complete, all deferred taxes are immediately due.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1102. A
new section is added to chapter 82.62 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
For the purposes of this section "eligible area" also means a
designated community empowerment zone approved under RCW 43.63A.700.

(2)
An eligible business project located within an eligible area as defined in this
section qualifies for a credit under this chapter for those employees who at
the time of hire are residents of the community empowerment zone in which the
project is located, if the fifteen percent threshold is met. As used in this
subsection, "resident" means the person makes his or her home in the
community empowerment zone. A mailing address alone is insufficient to
establish that a person is a resident for the purposes of this section.

(3)
All other provisions and eligibility requirements of this chapter apply to
applicants eligible under this section.

PART
XII

REPEALED
SECTIONS

Sec.
1201. RCW
43.131.386 and 1997 c 367 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

The
following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended,
are each repealed, effective June 30, 2001:

(1)
RCW 43.31.601 and 1997 c 367 s 1, 1995 c 226 s 1, 1992 c 21 s 2, &
1991 c 314 s 2;

(2)
RCW 43.31.641 and 1997 c 367 s 6, 1995 c 226 s 4, 1993 c 280 s 50, &
1991 c 314 s 7;

(3)
RCW 50.22.090 and ((1995 c 226 s 5, 1993 c 316 s 10, 1992 c 47 s 2, &
1991 c 315 s 4)) 1997 c 367 s 4;

(4)
((RCW 43.160.212 and 1996 c 168 s 4, 1995 c 226 s 6, & 1993 c 316 s 5;

(5))) RCW
43.63A.021 and 1997 c 367 s 5 & 1995 c 226 s 11;

(((6)))
(5) RCW 43.63A.600 and 1995 c 226 s 12, 1994 c 114 s 1, 1993 c 280 s 77,
& 1991 c 315 s 23;

(((7)))
(6) RCW 43.63A.440 and 1997 c 367 s 7, 1995 c 226 s 13, 1993 c
280 s 74, & 1989 c 424 s 7;

(((8)
RCW 43.160.200 and 1995 c 226 s 16, 1993 c 320 s 7, 1993 c 316 s 4, & 1991
c 314 s 23;

(9))) (7)
RCW 28B.50.258 and 1995 c 226 s 18 & 1991 c 315 s 16;

(((10)))
(8) RCW 28B.50.262 and 1995 c 226 s 19 & 1994 c 282 s 3;

(((11)))
(9) RCW 28B.80.570 and 1997 c 367 s 14, 1995 c 226 s 20, 1992 c
21 s 6, & 1991 c 315 s 18;

(((12)))
(10) RCW 28B.80.575 and 1995 c 269 s 1001, 1995 c 226 s 21,
& 1991 c 315 s 19;

(((13)))
(11) RCW 28B.80.580 and 1997 c 367 s 15, 1995 c 226 s 22, 1993
sp.s. c 18 s 34, 1992 c 231 s 31, & 1991 c 315 s 20;

(((14)))
(12) RCW 28B.80.585 and 1995 c 226 s 23 & 1991 c 315 s 21;

(((15)))
(13) RCW 43.17.065 and 1995 c 226 s 24, 1993 c 280 s 37, 1991 c 314 s
28, & 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 77;

(((16)))
(14) RCW 43.20A.750 and ((1995 c 226 s 25, 1993 c 280 s 38, 1992 c 21
s 4, & 1991 c 153 s 28)) 1997 c 367 s 16;

(((17)))
(15) RCW 43.168.140 and 1995 c 226 s 28 & 1991 c 314 s 20;

(((18)))
(16) RCW 50.12.270 and 1997 c 367 s 17, 1995 c 226 s 30,
& 1991 c 315 s 3;

(((19)))
(17) RCW 50.70.010 and 1995 c 226 s 31, 1992 c 21 s 1, & 1991 c 315
s 5; and

(((20)))
(18) RCW 50.70.020 and 1995 c 226 s 32 & 1991 c 315 s 6.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1202. RCW
43.160.212 (Rural natural resources impact areas--Loans for public
works facilities) and 1996 c 168 s 4, 1995 c 226 s 6, 1993 c 316 s 5, 1992 c 21
s 8, & 1991 c 314 s 26 are each repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1203. 1997
c 367 s 11, 1995 c 226 s 8, 1993 c 316 s 7, & 1991 c 314 s 33 (uncodified)
are each repealed.

PART
XIII

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1301. Part
headings and subheadings used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1302.
Section 101 of this act takes effect January 1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1303.
Sections 1, 102 through 105, 201, 202, 301 through 305, 401, 501, 601, 701
through 703, 801, 802, 901 through 905, 1001, 1002, 1101, 1102, and 1201
through 1203 of this act take effect August 1, 1999.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1304.
Sections 701 through 703, 801, 802, and 905 of this act do not affect any
existing right acquired or liability or obligation under the sections amended
or repealed in those sections or any rule or order adopted under those
sections, nor does it affect any proceeding instituted under those sections.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1305. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---