BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that workers engaged in the handling, transportation,
treatment, and disposal of biomedical waste may be exposed to elevated risks of
contracting diseases from pathogens conveyed by air or water. These risks may
be reduced by application of occupational health standards for airborne
pathogens and waterborne pathogens that are comparable to those developed to
protect workers from bloodborne pathogens.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The department of labor and industries shall review available data, studies,
hazard analyses, and other information regarding the potential for employee
exposure to airborne or waterborne biological hazards in the handling,
transport, treatment, and disposal of biomedical waste. Based on this review,
the department shall make recommendations for appropriate action under the
department's existing authority to protect workers and develop a plan for
implementing the recommendations. The department shall report to the
legislature its findings, recommendations, and implementation plan and
recommendations for action by the legislature no later than December 1, 1999.

(2) This section expires December 31, 1999.

---
END ---