BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

The
tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of tangible personal
property consumed or labor and services rendered with respect to contracts for
the state's World War II memorial.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
provisions of this chapter shall not apply in respect to the use of tangible
personal property consumed or labor and services rendered for contracts related
to the state's World War II memorial.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---