BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that most law enforcement effort to prevent prostitution is
directed at punishing prostitutes. The legislature also finds that many
patrons of prostitutes use motor vehicles in order to obtain the services of
prostitutes and that successful prevention of prostitution involves efforts to
curtail the demand for services offered by prostitutes. It is the intent of
the legislature to decrease the demand for prostitution services and thereby
eliminate the economic foundation for the prostitution industry. It is also
the intent of the legislature to eliminate traffic congestion and other
concerns to neighborhoods and business areas caused by patrons cruising in
motor vehicles in areas of high prostitution activity.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 9A.88 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Upon arresting and taking into custody a person suspected of patronizing a
prostitute in violation of RCW 9A.88.110 or patronizing a juvenile prostitute
in violation of RCW 9.68A.100, where a motor vehicle was used in the commission
of either crime, a law enforcement officer may immediately impound the vehicle,
provided that the person arrested is the owner of the vehicle.

(2) Impoundments performed under this section shall be in
accordance with chapter 46.55 RCW.

---
END ---