BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW to read as follows:

All
persons employed by, volunteering with, contracting with, leasing space from,
or otherwise providing health care services directly to patients at a health
care facility shall wear identification badges. The badge must display the
person's first name, or first and last name, or initials or a numeric
identifier, and the title of his or her profession under Title 18 RCW, or job
title, if the person is not a regulated health care professional. The badge
must indicate if the person is a delegatee nursing assistant delegated tasks
under chapter 18.88A RCW. The badge must be worn on the person's clothing so
that it is visible and readable. For the purposes of this section, "health
care facility" means a facility that provides health related services,
including but not limited to, a hospital, clinic, pharmacy, health care
provider's office, diagnostic or treatment center, neuropsychiatric or mental
health facility, or long-term care facility required to be licensed under
chapter 18.20, 18.51, 72.36, or 70.128 RCW or a home health, hospice, or home
care agency licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, or contracted assisted living
services under RCW 74.39A.010, or in-home independent care provider, but not
including veterinary medical facilities. For the purposes of this section
"person" includes but is not limited to health care provider, staff
member, and all other employees, both professional and nonprofessional, as well
as volunteers. It does not include visitors or family members in adult family
homes who do not regularly provide services to residents, nor does
"person" include veterinarians, licensed under chapter 18.92 RCW, or
their employees.

The
health care facility administrator or his or her designee is responsible for
assuring that all persons comply with this section.

Sec.
2. RCW
74.46.410 and 1998 c 322 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Costs will be unallowable if they are not documented, necessary, ordinary, and
related to the provision of care services to authorized patients.

(2)
Unallowable costs include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a)
Costs of items or services not covered by the medical care program. Costs of
such items or services will be unallowable even if they are indirectly
reimbursed by the department as the result of an authorized reduction in
patient contribution;

(b)
Costs of services and items provided to recipients which are covered by the
department's medical care program but not included in the medicaid per-resident
day payment rate established by the department under this chapter;

(c)
Costs associated with a capital expenditure subject to section 1122 approval
(part 100, Title 42 C.F.R.) if the department found it was not consistent with
applicable standards, criteria, or plans. If the department was not given
timely notice of a proposed capital expenditure, all associated costs will be
unallowable up to the date they are determined to be reimbursable under
applicable federal regulations;

(d)
Costs associated with a construction or acquisition project requiring
certificate of need approval, or exemption from the requirements for
certificate of need for the replacement of existing nursing home beds, pursuant
to chapter 70.38 RCW if such approval or exemption was not obtained;

(e)
Interest costs other than those provided by RCW 74.46.290 on and after January
1, 1985;

(f)
Salaries or other compensation of owners, officers, directors, stockholders,
partners, principals, participants, and others associated with the contractor
or its home office, including all board of directors' fees for any purpose,
except reasonable compensation paid for service related to patient care;

(g)
Costs in excess of limits or in violation of principles set forth in this
chapter;

(h)
Costs resulting from transactions or the application of accounting methods
which circumvent the principles of the payment system set forth in this
chapter;

(i)
Costs applicable to services, facilities, and supplies furnished by a related
organization in excess of the lower of the cost to the related organization or
the price of comparable services, facilities, or supplies purchased elsewhere;

(j)
Bad debts of non-Title XIX recipients. Bad debts of Title XIX recipients are
allowable if the debt is related to covered services, it arises from the
recipient's required contribution toward the cost of care, the provider can
establish that reasonable collection efforts were made, the debt was actually
uncollectible when claimed as worthless, and sound business judgment
established that there was no likelihood of recovery at any time in the future;

(k)
Charity and courtesy allowances;

(l)
Cash, assessments, or other contributions, excluding dues, to charitable
organizations, professional organizations, trade associations, or political
parties, and costs incurred to improve community or public relations;

(m)
Vending machine expenses;

(n)
Expenses for barber or beautician services not included in routine care;

(o)
Funeral and burial expenses;

(p)
Costs of gift shop operations and inventory;

(q)
Personal items such as cosmetics, smoking materials, newspapers and magazines,
and clothing, except those used in patient activity programs;

(r)
Fund-raising expenses, except those directly related to the patient activity
program;

(s)
Penalties and fines;

(t)
Expenses related to telephones, televisions, radios, and similar appliances in
patients' private accommodations;

(u)
Federal, state, and other income taxes;

(v)
Costs of special care services except where authorized by the department;

(w)
Expenses of an employee benefit not in fact made available to all employees on
an equal or fair basis, for example, key-man insurance and other insurance or
retirement plans;

(x)
Expenses of profit-sharing plans;

(y)
Expenses related to the purchase and/or use of private or commercial airplanes
which are in excess of what a prudent contractor would expend for the ordinary
and economic provision of such a transportation need related to patient care;

(z)
Personal expenses and allowances of owners or relatives;

(aa)
All expenses of maintaining professional licenses or membership in professional
organizations;

(bb)
Costs related to agreements not to compete;

(cc)
Amortization of goodwill, lease acquisition, or any other intangible asset,
whether related to resident care or not, and whether recognized under generally
accepted accounting principles or not;

(dd)
Expenses related to vehicles which are in excess of what a prudent contractor
would expend for the ordinary and economic provision of transportation needs
related to patient care;

(ee)
Legal and consultant fees in connection with a fair hearing against the
department where a decision is rendered in favor of the department or where
otherwise the determination of the department stands;

(ff)
Legal and consultant fees of a contractor or contractors in connection with a
lawsuit against the department;

(gg)
Lease acquisition costs, goodwill, the cost of bed rights, or any other
intangible assets;

(hh)
All rental or lease costs other than those provided in RCW 74.46.300 on and
after January 1, 1985;

(ii)
Postsurvey charges incurred by the facility as a result of subsequent
inspections under RCW 18.51.050 which occur beyond the first postsurvey visit
during the certification survey calendar year;

(jj)
Compensation paid for any purchased nursing care services, including registered
nurse, licensed practical nurse, and nurse assistant services, obtained through
service contract arrangement in excess of the amount of compensation paid for
such hours of nursing care service had they been paid at the average hourly
wage, including related taxes and benefits, for in-house nursing care staff of
like classification at the same nursing facility, as reported in the most
recent cost report period;

(kk)
For all partial or whole rate periods after July 17, 1984, costs of land and
depreciable assets that cannot be reimbursed under the Deficit Reduction Act of
1984 and implementing state statutory and regulatory provisions;

(ll)
Costs reported by the contractor for a prior period to the extent such costs,
due to statutory exemption, will not be incurred by the contractor in the
period to be covered by the rate;

(mm)
Costs of outside activities, for example, costs allocated to the use of a
vehicle for personal purposes or related to the part of a facility leased out
for office space;

(nn)
Travel expenses outside the states of Idaho, Oregon, and Washington and the
province of British Columbia. However, travel to or from the home or central
office of a chain organization operating a nursing facility is allowed whether
inside or outside these areas if the travel is necessary, ordinary, and related
to resident care;

(oo)
Moving expenses of employees in the absence of demonstrated, good-faith effort
to recruit within the states of Idaho, Oregon, and Washington, and the province
of British Columbia;

(pp)
Depreciation in excess of four thousand dollars per year for each passenger car
or other vehicle primarily used by the administrator, facility staff, or
central office staff;

(qq)
Costs for temporary health care personnel from a nursing pool not registered
with the secretary of the department of health;

(rr)
Payroll taxes associated with compensation in excess of allowable compensation
of owners, relatives, and administrative personnel;

(ss)
Costs and fees associated with filing a petition for bankruptcy;

(tt)
All advertising or promotional costs, except reasonable costs of help wanted
advertising;

(uu)
Outside consultation expenses required to meet department-required minimum data
set completion proficiency;

(vv)
Interest charges assessed by any department or agency of this state for failure
to make a timely refund of overpayments and interest expenses incurred for
loans obtained to make the refunds;

(ww)
All home office or central office costs, whether on or off the nursing facility
premises, and whether allocated or not to specific services, in excess of the
median of those adjusted costs for all facilities reporting such costs for the
most recent report period; ((and))

(xx)
Tax expenses that a nursing facility has never incurred; and

(yy) Costs associated with the provision of identification
badges to health care facility employees under section 1 of this act.

---
END ---