BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.21B.005 and 1990 c 65 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is created an environmental hearings office of the state of Washington.
The environmental hearings office shall consist of the pollution control
hearings board created in RCW 43.21B.010, the forest practices appeals board
created in RCW 76.09.210, the shorelines hearings board created in RCW
90.58.170, and the hydraulic appeals board created in RCW 75.20.130. The
chairman of the pollution control hearings board shall be the chief executive
officer of the environmental hearings office. Membership, powers, functions,
and duties of the pollution control hearings board, the forest practices
appeals board, the shorelines hearings board, and the hydraulic appeals board
shall be as provided by law.

(2)
The chief executive officer of the environmental hearings office may appoint an
administrative appeals judge who shall possess the powers and duties conferred
by the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, in cases before the
boards comprising the office. The administrative appeals judge shall have a
demonstrated knowledge of environmental law, and shall be admitted to the
practice of law in the state of Washington. Additional administrative appeals
judges may also be appointed by the chief executive officer on the same terms.
Administrative appeals judges shall not be subject to chapter 41.06 RCW.

(3)
The administrative appeals judges appointed under subsection (2) of this
section are subject to discipline and termination, for cause, by the chief
executive officer. Upon written request by the person so disciplined or
terminated, the chief executive officer shall state the reasons for such action
in writing. The person affected has a right of review by the superior court of
Thurston county on petition for reinstatement or other remedy filed within
thirty days of receipt of such written reasons.

(4)
The chief executive officer may appoint, discharge, and fix the compensation of
such administrative or clerical staff as may be necessary.

(5) The chief executive officer may also contract for required
services.

---
END ---