BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 41.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this
subsection apply throughout this section.

(a)
"Disabled employee" means an individual eligible to receive a
disability retirement allowance from the public employees' retirement system.

(b)
"Health plan" means a contract, policy, fund, trust, or other program
established by a county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state
that provides for all or a part of hospitalization or medical aid for its
employees and their dependents under RCW 41.04.180.

(c)
"Retired employee" means an individual who is a public employee
covered under the public employees' retirement system with not less than five
years of service at the date of retirement.

(d)
"Supplemental plan" means an individual or group health plan designed
primarily as a supplement to reimbursements under federal medicare for the
hospital, medical, or surgical expenses of persons eligible for medicare by
reason of age.

(2)
A county, municipality, or other political subdivision that provides a health
plan for its employees shall permit retired and disabled employees and their
dependents to continue participation in the plan subject to the exceptions,
limitations, and conditions set forth in this section. However, this section
does not apply to a county, municipality, or other political subdivision
participating in an insurance program administered under chapter 41.05 RCW if
retired and disabled employees and their dependents of the participating
county, municipality, or other political subdivision are covered under an
insurance program administered under chapter 41.05 RCW.

(3)
A county, municipality, or other political subdivision may require a person who
requests continued participation in its health plan under subsection (2) of
this section to pay the full cost of such participation, including any amounts
necessary for administration. However, this subsection does not require an
employer who is currently paying for all or part of a health plan for its
retired and disabled employees to discontinue those payments.

(4)
If a person continuing participation under a health plan becomes eligible for
federal medicare, then health plan participation is terminated and the person
has the option of participating in a supplemental plan provided by the
employer. Payment required of the person shall be modified to reflect cost
differences between the health plan and the supplemental plan.

(5)
Payments for continued participation in a former employer's health plan may be
assigned to the underwriter of the health plan from public pension benefits or
may be paid to the former employer, as determined by the former employer, so
that an underwriter of the health plan that is an insurance company, health
care service contractor, or health maintenance organization is not required to
accept individual payments from persons continuing participation in the
employer's health plan.

(6)
After an initial open enrollment period of not less than ninety days after the
effective date of this section, an employer may not be required to permit a
person to continue participation in the health plan if the person is
responsible for a lapse in coverage under the plan. In addition, an employer
may not be required to permit a person to continue participation in the
employer's health plan if the employer offered continued participation in a
health plan with substantially similar benefits and at substantially the same
price as that plan provided for active employees and the person failed to
enroll in that plan at the time the person was retired or disabled.

(7)
If a person continuing participation in the former employer's health plan has
medical coverage through another employer, the medical coverage of the other
employer is the primary coverage for purposes of coordination of benefits as
provided for in the former employer's health plan.

(8)
If a person's continued participation in a health plan was permitted because of
the person's relationship to a retired or disabled employee of the employer
providing the health plan and the retired or disabled employee dies, then that
person is permitted to continue participation in the health plan for a period
of not more than six months after the death of the retired or disabled
employee. However, the employer providing the health plan may permit continued
participation beyond that time period.

(9)
An employer may offer one or more health plans different from that provided for
active employees and designed to meet the needs of persons requesting continued
participation in the employer's health plan. An employer, in designing or
offering continued participation in a health plan, may utilize terms or
conditions necessary to administer the plan to the extent the terms and
conditions do not conflict with this section.

(10)
If an employer changes the underwriter of a health plan, the replaced
underwriter has no further responsibility or obligation to persons who
continued participation in a health plan of the replaced underwriter. However,
the employer shall permit those persons to participate in any new health plan.

(11)
The benefits granted under this section are not considered a matter of
contractual right. Should the legislature, a county, municipality, or other
political subdivision of the state revoke or change any benefits granted under
this section, an affected person is not entitled to receive the benefits as a
matter of contractual right.

(12) This section does not affect any health plan contained in a
collective bargaining agreement in existence as of the effective date of this
section. However, any plan contained in future collective bargaining
agreements shall conform to this section. In addition, this section does not
affect any health plan contract or policy in existence as of the effective date
of this section. However, any renewal of the contract or policy shall conform
to this section.

---
END ---