BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.70.115 and 1986 c 241 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If it appears to the director that a person has engaged or is about to engage
in an act or practice constituting a violation of this chapter, or a rule
adopted or an order issued under this chapter, the director may issue an order
directing the person to cease and desist from continuing the act or practice.
Reasonable notice of and opportunity for a hearing shall be given. The
director may issue a temporary order pending a hearing. The temporary order
shall remain in effect until ten days after the hearing is held and shall
become final if the person to whom the notice is addressed does not request a
hearing within fifteen days after receipt of the notice.

(2)
The director may levy and collect a civil penalty, in an amount not to exceed
one thousand dollars for each violation, against a person found by the director
to be curbstoning, as that term is defined in subsection (3) of this section.
A person against whom a civil penalty has been imposed must receive reasonable
notice and an opportunity for a hearing on the issue. The civil penalty is due
ten days after issuance of a final order.

(3) For the purposes of subsection (2) of this section,
"curbstoning" means a person or firm engaged in buying and offering
for sale, or buying and selling, five or more vehicles that are each less than
thirty years old in a twelve-month period without holding a vehicle dealer
license. For the purpose of subsections (1) and (2) of this section,
"curbstoning" does not include the sale of equipment or vehicles used
in farming as defined in RCW 46.04.183 and sold by a farmer as defined in RCW
46.04.182.

---
END ---