BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
48.66.045 and 1995 c 85 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
issuer of a medicare supplement insurance policy or certificate providing
coverage to a resident of this state issued on or after January 1, 1996, shall:

(1)
Issue coverage under its approved standardized benefit plans ((B, C,
D, E, F, and G)) without evidence of insurability to any resident of this
state who is eligible for both medicare hospital and physician services by
reason of age or by reason of disability or end-stage renal disease, if the
medicare supplement policy replaces another ((medicare supplement
standardized)) benefit plan, policy, or certificate ((B,
C, D, E, F, or G,)) or other ((more comprehensive)) coverage ((than
the replaced policy)). The replacing issuer shall waive any time
periods applicable to preexisting conditions in the medicare supplement
contract for similar benefits to the extent that similar exclusions have been
satisfied under the original coverage; and

(2)
((Issue coverage under its standardized plans A, H, I, and J without
evidence of insurability to any resident of this state who is eligible for both
medicare hospital and physician services by reason of age or by reason of
disability or end-stage renal disease, if the medicare supplement policy
replaces another medicare supplement policy or certificate which is the same
standardized plan as the replaced policy; and

(3))) Set
rates only on a community-rated basis. Premiums shall be equal for all
policyholders and certificate holders under a standardized medicare supplement
benefit plan form, except that an issuer may develop no more than two rating
pools that distinguish between an insured's eligibility for medicare by reason
of:

(a)
Age; or

(b)
Disability or end-stage renal disease.

(3) Chapter . . ., Laws of 2000 (this act) applies to
all medicare supplement plans offered or issued on or after September 1, 2000.

---
END ---