BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
75.46.005 and 1998 c 246 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that repeated attempts to improve salmonid fish runs
throughout the state of Washington have failed to avert listings of salmon and
steelhead runs as threatened or endangered under the federal endangered species
act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.). These listings threaten the sport,
commercial, and tribal fishing industries as well as the economic well-being
and vitality of vast areas of the state. It is the intent of the legislature
to begin activities required for the recovery of salmon stocks as soon as
possible, although the legislature understands that successful recovery efforts
may not be realized for many years because of the life cycle of salmon and the
complex array of natural and human-caused problems they face.

The
legislature finds that it is in the interest of the citizens of the state of
Washington for the state to retain primary responsibility for managing the
natural resources of the state, rather than abdicate those responsibilities to
the federal government, and that the state may best accomplish this
objective by integrating local and regional recovery activities into a
state-wide strategy that can make the most effective use of provisions of
federal laws allowing for a state lead in salmon recovery. The legislature
also finds that there is a substantial link between the provisions of the
federal endangered species act and the federal clean water act (33 U.S.C. Sec.
1251 et seq.). The legislature further finds that habitat restoration is a
vital component of salmon recovery efforts. Therefore, it is the intent of the
legislature to specifically address salmon habitat restoration in a coordinated
manner and to develop a structure that allows for the coordinated delivery of
federal, state, and local assistance to communities for habitat projects that
will assist in the recovery and enhancement of salmon stocks.

The
legislature also finds that credible scientific review and oversight is
essential for any salmon recovery effort to be successful.

The
legislature therefore finds that a coordinated framework for responding to the
salmon crisis is needed immediately. To that end, the salmon recovery office
should be created within the governor's office to provide overall coordination
of the state's response; an independent science team is needed to provide
scientific review and oversight; the appropriate local or tribal government
should provide local leadership in identifying and sequencing habitat
restoration projects to be funded by state agencies; habitat restoration
projects should be implemented without delay; and a strong locally based effort
to restore salmon habitat should be established by providing a framework to
allow citizen volunteers to work effectively.

Sec.
2. RCW
75.46.040 and 1998 c 246 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The salmon recovery office is created within the office of the governor to
coordinate state strategy to allow for salmon recovery to healthy sustainable
population levels with productive commercial and recreational fisheries. The
primary purpose of the office is to coordinate and assist in the development of
salmon recovery plans for evolutionarily significant units, and to
submit those plans to the appropriate tribal governments and federal agencies
((in response to the federal endangered species act)) as an integral
part of a state-wide strategy developed consistent with the guiding principles
and procedures under section 3 of this act. The governor's salmon recovery
office may also:

(a)
Act as liaison to local governments, the state congressional delegation, the
United States congress, federally recognized tribes, and the federal executive
branch agencies for issues related to the state's endangered species act salmon
recovery plans; and

(b)
Provide the biennial state of the salmon report to the legislature pursuant to
RCW 75.46.030.

(2)
This section expires June 30, 2006.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 75.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
By September 1, 1999, the governor, with the assistance of the salmon recovery
office, shall submit a state-wide salmon recovery strategy to the appropriate
federal agencies administering the federal endangered species act.

(2)
The governor and the salmon recovery office shall be guided by the following
considerations in developing the strategy:

(a)
The strategy should identify state-wide initiatives and responsibilities with
regional and local watershed initiatives as the principal mechanism for
implementing the strategy;

(b)
The strategy should emphasize collaborative, incentive-based approaches, which
rely on the existing statutory enforcement structure;

(c)
The strategy should address all factors limiting the recovery of Washington's
listed salmon stocks, including habitat and water quality degradation, harvest
and hatchery management, inadequate streamflows, and other barriers to fish
passage. Where other limiting factors are beyond the state's jurisidictional
authorities to respond to, such as some natural predators and high seas
fishing, the strategy shall include the state's requests for federal action to
effectively address these factors;

(d)
The strategy should identify immediate actions necessary to prevent extinction
of a listed salmon stock, establish performance measures to determine if
restoration efforts are working, recommend effective monitoring and data
management, and recommend to the legislature clear and certain measures to be
implemented if performance goals are not met;

(e)
The strategy shall be developed through an active public involvement process,
including early and meaningful opportunity for public comment. In obtaining
public comment, the salmon recovery office shall hold public meetings
throughout the state and shall encourage regional and local recovery planning
efforts to similarly ensure an active public involvement process;

(f)
The strategy shall rely on the best scientific information available and
provide for incorporation of new information as it is obtained;

(g)
The strategy should seek a fair allocation of the burdens and costs upon
economic and social sectors of the state whose activities may contribute to
limiting the recovery of salmon; and

(h)
The strategy should include an element addressing phased relaxation of
restrictions as salmon populations recover, and seek clear measures and
procedures from the appropriate federal agencies for removing Washington's
salmon stocks from listing under the federal act.

Sec.
4. RCW
75.46.060 and 1998 c 246 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
Counties, cities, and tribal governments must jointly designate, by official
resolution, the area for which a habitat restoration project list is to be
developed and the lead entity that is to be responsible for submitting the
habitat restoration project list. No project included on a habitat restoration
project list shall be considered mandatory in nature and no private landowner
may be forced or coerced into participation in any respect. The lead entity
may be a county, city, conservation district, special district, tribal
government, or other entity.

(b)
The lead entity shall establish a committee that consists of representative
interests of counties, cities, conservation districts, tribes, environmental
groups, business interests, landowners, citizens, volunteer groups, regional
fish enhancement groups, and other restoration interests. The purpose of the
committee is to provide a citizen-based evaluation of the projects proposed to
promote salmon habitat restoration. The interagency review team may provide
the lead entity with organizational models that may be used in establishing the
committees.

(c)
The committee shall compile a list of habitat restoration projects, establish
priorities for individual projects, define the sequence for project
implementation, and submit these activities as the habitat restoration project
list. The committee shall also identify potential federal, state, local, and
private funding sources.

(d)
Projects that include use of side channels, off-stream rearing enhancement,
improvement in over-wintering habitat, or use of acclimation ponds shall
receive consideration for funding.

(2)
The area covered by the habitat project list must be based, at a minimum, on a
WRIA, combination of WRIAs, an evolutionarily significant unit, or any other
area as agreed to by the counties, cities, and tribes meeting the requirements
of this subsection. Preference will be given to projects in an area that
contain a salmon species that is listed or proposed for listing under the
federal endangered species act.

Sec.
5. RCW
75.46.080 and 1998 c 246 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Representatives from the conservation commission, the department of
transportation, and the department of fish and wildlife shall establish an
interagency review team. Except as provided in subsection (((6))) (7)
of this section, habitat restoration project lists shall be submitted to the
interagency review team by January 1st and July 1st of each year beginning in
1999.

(2)
If no lead entity has been formed under RCW 75.46.060, the interagency review
team shall rank, prioritize, and dispense funds for habitat restoration
projects by giving preference to the projects that:

(a)
Provide a greater benefit to salmon recovery;

(b)
Will be implemented in a more critical area;

(c)
Are the most cost-effective;

(d)
Have the greatest matched, or in-kind funding; and

(e)
Will be implemented by a sponsor with a successful record of project
implementation.

(3)
Projects that include use of side channels, off-stream rearing enhancement,
improvement in over-wintering habitat, or use of acclimation ponds shall
receive consideration for funding under the provisions of this section.

(4)
If a lead entity established under RCW 75.46.060 has been formed, the
interagency review team shall evaluate project lists and may remove, but not
add, projects from a habitat project list.

(((4)))
(5) The interagency review team shall provide a summary of funding for
habitat restoration project lists to the governor and to the legislature by
December 1st of each year.

(((5)))
(6) The interagency review team may annually establish a maximum amount
of funding available for any individual project, subject to available funding.
The interagency review team shall attempt to assure a geographical balance in
assigning priorities to projects.

(((6)))
(7) For fiscal year 1998, the department of fish and wildlife, the
conservation commission, and the department of transportation may authorize,
subject to appropriations, expenditures for projects that have been developed
to restore salmon habitat before completion of the project lists required in
RCW 75.46.060(2).

(((7)))
(8) Where a lead entity has been established pursuant to RCW 75.46.060,
the interagency review team may provide block grants to the lead entity,
subject to available funding.

(9)
Prior to finalizing funding decisions under the provisions of this section, the
interagency review team shall consult with interests representing irrigated and
non-irrigated agriculture, sport and commercial fishing interests, large and
small scale timber interests, conservation districts, and county and city
governmental interests.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 75.46 RCW to read as follows:

RCW
75.46.040 and section 3 of this act apply prospectively only and not
retroactively. Nothing in this section shall be construed to invalidate
actions taken in recovery planning at the local, regional, or state level prior
to the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---