BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that a periodic review of the accounts and their uses is
necessary. While creating new accounts may facilitate the implementation of
legislative intent, the creation of too many accounts limits the effectiveness
of performance-based budgeting. Too many accounts also limit the flexibility
of the legislature to address emerging and changing issues in addition to
creating administrative burdens for the responsible agencies. Accounts created
for specific purposes may no longer be valid or needed. Accordingly, this act
eliminates accounts that are not in use or are unneeded and consolidates
accounts that are similar in nature.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.84.092 and 1997 c 218 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations
shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4)
of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services account,
the health system capacity account, the personal health services account, the
highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium refund
account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative
account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise
tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use
tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the
municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the perpetual
surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees' retirement system
plan I account, the public employees' retirement system plan II account, the
Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource management cost account, the
site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state
investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust
fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the teachers' retirement
system plan I account, the teachers' retirement system plan II account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the
University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington
building account, the volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension principal
account, the volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension administrative
account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan I retirement account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan II
retirement account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the
Washington State University building account, the Washington State University
bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings derived from
investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent
fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their
respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, ((the central Puget Sound public transportation account, the
city hardship assistance account,)) the county arterial preservation
account, the department of licensing services account, ((the economic
development account,)) the essential rail assistance account, ((the
essential rail banking account,)) the ferry bond retirement fund, ((the
gasohol exemption holding account,)) the grade crossing protective fund,
the high capacity transportation account, the highway bond retirement fund, ((the
highway construction stabilization account,)) the highway safety account,
the marine operating fund, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety
education account, the pilotage account, the public transportation systems
account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry
operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust
account, the safety and education account, ((the small city account,))
the special category C account, the state patrol highway account, ((the
transfer relief account, the transportation capital facilities account,))
the transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation
improvement account, ((the transportation revolving loan account,)) and
the urban arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

Sec.
3. RCW
43.84.092 and 1997 c 218 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations
shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4)
of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local
leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the
local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan I account, the public employees' retirement
system plan II account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource
management cost account, the site closure account, the special wildlife account,
the state employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve
account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the teachers'
retirement system plan I account, the teachers' retirement system plan II
account, the transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust
fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of
Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension
principal account, the volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension
administrative account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan I retirement
account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system
plan II retirement account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the
Washington State University building account, the Washington State University
bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings derived from
investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent
fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their
respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's
service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, ((the central Puget Sound public transportation account, the
city hardship assistance account,)) the county arterial preservation
account, the department of licensing services account, ((the economic
development account,)) the essential rail assistance account, ((the
essential rail banking account,)) the ferry bond retirement fund, ((the
gasohol exemption holding account,)) the grade crossing protective fund,
the high capacity transportation account, the highway bond retirement fund, ((the
highway construction stabilization account,)) the highway safety account,
((the marine operating fund,)) the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle
safety education account, the pilotage account, the public transportation
systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound
ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial
trust account, the safety and education account, ((the small city account,))
the special category C account, the state patrol highway account, ((the
transfer relief account, the transportation capital facilities account,))
the transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation
improvement account, ((the transportation revolving loan account,)) and
the urban arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

Sec.
4. RCW
43.84.092 and 1998 c 341 s 708 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations
shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4)
of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local
leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the
local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan I account, the public employees' retirement
system plan II account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource
management cost account, the site closure account, the special wildlife
account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance
reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment
board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the
teachers' retirement system plan I account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan II and plan III account, the transportation infrastructure
account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond
retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the volunteer
fire fighters' relief and pension principal account, the volunteer fire
fighters' relief and pension administrative account, the Washington judicial
retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' system plan I retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan II retirement account, the Washington
school employees' retirement system combined plan II and III account, the
Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University
building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the
water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University
capital projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent
common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university
permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.
All earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, ((the central Puget Sound public transportation account, the
city hardship assistance account,)) the county arterial preservation
account, the department of licensing services account, ((the economic
development account,)) the essential rail assistance account, ((the
essential rail banking account,)) the ferry bond retirement fund, ((the
gasohol exemption holding account,)) the grade crossing protective fund,
the high capacity transportation account, the highway bond retirement fund, ((the
highway construction stabilization account,)) the highway safety account,
((the marine operating fund,)) the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle
safety education account, the pilotage account, the public transportation
systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound
ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial
trust account, the safety and education account, ((the small city account,))
the special category C account, the state patrol highway account, ((the
transfer relief account, the transportation capital facilities account,))
the transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation
improvement account, ((the transportation revolving loan account,)) and
the urban arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

Sec.
5. RCW
43.160.010 and 1996 c 51 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature finds that it is the public policy of the state of Washington
to direct financial resources toward the fostering of economic development
through the stimulation of investment and job opportunities and the retention
of sustainable existing employment for the general welfare of the inhabitants
of the state. Reducing unemployment and reducing the time citizens remain
jobless is important for the economic welfare of the state. A valuable means
of fostering economic development is the construction of public facilities
which contribute to the stability and growth of the state's economic base.
Strengthening the economic base through issuance of industrial development
bonds, whether single or umbrella, further serves to reduce unemployment.
Consolidating issues of industrial development bonds when feasible to reduce
costs additionally advances the state's purpose to improve economic vitality.
Expenditures made for these purposes as authorized in this chapter are declared
to be in the public interest, and constitute a proper use of public funds. A
community economic revitalization board is needed which shall aid the
development of economic opportunities. The general objectives of the board
should include:

(a)
Strengthening the economies of areas of the state which have experienced or are
expected to experience chronically high unemployment rates or below average
growth in their economies;

(b)
Encouraging the diversification of the economies of the state and regions
within the state in order to provide greater seasonal and cyclical stability of
income and employment;

(c)
Encouraging wider access to financial resources for both large and small
industrial development projects;

(d)
Encouraging new economic development or expansions to maximize employment;

(e)
Encouraging the retention of viable existing firms and employment; and

(f)
Providing incentives for expansion of employment opportunities for groups of
state residents that have been less successful relative to other groups in
efforts to gain permanent employment.

(2)
The legislature also finds that the state's economic development efforts can be
enhanced by, in certain instances, providing funds to improve state highways in
the vicinity of new industries considering locating in this state or existing
industries that are considering significant expansion.

(a)
The legislature finds it desirable to provide a process whereby the need for
diverse public works improvements necessitated by planned economic development
can be addressed in a timely fashion and with coordination among all
responsible governmental entities.

(b)
((It is the intent of the legislature to create an economic development
account within the motor vehicle fund from which expenditures can be made by
the department of transportation for state highway improvements necessitated by
planned economic development. All such)) Transportation
improvements ((must first be)) on state highways that have been
approved by the ((state transportation commission and the)) community
economic revitalization board must be approved by the transportation
commission in accordance with the procedures established by RCW 43.160.074
and 47.01.280 to receive funding. ((It is further the intent of the
legislature that such improvements not jeopardize any other planned highway
construction projects. The improvements are intended to be of limited size and
cost, and to include such items as additional turn lanes, signalization,
illumination, and safety improvements.))

(3)
The legislature also finds that the state's economic development efforts can be
enhanced by providing funds to improve markets for those recyclable materials
representing a large fraction of the waste stream. The legislature finds that
public facilities which result in private construction of processing or
remanufacturing facilities for recyclable materials are eligible for
consideration from the board.

(4)
The legislature finds that sharing economic growth state-wide is important to
the welfare of the state. Rural natural resource impact areas do not share in
the economic vitality of the Puget Sound region. Infrastructure is one of
several ingredients that are critical for economic development. Rural natural
resource impact areas generally lack the infrastructure necessary to diversify
and revitalize their economies. It is, therefore, the intent of the
legislature to increase the availability of funds to help provide
infrastructure to rural natural resource impact areas.

Sec.
6. RCW
46.68.090 and 1994 c 225 s 2 and 1994 c 179 s 3 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
All moneys that have accrued or may accrue to the motor vehicle fund from the
motor vehicle fuel tax and special fuel tax shall be first expended for the
following purposes:

(a)
For payment of refunds of motor vehicle fuel tax and special fuel tax that has
been paid and is refundable as provided by law;

(b)
For payment of amounts to be expended pursuant to appropriations for the
administrative expenses of the offices of state treasurer, state auditor, and
the department of licensing of the state of Washington in the administration of
the motor vehicle fuel tax and the special fuel tax, which sums shall be
distributed monthly;

(c)
((From April 1, 1992, through March 31, 1996, for distribution to the
transfer relief account, hereby created in the motor vehicle fund, an amount
not to exceed three hundred twenty-five one-thousandths of one percent;

(d))) For
distribution to the rural arterial trust account in the motor vehicle fund, an
amount as provided in RCW 82.36.025(2) and 46.68.095(3);

(((e)))
(d) For distribution to the urban arterial trust account in the motor
vehicle fund, an amount as provided in RCW 46.68.100(4) and 82.36.025(3);

(((f)))
(e) For distribution to the transportation improvement account in the
motor vehicle fund, an amount as provided in RCW 46.68.095(1);

(((g)))
(f) For distribution to the special category C account, hereby created
in the motor vehicle fund, an amount as provided in RCW 46.68.095(2);

(((h)))
(g) For distribution to the county arterial preservation account, hereby
created in the motor vehicle fund, an amount as provided in RCW 46.68.095(4);

(((i)))
(h) For distribution to the motor vehicle fund to be allocated to cities
and towns as provided in RCW 46.68.110, an amount as provided in RCW
46.68.095(5);

(((j)))
(i) For distribution to the motor vehicle fund to be allocated to
counties as provided in RCW 46.68.120, an amount as provided in RCW
46.68.095(6);

(((k)))
(j) For expenditure for highway purposes of the state as defined in RCW
46.68.130, an amount as provided in RCW 82.36.025(4) and 46.68.095(7)((;

(l)
From July 1, 1994, through June 30, 1995, for distribution to the gasohol
exemption holding account, hereby created in the motor vehicle fund, an amount
equal to five and thirty-four one-hundredths of one percent of the amount
available prior to distributions provided under (a) through (k) of this subsection,
to be used only for highway construction;

(m)
For distribution to the small city account, hereby created in the motor vehicle
fund, an amount as provided for in RCW 46.68.095(1), 46.68.100(9), and
82.36.025(3))).

(2)
The amount accruing to the motor vehicle fund by virtue of the motor vehicle
fuel tax and the special fuel tax and remaining after payments, distributions,
and expenditures as provided in this section shall, for the purposes of this
chapter, be referred to as the "net tax amount."

Sec.
7. RCW
46.68.095 and 1994 c 179 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

All
moneys that have accrued or may accrue to the motor vehicle fund from the motor
vehicle fuel tax and special fuel tax imposed by RCW 82.36.025(5) shall be
distributed monthly by the state treasurer in the following proportions:

(1)
((Through June 30, 1995, one and one-half cents shall be deposited in the
transportation improvement account and expended in accordance with RCW
47.26.084. After June 30, 1995,)) Eighty-seven percent of one and
one-half cents shall be deposited in the transportation improvement account ((and
expended in accordance with RCW 47.26.086)) and thirteen percent of one and
one-half cents shall be deposited in the ((small city)) urban
arterial trust account and expended in accordance with RCW ((47.26.115))
47.26.080.

(2)
From April 1, 1991, seventy-five one-hundredths of one cent shall be deposited
in the special category C account in the motor vehicle fund for special
category C projects. Special category C projects are category C projects as
defined in RCW 47.05.030(3) that, due to high cost only, will require bond
financing to complete construction.

The
following criteria, listed in order of priority, shall be used in determining
which special category C projects have the highest priority:

(a)
Accident experience; and

(b)
Fatal accident experience; and

(c)
Capacity to move people and goods safely and at reasonable speeds without undue
congestion; and

(d)
Continuity of development of the highway transportation network.

Moneys
deposited in the special category C account in the motor vehicle fund may be
used for payment of debt service on bonds the proceeds of which are used to
finance special category C projects under this subsection.

(3)
Twenty-five one-hundredths of one cent shall be deposited in the rural arterial
trust account in the motor vehicle fund.

(4)
Forty-five one-hundredths of one cent shall be deposited in the county arterial
preservation account. These funds shall be distributed by the county road
administration board to counties in proportions corresponding to the number of
paved arterial lane miles in the unincorporated area of each county and shall
be used for improvements to sustain the structural, safety, and operational
integrity of county arterials. The county road administration board shall
adopt reasonable rules and develop policies to implement this program and to
assure that a pavement management system is used.

(5)
One-half of one cent shall be allocated to cities and towns as provided in RCW
46.68.110.

(6)
From April 1, 1990, through March 31, 1991, thirty one-hundredths of one cent
and after March 31, 1991, fifty-five one-hundredths of one cent shall be allocated
to counties as provided in RCW 46.68.120.

(7)
One cent shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund and shall be expended for
highway purposes of the state as defined in RCW 46.68.130.

Sec.
8. RCW
46.68.100 and 1994 c 179 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

From
the net tax amount in the motor vehicle fund there shall be paid monthly as
funds accrue the following sums:

(1)
To the cities and towns, to be distributed as provided by RCW 46.68.110, sums
equal to six and ninety-two hundredths percent of the net tax amount;

(2)
To the cities and towns, to be expended as provided by RCW 46.68.115, sums
equal to four and sixty-one hundredths percent of the net tax amount;

(3)
To the counties, sums equal to twenty-two and seventy-eight hundredths percent
of the net tax amount (a) out of which there shall be distributed from time to
time, as directed by the department of transportation, those sums as may be
necessary to carry out the provisions of RCW 47.56.725, and (b) less any
amounts appropriated to the county road administration board to implement the
provisions of RCW 47.56.725(4), with the balance of such county share to be
distributed monthly as the same accrues for distribution in accordance with RCW
46.68.120;

(4)
To the urban arterial trust account in the motor vehicle fund, (((a) through
June 30, 1995,)) sums equal to seven and twelve hundredths percent of the
net tax amount((, (b) and after June 30, 1995, ninety-five percent of seven
and twelve hundredths percent of the net tax amount));

(5)
To the state, to be expended as provided by RCW 46.68.130, sums equal to
forty-five and twenty-six hundredths percent of the net tax amount;

(6)
To the state, to be expended as provided by RCW 46.68.150 as now or hereafter
amended, sums equal to six and ninety-five hundredths percent of the net tax
amount;

(7)
To the Puget Sound capital construction account in the motor vehicle fund sums
equal to three and twenty-one hundredths percent of the net tax amount;

(8)
To the Puget Sound ferry operations account in the motor vehicle fund sums
equal to three and fifteen hundredths percent of the net tax amount((;

(9)
After June 30, 1995, to the small city account in the motor vehicle fund, sums
equal to five percent of seven and twelve hundredths percent of the net tax
amount)).

Nothing
in this section or in RCW 46.68.090 or 46.68.130 may be construed so as to
violate any terms or conditions contained in any highway construction bond
issues now or hereafter authorized by statute and whose payment is by such
statute pledged to be paid from any excise taxes on motor and special vehicle
fuels.

Sec.
9. RCW
46.68.110 and 1996 c 94 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Funds
credited to the incorporated cities and towns of the state as set forth in RCW
46.68.100(1) shall be subject to deduction and distribution as follows:

(1)
One and one-half percent of such sums shall be deducted monthly as such sums
are credited and set aside for the use of the department of transportation for
the supervision of work and expenditures of such incorporated cities and towns
on the city and town streets thereof, including the supervision and
administration of federal-aid programs for which the department of
transportation has responsibility: PROVIDED, That any moneys so retained and
not expended shall be credited in the succeeding biennium to the incorporated
cities and towns in proportion to deductions herein made;

(2)
Thirty-three one-hundredths of one percent of such funds shall be deducted
monthly, as such funds accrue, and set aside for the use of the department of
transportation for the purpose of funding the cities' share of the costs of
highway jurisdiction studies and other studies. Any funds so retained and not
expended shall be credited in the succeeding biennium to the cities in
proportion to the deductions made;

(3)
One percent of such funds shall be deducted monthly, as such funds accrue, to
be deposited in the ((city hardship assistance)) urban arterial trust
account((, hereby created)) in the motor vehicle fund, to implement the
city hardship assistance program, as provided in RCW 47.26.164. However, any
moneys so retained and not required to carry out the program as of July 1,
1996, and July 1st of each odd-numbered year thereafter, shall be provided
within sixty days to the treasurer and distributed in the manner prescribed in
subsection (4) of this section;

(4)
The balance remaining to the credit of incorporated cities and towns after such
deduction shall be apportioned monthly as such funds accrue among the several
cities and towns within the state ratably on the basis of the population last
determined by the office of financial management.

Sec.
10. RCW
47.01.280 and 1985 c 433 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Upon receiving an application for improvements to an existing state highway or
highways pursuant to RCW 43.160.074 from the community economic revitalization
board, the transportation commission shall, in a timely manner, determine
whether or not the proposed state highway improvements:

(a)
Meet the safety and design criteria of the department of transportation;

(b)
Will impair the operational integrity of the existing highway system;

(c)
Will affect any other improvements planned by the department; and

(d)
Will be consistent with its policies developed pursuant to RCW 47.01.071.

(2)
Upon completion of its determination of the factors contained in subsection (1)
of this section and any other factors it deems pertinent, the transportation
commission shall forward its approval, as submitted or amended or disapproval
of the proposed improvements to the board, along with any recommendation it may
wish to make concerning the desirability and feasibility of the proposed
development. If the transportation commission disapproves any proposed
improvements, it shall specify its reasons for disapproval.

(3)
Upon notification from the board of an application's approval pursuant to RCW
43.160.074, the transportation commission shall direct the department of transportation
to carry out the improvements in coordination with the applicant.

(4)
The transportation commission shall notify the legislative transportation
committee of all state highway improvements to be carried out pursuant to RCW
43.160.074 and this section.

(((5) All state highway improvements that are approved pursuant
to RCW 43.160.074 and this section shall be charged to the economic development
account of the motor vehicle fund created by RCW 47.10.803.))

Sec.
11. RCW
47.02.130 and 1990 c 293 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Authorized uses of proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in
RCW 47.02.120 through 47.02.190 include but are not limited to repayment to the
motor vehicle fund ((for the loan from the motor vehicle fund to the
transportation capital facilities account in the motor vehicle fund provided in
the supplemental transportation budget)) for the initial financing of the
headquarters facilities.

Sec.
12. RCW
47.02.150 and 1990 c 293 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.02.120
through 47.02.190 shall be available only for the purposes enumerated in RCW
47.02.120 and 47.02.130; for the payment of bond anticipation notes, if any;
and for the payment of bond issuance costs, including the costs of
underwriting. Proceeds ((required to repay the motor vehicle fund loan))
shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund ((and remaining proceeds shall
be deposited in the transportation capital facilities account)).

Sec.
13. RCW
47.10.801 and 1994 c 173 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In order to provide funds necessary for the location, design, right of way, and
construction of selected interstate and other state highway improvements, there
shall be issued and sold, subject to subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this
section, upon the request of the Washington state transportation commission a
total of four hundred sixty million dollars of general obligation bonds of the
state of Washington for the following purposes and specified sums:

(a)
Not to exceed two hundred twenty-five million dollars to pay the state's share
of costs for federal-aid interstate highway improvements and until December 31,
1989, to temporarily pay the regular federal share of construction of
federal-aid interstate highway improvements to complete state routes 82, 90,
182, and 705 in advance of federal-aid apportionments under the provisions of
23 U.S.C. Secs. 115 or 122: PROVIDED, That the total amount of bonds issued to
temporarily pay the regular federal share of construction of federal-aid
interstate highways in advance of federal-aid apportionments as authorized by
this section and RCW 47.10.790 shall not exceed one hundred twenty million
dollars: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the transportation commission shall consult
with the legislative transportation committee prior to the adoption of plans
for the obligation of federal-aid apportionments received in federal fiscal
year 1985 and subsequent years to pay the regular federal share of federal-aid
interstate highway construction projects or to convert such apportionments
under the provisions of 23 U.S.C. Secs. 115 or 122;

(b)
Two hundred twenty-five million dollars for major transportation improvements
throughout the state that are identified as category C improvements and for
selected major non-interstate construction and reconstruction projects that are
included as Category A Improvements in RCW 47.05.030;

(c)
Ten million dollars for state highway improvements necessitated by planned
economic development, as determined through the procedures set forth in RCW
43.160.074 and 47.01.280.

(2)
The amount of bonds authorized in subsection (1)(a) of this section shall be
reduced if the transportation commission, in consultation with the legislative
transportation committee, determines that any of the bonds that have not been
sold are no longer required.

(3)
The amount of bonds authorized in subsection (1)(b) of this section shall be
increased by an amount not to exceed, and concurrent with, any reduction of
bonds authorized under subsection (1)(a) of this section in the manner
prescribed in subsection (2) of this section.

(4)
The transportation commission may decrease the amount of bonds authorized in
subsection (1)(c) of this section and increase the amount of bonds authorized
in subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section, or both by an amount equal to the
decrease in subsection (1)(c) of this section. The transportation commission
may decrease the amount of bonds authorized in subsection (1)(c) of this
section only if the legislature appropriates ((a transfer of)) an equal
amount of funds from the motor vehicle fund - basic account ((to the
economic development account under RCW 47.10.803)) for the purposes
enumerated in subsection (1)(c) of this section.

Sec.
14. RCW
47.10.803 and 1986 c 290 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The proceeds from the sale of the bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.801(1) (((a) and (b))) shall be deposited in the motor vehicle
fund. ((The proceeds from the sale of the bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.801(1)(c) shall be deposited in the economic development account of the
motor vehicle fund, hereby created.)) All such proceeds shall be available
only for the purposes enumerated in RCW 47.10.801, for the payment of bond
anticipation notes, if any, and for the payment of the expense incurred in the
drafting, printing, issuance, and sale of such bonds. The costs of obtaining
insurance, letters of credit, or other credit enhancement devices with respect
to the bonds shall be considered to be expenses incurred in the issuance and
sale of the bonds.

Sec.
15. RCW
47.12.125 and 1991 c 291 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

All
moneys paid to the state of Washington under any of the provisions of RCW
47.12.120 shall be deposited in the department's advance right of way revolving
fund, except moneys that are subject to federal aid reimbursement and moneys
received from rental of capital facilities properties, which shall be
deposited in the motor vehicle fund((, and except that moneys received from
rental of capital facilities properties shall be deposited in the
transportation capital facilities account as defined in chapter 47.13 RCW)).

Sec.
16. RCW
47.26.080 and 1994 c 179 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

There
is hereby created in the motor vehicle fund the urban arterial trust account.
The intent of the urban arterial trust account program is to improve the ((urban))
arterial street system of the state by improving mobility and safety while
supporting an environment essential to the quality of life of the citizens of
the state of Washington. ((To be eligible to receive these funds, a project
must be consistent with the Growth Management Act, the Clean Air Act including
conformity, and the Commute Trip Reduction Law. The project shall consider
safety, mobility, and physical characteristics of the roadway and must be
partially funded by local government.

All
moneys deposited in the motor vehicle fund to be credited to the urban arterial
trust account shall be expended for the construction and improvement of city
arterial streets and county arterial roads within urban areas, for expenses of
the transportation improvement board in accordance with RCW 47.26.140, or for
the payment of principal or interest on bonds issued for the purpose of
constructing or improving city arterial streets and county arterial roads
within urban areas, or for reimbursement to the state, counties, cities, and
towns in accordance with RCW 47.26.4252 and 47.26.4254, the amount of any
payments made on principal or interest on urban arterial trust account bonds
from motor vehicle or special fuel tax revenues which were distributable to the
state, counties, cities, and towns.)) The city hardship
assistance program, as provided in RCW 47.26.164, and the small city program,
as provided for in RCW 47.26.115, are implemented within the urban arterial
trust account.

The
board shall not allocate funds, nor make payments of the funds under RCW
47.26.260, to any county, city, or town identified by the governor under RCW
36.70A.340.

Sec.
17. RCW
47.26.084 and 1994 c 179 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The
transportation improvement account is hereby created in the motor vehicle
fund. ((The board shall adopt rules and procedures which shall govern the
allocation of funds in the transportation improvement account at such time as
funds become available. All projects selected for funding before the fiscal
year 1996 transportation improvement account program are governed by this
section.

The
board shall allocate funds from the account by June 30th of each year for the
ensuing fiscal year and shall endeavor to provide geographical diversity in
selecting improvement projects to be funded from the account.

Of
the amount made available to the transportation improvement board from the
transportation improvement account for improvement projects:

(1)
Eighty-seven percent shall be allocated to urban counties, to cities with a
population of five thousand and over, and to transportation benefit districts.
Improvement projects may include, but are not limited to, multi-agency projects
and arterial improvement projects in fast-growing areas.

To
be eligible to receive these funds, a project must be (a) consistent with
state, regional, and local transportation plans and consideration shall be
given to the project's relationship, both actual and potential, with rapid mass
transit and at such time as a rail plan is developed by the rail development
commission, projects must be consistent therewith, (b) necessitated by existing
or reasonably foreseeable congestion levels attributable to economic
development or growth, and (c) partially funded by local government or private
contributions, or a combination of such contributions. The board shall, for
those projects meeting the eligibility criteria, determine what percentage of
each project is funded by local and/or private contribution. Priority
consideration shall be given to those projects with the greatest percentage of
local and/or private contribution.)) The intent of the
program is to improve mobility of people and goods in Washington state by
supporting economic development and environmentally responsive solutions to our
state-wide transportation system needs.

Within
one year after board approval of an application for funding, a county, city, or
transportation benefit district shall provide written certification to the
board of the pledged local and/or private funding. Funds allocated to an
applicant that does not certify its funding within one year after approval may
be reallocated by the board.

(((2)
Thirteen percent shall be allocated by the board to cities and towns with a population
of less than five thousand for street improvement projects in a manner
determined by the board.))

Sec.
18. RCW
47.26.115 and 1994 c 179 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The
intent of the small city ((account)) program is to preserve and improve
the roadway system consistent with local needs of incorporated cities and towns
with a population of less than five thousand. The board shall adopt rules and
procedures to govern the allocation of funds distributed to the small city ((account.
All moneys deposited in the motor vehicle fund to be credited to the small city
account must be expended for roadway projects, for expenses of the board, or
for the payment of principal or interest on bonds issued for the purpose of
constructing or improving roadway facilities or for reimbursement to the state,
counties, cities, and towns in accordance with RCW 47.26.4252 and 47.26.4254,
the amount of any payments made on principal or interest on urban arterial
trust account bonds from motor vehicle or special fuel tax revenues that were
distributable to the state, counties, cities, and towns. The board shall not
allocate funds, nor make payments of the funds under RCW 47.26.260, to a city
or town identified by the governor under RCW 36.70A.340)) program.

Sec.
19. RCW
47.26.140 and 1996 c 49 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The transportation improvement board shall appoint an executive
director, who shall serve at its pleasure and whose salary shall be set by the
board, and may employ additional staff as it deems appropriate. All costs
associated with staff, together with travel expenses in accordance with RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060, shall be paid from the urban arterial trust account,
((small city account, city hardship assistance account, central Puget Sound
public transportation account,)) public transportation systems account, and
the transportation improvement account in the motor vehicle fund as determined
by the biennial appropriation.

Sec.
20. RCW
47.26.164 and 1991 c 342 s 60 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board shall adopt reasonable rules necessary to implement the city hardship
assistance program as recommended by the road jurisdiction study.

The
following criteria shall be used to implement the program:

(1)
Only those cities with a net gain in cost responsibility due to jurisdictional
transfers in chapter 342, Laws of 1991, as determined by the board, may
participate;

(2)
Cities with populations of fifteen thousand or less, as determined by the
office of financial management, may participate;

(3)
The board shall develop criteria and procedures under which eligible cities may
request funding for rehabilitation projects on city streets acquired under
chapter 342, Laws of 1991; and

(4)
The board shall also be authorized to allocate funds from the city
hardship ((account)) assistance program to cities with a population
under twenty thousand to offset extraordinary costs associated with the
transfer of roadways other than pursuant to chapter 342, Laws of 1991, that
occur after January 1, 1991.

Sec.
21. RCW
47.26.425 and 1994 c 179 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
funds required to repay the first authorization of two hundred million dollars
of bonds authorized by RCW 47.26.420, as amended by section 18, chapter 317,
Laws of 1977 ex. sess. or the interest thereon when due, shall be taken from
that portion of the motor vehicle fund which results from the imposition of
excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels and which is distributed to the
urban arterial trust account in the motor vehicle fund ((and the certain
sums received by the small city account in the motor vehicle fund imposed by
RCW 82.36.025(3) and 46.68.100(9))), and shall never constitute a charge
against any allocations of any other such funds in the motor vehicle fund to
the state, counties, cities, and towns unless and until the amount of the motor
vehicle fund arising from the excise tax on motor vehicle and special fuels and
distributed to the urban arterial trust account ((and the small city account))
proves insufficient to meet the requirements for bond retirement or interest on
any such bonds.

Sec.
22. RCW
47.26.4252 and 1995 c 274 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
funds required to repay the authorization of series II bonds authorized by RCW
47.26.420, as reenacted by section 3, chapter 5, Laws of 1979, or the interest
thereon when due, shall first be taken from that portion of the motor vehicle
fund which results from the imposition of excise taxes on motor vehicle and
special fuels imposed by chapters 82.36 and 82.38 RCW and which is distributed
to the urban arterial trust account in the motor vehicle fund ((and the
certain sums received by the small city account in the motor vehicle fund
imposed by RCW 82.36.025(3) and 46.68.100(9))), subject, however, to the
prior lien of the first authorization of bonds authorized by RCW 47.26.420, as
reenacted by section 3, chapter 5, Laws of 1979. If the moneys distributed to
the urban arterial trust account ((and the small city account)) shall
ever be insufficient to repay the first authorization bonds together with
interest thereon, and the series II bonds or the interest thereon when due, the
amount required to make such payments on such bonds or interest thereon shall
next be taken from that portion of the motor vehicle fund which results from
the imposition of excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels and which is
distributed to the state, counties, cities, and towns pursuant to RCW 46.68.100
as now existing or hereafter amended. Any payments on such bonds or interest
thereon taken from motor vehicle or special fuel tax revenues which are
distributable to the state, counties, cities, and towns, shall be repaid from
the first moneys distributed to the urban arterial trust account not required
for redemption of the first authorization bonds or series II and series III
bonds or interest on those bond issues.

Sec.
23. RCW
47.26.4254 and 1995 c 274 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any funds required to repay series III bonds authorized by RCW 47.26.420, or
the interest thereon, when due shall first be taken from that portion of the
motor vehicle fund that results from the imposition of excise taxes on motor
vehicle and special fuels imposed by chapters 82.36 and 82.38 RCW and that is
distributed to the urban arterial trust account in the motor vehicle fund ((and
the certain sums received by the small city account in the motor vehicle fund
imposed by RCW 82.36.025(3) and 46.68.100(9))), subject, however, to the
prior lien of the first authorization of bonds authorized by RCW 47.26.420. If
the moneys so distributed to the urban arterial trust account ((and the
small city account)), after first being applied to administrative expenses
of the transportation improvement board and to the requirements of bond
retirement and payment of interest on first authorization bonds and series II
bonds as provided in RCW 47.26.425 and 47.26.4252, are insufficient to meet the
requirements for bond retirement or interest on any series III bonds, the amount
required to make such payments on series III bonds or interest thereon shall
next be taken from that portion of the motor vehicle fund that results from the
imposition of excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels and that is
distributed to the state, counties, cities, and towns pursuant to RCW
46.68.100, subject, however, to subsection (2) of this section.

(2)
To the extent that moneys so distributed to the urban arterial trust account ((and
the small city account)) are insufficient to meet the requirements for bond
retirement or interest on any series III bonds, sixty percent of the amount
required to make such payments when due shall first be taken from that portion
of the motor vehicle fund that results from the imposition of excise taxes on motor
vehicle and special fuels and that is distributed to the state. The remaining
forty percent shall first be taken from that portion of the motor vehicle fund
that results from the imposition of excise taxes on motor vehicle and special
fuels and that is distributed to the cities and towns pursuant to RCW
46.68.100(1) and to the counties pursuant to RCW 46.68.100(3). Of the
counties', cities', and towns' share of any additional amounts required in the
fiscal year ending June 30, 1984, fifteen percent shall be taken from the
counties' distributive share and eighty-five percent from the cities' and
towns' distributive share. Of the counties', cities', and towns' share of any
additional amounts required in each fiscal year thereafter, the percentage thereof
to be taken from the counties' distributive share and from the cities' and
towns' distributive share shall correspond to the percentage of funds
authorized for specific county projects and for specific city and town
projects, respectively, from the proceeds of series III bonds, for the period
through the first eleven months of the prior fiscal year as determined by the
chairman of the transportation improvement board and reported to the state
finance committee and the state treasurer not later than the first working day
of June.

(3)
Any payments on such bonds or interest thereon taken from motor vehicle or
special fuel tax revenues that are distributable to the state, counties,
cities, and towns shall be repaid from the first moneys distributed to the urban
arterial trust account ((and the small city account)) not required for
redemption of the first authorization bonds, series II bonds, or series III
bonds or interest on these bonds.

Sec.
24. RCW
47.26.505 and 1994 c 179 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
funds required to repay such bonds, or the interest thereon when due, shall be
taken from that portion of the motor vehicle fund which results from the
imposition of excise taxes on motor vehicle and special fuels and which is
distributed to the transportation improvement account in the motor vehicle fund
((and the sums received by the small city account in the motor vehicle fund
under RCW 46.68.095)), and shall never constitute a charge against any
allocations of any other such funds in the motor vehicle fund to the state,
counties, cities, and towns unless and until the amount of the motor vehicle
fund arising from the excise tax on motor vehicle and special fuels and
distributed to the transportation improvement account proves insufficient to
meet the requirements for bond retirement or interest on any such bonds.

Sec.
25. RCW
47.56.772 and 1993 c 4 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon
the issuance of refunding bonds as authorized by RCW 47.56.770, the department
of transportation may liquidate the existing bond fund and other funds and
accounts established in the proceedings which authorized the issuance of the
outstanding toll bridge authority, ferry, and Hood Canal bridge refunding
revenue bonds and apply the money contained in those funds and accounts to the
defeasance and redemption of outstanding toll bridge authority, ferry, and Hood
Canal refunding revenue bonds, except that prior to such bond redemption, money
sufficient to pay the first interest installment on the refunding bonds shall
be deposited in the ferry bond retirement fund. Money remaining in such funds
not used for such bond defeasance and redemption or first interest installment
on the refunding bonds shall be transferred to and deposited in the ((marine
operating fund under RCW 47.56.775)) Puget Sound ferry operations
account created under RCW 47.60.530.

Sec.
26. RCW
47.60.150 and 1990 c 42 s 405 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject
to the provisions of RCW 47.60.326, the schedule of charges for the services
and facilities of the system shall be fixed and revised from time to time by
the commission so that the tolls and other revenues ((collected
together with any moneys)) deposited in the Puget Sound ferry
operations account ((transferred to the ferry system revolving account))
for maintenance and operation, and all moneys in the Puget Sound capital construction
account available for debt service will yield annual revenue and income
sufficient, after allowance for all operating, maintenance, and repair expenses
to pay the interest and principal and sinking fund charges for all outstanding
revenue bonds, and to create and maintain a fund for ordinary renewals and
replacements: PROVIDED, That if provision is made by any resolution for the
issuance of revenue bonds for the creation and maintenance of a special fund
for rehabilitating, rebuilding, enlarging, or improving all or any part of the
ferry system then such schedule of tolls and rates of charges shall be fixed
and revised so that the revenue and income will also be sufficient to comply
with such provision.

All
income and revenues as collected shall be paid to the state treasurer for the
account of the department ((as a separate trust fund and to be segregated
and disbursed upon order of the department: PROVIDED, That the fund so
segregated and set apart for the payment of the revenue bonds may be remitted
to and held by a designated trustee in such manner and with such collateral as
may be provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of said bonds. No
expenditure may be made from the revenue fund established under this section
and the bond resolution without an appropriation by law)) and deposited
into the Puget Sound ferry operations account. Nothing in this section
requires tolls on the Hood Canal bridge except as may be required by any bond
covenants.

Sec.
27. RCW
47.60.326 and 1990 c 42 s 406 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In order to maintain an adequate, fair, and economically sound schedule of
charges for the transportation of passengers, vehicles, and commodities on the
Washington state ferries, the department of transportation each year shall
conduct a full review of such charges.

(2)
Prior to February 1st of each odd-numbered year the department shall transmit
to the transportation commission a report of its review together with its
recommendations for the revision of a schedule of charges for the ensuing
biennium. The commission on or before July 1st of that year shall adopt as a
rule, in the manner provided by the Washington administrative procedure act, a
schedule of charges for the Washington state ferries for the ensuing biennium
commencing July 1st. The schedule may initially be adopted as an emergency
rule if necessary to take effect on, or as near as possible to, July 1st.

(3)
The department in making its review and formulating recommendations and the
commission in adopting a schedule of charges may consider any of the following
factors:

(a)
The amount of subsidy available to the ferry system for maintenance and
operation;

(b)
The time and distance of ferry runs;

(c)
The maintenance and operation costs for ferry runs with a proper adjustment for
higher costs of operating outmoded or less efficient equipment;

(d)
The efficient distribution of traffic between cross-sound routes;

(e)
The desirability of reasonable commutation rates for persons using the ferry
system to commute daily to work;

(f)
The effect of proposed fares in increasing walk-on and vehicular passenger use;

(g)
The effect of proposed fares in promoting all types of ferry use during nonpeak
periods;

(h)
Such other factors as prudent managers of a major ferry system would consider.

(4)
If at any time during the biennium it appears that projected ((toll))
revenues from the ((ferry system, together with the transfer from the))
Puget Sound ferry operations account ((to the ferry system revolving account))
and any other operating subsidy available to the Washington state ferries((,))
will be less than the projected total cost of maintenance and operation of the
Washington state ferries for the biennium, the department shall forthwith
undertake a review of its schedule of charges to ascertain whether or not the
schedule of charges should be revised. The department shall, upon completion
of its review report, submit its recommendation to the transportation
commission which may in its sound discretion revise the schedule of charges as
required to meet necessary maintenance and operation expenditures of the ferry
system for the biennium or may defer action until the regular annual review and
revision of ferry charges as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(5)
The provisions of RCW 47.60.330 relating to public participation shall apply to
the process of revising ferry tolls under this section.

Sec.
28. RCW
47.60.440 and 1990 c 42 s 408 are each amended to read as follows:

The
Washington state ferry system shall be efficiently managed, operated, and
maintained as a revenue-producing undertaking. Subject to the provisions of
RCW 47.60.326 the commission shall maintain and revise from time to time as
necessary a schedule of tolls and charges on said ferry system ((and, if
necessary to comply with bond covenants, on the Hood Canal bridge which
together)) with ((any)) other moneys deposited in the
Puget Sound ferry operations account ((transferred to the ferry system
revolving account)) for maintenance and operation and all moneys in the
Puget Sound capital construction account available for debt service will
produce net revenue available for debt service, in each fiscal year, in an
amount at least equal to minimum annual debt service requirements as
hereinafter provided. Minimum annual debt service requirements as used in this
section shall include required payments of principal and interest, sinking fund
requirements, and payments into reserves on all outstanding revenue bonds
authorized by RCW 47.60.400 through 47.60.470.

The
provisions of law relating to the revision of tolls and charges to meet minimum
annual debt service requirements from net revenues as required by this section
shall be binding upon the commission but shall not be deemed to constitute a
contract to that effect for the benefit of the holders of such bonds.

Sec.
29. RCW
82.36.025 and 1994 c 179 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

The
motor vehicle fuel tax rate shall be computed as the sum of the tax rate
provided in subsection (1) of this section and the additional tax rates
provided in subsections (2) through (5) of this section.

(1)
A motor vehicle fuel tax rate of seventeen cents per gallon shall apply to the
sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel.

(2)
An additional motor vehicle fuel tax rate of one-third cent per gallon shall
apply to the sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel, and the proceeds
from this additional tax rate, reduced by an amount equal to the sum of the
payments under RCW 46.68.090(1) (a), (b), and (c) multiplied by the additional
tax rate prescribed by this subsection divided by the motor vehicle fuel tax
rate provided in this section, shall be deposited in the rural arterial trust
account in the motor vehicle fund for expenditures under RCW 36.79.020.

(3)
An additional motor vehicle fuel tax rate of one-third cent per gallon shall
apply to the sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel, and the proceeds
from this additional tax rate, reduced by an amount equal to the sum of the
payments under RCW 46.68.090(1) (a), (b), and (c) multiplied by the additional
tax rate prescribed by this subsection divided by the motor vehicle fuel tax rate
provided in this section, shall be deposited in the urban arterial trust
account in the motor vehicle fund. ((After June 30, 1995, ninety-five
percent of this revenue shall be deposited in the urban arterial trust account
in the motor vehicle fund and five percent shall be deposited in the small city
account in the motor vehicle fund.))

(4)
An additional motor vehicle fuel tax rate of one-third cent per gallon shall be
applied to the sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel, and the
proceeds from this additional tax rate, reduced by an amount equal to the sum
of the payments under RCW 46.68.090(1) (a), (b), and (c) multiplied by the
additional tax rate prescribed by this subsection divided by the motor vehicle
fuel tax rate provided in this section, shall be deposited in the motor vehicle
fund to be expended for highway purposes of the state as defined in RCW
46.68.130.

(5)
An additional motor vehicle fuel tax rate of four cents per gallon from April
1, 1990, through March 31, 1991, and five cents per gallon from April 1, 1991,
applies to the sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel. The proceeds
from the additional tax rate under this subsection, reduced by an amount equal
to the sum of the payments under RCW 46.68.090(1) (a), (b), and (c) multiplied
by the additional tax rate prescribed by this subsection divided by the motor
fuel tax rate provided in this section, shall be deposited in the motor vehicle
fund and shall be distributed by the state treasurer according to RCW
46.68.095.

Sec.
30. RCW
82.44.150 and 1998 c 321 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The director of licensing shall, on the twenty-fifth day of February, May,
August, and November of each year, advise the state treasurer of the total
amount of motor vehicle excise taxes imposed by RCW 82.44.020(1) remitted to
the department during the preceding calendar quarter ending on the last day of
March, June, September, and December, respectively, except for those payable
under RCW 82.44.030, from motor vehicle owners residing within each
municipality which has levied a tax under RCW 35.58.273, which amount of excise
taxes shall be determined by the director as follows:

The
total amount of motor vehicle excise taxes remitted to the department, except
those payable under RCW 82.44.020(2) and 82.44.030, from each county shall be
multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is the population of the
municipality residing in such county, and the denominator of which is the total
population of the county in which such municipality or portion thereof is
located. The product of this computation shall be the amount of excise taxes
from motor vehicle owners residing within such municipality or portion
thereof. Where the municipality levying a tax under RCW 35.58.273 is located
in more than one county, the above computation shall be made by county, and the
combined products shall provide the total amount of motor vehicle excise taxes
from motor vehicle owners residing in the municipality as a whole. Population
figures required for these computations shall be supplied to the director by
the office of financial management, who shall adjust the fraction annually.

(2)
On the first day of the months of January, April, July, and October of each
year, the state treasurer based upon information provided by the department
shall, from motor vehicle excise taxes deposited in the transportation fund
under RCW 82.44.110, make the following deposits:

(a)
To the high capacity transportation account created in RCW 47.78.010, a sum
equal to four and five-tenths percent of the special excise tax levied under
RCW 35.58.273 by those municipalities authorized to levy a special excise tax
within each county that has a population of one hundred seventy-five thousand or
more and has an interstate highway within its borders; except that in a case of
a municipality located in a county that has a population of one hundred
seventy-five thousand or more that does not have an interstate highway located
within its borders, that sum shall be deposited in the passenger ferry account;

(b)
To the ((central Puget Sound)) public transportation systems
account created in RCW 82.44.180, for revenues distributed after June 30,
1999, within a county with a population of one million or more and a county
with a population of from two hundred thousand to less than one million
bordering a county with a population of one million or more with which it
shares a border of more than five miles, a sum equal to ((the difference
between (i) the special excise tax levied and collected under RCW 35.58.273 by
those municipalities authorized to levy and collect a special excise tax
subject to the requirements of subsections (3) and (4) of this section and (ii)
the special excise tax that the municipality would otherwise have been eligible
to levy and collect at a tax rate of .815 percent and been able to match with
locally generated tax revenues, other than the excise tax imposed under RCW
35.58.273, budgeted for any public transportation purpose. Before this
deposit, the sum shall be reduced by an amount equal to the amount distributed
under (a) of this subsection for each of the municipalities within the counties
to which this subsection (2)(b) applies; however, any transfer under this
subsection (2)(b) must be greater than zero)) 6.8688 percent of the
special excise tax distributed under RCW 35.58.273; and

(c)
To the public transportation systems account created in RCW 82.44.180, for
revenues distributed after June 30, 1999, within counties not described in
(b) of this subsection, a sum equal to ((the difference between (i) the
special excise tax levied and collected under RCW 35.58.273 by those
municipalities authorized to levy and collect a special excise tax subject to
the requirements of subsections (3) and (4) of this section and (ii) the
special excise tax that the municipality would otherwise have been eligible to
levy and collect at a tax rate of .815 percent and been able to match with
locally generated tax revenues, other than the excise tax imposed under RCW
35.58.273, budgeted for any public transportation purpose. Before this
deposit, the sum shall be reduced by an amount equal to the amount distributed
under (a) of this subsection for each of the municipalities within the counties
to which this subsection (2)(c) applies; however, any transfer under this
subsection (2)(c) must be greater than zero)) 1.0534 percent of the
special excise tax levied and collected under RCW 35.58.273.

(3)
On the first day of the months of January, April, July, and October of each
year, the state treasurer, based upon information provided by the department,
shall remit motor vehicle excise tax revenues imposed and collected under RCW
35.58.273 as follows:

(a)
The amount required to be remitted by the state treasurer to the treasurer of
any municipality levying the tax shall not exceed in any calendar year the
amount of locally-generated tax revenues, excluding (i) the excise tax imposed
under RCW 35.58.273 for the purposes of this section, which shall have been budgeted
by the municipality to be collected in such calendar year for any public
transportation purposes including but not limited to operating costs, capital
costs, and debt service on general obligation or revenue bonds issued for these
purposes; and (ii) the sales and use tax equalization distributions provided
under RCW 82.14.046; and

(b)
In no event may the amount remitted in a single calendar quarter exceed the
amount collected on behalf of the municipality under RCW 35.58.273 during the
calendar quarter next preceding the immediately preceding quarter, excluding
the sales and use tax equalization distributions provided under RCW 82.14.046.

(4)
At the close of each calendar year accounting period, but not later than April
1, each municipality that has received motor vehicle excise taxes under
subsection (3) of this section shall transmit to the director of licensing and
the state auditor a written report showing by source the previous year's
budgeted tax revenues for public transportation purposes as compared to actual
collections. Any municipality that has not submitted the report by April 1
shall cease to be eligible to receive motor vehicle excise taxes under
subsection (3) of this section until the report is received by the director of
licensing. If a municipality has received more or less money under subsection
(3) of this section for the period covered by the report than it is entitled to
receive by reason of its locally-generated collected tax revenues, the director
of licensing shall, during the next ensuing quarter that the municipality is
eligible to receive motor vehicle excise tax funds, increase or decrease the
amount to be remitted in an amount equal to the difference between the
locally-generated budgeted tax revenues and the locally-generated collected tax
revenues. In no event may the amount remitted for a calendar year exceed the
amount collected on behalf of the municipality under RCW 35.58.273 during that
same calendar year excluding the sales and use tax equalization distributions provided
under RCW 82.14.046. At the time of the next fiscal audit of each
municipality, the state auditor shall verify the accuracy of the report
submitted and notify the director of licensing of any discrepancies.

(5)
The motor vehicle excise taxes imposed under RCW 35.58.273 and required to be
remitted under this section and RCW 82.14.046 shall be remitted without
legislative appropriation.

(6)
Any municipality levying and collecting a tax under RCW 35.58.273 which does
not have an operating, public transit system or a contract for public
transportation services in effect within one year from the initial effective
date of the tax shall return to the state treasurer all motor vehicle excise
taxes received under subsection (3) of this section.

Sec.
31. RCW
82.44.180 and 1998 c 321 s 41 (Referendum Bill No. 49) are each amended to read
as follows:

(1)
The transportation fund is created in the state treasury. Revenues under RCW
82.44.110 and 82.50.510 shall be deposited into the fund as provided in those
sections.

Moneys
in the fund may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the fund
may be used only for transportation purposes and activities and operations of
the Washington state patrol not directly related to the policing of public
highways and that are not authorized under Article II, section 40 of the state
Constitution.

(2)
((There is hereby created the central Puget Sound public transportation
account within the transportation fund. Moneys deposited into the account
under RCW 82.44.150(2)(b) shall be appropriated to the transportation
improvement board and allocated by the transportation improvement board to
public transportation projects within the region from which the funds are
derived, solely for:

(a)
Planning;

(b)
Development of capital projects;

(c)
Development of high capacity transportation systems as defined in RCW
81.104.015;

(d)
Development of high occupancy vehicle lanes and related facilities as defined
in RCW 81.100.020; and

(e)
Public transportation system contributions required to fund projects under
federal programs and those approved by the transportation improvement board
from other fund sources.

(3)))
There is hereby created the public transportation systems account within the
transportation fund. Moneys deposited into the account under RCW 82.44.150(2) (b)
and (c) shall be appropriated to the transportation improvement board and
allocated by the transportation improvement board to public transportation
projects submitted by the public transportation systems ((from which the
funds are derived)) as defined by chapters 36.56, 36.57, and 36.57A RCW
and RCW 35.84.060 and 81.112.030, and the Washington state ferry system,
solely for:

(a)
Planning;

(b)
Development of capital projects;

(c)
Development of high capacity transportation systems as defined in RCW
81.104.015;

(d)
Development of high occupancy vehicle lanes and related facilities as defined
in RCW 81.100.020;

(e)
Other public transportation system-related roadway projects on state highways,
county roads, or city streets; and

(f)
Public transportation system contributions required to fund projects under
federal programs and those approved by the transportation improvement board
from other fund sources.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 32. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 46.68.180
(Highway construction stabilization account--Established, purpose) and 1985 c
140 s 1;

(2) RCW
46.68.190 (Highway construction stabilization account--Deposits,
transfers) and 1985 c 140 s 2; and

(3) RCW
46.68.200 (Highway construction stabilization account--Uses
limited) and 1985 c 140 s 3.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 33. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
47.02.180 (District 1 headquarters bonds--Reimbursement of motor
vehicle fund) and 1990 c 293 s 7;

(2) RCW
47.13.010 (Account created--Deposits and expenditures) and 1989 c
397 s 1;

(3) RCW
47.13.020 (Federal moneys) and 1995 c 271 s 1 & 1989 c 397 s
2;

(4) RCW
47.13.030 (Exclusion of certain facilities) and 1989 c 397 s 3;

(5) RCW
47.13.040 (Definition) and 1989 c 397 s 4; and

(6) RCW
47.13.900 (Effective date--1989 c 397) and 1989 c 397 s 6.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 34. RCW
47.56.775 (Marine operating fund created) and 1993 c 4 s 7 are
each repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 35. (1)
Sections 1, 2, 5 through 24, 29 through 31, and 33 of this act are necessary
for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or
support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take
effect July 1, 1999.

(2)
Section 4 of this act takes effect September 1, 2000.

(3)
Sections 32 and 37 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of
the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, and take effect June 30, 1999.

(4)
Sections 3, 25 through 28, and 34 of this act take effect July 1, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 36.
Sections 2 and 3 of this act expire September 1, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 37. If
House Bill No. 1053, or similar legislation ending distribution of revenue to
the small city account and the city hardship assistance account, does not
become law by July 1, 1999, this act is null and void.

---
END ---