BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.20.025 and 1993 c 148 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
following persons are exempt from license hereunder:

(1)
Any person in the service of the army, navy, air force, marine corps, or coast
guard of the United States, or in the service of the national guard of this
state or any other state, ((when)) if:

(a)
Furnished with a driver's license by such service when operating an
official motor vehicle in such service; or

(b)
He or she is at least sixteen years old and has in his or her immediate
possession a valid driver's license issued by the jurisdiction designated as
his or her home state. A spouse or dependent of the person who meets the
criteria of this subsection (1)(b) is also exempt from the driver's license
requirement;

(2)
A nonresident who is at least sixteen years of age and who has in his or her
immediate possession a valid driver's license issued to him or her in his or
her home state or is at least fifteen years of age with a valid instruction
permit issued to him or her in his or her home state, and when accompanied by a
licensed driver who has had at least five years of driving experience and is
occupying a seat beside the driver;

(3)
A nonresident who is at least sixteen years of age and who has in his or her
immediate possession a valid driver's license issued to him or her in his or
her home country may operate a motor vehicle in this state for a period not to
exceed one year;

(4)
A student who maintains his or her legal home of record at a location
outside Washington state, or the spouse or dependent of the student, who is at
least sixteen years of age and who has in his or her immediate possession a
valid driver's license issued to him or her in his or her home state. The
student must be enrolled as a full-time nonresident student at an institution
of higher learning in Washington state that is accredited by the Northwest
association of schools and colleges or by an accrediting association recognized
by the higher education coordinating board, or at a private vocational school
as that term is defined by RCW 28C.10.020(7). The student must carry
documentation issued by the institution that readily establishes his or her
status as a nonresident student. A spouse or dependent of a nonresident
student must carry a copy of the documentation issued to the student by the
institution and documentation establishing the relationship with the student;

(5)
Any person operating special highway construction equipment as defined in RCW
46.16.010;

(((5)))
(6) Any person while driving or operating any farm tractor or implement
of husbandry which is only incidentally operated or moved over a highway;

(((6))) (7) Any person while operating a locomotive
upon rails, including operation on a railroad crossing over a public highway;
and such person is not required to display a driver's license to any law
enforcement officer in connection with the operation of a locomotive or train
within this state.

---
END ---