BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
75.25.092 and 1998 c 191 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A personal use shellfish and seaweed license is required for all persons other
than residents or nonresidents under fifteen years of age to fish for, take,
dig for, or possess seaweed or shellfish for personal use from state waters or
offshore waters including national park beaches.

(2)
The minimum fees for annual personal use shellfish and seaweed licenses
are:

(a)
For a resident fifteen years of age or older, seven dollars;

(b)
For a nonresident fifteen years of age or older, twenty dollars; and

(c)
For a senior, five dollars.

Sec.
2. RCW
75.28.046 and 1998 c 267 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

This
section applies to all commercial fishery licenses and delivery licenses,
except for whiting‑-Puget Sound fishery licenses and emergency salmon
delivery licenses.

(1)
The license holder may engage in the activity authorized by a license subject
to this section. With the exception of Dungeness crab‑-coastal fishery
class B licensees licensed under RCW 75.30.350(4), the holder of a license
subject to this section may also designate up to two alternate operators for
the license. Dungeness crab‑-coastal fishery class B licensees may not
designate alternate operators. A person designated as an alternate operator
must possess an alternate operator license issued under RCW 75.28.048.

(2)
The minimum fee to change the alternate operator designation is
twenty-two dollars.

Sec.
3. RCW
75.28.095 and 1998 c 190 s 95 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The director shall issue the charter licenses and angler permits listed in this
section according to the requirements of this title. The licenses and permits
and their minimum annual fees and surcharges are:

License or Permit Annual Fee Governing

(RCW 75.50.100 Surcharge) Section

Resident Nonresident

(a) Nonsalmon charter $225 $375

(b) Salmon charter $380 $685 RCW 75.30.065

(plus $100) (plus $100)

(c) Salmon angler $ 0 $ 0 RCW 75.30.070

(d) Salmon roe $ 95 $ 95 RCW 75.28.690

(2)
A salmon charter license designating a vessel is required to operate a charter
boat to take salmon, other food fish, and shellfish. The director may issue a
salmon charter license only to a person who meets the qualifications of RCW
75.30.065.

(3)
A nonsalmon charter license designating a vessel is required to operate a
charter boat to take food fish other than salmon and shellfish. As used in
this subsection, "food fish" does not include salmon.

(4)
"Charter boat" means a vessel from which persons may, for a fee, fish
for food fish or shellfish for personal use, and that brings food fish or
shellfish into state ports or brings food fish or shellfish taken from state
waters into United States ports. The director may specify by rule when a
vessel is a "charter boat" within this definition. "Charter
boat" does not mean a vessel used by a guide for clients fishing for food
fish for personal use in freshwater rivers, streams, and lakes, other than Lake
Washington or that part of the Columbia River below the bridge at Longview.

(5)
A charter boat licensed in Oregon may fish without a Washington charter license
under the same rules as Washington charter boat operators in ocean waters
within the jurisdiction of Washington state from the southern border of the
state of Washington to Leadbetter Point, as long as the Oregon vessel does not
land at any Washington port with the purpose of taking on or discharging
passengers. The provisions of this subsection shall be in effect as long as
the state of Oregon has reciprocal laws and regulations.

(6)
A salmon charter license under subsection (1)(b) of this section may be renewed
if the license holder notifies the department by May 1st of that year that he
or she will not participate in the fishery during that calendar year. The license
holder must pay the one hundred-dollar enhancement surcharge, plus a
fifteen-dollar handling charge, in order to be considered a valid renewal and
eligible to renew the license the following year.

Sec.
4. RCW
75.28.110 and 1997 c 76 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The following commercial salmon fishery licenses are required for the license
holder to use the specified gear to fish for salmon in state waters. Only a
person who meets the qualifications of RCW 75.30.120 may hold a license listed
in this subsection. The licenses and their minimum annual fees and
surcharges under RCW 75.50.100 are:

Fishery Resident Nonresident Surcharge

License Fee Fee

(a) Salmon Gill Net‑-Grays $380 $685 plus
$100

Harbor-Columbia river

(b) Salmon Gill Net‑-Puget $380 $685 plus $100

Sound

(c) Salmon Gill Net‑-Willapa $380 $685 plus $100

Bay-Columbia river

(d) Salmon purse seine $530 $985 plus $100

(e) Salmon reef net $380 $685 plus $100

(f) Salmon troll $380 $685 plus $100

(2)
A license issued under this section authorizes no taking or delivery of salmon
or other food fish unless a vessel is designated under RCW 75.28.045.

(3)
Holders of commercial salmon fishery licenses may retain incidentally caught
food fish other than salmon, subject to rules of the department.

(4)
A salmon troll license includes a salmon delivery license.

(5)
A salmon gill net license authorizes the taking of salmon only in the
geographical area for which the license is issued. The geographical
designations in subsection (1) of this section have the following meanings:

(a)
"Puget Sound" includes waters of the Strait of Juan de Fuca, Georgia
Strait, Puget Sound and all bays, inlets, canals, coves, sounds, and estuaries
lying easterly and southerly of the international boundary line and a line at
the entrance to the Strait of Juan de Fuca projected northerly from Cape
Flattery to the lighthouse on Tatoosh Island and then to Bonilla Point on
Vancouver Island.

(b)
"Grays Harbor-Columbia river" includes waters of Grays Harbor and
tributary estuaries lying easterly of a line projected northerly from Point
Chehalis Light to Point Brown and those waters of the Columbia river and
tributary sloughs and estuaries easterly of a line at the entrance to the
Columbia river projected southerly from the most westerly point of the North
jetty to the most westerly point of the South jetty.

(c)
"Willapa Bay-Columbia river" includes waters of Willapa Bay and
tributary estuaries and easterly of a line projected northerly from Leadbetter
Point to the Cape Shoalwater tower and those waters of the Columbia river and
tributary sloughs described in (b) of this subsection.

(6)
A commercial salmon troll fishery license may be renewed under this section if
the license holder notifies the department by May 1st of that year that he or
she will not participate in the fishery during that calendar year. A
commercial salmon gill net, reef net, or seine fishery license may be renewed
under this section if the license holder notifies the department by August 1st
of that year that he or she will not participate in the fishery during that
calendar year. The license holder must pay the one hundred-dollar enhancement
surcharge, plus a fifteen-dollar handling charge, in order to be considered a
valid renewal and eligible to renew the license the following year.

Sec.
5. RCW
75.28.113 and 1998 c 190 s 96 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A salmon delivery license is required to deliver salmon taken in offshore
waters to a place or port in the state. The minimum annual fee for a
salmon delivery license is three hundred eighty dollars for residents and six
hundred eighty-five dollars for nonresidents. The minimum annual
surcharge under RCW 75.50.100 is one hundred dollars for each license. Holders
of nonlimited entry delivery licenses issued under RCW 75.28.125 may apply the
nonlimited entry delivery license fee against the salmon delivery license fee.

(2)
Only a person who meets the qualifications established in RCW 75.30.120 may
hold a salmon delivery license issued under this section.

(3)
A salmon delivery license authorizes no taking of salmon or other food fish or
shellfish from the waters of the state.

(4)
If the director determines that the operation of a vessel under a salmon
delivery license results in the depletion or destruction of the state's salmon
resource or the delivery into this state of salmon products prohibited by law,
the director may revoke the license under the procedures of chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec.
6. RCW
75.28.116 and 1993 sp.s. c 17 s 37 are each amended to read as follows:

A
person who does not qualify for a license under RCW 75.30.120 shall obtain a
nontransferable emergency salmon delivery license to make one delivery of
salmon taken in offshore waters. The director shall not issue an emergency
salmon delivery license unless, as determined by the director, a bona fide
emergency exists. The minimum license fee is two hundred twenty-five
dollars for residents and four hundred seventy-five dollars for nonresidents.
An applicant for an emergency salmon delivery license shall designate no more
than one vessel that will be used with the license. Alternate operator
licenses are not required of persons delivering salmon under an emergency
salmon delivery license. Emergency salmon delivery licenses are not renewable.

Sec.
7. RCW
75.28.120 and 1993 sp.s. c 17 s 38 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
This section establishes commercial fishery licenses required for food fish
fisheries and the minimum annual fees for those licenses. As used in
this section, "food fish" does not include salmon. The director may
issue a limited-entry commercial fishery license only to a person who meets the
qualifications established in applicable governing sections of this title.

Fishery Annual Fee Vessel Limited

(Governing section(s)) Resident Nonresident Required? Entry?

(a) Baitfish Lampara $185 $295 Yes No

(b) Baitfish purse seine $530 $985 Yes No

(c) Bottom fish jig $130 $185 Yes No

(d) Bottom fish pot $130 $185 Yes No

(e) Bottom fish troll $130 $185 Yes No

(f) Carp $130 $185 No No

(g) Columbia river smelt $380 $685 No No

(h) Dog fish set net $130 $185 Yes No

(i) Emerging commercial $185 $295 Determined Determined

fishery (RCW 75.30.220 by
rule by rule

and 75.28.740)

(j) Food fish drag seine $130 $185 Yes No

(k) Food fish set line $130 $185 Yes No

(l) Food fish trawl- $240 $405 Yes No

Non-Puget Sound

(m) Food fish trawl- $185 $295 Yes No

Puget Sound

(n) Herring dip bag net $175 $275 Yes Yes

(RCW 75.30.140)

(o) Herring drag seine $175 $275 Yes Yes

(RCW 75.30.140)

(p) Herring gill net $175 $275 Yes Yes

(RCW 75.30.140)

(q) Herring Lampara $175 $275 Yes Yes

(RCW 75.30.140)

(r) Herring purse seine $175 $275 Yes Yes

(RCW 75.30.140)

(s) Herring spawn-on-kelp N/A N/A Yes Yes

(RCW 75.30.270)

(t) Smelt dip bag net $130 $185 No No

(u) Smelt gill net $380 $685 Yes No

(v) Whiting-Puget Sound $295 $520 Yes Yes

(RCW 75.30.170)

(2)
The director may by rule determine the species of food fish that may be taken
with the commercial fishery licenses established in this section, the gear that
may be used with the licenses, and the areas or waters in which the licenses
may be used. Where a fishery license has been established for a particular
species, gear, geographical area, or combination thereof, a more general
fishery license may not be used to take food fish in that fishery.

Sec.
8. RCW
75.28.125 and 1998 c 190 s 97 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person may not use a
commercial fishing vessel to deliver food fish or shellfish taken in offshore
waters to a port in the state without a nonlimited entry delivery license. As
used in this section, "food fish" does not include salmon. As used
in this section, "shellfish" does not include ocean pink shrimp or
coastal crab. The minimum annual license fee for a nonlimited entry
delivery license is one hundred ten dollars for residents and two hundred
dollars for nonresidents.

(2)
Holders of salmon troll fishery licenses issued under RCW 75.28.110, salmon
delivery licenses issued under RCW 75.28.113, crab pot fishery licenses issued
under RCW 75.28.130, food fish trawl‑-Non-Puget Sound fishery licenses
issued under RCW 75.28.120, Dungeness crab‑-coastal fishery licenses,
ocean pink shrimp delivery licenses, and shrimp trawl‑-Non-Puget Sound
fishery licenses issued under RCW 75.28.130 may deliver food fish or shellfish
taken in offshore waters without a nonlimited entry delivery license.

(3)
A nonlimited entry delivery license authorizes no taking of food fish or
shellfish from state waters.

Sec.
9. RCW
75.28.130 and 1994 c 260 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
This section establishes commercial fishery licenses required for shellfish
fisheries and the minimum annual fees for those licenses. The director
may issue a limited-entry commercial fishery license only to a person who meets
the qualifications established in applicable governing sections of this title.

Fishery Annual Fee Vessel Limited

(Governing section(s)) Resident Nonresident Required? Entry?

(a) Burrowing shrimp $185 $295 Yes No

(b) Crab ring net- $130 $185 Yes No

Non-Puget Sound

(c) Crab ring net- $130 $185 Yes No

Puget Sound

(d) Dungeness crab- $295 $520 Yes Yes

coastal (RCW 75.30.350)

(e) Dungeness crab- $295 $520 Yes Yes

coastal, class B

(RCW
75.30.350)

(f) Dungeness crab- $130 $185 Yes Yes

Puget Sound

(RCW 75.30.130)

(g) Emerging commercial $185 $295 Determined Determined

fishery (RCW 75.30.220 by
rule by rule

and 75.28.740)

(h) Geoduck (RCW $ 0 $ 0 Yes Yes

75.30.280)

(i) Hardshell clam $530 $985 Yes No

mechanical harvester

(RCW 75.28.280)

(j) Oyster reserve $130 $185 No No

(RCW 75.28.290)

(k) Razor clam $130 $185 No No

(l) Sea cucumber dive $130 $185 Yes Yes

(RCW 75.30.250)

(m) Sea urchin dive $130 $185 Yes Yes

(RCW 75.30.210)

(n) Shellfish dive $130 $185 Yes No

(o) Shellfish pot $130 $185 Yes No

(p) Shrimp pot- $325 $575 Yes No

Hood Canal

(q) Shrimp trawl- $240 $405 Yes No

Non-Puget Sound

(r) Shrimp trawl- $185 $295 Yes No

Puget Sound

(s) Squid $185 $295 Yes No

(2)
The director may by rule determine the species of shellfish that may be taken
with the commercial fishery licenses established in this section, the gear that
may be used with the licenses, and the areas or waters in which the licenses
may be used. Where a fishery license has been established for a particular
species, gear, geographical area, or combination thereof, a more general
fishery license may not be used to take shellfish in that fishery.

Sec.
10. RCW
75.28.133 and 1997 c 418 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

A minimum
surcharge of one hundred twenty dollars shall be collected with each Dungeness
crab-coastal fishery license and with each Dungeness crab-coastal class B
fishery license issued under RCW 75.28.130. Moneys collected under this
section shall be placed in the coastal crab account created under RCW
75.30.390.

Sec.
11. RCW
75.28.300 and 1993 sp.s. c 17 s 43 are each amended to read as follows:

A
wholesale fish dealer's license is required for:

(1)
A business in the state to engage in the commercial processing of food fish or
shellfish, including custom canning or processing of personal use food fish or
shellfish.

(2)
A business in the state to engage in the wholesale selling, buying, or
brokering of food fish or shellfish. A wholesale fish dealer's license is not
required of those businesses which buy exclusively from Washington licensed
wholesale dealers and sell solely at retail.

(3)
Fishermen who land and sell their catch or harvest in the state to anyone other
than a licensed wholesale dealer within or outside the state.

(4)
A business to engage in the commercial manufacture or preparation of
fertilizer, oil, meal, caviar, fish bait, or other byproducts from food fish or
shellfish.

(5)
A business employing a fish buyer as defined under RCW 75.28.340.

The
minimum annual license fee for a wholesale dealer is two hundred fifty
dollars. A wholesale fish dealer's license is not required for persons engaged
in the processing, wholesale selling, buying, or brokering of private sector
cultured aquatic products as defined in RCW 15.85.020. However, if a means of
identifying such products is required by rules adopted under RCW 15.85.060, the
exemption from licensing requirements established by this subsection applies
only if the aquatic products are identified in conformance with those rules.

Sec.
12. RCW
75.28.780 and 1993 sp.s. c 17 s 42 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director shall issue the personal licenses listed in this section according to
the requirements of this title. The licenses and their minimum annual
fees are:

Personal License Annual Fee Governing

(RCW 75.50.100 Surcharge) Section

Resident Nonresident

(1) Alternate Operator $ 35 $ 35 RCW 75.28.048

(2) Geoduck Diver $185 $295 RCW 75.28.750

(3) Salmon Guide $130 $630 RCW 75.28.710

(plus $20) (plus $100)

Sec.
13. RCW
77.04.055 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In establishing policies to preserve, protect, and perpetuate wildlife, fish,
and wildlife and fish habitat, the commission shall meet annually with the
governor to:

(a)
Review and prescribe basic goals and objectives related to those policies; and

(b)
Review the performance of the department in implementing fish and wildlife
policies.

The
commission shall maximize fishing, hunting, and outdoor recreational
opportunities compatible with healthy and diverse fish and wildlife
populations.

(2)
The commission shall establish hunting, trapping, and fishing seasons and
prescribe the time, place, manner, and methods that may be used to harvest or enjoy
game fish and wildlife.

(3)
The commission shall establish provisions regulating food fish and shellfish as
provided in RCW 75.08.080.

(4)
The commission shall have final approval authority for tribal, interstate,
international, and any other department agreements relating to fish and
wildlife.

(5)
The commission shall adopt rules to implement the state's fish and wildlife
laws.

(6)
The commission shall have final approval authority for the department's budget
proposals.

(7)
The commission shall select its own staff and shall appoint the director of the
department. The director and commission staff shall serve at the pleasure of
the commission.

(8)
The commission shall establish fees for hunting, recreational and commercial
fishing licenses, tags and permits established under chapters 75.25, 75.28, and
77.32 RCW. These fees can be increased but shall not be reduced beyond the
levels in effect on January 1, 1999.

Sec.
14. RCW
77.32.350 and 1998 c 191 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to a small game hunting license, a supplemental permit or stamp is
required to hunt for western Washington pheasant or migratory birds.

(1)
A western Washington pheasant permit is required to hunt for pheasant in western
Washington. Western Washington pheasant permits must contain numbered spaces
for recording the location and date of harvest of each western Washington
pheasant. It is unlawful to harvest a western Washington pheasant without
immediately recording this information on the permit.

(2)
The permit shall be available as a season option, a youth full season option,
or a three-day option. The minimum fee for this permit is:

(a)
For the resident and nonresident full season option, thirty-six dollars;

(b)
For the youth full season option, eighteen dollars;

(c)
For the three-day option, twenty dollars.

(3)
A migratory bird stamp affixed to a hunting license designated by rule of the
commission is required for all persons sixteen years of age or older to hunt
migratory birds. The minimum fee for the stamp for hunters is six
dollars for residents and nonresidents. The minimum fee for the stamp
for collectors is six dollars.

(4)
The migratory bird stamp shall be validated by the signature of the licensee
written across the face of the stamp.

Sec.
15. RCW
77.32.450 and 1998 c 191 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A big game hunting license is required to hunt for big game. A big game
license allows the holder to hunt for forest grouse and the individual species
identified within a specific big game combination license package. Each big
game license includes one transport tag for each species purchased in that
package. A hunter may not purchase more than one license for each big game
species except as authorized by rule of the commission. The minimum
fees for annual big game combination packages are as follows:

(a)
Big game number 1: Deer, elk, bear, and cougar. The fee for this license is
sixty-six dollars for residents, six hundred sixty dollars for nonresidents,
and thirty-three dollars for youth.

(b)
Big game number 2: Deer and elk. The fee for this license is fifty-six
dollars for residents, five hundred sixty dollars for nonresidents, and
twenty-eight dollars for youth.

(c)
Big game number 3: Deer or elk, bear, and cougar. At the time of purchase,
the holder must identify either deer or elk. The fee for this license is
forty-six dollars for residents, four hundred sixty dollars for nonresidents,
and twenty-three dollars for youth.

(d)
Big game number 4: Deer or elk. At the time of purchase, the holder must
identify either deer or elk. The fee for this license is thirty-six dollars
for residents, three hundred sixty dollars for nonresidents, and eighteen
dollars for youth.

(e)
Big game number 5: Bear and cougar. The fee for this license is twenty
dollars for residents, two hundred dollars for nonresidents, and ten dollars
for youth.

(2)
In the event that the commission authorizes a two animal big game limit, the
fees for the second animal are as follows:

(a)
Elk: The fee is twenty dollars for residents, two hundred dollars for
nonresidents, and ten dollars for youth.

(b)
Deer: The fee is twenty dollars for residents, two hundred dollars for
nonresidents, and ten dollars for youth.

(c)
Bear: The fee is ten dollars for residents, one hundred dollars for
nonresidents, and five dollars for youth.

(d)
Cougar: The fee is ten dollars for residents, one hundred dollars for
nonresidents, and five dollars for youth.

(3)
In the event that the commission authorizes a special permit hunt for goat,
sheep, or moose, the permit fees are as follows:

(a)
Mountain goat: The fee is one hundred dollars for residents, one thousand
dollars for nonresidents, and fifty dollars for youth.

(b)
Sheep: The fee is one hundred dollars for residents, one thousand dollars for
nonresidents, and fifty dollars for youth.

(c)
Moose: The fee is one hundred dollars for residents, one thousand dollars for
nonresidents, and fifty dollars for youth.

Authorization
to hunt the species set out under subsection (3)(a) through (c) of this section
is by special permit identified under RCW 77.32.370.

(4) The commission may adopt rules to reduce the price of a license
or eliminate the transportation tag requirements concerning bear or cougar when
necessary to meet harvest objectives.

Sec.
16. RCW
77.32.460 and 1998 c 191 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A small game hunting license is required to hunt for all wild animals and wild
birds, except big game. The small game license includes one transport tag for
turkey.

(a)
The minimum fee for this license is thirty dollars for residents, one
hundred fifty dollars for nonresidents, and fifteen dollars for youth.

(b)
The minimum fee for this license if purchased in conjunction with a big
game combination license package is sixteen dollars for residents, eighty
dollars for nonresidents, and eight dollars for youth.

(c)
The minimum fee for a three-consecutive-day small game license is fifty
dollars for nonresidents.

(2) The minimum fee for each additional turkey tag is
eighteen dollars for residents, sixty dollars for nonresidents, and nine
dollars for youth.

Sec.
17. RCW
77.32.470 and 1998 c 191 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A personal use saltwater, freshwater, combination, temporary, or family fishing
weekend license is required for all persons fifteen years of age or older to
fish for or possess fish taken for personal use from state waters or offshore
waters.

(2)
The minimum fees for annual personal use saltwater, freshwater, or
combination licenses are as follows:

(a)
A combination license allows the holder to fish for or possess fish, shellfish,
and seaweed from state waters or offshore waters. The fee for this license is
thirty-six dollars for residents, seventy-two dollars for nonresidents, and
five dollars for youth.

(b)
A saltwater license allows the holder to fish for or possess fish taken from
saltwater areas. The fee for this license is eighteen dollars for residents,
thirty-six dollars for nonresidents, and five dollars for resident seniors.

(c)
A freshwater license allows the holder to fish for, take, or possess food fish
or game fish species in all freshwater areas. The fee for this license is
twenty dollars for residents, forty dollars for nonresidents, and five dollars
for resident seniors.

(3)
A temporary fishing license is valid for two consecutive days and allows the
holder to fish for or possess fish taken from state waters or offshore waters.
The minimum fee for this temporary fishing license is six dollars for
both residents and nonresidents. This license is not valid on game fish
species for an eight-consecutive-day period beginning on the opening day of the
lowland lake fishing season.

(4)
A family fishing weekend license allows for a maximum of six anglers: One
resident and five youth; two residents and four youth; or one resident, one
nonresident, and four youth. This license allows the holders to fish for or
possess fish taken from state waters or offshore waters. The minimum
fee for this license is twenty dollars. This license is only valid during
periods as specified by rule of the department.

(5) The commission may adopt rules to create and sell combination
licenses for all hunting and fishing activities at or below a fee equal to the
total cost of the individual license contained within any combination.

---
END ---