BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
76.04.610 and 1993 c 36 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If any owner of forest land within a forest protection zone neglects or fails
to provide adequate fire protection as required by RCW 76.04.600, the
department shall provide such protection and shall annually impose the
following assessments on each parcel of such land: (a) A flat fee assessment
of fourteen dollars and fifty cents; and (b) twenty-two cents on each acre
exceeding fifty acres. Assessors may, at their option, collect the assessment
on tax exempt lands. If the assessor elects not to collect the assessment, the
department may bill the landowner directly.

(2)
An owner who has paid assessments on two or more parcels, each containing fewer
than fifty acres and each within the same county, may obtain the following
refund:

(a)
If all the parcels together contain less than fifty acres, then the refund is
equal to the flat fee assessments paid, reduced by the total of (i) fourteen
dollars and (ii) the total of the amounts retained by the county from such
assessments under subsection (5) of this section.

(b)
If all the parcels together contain fifty or more acres, then the refund is
equal to the flat fee assessments paid, reduced by the total of (i) fourteen
dollars, (ii) twenty-two cents for each acre exceeding fifty acres, and (iii)
the total of the amounts retained by the county from such assessments under
subsection (5) of this section.

Applications
for refunds shall be submitted to the department on a form prescribed by the
department and in the same year in which the assessments were paid. The
department may not provide refunds to applicants who do not provide
verification that all assessments and property taxes on the property have been
paid. Applications may be made by mail. Once an owner has received a
refund on the properties, the owner is no longer required to submit an annual
application for a refund. The county assessor shall instead automatically send
the refund to the property owner annually. However, the property owner is
required to notify the county assessor of any changes of ownership of the
parcels.

(3)
Beginning January 1, 1991, under the administration and at the discretion of
the department up to two hundred thousand dollars per year of this assessment
shall be used in support of those rural fire districts assisting the department
in fire protection services on forest lands.

(4)
For the purpose of this chapter, the department may divide the forest lands of
the state, or any part thereof, into districts, for fire protection and
assessment purposes, may classify lands according to the character of timber
prevailing, and the fire hazard existing, and place unprotected lands under the
administration of the proper district. Amounts paid or contracted to be paid
by the department for protection of forest lands from funds at its disposal
shall be a lien upon the property protected, unless reimbursed by the owner
within ten days after October 1st of the year in which they were incurred. The
department shall be prepared to make statement thereof, upon request, to a
forest owner whose own protection has not been previously approved as to its
adequacy, the department shall report the same to the assessor of the county in
which the property is situated. The assessor shall extend the amounts upon the
tax rolls covering the property, and upon authorization from the department
shall levy the forest protection assessment against the amounts of unimproved
land as shown in each ownership on the county assessor's records. The assessor
may then segregate on the records to provide that the improved land and
improvements thereon carry the millage levy designed to support the rural fire
protection districts as provided for in RCW 52.16.170.

(5)
The amounts assessed shall be collected at the time, in the same manner, by the
same procedure, and with the same penalties attached that general state and
county taxes on the same property are collected, except that errors in
assessments may be corrected at any time by the department certifying them to
the treasurer of the county in which the land involved is situated.
Assessments shall be known and designated as assessments of the year in which
the amounts became reimbursable. Upon the collection of assessments the county
treasurer shall place fifty cents of the total assessments paid on a parcel for
fire protection into the county current expense fund to defray the costs of
listing, billing, and collecting these assessments. The treasurer shall then
transmit the balance to the department. Collections shall be applied against
expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this section, including
necessary and reasonable administrative costs incurred by the department in the
enforcement of these provisions. The department may also expend sums collected
from owners of forest lands or received from any other source for necessary
administrative costs in connection with the enforcement of RCW 76.04.660.

(6)
When land against which forest protection assessments are outstanding is acquired
for delinquent taxes and sold at public auction, the state shall have a prior
lien on the proceeds of sale over and above the amount necessary to satisfy the
county's delinquent tax judgment. The county treasurer, in case the proceeds
of sale exceed the amount of the delinquent tax judgment, shall immediately
remit to the department the amount of the outstanding forest protection
assessments.

(7)
All nonfederal public bodies owning or administering forest land included in a
forest protection zone shall pay the forest protection assessments provided in
this section and the special forest fire suppression account assessments under
RCW 76.04.630. The forest protection assessments and special forest fire
suppression account assessments shall be payable by nonfederal public bodies
from available funds within thirty days following receipt of the written notice
from the department which is given after October 1st of the year in which the
protection was provided. Unpaid assessments shall not be a lien against the
nonfederal publicly owned land but shall constitute a debt by the nonfederal
public body to the department and shall be subject to interest charges at the
legal rate.

(8)
A public body, having failed to previously pay the forest protection assessments
required of it by this section, which fails to suppress a fire on or
originating from forest lands owned or administered by it, shall be liable for
the costs of suppression incurred by the department or its agent and shall not
be entitled to reimbursement of costs incurred by the public body in the
suppression activities.

(9) The department may adopt rules to implement this section,
including, but not limited to, rules on levying and collecting forest
protection assessments.

---
END ---