BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
59.18.390 and 1997 c 255 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The sheriff shall, upon receiving the writ of restitution, forthwith serve a
copy thereof upon the defendant, his or her agent, or attorney, or a person in
possession of the premises, and shall not execute the same for three days
thereafter, and the defendant, or person in possession of the premises within
three days after the service of the writ of restitution may execute to the
plaintiff a bond to be filed with and approved by the clerk of the court in
such sum as may be fixed by the judge, with sufficient surety to be approved by
the clerk of the court, conditioned that they will pay to the plaintiff such
sum as the plaintiff may recover for the use and occupation of the premises, or
any rent found due, together with all damages the plaintiff may sustain by
reason of the defendant occupying or keeping possession of the premises,
together with all damages which the court theretofore has awarded to the
plaintiff as provided in this chapter, and also all the costs of the action.
The plaintiff, his or her agent or attorneys, shall have notice of the time and
place where the court or judge thereof shall fix the amount of the defendant's
bond, and shall have notice and a reasonable opportunity to examine into the
qualification and sufficiency of the sureties upon the bond before the bond
shall be approved by the clerk. After the issuance of a writ of restitution,
acceptance of a payment by the landlord or plaintiff that only partially
satisfies the judgment will not invalidate the writ unless pursuant to a written
agreement executed by both parties. The eviction will not be postponed or
stopped unless a copy of that written agreement is provided to the sheriff. It
is the responsibility of the tenant or defendant to ensure a copy of the
agreement is provided to the sheriff. Upon receipt of the agreement the
sheriff will cease action unless ordered to do otherwise by the court. The
writ of restitution and the notice that accompanies the writ of restitution
required under RCW 59.18.312 shall conspicuously state in bold face type, all
capitals, not less than twelve points information about partial payments as set
forth in subsection (2) of this section. If the writ of restitution has been
based upon a finding by the court that the tenant, subtenant, sublessee, or a
person residing at the rental premises has engaged in drug-related activity or
has allowed any other person to engage in drug-related activity at those
premises with his or her knowledge or approval, neither the tenant, the
defendant, nor a person in possession of the premises shall be entitled to post
a bond in order to retain possession of the premises. The writ may be served
by the sheriff, in the event he or she shall be unable to find the defendant,
an agent or attorney, or a person in possession of the premises, by affixing a
copy of the writ in a conspicuous place upon the premises: PROVIDED, That,
notwithstanding any other provision of law, the sheriff shall not require
any bond for the service or execution of the writ under this chapter or under
chapter 59.20 RCW to specifically include not requiring a bond for service and
execution of the writ to remove a mobile home, a mobile home tenant, or any
personal property of the mobile home tenant. The sheriff shall be immune
from all civil liability for serving and enforcing writs of restitution unless
the sheriff is grossly negligent in carrying out his or her duty. The
sheriff shall not require any person to hold harmless or indemnify the sheriff
for any violation by the sheriff of the service and enforcement of a writ of
restitution under this chapter or chapter 59.20 RCW. The sheriff shall execute
the writ of restitution regarding the tenant's mobile home, the tenant, the
tenant's personal property, or any combination of the three categories, as
provided in the writ of restitution.

(2)
The notice accompanying a writ of restitution required under RCW 59.18.312
shall be substantially similar to the following:

IMPORTANT
NOTICE - PARTIAL PAYMENTS

YOUR LANDLORD'S ACCEPTANCE OF A PARTIAL PAYMENT FROM YOU AFTER
SERVICE OF THIS WRIT OF RESTITUTION WILL NOT AUTOMATICALLY POSTPONE OR STOP
YOUR EVICTION. IF YOU HAVE A WRITTEN AGREEMENT WITH YOUR LANDLORD THAT THE
EVICTION WILL BE POSTPONED OR STOPPED, IT IS YOUR RESPONSIBILITY TO PROVIDE A
COPY OF THE AGREEMENT TO THE SHERIFF. THE SHERIFF WILL NOT CEASE ACTION UNLESS
YOU PROVIDE A COPY OF THE AGREEMENT. AT THE DIRECTION OF THE COURT THE SHERIFF
MAY TAKE FURTHER ACTION.

---
END ---