BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
13.32A.198 and 1990 c 276 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Upon making a disposition regarding an adjudicated at-risk youth, the court
shall schedule the matter on the calendar for review within three months,
advise the parties of the date thereof, appoint legal counsel for the child,
advise the parent of the right to be represented by legal counsel at the review
hearing at the parent's own expense, and notify the parties of their rights to
present evidence at the hearing.

(2)
At the review hearing, the court shall approve or disapprove the continuation
of court supervision ((in accordance with the goal of assisting the parent
to maintain the care, custody, and control of the child. The court shall
determine whether the parent and child are complying with the dispositional
plan. If court supervision is continued, the court may modify the
dispositional plan)). The court may continue court supervision up to
two hundred seventy days past the date the review hearing was commenced if the
court finds that continuing court intervention and supervision are necessary to
assist the parent to maintain the care, custody, and control of the child.

(3)
((Court supervision of the child may not be continued past one hundred
eighty days from the day the review hearing commenced unless the court finds,
and the parent agrees, that there are compelling reasons for an extension of
supervision. Any extension granted pursuant to this subsection shall not
exceed ninety days.)) At the end of a period of continued supervision
extended pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, or at the end of any
subsequent period of continued court supervision, the court shall hold a review
hearing. At the review hearing, a parent may move the court to continue court
supervision of the child for up to one year. The court may extend its
supervision of the child if the court finds that continuing court intervention
and supervision are necessary to assist the parent to maintain the care,
custody, and control of the child. In all review hearings held under this
section, the court shall determine whether the parent and child are complying
with the dispositional plan, and the court may modify the dispositional plan.

(4) The court may dismiss an at-risk youth proceeding at any time
if the court finds good cause to believe that continuation of court supervision
would serve no useful purpose or that the parent is not cooperating with the
court-ordered case plan. The court shall dismiss an at-risk youth proceeding
if the child is the subject of a proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW.

---
END ---