BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.68A.105 and 1995 c 353 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
In addition to penalties set forth in RCW 9.68A.100, a person who is either convicted
or given a deferred sentence or a deferred prosecution or who has entered
into a diversion agreement as a result of an arrest for violating RCW
9.68A.100 or a comparable county or municipal ordinance shall be assessed a two
hundred fifty dollar fee.

(b)
The court may not suspend payment of all or part of the fee unless it finds
that the person does not have the ability to pay.

(c)
When a minor has been adjudicated a juvenile offender or has entered into a
diversion agreement for an offense which, if committed by an adult, would
constitute a violation of RCW 9.68A.100 or a comparable county or municipal
ordinance, the court shall assess the fee under (a) of this subsection. The
court may not suspend payment of all or part of the fee unless it finds that
the minor does not have the ability to pay the fee.

(2)
The fee assessed under subsection (1) of this section shall be collected by the
clerk of the court and distributed each month to the state treasurer for
deposit in the prostitution prevention and intervention account under RCW
43.63A.740 for the purpose of funding prostitution prevention and intervention
activities.

(3)
For the purposes of this section, "diversion agreement" means an
agreement under RCW 13.40.080 or any written agreement between a person accused
of an offense listed in subsection (1) of this section and a court or a county
or city prosecutor, or a designee thereof, whereby the person agrees to fulfill
certain conditions in lieu of prosecution.

Sec.
2. RCW
9A.88.120 and 1995 c 353 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
In addition to penalties set forth in RCW 9A.88.010, 9A.88.030, and 9A.88.090,
a person who is either convicted or given a deferred sentence or a deferred
prosecution or who has entered into a diversion agreement as a result of
an arrest for violating RCW 9A.88.010, 9A.88.030, 9A.88.090, or comparable
county or municipal ordinances shall be assessed a fifty dollar fee.

(b)
In addition to penalties set forth in RCW 9A.88.110, a person who is either
convicted or given a deferred sentence or a deferred prosecution or who has
entered into a diversion agreement as a result of an arrest for violating
RCW 9A.88.110 or a comparable county or municipal ordinance shall be assessed a
one hundred fifty dollar fee.

(c)
In addition to penalties set forth in RCW 9A.88.070 and 9A.88.080, a person who
is either convicted or given a deferred sentence or a deferred prosecution or
who has entered into a diversion agreement as a result of an arrest for
violating RCW 9A.88.070, 9A.88.080, or comparable county or municipal
ordinances shall be assessed a three hundred dollar fee.

(2)
The court may not suspend payment of all or part of the fee unless it finds
that the person does not have the ability to pay.

(3)
When a minor has been adjudicated a juvenile offender or has entered into a
diversion agreement for an offense which, if committed by an adult, would
constitute a violation under this chapter or comparable county or municipal
ordinances, the court shall assess the fee as specified under subsection (1) of
this section. The court may not suspend payment of all or part of the fee
unless it finds that the minor does not have the ability to pay the fee.

(4)
Any fee assessed under this section shall be collected by the clerk of the
court and distributed each month to the state treasurer for deposit in the
prostitution prevention and intervention account under RCW 43.63A.740 for the
purpose of funding prostitution prevention and intervention activities.

(5) For the purposes of this section, "diversion
agreement" means an agreement under RCW 13.40.080 or any written agreement
between a person accused of an offense listed in subsection (1) of this section
and a court or a county or city prosecutor, or a designee thereof, whereby the
person agrees to fulfill certain conditions in lieu of prosecution.

---
END ---