BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.08.010 and 1985 c 38 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

For
the purposes of this chapter:

(1)
"Selling price" means the consideration, whether money, credits,
rights, or other property except trade-in property of like kind, expressed in
the terms of money paid or delivered by a buyer to a seller without any
deduction on account of the cost of tangible property sold, the cost of
materials used, labor costs, interest, discount, delivery costs, taxes other
than taxes imposed under this chapter if the seller advertises the price as
including the tax or that the seller is paying the tax, or any other expenses
whatsoever paid or accrued and without any deduction on account of losses; but
shall not include the amount of cash discount actually taken by a buyer; and
shall be subject to modification to the extent modification is provided for in
RCW 82.08.080.

The
term does not include amounts charged the buyer that represent amounts paid by
the seller as impact fees for development activity under RCW 82.02.050 in the
constructing, repairing, or improving of new or existing buildings or other
structures under, upon, or above real property.

When
tangible personal property is rented or leased under circumstances that the
consideration paid does not represent a reasonable rental for the use of the
articles so rented or leased, the "selling price" shall be determined
as nearly as possible according to the value of such use at the places of use
of similar products of like quality and character under such rules as the
department of revenue may prescribe;

(2)
"Seller" means every person, including the state and its departments
and institutions, making sales at retail or retail sales to a buyer or
consumer, whether as agent, broker, or principal, except "seller"
does not mean the state and its departments and institutions when making sales
to the state and its departments and institutions;

(3)
"Buyer" and "consumer" include, without limiting the scope
hereof, every individual, receiver, assignee, trustee in bankruptcy, trust,
estate, firm, copartnership, joint venture, club, company, joint stock company,
business trust, corporation, association, society, or any group of individuals
acting as a unit, whether mutual, cooperative, fraternal, nonprofit, or otherwise,
municipal corporation, quasi municipal corporation, and also the state, its
departments and institutions and all political subdivisions thereof,
irrespective of the nature of the activities engaged in or functions performed,
and also the United States or any instrumentality thereof;

(4)
The meaning attributed in chapter 82.04 RCW to the terms "tax year,"
"taxable year," "person," "company,"
"sale," "sale at retail," "retail sale,"
"sale at wholesale," "wholesale," "business,"
"engaging in business," "cash discount,"
"successor," "consumer," "in this state" and
"within this state" shall apply equally to the provisions of this
chapter.

Sec.
2. RCW
82.12.010 and 1994 c 93 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

For
the purposes of this chapter:

(1)(a)
"Value of the article used" shall mean the consideration, whether
money, credit, rights, or other property except trade-in property of like kind,
expressed in terms of money, paid or given or contracted to be paid or given by
the purchaser to the seller for the article of tangible personal property, the
use of which is taxable under this chapter. The term includes, in addition to
the consideration paid or given or contracted to be paid or given, the amount
of any tariff or duty paid with respect to the importation of the article
used. In case the article used is acquired by lease or by gift or is
extracted, produced, or manufactured by the person using the same or is sold
under conditions wherein the purchase price does not represent the true value
thereof, the value of the article used shall be determined as nearly as
possible according to the retail selling price at place of use of similar
products of like quality and character under such rules as the department of
revenue may prescribe.

The
term does not include amounts charged the buyer that represent amounts paid by
the seller as impact fees for development activity under RCW 82.02.050 in the
constructing, repairing, or improving of new or existing buildings or other
structures under, upon, or above real property.

(b)
In case the articles used are acquired by bailment, the value of the use of the
articles so used shall be in an amount representing a reasonable rental for the
use of the articles so bailed, determined as nearly as possible according to
the value of such use at the places of use of similar products of like quality
and character under such rules as the department of revenue may prescribe. In
case any such articles of tangible personal property are used in respect to the
construction, repairing, decorating, or improving of, and which become or are
to become an ingredient or component of, new or existing buildings or other
structures under, upon, or above real property of or for the United States, any
instrumentality thereof, or a county or city housing authority created pursuant
to chapter 35.82 RCW, including the installing or attaching of any such
articles therein or thereto, whether or not such personal property becomes a
part of the realty by virtue of installation, then the value of the use of such
articles so used shall be determined according to the retail selling price of
such articles, or in the absence of such a selling price, as nearly as possible
according to the retail selling price at place of use of similar products of
like quality and character or, in the absence of either of these selling price
measures, such value may be determined upon a cost basis, in any event under
such rules as the department of revenue may prescribe.

(c)
In the case of articles owned by a user engaged in business outside the state
which are brought into the state for no more than one hundred eighty days in
any period of three hundred sixty-five consecutive days and which are
temporarily used for business purposes by the person in this state, the value
of the article used shall be an amount representing a reasonable rental for the
use of the articles, unless the person has paid tax under this chapter or
chapter 82.08 RCW upon the full value of the article used, as defined in (a) of
this subsection.

(d)
In the case of articles manufactured or produced by the user and used in the
manufacture or production of products sold or to be sold to the department of
defense of the United States, the value of the articles used shall be determined
according to the value of the ingredients of such articles.

(e)
In the case of an article manufactured or produced for purposes of serving as a
prototype for the development of a new or improved product, the value of the
article used shall be determined by: (i) The retail selling price of such new
or improved product when first offered for sale; or (ii) the value of materials
incorporated into the prototype in cases in which the new or improved product
is not offered for sale;

(2)
"Use," "used," "using," or "put to use"
shall have their ordinary meaning, and shall mean the first act within this
state by which the taxpayer takes or assumes dominion or control over the
article of tangible personal property (as a consumer), and include installation,
storage, withdrawal from storage, or any other act preparatory to subsequent
actual use or consumption within this state;

(3)
"Taxpayer" and "purchaser" include all persons included
within the meaning of the word "buyer" and the word
"consumer" as defined in chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW;

(4)
"Retailer" means every seller as defined in RCW 82.08.010 and every
person engaged in the business of selling tangible personal property at retail
and every person required to collect from purchasers the tax imposed under this
chapter;

(5) The meaning ascribed to words and phrases in chapters 82.04 and
82.08 RCW, insofar as applicable, shall have full force and effect with respect
to taxes imposed under the provisions of this chapter. "Consumer,"
in addition to the meaning ascribed to it in chapters 82.04 and 82.08 RCW
insofar as applicable, shall also mean any person who distributes or displays,
or causes to be distributed or displayed, any article of tangible personal
property, except newspapers, the primary purpose of which is to promote the
sale of products or services.

---
END ---