BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. This
chapter may be known and cited as the Washington state civil rights act of
1999.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The legislature recognizes that all political power is inherent in the people,
and governments derive their just powers from the consent of the governed, and
are established to protect and maintain individual rights; and that a frequent
recurrence to fundamental principles is essential to the security of individual
right and the perpetuity of free government.

(2)
The legislature declares that it is a fundamental principle that the state
Constitution embodies public policy of the highest order and priority; that it
is a compelling interest of the state of Washington to ensure that the
provisions of the state Constitution are guaranteed and enforced in order to
protect and maintain the liberties and individual rights of the people of the
state of Washington; that the people of the state of Washington should be able
to rely primarily upon the state Constitution for the protection of their
liberties and individual rights; and that it is a legitimate exercise of the
police power of the state of Washington to preserve the public peace, health,
morals, and safety of the people of the state of Washington by establishing an
enforcement mechanism for redress for violations of the state Constitution.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
Every governmental entity that, under color of a statute, ordinance,
regulation, custom, or usage, subjects or causes to be subjected, a citizen,
inhabitant, or domiciliary of the state of Washington to the deprivation of any
rights, privileges, or immunities secured by the Constitution of the state of
Washington, is liable to the person injured in an action at law, suit in
equity, or other proper proceeding for the redress.

(2)
A person deeming himself or herself injured by any act in violation of this
chapter may recover all damages sustained including, but not limited to,
damages or remedies made available under the Civil Rights Act of 1871 (42
U.S.C. Sec. 1983).

(3)
It is the intent of the legislature that persons who are injured by a violation
of the state Constitution are eligible for redress, that future violations of
the state Constitution be deterred thereby, and that this statute be construed
liberally for the accomplishment of its declared purpose in this chapter.
Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to deny the right of a
person to institute an action or pursue any civil or criminal remedy based upon
an alleged violation of his or her civil rights.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
For purposes of this chapter, "governmental entity" means any
federal, state, or local government.

(2)
For the purposes of this chapter, a governmental entity is liable for the act
of an agency, instrumentality, officer, or employee done under color of a
statute, ordinance, regulation, custom, or usage.

(3)
For the purposes of this chapter, an officer, employee, or agent of a
governmental entity is liable only to the extent that he or she acts under
color of a statute, ordinance, regulation, custom, or usage.

(4)
For the purposes of this chapter, "person" means a natural person,
and does not include a corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership,
association, joint venture, or other legal or commercial entity.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. In an
action or proceeding to enforce a provision of this chapter, a court may not
impose or levy as a remedy or otherwise a general or special tax, assessment,
fee, toll, charge, or other monetary obligation on the citizens of the state of
Washington.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. In an
action or proceeding to enforce a provision of this chapter, the prevailing
party may recover any and all attorneys' fees and costs for any act in
violation of this chapter, including but not limited to expert witness fees, to
the same extent recoverable under RCW 49.60.030(2).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 7 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. This
act applies to causes of action arising after the effective date of this act.

---
END ---