BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the policy of the state to contribute to the state's general welfare by
assisting in making affordable and decent housing available to farm workers.
Providing affordable and decent housing for farm workers helps protect the
health and safety needs of those persons.

It
is the purpose of this act to establish a pool of funds to provide a source of
revenue for farm worker housing through the creation of a tax credit to be used
against the business and occupation or public utility tax.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to the limitations and conditions of this section, a person shall be
allowed a credit against taxes due under this chapter equal to the face value
of credit purchased in an auction under this section.

(2)
The commission is authorized to conduct auctions of tax credits to be used
against the business and occupation or public utility tax. The commission
shall establish the procedures under which the auctions will be conducted. The
commission shall not accept a bid less than seventy-five percent of the value
of the credit. The commission may establish a minimum bid higher than this
seventy-five percent statutory minimum. No more than ten million dollars worth
of credit may be auctioned by the commission each biennium.

(3)
A person purchasing a credit shall complete a registration form at the time of
purchase. The commission shall develop and provide the form. The form shall
include: An identifying number; the time period during which the credit must
be used; in a conspicuous manner, the conditions under which the credit may be
claimed; and the amount of credit purchased by the buyer. The identifying
number on the form will be discrete as to each purchase. The commission shall
maintain a registry of tax credits purchased at auction and shall provide the
department electronic access to the file.

(4)
No application is necessary for the use of the tax credit. The person must
claim the credit on the combined excise tax reporting form. The person claiming
the credit must keep records necessary for the department to verify eligibility
under this section. The person or its successor must keep a copy of the
registration form.

(5)
No applicant is eligible for tax credits under this section in excess of the
amount of tax that would otherwise be due under this chapter. A credit must be
used during the biennium in which it was purchased or it expires. Refunds will
not be given in place of credits.

(6)
If at any time the department finds that a person is not eligible for tax
credit under this section, the amount of taxes for which a credit has been used
shall be immediately due. The department shall assess interest, but not
penalties, on the credited taxes for which the person is not eligible. The
interest shall be assessed at the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes
under chapter 82.32 RCW, be assessed retroactively to the date the tax credit
was taken, and accrue until the taxes for which a credit has been used are
repaid.

(7)
The commission shall deposit all of the proceeds from the auction into a trust
account. The trust account shall be an account with a qualified financial
institution, established by the commission for the deposit of the proceeds of
the auction.

(8)
The proceeds and earnings in the trust account shall be used by the commission
for the benefit of nonprofit organizations that provide housing for farm
workers. Subject to the joint approval of the commission and the director of
the department of community, trade, and economic development, the commission
may allocate funds which include, but are not limited to, the following
purposes:

(a)
Providing funds for new construction;

(b)
Providing funds for rehabilitation and repair;

(c)
Providing funds for operation and maintenance; and

(d)
Providing funds for farm worker housing infrastructure, such as sewer, water,
and electricity.

(9)
Programs established under subsection (8) of this section shall be administered
by the commission or the department of community, trade, and economic development.

(10)
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the following definitions apply
to this section.

(a)
"Commission" means the housing finance commission.

(b)
"Auction" means the sale of a business and occupation or public
utility tax credit through sealed bid, conducted by the commission.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

Purchase
of a tax credit by a financial institution qualifies as an investment in affordable
housing for purposes of the community reinvestment act under Titles 30 and 32
RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW to read as follows:

A
credit purchased at the auction under section 2 of this act may be used against
tax due under this chapter. If a person has used a credit against tax due
under chapter 82.04 RCW, the person may not use the same credit for tax due
under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
department of revenue, the housing finance commission, and the department of
community, trade, and economic development shall evaluate the results of all
programs allocated funds from the trust account and report the findings to the
governor and the legislature by December 1, 2001. The evaluation must consider
the effect of the programs in meeting the purposes of this act, the financing
options available to create or preserve housing for farm workers, and the
impact of the credit on the state economy and revenues.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. If
any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding
does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application
to the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by
the state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---