BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
51.32.095 and 1999 c 110 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
One of the primary purposes of this title is to enable the injured worker to
become employable at gainful employment. To this end, the department or
self-insurers shall utilize the services of individuals and organizations,
public or private, whose experience, training, and interests in vocational
rehabilitation and retraining qualify them to lend expert assistance to the
supervisor of industrial insurance in such programs of vocational
rehabilitation as may be reasonable to make the worker employable consistent
with his or her physical and mental status. Where, after evaluation and
recommendation by such individuals or organizations and prior to final
evaluation of the worker's permanent disability and in the sole opinion of the
supervisor or supervisor's designee, whether or not medical treatment has been
concluded, vocational rehabilitation is both necessary and likely to enable the
injured worker to become employable at gainful employment, the supervisor or
supervisor's designee may, in his or her sole discretion, pay or, if the
employer is a self-insurer, direct the self-insurer to pay the cost as provided
in subsection (3) of this section.

(2)
When in the sole discretion of the supervisor or the supervisor's designee
vocational rehabilitation is both necessary and likely to make the worker
employable at gainful employment, then the following order of priorities shall
be used:

(a)
Return to the previous job with the same employer;

(b)
Modification of the previous job with the same employer including transitional
return to work;

(c)
A new job with the same employer in keeping with any limitations or
restrictions;

(d)
Modification of a new job with the same employer including transitional return
to work;

(e)
Modification of the previous job with a new employer;

(f)
A new job with a new employer or self-employment based upon transferable
skills;

(g)
Modification of a new job with a new employer;

(h)
A new job with a new employer or self-employment involving on-the-job training;

(i)
Short-term retraining and job placement.

(3)(a)
Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, costs for vocational
rehabilitation benefits allowed by the supervisor or supervisor's designee
under subsection (1) of this section may include the cost of books, tuition,
fees, supplies, equipment, transportation, child or dependent care, and other
necessary expenses for any such worker in an amount not to exceed three
thousand dollars in any fifty-two week period ((except as authorized by RCW
51.60.060)), and the cost of continuing the temporary total disability
compensation under RCW 51.32.090 while the worker is actively and successfully
undergoing a formal program of vocational rehabilitation.

(b)
Beginning with vocational rehabilitation plans approved on or after July 1,
1999, costs for vocational rehabilitation benefits allowed by the supervisor or
supervisor's designee under subsection (1) of this section may include the cost
of books, tuition, fees, supplies, equipment, child or dependent care, and
other necessary expenses for any such worker in an amount not to exceed four
thousand dollars in any fifty-two week period ((except as authorized by RCW
51.60.060)), and the cost of transportation and continuing the temporary
total disability compensation under RCW 51.32.090 while the worker is actively
and successfully undergoing a formal program of vocational rehabilitation.

(c)
The expenses allowed under (a) or (b) of this subsection may include training
fees for on-the-job training and the cost of furnishing tools and other
equipment necessary for self-employment or reemployment. However, compensation
or payment of retraining with job placement expenses under (a) or (b) of this
subsection may not be authorized for a period of more than fifty-two weeks,
except that such period may, in the sole discretion of the supervisor after his
or her review, be extended for an additional fifty-two weeks or portion thereof
by written order of the supervisor.

(d)
In cases where the worker is required to reside away from his or her customary
residence, the reasonable cost of board and lodging shall also be paid.

(e)
Costs paid under this subsection shall be chargeable to the employer's cost
experience or shall be paid by the self-insurer as the case may be.

(4)
((In addition to the vocational rehabilitation expenditures provided for
under subsection (3) of this section, an additional five thousand dollars may,
upon authorization of the supervisor or the supervisor's designee, be expended
for: (a) Accommodations for an injured worker that are medically necessary for
the worker to participate in an approved retraining plan; and (b)
accommodations necessary to perform the essential functions of an occupation in
which an injured worker is seeking employment, consistent with the retraining
plan or the recommendations of a vocational evaluation. The injured worker's attending
physician must verify the necessity of the modifications or accommodations.
The total expenditures authorized in this subsection and the expenditures
authorized under RCW 51.32.250 shall not exceed five thousand dollars)) The
following early intervention services are authorized as provided in this
subsection.

(a)
To provide employers and injured workers greater flexibility in returning
injured workers to work at the same job or a new job with the employer of
injury or a new employer, a self-insurer or the supervisor of industrial
insurance, or supervisor's designee, in his or her sole discretion, at an
employer's request and with the employer's approval, may pay the costs of early
intervention services as provided in (b) of this subsection, if:

(i)
The attending doctor has certified that it is more probable than not that the
injured worker's accepted condition will last more than twelve months from the
date of injury, and that the injured worker's accepted condition constitutes a
substantial impairment that prevents the injured worker from performing an
essential function of the job at injury; and

(ii)
The employer has obtained a job analysis of the proposed job completed by a
qualified vocational rehabilitation professional and approved by the attending
doctor. The job analysis must meet standards determined by department rule,
not to exceed the job analysis requirements of the federal Americans with
disabilities act, P.L. 101-336.

(b)
Early intervention services may include:

(i)
The costs of job modification, including workstation improvements and personal
accommodation devices. If expenditures are for a new job with the employer of
injury or a new employer, modification of the worker's job at injury must not
be an option or constitute an undue hardship to the employer, and the worker's
wages must be at least ninety-five percent of the worker's wages at injury;

(ii)
Skill enhancement costs, limited to tuition, books, and fees, to provide the
injured worker with skills to meet the requirements of the new job;

(iii)
Professional services, such as job modification consultation to assist with job
modification and skill enhancement; and

(iv)
A wage subsidy of up to thirty percent of the injured worker's wages for a
modified job at injury or a new job. If the payment of a wage subsidy pursuant
to a schedule authorized under this subsection is not completed before claim
closure, the subsidy may continue to be paid after the claim is closed,
consistent with the authorized schedule. An injured worker is not eligible for
a wage subsidy and benefits under RCW 51.32.090(3) for the same period.

(c)
Early intervention services, except for services under (b)(i) of this
subsection, must terminate if the injured worker has refused a bona fide offer
of employment or if the injured worker is referred for vocational assessment.

(d)
Total costs for early intervention services may not exceed five thousand dollars,
and expenditures for services under (b)(ii) through (iv) of this subsection may
not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars of the five thousand dollar total.

(e)
For state fund employers, the costs under (b)(i) of this subsection shall be
charged to the employer's medical aid fund cost experience, and the costs under
(b)(ii) through (iv) of this subsection shall be charged to the state fund
employer's accident fund cost experience. Self-insured employers shall pay all
costs of early intervention services directly, except for costs under (b)(i) of
this subsection, which shall be charged to the second injury fund.

(f)(i)
If an employer fails to retain an injured worker who received early
intervention services under this section in the new or modified job for at
least fifty-two weeks, the employer must repay the benefits paid under this
section, unless the failure to retain the worker was for reasons not
attributable to the employer. The employer may contest a department order
assessing the repayment in the same manner and to the same extent as provided
in RCW 51.52.050 and 51.52.060.

(ii)(A)
If a department's order of repayment under this subsection becomes final under
chapter 51.52 RCW, the director or director's designee may file with the clerk in
any county within the state a warrant in the amount representing the sum to be
repaid plus interest accruing from the date the order became final. The clerk
of the court shall be entitled to a filing fee of five dollars, which shall be
added to the amount of the warrant. A copy of the warrant shall be mailed to
the employer within three days of filing with the clerk.

(B)
The clerk of the county in which the warrant is filed shall immediately
designate a superior court cause number for the warrant and the clerk shall
cause to be entered in the judgment docket under the superior court cause
number assigned to the warrant the name of the employer named in the warrant,
the amount of the repayment plus interest accrued, and the date the warrant was
filed. The amount of the warrant as docketed shall become a lien upon the
title to and interest in all real and personal property of the employer against
whom the warrant is issued, the same as a judgment in a civil case docketed in
the office of such clerk. The sheriff shall then proceed in the same manner
and with like effect as prescribed by law with respect to execution or other
process issued against rights or property upon judgment in the superior court.

(C)
A warrant docketed under this subsection shall be sufficient to support:

(I)
The issuance of writs of garnishment in favor of the department in the manner
provided by law in the case of judgment, wholly or partially unsatisfied; and

(II)
Any action by the department authorized under this title for the collection of
payments due to the state fund.

(5)
The department shall establish criteria to monitor the quality and
effectiveness of rehabilitation services provided by the individuals and
organizations used under subsection (1) of this section. The state fund shall
make referrals for vocational rehabilitation services based on these
performance criteria.

(6)
The department shall engage in, where feasible and cost-effective, a
cooperative program with the state employment security department to provide
job placement services under this section.

(7)
The benefits in this section shall be provided for the injured workers of
self-insured employers. Self-insurers shall report both benefits provided and
benefits denied under this section in the manner prescribed by the department
by rule adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW. The director may, in his or her sole
discretion and upon his or her own initiative or at any time that a dispute
arises under this section, promptly make such inquiries as circumstances require
and take such other action as he or she considers will properly determine the
matter and protect the rights of the parties.

(8)
Except as otherwise provided in this section, the benefits provided for in this
section are available to any otherwise eligible worker regardless of the date
of industrial injury. However, claims shall not be reopened solely for
vocational rehabilitation purposes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2.
Section 1 of this act takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---