BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-BASIC EDUCATION CERTIFICATED
INSTRUCTIONAL STAFF COMPENSATION. (1) Salary allocations for
certificated instructional staff units shall be determined for each district by
multiplying the district's certificated instructional derived base salary shown
on LEAP Document 12E, by the district's average staff mix factor for basic
education and special education certificated instructional staff in that school
year, computed using LEAP Document 1B.

(2)
For the purposes of this section:

(a)
"Basic education certificated instructional staff" is defined as
provided in RCW 28A.150.100 and "special education certificated
staff" means staff assigned to the state-supported special education
program pursuant to chapter 28A.155 RCW in positions requiring a certificate;

(b)
"LEAP Document 1B" means the computerized tabulation establishing
staff mix factors for certificated instructional staff according to education
and years of experience, as developed by the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee on January 25, 1999, at 15:45 hours; and

(c)
"LEAP Document 12E" means the computerized tabulation of 1999-00 and
2000-01 school year salary allocations for derived base salaries for
certificated instructional staff as developed by the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee on January 25, 1999, at 16:25 hours.

(3)
Incremental fringe benefit factors shall be applied to salary adjustments at a
rate of 16.22 percent for certificated staff and 12.20 percent for classified
staff for both years of the biennium.

(4)(a)
Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.410, the following state‑wide salary allocation
schedules for certificated instructional staff are established for basic
education salary allocations:

STATE-WIDE
SALARY ALLOCATION SCHEDULE

FOR
THE 1999-00 SCHOOL YEAR

Years
of

Service BA BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90

0 26,002 26,704 27,432 28,161 30,501

1 26,610 27,329 28,073 28,842 31,229

2 27,220 27,954 28,713 29,549 31,954

3 27,855 28,605 29,379 30,253 32,677

4 28,222 29,004 29,784 30,688 33,129

5 28,595 29,381 30,169 31,122 33,556

6 28,969 29,738 30,554 31,555 33,977

7 29,915 30,703 31,538 32,604 35,086

8 30,568 31,391 32,238 33,381 35,872

9 32,420 33,307 34,492 37,041

10 34,390 35,659 38,243

11 36,861 39,502

12 38,025 40,793

13 42,117

14 43,448

15 44,578

Years
of MA+90

Service BA+135 MA MA+45 or
PHD

0 32,009 31,175 33,515 35,023

1 32,743 31,830 34,217 35,731

2 33,499 32,509 34,914 36,458

3 34,276 33,185 35,610 37,208

4 34,741 33,565 36,006 37,618

5 35,200 33,945 36,378 38,023

6 35,630 34,323 36,745 38,398

7 36,802 35,373 37,854 39,571

8 37,633 36,121 38,613 40,374

9 38,862 37,231 39,782 41,603

10 40,124 38,400 40,983 42,865

11 41,421 39,602 42,242 44,162

12 42,771 40,852 43,534 45,511

13 44,153 42,144 44,858 46,894

14 45,588 43,476 46,275 48,329

15 46,773 44,606 47,478 49,585

STATE-WIDE
SALARY ALLOCATION SCHEDULE

FOR
THE 2000-01 SCHOOL YEAR

Years
of

Service BA BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90

0 26,782 27,506 28,255 29,005 31,416

1 27,408 28,149 28,916 29,708 32,166

2 28,036 28,792 29,574 30,436 32,912

3 28,691 29,463 30,260 31,161 33,658

4 29,068 29,874 30,678 31,608 34,123

5 29,453 30,263 31,074 32,056 34,562

6 29,839 30,631 31,470 32,502 34,996

7 30,812 31,624 32,484 33,582 36,139

8 31,485 32,333 33,205 34,382 36,948

9 33,392 34,307 35,526 38,152

10 35,422 36,729 39,390

11 37,967 40,687

12 39,166 42,017

13 43,380

14 44,751

15 45,915

Years
of MA+90

Service BA+135 MA MA+45 or
PHD

0 32,969 32,110 34,521 36,074

1 33,725 32,785 35,243 36,802

2 34,504 33,484 35,961 37,552

3 35,304 34,181 36,678 38,325

4 35,783 34,572 37,087 38,747

5 36,256 34,963 37,470 39,164

6 36,699 35,353 37,847 39,550

7 37,906 36,434 38,990 40,758

8 38,762 37,205 39,771 41,585

9 40,028 38,348 40,975 42,851

10 41,328 39,552 42,213 44,151

11 42,663 40,790 43,510 45,487

12 44,054 42,078 44,840 46,877

13 45,478 43,408 46,204 48,301

14 46,956 44,780 47,663 49,779

15 48,177 45,944 48,902 51,073

(b)
As used in this subsection, the column headings "BA+(N)" refer to the
number of credits earned since receiving the baccalaureate degree.

(c)
For credits earned after the baccalaureate degree but before the masters
degree, any credits in excess of forty‑five credits may be counted after
the masters degree. Thus, as used in this subsection, the column headings
"MA+(N)" refer to the total of:

(i)
Credits earned since receiving the masters degree; and

(ii)
Any credits in excess of forty‑five credits that were earned after the
baccalaureate degree but before the masters degree.

(5)
For the purposes of this section:

(a)
"BA" means a baccalaureate degree;

(b)
"MA" means a masters degree;

(c)
"PHD" means a doctorate degree;

(d)
"Years of service" shall be calculated under the same rules adopted
by the superintendent of public instruction;

(e)
"Credits" means college quarter-hour credits and equivalent
in-service credits computed in accordance with RCW 28A.415.020 and chapter 90,
Laws of 1997.

(6)
No more than ninety college quarter-hour credits received by any employee after
the baccalaureate degree may be used to determine compensation allocations
under the state salary allocation schedule and LEAP documents referenced in
this act, or any replacement schedules and documents, unless:

(a)
The employee has a masters degree; or

(b)
The credits were used in generating state salary allocations before January 1,
1992.

(7)
The salary allocation schedules established in this section are for allocation
purposes only except as provided in RCW 28A.400.200(2).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR CERTIFICATED
INSTRUCTIONAL STAFF COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)........ $ 82,999,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)........ $ 165,599,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 248,598,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$193,193,000 is provided for a cost-of-living adjustment of 3.0 percent
effective September 1, 1999, and another 3.0 percent effective September 1,
2000, for state formula certificated instructional staff units. The
appropriations include associated incremental fringe benefit allocations at
rates of 16.22 percent. The appropriations in this section include the
increased portion of salaries and incremental fringe benefits for all relevant
state-funded school programs.

(2)
$55,405,000 is provided to adjust the salary allocation schedule to provide for
salary increases for staff in the first eight rows of the salary schedule as
reflected in the salary schedules contained in section 1 of this act. The
appropriations in this section include the increased portion of salaries and
incremental fringe benefits for all relevant state-funded school programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---