BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that: (1) Protecting the well-being, tranquility, and
privacy of the home is of significant concern to many citizens; and (2) for
many people, unwanted commercial telephone solicitations constitute an invasion
of the well-being, tranquility, and privacy of the home. The legislature
intends, therefore, to assist citizens in protecting the well-being,
tranquility, and privacy of their homes by creating a process through which
residential telephone subscribers can choose to be free from unwanted
commercial telephone solicitations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 19.158 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The attorney general shall maintain a public listing of residential telephone
numbers whose subscribers have affirmatively requested not to receive
commercial telephone solicitations. The attorney general and the utilities and
transportation commission shall make reasonable efforts, within existing
resources, to publicize the availability of the public listing and the method
or methods by which residential telephone subscribers may have their telephone
numbers placed on the list. The listing shall be available for inspection by
the public in written and electronic form. The attorney general shall
periodically transmit the list to a national telephone preference service for
the purpose of removing individuals from national telemarketing lists.

(2)
No fee may be charged to residential telephone subscribers for placing their
numbers on the list. A reasonable fee, as determined by the attorney general,
may be charged to inspect the list in written or electronic form.

(3)
It is unlawful and a violation of this section for any person to make a
commercial telephone solicitation call to any residential telephone number
that: (a) Is contained on the public listing under subsection (1) of this
section; and (b) has been on the list for at least ten business days prior to
the making of the commercial telephone solicitation.

(4) In addition to any other penalties or remedies available under
this chapter or chapter 19.86 RCW, a person injured by a violation of
subsection (3) of this section may bring an action for recovery of liquidated
damages in the amount of one hundred dollars per violation, plus court costs
and attorneys' fees.

---
END ---