BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
76.12.072 and 1983 c 3 s 195 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever the board of county commissioners of any county shall determine that
forest lands, that were acquired from such county by the state pursuant to RCW
76.12.030 and that are under the administration of the department of natural
resources, are needed by the county for public park use in accordance with the
county and the state outdoor recreation plans, or for the protection of
municipal water supply sources in accordance with applicable water system plans
or regional water supply plans, the board of county commissioners, with
the concurrence of all municipalities whose water supply is intended to be
protected may file an application with the board of natural resources for
the transfer of such forest lands.

(2)
Upon the filing of an application by the board of county commissioners, the
department of natural resources shall cause notice of the impending transfer to
be given in the manner provided by RCW 42.30.060.

(3)
For applications requesting reconveyance for public park uses, if the
department of natural resources determines that the proposed use is in
accordance with the state outdoor recreation plan, it shall reconvey said
forest lands to the requesting county to have and to hold for so long as the
forest lands are developed, maintained, and used for the proposed public park
purpose. This reconveyance may contain conditions to allow the department of
natural resources to coordinate the management of any adjacent state owned
lands with the proposed park activity to encourage maximum multiple use
management and may reserve rights of way needed to manage other state owned
lands in the area. The application shall be denied if the department of natural
resources finds that the proposed use is not in accord with the state outdoor
recreation plan. If the land is not, or ceases to be, used for public park
purposes the land shall be conveyed back to the department of natural resources
upon request of the department.

(4)
For applications requesting reconveyance for municipal water supply purposes,
if the department of natural resources determines that the proposed use is in
accordance with the applicable individual water system plans and regional water
supply plans, it shall reconvey the forest lands to the requesting county to
have and to hold for so long as the forest lands are developed, maintained, and
used for the proposed municipal water supply protection purpose. The
application shall be denied if the department of natural resources finds that
the proposed use is not in accordance with applicable individual water system
plans and regional water supply plans. If the land is not, or ceases to be,
used for municipal water supply protection purposes, the land shall be conveyed
back to the department of natural resources upon request of the department.

(5) In any event, any use of such forest lands for purposes of
logging, whether reconveyed or not, shall be consistent with best watershed
protection practices, including but not limited to selective logging rather
than clear cutting and minimal and ecologically sound road cuts.

---
END ---