BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
75.08.011 and 1998 c 190 s 70 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this title or Title 77 RCW or rules adopted under those titles, unless
the context clearly requires otherwise:

(1)
"Commission" means the fish and wildlife commission.

(2)
"Director" means the director of fish and wildlife.

(3)
"Department" means the department of fish and wildlife.

(4)
"Person" means an individual or a public or private entity or
organization. The term "person" includes local, state, and federal
government agencies, and all business organizations, including corporations and
partnerships.

(5)
"Fish and wildlife officer" means a person appointed and commissioned
by the commission, with authority to enforce this title, rules of the
department, and other statutes as prescribed by the legislature. Fish and
wildlife officers are peace officers. Fish and wildlife officer includes a
person commissioned before June 11, 1998, as a fisheries patrol officer.

(6)
"Ex officio fish and wildlife officer" means a commissioned officer
of a municipal, county, state, or federal agency having as its primary function
the enforcement of criminal laws in general, while the officer is in the
appropriate jurisdiction. The term "ex officio fish and wildlife
officer" also includes special agents of the national marine fisheries
service, United States fish and wildlife special agents, state parks commissioned
officers, department of natural resources enforcement officers, and United
States forest service officers, while the agents and officers are within their
respective jurisdictions.

(7)
"To fish," "to harvest," and "to take" and their
derivatives mean an effort to kill, injure, harass, or catch fish or shellfish.

(8)
"State waters" means all marine waters and fresh waters within
ordinary high water lines and within the territorial boundaries of the state.

(9)
"Offshore waters" means marine waters of the Pacific Ocean outside
the territorial boundaries of the state, including the marine waters of other
states and countries.

(10)
"Concurrent waters of the Columbia river" means those waters of the
Columbia river that coincide with the Washington-Oregon state boundary.

(11)
"Resident" means a person who has maintained a permanent place of
abode within the state for at least ninety days immediately preceding an
application for a license, has established by formal evidence an intent to
continue residing within the state, and who is not licensed to hunt or fish as
a resident in another state.

(12)
"Nonresident" means a person who has not fulfilled the qualifications
of a resident.

(13)
"Food fish" means those species of the classes Osteichthyes, Agnatha,
and Chondrichthyes that have been classified and that shall not be fished for
except as authorized by rule of the commission. The term "food fish"
includes all stages of development and the bodily parts of food fish species.

(14)
"Shellfish" means those species of marine and freshwater
invertebrates that have been classified and that shall not be taken except as
authorized by rule of the commission. The term "shellfish" includes
all stages of development and the bodily parts of shellfish species.

(15)
"Salmon" means all species of the genus Oncorhynchus, except those
classified as game fish in Title 77 RCW, and includes:

Scientific
Name Common Name

Oncorhynchus tshawytscha Chinook salmon

Oncorhynchus kisutch Coho salmon

Oncorhynchus keta Chum salmon

Oncorhynchus gorbuscha Pink salmon

Oncorhynchus nerka Sockeye salmon

(16)
"Commercial" means related to or connected with buying, selling, or
bartering. Fishing for food fish or shellfish with gear unlawful for fishing
for personal use, or possessing food fish or shellfish in excess of the limits
permitted for personal use are commercial activities.

(17)
"To process" and its derivatives mean preparing or preserving food
fish or shellfish.

(18)
"Personal use" means for the private use of the individual taking the
food fish or shellfish and not for sale or barter.

(19)
"Angling gear" means a line attached to a rod and reel capable of
being held in hand while landing the fish or a hand-held line operated without
rod or reel.

(20)
"Open season" means those times, manners of taking, and places or
waters established by rule of the commission for the lawful fishing, taking, or
possession of food fish or shellfish. "Open season" includes the
first and last days of the established time.

(21)
"Fishery" means the taking of one or more particular species of food
fish or shellfish with particular gear in a particular geographical area.

(22)
"Limited-entry license" means a license subject to a license
limitation program established in chapter 75.30 RCW.

(23)
"Seaweed" means marine aquatic plant species that are dependent upon
the marine aquatic or tidal environment, and exist in either an attached or
free floating form, and includes but is not limited to marine aquatic plants in
the classes Chlorophyta, Phaeophyta, and Rhodophyta.

(24)
"Fish" includes all species classified as game fish or food fish by
statute or rule, as well as all fin fish not currently classified as food fish
or game fish if such species exist in state waters. The term "fish"
includes all stages of development and the bodily parts of fish species.

(25)
"Trafficking" means offering, attempting to engage, or engaging in
sale, barter, or purchase of fish, shellfish, wildlife, or deleterious exotic
wildlife.

Sec.
2. RCW
77.08.010 and 1998 c 190 s 111 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this title or Title 75 RCW or rules adopted pursuant to those titles,
unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(1)
"Director" means the director of fish and wildlife.

(2)
"Department" means the department of fish and wildlife.

(3)
"Commission" means the state fish and wildlife commission.

(4)
"Person" means and includes an individual, a corporation, or a group
of two or more individuals acting with a common purpose whether acting in an
individual, representative, or official capacity.

(5)
"Fish and wildlife officer" means a person appointed and commissioned
by the director, with authority to enforce laws and rules adopted pursuant to
this title, and other statutes as prescribed by the legislature. Fish and
wildlife officer includes a person commissioned before June 11, 1998, as a
wildlife agent.

(6)
"Ex officio fish and wildlife officer" means a commissioned officer
of a municipal, county, state, or federal agency having as its primary function
the enforcement of criminal laws in general, while the officer is in the
appropriate jurisdiction. The term "ex officio fish and wildlife
officer" includes special agents of the national marine fisheries service,
state parks commissioned officers, United States fish and wildlife special
agents, department of natural resources enforcement officers, and United States
forest service officers, while the agents and officers are within their
respective jurisdictions.

(7)
"To hunt" and its derivatives means an effort to kill, injure,
capture, or harass a wild animal or wild bird.

(8)
"To trap" and its derivatives means a method of hunting using devices
to capture wild animals or wild birds.

(9)
"To fish" and its derivatives means an effort to kill, injure,
harass, or catch a fish.

(10)
"Open season" means those times, manners of taking, and places or waters
established by rule of the commission for the lawful hunting, fishing, or
possession of game animals, game birds, or game fish that conform to the
special restrictions or physical descriptions established by rule of the
commission or that have otherwise been deemed legal to hunt, fish, or possess
by rule of the commission. "Open season" includes the first and last
days of the established time.

(11)
"Closed season" means all times, manners of taking, and places or
waters other than those established by rule of the commission as an open
season. "Closed season" also means all hunting, fishing, or
possession of game animals, game birds, or game fish that do not conform to the
special restrictions or physical descriptions established by rule of the
commission as an open season or that have not otherwise been deemed legal to
hunt, fish, or possess by rule of the commission as an open season.

(12)
"Closed area" means a place where the hunting of some species of wild
animals or wild birds is prohibited.

(13)
"Closed waters" means all or part of a lake, river, stream, or other
body of water, where fishing for game fish is prohibited.

(14)
"Game reserve" means a closed area where hunting for all wild animals
and wild birds is prohibited.

(15)
"Bag limit" means the maximum number of game animals, game birds, or
game fish which may be taken, caught, killed, or possessed by a person, as
specified by rule of the commission for a particular period of time, or as to
size, sex, or species.

(16)
"Wildlife" means all species of the animal kingdom whose members
exist in Washington in a wild state. This includes but is not limited to
mammals, birds, reptiles, amphibians, fish, and invertebrates. The term
"wildlife" does not include feral domestic mammals, the family Muridae
of the order Rodentia (old world rats and mice), or those fish, shellfish, and
marine invertebrates classified as food fish or shellfish by the director. The
term "wildlife" includes all stages of development and the bodily
parts of wildlife members.

(17)
"Wild animals" means those species of the class Mammalia whose
members exist in Washington in a wild state and the species Rana catesbeiana
(bullfrog). The term "wild animal" does not include feral domestic
mammals or the family Muridae of the order Rodentia (old world rats and mice).

(18)
"Wild birds" means those species of the class Aves whose members
exist in Washington in a wild state.

(19)
"Protected wildlife" means wildlife designated by the commission that
shall not be hunted or fished.

(20)
"Endangered species" means wildlife designated by the commission as
seriously threatened with extinction.

(21)
"Game animals" means wild animals that shall not be hunted except as
authorized by the commission.

(22)
"Fur-bearing animals" means game animals that shall not be trapped
except as authorized by the commission.

(23)
"Game birds" means wild birds that shall not be hunted except as
authorized by the commission.

(24)
"Predatory birds" means wild birds that may be hunted throughout the
year as authorized by the commission.

(25)
"Deleterious exotic wildlife" means species of the animal kingdom not
native to Washington and designated as dangerous to the environment or wildlife
of the state.

(26)
"Game farm" means property on which wildlife is held or raised for
commercial purposes, trade, or gift. The term "game farm" does not
include publicly owned facilities.

(27)
"Person of disability" means a permanently disabled person who is not
ambulatory without the assistance of a wheelchair, crutches, or similar
devices.

(28)
"Fish" includes all species classified as game fish or food fish by
statute or rule, as well as all fin fish not currently classified as food fish
or game fish if such species exist in state waters. The term "fish"
includes all stages of development and the bodily parts of fish species.

(29)
"Trafficking" means offering, attempting to engage, or engaging in
sale, barter, or purchase of fish, shellfish, wildlife, or deleterious exotic
wildlife.

Sec.
3. RCW
77.15.030 and 1998 c 190 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Where
it is unlawful to hunt, take, fish, ((or)) possess, or traffic in
big game or protected or endangered fish or wildlife, then each individual
animal unlawfully taken or possessed is a separate offense.

Sec.
4. RCW
77.15.400 and 1998 c 190 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of unlawful hunting of ((game)) wild birds in
the second degree if the person:

(a)
Hunts for, takes, or possesses a ((game)) wild bird and
the person does not have and possess all licenses, tags, stamps, and permits
required under this title;

(b)
Maliciously destroys, takes, or harms the eggs or nests of a game bird except
when authorized by permit; ((or))

(c)
Violates any rule of the commission or director regarding seasons, bag or
possession limits but less than two times the bag or possession limit, closed
areas ((including game reserves)), closed times, or other rule
addressing the manner or method of hunting or possession of ((game)) wild
birds; or

(d)
Possesses a wild bird taken during a closed season for that wild bird or taken
from a closed area for that wild bird.

(2)
A person is guilty of unlawful hunting of ((game)) wild birds in
the first degree if the person ((hunts game birds and the person)) takes
or possesses two times or more than the possession or bag limit for ((such))
game birds allowed by rule of the commission or director.

(3)(a)
Unlawful hunting of ((game)) wild birds in the second degree is a
misdemeanor.

(b)
Unlawful hunting of ((game)) wild birds in the first degree is a
gross misdemeanor.

Sec.
5. RCW
77.15.410 and 1998 c 190 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of unlawful hunting of big game in the second degree if the
person:

(a)
Hunts for, takes, or possesses big game and the person does not have and
possess all licenses, tags, or permits required under this title; ((or))

(b)
Violates any rule of the commission or director regarding seasons, bag or
possession limits, closed areas including game reserves, closed times, or any
other rule governing the hunting, taking, or possession of big game; or

(c)
Possesses big game taken during a closed season for that big game or taken from
a closed area for that big game.

(2)
A person is guilty of unlawful hunting of big game in the first degree if the
person was previously convicted of any crime under this title involving
unlawful hunting, killing, possessing, or taking big game, and within five
years of the date that the prior conviction was entered the person:

(a)
Hunts for big game and((:

(a)
The person)) does not have and possess all licenses, tags,
or permits required under this title; ((or))

(b)
((The act was)) Acts in violation of any rule of the commission
or director regarding seasons, bag or possession limits, closed areas including
game reserves, or closed times; or

(c)
Possesses big game taken during a closed season for that big game or taken from
a closed area for that big game.

(3)(a)
Unlawful hunting of big game in the second degree is a gross misdemeanor.

(b)
Unlawful hunting of big game in the first degree is a class C felony. Upon
conviction, the department shall revoke all licenses or tags involved in the
crime and the department shall order the person's hunting privileges suspended
for two years.

Sec.
6. RCW
77.15.430 and 1998 c 190 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of unlawful hunting of ((game)) wild animals
in the second degree if the person:

(a)
Hunts for, takes, or possesses a ((game)) wild animal that
is not classified as big game, and does not have and possess all licenses,
tags, or permits required by this title; ((or))

(b)
Violates any rule of the commission or director regarding seasons, bag or
possession limits but less than two times the bag or possession limit, closed
areas including game reserves, closed times, or other rule addressing the
manner or method of hunting or possession of ((game)) wild
animals not classified as big game; or

(c)
Possesses a wild animal that is not classified as big game taken during a
closed season for that wild animal or from a closed area for that wild animal.

(2)(((a)))
A person is guilty of unlawful hunting of ((game)) wild animals
in the first degree if the person ((hunts a game animal that is not
classified as big game; and

(b)
The person)) takes or possesses two times or more than the
possession or bag limit for ((such game)) wild animals that
are not classified as big game animals as allowed by rule of the commission
or director.

(3)(a)
Unlawful hunting of ((game)) wild animals in the second degree is
a misdemeanor.

(b)
Unlawful hunting of ((game)) wild animals in the first degree is
a gross misdemeanor.

Sec.
7. RCW
77.15.170 and 1998 c 190 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of waste of fish and wildlife in the second degree if:

(a)
The person kills, takes, or possesses fish, shellfish, or wildlife and
the value of the fish, shellfish, or wildlife is greater than twenty
dollars but less than two hundred fifty dollars; and

(b)
The person recklessly allows such fish, shellfish, or wildlife to be
wasted.

(2)
A person is guilty of waste of fish and wildlife in the first degree if:

(a)
The person kills, takes, or possesses ((food)) fish, shellfish, ((game
fish, game birds,)) or ((game animals)) wildlife having a
value of two hundred fifty dollars or more or wildlife classified as big
game; and

(b)
The person recklessly allows such fish, shellfish, or wildlife to be
wasted.

(3)(a)
Waste of fish and wildlife in the second degree is a misdemeanor.

(b)
Waste of fish and wildlife in the first degree is a gross misdemeanor. Upon
conviction, the department shall revoke any license or tag used in the crime
and shall order suspension of the person's privileges to engage in the activity
in which the person committed waste of fish and wildlife in the first degree
for a period of one year.

(4)
It is prima facie evidence of waste if a processor purchases or engages a
quantity of food fish, shellfish, or game fish that cannot be processed within
sixty hours after the food fish or shellfish are taken from the water, unless
the food fish or shellfish are preserved in good marketable condition.

Sec.
8. RCW
77.15.230 and 1998 c 190 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of unlawful use of department lands or facilities if the
person enters upon, uses, or remains upon department-owned or
department-controlled lands or facilities in violation of any rule of the
department.

(2)
Unlawful use of department lands or facilities is a misdemeanor.

Sec.
9. RCW
77.15.460 and 1998 c 190 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of unlawful possession of a loaded firearm in a motor
vehicle if:

(a)
The person carries, transports, conveys, possesses, or controls a rifle or
shotgun in or on a motor vehicle; and

(b)
The rifle or shotgun contains shells or cartridges in the magazine or chamber,
or is a muzzle-loading firearm that is loaded and capped or primed.

(2)
A person is guilty of unlawful use of a loaded firearm if the person negligently
shoots a firearm from, across, or along the maintained portion of a public
highway.

(3)
Unlawful possession of a loaded firearm in a motor vehicle or unlawful use
of a loaded firearm is a misdemeanor.

(4)
This section does not apply if the person:

(a)
Is a law enforcement officer who is authorized to carry a firearm and is on
duty within the officer's respective jurisdiction;

(b)
Possesses a disabled hunter's permit as provided by RCW 77.32.237 and complies
with all rules of the department concerning hunting by persons with
disabilities.

(5)
For purposes of this section, a firearm shall not be considered loaded if the
detachable clip or magazine is not inserted in or attached to the firearm.

Sec.
10. RCW
77.15.480 and 1980 c 78 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

Articles
or devices unlawfully used, possessed, or maintained for catching, taking,
killing, attracting, or decoying wildlife are public nuisances. If necessary,
((wildlife agents and ex officio wildlife agents)) fish and wildlife
officers and ex officio fish and wildlife officers may seize, abate, or
destroy these public nuisances without warrant or process.

Sec.
11. RCW
77.15.600 and 1998 c 190 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of engaging in commercial wildlife activity without a
license if the person:

(a)
Deals in raw furs for commercial purposes and does not hold a fur dealer
license required by chapter 77.32 RCW; or

(b)
Practices taxidermy for ((profit)) commercial purposes and does
not hold a taxidermy license required by chapter 77.32 RCW((; or

(c)
Operates a game farm without a license required by chapter 77.32 RCW)).

(2)
Engaging in commercial wildlife activities without a license is a gross
misdemeanor.

Sec.
12. RCW
77.15.190 and 1998 c 190 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of unlawful trapping if the person:

(a)
Sets out traps that are capable of taking wild animals, game animals, or
furbearing mammals and does not possess all licenses, tags, or permits required
under this title; ((or))

(b)
Violates any rule of the commission or director regarding seasons, bag or
possession limits, closed areas including game reserves, closed times, or any
other rule governing the trapping of wild animals; or

(c)
Fails to identify the owner of the traps or devices by neither (i) attaching a
metal tag with the owner's department-assigned identification number or the
name and address of the trapper legibly written in numbers or letters not less
than one-eighth inch in height nor (ii) inscribing into the metal of the trap
such number or name and address.

(2)
Unlawful trapping is a misdemeanor.

Sec.
13. RCW
77.15.550 and 1998 c 190 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of violating commercial fishing area or time in the second
degree if the person acts for commercial purposes and takes, fishes for, possesses,
delivers, or receives food fish or shellfish:

(a)
At a time not authorized by statute or rule; ((or))

(b)
From an area that was closed to the taking of such food fish or shellfish for
commercial purposes by statute or rule; or

(c)
If such fish or shellfish do not conform to the special restrictions or
physical descriptions established by rule of the department.

(2)
A person is guilty of violating commercial fishing area or time in the first
degree if the person commits the act described by subsection (1) of this
section and:

(a)
The person acted with knowledge that the area or time was not open to the
taking or fishing of food fish or shellfish for commercial purposes; and

(b)
The violation involved two hundred fifty dollars or more worth of food fish or
shellfish.

(3)(a)
Violating commercial fishing area or time in the second degree is a gross
misdemeanor.

(b)
Violating commercial fishing area or time in the first degree is a class C
felony.

Sec.
14. RCW
77.15.570 and 1998 c 190 s 49 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, it is unlawful for a
person who is not a treaty Indian fisherman to participate in the taking of
fish or shellfish in a treaty Indian fishery, or to be on board a vessel, or
associated equipment, operating in a treaty Indian fishery. A violation of
this subsection is a gross misdemeanor.

(2)
A person who violates subsection (1) of this section with the intent of acting
for commercial purposes, including any sale of catch, control of catch, profit
from catch, or payment for fishing assistance, is guilty of a class C felony.
Upon conviction, the department shall order revocation of any license and a
one-year suspension of all commercial fishing privileges requiring a license
under chapter 75.28 or 75.30 RCW.

(3)(a)
The spouse, forebears, siblings, children, and grandchildren of a treaty Indian
fisherman may assist the fisherman in exercising treaty Indian fishing rights
when the treaty Indian fisherman is present at the fishing site and the
assistance is authorized in writing by the treaty fisherman's tribe.

(b)
Other treaty Indian fishermen with off-reservation treaty fishing rights in the
same usual and accustomed places, whether or not the fishermen are members of
the same tribe or another treaty tribe, may assist a treaty Indian fisherman in
exercising treaty Indian fishing rights when the treaty Indian fisherman is
present at the fishing site.

(c)
Biologists approved by the department may be on board a vessel operating in a
treaty Indian fishery.

(4)
For the purposes of this section:

(a)
"Treaty Indian fisherman" means a person who may exercise treaty
Indian fishing rights as determined under United States v. Washington,
384 F. Supp. 312 (W.D. Wash. 1974), or Sohappy v. Smith, 302 F. Supp.
899 (D. Oregon 1969), and post-trial orders of those courts;

(b)
"Treaty Indian fishery" means a fishery open to only treaty Indian
fishermen by tribal or federal regulation;

(c)
"To participate" and its derivatives mean an effort to operate a
vessel or fishing equipment, provide immediate supervision in the operation of
a vessel or fishing equipment, or otherwise assist in the fishing operation, to
claim possession of a share of the catch, or to represent that the catch was
lawfully taken in an Indian fishery.

(5)
A violation of this section constitutes illegal fishing and is subject to the
suspensions provided for commercial fishing violations.

Sec.
15. RCW
77.15.670 and 1998 c 190 s 60 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of ((unlawful hunting or fishing when)) violating
a suspension of department privileges ((are revoked or suspended))
in the second degree if the person ((hunts or fishes and the person's
privilege to engage in such hunting or fishing)) engages in any activity
that is licensed by the department and the person's privileges to engage in
that activity were revoked or suspended by any court or the department.

(2)
A person is guilty of ((unlawful hunting or fishing when)) violating
a suspension of department privileges ((are revoked or suspended))
in the first degree if the person commits the act described by subsection (1)
of this section and:

(a)
The suspension of privileges that was violated was a permanent suspension;

(b)
The person takes or possesses more than two hundred fifty dollars' worth of
unlawfully taken food fish, wildlife, game fish, seaweed, or shellfish; or

(c)
The violation involves the hunting, taking, or possession of fish or wildlife
classified as endangered or threatened or big game.

(3)(a)
((Unlawful hunting or fishing when)) Violating a suspension of
department privileges ((are revoked or suspended)) in the second
degree is a gross misdemeanor. Upon conviction, the department shall order
permanent suspension of the person's privileges to engage in such hunting or
fishing activities.

(b)
((Unlawful hunting or fishing when)) Violating a suspension of
department privileges ((are revoked or suspended)) in the first
degree is a class C felony. Upon conviction, the department shall order
permanent suspension of all privileges to hunt, fish, trap, or take wildlife,
food fish, or shellfish.

(4)
As used in this section, hunting includes trapping with a trapping license.

Sec.
16. RCW
77.16.070 and 1980 c 78 s 75 are each amended to read as follows:

((It
is unlawful to hunt)) (1) A person is guilty of hunting while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs if the person hunts wild
animals or wild birds while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs.

(2)
Hunting while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs is a gross
misdemeanor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17. RCW
77.16.070 is recodified as a new section in chapter 77.15 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW 75.25.160
(Recreational licenses--Penalties) and 1989 c 305 s 15, 1987 c 87 s 8, 1984 c
80 s 10, 1983 1st ex.s. c 46 s 100, & 1977 ex.s. c 327 s 16;

(2) RCW
77.12.101 (Seizure of contraband wildlife and
devices--Forfeiture) and 1989 c 314 s 2;

(3) RCW
77.15.200 (Furbearing animal traps--Failure to identify--Penalty)
and 1998 c 190 s 23;

(4) RCW
77.16.290 (Law enforcement officers, exemption) and 1994 sp.s. c
7 s 444, 1980 c 78 s 95, & 1955 c 36 s 77.16.290;

(5) RCW
77.21.020 (Revocation of hunting license for big game
violation--Subsequent issuance--Appeal) and 1998 c 191 s 35, 1987 c 506 s 70,
1980 c 78 s 124, & 1975 1st ex.s. c 6 s 1;

(6) RCW
77.21.030 (Revocation for shooting person or
livestock--Subsequent issuance) and 1998 c 191 s 36, 1987 c 506 s 71, 1980 c 78
s 123, & 1955 c 36 s 77.32.280; and

(7) RCW
77.32.094 (Validity of licenses issued by department of fisheries
and department of wildlife) and 1994 c 255 s 14.

---
END ---