BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
26.44.030 and 1998 c 328 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
When any practitioner, county coroner or medical examiner, law enforcement
officer, professional school personnel, registered or licensed nurse, social
service counselor, psychologist, pharmacist, licensed or certified child care
providers or their employees, employee of the department, juvenile probation
officer, or state family and children's ombudsman or any volunteer in the
ombudsman's office has reasonable cause to believe that a child or adult
dependent or developmentally disabled person, has suffered abuse or neglect, he
or she shall report such incident, or cause a report to be made, to the proper
law enforcement agency or to the department as provided in RCW 26.44.040.

(b)
The reporting requirement shall also apply to department of corrections
personnel who, in the course of their employment, observe offenders or the
children with whom the offenders are in contact. If, as a result of
observations or information received in the course of his or her employment,
any department of corrections personnel has reasonable cause to believe that a
child or adult dependent or developmentally disabled person has suffered abuse
or neglect, he or she shall report the incident, or cause a report to be made,
to the proper law enforcement agency or to the department as provided in RCW
26.44.040.

(c)
The reporting requirement shall also apply to any adult who has reasonable
cause to believe that a child or adult dependent or developmentally disabled
person, who resides with them, has suffered severe abuse, and is able or capable
of making a report. For the purposes of this subsection, "severe
abuse" means any of the following: Any single act of abuse that causes
physical trauma of sufficient severity that, if left untreated, could cause
death; any single act of sexual abuse that causes significant bleeding, deep
bruising, or significant external or internal swelling; or more than one act of
physical abuse, each of which causes bleeding, deep bruising, significant
external or internal swelling, bone fracture, or unconsciousness.

(d)
The report shall be made at the first opportunity, but in no case longer than
forty-eight hours after there is reasonable cause to believe that the child or
adult has suffered abuse or neglect. The report shall include the identity of
the accused if known.

(2)
The reporting requirement of subsection (1) of this section does not apply to
the discovery of abuse or neglect that occurred during childhood if it is
discovered after the child has become an adult. However, if there is
reasonable cause to believe other children, dependent adults, or
developmentally disabled persons are or may be at risk of abuse or neglect by
the accused, the reporting requirement of subsection (1) of this section shall
apply.

(3)
Any other person who has reasonable cause to believe that a child or adult
dependent or developmentally disabled person has suffered abuse or neglect may
report such incident to the proper law enforcement agency or to the department
of social and health services as provided in RCW 26.44.040.

(4)
The department, upon receiving a report of an incident of alleged abuse or
neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child or adult dependent or
developmentally disabled person who has died or has had physical injury or
injuries inflicted upon him or her other than by accidental means or who has
been subjected to alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident to the
proper law enforcement agency. In emergency cases, where the child, adult
dependent, or developmentally disabled person's welfare is endangered, the
department shall notify the proper law enforcement agency within twenty-four
hours after a report is received by the department. In all other cases, the
department shall notify the law enforcement agency within seventy-two hours
after a report is received by the department. If the department makes an oral
report, a written report shall also be made to the proper law enforcement
agency within five days thereafter.

(5)
Any law enforcement agency receiving a report of an incident of alleged abuse
or neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child or adult dependent or
developmentally disabled person who has died or has had physical injury or
injuries inflicted upon him or her other than by accidental means, or who has
been subjected to alleged sexual abuse, shall report such incident in writing
as provided in RCW 26.44.040 to the proper county prosecutor or city attorney
for appropriate action whenever the law enforcement agency's investigation
reveals that a crime may have been committed. The law enforcement agency shall
also notify the department of all reports received and the law enforcement
agency's disposition of them. In emergency cases, where the child, adult
dependent, or developmentally disabled person's welfare is endangered, the law
enforcement agency shall notify the department within twenty-four hours. In
all other cases, the law enforcement agency shall notify the department within
seventy-two hours after a report is received by the law enforcement agency.

(6)
Any county prosecutor or city attorney receiving a report under subsection (5)
of this section shall notify the victim, any persons the victim requests, and
the local office of the department, of the decision to charge or decline to
charge a crime, within five days of making the decision.

(7)
The department may conduct ongoing case planning and consultation with those
persons or agencies required to report under this section, with consultants
designated by the department, and with designated representatives of Washington
Indian tribes if the client information exchanged is pertinent to cases
currently receiving child protective services or department case services for
the developmentally disabled. Upon request, the department shall conduct such
planning and consultation with those persons required to report under this
section if the department determines it is in the best interests of the child
or developmentally disabled person. Information considered privileged by
statute and not directly related to reports required by this section shall not
be divulged without a valid written waiver of the privilege.

(8)
Any case referred to the department by a physician licensed under chapter 18.57
or 18.71 RCW on the basis of an expert medical opinion that child abuse,
neglect, or sexual assault has occurred and that the child's safety will be
seriously endangered if returned home, the department shall file a dependency
petition unless a second licensed physician of the parents' choice believes
that such expert medical opinion is incorrect. If the parents fail to
designate a second physician, the department may make the selection. If a
physician finds that a child has suffered abuse or neglect but that such abuse
or neglect does not constitute imminent danger to the child's health or safety,
and the department agrees with the physician's assessment, the child may be
left in the parents' home while the department proceeds with reasonable efforts
to remedy parenting deficiencies.

(9)
Persons or agencies exchanging information under subsection (7) of this section
shall not further disseminate or release the information except as authorized
by state or federal statute. Violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor.

(10)(a)
Upon receiving reports of alleged abuse or neglect, the department or law
enforcement agency may interview children. The interviews may be conducted on
school premises, at day-care facilities, at the child's home, or at other
suitable locations outside of the presence of parents. Parental notification
of the interview shall occur at the earliest possible point in the
investigation that will not jeopardize the safety or protection of the child or
the course of the investigation. Prior to commencing the interview the
department or law enforcement agency shall determine whether the child wishes a
third party to be present for the interview and, if so, shall make reasonable
efforts to accommodate the child's wishes. Unless the child objects, the
department or law enforcement agency shall make reasonable efforts to include a
third party in any interview so long as the presence of the third party will
not jeopardize the course of the investigation.

(b)
The interviewer shall use a question and answer interviewing format, with
questioning as nondirective as possible, to elicit spontaneous responses. When
interviewing the alleged child victim and child witnesses, the interviewer
must, whenever possible, record the interview by either the use of videotape or
audiotape or certified court stenographer.

(11)
Upon receiving a report of alleged child abuse and neglect, the department or
investigating law enforcement agency shall have access to all relevant records
of the child in the possession of mandated reporters and their employees.

(12)
The department or law enforcement agency shall maintain investigation
records ((and)), including verbatim or near verbatim records of child
interviews. The department shall conduct timely and periodic reviews of
all cases constituting abuse and neglect. The department shall maintain a log
of screened-out nonabusive cases.

(13)
The department shall use a risk assessment process when investigating alleged
child abuse and neglect referrals. The department shall present the risk
factors at all hearings in which the placement of a dependent child is an
issue. Substance abuse must be a risk factor. The department shall, within
funds appropriated for this purpose, offer enhanced community-based services to
persons who are determined not to require further state intervention.

The
department shall provide annual reports to the legislature on the effectiveness
of the risk assessment process.

(14)
Upon receipt of a report of alleged abuse or neglect the law enforcement agency
may arrange to interview the person making the report and any collateral
sources to determine if any malice is involved in the reporting.

(15)
The department shall make reasonable efforts to learn the name, address, and
telephone number of each person making a report of abuse or neglect under this
section. The department shall provide assurances of appropriate
confidentiality of the identification of persons reporting under this section.
If the department is unable to learn the information required under this
subsection, the department shall only investigate cases in which: (a) The
department believes there is a serious threat of substantial harm to the child;
(b) the report indicates conduct involving a criminal offense that has, or is
about to occur, in which the child is the victim; or (c) the department has,
after investigation, a report of abuse or neglect that has been founded with
regard to a member of the household within three years of receipt of the
referral.

Sec.
2. RCW
26.44.035 and 1997 c 386 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

If
the department or a law enforcement agency responds to a complaint of alleged
child abuse or neglect and discovers that another agency has also responded to
the complaint, the agency shall notify the other agency of their presence, and
the agencies shall coordinate the investigation and keep each other apprised of
progress.

The
department, each law enforcement agency, each county prosecuting attorney, each
city attorney, and each court shall make as soon as practicable a written
record and shall maintain records of all incidents of suspected child abuse
reported to that person or agency. Records kept under this section shall be
identifiable by means of an agency code for child abuse. Any agency which
conducts a child witness interview, including the department, a law enforcement
agency, the county prosecutor's office, or the city attorney's office, shall
make and maintain a verbatim record or near verbatim record of the interview as
required by RCW 26.44.030(10).

Sec.
3. RCW
26.44.050 and 1987 c 450 s 7 and 1987 c 206 s 5 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

Upon
the receipt of a report concerning the possible occurrence of abuse or neglect,
it shall be the duty of the law enforcement agency or the department of social
and health services to investigate and provide the protective services section
with a report in accordance with the provision of chapter 74.13 RCW, and where
necessary to refer such report to the court.

A
law enforcement officer may take, or cause to be taken, a child into custody
without a court order if there is probable cause to believe that the child is
abused or neglected and that the child would be injured or could not be taken
into custody if it were necessary to first obtain a court order pursuant to RCW
13.34.050. The law enforcement agency or the department of social and health
services investigating such a report is hereby authorized to photograph,
audiotape, or videotape such a child or adult dependent or developmentally
disabled person for the purpose of providing documentary evidence of the
physical condition of the child, adult dependent or developmentally disabled
person.

Sec.
4. RCW
26.44.080 and 1982 c 129 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Every person who is required to make, or to cause to be made, a report pursuant
to RCW 26.44.030 and 26.44.040, and who knowingly fails to make, or fails to
cause to be made, such report, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(2)
Every person who is required to maintain investigation records including
verbatim or near verbatim records of child interviews under RCW 26.44.030 and
26.44.035, and who knowingly fails to maintain or destroys those records, shall
be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 26.44 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A custodian of a videotape of a child victim or alleged victim alleging,
explaining, denying, or describing an act of physical or sexual abuse as part
of an investigation or evaluation of the abuse may not release a copy of the
videotape without a court order, notwithstanding that the subject has consented
to the release of the videotape or that the release is authorized under law.

(2)
The court order may govern the purposes for which the videotape may be used,
including reproduction, release to other persons, retention and return of
copies, and other requirements reasonably necessary for the protection of the
privacy and best interests of the child.

(3)
An individual being investigated or charged with the allegation of child abuse
or child sexual abuse or the child victim or alleged child victim who is
seeking a copy of the videotape under this section may petition the superior
court in the county where the alleged abuse took place or where the custodian
of the videotape resides for an order releasing a copy of the videotape under
subsection (2) of this section. Nothing in this section establishes a right to
obtain access to a videotape by any other person or limits the right of a
person to obtain access if access is otherwise authorized by law or pursuant to
discovery in a court proceeding.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW to read as follows:

The
commission shall provide training for law enforcement officers, prosecutors,
and employees of child protective services concerning investigations of child
sexual abuse allegations. The course of study shall include, but is not
limited to, research about children's memory and suggestibility, patterns of
disclosure and reporting, recommended interview techniques with a specified
minimum number of clinical training hours, interviews with suspects, interviews
with collateral witnesses, and reviews of forensic medical evidence.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 43.101 RCW to read as follows:

Any public employee or volunteer of any city, county, state, or
combination thereof, who conducts any investigation and/or interview for the
purpose of investigating allegations of child sexual abuse shall be certified,
prior to conducting that investigation or interview, by the commission as
having completed a course of study concerning investigation of child sexual abuse
allegations.

---
END ---