BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
task force to study and make recommendations regarding the date for primary
elections as provided in this act is established.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
legislature finds that:

(1)
The current statute relating to the timing of the primary election may not
allow adequate time for absentee voters, especially military personnel living
overseas, to review the candidates and issues appearing on the general election
ballot before casting their votes;

(2)
The proliferation of permanent absentee voters presents increasing difficulties
for county auditors to canvass ballots in a timely way, which in turn may
adversely affect the general election campaign of a candidate involved in a
close primary race; and

(3)
A delay in counting votes and processing ballots negatively impacts the
public's right to timely election results and thus harms our electoral process.

Therefore,
the mission of the task force includes, but is not limited to, a review of
issues relating to the timing of the primary election, the canvassing of
ballots, and the certification of election results. The task force shall
consider alternates to the current statutes that relate to these issues, and
shall provide recommendations accordingly.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
task force membership consists of the following thirteen members:

(1)
Five citizen members from across the state, appointed jointly by the secretary
of state, the president of the senate, and the co-speakers of the house of
representatives;

(2)
Two members of the senate, one from each of the largest two caucuses, appointed
by the president of the senate, and two members of the house of
representatives, one from each of the largest two caucuses, appointed by the
co-speakers of the house of representatives;

(3)
The secretary of state or the secretary's designee;

(4)
A county elections official designated by the Association of County Officials;
and

(5)
A representative of each major political party in the state, appointed by the
chair of the state central committee for the party.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
task force shall report its recommendations to the governor, the secretary of
state, and the appropriate standing committees of the senate and house of
representatives no later than December 1, 1999. The task force terminates on
December 31, 1999.

Sec.
5. RCW
29.62.020 and 1995 c 139 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
((No later than the tenth day after a special election or primary and no
later than the fifteenth day after a general election, the county auditor shall
convene the county canvassing board to process the absentee ballots and canvass
the votes cast at that primary or election.)) At least every third day
after a special election, primary, or general election and before certification
of the election results, excepting Sundays and legal holidays, the county
auditor shall convene the county canvassing board to process absentee ballots
and canvass the votes cast at that special election, primary, or general
election. Each absentee ballot previously not canvassed that was received by
the county auditor on or before the day before the convening of the canvass board
and that either was returned before the closing of the polls on the date of the
special election, primary, or general election for which it was issued, or
bears a date of mailing on or before the date of the special election, primary,
or general election for which it was issued, must be processed at that time.
The tabulation of votes that results from that day's canvass must be made
available to the general public immediately upon completion of the canvass.

(2)
On the tenth day after a special election or a primary and on the fifteenth day
after a general election, the canvassing board shall complete the canvass and
certify the results. Each absentee ballot that was returned before the closing
of the polls on the date of the primary or election for which it was issued,
and each absentee ballot with a date of mailing on or before the date of the
primary or election for which it was issued and received on or before the date
on which the primary or election is certified, shall be included in the canvass
report.

(((2))) (3) At the request of any caucus of the state
legislature, the county auditor shall transmit copies of all unofficial returns
of state and legislative primaries or elections prepared by or for the county
canvassing board to either the secretary of the senate or the chief clerk of
the house.

---
END ---