BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes that good language skills are essential for productive
adults and that public schools in the state of Washington provide trained
speech pathologists to assist children who lack adequate verbal communication
skills to compete successfully in the challenges of securing an education. It
recognizes that the task of teaching students to speak well is a formidable one
and sees shrinking public funding as an obstacle in providing sufficient
professional staff to realize that goal. It further recognizes that
professionally trained and nationally certified speech pathologists are
provided at no cost by nonprofit charitable organizations to preschool and school-age
children. To aid the public schools in teaching essential speech skills, a
"Help Kids Speak" license plate is established.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 46.04 RCW to read as follows:

"Help
Kids Speak license plates" means license plates that display a symbol of a
nonprofit, charitable organization that provides no-fee nationally certified
speech pathologists to teach youngsters to speak.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW to read as follows:

In
cooperation with the Washington state patrol and the department of licensing,
the sponsors of the "Help Kids Speak" program shall create and
design, and the department shall issue, a special license plate displaying a
symbol of a nonprofit charitable organization and the words "Help Kids
Speak" that may be used in lieu of regular or personalized license plates
for motor vehicles required to display two motor vehicle license plates, excluding
vehicles registered under chapter 46.87 RCW, upon terms and conditions
established by the department. The special plates will commemorate the
"Help Kids Speak" organization.

Sec.
4. RCW
46.16.313 and 1997 c 291 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department may establish a fee for each type of special license plates
issued under RCW 46.16.301(1) (a), (b), or (c), as existing before amendment by
section 5, chapter 291, Laws of 1997, in an amount calculated to offset the
cost of production of the special license plates and the administration of this
program. ((Until December 31, 1997,)) The fee shall not exceed
((thirty-five dollars, but effective with vehicle registrations due or to
become due on January 1, 1998, the department may adjust the fee to no more
than)) forty dollars. This fee is in addition to all other fees required
to register and license the vehicle for which the plates have been requested.
All such additional special license plate fees collected by the department
shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the motor vehicle
fund.

(2)
((Until December 31, 1997, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be
paid upon application, registration, and renewal registration of a motor
vehicle, the holder of a collegiate license plate shall pay a fee of thirty
dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed two dollars of
each fee collected under this subsection for administration and collection
expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds, minus the cost of plate
production, shall be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a
proper identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds
to the appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.

(3)
Effective with vehicle registrations due or to become due on January 1, 1998,)) In
addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon application and
registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a collegiate license plate shall
pay an initial fee of forty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not
to exceed twelve dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds
shall be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the
appropriate collegiate license plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.

(((4)))
(3) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January 1,
1999, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon renewal of a
motor vehicle registration, the holder of a collegiate license plate shall pay
a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not to exceed
two dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for administration and
collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds shall be remitted
to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed
report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the appropriate
collegiate license plate fund as provided in RCW 28B.10.890.

(((5)))
(4) In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon
application and registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a special
baseball stadium license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty dollars. The
department shall deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars of each fee
collected under this subsection for administration and collection expenses
incurred by it. The remaining proceeds, minus the cost of plate production,
shall be distributed to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and
interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball
stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds to the
state general fund.

(((6)))
(5) Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January 1,
1999, in addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon renewal of a
motor vehicle registration, the holder of a special baseball stadium license
plate shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount
not to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds
shall be distributed to a county for the purpose of paying the principal and
interest payments on bonds issued by the county to construct a baseball
stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485, including reasonably necessary
preconstruction costs, while the taxes are being collected under RCW
82.14.360. After this date, the state treasurer shall credit the funds to the
state general fund.

(6)
In addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon application and
registration of a motor vehicle, the holder of a "Help Kids Speak"
license plate shall pay an initial fee of forty dollars. The department shall
deduct an amount not to exceed twelve dollars of each fee collected under this
subsection for administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The
remaining proceeds, minus the cost of plate production, shall be remitted to
the custody of the state treasurer with a proper identifying detailed report.
The state treasurer shall credit the proceeds to the "Help Kids
Speak" license plate account established under section 5 of this act.

(7)
Effective with annual renewals due or to become due on January 1, 2001, in
addition to all fees and taxes required to be paid upon renewal of a motor
vehicle registration, the holder of a "Help Kids Speak" license plate
shall pay a fee of thirty dollars. The department shall deduct an amount not
to exceed two dollars of each fee collected under this subsection for
administration and collection expenses incurred by it. The remaining proceeds
shall be remitted to the custody of the state treasurer with a proper
identifying detailed report. The state treasurer shall credit the funds to the
"Help Kids Speak" license plate account established under section 5
of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The "Help Kids Speak" program is created. The purpose of the program
is to provide grants to nonprofit, charitable organizations, incorporated under
the laws of the state of Washington that do not discriminate in any way, and
that provide nationally certified speech pathologists on a no-fee basis to
youngsters, regardless of their economic status, whether enrolled in a public,
private, or home school, of preschool or school age, and who have displayed a
lack of verbal communication skills; including in the grant application a
finding that there is, on staff of the nonprofit, charitable organization,
nationally certified speech pathologists trained in the techniques of teaching
youngsters essential communication skills. The superintendent of public
instruction shall administer the grant program.

(2) The "Help Kids Speak" license plate account is
established in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts, except as
provided in RCW 46.16.313 (6) and (7), from "Help Kids Speak" license
plates must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may
be used only to fund the grant program under subsection (1) of this section.
Only the superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee
may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is not subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, and no appropriation is required
for expenditures.

---
END ---