BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that it is a matter of public necessity that forest resources
in Washington be managed properly. It is the intent of the legislature to
provide for the protection and benefit of the public by ensuring application of
the highest standards relative to the practice of consulting forestry and to
provide protection of the public from unqualified consulting forestry
practitioners.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Board" means the state board of consulting foresters.

(2)
"Department" means the department of licensing.

(3)
"Consulting forester" means a person who, by reason of his or her
knowledge of the natural sciences, mathematics, and the principles of forestry
acquired by forestry education or experience, performs forestry services for
the public on a fee basis, including but not limited to, consultation,
investigation, evaluation, planning, or responsible supervision of forestry
activities when the services require the application of forestry principles and
techniques.

(4)
"Consulting forestry" means all professional services relating to the
forest resources of the state that require the application of forestry
principles, data, and techniques as acquired by experience, training, and
education. Such services include, but are not limited to, consultation,
investigations, evaluations, planning, and the formation and implementation of
forestry policies when such activities require the application of forestry
practices, data, and techniques.

(5)
"Forestry" means the science and practice of managing forested
landscapes and the treatment of the forest cover in general, and includes,
among other things, the application of scientific knowledge and forestry
principles in the fields of fuel management and forest protection, timber
growing and utilization, forest inventories, forest economics, forest valuation
and finance, and the evaluation and mitigation of impacts from forestry
activities on watershed values, to achieve the purposes of this chapter. The
practice of forestry applies only to those activities undertaken on forested
landscapes. "Forestry" shall not include those activities performed
by wildlife biologists, fisheries biologists, botanists, ecological
restorationists, stream restorationists, hydrologists, or geologists.

(6)
"Government forester" means any forester who is a regular full-time
employee of a federal, state, or local governmental entity engaged in the
management of public lands or renders extension forestry services to the
public.

(7)
"Industrial forestry business" means a private business which
possesses expertise in practicing forestry, or that is engaged in the
manufacture of wood products from raw materials harvested from the business's
own land.

(8)
"Person" means a natural person.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. No
person shall receive income, whether directly or indirectly, for engaging in
the practice of consulting forestry, or advertise as engaging in such practice,
or solicit business in such practice, including but not limited to foresters
whose responsibilities include industry-sponsored forestry assistance programs
for landowners, unless the person holds a valid license issued by the board.
This section shall not prohibit, prevent, or affect:

(1)
Any person from practicing forestry on his or her own land, including
application for forest practices permits;

(2)
Any government forester from practicing forestry on government land;

(3)
Any person from practicing any other recognized profession or trade, including
but not limited to vendors of tree planting, timber stand improvement
practices, pesticide application, pest control, site preparation, heavy equipment,
fire control activities, and timber harvesting;

(4)
Any person employed or contracted by an industrial forestry business from
practicing forestry on the business's land;

(5)
An industrial forestry business from engaging the services of an independent
contractor to perform forestry tasks and projects directed or designed by the
business; or

(6)
Any person from practicing forestry under the direct supervision of a licensed
consulting forester.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. There
is created a state board of consulting foresters within the department to
administer the provisions of this chapter. The board shall consist of five
members appointed by the governor as follows: Three members shall be
consulting foresters, two of whom shall be appointed from a list of at least
three names submitted by nationally recognized professional forestry societies
and associations; two members shall be members of the public, one of whom shall
be appointed from a list of at least three names submitted by a recognized
state-wide organization representing nonindustrial forest landowners; and the
remaining public member shall be a person who is not, and never has been, a
member of the forestry profession, or a relative of such a person, and who does
not have and never has had, a material financial interest in the provision of
forestry services or in an activity directly related to forestry. Each
consulting forester member shall have actively practiced the profession of
consulting forestry for at least ten years prior to appointment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
The initial members of the board shall serve for the following terms: One
member for one year, one member for two years, one member for three years, one
member for four years, and one member for five years. All five members of the
first board must be appointed on the same date and shall serve their respective
terms from the date of appointment.

(2)
By virtue of their appointment, the initial three consulting forester members
of the board shall issue to themselves the licenses as consulting foresters and
pay the fees required under this chapter once the fees are established. After
the initial three consulting forester members of the board have so qualified
and been administered their oaths of office, no person shall be appointed as a
consulting forester member of the board unless such person, at the time
appointed, is a licensed consulting forester under this chapter.

(3)
On the expiration of the term of each member, the governor shall appoint a
successor to serve for a term of five years. Members of the board hold their
offices until their successors are appointed. No member shall serve more than
two consecutive terms.

(4)
A quorum of the board shall be three members.

(5)
The governor may remove any member of the board for cause. Vacancies on the
board shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term.

(6)
In carrying out the provisions of this chapter, the members of the board shall
be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
board has the following powers and duties:

(1)
To adopt rules governing the holding of meetings and hearings, applications for
licenses, and any other duties necessary for the administration of this
chapter;

(2)
To establish and issue standards of practice and a code of ethics for
consulting foresters and provide for the enforcement of such standards and the
code of ethics;

(3)
To establish minimum requirements for professional continuing education;

(4)
To prepare a biennial roster of the names, business addresses, and other
information as the board deems necessary of all licensed consulting foresters
licensed under this chapter;

(5)
To issue, suspend, or revoke licenses;

(6)
To investigate and conduct hearings concerning alleged violations of this
chapter; and

(7)
To keep a record of its proceedings and a register of all applicants for
licensing.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. (1)
The minimum requirements for licensure as a consulting forester prior to
January 1, 2002, are:

(a)
Evidence of seven or more years' experience in practicing forestry or performing
the services of a consulting forester that is satisfactory to the board; or

(b)
Passage of a written examination administered by the board indicating that the
applicant is competent to practice consulting forestry.

(2)
The minimum requirements for licensure after January 1, 2002, are:

(a)
Graduation in forestry or a related field, requiring study of four years or
more, from a school, college, or university approved by the board;

(b)
Evidence of five or more years' experience in practicing forestry or performing
the services of a consulting forester satisfactory to the board; and

(c)
Passage of a written examination administered by the board indicating that the
applicant is competent to practice consulting forestry.

Evidence
of seven or more years' experience in practicing forestry or performing the
services of a consulting forester satisfactory to the board may substitute for
the education and experience requirements of (a) and (b) of this subsection.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. An
application for a consulting forester license shall be filed with the board
before the date set for examination. The application fee shall be determined
by the board and shall include a nonrefundable examination fee and a fee for
issuance of the license. The examination fee must be paid to the board by
thirty days before the date of the examination.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. (1)
Examinations of applicants for licenses shall be held at least annually and at
such times and places as the board may determine.

(2)
The scope of the examination and methods of procedure shall be prescribed by
the board. The examination must cover timber management, including the ability
to evaluate and appraise timber, use of contracts, applicable state statutes
and rules, including labor and industries, and similar subjects necessary to
the practice of consulting forestry.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. The
board shall issue a license with a license number, upon payment of the license
fee, to a qualified applicant who is certified by the board as having passed
the required examination and as having given satisfactory proof of completion
of the required experience to the board and who, in the opinion of the board,
has satisfactorily met all the requirements of this chapter and the rules of
the board.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. All
plans, maps, specifications, and reports issued by a licensed consulting forester
shall be endorsed with the name of the licensed consulting forester and a
license number. No licensed consulting forester shall endorse any plan,
specification, estimate, map, or related document unless he or she actually
prepared or directly supervised the preparation of such document.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. No
business, partnership, or corporation may be licensed to practice consulting
forestry. Licensing shall be determined on the basis of individual personal
qualifications.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. (1)
The initial license expires on the second anniversary of the licensee's
birthday following the issuance of the license and biennially thereafter.

(2)
A licensee may renew a license prior to its expiration by paying any required
license renewal fee to the board and submitting proof of compliance with
continuing education requirements.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. The
board, upon application and payment of a fee determined by the board, may issue
a license without further examination to a person who is legally licensed as a
consulting forester in a state other than Washington and meets requirements set
by the board. The requirements for licensure in the person's licensing state
must be substantially equivalent to the requirements of this chapter and the
state in which he or she is so licensed must observe the same rules of
reciprocity granted under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. The
board has the power, after notice and hearing, to suspend or revoke the license
of any licensee or assess administrative penalties against a licensee who:

(1)
Is found liable for fraud, deceit, gross negligence, gross incompetency, or
gross misconduct in the practice of consulting forestry;

(2)
Is found liable by the board of unprofessional or unethical conduct;

(3)
Has had his or her license suspended or revoked for cause in another
jurisdiction;

(4)
Fails to comply with the continuing education requirements established by the
board;

(5)
Has directly or indirectly through another person or entity, purchased or
attempted to purchase timber from a landowner while providing forestry services
for the landowner;

(6)
Gives false or forged evidence of any kind to the board in obtaining a license;

(7)
Uses an expired or revoked license; or

(8)
Endorses any plan, specification, estimate, map, or related document unless he
or she actually prepared or directly supervised the preparation of such
document.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. (1)
If, after investigation, the board determines there is reason to believe a
violation of this chapter has taken place, the board shall prepare a statement
of allegations and serve the statement on the licensee or license applicant.
All procedures related to hearings shall be in accordance with the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2)
In conducting hearings, any member of the board may administer oaths to
witnesses appearing before the board, subpoena witnesses and compel their
attendance, and require the production of books, records, papers, and
documents. If any person refuses to obey any subpoena issued, or refuses to
testify or to produce any books, records, papers, or documents required to be
produced, the board may present a petition to the superior court of the county
in which the person resides, setting forth the facts, and the court may, in a
proper case, enter an order compelling compliance with this chapter and
imposing other terms and conditions as the court deems equitable.

(3)
Any person who feels aggrieved by any action of the board may appeal to the
superior court of the county in which he or she resides. The court shall
review the board's proceedings on the record presented and may, in a proper
case, sustain or dismiss the appeal, or modify or vacate the board's order.
However, in case the order is modified or vacated, the court may also, in its
discretion, remand the matter to the board for further proceedings consistent
with the court's order.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17. (1)
It is a misdemeanor for any person to:

(a)
Practice consulting forestry without being licensed in accordance with this
chapter;

(b)
Use in connection with his or her name, or otherwise assume, use, or advertise
any title or description tending to convey the impression that he or she is a
licensed consulting forester without being licensed in accordance with this
chapter;

(c)
Present or attempt to use as his or her own the license of another;

(d)
Give false or forged evidence of any kind to the board in obtaining a license;

(e)
Use an expired or revoked license; or

(f)
Endorse any plan, specification, estimate, map, or related document unless he
or she actually prepared or directly supervised the preparation of such document.

(2)
The board shall refer criminal violations of this chapter to the appropriate
prosecuting attorney for prosecution. A person convicted of a misdemeanor
shall be punished according to RCW 9.92.030.

(3)
The state attorney general or his or her designated assistant shall act as
legal advisor to the board and render such assistance as may be necessary in
carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18.
Sections 1 through 17 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

---
END ---