BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
19.48.010 and 1929 c 216 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any building held out to the public to be an inn, hotel or public
lodging house or place where sleeping accommodations, whether with or without
meals, or the facilities for preparing the same, are furnished for hire to
transient guests, in which ((fifteen)) three or more rooms are
used for the accommodation of such guests, shall for the purposes of this
chapter and chapter 60.64 RCW, or any amendment thereof, only, be defined to be
a hotel, and whenever the word hotel shall occur in this chapter and chapter
60.64 RCW, or any amendment thereof, it shall be construed to mean a hotel as
herein described.

---
END ---