BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.11.070 and 1989 c 307 s 43 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
It is unlawful for any person to act as an auctioneer or for an auction company
to engage in any business in this state without a license.

(2)
This chapter does not apply to:

(a)
An auction of goods conducted by an individual who personally owns those goods
and who did not acquire those goods for resale;

(b)
An auction conducted by or under the direction of a public authority;

(c)
An auction held under judicial order in the settlement of a decedent's estate;

(d)
An auction which is required by law to be at auction;

(e)
An auction conducted by or on behalf of a political organization or a
charitable corporation or association if the person conducting the sale
receives no compensation;

(f)
An auction of livestock or agricultural products which is conducted under
chapter 16.65 or 20.01 RCW. Auctions not regulated under chapter 16.65 or
20.01 RCW shall be fully subject to the provisions of this chapter;

(g)
An auction held under chapter 19.150 RCW; ((or))

(h)
An auction of an abandoned vehicle under chapter 46.55 RCW; or

(i)
An auction of fur pelts conducted by any cooperative association organized
under chapter 23.86 RCW or its wholly owned subsidiary. In order to qualify
for this exemption, the fur pelts must be from members of the association.
However, the association, without loss of the exemption, may auction pelts that
it purchased from nonmembers for the purpose of completing lots or orders, so
long as the purchased pelts do not exceed fifteen percent of the total pelts
auctioned.

Sec.
2. RCW
46.55.010 and 1998 c 203 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The
definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this chapter:

(1)
"Abandoned vehicle" means a vehicle that a registered tow truck
operator has impounded and held in the operator's possession for one hundred
twenty consecutive hours.

(2)
"Abandoned vehicle report" means the document prescribed by the state
that the towing operator forwards to the department after a vehicle has become
abandoned.

(3)
"Impound" means to take and hold a vehicle in legal custody. There
are two types of impounds‑-public and private.

(a)
"Public impound" means that the vehicle has been impounded at the
direction of a law enforcement officer or by a public official having
jurisdiction over the public property upon which the vehicle was located.

(b)
"Private impound" means that the vehicle has been impounded at the
direction of a person having control or possession of the private property upon
which the vehicle was located.

(4)
"Junk vehicle" means a vehicle certified under RCW 46.55.230 as
meeting at least three of the following requirements:

(a)
Is three years old or older;

(b)
Is extensively damaged, such damage including but not limited to any of the
following: A broken window or windshield, or missing wheels, tires, motor, or
transmission;

(c)
Is apparently inoperable;

(d)
Has an approximate fair market value equal only to the approximate value of the
scrap in it.

(5)
"Long-term impound" means an impound for up to thirty, sixty, or
ninety days ordered under RCW 46.55.120 because the driver was in violation of
RCW 46.20.342.

(6)
"Master log" means the document or an electronic facsimile prescribed
by the department and the Washington state patrol in which an operator records
transactions involving impounded vehicles.

(((6)))
(7) "Registered tow truck operator" or "operator"
means any person who engages in the impounding, transporting, or storage of
unauthorized vehicles or the disposal of abandoned vehicles.

(((7)))
(8) "Residential property" means property that has no more
than four living units located on it.

(((8)))
(9) "Tow truck" means a motor vehicle that is equipped for and
used in the business of towing vehicles with equipment as approved by the state
patrol.

(((9)))
(10) "Tow truck number" means the number issued by the department
to tow trucks used by a registered tow truck operator in the state of
Washington.

(((10)))
(11) "Tow truck permit" means the permit issued annually by
the department that has the classification of service the tow truck may provide
stamped upon it.

(((11)))
(12) "Tow truck service" means the transporting upon the
public streets and highways of this state of vehicles, together with personal
effects and cargo, by a tow truck of a registered operator.

(((12)))
(13) "Unauthorized vehicle" means a vehicle that is subject to
impoundment after being left unattended in one of the following public or
private locations for the indicated period of time:

Subject to removal after:

(a)Public
locations:

(i)Constituting an accident or a
traffic hazard as defined in RCW 46.55.113 Immediately

(ii)On a highway and tagged as
described in RCW 46.55.085.................... 24 hours

(iii)In a publicly owned or
controlled parking facility, properly posted under RCW

46.55.070................. Immediately

(b)Private locations:

(i)On residential property... Immediately

(ii)On private, nonresidential
property, properly posted under RCW 46.55.070.......................... Immediately

(iii)On private, nonresidential
property,

not posted................... 24 hours

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 46.55 RCW to read as follows:

The
Washington state patrol shall provide by rule for a uniform impound
authorization and inventory form. All law enforcement agencies must use this
form for all vehicle impounds after June 30, 2001.

Sec.
4. RCW
46.55.080 and 1989 c 111 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If a vehicle is in violation of the time restrictions of RCW 46.55.010(((12)))
(13), it may be impounded by a registered tow truck operator at the
direction of a law enforcement officer or other public official with
jurisdiction if the vehicle is on public property, or at the direction of the
property owner or an agent if it is on private property. A law enforcement
officer may also direct the impoundment of a vehicle pursuant to a writ or
court order.

(2)
The person requesting a private impound or a law enforcement officer or public
official requesting a public impound shall provide a signed authorization for
the impound at the time and place of the impound to the registered tow truck
operator before the operator may proceed with the impound. A registered tow
truck operator, employee, or his or her agent may not serve as an agent of a
property owner for the purposes of signing an impound authorization or,
independent of the property owner, identify a vehicle for impound.

(3)
In the case of a private impound, the impound authorization shall include the
following statement: "A person authorizing this impound, if the impound
is found in violation of chapter 46.55 RCW, may be held liable for the costs
incurred by the vehicle owner."

(4)
A registered tow truck operator shall record and keep in the operator's files
the date and time that a vehicle is put in the operator's custody and
released. The operator shall make an entry into a master log regarding
transactions relating to impounded vehicles. The operator shall make this
master log available, upon request, to representatives of the department or the
state patrol.

(5)
A person who engages in or offers to engage in the activities of a registered
tow truck operator may not be associated in any way with a person or business
whose main activity is authorizing the impounding of vehicles.

Sec.
5. RCW
46.55.100 and 1998 c 203 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
At the time of impoundment the registered tow truck operator providing the
towing service shall give immediate notification, by telephone or radio, to a
law enforcement agency having jurisdiction who shall maintain a log of such
reports. A law enforcement agency, or a private communication center acting on
behalf of a law enforcement agency, shall within six to twelve hours of the
impoundment, provide to a requesting operator the name and address of the legal
and registered owners of the vehicle, and the registered owner of any personal
property registered or titled with the department that is attached to or
contained in or on the impounded vehicle, the vehicle identification number,
and any other necessary, pertinent information. The initial notice of
impoundment shall be followed by a written or electronic facsimile notice
within twenty-four hours. In the case of a vehicle from another state, time
requirements of this subsection do not apply until the requesting law
enforcement agency in this state receives the information.

(2)
The operator shall immediately send an abandoned vehicle report to the
department for any vehicle, and for any items of personal property registered
or titled with the department, that are in the operator's possession after the
one hundred twenty hour abandonment period. Such report need not be sent when
the impoundment is pursuant to a writ, court order, or police hold other
than a long-term impound. The owner notification and abandonment process
shall be initiated by the registered tow truck operator immediately following
notification by a court or law enforcement officer that the writ, court order,
or police hold other than a long-term impound is no longer in effect.

(3)
Following the submittal of an abandoned vehicle report, the department shall
provide the registered tow truck operator with owner information within
seventy-two hours.

(4)
Within fourteen days of the sale of an abandoned vehicle at public auction, the
towing operator shall send a copy of the abandoned vehicle report showing the
disposition of the abandoned vehicle and any other items of personal property
registered or titled with the department to the crime information center of the
Washington state patrol.

(5)
If the operator sends an abandoned vehicle report to the department and the
department finds no owner information, an operator may proceed with an
inspection of the vehicle and any other items of personal property registered
or titled with the department to determine whether owner identification is
within the vehicle.

(6) If the operator finds no owner identification, the operator
shall immediately notify the appropriate law enforcement agency, which shall
search the vehicle and any other items of personal property registered or
titled with the department for the vehicle identification number or other
appropriate identification numbers and check the necessary records to determine
the vehicle's or other property's owners.

Sec.
6. RCW
46.55.110 and 1998 c 203 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
When an unauthorized vehicle is impounded, the impounding towing operator shall
notify the legal and registered owners of the impoundment of the unauthorized
vehicle and the owners of any other items of personal property registered or
titled with the department. The notification shall be sent by first-class mail
within twenty-four hours after the impoundment to the last known registered and
legal owners of the vehicle, and the owners of any other items of personal
property registered or titled with the department, as provided by the law
enforcement agency, and shall inform the owners of the identity of the person
or agency authorizing the impound. The notification shall include the name of
the impounding tow firm, its address, and telephone number. The notice shall
also include the location, time of the impound, and by whose authority the
vehicle was impounded. The notice shall also include the written notice of the
right of redemption and opportunity for a hearing to contest the validity of
the impoundment pursuant to RCW 46.55.120.

(2)
In addition, if a long-term impound has been ordered, the notice must state
the length of the impound, the requirement of the posting of a security deposit
to ensure payment of the costs of removal, towing, and storage, notification
that if the security deposit is not posted the vehicle will immediately be
processed and sold at auction as an abandoned vehicle, and the requirements set
out in RCW 46.55.120(1)(b) regarding the payment of the costs of removal,
towing, and storage as well as providing proof of satisfaction of any
penalties, fines, or forfeitures before redemption. The notice must also state
that the registered owner is ineligible to purchase the vehicle at the
abandoned vehicle auction, if held.

(3)
In the case of an abandoned vehicle, or other item of personal property
registered or titled with the department, within twenty-four hours after
receiving information on the owners from the department through the abandoned
vehicle report, the tow truck operator shall send by certified mail, with
return receipt requested, a notice of custody and sale to the legal and
registered owners.

(((3)))
(4) If the date on which a notice required by subsection (((2))) (3)
of this section is to be mailed falls upon a Saturday, Sunday, or a postal
holiday, the notice may be mailed on the next day that is neither a Saturday,
Sunday, nor a postal holiday.

(((4))) (5) No notices need be sent to the legal or
registered owners of an impounded vehicle or other item of personal property
registered or titled with the department, if the vehicle or personal property
has been redeemed.

Sec.
7. RCW
46.55.120 and 1998 c 203 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Vehicles or other items of personal property registered or titled with the
department that are impounded by registered tow truck operators pursuant to RCW
46.55.080, 46.55.085, or 46.55.113 may be redeemed only under the following
circumstances:

(a)
Only the legal owner, the registered owner, a person authorized in writing by
the registered owner or the vehicle's insurer, a person who is determined and
verified by the operator to have the permission of the registered owner of the
vehicle or other item of personal property registered or titled with the
department, or one who has purchased a vehicle or item of personal property
registered or titled with the department from the registered owner who produces
proof of ownership or written authorization and signs a receipt therefor, may
redeem an impounded vehicle or items of personal property registered or titled
with the department. In addition, a vehicle impounded because the operator is
in violation of RCW 46.20.342(1)(c) shall not be released until a person
eligible to redeem it under this subsection (1)(a) satisfies the requirements
of (((b))) (e) of this subsection, including paying all towing,
removal, and storage fees, notwithstanding the fact that the hold was ordered
by a government agency. If the department's records show that the operator has
been convicted of a violation of RCW 46.20.342 or a similar local ordinance
within the past five years, the vehicle may be held for up to thirty days at
the written direction of the agency ordering the vehicle impounded. A vehicle
impounded because the operator is arrested for a violation of RCW 46.20.342 may
be released only pursuant to a written order from the agency that ordered the
vehicle impounded. An agency may issue a written order to release pursuant to
a provision of an applicable state agency rule or local ordinance authorizing
release on the basis of economic or personal hardship to the spouse of the
operator, taking into consideration public safety factors, including the
operator's criminal history and driving record.

If
a vehicle is impounded because the operator is in violation of RCW 46.20.342(1)
(a) or (b), the vehicle may be held for up to thirty days at the written
direction of the agency ordering the vehicle impounded. However, if the
department's records show that the operator has been convicted of a violation
of RCW 46.20.342(1) (a) or (b) or a similar local ordinance within the past
five years, the vehicle may be held at the written direction of the agency
ordering the vehicle impounded for up to sixty days, and for up to ninety days
if the operator has two or more such prior offenses. If a vehicle is impounded
because the operator is arrested for a violation of RCW 46.20.342, the vehicle
may not be released until a person eligible to redeem it under this subsection
(1)(a) satisfies the requirements of (((b))) (e) of this
subsection, including paying all towing, removal, and storage fees,
notwithstanding the fact that the hold was ordered by a government agency.

(b)
If the vehicle is directed to be held for a long-term impound, a person who
desires to redeem the vehicle at the end of the period of impound shall within
five days of the impound at the request of the tow truck operator pay a
security deposit to the tow truck operator of not more than one-half of the
applicable impound storage rate for each day of the proposed long-term
impound. The tow truck operator shall credit this amount against the final
bill for removal, towing, and storage upon redemption. The tow truck operator
may accept other sufficient security in lieu of the security deposit. If the
person desiring to redeem the vehicle does not pay the security deposit or
provide other security acceptable to the tow truck operator, the tow truck
operator may process and sell at auction the vehicle as an abandoned vehicle
within the normal time limits set out in RCW 46.55.130(1). The security
deposit required by this section may be paid and must be accepted at any time
up to twenty-four hours before the beginning of the auction to sell the vehicle
as abandoned. The registered owner is not eligible to purchase the vehicle at
the auction, and the tow truck operator shall sell the vehicle to the highest
bidder who is not the registered owner.

(c)
Notwithstanding (b) of this subsection, a rental car business may immediately
redeem a rental vehicle it owns by payment of the costs of removal, towing, and
storage, whereupon the vehicle will not be held for a long-term impound.

(d)
Notwithstanding (b) of this subsection, a motor vehicle dealer or lender with a
perfected security interest in the vehicle may redeem or lawfully repossess a
vehicle immediately by payment of the costs of removal, towing, and storage,
whereupon the vehicle will not be held for a long-term impound. A motor
vehicle dealer or lender with a perfected security interest in the vehicle may
not knowingly and intentionally engage in collusion with a registered owner to
repossess and then return or resell a vehicle to the registered owner in an
attempt to avoid a long-term impound. However, this provision does not
preclude a vehicle dealer or lender with a perfected security interest in the
vehicle from repossessing the vehicle and then selling, leasing, or otherwise
disposing of it in accordance with chapter 62A.9 RCW, including providing
redemption rights to the debtor under RCW 62A.9-506.

(e)
The vehicle or other item of personal property registered or titled with the
department shall be released upon the presentation to any person having custody
of the vehicle of commercially reasonable tender sufficient to cover the costs
of towing, storage, or other services rendered during the course of towing,
removing, impounding, or storing any such vehicle, with credit being given
for the amount of any security deposit paid under (b) of this subsection.
In addition, if a vehicle is impounded because the operator was arrested for a
violation of RCW 46.20.342 or 46.20.420 and was being operated by the registered
owner when it was impounded, it must not be released to any person until the
registered owner establishes with the ((agency that ordered the vehicle
impounded)) court having jurisdiction that any penalties, fines, or
forfeitures owed by him or her as a result of the impound have been
satisfied. Commercially reasonable tender shall include, without limitation,
cash, major bank credit cards, or personal checks drawn on in-state banks if
accompanied by two pieces of valid identification, one of which may be required
by the operator to have a photograph. If the towing firm can determine through
the customer's bank or a check verification service that the presented check
would not be paid by the bank or guaranteed by the service, the towing firm may
refuse to accept the check. Any person who stops payment on a personal check
or credit card, or does not make restitution within ten days from the date a
check becomes insufficient due to lack of funds, to a towing firm that has
provided a service pursuant to this section or in any other manner defrauds the
towing firm in connection with services rendered pursuant to this section shall
be liable for damages in the amount of twice the towing and storage fees, plus
costs and reasonable attorney's fees.

(2)(a)
The registered tow truck operator shall give to each person who seeks to redeem
an impounded vehicle, or item of personal property registered or titled with
the department, written notice of the right of redemption and opportunity for a
hearing, which notice shall be accompanied by a form to be used for requesting
a hearing, the name of the person or agency authorizing the impound, and a copy
of the towing and storage invoice. The registered tow truck operator shall
maintain a record evidenced by the redeeming person's signature that such
notification was provided.

(b)
Any person seeking to redeem an impounded vehicle under this section has a
right to a hearing in the district or municipal court for the jurisdiction in
which the vehicle was impounded to contest the validity of the impoundment or
the amount of towing and storage charges. The district court has jurisdiction
to determine the issues involving all impoundments including those authorized
by the state or its agents. The municipal court has jurisdiction to determine
the issues involving impoundments authorized by agents of the municipality.
Any request for a hearing shall be made in writing on the form provided for
that purpose and must be received by the appropriate court within ten days of
the date the opportunity was provided for in subsection (2)(a) of this section and
more than five days before the date of the auction. At the time of the
filing of the hearing request, the petitioner shall pay to the court clerk a
filing fee in the same amount required for the filing of a suit in district
court. If the hearing request is not received by the court within the ten-day
period, the right to a hearing is waived and the registered owner is liable for
any towing, storage, or other impoundment charges permitted under this
chapter. Upon receipt of a timely hearing request, the court shall proceed to
hear and determine the validity of the impoundment.

(3)(a)
The court, within five days after the request for a hearing, shall notify the
registered tow truck operator, the person requesting the hearing if not the
owner, the registered and legal owners of the vehicle or other item of personal
property registered or titled with the department, and the person or agency
authorizing the impound in writing of the hearing date and time.

(b)
At the hearing, the person or persons requesting the hearing may produce any
relevant evidence to show that the impoundment, towing, or storage fees charged
were not proper. The court may consider a written report made under oath by
the officer who authorized the impoundment in lieu of the officer's personal
appearance at the hearing.

(c)
At the conclusion of the hearing, the court shall determine whether the
impoundment was proper, whether the towing or storage fees charged were in
compliance with the posted rates, and who is responsible for payment of the
fees. The court may not adjust fees or charges that are in compliance with the
posted or contracted rates.

(d)
If the impoundment is found proper, the impoundment, towing, and storage fees
as permitted under this chapter together with court costs shall be assessed
against the person or persons requesting the hearing, unless the operator did
not have a signed and valid impoundment authorization from a private property
owner or an authorized agent.

(e)
If the impoundment is determined to be in violation of this chapter, then the
registered and legal owners of the vehicle or other item of personal property
registered or titled with the department shall bear no impoundment, towing, or
storage fees, and any security shall be returned or discharged as appropriate,
and the person or agency who authorized the impoundment shall be liable for any
towing, storage, or other impoundment fees permitted under this chapter. The
court shall enter judgment in favor of the registered tow truck operator
against the person or agency authorizing the impound for the impoundment,
towing, and storage fees paid. In addition, the court shall enter judgment in
favor of the registered and legal owners of the vehicle, or other item of
personal property registered or titled with the department, for the amount of
the filing fee required by law for the impound hearing petition as well as
reasonable damages for loss of the use of the vehicle during the time the same
was impounded, for not less than fifty dollars per day, against the person or
agency authorizing the impound. However, if an impoundment arising from an
alleged violation of RCW 46.20.342 or 46.20.420 is determined to be in
violation of this chapter, then the law enforcement officer directing the
impoundment and the government employing the officer are not liable for damages
if the officer relied in good faith and without gross negligence on the records
of the department in ascertaining that the operator of the vehicle had a
suspended or revoked driver's license. If any judgment entered is not paid
within fifteen days of notice in writing of its entry, the court shall award
reasonable attorneys' fees and costs against the defendant in any action to
enforce the judgment. Notice of entry of judgment may be made by registered or
certified mail, and proof of mailing may be made by affidavit of the party
mailing the notice. Notice of the entry of the judgment shall read essentially
as follows:

TO:
. . . . . .

YOU ARE HEREBY NOTIFIED JUDGMENT was entered against you
in the . . . . . . Court located at
. . . . . . in the sum of
$. . . . . ., in an action entitled
. . . . . ., Case No. . . . . YOU ARE
FURTHER NOTIFIED that attorneys fees and costs will be awarded against you under
RCW . . . if the judgment is not paid within 15 days of the date of
this notice.

DATED this . . . . day of
. . . . . ., (year) . . .

Signature ..................

Typed name and address

of
party mailing notice

(4) Any impounded abandoned vehicle or item of personal property
registered or titled with the department that is not redeemed within ((fifteen))
thirty days of mailing of the notice of custody and sale as required by
RCW 46.55.110(((2))) (3) shall be sold at public auction in
accordance with all the provisions and subject to all the conditions of RCW
46.55.130. A vehicle or item of personal property registered or titled with
the department may be redeemed at any time before the start of the auction upon
payment of the applicable towing and storage fees.

Sec.
8. RCW
46.55.130 and 1998 c 203 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If, after the expiration of ((fifteen)) thirty days from the date
of mailing of notice of custody and sale required in RCW 46.55.110(((2)))
(3) to the registered and legal owners, the vehicle remains unclaimed
and has not been listed as a stolen vehicle, or for which a long-term
impound has been directed but no security paid under RCW 46.55.120, then
the registered tow truck operator having custody of the vehicle shall conduct a
sale of the vehicle at public auction after having first published a notice of
the date, place, and time of the auction in a newspaper of general circulation
in the county in which the vehicle is located not less than three days and no
more than ten days before the date of the auction. The notice shall contain a
description of the vehicle including the make, model, year, and license number
and a notification that a three-hour public viewing period will be available
before the auction. The auction shall be held during daylight hours of a
normal business day.

(2)
The following procedures are required in any public auction of such abandoned
vehicles:

(a)
The auction shall be held in such a manner that all persons present are given
an equal time and opportunity to bid;

(b)
All bidders must be present at the time of auction unless they have submitted
to the registered tow truck operator, who may or may not choose to use the
preauction bid method, a written bid on a specific vehicle. Written bids may
be submitted up to five days before the auction and shall clearly state which
vehicle is being bid upon, the amount of the bid, and who is submitting the
bid;

(c)
The open bid process, including all written bids, shall be used so that
everyone knows the dollar value that must be exceeded;

(d)
The highest two bids received shall be recorded in written form and shall
include the name, address, and telephone number of each such bidder;

(e)
In case the high bidder defaults, the next bidder has the right to purchase the
vehicle for the amount of his or her bid;

(f)
The successful bidder shall apply for title within fifteen days;

(g)
The registered tow truck operator shall post a copy of the auction procedure at
the bidding site. If the bidding site is different from the licensed office
location, the operator shall post a clearly visible sign at the office location
that describes in detail where the auction will be held. At the bidding site a
copy of the newspaper advertisement that lists the vehicles for sale shall be
posted;

(h)
All surplus moneys derived from the auction after satisfaction of the
registered tow truck operator's lien shall be remitted within thirty days to
the ((department for deposit in the state motor vehicle fund. A report
identifying the vehicles resulting in any surplus shall accompany the remitted
funds. If the director subsequently receives a valid claim from the))
registered vehicle owner of record as determined by the department ((within
one year from the date of the auction, the surplus moneys shall be remitted to
such owner));

(i)
If an operator receives no bid, or if the operator is the successful bidder at
auction, the operator shall, within forty-five days sell the vehicle to a
licensed vehicle wrecker, hulk hauler, or scrap processor by use of the
abandoned vehicle report-affidavit of sale, or the operator shall apply for
title to the vehicle.

(3)
In no case may an operator hold a vehicle for longer than ninety days without
holding an auction on the vehicle, except for vehicles that are under a police
or judicial hold.

(4)(a)
In no case may the accumulation of storage charges exceed fifteen days from the
date of receipt of the information by the operator from the department as
provided by RCW 46.55.110(((2))) (3).

(b)
The failure of the registered tow truck operator to comply with the time limits
provided in this chapter limits the accumulation of storage charges to five
days except where delay is unavoidable. Providing incorrect or incomplete
identifying information to the department in the abandoned vehicle report shall
be considered a failure to comply with these time limits if correct information
is available. However, storage charges begin to accrue again on the date
the correct and complete information is provided to the department by the
registered tow truck operator.

Sec.
9. RCW
46.61.625 and 1995 c 360 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No person or persons shall occupy any trailer while it is being moved upon a
public highway, except a person occupying a proper position for steering a
trailer designed to be steered from a rear-end position.

(2)
No person or persons may occupy a vehicle while it is being towed by a tow
truck as defined in RCW 46.55.010(((8))).

Sec.
10. RCW
46.70.180 and 1997 c 153 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
of the following acts or practices is unlawful:

(1)
To cause or permit to be advertised, printed, displayed, published,
distributed, broadcasted, televised, or disseminated in any manner whatsoever,
any statement or representation with regard to the sale or financing of a
vehicle which is false, deceptive, or misleading, including but not limited to
the following:

(a)
That no down payment is required in connection with the sale of a vehicle when
a down payment is in fact required, or that a vehicle may be purchased for a
smaller down payment than is actually required;

(b)
That a certain percentage of the sale price of a vehicle may be financed when
such financing is not offered in a single document evidencing the entire
security transaction;

(c)
That a certain percentage is the amount of the service charge to be charged for
financing, without stating whether this percentage charge is a monthly amount
or an amount to be charged per year;

(d)
That a new vehicle will be sold for a certain amount above or below cost
without computing cost as the exact amount of the factory invoice on the
specific vehicle to be sold;

(e)
That a vehicle will be sold upon a monthly payment of a certain amount, without
including in the statement the number of payments of that same amount which are
required to liquidate the unpaid purchase price.

(2)
To incorporate within the terms of any purchase and sale agreement any
statement or representation with regard to the sale or financing of a vehicle
which is false, deceptive, or misleading, including but not limited to terms
that include as an added cost to the selling price of a vehicle an amount for
licensing or transfer of title of that vehicle which is not actually due to the
state, unless such amount has in fact been paid by the dealer prior to such
sale.

(3)
To set up, promote, or aid in the promotion of a plan by which vehicles are to
be sold to a person for a consideration and upon further consideration that the
purchaser agrees to secure one or more persons to participate in the plan by
respectively making a similar purchase and in turn agreeing to secure one or
more persons likewise to join in said plan, each purchaser being given the
right to secure money, credits, goods, or something of value, depending upon the
number of persons joining the plan.

(4)
To commit, allow, or ratify any act of "bushing" which is defined as
follows: Taking from a prospective buyer of a vehicle a written order or offer
to purchase, or a contract document signed by the buyer, which:

(a)
Is subject to the dealer's, or his or her authorized representative's future
acceptance, and the dealer fails or refuses within three calendar days,
exclusive of Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, and prior to any further
negotiations with said buyer, either (i) to deliver to the buyer the dealer's
signed acceptance, or (ii) to void the order, offer, or contract document and
tender the return of any initial payment or security made or given by the
buyer, including but not limited to money, check, promissory note, vehicle
keys, a trade-in, or certificate of title to a trade-in; or

(b)
Permits the dealer to renegotiate a dollar amount specified as trade-in
allowance on a vehicle delivered or to be delivered by the buyer as part of the
purchase price, for any reason except:

(i)
Failure to disclose that the vehicle's certificate of ownership has been
branded for any reason, including, but not limited to, status as a rebuilt
vehicle as provided in RCW 46.12.050 and 46.12.075; or

(ii)
Substantial physical damage or latent mechanical defect occurring before the
dealer took possession of the vehicle and which could not have been reasonably
discoverable at the time of the taking of the order, offer, or contract; or

(iii)
Excessive additional miles or a discrepancy in the mileage. "Excessive
additional miles" means the addition of five hundred miles or more, as
reflected on the vehicle's odometer, between the time the vehicle was first
valued by the dealer for purposes of determining its trade-in value and the
time of actual delivery of the vehicle to the dealer. "A discrepancy in
the mileage" means (A) a discrepancy between the mileage reflected on the
vehicle's odometer and the stated mileage on the signed odometer statement; or
(B) a discrepancy between the mileage stated on the signed odometer statement
and the actual mileage on the vehicle; or

(c)
Fails to comply with the obligation of any written warranty or guarantee given
by the dealer requiring the furnishing of services or repairs within a
reasonable time.

(5)
To commit any offense relating to odometers, as such offenses are defined in
RCW 46.37.540, 46.37.550, 46.37.560, and 46.37.570. A violation of this
subsection is a class C felony punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(6)
For any vehicle dealer or vehicle salesperson to refuse to furnish, upon
request of a prospective purchaser, for vehicles previously registered to a
business or governmental entity, the name and address of the business or
governmental entity.

(7)
To commit any other offense under RCW 46.37.423, 46.37.424, or 46.37.425.

(8)
To commit any offense relating to a dealer's temporary license permit,
including but not limited to failure to properly complete each such permit, or
the issuance of more than one such permit on any one vehicle. However, a
dealer may issue a second temporary permit on a vehicle if the following
conditions are met:

(a)
The lienholder fails to deliver the vehicle title to the dealer within the
required time period;

(b)
The dealer has satisfied the lien; and

(c)
The dealer has proof that payment of the lien was made within two calendar
days, exclusive of Saturday, Sunday, or a legal holiday, after the sales
contract has been executed by all parties and all conditions and contingencies
in the sales contract have been met or otherwise satisfied.

(9)
For a dealer, salesman, or mobile home manufacturer, having taken an instrument
or cash "on deposit" from a purchaser prior to the delivery of the
bargained-for vehicle, to commingle the "on deposit" funds with assets
of the dealer, salesman, or mobile home manufacturer instead of holding the
"on deposit" funds as trustee in a separate trust account until the
purchaser has taken delivery of the bargained-for vehicle. Delivery of a
manufactured home shall be deemed to occur in accordance with RCW
46.70.135(5). Failure, immediately upon receipt, to endorse "on
deposit" instruments to such a trust account, or to set aside "on
deposit" cash for deposit in such trust account, and failure to deposit such
instruments or cash in such trust account by the close of banking hours on the
day following receipt thereof, shall be evidence of intent to commit this
unlawful practice: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That a motor vehicle dealer may keep a
separate trust account which equals his or her customary total customer
deposits for vehicles for future delivery. For purposes of this section,
"on deposit" funds received from a purchaser of a manufactured home
means those funds that a seller requires a purchaser to advance before ordering
the manufactured home, but does not include any loan proceeds or moneys that
might have been paid on an installment contract.

(10)
For a dealer or manufacturer to fail to comply with the obligations of any
written warranty or guarantee given by the dealer or manufacturer requiring the
furnishing of goods and services or repairs within a reasonable period of time,
or to fail to furnish to a purchaser, all parts which attach to the
manufactured unit including but not limited to the undercarriage, and all items
specified in the terms of a sales agreement signed by the seller and buyer.

(11)
For a vehicle dealer to pay to or receive from any person, firm, partnership,
association, or corporation acting, either directly or through a subsidiary, as
a buyer's agent for consumers, any compensation, fee, purchase moneys or funds
that have been deposited into or withdrawn out of any account controlled or
used by any buyer's agent, gratuity, or reward in connection with the purchase
or sale of a new motor vehicle.

(12)
For a buyer's agent, acting directly or through a subsidiary, to pay to or to
receive from any motor vehicle dealer any compensation, fee, gratuity, or
reward in connection with the purchase or sale of a new motor vehicle. In
addition, it is unlawful for any buyer's agent to engage in any of the
following acts on behalf of or in the name of the consumer:

(a)
Receiving or paying any purchase moneys or funds into or out of any account
controlled or used by any buyer's agent;

(b)
Signing any vehicle purchase orders, sales contract, odometer statements, or
title documents, or having the name of the buyer's agent appear on the vehicle
purchase order, sales contract, or title; or

(c)
Signing any other documentation relating to the purchase, sale, or transfer of
any new motor vehicle.

It
is unlawful for a buyer's agent to use a power of attorney obtained from the
consumer to accomplish or effect the purchase, sale, or transfer of ownership
documents of any new motor vehicle by any means which would otherwise be prohibited
under (a) through (c) of this subsection. However, the buyer's agent may use a
power of attorney for physical delivery of motor vehicle license plates to the
consumer.

Further,
it is unlawful for a buyer's agent to engage in any false, deceptive, or
misleading advertising, disseminated in any manner whatsoever, including but
not limited to making any claim or statement that the buyer's agent offers,
obtains, or guarantees the lowest price on any motor vehicle or words to
similar effect.

(13)
For a buyer's agent to arrange for or to negotiate the purchase, or both, of a
new motor vehicle through an out-of-state dealer without disclosing in writing
to the customer that the new vehicle would not be subject to chapter 19.118
RCW. In addition, it is unlawful for any buyer's agent to fail to have a
written agreement with the customer that: (a) Sets forth the terms of the
parties' agreement; (b) discloses to the customer the total amount of any fees
or other compensation being paid by the customer to the buyer's agent for the
agent's services; and (c) further discloses whether the fee or any portion of
the fee is refundable. The department of licensing shall by December 31, 1996,
in rule, adopt standard disclosure language for buyer's agent agreements under
RCW 46.70.011, 46.70.070, and this section.

(14)
Being a manufacturer, other than a motorcycle manufacturer governed by chapter
46.94 RCW, to:

(a)
Coerce or attempt to coerce any vehicle dealer to order or accept delivery of
any vehicle or vehicles, parts or accessories, or any other commodities which
have not been voluntarily ordered by the vehicle dealer: PROVIDED, That
recommendation, endorsement, exposition, persuasion, urging, or argument are
not deemed to constitute coercion;

(b)
Cancel or fail to renew the franchise or selling agreement of any vehicle
dealer doing business in this state without fairly compensating the dealer at a
fair going business value for his or her capital investment which shall include
but not be limited to tools, equipment, and parts inventory possessed by the
dealer on the day he or she is notified of such cancellation or termination and
which are still within the dealer's possession on the day the cancellation or
termination is effective, if: (i) The capital investment has been entered into
with reasonable and prudent business judgment for the purpose of fulfilling the
franchise; and (ii) the cancellation or nonrenewal was not done in good faith.
Good faith is defined as the duty of each party to any franchise to act in a
fair and equitable manner towards each other, so as to guarantee one party
freedom from coercion, intimidation, or threats of coercion or intimidation
from the other party: PROVIDED, That recommendation, endorsement, exposition,
persuasion, urging, or argument are not deemed to constitute a lack of good
faith.

(c)
Encourage, aid, abet, or teach a vehicle dealer to sell vehicles through any
false, deceptive, or misleading sales or financing practices including but not
limited to those practices declared unlawful in this section;

(d)
Coerce or attempt to coerce a vehicle dealer to engage in any practice
forbidden in this section by either threats of actual cancellation or failure
to renew the dealer's franchise agreement;

(e)
Refuse to deliver any vehicle publicly advertised for immediate delivery to any
duly licensed vehicle dealer having a franchise or contractual agreement for
the retail sale of new and unused vehicles sold or distributed by such
manufacturer within sixty days after such dealer's order has been received in
writing unless caused by inability to deliver because of shortage or
curtailment of material, labor, transportation, or utility services, or by any
labor or production difficulty, or by any cause beyond the reasonable control of
the manufacturer;

(f)
To provide under the terms of any warranty that a purchaser of any new or
unused vehicle that has been sold, distributed for sale, or transferred into
this state for resale by the vehicle manufacturer may only make any warranty
claim on any item included as an integral part of the vehicle against the
manufacturer of that item.

Nothing
in this section may be construed to impair the obligations of a contract or to
prevent a manufacturer, distributor, representative, or any other person,
whether or not licensed under this chapter, from requiring performance of a
written contract entered into with any licensee hereunder, nor does the
requirement of such performance constitute a violation of any of the provisions
of this section if any such contract or the terms thereof requiring
performance, have been freely entered into and executed between the contracting
parties. This paragraph and subsection (14)(b) of this section do not apply to
new motor vehicle manufacturers governed by chapter 46.96 RCW.

(15)
Unlawful transfer of an ownership interest in a motor vehicle as defined in RCW
19.116.050.

(16) To knowingly and intentionally engage in collusion with a
registered owner of a vehicle to repossess and return or resell the vehicle to
the registered owner in an attempt to avoid a long-term impound under chapter
46.55 RCW. However, compliance with chapter 62A.9 RCW in repossessing,
selling, leasing, or otherwise disposing of the vehicle, including providing
redemption rights to the debtor, is not a violation of this section.

---
END ---