BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
8.25.020 and 1967 ex.s. c 137 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be paid by the condemnor in respect of each parcel of
real property acquired by eminent domain or by consent under threat thereof, in
addition to the fair market value of the property, a sum equal to the various
expenditures actually and reasonably incurred by those with an interest or
interests in said parcel in the process of evaluating the condemnor's offer to
buy the same, but not to exceed a total of ((two)) seven hundred fifty
dollars. In the case of multiple interests in a parcel, the division of such
sum shall be determined by the court or by agreement of the parties.

---
END ---