BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section
apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Authorized facilities" means all of the plant, equipment, fixtures,
appurtenances, antennas, and other facilities necessary to furnish and deliver
telecommunications services and cable television services, including but not
limited to poles with crossarms, poles without crossarms, wires, lines,
conduits, cables, communication and signal lines and equipment, braces, guys,
anchors, vaults, and all attachments, appurtenances, and appliances necessary
or incidental to the distribution and use of telecommunications services and
cable television services.

(2)
"Authorized user" means every corporation, company, association,
joint stock association, partnership, and person; their lessees, trustees, or
receivers appointed by any court whatsoever; and every city or town owning,
operating, or managing any facilities used to provide telecommunications for
hire, sale, or resale to the general public within this state.

(3)
"Cable television service" means the one-way transmission to
subscribers of video programming or other programming service and subscriber
interaction, if any, which is required for the selection or use of such video
programming or other programming service.

(4)
"Public right-of-way" means roads, streets, and highways dedicated or
secured by the public for public use, but does not include:

(a)
Unimproved land dedicated for roads, streets, and highways that are not
currently in use;

(b)
Structures located within the right-of-way;

(c)
Federally granted trust lands and the forest board trust lands;

(d)
Federally granted railroad rights-of-way acquired under 43 U.S.C. Sec. 912 and
related provisions of federal law that are not open for motor vehicle use; or

(e)
Lands owned or managed by the state parks and recreation commission.

(5)
"Telecommunications service" means the transmission of information by
wire, radio, optical cable, electromagnetic, or other similar means for the
general public. Telecommunications services excludes the over-the-air
transmission of broadcast television or broadcast radio signals. For the
purpose of this subsection, "information" means knowledge or
intelligence represented by any form of writing, signs, signals, pictures,
sounds, or any other symbols.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The state, counties, cities, or towns, consistent with state law, shall not
deny the use of public rights-of-way for the purposes of locating authorized
facilities for telecommunications services or cable television services
provided that authorized users ensure that:

(a)
The authorized facilities comply with applicable land use and construction
codes, regulations, standards, and franchise requirements adopted by state
agencies, counties, cities, and towns not inconsistent with state law or
easement agreements for the use of private property;

(b)
The authorized facilities are installed and maintained within public
rights-of-way in such manner and at such points so as not to incommode the
public use of the rights-of-way;

(c)
The authorized users obtain all permits required for the installation of
authorized facilities as required by the state agencies, counties, cities, and
towns; and

(d)
The use of a facility or structure in the public right-of-way, or attachment to
it, or the use of public property that is not public right-of-way has received
the explicit approval of, and is under such conditions as may be agreed to by,
the owner of the facility, structure, or property.

(2)
The reasons for a denial of the use of the public right-of-way shall be clearly
stated in writing.

(3)
This section does not create or expand: (a) Liabilities of the state,
counties, cities, or towns regarding the construction, installation,
maintenance, or removal of authorized facilities; or (b) duties owed by the
state, counties, cities, or towns to authorized users to construct, install,
maintain, or remove authorized facilities. In addition, this section does not
extend any liability of the state, counties, cities, or towns to any third
party user of authorized facilities.

(4)
This section does not create, modify, or diminish the priority of use for
authorized facilities over other users of the public right- of-way for other
purposes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
Counties, cities, and towns may not adopt or enforce regulations or ordinances
specifically relating to authorized users in public rights-of-way that:

(a)
Impose requirements that regulate the services and business operations of the
authorized user, except where expressly authorized in state or federal law;

(b)
Conflict with federal or state laws, rules, and regulations that specifically
apply to the design, construction, and operation of authorized facilities or
with federal or state worker safety or public safety laws, rules, and
regulations; or

(c)
Regulate services of authorized users based upon the content or type of signals
that are carried or are capable of being carried over the telecommunications
facilities, except where specifically authorized in state or federal law.

(2)
This section does not limit the authority of the counties, cities, and towns to
regulate the placement of authorized facilities through local zoning authority,
if:

(a)
The regulations do not uniformly prohibit the placement of authorized
facilities within the county, city, or town, or uniformly prohibit the
placement of authorized facilities within county, city, or town public
rights-of-way, and do not have the effect of a barrier to entry as prohibited
by the telecommunications act of 1996, P.L. 104-104 (110 Stat. 56); and

(b)
The regulations do not unreasonably discriminate or have the effect of
unreasonably discriminating between similarly situated authorized users or
authorized facilities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
The state department of transportation, counties, cities, and towns shall adopt
procedures for the issuance of permits for authorized facilities. Under the
adopted procedures, permits shall be issued or denied within one hundred twenty
days from an applicant's filing of a complete application for a permit, except:

(a)
Where required by specific procedures to assure coordination of work within the
public right-of-way that provide reasonable opportunities for scheduling of
work, including advance notice of planned work, that conform with section 6 of
this act, and that do not impose unreasonable barriers to entry as prohibited
by the telecommunications act of 1996, P.L. 104-104 (110 Stat. 56);

(b)
With the agreement of the applicant;

(c)
Where permits require the approval or cooperation of another unit of government
that cannot be obtained within the one hundred twenty-day period;

(d)
Where franchises require the approval of the legislative body of the
jurisdiction, if procedures allow the interim installation of authorized
facilities where the timeline to complete such a franchise agreement is
expected to exceed one hundred twenty days; or

(e)
Issuance and renewals of franchises and related permits for cable television
service that are governed by federal law.

(2)
For purposes of this section, the state department of transportation, counties,
cities, and towns shall adopt by rule or ordinance the specific requirements
necessary to deem an application for a permit complete, and shall provide a
copy of the requirements to all applicants.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
The Washington utilities and transportation commission shall develop and
maintain a centralized registry where all authorized users must register. The
registry shall act as a central source for registering information necessary to
the management of public rights-of-way and shall reduce repetitive requirements
of counties, cities, and towns.

(2)
Authorized users shall register with the commission and provide information as
determined necessary by the commission. The information required shall include
proof of insurance, bonds, letters of indemnification, and other information
capable of being collected once and maintained centrally.

(3)
Information contained in the registry and specifically applicable to use of
public rights-of-way shall be available to counties, cities, and towns upon
request. Information contained in the registry shall not be duplicated through
any requirements imposed by counties, cities, and towns.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. (1)
The Washington utilities and transportation commission shall develop and
maintain a centralized data base accessible via the internet to provide
information about construction activities within public rights-of-way. The
data base shall include information necessary to coordinate construction
activities and reduce street openings and disruption within the public
rights-of-way.

(2)
Counties, cities, and towns opting to manage authorized users in public
rights-of-way as provided in section 4(1)(a) of this act shall notify the
commission in advance of all street opening and construction activities in the
public rights-of-way and provide all necessary information to the commission.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. (1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a county, city, town, or
the state department of transportation shall not place a moratorium on the
acceptance and processing of applications, permitting, construction,
maintenance, repair, replacement, extension, operation, or use of any personal
wireless communication facility after the effective date of this section. Any
moratorium that expires after the effective date of this section shall not be
extended in whole or in part.

(2)
A city or town incorporated after the effective date of this section may impose
one moratorium that does not exceed one hundred eighty days and is not
extendable.

Sec.
8. RCW
35.21.860 and 1983 2nd ex.s. c 3 s 39 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No city or town may impose a franchise fee or any other fee or charge of
whatever nature or description upon the light and power, or gas distribution
businesses, as defined in RCW 82.16.010, ((or)) telephone business, as
defined in RCW 82.04.065, or telecommunications company, as defined in RCW
80.04.010, except that (a) a tax authorized by RCW 35.21.865 may be imposed,
(b) fees and franchise requirements authorized by federal law may be imposed on
cable television services, as defined in section 1 of this act, and (((b)))
(c) a fee may be charged to such businesses that recovers actual
administrative expenses incurred by a city or town that are directly related to
receiving and approving a permit, license, and franchise, to inspecting plans
and construction, or to the preparation of a detailed statement pursuant to
chapter 43.21C RCW.

(2)
Subsection (1) of this section does not prohibit franchise fees imposed on an
electrical energy, natural gas, or telephone business, by contract existing on
April 20, 1982, with a city or town, for the duration of the contract, but the
franchise fees shall be considered taxes for the purposes of the limitations
established in RCW 35.21.865 and 35.21.870 to the extent the fees exceed the
costs allowable under subsection (1) of this section.

Sec.
9. RCW
36.55.010 and 1963 c 4 s 36.55.010 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any ((board of)) county ((commissioners)) legislative
authority may grant franchises to persons or private or municipal
corporations to use the right-of-way of county roads in their
respective counties for the construction and maintenance of waterworks, gas
pipes, telephone, telegraph, and electric light lines, sewers, and any
other such facilities. However, a franchise fee or any other fee or charge
of whatever nature or description may not be imposed upon a telecommunications
company as defined in RCW 80.04.010, except that (a) fees and franchise
requirements authorized by federal law may be imposed on cable television
services, as defined in section 1 of this act, and (b) a fee may be charged to
such telecommunications service companies that recovers actual administrative
expenses incurred by a county that are directly related to receiving and approving
a permit, license, and franchise, to inspecting plans and construction, or to
the preparation of a detailed statement pursuant to chapter 43.21C RCW.

(2)
Subsection (1) of this section does not prohibit franchise fees imposed on a
telecommunications service company, by contract existing on the effective date
of this section, with a county, for the duration of the contract.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10.
Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 80 RCW.

---
END ---