BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
department shall establish the parents as scholars program. The goal of the
program is to help parents, who are also students, and who have dependent
children in need, receive up to two years of undergraduate education or
training. Annually the department shall provide up to three thousand parents
enrolled at an institution of higher education with a package of student aid
that includes direct aid for living expenses equal to that provided under this
chapter, as well as the other support services provided to recipients of
temporary assistance for needy families, including but not limited to medical
assistance, child care, food stamps, and other support services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. For
purposes of sections 1 through 9 of this act, "institution of higher
education" means the state universities, the regional universities, The
Evergreen State College, the community colleges, the technical colleges, and
private career schools or colleges.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
parents as scholars program shall be supported with funds other than those
granted to the state under Title IV-A of the federal social security act,
provided that the state funds used for this program meet the definition of
state maintenance of effort under Title IV-A of the federal social security
act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
Families that qualify for temporary assistance for needy families under this
chapter may participate in the parents as scholars program in lieu of the
temporary assistance for needy families. Eligibility for assistance, and the
amount of assistance, shall be determined under criteria used in the temporary
assistance for needy families program.

(2)
The department shall assess the applicant to determine that the education and
training sought by the applicant is likely to result in employment that
provides the wages and benefits necessary for the applicant to support the
applicant's family without public assistance.

(3)
To be eligible for the parents as scholars program, an applicant is required to
have worked in unsubsidized employment for twenty hours a week for at least twelve
of the twenty-four weeks prior to applying for the parents as scholars program.

(4)
To the extent that funds are available, enrollment in the program shall be
granted if the department determines that:

(a)
The applicant does not possess the necessary skills to obtain employment that
will enable that individual to support a family at seventy-five percent of the
median family income in the state for a family of the same size as the
applicant's family;

(b)
Considering potential employment opportunities and local labor market
conditions, the undergraduate education sought by the individual is likely to
improve the ability of the family to be self-supporting; and

(c)
The applicant has the aptitude to successfully complete the proposed program at
an institution of higher education.

The
applicant shall meet the requirements for the state need grant under RCW
28B.10.800 through 28B.10.820 and qualify for acceptance at an institution of
higher education in the state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
department shall provide career planning and counseling services to applicants
for, and recipients of, assistance under sections 1 through 9 of this act to
assist them in choosing an educational plan that is likely to lead to
self-sufficiency, and provide to students who have begun an educational program
assistance to overcome barriers to completing the program and becoming
employed. The department may work with other state and local entities to
provide the planning and counseling services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
Students receiving assistance under sections 1 through 9 of this act shall meet
the following requirements:

(1)
They must participate in some combination of education, training, study, or
work experience for at least twenty hours per week; and

(2)
They must be enrolled full-time, with the expectation that they make
satisfactory progress toward a degree, certificate, or license.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
department shall inform all persons applying for or participating in the
temporary assistance for needy families program of the option to apply for the
parents as scholars program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. To
the extent permitted by federal law, assistance received under sections 1
through 9 of this act must be disregarded as income and excluded as a resource
or asset to the same extent as assistance under the temporary assistance for
needy families program, under this chapter, for the purposes of any state,
federal, tribal, or municipal assistance program. Assistance received under
sections 1 through 9 of this act must be treated in the same manner as
assistance received under the temporary assistance for needy families program
under this chapter for all tax purposes. Furthermore, the department shall
implement the program so participants can qualify for food stamps.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. The
department shall adopt rules to implement sections 1 through 8 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10.
Sections 1 through 9 of this act are each added to chapter 74.08A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. If
any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding
does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application
to the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by
the state.

---
END ---