BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that private property owners and their tenants need to be
able to deal with animals posing a nuisance or causing damage to their property
and acknowledges that trapping the animals may be the most expedient means of
addressing an animal damage problem. The legislature further finds that the
department of fish and wildlife may also need to employ trapping techniques to
remove wildlife that is destroying or injuring property or when necessary for
wildlife management or research. However, with regard to recreational trapping
of animals or the trapping of animals for commercial gain, the legislature
finds that trappers should use the most humane trapping methods possible. It
is the intent of this legislation to ensure that trappers do so.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 77.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a)
In order to ensure that trapping is conducted as humanely as possible, trappers
licensed under chapter 77.32 RCW shall not use, set, place, or maintain leghold
traps, padded leghold traps, conibear traps, other body-gripping traps, or
snares. The commission shall adopt rules to implement this section.

(b)
For purposes of this section, "leghold trap" means a spring-powered
trap, featuring two jaws that clamp shut on an animal's leg when the animal
steps on a weight-sensitive trigger. These traps are also known as and
include: Steel-jawed traps, foothold traps, long-spring traps, coilspring
traps, underspring or jump traps, and guarded or stop-loss traps.

(c)
For the purposes of this section, "conibear" trap means any conibear
model trap or similar body-gripping trap or device, whether or not enclosed in
or comprising part of a box, tube, or other enclosing device.

(d)
This prohibition on the use of certain types of traps does not include traps
designed primarily to catch mice and rats.

(2)
Subsection (1) of this section does not apply in any of the following
situations:

(a)
If an owner or tenant is trapping an animal on the owner's property and the
owner or tenant is acting in compliance with RCW 77.36.030. The legislature
encourages these persons to use humane trapping methods when possible;

(b)
If the department is trapping wildlife that is destroying or injuring property or
when the department finds such trapping necessary for wildlife management or
research pursuant to RCW 77.12.240. The legislature encourages the department
to use humane trapping methods when possible; and

(c)
If the department has solicited the assistance of a licensed trapper to assist
in accomplishing the purposes of (b) of this subsection. Again the legislature
encourages the choice of humane trapping methods when possible.

Sec.
3. RCW
77.32.197 and 1987 c 506 s 82 are each amended to read as follows:

Persons
purchasing a state trapping license for the first time shall present
certification of completion of a course of instruction in safe, humane, and
proper trapping techniques or pass an examination to establish that the
applicant has the requisite knowledge.

The director shall establish a program for training persons in
trapping techniques and responsibilities, ((including)) emphasizing
the use of trapping devices designed to painlessly capture or instantly kill. The
program shall identify trapping methods that are in compliance with section 2
of this act. The director shall cooperate with national and state animal,
humane, hunter education, and trapping organizations in the development of a
curriculum. Upon successful completion of the course, trainees shall receive a
trapper's training certificate signed by an authorized instructor. This
certificate is evidence of compliance with this section.

---
END ---