BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 18.92 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that overpopulation of pets is a continuing problem in this
state. The legislature further finds that providing low-income pet owners
enhanced access to sterilization, vaccination, and electronic identification
device implantation would help solve this problem. The legislature further
finds that the integrity of the veterinary licensing program must be maintained
to ensure the delivery of safe, high quality veterinary medical services.

It
is the intent of this act to authorize appropriate agencies to offer low-income
pet owners certain limited veterinary medical services performed by licensed
providers, while maintaining current veterinary licensure requirements.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 18.92 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
It is not a violation of this chapter for an animal care and control agency as
defined in RCW 16.52.011, or a bona fide nonprofit humane society that has
obtained certification under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code, to
provide the following procedures on animals owned by others, as further limited
by this section:

(a)
Surgical and nonsurgical sterilization;

(b)
Inoculation against disease; and

(c)
Implanting of an electronic device for identifying animals.

(2)
To receive services authorized by this section, an animal owner must qualify as
a low-income household as defined by RCW 43.185A.010.

(3)
Services and procedures authorized by this section must be performed by a
veterinarian licensed under this chapter, or an animal technician or veterinary
medication clerk acting under the direction and supervision of a licensed
veterinarian.

(4)
It is a violation of this chapter for an animal care and control agency as
defined in RCW 16.52.011, or a bona fide nonprofit humane society that has
obtained certification under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code, to
provide procedures on animals owned by others, other than those procedures set
forth in this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The
department of health shall adopt rules necessary for the implementation of this
act, including the qualification of a humane society to provide services under
this act, and the method for determining the income level of owners of animals
receiving services under this act.

---
END ---