BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 70.106 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Any antifreeze product containing by weight ten percent or more ethylene glycol
and manufactured or sold in this state on or after July 1, 2000, must also
contain an aversive agent, approved by the director, in a concentration
sufficient to render that antifreeze product unpalatable to humans and animals.

(2) If the director finds or has probable cause to believe that any
antifreeze product being sold in this state fails to comply with subsection (1)
of this section, the director is authorized to order that product's removal
from retail shelf space.

---
END ---