BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
secretary of state shall assemble a task force to conduct a study of the issues
and challenges presented by incorporating on-line and Internet technologies in
the voting process. These issues may include the use of on-line technology
within existing systems and the requirements for authorization of collection,
storage, and processing of electronically generated and transmitted digital
messages to permit any eligible person to vote in any election, including
applying for and casting an absentee ballot.

In
conducting the study, the secretary of state shall do all of the following:

(1)
Create, and be assisted by, an advisory committee, who serves at the pleasure
of the secretary of state, composed of county election staff, technical
experts, and such other individuals whom the secretary deems to have expertise
in these issues, to research the issues and challenges presented by
incorporating on-line and Internet technologies into the voting process;

(2)
Determine and define the appropriate security measures required and minimum
standards for certification of systems, and make recommendations concerning
statutes and rules to be adopted in order to implement the system;

(3)
Consider the impact of an on-line or Internet voting system on voter
participation rates, public accessibility, potential external influences during
the elections process, and other issues related to the conduct and
administration of elections.

The
secretary of state shall report in writing to the legislature no later than
March 1, 2000, on the results of the study required by this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2.
Section 1 of this act expires June 30, 2001.

---
END ---