BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
INTENT. The legislature intends to authorize the establishment
of charter schools for the purpose of providing a unique setting for learning
that will improve pupil achievement and provide additional public school
choices for students, parents, and teachers.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
DEFINITIONS. Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in
this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Applicant" means a nonprofit corporation that has submitted an
application to a sponsor to obtain approval to operate a charter school. The
nonprofit corporation must either be a public benefit nonprofit corporation as
defined in RCW 24.03.490, or a nonprofit corporation as defined in RCW
24.03.005 that has applied for tax-exempt status under section 501(c)(3) of the
internal revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)). The nonprofit
corporation may not be a sectarian or religious organization and must meet all
of the requirements for a public benefit nonprofit corporation before receiving
any funding under section 12 of this act.

(2)
"Charter" means a contract between an applicant and a sponsor. The
charter establishes, in accordance with this chapter, the terms and conditions
for the management, operation, and educational program of the charter school.

(3)
"Charter school" means a public school managed by an applicant's
board of directors and operating independently of any school district board
under a charter approved in accordance with this chapter.

(4)
"Board of directors" means the board of directors of the public
benefit nonprofit corporation that manages and operates the charter school.

(5)
"Sponsor" means: (a) The school district in which the charter school
is located; (b) the state and regional universities as defined in RCW
28B.10.016; or (c) The Evergreen State College. Charter schools sponsored
under (b) or (c) of this subsection shall be approved by the governing board of
the sponsoring institution or by an official or agency designated by and
accountable to the governing board.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
CHARTER SCHOOLS‑-POWERS. (1) The charter school's board of directors may
hire, manage, and discharge any charter school employee in accordance with the
terms of this chapter and that school's charter.

(2)
The charter school's board of directors may enter into a contract with any
school district, or any other public or private entity, also empowered to enter
into contracts, for any and all real property, equipment, goods, supplies, and
services, including educational instructional services.

(3)
Charter schools may rent, lease, or own property, but may not acquire property
by eminent domain. All charters and charter school contracts with other public
and private entities must include provisions regarding the disposition of the
property if the charter school fails to open as planned, closes, or the charter
is revoked or not renewed. Charter schools may accept gifts and donations from
other governmental and private entities, excluding sectarian or religious
organizations. Charter schools may not accept any gifts or donations the
conditions of which violate this chapter.

(4)
Neither a charter school sponsor nor the school district in which the charter
school is located is liable for acts or omissions of a charter school,
including acts or omissions related to the application, the charter, the
operation, and the performance of the charter school.

(5)
Charter schools may not charge tuition, levy taxes, or issue bonds, however
they may charge fees for optional noncredit extracurricular events.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. LEGAL
STATUS. A charter school is a public school including one or more of grades
kindergarten through twelve, operated by a public benefit nonprofit
corporation, according to the terms of a renewable five-year contract granted
by a sponsor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
CHARTER SCHOOLS‑-EXEMPTIONS. (1) A charter school shall operate
independently of any school district board, under a charter approved by a
sponsor under this chapter.

(2)
Charter schools are exempt from all state statutes and rules applicable to
school districts and school district boards of directors except as provided in
this chapter and in the school's approved charter.

(3)
A charter school's board of directors may elect to comply with one or more
provisions of the statutes or rules that are applicable to school districts and
school district board of directors.

(4)
All approved charter schools shall:

(a)
Comply with state and federal health, safety, and civil rights laws applicable
to school districts;

(b)
All charter schools shall participate in nationally normed standardized
achievement tests as required in RCW 28A.230.230 and 28A.230.240 and the
elementary, middle school, and high school standards and assessment
examinations as required in RCW 28A.630.885;

(c)
Employ certificated instructional staff as required in RCW 28A.410.010, however
charter schools may hire noncertificated instructional staff of unusual
competence and in exceptional cases as specified in RCW 28A.150.260;

(d)
Comply with the employee record check requirements in RCW 28A.400.303;

(e)
Be subject to the same financial and audit requirements as a school district;

(f)
Comply with the annual performance report under RCW 28A.320.205;

(g)
Report at least annually to its sponsor and to parents of children enrolled at
the charter school on progress toward the student performance goals specified
in the charter; and

(h)
Comply with the open public meetings act in chapter 42.30 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
ADMISSION REQUIREMENTS. (1) A charter school must enroll all students who
submit a timely application. If capacity is insufficient to enroll all
students who submit a timely application, the charter school must give
enrollment priority to students who reside within the school district
boundaries in which the charter school is physically located. Priority also
must be given to siblings of students who are currently enrolled in the
school. Students must be selected through an equitable selection process, such
as a lottery, to fill any remaining spaces. Schools that convert to charter
schools must also give priority to the students who are currently enrolled in
school.

(2)
A charter school may not limit admission based on race, religion, ethnicity,
national origin, gender, income level, intellectual ability, disabling
condition, proficiency in the English language, or athletic ability. A charter
school may limit admission to students within a given age group or grade level.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
CHARTER APPLICATION‑-CHARTERING PROCESS. (1) An applicant may apply to a
sponsor to establish a charter school as provided in this section.

(2)
An application for a charter school may be submitted to any qualified sponsor.

(3)
The local school district board of directors must hold a public hearing in the
school district on the application within sixty days of receipt of the
application. The school board must either accept or reject the application
within thirty days after the hearing. The thirty-day deadline for acceptance
or rejection of the charter school application may be extended for an
additional thirty days if both parties agree in writing.

(4)
If the local school board rejects the application, the school board must notify
the applicant in writing of the reasons for the rejection. The applicant may
submit a revised application for the school board's reconsideration. The
school board may provide assistance to improve the application. If the school
board rejects the application after submission of a revised application, the
school board must notify the applicant in writing of the reasons for the
rejection.

(5)
Sponsors other than school districts must comply with the procedures specified
in subsections (1) through (4) of this section for consideration of the charter
application. The sponsor is not bound by the school board's findings or
decision to deny the application.

(6)
The superintendent of public instruction shall maintain copies of all approved
charter applications. An applicant may obtain copies of those applications
from the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
APPLICATION REQUIREMENTS. The charter school application is a proposed
contract and must include:

(1)
The identification and description of the nonprofit corporation submitting the
application, including the names and descriptions of the individuals who will
operate the school;

(2)
The nonprofit corporation's proposed articles of incorporation, bylaws, and
most recent financial statement and balance sheet;

(3)
A mission statement for the proposed school, consistent with the description of
legislative intent in this chapter;

(4)
A description of the school's educational program, including curriculum and
instructional strategies;

(5)
A description of the school's admissions policy and marketing program,
including deadlines for applications or admission;

(6)
A description of student performance standards that must meet those determined
under RCW 28A.630.885, and be measured according to the assessment system
determined under RCW 28A.630.885;

(7)
A description of the plan for evaluating student performance and the procedures
for taking corrective action in the event that student performance at the
charter school falls below standards established in its charter;

(8)
A description of the financial plan for the school. The plan shall include:
(a) A proposed five-year budget of projected revenues and expenditures; (b) a
plan for starting the school; (c) a five-year facilities plan; (d) evidence
supporting student enrollment projections of at least twenty students; and (e)
a description of major contracts planned for equipment and services, leases,
improvements, purchases of real property, and insurance;

(9)
A description of the proposed financial management procedures, including annual
audits of the school's financial and administrative operations, which shall
meet or exceed generally accepted standards of management and public
accounting;

(10)
An assessment of the school's potential legal liability and a description of
the types and limits of insurance coverage the nonprofit corporation plans to
obtain that are adequate. For purposes of this subsection, a liability policy
of between one million and five million dollars is required;

(11)
A description of the procedures to discipline and dismiss students; and

(12)
A description of procedures to assure the health and safety of students,
employees, and guests of the school and to comply with applicable federal and
state health and safety laws and regulations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9.
APPROVAL CRITERIA. A sponsor may approve an application for a charter school,
if in the sponsor's reasonable judgment, after exercising due diligence and
good faith, the sponsor or alternate sponsor finds:

(1)
The applicant is a public benefit nonprofit corporation and the individuals it
proposes to manage the school are qualified to operate a charter school and
implement the proposed educational program;

(2)
The mission statement is consistent with the description of legislative intent
and restrictions on charter school operations in this chapter;

(3)
The school's proposed educational program is free from religious or sectarian
influence;

(4)
The school's proposed educational program includes student academic performance
standards that meet those determined under RCW 28A.630.885 and are measured
according to the assessment system determined under RCW 28A.630.885;

(5)
The application includes a viable plan for evaluating pupil performance and
procedures for taking appropriate corrective action in the event that pupil
performance at the charter school falls below standards established in its
charter;

(6)
The school's educational program, including curriculum and instructional
strategies, has the potential to improve student performance as measured under
section 5 of this act;

(7)
The application includes school performance standards, which must meet those determined
under the state-wide accountability system adopted by the legislature pursuant
to RCW 28A.630.885(3)(h)(i);

(8)
The school's admissions policy and marketing program is consistent with state
and federal law;

(9)
The financial plan for the school is designed to reasonably support the charter
school's educational program based on a review of the proposed five-year budget
of projected revenues, expenditures, and facilities;

(10)
The school's financial and administrative operations, including its annual
audits, meet or exceed generally accepted standards of accounting and
management;

(11)
The assessment of the school's potential legal liability, and the types and
limits of insurance coverage the school plans to obtain, are adequate. For
purposes of this subsection, a liability policy of between one million and five
million dollars is required;

(12)
The procedures the school plans to follow for discipline and dismissal of
students are reasonable and comply with federal law;

(13)
The procedures the school plans to follow to assure the health and safety of
students, employees, and guests of the school comply with applicable state and
federal health and safety laws and regulations; and

(14)
The public benefit nonprofit corporation has been approved or conditionally
approved by the internal revenue service for tax exempt status under section
501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10.
CHARTER AGREEMENT‑-AMENDMENT. (1) A charter application approved by a
sponsor with any changes constitutes a charter.

(2)
A charter may be amended during its term at the request of the charter school
board of directors and on the approval of the sponsor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11.
CHARTER RENEWAL AND REVOCATION. (1) An approved plan to establish a charter
school is effective for five years from the first day of operation. At the
conclusion of the first three years of operation, the charter school may apply
to the sponsor for renewal. A request for renewal must be submitted no later
than six months before the expiration of the charter.

(2)
A charter school renewal application must include:

(a)
A report on the progress of the charter school in achieving the goals, student
performance standards, and other terms of the charter; and

(b)
A financial statement that discloses the costs of administration, instruction,
and other expenditure objects and activities of the charter school.

(3)
The sponsor may reject the application for renewal if any of the following
occurred:

(a)
The charter school materially violated its contract with the sponsor, as set
forth in the charter;

(b)
The students enrolled in the charter school failed to meet student performance
standards identified in the charter;

(c)
The charter school failed to meet generally accepted standards of fiscal
management; or

(d)
The charter school violated provisions in law that have not been waived in
accordance with this chapter.

(4)
A sponsor shall give written notice of its intent not to renew the charter
school's request for renewal to the charter school within one month of the
request for renewal to allow the charter school an opportunity to correct
identified deficiencies in its operation. At the request of the board of
directors of the charter school, the sponsor shall review its decision for
nonrenewal after the charter school has corrected any identified deficiencies.

(5)
The sponsor may revoke a previously approved charter before the expiration of
the term of the charter, and before application for renewal, for any of the
reasons specified in subsection (3) of this section. Except in cases of
emergency where the health and safety of children are at risk, a charter may
not be revoked unless the sponsor first provides written notice of the specific
violations alleged, a public hearing, and a reasonable opportunity for the
charter school to correct the identified areas of concern. The sponsor of a
charter school shall provide for an appeal process upon a determination by the
sponsor that grounds exist to revoke a charter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12.
FUNDING. (1) When the sponsor is a school district:

(a)
For purposes of funding, students in charter schools shall be considered
students of the sponsoring district for general fund apportionment purposes.
The sponsoring school district shall provide funding for charter schools on a
per student basis in amounts the schools would have received if the students
were enrolled in a noncharter school in the district except that a charter
school shall not generate eligibility for small school assistance. Funding for
charter schools shall include regular apportionment, categorical, and nonbasic
education funds, as appropriate and shall be based on enrollment and other
financial information submitted by the charter school to the school district as
is required to determine state apportionment amounts;

(b)
Local levy moneys approved by the voters before the effective date of a charter
between a school district and an applicant shall not be allocated to a charter
school unless the sponsoring school district determines it has received
sufficient authority from voters to allocate maintenance and operation excess
tax levy money to the charter school. For levies approved after the effective
date of a charter, charter schools shall be included in levy planning, budgets,
and funding distribution in the same manner as other schools in the district;
and

(c)
A charter school is eligible for state matching funds for common school
construction if a sponsoring school district determines it has received voter
approval of local capital funds for the project.

(2)
Public schools converting to charter schools shall receive funding in the same
manner as other charter schools.

(3)
If the sponsor is not a school district, students in the charter school shall
be considered students of the district in which the charter school is located
for general fund apportionment purposes. The superintendent of public
instruction shall provide funding for charter schools on a per student basis in
amounts the schools would have received if the students were enrolled in a
noncharter school in the district except that a charter school shall not
generate eligibility for small school assistance. The funding shall include
regular apportionment, categorical, and nonbasic education funds and shall be
based on enrollment and other financial information submitted by the charter
school to the school district as is required to determine state apportionment
amounts.

(4)
No local levy money may be allocated to a charter school if the charter school
is sponsored by an alternate sponsor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13.
ADMINISTRATION FEE. To offset costs of oversight and administering the
charter, a sponsor may retain up to three percent of state funding and local
excess levy funding, if applicable, that is being driven to the charter
school. Except for the administration fee in this section, no other offsets or
deductions are allowed, whether for central administration or other off-site
support services, from a charter school's per-pupil share of state
appropriations, local levies, or other funds, unless the charter school has
contracted with a school district to obtain specific additional services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14.
CHARTER SCHOOL ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT. The charter school assistance account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from
appropriations shall be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the
account may be used only to provide financial grants to approved charter
schools for start-up costs. Charter schools may receive up to two hundred
fifty dollars per student for start-up costs. Only the superintendent of
public instruction or the superintendent's designee may authorize expenditures
from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures. Start-up moneys
shall be distributed to schools with approved charters on a first-come,
first-served basis.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. RULES‑-GRANTS.
The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to
implement section 14 of this act.

If
an applicant for a charter school receives a grant under section 14 of this act
and fails to begin operating a charter school within the next eighteen months,
the applicant must immediately reimburse the office of the superintendent of
public instruction for the amount of the grant.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16.
LEAVES OF ABSENCE. If a school district employee makes a written request for
an extended leave of absence to work at a charter school, the school district
shall grant the request. The school district may require that the request for
a leave be made up to ninety days before the employee would otherwise have to
report for duty. The leave shall be granted for up to three years. If the
employee returns to the school district within the three-year period, the
employee shall be hired before the district hires anyone else with fewer years
of service, with respect to any position for which the returning employee is certificated
or otherwise qualified.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17. STUDY
OF CHARTER SCHOOLS. The Washington institute of public policy shall study the
implementation and effectiveness of this act. The institute shall make
recommendations to the legislature about the effectiveness of charter schools
and the impact of charter schools. The institute shall also recommend changes
to this chapter including improvements that could be made to the application
and approval process. A preliminary report of the study is due to the
legislature by September 1, 2001, and a final report is due September 1, 2003.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18.
NUMBER OF CHARTER SCHOOLS. (1) The maximum number of charters that can be
granted under this chapter is twenty in any given year commencing July 1, 1999,
for the first four years. These annual allocations shall be cumulative so that
if the maximum is not reached in any given year the maximum shall be increased
accordingly for the successive years.

(2)
A sponsor may not sponsor a charter school in a school district with a student
enrollment of less than one thousand students until June 1, 2001.

(3)
For purposes of monitoring compliance with this section and providing
information to new charter school applicants, the superintendent of public
instruction shall maintain a running total of the projected and actual
enrollment at charter schools and the number of charters granted.

(4)
For purposes of implementing this subsection, a sponsor shall notify the office
of the superintendent of public instruction when it receives a charter school
application, when it approves a charter school, and when a charter school is
terminated.

(5)
The maximum number of charter schools allowed under this section does not
include public schools converting to charter schools.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19. A
new section is added to chapter 41.56 RCW to read as follows:

This
chapter applies to charter schools as defined in section 2 of this act and the
charter school's employees included in the bargaining unit. The bargaining
unit of employees of charter schools must be limited to the employees of the
charter school and must be separate from other bargaining units in the school
district or educational service district.

This
section, designating charter schools as employers and charter schools as
members under the teachers' retirement systems and the public employees'
retirement systems, takes effect only if the department of retirement systems
receives determinations from the internal revenue service and the United States
department of labor that such participation does not jeopardize the status of
these retirement systems as governmental plans under the federal employees'
retirement income security act and the internal revenue code.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 20. A
new section is added to chapter 41.59 RCW to read as follows:

This
chapter applies to collective bargaining agreements between charter schools and
the employees of charter schools included in the bargaining unit. The
bargaining unit of employees of charter schools must be limited to the
employees of the charter school and must be separate from other bargaining
units in the school district.

This
section, designating charter schools as employers and charter schools as
members under the teachers' retirement systems and the public employees'
retirement systems, takes effect only if the department of retirement systems
receives determinations from the internal revenue service and the United States
department of labor that such participation does not jeopardize the status of
these retirement systems as governmental plans under the federal employees'
retirement income security act and the internal revenue code.

Sec.
21. RCW
41.59.080 and 1998 c 244 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The
commission, upon proper application for certification as an exclusive
bargaining representative or upon petition for change of unit definition by the
employer or any employee organization within the time limits specified in RCW
41.59.070(3), and after hearing upon reasonable notice, shall determine the
unit appropriate for the purpose of collective bargaining. In determining,
modifying or combining the bargaining unit, the commission shall consider the
duties, skills, and working conditions of the educational employees; the
history of collective bargaining; the extent of organization among the
educational employees; and the desire of the educational employees; except
that:

(1)
A unit including nonsupervisory educational employees shall not be considered
appropriate unless it includes all such nonsupervisory educational employees of
the employer; and

(2)
A unit that includes only supervisors may be considered appropriate if a
majority of the employees in such category indicate by vote that they desire to
be included in such a unit; and

(3)
A unit that includes only principals and assistant principals may be considered
appropriate if a majority of such employees indicate by vote that they desire
to be included in such a unit; and

(4)
A unit that includes both principals and assistant principals and other
supervisory employees may be considered appropriate if a majority of the
employees in each category indicate by vote that they desire to be included in
such a unit; and

(5)
A unit that includes supervisors and/or principals and assistant principals and
nonsupervisory educational employees may be considered appropriate if a
majority of the employees in each category indicate by vote that they desire to
be included in such a unit; and

(6)
A unit that includes only employees in vocational-technical institutes or
occupational skill centers may be considered to constitute an appropriate
bargaining unit if the history of bargaining in any such school district so
justifies; and

(7)
Notwithstanding the definition of collective bargaining, a unit that contains
only supervisors and/or principals and assistant principals shall be limited in
scope of bargaining to compensation, hours of work, and the number of days of
work in the annual employment contracts; and

(8)
The bargaining unit of certificated employees of school districts, educational
service districts, or institutions of higher education that are education
providers under chapter 28A.193 RCW must be limited to the employees working as
education providers to juveniles in each adult correctional facility maintained
by the department of corrections and must be separate from other bargaining
units in school districts, educational service districts, or institutions of
higher education; and

(9)
The bargaining unit for employees of charter schools as defined in section 2 of
this act must be limited to the employees of the charter school and must be
separate from other bargaining units in the school district or educational
service district.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 22.
CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this chapter do not constitute any part of
the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 23.
Sections 1 through 18 and 22 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 28A
RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 24. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 25. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 26. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 1999, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

---
END ---