BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
7.80.130 and 1987 c 456 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
An order entered after the receipt of a response which does not contest the
determination, or after it has been established at a hearing that the civil
infraction was committed, or after a hearing for the purpose of explaining
mitigating circumstances is civil in nature.

(2)
The court may waive, reduce, or suspend the monetary penalty prescribed for the
civil infraction. If the court determines that a person has insufficient funds
to pay the monetary penalty, the court may order performance of a number of
hours of community ((service)) restitution in lieu of a monetary
penalty, at the rate of the then state minimum wage per hour.

Sec.
2. RCW
7.80.160 and 1989 c 373 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person who fails to sign a notice of civil infraction is guilty of a
misdemeanor.

(2)
Any person willfully violating his or her written and signed promise to appear
in court or his or her written and signed promise to respond to a notice of
civil infraction is guilty of a misdemeanor regardless of the disposition of
the notice of civil infraction. A written promise to appear in court or a
written promise to respond to a notice of civil infraction may be complied with
by an appearance by counsel.

(3) A person who willfully fails to pay a monetary penalty or to
perform community ((service)) restitution as required by a court
under this chapter may be found in contempt of court as provided in chapter
7.21 RCW.

Sec.
3. RCW
7.84.110 and 1987 c 380 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
An order entered after the receipt of a response which does not contest the
determination, or after it has been established at a hearing that the
infraction was committed, or after a hearing for the purpose of explaining
mitigating circumstances, is civil in nature.

(2)
The court may, in its discretion, waive, reduce, or suspend the monetary
penalty prescribed for the infraction. At the person's request, the court may
order performance of a number of hours of community ((service)) restitution
in lieu of a monetary penalty, at the rate of the then state minimum wage per
hour.

Sec.
4. RCW
7.84.130 and 1987 c 380 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Failure to pay a monetary penalty assessed by a court under the provisions of
this chapter is a misdemeanor under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(2)
Failure to complete community ((service)) restitution ordered by
a court under the provisions of this chapter is a misdemeanor under chapter
9A.20 RCW.

Sec.
5. RCW
9.94A.030 and 1998 c 290 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit,"
or "collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department
of corrections, means that the department is responsible for monitoring and
enforcing the offender's sentence with regard to the legal financial
obligation, receiving payment thereof from the offender, and, consistent with
current law, delivering daily the entire payment to the superior court clerk
without depositing it in a departmental account.

(2)
"Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.

(3)
"Community corrections officer" means an employee of the department
who is responsible for carrying out specific duties in supervision of sentenced
offenders and monitoring of sentence conditions.

(4)
"Community custody" means that portion of an inmate's sentence of
confinement in lieu of earned early release time or imposed pursuant to RCW
9.94A.120 (6), (8), or (10) served in the community subject to controls placed
on the inmate's movement and activities by the department of corrections.

(5)
"Community placement" means that period during which the offender is
subject to the conditions of community custody and/or postrelease supervision,
which begins either upon completion of the term of confinement (postrelease
supervision) or at such time as the offender is transferred to community
custody in lieu of earned early release. Community placement may consist of
entirely community custody, entirely postrelease supervision, or a combination
of the two.

(6)
"Community ((service)) restitution" means compulsory
service, without compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by
the offender.

(7)
"Community supervision" means a period of time during which a
convicted offender is subject to crime-related prohibitions and other sentence
conditions imposed by a court pursuant to this chapter or RCW 16.52.200(6) or
46.61.524. For first-time offenders, the supervision may include crime-related
prohibitions and other conditions imposed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.120(5). For
purposes of the interstate compact for out-of-state supervision of parolees and
probationers, RCW 9.95.270, community supervision is the functional equivalent
of probation and should be considered the same as probation by other states.

(8)
"Confinement" means total or partial confinement as defined in this
section.

(9)
"Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to Titles 10 or
13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of guilty, and acceptance of
a plea of guilty.

(10)
"Court-ordered legal financial obligation" means a sum of money that
is ordered by a superior court of the state of Washington for legal financial
obligations which may include restitution to the victim, statutorily imposed
crime victims' compensation fees as assessed pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court
costs, county or interlocal drug funds, court-appointed attorneys' fees, and
costs of defense, fines, and any other financial obligation that is assessed to
the offender as a result of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for vehicular
assault while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW
46.61.522(1)(b), or vehicular homicide while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), legal financial
obligations may also include payment to a public agency of the expense of an
emergency response to the incident resulting in the conviction, subject to the
provisions in RCW 38.52.430.

(11)
"Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court prohibiting
conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the crime for which the
offender has been convicted, and shall not be construed to mean orders directing
an offender affirmatively to participate in rehabilitative programs or to
otherwise perform affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts necessary to
monitor compliance with the order of a court may be required by the department.

(12)
"Criminal history" means the list of a defendant's prior convictions
and juvenile adjudications, whether in this state, in federal court, or
elsewhere. The history shall include, where known, for each conviction (a)
whether the defendant has been placed on probation and the length and terms
thereof; and (b) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and the length of
incarceration.

(13)
"Day fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing judge that equals
the difference between the offender's net daily income and the reasonable
obligations that the offender has for the support of the offender and any
dependents.

(14)
"Day reporting" means a program of enhanced supervision designed to
monitor the defendant's daily activities and compliance with sentence
conditions, and in which the defendant is required to report daily to a
specific location designated by the department or the sentencing judge.

(15)
"Department" means the department of corrections.

(16)
"Determinate sentence" means a sentence that states with exactitude
the number of actual years, months, or days of total confinement, of partial
confinement, of community supervision, the number of actual hours or days of
community ((service)) restitution work, or dollars or terms of a
legal financial obligation. The fact that an offender through "earned
early release" can reduce the actual period of confinement shall not
affect the classification of the sentence as a determinate sentence.

(17)
"Disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings of an
individual remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any amount
required by law to be withheld. For the purposes of this definition,
"earnings" means compensation paid or payable for personal services,
whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or otherwise, and,
notwithstanding any other provision of law making the payments exempt from
garnishment, attachment, or other process to satisfy a court-ordered legal
financial obligation, specifically includes periodic payments pursuant to
pension or retirement programs, or insurance policies of any type, but does not
include payments made under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020
and 50.40.050, or Title 74 RCW.

(18)
"Drug offense" means:

(a)
Any felony violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of a controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.401(d)) or forged prescription for a controlled substance
(RCW 69.50.403);

(b)
Any offense defined as a felony under federal law that relates to the
possession, manufacture, distribution, or transportation of a controlled
substance; or

(c)
Any out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state
would be a felony classified as a drug offense under (a) of this subsection.

(19)
"Escape" means:

(a)
Escape in the first degree (RCW 9A.76.110), escape in the second degree (RCW
9A.76.120), willful failure to return from furlough (RCW 72.66.060), willful
failure to return from work release (RCW 72.65.070), or willful failure to be
available for supervision by the department while in community custody (RCW
72.09.310); or

(b)
Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of
this state would be a felony classified as an escape under (a) of this
subsection.

(20)
"Felony traffic offense" means:

(a)
Vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW 46.61.522), eluding
a police officer (RCW 46.61.024), or felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW
46.52.020(4)); or

(b)
Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of
this state would be a felony classified as a felony traffic offense under (a)
of this subsection.

(21)
"Fines" means the requirement that the offender pay a specific sum of
money over a specific period of time to the court.

(22)
"First-time offender" means any person who is convicted of a felony
(a) not classified as a violent offense or a sex offense under this chapter, or
(b) that is not the manufacture, delivery, or possession with intent to
manufacture or deliver a controlled substance classified in Schedule I or II
that is a narcotic drug or flunitrazepam classified in Schedule IV, nor the
manufacture, delivery, or possession with intent to deliver methamphetamine,
its salts, isomers, and salts of its isomers as defined in RCW 69.50.206(d)(2),
nor the selling for profit of any controlled substance or counterfeit substance
classified in Schedule I, RCW 69.50.204, except leaves and flowering tops of
marihuana, who previously has never been convicted of a felony in this state,
federal court, or another state, and who has never participated in a program of
deferred prosecution for a felony offense.

(23)
"Most serious offense" means any of the following felonies or a
felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies, as now existing or
hereafter amended:

(a)
Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or criminal solicitation
of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A felony;

(b)
Assault in the second degree;

(c)
Assault of a child in the second degree;

(d)
Child molestation in the second degree;

(e)
Controlled substance homicide;

(f)
Extortion in the first degree;

(g)
Incest when committed against a child under age fourteen;

(h)
Indecent liberties;

(i)
Kidnapping in the second degree;

(j)
Leading organized crime;

(k)
Manslaughter in the first degree;

(l)
Manslaughter in the second degree;

(m)
Promoting prostitution in the first degree;

(n)
Rape in the third degree;

(o)
Robbery in the second degree;

(p)
Sexual exploitation;

(q)
Vehicular assault;

(r)
Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by
any person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as
defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless
manner;

(s)
Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual motivation, as
"sexual motivation" is defined under this section;

(t)
Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW 9.94A.125;

(u)
Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to December 2, 1993, that is
comparable to a most serious offense under this subsection, or any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a most serious offense under this subsection;

(v)(i)
A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.88.100(1) (a), (b), and
(c), chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess. as it existed until July 1, 1979,
RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as it existed from July 1, 1979, until June
11, 1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11,
1986, until July 1, 1988;

(ii)
A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1)(c) as it
existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988, if: (A) The crime was
committed against a child under the age of fourteen; or (B) the relationship
between the victim and perpetrator is included in the definition of indecent
liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through
July 27, 1997, or RCW 9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993,
through July 27, 1997.

(24)
"Nonviolent offense" means an offense which is not a violent offense.

(25)
"Offender" means a person who has committed a felony established by
state law and is eighteen years of age or older or is less than eighteen years
of age but whose case is under superior court jurisdiction under RCW 13.04.030
or has been transferred by the appropriate juvenile court to a criminal court
pursuant to RCW 13.40.110. Throughout this chapter, the terms
"offender" and "defendant" are used interchangeably.

(26)
"Partial confinement" means confinement for no more than one year in
a facility or institution operated or utilized under contract by the state or
any other unit of government, or, if home detention or work crew has been
ordered by the court, in an approved residence, for a substantial portion of
each day with the balance of the day spent in the community. Partial
confinement includes work release, home detention, work crew, and a combination
of work crew and home detention as defined in this section.

(27)
"Persistent offender" is an offender who:

(a)(i)
Has been convicted in this state of any felony considered a most serious
offense; and

(ii)
Has, before the commission of the offense under (a) of this subsection, been
convicted as an offender on at least two separate occasions, whether in this
state or elsewhere, of felonies that under the laws of this state would be
considered most serious offenses and would be included in the offender score under
RCW 9.94A.360; provided that of the two or more previous convictions, at least
one conviction must have occurred before the commission of any of the other
most serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or

(b)(i)
Has been convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape of a child in the
first degree, child molestation in the first degree, rape in the second degree,
rape of a child in the second degree, or indecent liberties by forcible
compulsion; (B) murder in the first degree, murder in the second degree,
homicide by abuse, kidnapping in the first degree, kidnapping in the second
degree, assault in the first degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a
child in the first degree, or burglary in the first degree, with a finding of
sexual motivation; or (C) an attempt to commit any crime listed in this
subsection (27)(b)(i); and

(ii)
Has, before the commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this subsection, been
convicted as an offender on at least one occasion, whether in this state or
elsewhere, of an offense listed in (b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for
rape of a child in the first degree constitutes a conviction under subsection
(27)(b)(i) only when the offender was sixteen years of age or older when the
offender committed the offense. A conviction for rape of a child in the second
degree constitutes a conviction under subsection (27)(b)(i) only when the
offender was eighteen years of age or older when the offender committed the
offense.

(28)
"Postrelease supervision" is that portion of an offender's community
placement that is not community custody.

(29)
"Restitution" means the requirement that the offender pay a specific
sum of money over a specific period of time to the court as payment of
damages. The sum may include both public and private costs. The imposition of
a restitution order does not preclude civil redress.

(30)
"Serious traffic offense" means:

(a)
Driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.502), actual physical control while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504), reckless driving (RCW 46.61.500), or
hit-and-run an attended vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5)); or

(b)
Any federal, out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be classified as a serious traffic offense
under (a) of this subsection.

(31)
"Serious violent offense" is a subcategory of violent offense and
means:

(a)
Murder in the first degree, homicide by abuse, murder in the second degree,
manslaughter in the first degree, assault in the first degree, kidnapping in
the first degree, or rape in the first degree, assault of a child in the first
degree, or an attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit
one of these felonies; or

(b)
Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of
this state would be a felony classified as a serious violent offense under (a)
of this subsection.

(32)
"Sentence range" means the sentencing court's discretionary range in
imposing a nonappealable sentence.

(33)
"Sex offense" means:

(a)
A felony that is a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW or RCW 9A.64.020 or 9.68A.090
or a felony that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, criminal
solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit such crimes;

(b)
A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.127 or 13.40.135;
or

(c)
Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of
this state would be a felony classified as a sex offense under (a) of this
subsection.

(34)
"Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes for which the
defendant committed the crime was for the purpose of his or her sexual
gratification.

(35)
"Total confinement" means confinement inside the physical boundaries
of a facility or institution operated or utilized under contract by the state
or any other unit of government for twenty-four hours a day, or pursuant to RCW
72.64.050 and 72.64.060.

(36)
"Transition training" means written and verbal instructions and
assistance provided by the department to the offender during the two weeks
prior to the offender's successful completion of the work ethic camp program.
The transition training shall include instructions in the offender's
requirements and obligations during the offender's period of community custody.

(37)
"Victim" means any person who has sustained emotional, psychological,
physical, or financial injury to person or property as a direct result of the
crime charged.

(38)
"Violent offense" means:

(a)
Any of the following felonies, as now existing or hereafter amended: Any
felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an attempt to commit a
class A felony, criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a
class A felony, manslaughter in the first degree, manslaughter in the second
degree, indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion, kidnapping in
the second degree, arson in the second degree, assault in the second degree,
assault of a child in the second degree, extortion in the first degree, robbery
in the second degree, drive-by shooting, vehicular assault, and vehicular
homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW
46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;

(b)
Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1,
1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a violent offense in (a) of
this subsection; and

(c)
Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of
this state would be a felony classified as a violent offense under (a) or (b)
of this subsection.

(39)
"Work crew" means a program of partial confinement consisting of
civic improvement tasks for the benefit of the community of not less than
thirty-five hours per week that complies with RCW 9.94A.135. The civic
improvement tasks shall have minimal negative impact on existing private
industries or the labor force in the county where the service or labor is
performed. The civic improvement tasks shall not affect employment
opportunities for people with developmental disabilities contracted through
sheltered workshops as defined in RCW 82.04.385. Only those offenders
sentenced to a facility operated or utilized under contract by a county or the
state are eligible to participate on a work crew. Offenders sentenced for a
sex offense as defined in subsection (33) of this section are not eligible for
the work crew program.

(40)
"Work ethic camp" means an alternative incarceration program designed
to reduce recidivism and lower the cost of corrections by requiring offenders
to complete a comprehensive array of real-world job and vocational experiences,
character-building work ethics training, life management skills development,
substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling, literacy training, and basic adult
education.

(41)
"Work release" means a program of partial confinement available to
offenders who are employed or engaged as a student in a regular course of study
at school. Participation in work release shall be conditioned upon the
offender attending work or school at regularly defined hours and abiding by the
rules of the work release facility.

(42)
"Home detention" means a program of partial confinement available to
offenders wherein the offender is confined in a private residence subject to
electronic surveillance.

Sec.
6. RCW
9.94A.040 and 1997 c 365 s 2 and 1997 c 338 s 3 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
A sentencing guidelines commission is established as an agency of state
government.

(2)
The legislature finds that the commission, having accomplished its original statutory
directive to implement this chapter, and having expertise in sentencing
practice and policies, shall:

(a)
Evaluate state sentencing policy, to include whether the sentencing ranges and
standards are consistent with and further:

(i)
The purposes of this chapter as defined in RCW 9.94A.010; and

(ii)
The intent of the legislature to emphasize confinement for the violent offender
and alternatives to confinement for the nonviolent offender.

The
commission shall provide the governor and the legislature with its evaluation
and recommendations under this subsection not later than December 1, 1996, and
every two years thereafter;

(b)
Recommend to the legislature revisions or modifications to the standard
sentence ranges, state sentencing policy, prosecuting standards, and other
standards. If implementation of the revisions or modifications would result in
exceeding the capacity of correctional facilities, then the commission shall
accompany its recommendation with an additional list of standard sentence
ranges which are consistent with correction capacity;

(c)
Study the existing criminal code and from time to time make recommendations to
the legislature for modification;

(d)(i)
Serve as a clearinghouse and information center for the collection, preparation,
analysis, and dissemination of information on state and local adult and
juvenile sentencing practices; (ii) develop and maintain a computerized adult
and juvenile sentencing information system by individual superior court judge
consisting of offender, offense, history, and sentence information entered from
judgment and sentence forms for all adult felons; and (iii) conduct ongoing
research regarding adult and juvenile sentencing guidelines, use of total
confinement and alternatives to total confinement, plea bargaining, and other
matters relating to the improvement of the adult criminal justice system and
the juvenile justice system;

(e)
Assume the powers and duties of the juvenile disposition standards commission
after June 30, 1996;

(f)
Evaluate the effectiveness of existing disposition standards and related
statutes in implementing policies set forth in RCW 13.40.010 generally,
specifically review the guidelines relating to the confinement of minor and
first offenders as well as the use of diversion, and review the application of
current and proposed juvenile sentencing standards and guidelines for potential
adverse impacts on the sentencing outcomes of racial and ethnic minority youth;

(g)
Solicit the comments and suggestions of the juvenile justice community
concerning disposition standards, and make recommendations to the legislature
regarding revisions or modifications of the standards. The evaluations shall
be submitted to the legislature on December 1 of each odd-numbered year. The
department of social and health services shall provide the commission with
available data concerning the implementation of the disposition standards and
related statutes and their effect on the performance of the department's
responsibilities relating to juvenile offenders, and with recommendations for
modification of the disposition standards. The office of the administrator for
the courts shall provide the commission with available data on diversion and
dispositions of juvenile offenders under chapter 13.40 RCW; and

(h)
Not later than December 1, 1997, and at least every two years thereafter, based
on available information, report to the governor and the legislature on:

(i)
Racial disproportionality in juvenile and adult sentencing;

(ii)
The capacity of state and local juvenile and adult facilities and resources;
and

(iii)
Recidivism information on adult and juvenile offenders.

(3)
Each of the commission's recommended standard sentence ranges shall include one
or more of the following: Total confinement, partial confinement, community
supervision, community ((service)) restitution, and a fine.

(4)
The standard sentence ranges of total and partial confinement under this
chapter are subject to the following limitations:

(a)
If the maximum term in the range is one year or less, the minimum term in the
range shall be no less than one-third of the maximum term in the range, except
that if the maximum term in the range is ninety days or less, the minimum term
may be less than one-third of the maximum;

(b)
If the maximum term in the range is greater than one year, the minimum term in
the range shall be no less than seventy-five percent of the maximum term in the
range, except that for murder in the second degree in seriousness category XIII
under RCW 9.94A.310, the minimum term in the range shall be no less than fifty
percent of the maximum term in the range; and

(c)
The maximum term of confinement in a range may not exceed the statutory maximum
for the crime as provided in RCW 9A.20.021.

(5)
The commission shall exercise its duties under this section in conformity with
chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec.
7. RCW
9.94A.120 and 1998 c 260 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

When
a person is convicted of a felony, the court shall impose punishment as
provided in this section.

(1)
Except as authorized in subsections (2), (4), (5), (6), and (8) of this
section, the court shall impose a sentence within the sentence range for the
offense.

(2)
The court may impose a sentence outside the standard sentence range for that
offense if it finds, considering the purpose of this chapter, that there are
substantial and compelling reasons justifying an exceptional sentence.

(3)
Whenever a sentence outside the standard range is imposed, the court shall set
forth the reasons for its decision in written findings of fact and conclusions
of law. A sentence outside the standard range shall be a determinate sentence.

(4)
A persistent offender shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement for
life without the possibility of parole or, when authorized by RCW 10.95.030 for
the crime of aggravated murder in the first degree, sentenced to death,
notwithstanding the maximum sentence under any other law. An offender
convicted of the crime of murder in the first degree shall be sentenced to a
term of total confinement not less than twenty years. An offender convicted of
the crime of assault in the first degree or assault of a child in the first
degree where the offender used force or means likely to result in death or
intended to kill the victim shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement
not less than five years. An offender convicted of the crime of rape in the
first degree shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement not less than
five years. The foregoing minimum terms of total confinement are mandatory and
shall not be varied or modified as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
In addition, all offenders subject to the provisions of this subsection shall
not be eligible for community custody, earned early release time, furlough,
home detention, partial confinement, work crew, work release, or any other form
of early release as defined under RCW 9.94A.150 (1), (2), (3), (5), (7), or
(8), or any other form of authorized leave of absence from the correctional
facility while not in the direct custody of a corrections officer or officers
during such minimum terms of total confinement except in the case of an
offender in need of emergency medical treatment or for the purpose of
commitment to an inpatient treatment facility in the case of an offender
convicted of the crime of rape in the first degree.

(5)
In sentencing a first-time offender the court may waive the imposition of a
sentence within the sentence range and impose a sentence which may include up
to ninety days of confinement in a facility operated or utilized under contract
by the county and a requirement that the offender refrain from committing new
offenses. The sentence may also include up to two years of community
supervision, which, in addition to crime-related prohibitions, may include
requirements that the offender perform any one or more of the following:

(a)
Devote time to a specific employment or occupation;

(b)
Undergo available outpatient treatment for up to two years, or inpatient
treatment not to exceed the standard range of confinement for that offense;

(c)
Pursue a prescribed, secular course of study or vocational training;

(d)
Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the
community corrections officer prior to any change in the offender's address or
employment;

(e)
Report as directed to the court and a community corrections officer; or

(f)
Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations as provided in RCW 9.94A.030
and/or perform community ((service)) restitution work.

(6)(a)
An offender is eligible for the special drug offender sentencing alternative
if:

(i)
The offender is convicted of the manufacture, delivery, or possession with
intent to manufacture or deliver a controlled substance classified in Schedule
I or II that is a narcotic drug or a felony that is, under chapter 9A.28 RCW or
RCW 69.50.407, a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal
conspiracy to commit such crimes, and the violation does not involve a sentence
enhancement under RCW 9.94A.310 (3) or (4);

(ii)
The offender has no prior convictions for a felony in this state, another
state, or the United States; and

(iii)
The offense involved only a small quantity of the particular controlled
substance as determined by the judge upon consideration of such factors as the
weight, purity, packaging, sale price, and street value of the controlled
substance.

(b)
If the midpoint of the standard range is greater than one year and the
sentencing judge determines that the offender is eligible for this option and
that the offender and the community will benefit from the use of the special
drug offender sentencing alternative, the judge may waive imposition of a
sentence within the standard range and impose a sentence that must include a
period of total confinement in a state facility for one-half of the midpoint of
the standard range. During incarceration in the state facility, offenders
sentenced under this subsection shall undergo a comprehensive substance abuse
assessment and receive, within available resources, treatment services
appropriate for the offender. The treatment services shall be designed by the
division of alcohol and substance abuse of the department of social and health
services, in cooperation with the department of corrections. If the midpoint
of the standard range is twenty-four months or less, no more than three months
of the sentence may be served in a work release status. The court shall also
impose one year of concurrent community custody and community supervision that
must include appropriate outpatient substance abuse treatment, crime-related
prohibitions including a condition not to use illegal controlled substances,
and a requirement to submit to urinalysis or other testing to monitor that
status. The court may require that the monitoring for controlled substances be
conducted by the department or by a treatment alternatives to street crime
program or a comparable court or agency-referred program. The offender may be
required to pay thirty dollars per month while on community custody to offset
the cost of monitoring. In addition, the court shall impose three or more of
the following conditions:

(i)
Devote time to a specific employment or training;

(ii)
Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the
community corrections officer before any change in the offender's address or
employment;

(iii)
Report as directed to a community corrections officer;

(iv)
Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations;

(v)
Perform community ((service)) restitution work;

(vi)
Stay out of areas designated by the sentencing judge.

(c)
If the offender violates any of the sentence conditions in (b) of this
subsection, the department shall impose sanctions administratively, with notice
to the prosecuting attorney and the sentencing court. Upon motion of the court
or the prosecuting attorney, a violation hearing shall be held by the court.
If the court finds that conditions have been willfully violated, the court may
impose confinement consisting of up to the remaining one-half of the midpoint
of the standard range. All total confinement served during the period of
community custody shall be credited to the offender, regardless of whether the
total confinement is served as a result of the original sentence, as a result
of a sanction imposed by the department, or as a result of a violation found by
the court. The term of community supervision shall be tolled by any period of
time served in total confinement as a result of a violation found by the court.

(d)
The department shall determine the rules for calculating the value of a day
fine based on the offender's income and reasonable obligations which the
offender has for the support of the offender and any dependents. These rules
shall be developed in consultation with the administrator for the courts, the
office of financial management, and the commission.

(7)
If a sentence range has not been established for the defendant's crime, the
court shall impose a determinate sentence which may include not more than one
year of confinement, community ((service)) restitution work, a
term of community supervision not to exceed one year, and/or other legal
financial obligations. The court may impose a sentence which provides more
than one year of confinement if the court finds, considering the purpose of
this chapter, that there are substantial and compelling reasons justifying an
exceptional sentence.

(8)(a)(i)
When an offender is convicted of a sex offense other than a violation of RCW
9A.44.050 or a sex offense that is also a serious violent offense and has no
prior convictions for a sex offense or any other felony sex offenses in this or
any other state, the sentencing court, on its own motion or the motion of the
state or the defendant, may order an examination to determine whether the
defendant is amenable to treatment.

The
report of the examination shall include at a minimum the following: The
defendant's version of the facts and the official version of the facts, the
defendant's offense history, an assessment of problems in addition to alleged
deviant behaviors, the offender's social and employment situation, and other
evaluation measures used. The report shall set forth the sources of the
evaluator's information.

The
examiner shall assess and report regarding the defendant's amenability to
treatment and relative risk to the community. A proposed treatment plan shall
be provided and shall include, at a minimum:

(A)
Frequency and type of contact between offender and therapist;

(B)
Specific issues to be addressed in the treatment and description of planned
treatment modalities;

(C)
Monitoring plans, including any requirements regarding living conditions,
lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by family members and others;

(D)
Anticipated length of treatment; and

(E)
Recommended crime-related prohibitions.

The
court on its own motion may order, or on a motion by the state shall order, a
second examination regarding the offender's amenability to treatment. The
evaluator shall be selected by the party making the motion. The defendant
shall pay the cost of any second examination ordered unless the court finds the
defendant to be indigent in which case the state shall pay the cost.

(ii)
After receipt of the reports, the court shall consider whether the offender and
the community will benefit from use of this special sex offender sentencing
alternative and consider the victim's opinion whether the offender should
receive a treatment disposition under this subsection. If the court determines
that this special sex offender sentencing alternative is appropriate, the court
shall then impose a sentence within the sentence range. If this sentence is
less than eleven years of confinement, the court may suspend the execution of
the sentence and impose the following conditions of suspension:

(A)
The court shall place the defendant on community custody for the length of the
suspended sentence or three years, whichever is greater, and require the
offender to comply with any conditions imposed by the department of corrections
under subsection (14) of this section;

(B)
The court shall order treatment for any period up to three years in duration.
The court in its discretion shall order outpatient sex offender treatment or
inpatient sex offender treatment, if available. A community mental health
center may not be used for such treatment unless it has an appropriate program
designed for sex offender treatment. The offender shall not change sex
offender treatment providers or treatment conditions without first notifying
the prosecutor, the community corrections officer, and the court, and shall not
change providers without court approval after a hearing if the prosecutor or
community corrections officer object to the change. In addition, as conditions
of the suspended sentence, the court may impose other sentence conditions
including up to six months of confinement, not to exceed the sentence range of
confinement for that offense, crime-related prohibitions, and requirements that
the offender perform any one or more of the following:

(I)
Devote time to a specific employment or occupation;

(II)
Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the
community corrections officer prior to any change in the offender's address or
employment;

(III)
Report as directed to the court and a community corrections officer;

(IV)
Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations as provided in RCW 9.94A.030,
perform community ((service)) restitution work, or any
combination thereof; or

(V)
Make recoupment to the victim for the cost of any counseling required as a
result of the offender's crime; and

(C)
Sex offenders sentenced under this special sex offender sentencing alternative
are not eligible to accrue any earned early release time while serving a
suspended sentence.

(iii)
The sex offender therapist shall submit quarterly reports on the defendant's
progress in treatment to the court and the parties. The report shall reference
the treatment plan and include at a minimum the following: Dates of
attendance, defendant's compliance with requirements, treatment activities, the
defendant's relative progress in treatment, and any other material as specified
by the court at sentencing.

(iv)
At the time of sentencing, the court shall set a treatment termination hearing
for three months prior to the anticipated date for completion of treatment.
Prior to the treatment termination hearing, the treatment professional and
community corrections officer shall submit written reports to the court and
parties regarding the defendant's compliance with treatment and monitoring
requirements, and recommendations regarding termination from treatment,
including proposed community supervision conditions. Either party may request
and the court may order another evaluation regarding the advisability of
termination from treatment. The defendant shall pay the cost of any additional
evaluation ordered unless the court finds the defendant to be indigent in which
case the state shall pay the cost. At the treatment termination hearing the
court may: (A) Modify conditions of community custody, and either (B) terminate
treatment, or (C) extend treatment for up to the remaining period of community
custody.

(v)
If a violation of conditions occurs during community custody, the department
shall either impose sanctions as provided for in RCW 9.94A.205(2)(a) or refer
the violation to the court and recommend revocation of the suspended sentence
as provided for in (a)(vi) of this subsection.

(vi)
The court may revoke the suspended sentence at any time during the period of
community custody and order execution of the sentence if: (A) The defendant
violates the conditions of the suspended sentence, or (B) the court finds that
the defendant is failing to make satisfactory progress in treatment. All
confinement time served during the period of community custody shall be credited
to the offender if the suspended sentence is revoked.

(vii)
Except as provided in (a)(viii) of this subsection, after July 1, 1991,
examinations and treatment ordered pursuant to this subsection shall only be
conducted by sex offender treatment providers certified by the department of
health pursuant to chapter 18.155 RCW.

(viii)
A sex offender therapist who examines or treats a sex offender pursuant to this
subsection (8) does not have to be certified by the department of health
pursuant to chapter 18.155 RCW if the court finds that: (A) The offender has
already moved to another state or plans to move to another state for reasons
other than circumventing the certification requirements; (B) no certified
providers are available for treatment within a reasonable geographical distance
of the offender's home; and (C) the evaluation and treatment plan comply with
this subsection (8) and the rules adopted by the department of health.

(ix)
For purposes of this subsection (8), "victim" means any person who
has sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to person
or property as a result of the crime charged. "Victim" also means a
parent or guardian of a victim who is a minor child unless the parent or
guardian is the perpetrator of the offense.

(x)
If the defendant was less than eighteen years of age when the charge was filed,
the state shall pay for the cost of initial evaluation and treatment.

(b)
When an offender commits any felony sex offense on or after July 1, 1987, and
is sentenced to a term of confinement of more than one year but less than six
years, the sentencing court may, on its own motion or on the motion of the
offender or the state, request the department of corrections to evaluate
whether the offender is amenable to treatment and the department may place the
offender in a treatment program within a correctional facility operated by the
department.

Except
for an offender who has been convicted of a violation of RCW 9A.44.040 or
9A.44.050, if the offender completes the treatment program before the
expiration of his or her term of confinement, the department of corrections may
request the court to convert the balance of confinement to community
supervision and to place conditions on the offender including crime-related prohibitions
and requirements that the offender perform any one or more of the following:

(i)
Devote time to a specific employment or occupation;

(ii)
Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the
community corrections officer prior to any change in the offender's address or
employment;

(iii)
Report as directed to the court and a community corrections officer;

(iv)
Undergo available outpatient treatment.

If
the offender violates any of the terms of his or her community supervision, the
court may order the offender to serve out the balance of his or her community
supervision term in confinement in the custody of the department of
corrections.

Nothing
in this subsection (8)(b) shall confer eligibility for such programs for offenders
convicted and sentenced for a sex offense committed prior to July 1, 1987.
This subsection (8)(b) does not apply to any crime committed after July 1,
1990.

(c)
Offenders convicted and sentenced for a sex offense committed prior to July 1,
1987, may, subject to available funds, request an evaluation by the department
of corrections to determine whether they are amenable to treatment. If the
offender is determined to be amenable to treatment, the offender may request
placement in a treatment program within a correctional facility operated by the
department. Placement in such treatment program is subject to available funds.

(9)(a)
When a court sentences a person to a term of total confinement to the custody
of the department of corrections for an offense categorized as a sex offense or
a serious violent offense committed after July 1, 1988, but before July 1,
1990, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the second degree,
any crime against a person where it is determined in accordance with RCW
9.94A.125 that the defendant or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon at
the time of commission, or any felony offense under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW
not sentenced under subsection (6) of this section, committed on or after July
1, 1988, the court shall in addition to the other terms of the sentence,
sentence the offender to a one-year term of community placement beginning
either upon completion of the term of confinement or at such time as the
offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of earned early release in
accordance with RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2). When the court sentences an
offender under this subsection to the statutory maximum period of confinement
then the community placement portion of the sentence shall consist entirely of
such community custody to which the offender may become eligible, in accordance
with RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2). Any period of community custody actually
served shall be credited against the community placement portion of the
sentence.

(b)
When a court sentences a person to a term of total confinement to the custody
of the department of corrections for an offense categorized as a sex offense
committed on or after July 1, 1990, but before June 6, 1996, a serious violent
offense, vehicular homicide, or vehicular assault, committed on or after July
1, 1990, the court shall in addition to other terms of the sentence, sentence
the offender to community placement for two years or up to the period of earned
early release awarded pursuant to RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2), whichever is
longer. The community placement shall begin either upon completion of the term
of confinement or at such time as the offender is transferred to community
custody in lieu of earned early release in accordance with RCW 9.94A.150 (1)
and (2). When the court sentences an offender under this subsection to the
statutory maximum period of confinement then the community placement portion of
the sentence shall consist entirely of the community custody to which the
offender may become eligible, in accordance with RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2).
Any period of community custody actually served shall be credited against the
community placement portion of the sentence. Unless a condition is waived by
the court, the terms of community placement for offenders sentenced pursuant to
this section shall include the following conditions:

(i)
The offender shall report to and be available for contact with the assigned
community corrections officer as directed;

(ii)
The offender shall work at department of corrections-approved education,
employment, and/or community ((service)) restitution;

(iii)
The offender shall not possess or consume controlled substances except pursuant
to lawfully issued prescriptions;

(iv)
The offender shall pay supervision fees as determined by the department of
corrections;

(v)
The residence location and living arrangements are subject to the prior
approval of the department of corrections during the period of community
placement; and

(vi)
The offender shall submit to affirmative acts necessary to monitor compliance
with the orders of the court as required by the department.

(c)
As a part of any sentence imposed under (a) or (b) of this subsection, the
court may also order any of the following special conditions:

(i)
The offender shall remain within, or outside of, a specified geographical
boundary;

(ii)
The offender shall not have direct or indirect contact with the victim of the
crime or a specified class of individuals;

(iii)
The offender shall participate in crime-related treatment or counseling
services;

(iv)
The offender shall not consume alcohol;

(v)
The offender shall comply with any crime-related prohibitions; or

(vi)
For an offender convicted of a felony sex offense against a minor victim after
June 6, 1996, the offender shall comply with any terms and conditions of
community placement imposed by the department of corrections relating to
contact between the sex offender and a minor victim or a child of similar age
or circumstance as a previous victim.

(d)
Prior to transfer to, or during, community placement, any conditions of
community placement may be removed or modified so as not to be more restrictive
by the sentencing court, upon recommendation of the department of corrections.

(10)(a)
When a court sentences a person to the custody of the department of corrections
for an offense categorized as a sex offense committed on or after June 6, 1996,
the court shall, in addition to other terms of the sentence, sentence the offender
to community custody for three years or up to the period of earned early
release awarded pursuant to RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2), whichever is longer.
The community custody shall begin either upon completion of the term of
confinement or at such time as the offender is transferred to community custody
in lieu of earned early release in accordance with RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2).

(b)
Unless a condition is waived by the court, the terms of community custody shall
be the same as those provided for in subsection (9)(b) of this section and may
include those provided for in subsection (9)(c) of this section. As part of
any sentence that includes a term of community custody imposed under this
subsection, the court shall also require the offender to comply with any
conditions imposed by the department of corrections under subsection (14) of
this section.

(c)
At any time prior to the completion of a sex offender's term of community
custody, if the court finds that public safety would be enhanced, the court may
impose and enforce an order extending any or all of the conditions imposed
pursuant to this section for a period up to the maximum allowable sentence for
the crime as it is classified in chapter 9A.20 RCW, regardless of the
expiration of the offender's term of community custody. If a violation of a
condition extended under this subsection occurs after the expiration of the
offender's term of community custody, it shall be deemed a violation of the
sentence for the purposes of RCW 9.94A.195 and may be punishable as contempt of
court as provided for in RCW 7.21.040.

(11)
If the court imposes a sentence requiring confinement of thirty days or less,
the court may, in its discretion, specify that the sentence be served on
consecutive or intermittent days. A sentence requiring more than thirty days
of confinement shall be served on consecutive days. Local jail administrators
may schedule court-ordered intermittent sentences as space permits.

(12)
If a sentence imposed includes payment of a legal financial obligation, the
sentence shall specify the total amount of the legal financial obligation owed,
and shall require the offender to pay a specified monthly sum toward that legal
financial obligation. Restitution to victims shall be paid prior to any other
payments of monetary obligations. Any legal financial obligation that is
imposed by the court may be collected by the department, which shall deliver
the amount paid to the county clerk for credit. The offender's compliance with
payment of legal financial obligations shall be supervised by the department
for ten years following the entry of the judgment and sentence or ten years
following the offender's release from total confinement. All monetary payments
ordered shall be paid no later than ten years after the last date of release
from confinement pursuant to a felony conviction or the date the sentence was
entered unless the superior court extends the criminal judgment an additional
ten years. If the legal financial obligations including crime victims' assessments
are not paid during the initial ten-year period, the superior court may extend
jurisdiction under the criminal judgment an additional ten years as provided in
RCW 9.94A.140, 9.94A.142, and 9.94A.145. If jurisdiction under the criminal
judgment is extended, the department is not responsible for supervision of the
offender during the subsequent period. Independent of the department, the
party or entity to whom the legal financial obligation is owed shall have the
authority to utilize any other remedies available to the party or entity to
collect the legal financial obligation. Nothing in this section makes the
department, the state, or any of its employees, agents, or other persons acting
on their behalf liable under any circumstances for the payment of these legal
financial obligations. If an order includes restitution as one of the monetary
assessments, the county clerk shall make disbursements to victims named in the
order.

(13)
Except as provided under RCW 9.94A.140(1) and 9.94A.142(1), a court may not
impose a sentence providing for a term of confinement or community supervision
or community placement which exceeds the statutory maximum for the crime as
provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(14)
All offenders sentenced to terms involving community supervision, community ((service))
restitution, community placement, or legal financial obligation shall be
under the supervision of the department of corrections and shall follow
explicitly the instructions and conditions of the department of corrections. The
department may require an offender to perform affirmative acts it deems
appropriate to monitor compliance with the conditions of the sentence imposed.

(a)
The instructions shall include, at a minimum, reporting as directed to a
community corrections officer, remaining within prescribed geographical
boundaries, notifying the community corrections officer of any change in the
offender's address or employment, and paying the supervision fee assessment.

(b)
For offenders sentenced to terms involving community custody for crimes
committed on or after June 6, 1996, the department may include, in addition to
the instructions in (a) of this subsection, any appropriate conditions of
supervision, including but not limited to, prohibiting the offender from having
contact with any other specified individuals or specific class of individuals.
The conditions authorized under this subsection (14)(b) may be imposed by the
department prior to or during an offender's community custody term. If a
violation of conditions imposed by the court or the department pursuant to
subsection (10) of this section occurs during community custody, it shall be
deemed a violation of community placement for the purposes of RCW 9.94A.207 and
shall authorize the department to transfer an offender to a more restrictive
confinement status as provided in RCW 9.94A.205. At any time prior to the
completion of a sex offender's term of community custody, the department may
recommend to the court that any or all of the conditions imposed by the court
or the department pursuant to subsection (10) of this section be continued
beyond the expiration of the offender's term of community custody as authorized
in subsection (10)(c) of this section.

The
department may require offenders to pay for special services rendered on or
after July 25, 1993, including electronic monitoring, day reporting, and
telephone reporting, dependent upon the offender's ability to pay. The
department may pay for these services for offenders who are not able to pay.

(15)
All offenders sentenced to terms involving community supervision, community ((service))
restitution, or community placement under the supervision of the
department of corrections shall not own, use, or possess firearms or
ammunition. Offenders who own, use, or are found to be in actual or
constructive possession of firearms or ammunition shall be subject to the
appropriate violation process and sanctions. "Constructive
possession" as used in this subsection means the power and intent to
control the firearm or ammunition. "Firearm" as used in this
subsection means a weapon or device from which a projectile may be fired by an
explosive such as gunpowder.

(16)
The sentencing court shall give the offender credit for all confinement time
served before the sentencing if that confinement was solely in regard to the
offense for which the offender is being sentenced.

(17)
A departure from the standards in RCW 9.94A.400 (1) and (2) governing whether
sentences are to be served consecutively or concurrently is an exceptional
sentence subject to the limitations in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
and may be appealed by the defendant or the state as set forth in RCW 9.94A.210
(2) through (6).

(18)
The court shall order restitution whenever the offender is convicted of a
felony that results in injury to any person or damage to or loss of property,
whether the offender is sentenced to confinement or placed under community
supervision, unless extraordinary circumstances exist that make restitution
inappropriate in the court's judgment. The court shall set forth the
extraordinary circumstances in the record if it does not order restitution.

(19)
As a part of any sentence, the court may impose and enforce an order that
relates directly to the circumstances of the crime for which the offender has
been convicted, prohibiting the offender from having any contact with other specified
individuals or a specific class of individuals for a period not to exceed the
maximum allowable sentence for the crime, regardless of the expiration of the
offender's term of community supervision or community placement.

(20)
The court may order an offender whose sentence includes community placement or
community supervision to undergo a mental status evaluation and to participate
in available outpatient mental health treatment, if the court finds that
reasonable grounds exist to believe that the offender is a mentally ill person
as defined in RCW 71.24.025, and that this condition is likely to have
influenced the offense. An order requiring mental status evaluation or
treatment must be based on a presentence report and, if applicable, mental status
evaluations that have been filed with the court to determine the offender's
competency or eligibility for a defense of insanity. The court may order
additional evaluations at a later date if deemed appropriate.

(21)
In any sentence of partial confinement, the court may require the defendant to
serve the partial confinement in work release, in a program of home detention,
on work crew, or in a combined program of work crew and home detention.

(22)
All court-ordered legal financial obligations collected by the department and
remitted to the county clerk shall be credited and paid where restitution is
ordered. Restitution shall be paid prior to any other payments of monetary
obligations.

Sec.
8. RCW
9.94A.200 and 1998 c 260 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If an offender violates any condition or requirement of a sentence, the court
may modify its order of judgment and sentence and impose further punishment in
accordance with this section.

(2)
In cases where conditions from a second or later sentence of community
supervision begin prior to the term of the second or later sentence, the court
shall treat a violation of such conditions as a violation of the sentence of
community supervision currently being served.

(3)
If an offender fails to comply with any of the requirements or conditions of a
sentence the following provisions apply:

(a)(i)
Following the violation, if the offender and the department make a stipulated
agreement, the department may impose sanctions such as work release, home
detention with electronic monitoring, work crew, community ((service)) restitution,
inpatient treatment, daily reporting, curfew, educational or counseling
sessions, supervision enhanced through electronic monitoring, jail time, or
other sanctions available in the community.

(ii)
Within seventy-two hours of signing the stipulated agreement, the department
shall submit a report to the court and the prosecuting attorney outlining the
violation or violations, and sanctions imposed. Within fifteen days of receipt
of the report, if the court is not satisfied with the sanctions, the court may
schedule a hearing and may modify the department's sanctions. If this occurs,
the offender may withdraw from the stipulated agreement.

(iii)
If the offender fails to comply with the sanction administratively imposed by
the department, the court may take action regarding the original
noncompliance. Offender failure to comply with the sanction administratively
imposed by the department may be considered an additional violation.

(b)
In the absence of a stipulated agreement, or where the court is not satisfied
with the department's sanctions as provided in (a) of this subsection, the
court, upon the motion of the state, or upon its own motion, shall require the
offender to show cause why the offender should not be punished for the
noncompliance. The court may issue a summons or a warrant of arrest for the
offender's appearance;

(c)
The state has the burden of showing noncompliance by a preponderance of the
evidence. If the court finds that the violation has occurred, it may order the
offender to be confined for a period not to exceed sixty days for each
violation, and may (i) convert a term of partial confinement to total
confinement, (ii) convert community ((service)) restitution
obligation to total or partial confinement, (iii) convert monetary obligations,
except restitution and the crime victim penalty assessment, to community ((service))
restitution hours at the rate of the state minimum wage as established
in RCW 49.46.020 for each hour of community ((service)) restitution,
or (iv) order one or more of the penalties authorized in (a)(i) of this
subsection. Any time served in confinement awaiting a hearing on noncompliance
shall be credited against any confinement order by the court;

(d)
If the court finds that the violation was not willful, the court may modify its
previous order regarding payment of legal financial obligations and regarding
community ((service)) restitution obligations; and

(e)
If the violation involves a failure to undergo or comply with mental status
evaluation and/or outpatient mental health treatment, the community corrections
officer shall consult with the treatment provider or proposed treatment
provider. Enforcement of orders concerning outpatient mental health treatment
must reflect the availability of treatment and must pursue the least
restrictive means of promoting participation in treatment. If the offender's
failure to receive care essential for health and safety presents a risk of
serious physical harm or probable harmful consequences, the civil detention and
commitment procedures of chapter 71.05 RCW shall be considered in preference to
incarceration in a local or state correctional facility.

(4)
The community corrections officer may obtain information from the offender's
mental health treatment provider on the offender's status with respect to
evaluation, application for services, registration for services, and compliance
with the supervision plan, without the offender's consent, as described under
RCW 71.05.630.

(5)
An offender under community placement or community supervision who is civilly
detained under chapter 71.05 RCW, and subsequently discharged or conditionally
released to the community, shall be under the supervision of the department of
corrections for the duration of his or her period of community placement or
community supervision. During any period of inpatient mental health treatment
that falls within the period of community placement or community supervision,
the inpatient treatment provider and the supervising community corrections
officer shall notify each other about the offender's discharge, release, and
legal status, and shall share other relevant information.

(6)
Nothing in this section prohibits the filing of escape charges if appropriate.

Sec.
9. RCW
9.94A.380 and 1988 c 157 s 4 and 1988 c 155 s 3 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

Alternatives
to total confinement are available for offenders with sentences of one year or
less. These alternatives include the following sentence conditions that the
court may order as substitutes for total confinement: (1) One day of partial
confinement may be substituted for one day of total confinement; (2) in
addition, for offenders convicted of nonviolent offenses only, eight hours of
community ((service)) restitution may be substituted for one day
of total confinement, with a maximum conversion limit of two hundred forty
hours or thirty days. Community ((service)) restitution hours
must be completed within the period of community supervision or a time period
specified by the court, which shall not exceed twenty-four months, pursuant to
a schedule determined by the department.

For
sentences of nonviolent offenders for one year or less, the court shall
consider and give priority to available alternatives to total confinement and
shall state its reasons in writing on the judgment and sentence form if the
alternatives are not used.

Sec.
10. RCW
9.94A.400 and 1998 c 235 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
Except as provided in (b) or (c) of this subsection, whenever a person is to be
sentenced for two or more current offenses, the sentence range for each current
offense shall be determined by using all other current and prior convictions as
if they were prior convictions for the purpose of the offender score:
PROVIDED, That if the court enters a finding that some or all of the current
offenses encompass the same criminal conduct then those current offenses shall
be counted as one crime. Sentences imposed under this subsection shall be
served concurrently. Consecutive sentences may only be imposed under the
exceptional sentence provisions of RCW 9.94A.120 and 9.94A.390(2)(g) or any
other provision of RCW 9.94A.390. "Same criminal conduct," as used in
this subsection, means two or more crimes that require the same criminal
intent, are committed at the same time and place, and involve the same victim.
This definition applies in cases involving vehicular assault or vehicular
homicide even if the victims occupied the same vehicle.

(b)
Whenever a person is convicted of two or more serious violent offenses, as
defined in RCW 9.94A.030, arising from separate and distinct criminal conduct,
the sentence range for the offense with the highest seriousness level under RCW
9.94A.320 shall be determined using the offender's prior convictions and other
current convictions that are not serious violent offenses in the offender score
and the sentence range for other serious violent offenses shall be determined
by using an offender score of zero. The sentence range for any offenses that
are not serious violent offenses shall be determined according to (a) of this
subsection. All sentences imposed under (b) of this subsection shall be served
consecutively to each other and concurrently with sentences imposed under (a)
of this subsection.

(c)
If an offender is convicted under RCW 9.41.040 for unlawful possession of a
firearm in the first or second degree and for the felony crimes of theft of a
firearm or possession of a stolen firearm, or both, then the offender shall
serve consecutive sentences for each conviction of the felony crimes listed in
this subsection, and for each firearm unlawfully possessed.

(2)(a)
Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, whenever a person while under
sentence of felony commits another felony and is sentenced to another term of
confinement, the latter term shall not begin until expiration of all prior
terms.

(b)
Whenever a second or later felony conviction results in community supervision
with conditions not currently in effect, under the prior sentence or sentences
of community supervision the court may require that the conditions of community
supervision contained in the second or later sentence begin during the
immediate term of community supervision and continue throughout the duration of
the consecutive term of community supervision.

(3)
Subject to subsections (1) and (2) of this section, whenever a person is
sentenced for a felony that was committed while the person was not under sentence
of a felony, the sentence shall run concurrently with any felony sentence which
has been imposed by any court in this or another state or by a federal court
subsequent to the commission of the crime being sentenced unless the court
pronouncing the current sentence expressly orders that they be served
consecutively.

(4)
Whenever any person granted probation under RCW 9.95.210 or 9.92.060, or both,
has the probationary sentence revoked and a prison sentence imposed, that
sentence shall run consecutively to any sentence imposed pursuant to this
chapter, unless the court pronouncing the subsequent sentence expressly orders
that they be served concurrently.

(5)
However, in the case of consecutive sentences, all periods of total confinement
shall be served before any partial confinement, community ((service)) restitution,
community supervision, or any other requirement or conditions of any of the
sentences. Except for exceptional sentences as authorized under RCW
9.94A.120(2), if two or more sentences that run consecutively include periods
of community supervision, the aggregate of the community supervision period
shall not exceed twenty-four months.

Sec.
11. RCW
10.98.040 and 1985 c 201 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Arrest and fingerprint form" means the reporting form prescribed by
the identification, child abuse, and criminal history section to initiate
compiling arrest and identification information.

(2)
"Chief law enforcement officer" includes the sheriff or director of
public safety of a county, the chief of police of a city or town, and chief
officers of other law enforcement agencies operating within the state.

(3)
"Department" means the department of corrections.

(4)
"Disposition" means the conclusion of a criminal proceeding at any
stage it occurs in the criminal justice system. Disposition includes but is
not limited to temporary or permanent outcomes such as charges dropped by
police, charges not filed by the prosecuting attorney, deferred prosecution,
defendant absconded, charges filed by the prosecuting attorney pending court
findings such as not guilty, dismissed, guilty, or guilty‑-case appealed
to higher court.

(5)
"Disposition report" means the reporting form prescribed by the
identification, child abuse, and criminal history section to report the
legal procedures taken after completing an arrest and fingerprint form. The
disposition report shall include but not be limited to the following types of
information:

(a)
The type of disposition;

(b)
The statutory citation for the arrests;

(c)
The sentence structure if the defendant was convicted of a felony;

(d)
The state identification number; and

(e)
Identification information and other information that is prescribed by the
identification, child abuse, and criminal history section.

(6)
"Fingerprints" means the fingerprints taken from arrested or charged
persons under the procedures prescribed by the Washington state patrol
identification, child abuse, and criminal history section.

(7)
"Prosecuting attorney" means the public or private attorney
prosecuting a criminal case.

(8)
"Section" refers to the Washington state patrol section on
identification, child abuse, and criminal history.

(9)
"Sentence structure" means itemizing the components of the felony
sentence. The sentence structure shall include but not be limited to the total
or partial confinement sentenced, and whether the sentence is prison or jail,
community supervision, fines, restitution, or community ((service)) restitution.

Sec.
12. RCW
13.40.020 and 1997 c 338 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

For
the purposes of this chapter:

(1)
"Community-based rehabilitation" means one or more of the following:
Employment; attendance of information classes; literacy classes; counseling,
outpatient substance abuse treatment programs, outpatient mental health
programs, anger management classes, education or outpatient treatment programs
to prevent animal cruelty, or other services; or attendance at school or other
educational programs appropriate for the juvenile as determined by the school
district. Placement in community-based rehabilitation programs is subject to
available funds;

(2)
Community-based sanctions may include one or more of the following:

(a)
A fine, not to exceed five hundred dollars;

(b)
Community ((service)) restitution not to exceed one hundred fifty
hours of ((service)) community restitution;

(3)
"Community ((service)) restitution" means compulsory
service, without compensation, performed for the benefit of the community by
the offender as punishment for committing an offense. Community ((service))
restitution may be performed through public or private organizations or
through work crews;

(4)
"Community supervision" means an order of disposition by the court of
an adjudicated youth not committed to the department or an order granting a
deferred disposition. A community supervision order for a single offense may
be for a period of up to two years for a sex offense as defined by RCW
9.94A.030 and up to one year for other offenses. As a mandatory condition of
any term of community supervision, the court shall order the juvenile to
refrain from committing new offenses. As a mandatory condition of community
supervision, the court shall order the juvenile to comply with the mandatory
school attendance provisions of chapter 28A.225 RCW and to inform the school of
the existence of this requirement. Community supervision is an individualized
program comprised of one or more of the following:

(a)
Community-based sanctions;

(b)
Community-based rehabilitation;

(c)
Monitoring and reporting requirements;

(d)
Posting of a probation bond;

(5)
"Confinement" means physical custody by the department of social and
health services in a facility operated by or pursuant to a contract with the
state, or physical custody in a detention facility operated by or pursuant to a
contract with any county. The county may operate or contract with vendors to
operate county detention facilities. The department may operate or contract to
operate detention facilities for juveniles committed to the department.
Pretrial confinement or confinement of less than thirty-one days imposed as
part of a disposition or modification order may be served consecutively or
intermittently, in the discretion of the court;

(6)
"Court," when used without further qualification, means the juvenile
court judge(s) or commissioner(s);

(7)
"Criminal history" includes all criminal complaints against the
respondent for which, prior to the commission of a current offense:

(a)
The allegations were found correct by a court. If a respondent is convicted of
two or more charges arising out of the same course of conduct, only the highest
charge from among these shall count as an offense for the purposes of this
chapter; or

(b)
The criminal complaint was diverted by a prosecutor pursuant to the provisions
of this chapter on agreement of the respondent and after an advisement to the
respondent that the criminal complaint would be considered as part of the
respondent's criminal history. A successfully completed deferred adjudication
that was entered before July 1, 1998, or a deferred disposition shall not be
considered part of the respondent's criminal history;

(8)
"Department" means the department of social and health services;

(9)
"Detention facility" means a county facility, paid for by the county,
for the physical confinement of a juvenile alleged to have committed an offense
or an adjudicated offender subject to a disposition or modification order.
"Detention facility" includes county group homes, inpatient substance
abuse programs, juvenile basic training camps, and electronic monitoring;

(10)
"Diversion unit" means any probation counselor who enters into a
diversion agreement with an alleged youthful offender, or any other person,
community accountability board, or other entity except a law enforcement
official or entity, with whom the juvenile court administrator has contracted
to arrange and supervise such agreements pursuant to RCW 13.40.080, or any
person, community accountability board, or other entity specially funded by the
legislature to arrange and supervise diversion agreements in accordance with
the requirements of this chapter. For purposes of this subsection,
"community accountability board" means a board comprised of members
of the local community in which the juvenile offender resides. The superior
court shall appoint the members. The boards shall consist of at least three
and not more than seven members. If possible, the board should include a
variety of representatives from the community, such as a law enforcement
officer, teacher or school administrator, high school student, parent, and
business owner, and should represent the cultural diversity of the local
community;

(11)
"Foster care" means temporary physical care in a foster family home
or group care facility as defined in RCW 74.15.020 and licensed by the
department, or other legally authorized care;

(12)
"Institution" means a juvenile facility established pursuant to
chapters 72.05 and 72.16 through 72.20 RCW;

(13)
"Intensive supervision program" means a parole program that requires
intensive supervision and monitoring, offers an array of individualized
treatment and transitional services, and emphasizes community involvement and
support in order to reduce the likelihood a juvenile offender will commit
further offenses;

(14)
"Juvenile," "youth," and "child" mean any
individual who is under the chronological age of eighteen years and who has not
been previously transferred to adult court pursuant to RCW 13.40.110 or who is
otherwise under adult court jurisdiction;

(15)
"Juvenile offender" means any juvenile who has been found by the
juvenile court to have committed an offense, including a person eighteen years
of age or older over whom jurisdiction has been extended under RCW 13.40.300;

(16)
"Local sanctions" means one or more of the following: (a) 0‑30
days of confinement; (b) 0‑12 months of community supervision; (c) 0‑150
hours of community ((service)) restitution; or (d) $0‑$500
fine;

(17)
"Manifest injustice" means a disposition that would either impose an
excessive penalty on the juvenile or would impose a serious, and clear danger
to society in light of the purposes of this chapter;

(18)
"Monitoring and reporting requirements" means one or more of the following:
Curfews; requirements to remain at home, school, work, or court-ordered
treatment programs during specified hours; restrictions from leaving or
entering specified geographical areas; requirements to report to the probation
officer as directed and to remain under the probation officer's supervision;
and other conditions or limitations as the court may require which may not
include confinement;

(19)
"Offense" means an act designated a violation or a crime if committed
by an adult under the law of this state, under any ordinance of any city or
county of this state, under any federal law, or under the law of another state
if the act occurred in that state;

(20)
"Probation bond" means a bond, posted with sufficient security by a
surety justified and approved by the court, to secure the offender's appearance
at required court proceedings and compliance with court-ordered community
supervision or conditions of release ordered pursuant to RCW 13.40.040 or
13.40.050. It also means a deposit of cash or posting of other collateral in
lieu of a bond if approved by the court;

(21)
"Respondent" means a juvenile who is alleged or proven to have
committed an offense;

(22)
"Restitution" means financial reimbursement by the offender to the
victim, and shall be limited to easily ascertainable damages for injury to or
loss of property, actual expenses incurred for medical treatment for physical
injury to persons, lost wages resulting from physical injury, and costs of the
victim's counseling reasonably related to the offense if the offense is a sex
offense. Restitution shall not include reimbursement for damages for mental
anguish, pain and suffering, or other intangible losses. Nothing in this
chapter shall limit or replace civil remedies or defenses available to the
victim or offender;

(23)
"Secretary" means the secretary of the department of social and
health services. "Assistant secretary" means the assistant secretary
for juvenile rehabilitation for the department;

(24)
"Services" means services which provide alternatives to incarceration
for those juveniles who have pleaded or been adjudicated guilty of an offense
or have signed a diversion agreement pursuant to this chapter;

(25)
"Sex offense" means an offense defined as a sex offense in RCW
9.94A.030;

(26)
"Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes for which the
respondent committed the offense was for the purpose of his or her sexual
gratification;

(27)
"Surety" means an entity licensed under state insurance laws or by
the state department of licensing, to write corporate, property, or probation
bonds within the state, and justified and approved by the superior court of the
county having jurisdiction of the case;

(28)
"Violation" means an act or omission, which if committed by an adult,
must be proven beyond a reasonable doubt, and is punishable by sanctions which
do not include incarceration;

(29)
"Violent offense" means a violent offense as defined in RCW
9.94A.030.

Sec.
13. RCW
13.40.0357 and 1998 c 290 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

DESCRIPTION AND OFFENSE CATEGORY

juvenile juvenile
disposition

disposition category
for attempt,

offense bailjump,
conspiracy,

category description (rcw citation) or
solicitation

........................................

Arson and Malicious Mischief

A Arson 1 (9A.48.020) B+

B Arson 2 (9A.48.030) C

C Reckless Burning 1 (9A.48.040) D

D Reckless Burning 2 (9A.48.050) E

B Malicious Mischief 1 (9A.48.070) C

C Malicious Mischief 2 (9A.48.080) D

D Malicious
Mischief 3 (<$50 is

E class) (9A.48.090) E

E Tampering with
Fire Alarm

Apparatus (9.40.100) E

A Possession of
Incendiary Device

(9.40.120) B+

Assault and
Other Crimes

Involving
Physical Harm

A Assault 1 (9A.36.011) B+

B+ Assault 2 (9A.36.021) C+

C+ Assault 3 (9A.36.031) D+

D+ Assault 4 (9A.36.041) E

B+ Drive-By
Shooting

(9A.36.045) C+

D+ Reckless
Endangerment

(9A.36.050) E

C+ Promoting
Suicide Attempt

(9A.36.060) D+

D+ Coercion (9A.36.070) E

C+ Custodial Assault (9A.36.100) D+

Burglary and Trespass

B+ Burglary 1 (9A.52.020) C+

B Residential
Burglary

(9A.52.025) C

B Burglary 2 (9A.52.030) C

D Burglary Tools
(Possession of)

(9A.52.060) E

D Criminal Trespass 1 (9A.52.070) E

E Criminal
Trespass 2 (9A.52.080) E

C Vehicle
Prowling 1 (9A.52.095) D

D Vehicle Prowling 2 (9A.52.100) E

Drugs

E Possession/Consumption
of Alcohol

(66.44.270) E

C Illegally
Obtaining Legend Drug

(69.41.020) D

C+ Sale, Delivery,
Possession of Legend

Drug with
Intent to Sell

(69.41.030) D+

E Possession of
Legend Drug

(69.41.030) E

B+ Violation of
Uniform Controlled

Substances Act
- Narcotic,

Methamphetamine,
or Flunitrazepam

Sale (69.50.401(a)(1) (i) or (ii)) B+

C Violation of
Uniform Controlled

Substances Act
- Nonnarcotic Sale

(69.50.401(a)(1)(iii)) C

E Possession of
Marihuana <40 grams

(69.50.401(e)) E

C Fraudulently
Obtaining Controlled

Substance (69.50.403) C

C+ Sale of
Controlled Substance

for Profit (69.50.410) C+

E Unlawful Inhalation (9.47A.020) E

B Violation of
Uniform Controlled

Substances Act
- Narcotic,

Methamphetamine, or Flunitrazepam

Counterfeit
Substances

(69.50.401(b)(1) (i) or (ii)) B

C Violation of
Uniform Controlled

Substances Act - Nonnarcotic

Counterfeit
Substances

(69.50.401(b)(1) (iii), (iv), (v)) C

C Violation of
Uniform Controlled

Substances Act - Possession of a

Controlled
Substance

(69.50.401(d)) C

C Violation of
Uniform Controlled

Substances Act - Possession of a

Controlled
Substance

(69.50.401(c)) C

Firearms and Weapons

B Theft of Firearm (9A.56.300) C

B Possession of
Stolen Firearm

(9A.56.310) C

E Carrying Loaded
Pistol Without

Permit (9.41.050) E

C Possession of
Firearms by Minor (<18)

(9.41.040(1)(b)(iii)) C

D+ Possession of
Dangerous Weapon

(9.41.250) E

D Intimidating
Another Person by use

of Weapon (9.41.270) E

Homicide

A+ Murder 1 (9A.32.030) A

A+ Murder 2 (9A.32.050) B+

B+ Manslaughter 1 (9A.32.060) C+

C+ Manslaughter 2 (9A.32.070) D+

B+ Vehicular Homicide (46.61.520) C+

Kidnapping

A Kidnap 1 (9A.40.020) B+

B+ Kidnap 2 (9A.40.030) C+

C+ Unlawful
Imprisonment

(9A.40.040) D+

Obstructing
Governmental Operation

D Obstructing a
Law Enforcement

Officer (9A.76.020) E

E Resisting Arrest (9A.76.040) E

B Introducing
Contraband 1

(9A.76.140) C

C Introducing
Contraband 2

(9A.76.150) D

E Introducing
Contraband 3

(9A.76.160) E

B+ Intimidating a
Public Servant

(9A.76.180) C+

B+ Intimidating a
Witness

(9A.72.110) C+

Public
Disturbance

C+ Riot with Weapon (9A.84.010) D+

D+ Riot Without
Weapon

(9A.84.010) E

E Failure to
Disperse (9A.84.020) E

E Disorderly Conduct (9A.84.030) E

Sex Crimes

A Rape 1 (9A.44.040) B+

A- Rape 2 (9A.44.050) B+

C+ Rape 3 (9A.44.060) D+

A- Rape of a Child 1 (9A.44.073) B+

B+ Rape of a Child 2 (9A.44.076) C+

B Incest 1 (9A.64.020(1)) C

C Incest 2 (9A.64.020(2)) D

D+ Indecent
Exposure

(Victim <14) (9A.88.010) E

E Indecent Exposure

(Victim 14 or over) (9A.88.010) E

B+ Promoting Prostitution 1

(9A.88.070) C+

C+ Promoting
Prostitution 2

(9A.88.080) D+

E O & A (Prostitution) (9A.88.030) E

B+ Indecent Liberties (9A.44.100) C+

A- Child Molestation 1 (9A.44.083) B+

B Child Molestation 2 (9A.44.086) C+

Theft, Robbery,
Extortion, and Forgery

B Theft 1 (9A.56.030) C

C Theft 2 (9A.56.040) D

D Theft 3 (9A.56.050) E

B Theft of Livestock (9A.56.080) C

C Forgery (9A.60.020) D

A Robbery 1 (9A.56.200) B+

B+ Robbery 2 (9A.56.210) C+

B+ Extortion 1 (9A.56.120) C+

C+ Extortion 2 (9A.56.130) D+

B Possession of
Stolen Property 1

(9A.56.150) C

C Possession of
Stolen Property 2

(9A.56.160) D

D Possession of
Stolen Property 3

(9A.56.170) E

C Taking Motor
Vehicle Without

Owner's Permission (9A.56.070) D

Motor Vehicle
Related Crimes

E Driving Without
a License

(46.20.005) E

C Hit and Run -
Injury

(46.52.020(4)) D

D Hit and
Run-Attended

(46.52.020(5)) E

E Hit and
Run-Unattended

(46.52.010) E

C Vehicular Assault (46.61.522) D

C Attempting to
Elude Pursuing

Police Vehicle (46.61.024) D

E Reckless Driving (46.61.500) E

D Driving While
Under the Influence

(46.61.502 and 46.61.504) E

Other

B Bomb Threat (9.61.160) C

C Escape 11 (9A.76.110) C

C Escape 21 (9A.76.120) C

D Escape 3 (9A.76.130) E

E Obscene,
Harassing, Etc.,

Phone Calls (9.61.230) E

A Other Offense
Equivalent to an

Adult Class A Felony B+

B Other Offense
Equivalent to an

Adult Class B Felony C

C Other Offense
Equivalent to an

Adult Class C Felony D

D Other Offense
Equivalent to an

Adult Gross Misdemeanor E

E Other Offense
Equivalent to an

Adult Misdemeanor E

V Violation of
Order of Restitution,

Community
Supervision, or

Confinement (13.40.200)2 V

1Escape 1 and 2 and Attempted Escape 1 and 2 are
classed as C offenses and the standard range is established as follows:

1st
escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 4 weeks confinement

2nd
escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 8 weeks confinement

3rd
and subsequent escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 12 weeks
confinement

2If the
court finds that a respondent has violated terms of an order, it may impose a
penalty of up to 30 days of confinement.

JUVENILE SENTENCING STANDARDS

This schedule must be used for juvenile offenders.
The court may select sentencing option A, B, or C.

OPTION A

JUVENILE OFFENDER SENTENCING GRID

STANDARD RANGE

A+ 180 WEEKS TO AGE 21 YEARS

A 103 WEEKS TO 129 WEEKS

A- 15-36 |52-65 |80-100 |103-129

WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS|WEEKS

EXCEPT | | |

30-40 | | |

WEEKS FOR | | |

15-17 | | |

YEAR OLDS | | |

Current B+ 15-36 |52-65 |80-100 |103-129

Offense WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS

Category

B LOCAL | |52-65

SANCTIONS (LS) |15-36 WEEKS |WEEKS

C+ LS |

|15-36 WEEKS

C LS |15-36 WEEKS

Local Sanctions: |

0 to 30 Days

D+ LS 0 to 12 Months Community Supervision

0 to 150 Hours Community ((Service)) Restitution

D LS $0 to $500 Fine

E LS

0 1 2 3 4 or more

PRIOR ADJUDICATIONS

NOTE:
References in the grid to days or weeks mean periods of confinement.

(1)
The vertical axis of the grid is the current offense category. The current
offense category is determined by the offense of adjudication.

(2)
The horizontal axis of the grid is the number of prior adjudications included
in the juvenile's criminal history. Each prior felony adjudication shall count
as one point. Each prior violation, misdemeanor, and gross misdemeanor
adjudication shall count as 1/4 point. Fractional points shall be rounded
down.

(3)
The standard range disposition for each offense is determined by the
intersection of the column defined by the prior adjudications and the row
defined by the current offense category.

(4)
RCW 13.40.180 applies if the offender is being sentenced for more than one
offense.

(5)
A current offense that is a violation is equivalent to an offense category of
E. However, a disposition for a violation shall not include confinement.

OR

OPTION
B

CHEMICAL
DEPENDENCY DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE

If
the juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition of local
sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not committed an A- or B+
offense, the court may impose a disposition under RCW 13.40.160(5) and
13.40.165.

OR

OPTION
C

MANIFEST
INJUSTICE

If the court determines that a disposition under
option A or B would effectuate a manifest injustice, the court shall impose a
disposition outside the standard range under RCW 13.40.160(2).

Sec.
14. RCW
13.40.080 and 1997 c 338 s 70 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A diversion agreement shall be a contract between a juvenile accused of an
offense and a diversionary unit whereby the juvenile agrees to fulfill certain
conditions in lieu of prosecution. Such agreements may be entered into only
after the prosecutor, or probation counselor pursuant to this chapter, has
determined that probable cause exists to believe that a crime has been
committed and that the juvenile committed it. Such agreements shall be entered
into as expeditiously as possible.

(2)
A diversion agreement shall be limited to one or more of the following:

(a)
Community ((service)) restitution not to exceed one hundred fifty
hours, not to be performed during school hours if the juvenile is attending
school;

(b)
Restitution limited to the amount of actual loss incurred by the victim;

(c)
Attendance at up to ten hours of counseling and/or up to twenty hours of
educational or informational sessions at a community agency. The educational
or informational sessions may include sessions relating to respect for self,
others, and authority; victim awareness; accountability; self-worth;
responsibility; work ethics; good citizenship; literacy; and life skills. For
purposes of this section, "community agency" may also mean a
community-based nonprofit organization, if approved by the diversion unit. The
state shall not be liable for costs resulting from the diversionary unit
exercising the option to permit diversion agreements to mandate attendance at
up to ten hours of counseling and/or up to twenty hours of educational or
informational sessions;

(d)
A fine, not to exceed one hundred dollars. In determining the amount of the
fine, the diversion unit shall consider only the juvenile's financial resources
and whether the juvenile has the means to pay the fine. The diversion unit
shall not consider the financial resources of the juvenile's parents, guardian,
or custodian in determining the fine to be imposed; and

(e)
Requirements to remain during specified hours at home, school, or work, and
restrictions on leaving or entering specified geographical areas.

(3)
In assessing periods of community ((service)) restitution to be
performed and restitution to be paid by a juvenile who has entered into a
diversion agreement, the court officer to whom this task is assigned shall
consult with the juvenile's custodial parent or parents or guardian and victims
who have contacted the diversionary unit and, to the extent possible, involve
members of the community. Such members of the community shall meet with the
juvenile and advise the court officer as to the terms of the diversion
agreement and shall supervise the juvenile in carrying out its terms.

(4)(a)
A diversion agreement may not exceed a period of six months and may include a
period extending beyond the eighteenth birthday of the divertee.

(b)
If additional time is necessary for the juvenile to complete restitution to the
victim, the time period limitations of this subsection may be extended by an
additional six months.

(c)
If the juvenile has not paid the full amount of restitution by the end of the
additional six-month period, then the juvenile shall be referred to the
juvenile court for entry of an order establishing the amount of restitution
still owed to the victim. In this order, the court shall also determine the
terms and conditions of the restitution, including a payment plan extending up
to ten years if the court determines that the juvenile does not have the means
to make full restitution over a shorter period. For the purposes of this
subsection (4)(c), the juvenile shall remain under the court's jurisdiction for
a maximum term of ten years after the juvenile's eighteenth birthday. Prior to
the expiration of the initial ten-year period, the juvenile court may extend
the judgment for restitution an additional ten years. The court may not
require the juvenile to pay full or partial restitution if the juvenile
reasonably satisfies the court that he or she does not have the means to make
full or partial restitution and could not reasonably acquire the means to pay
the restitution over a ten-year period. The county clerk shall make
disbursements to victims named in the order. The restitution to victims named
in the order shall be paid prior to any payment for other penalties or monetary
assessments. A juvenile under obligation to pay restitution may petition the
court for modification of the restitution order.

(5)
The juvenile shall retain the right to be referred to the court at any time
prior to the signing of the diversion agreement.

(6)
Divertees and potential divertees shall be afforded due process in all contacts
with a diversionary unit regardless of whether the juveniles are accepted for
diversion or whether the diversion program is successfully completed. Such due
process shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a)
A written diversion agreement shall be executed stating all conditions in
clearly understandable language;

(b)
Violation of the terms of the agreement shall be the only grounds for
termination;

(c)
No divertee may be terminated from a diversion program without being given a
court hearing, which hearing shall be preceded by:

(i)
Written notice of alleged violations of the conditions of the diversion
program; and

(ii)
Disclosure of all evidence to be offered against the divertee;

(d)
The hearing shall be conducted by the juvenile court and shall include:

(i)
Opportunity to be heard in person and to present evidence;

(ii)
The right to confront and cross-examine all adverse witnesses;

(iii)
A written statement by the court as to the evidence relied on and the reasons
for termination, should that be the decision; and

(iv)
Demonstration by evidence that the divertee has substantially violated the
terms of his or her diversion agreement.

(e)
The prosecutor may file an information on the offense for which the divertee
was diverted:

(i)
In juvenile court if the divertee is under eighteen years of age; or

(ii)
In superior court or the appropriate court of limited jurisdiction if the
divertee is eighteen years of age or older.

(7)
The diversion unit shall, subject to available funds, be responsible for
providing interpreters when juveniles need interpreters to effectively
communicate during diversion unit hearings or negotiations.

(8)
The diversion unit shall be responsible for advising a divertee of his or her
rights as provided in this chapter.

(9)
The diversion unit may refer a juvenile to community-based counseling or
treatment programs.

(10)
The right to counsel shall inure prior to the initial interview for purposes of
advising the juvenile as to whether he or she desires to participate in the
diversion process or to appear in the juvenile court. The juvenile may be
represented by counsel at any critical stage of the diversion process,
including intake interviews and termination hearings. The juvenile shall be
fully advised at the intake of his or her right to an attorney and of the
relevant services an attorney can provide. For the purpose of this section,
intake interviews mean all interviews regarding the diversion agreement
process.

The
juvenile shall be advised that a diversion agreement shall constitute a part of
the juvenile's criminal history as defined by RCW 13.40.020(((9))) (7).
A signed acknowledgment of such advisement shall be obtained from the juvenile,
and the document shall be maintained by the diversionary unit together with the
diversion agreement, and a copy of both documents shall be delivered to the
prosecutor if requested by the prosecutor. The supreme court shall promulgate
rules setting forth the content of such advisement in simple language.

(11)
When a juvenile enters into a diversion agreement, the juvenile court may
receive only the following information for dispositional purposes:

(a)
The fact that a charge or charges were made;

(b)
The fact that a diversion agreement was entered into;

(c)
The juvenile's obligations under such agreement;

(d)
Whether the alleged offender performed his or her obligations under such
agreement; and

(e)
The facts of the alleged offense.

(12)
A diversionary unit may refuse to enter into a diversion agreement with a
juvenile. When a diversionary unit refuses to enter a diversion agreement with
a juvenile, it shall immediately refer such juvenile to the court for action
and shall forward to the court the criminal complaint and a detailed statement
of its reasons for refusing to enter into a diversion agreement. The
diversionary unit shall also immediately refer the case to the prosecuting
attorney for action if such juvenile violates the terms of the diversion
agreement.

(13)
A diversionary unit may, in instances where it determines that the act or
omission of an act for which a juvenile has been referred to it involved no
victim, or where it determines that the juvenile referred to it has no prior
criminal history and is alleged to have committed an illegal act involving no
threat of or instance of actual physical harm and involving not more than fifty
dollars in property loss or damage and that there is no loss outstanding to the
person or firm suffering such damage or loss, counsel and release or release
such a juvenile without entering into a diversion agreement. A diversion
unit's authority to counsel and release a juvenile under this subsection shall
include the authority to refer the juvenile to community-based counseling or
treatment programs. Any juvenile released under this subsection shall be
advised that the act or omission of any act for which he or she had been
referred shall constitute a part of the juvenile's criminal history as defined
by RCW 13.40.020(((9))) (7). A signed acknowledgment of such
advisement shall be obtained from the juvenile, and the document shall be
maintained by the unit, and a copy of the document shall be delivered to the
prosecutor if requested by the prosecutor. The supreme court shall promulgate
rules setting forth the content of such advisement in simple language. A
juvenile determined to be eligible by a diversionary unit for release as
provided in this subsection shall retain the same right to counsel and right to
have his or her case referred to the court for formal action as any other
juvenile referred to the unit.

(14)
A diversion unit may supervise the fulfillment of a diversion agreement entered
into before the juvenile's eighteenth birthday and which includes a period
extending beyond the divertee's eighteenth birthday.

(15)
If a fine required by a diversion agreement cannot reasonably be paid due to a
change of circumstance, the diversion agreement may be modified at the request
of the divertee and with the concurrence of the diversion unit to convert an
unpaid fine into community ((service)) restitution. The
modification of the diversion agreement shall be in writing and signed by the
divertee and the diversion unit. The number of hours of community ((service))
restitution in lieu of a monetary penalty shall be converted at the rate
of the prevailing state minimum wage per hour.

(16)
Fines imposed under this section shall be collected and paid into the county
general fund in accordance with procedures established by the juvenile court
administrator under RCW 13.04.040 and may be used only for juvenile services.
In the expenditure of funds for juvenile services, there shall be a maintenance
of effort whereby counties exhaust existing resources before using amounts
collected under this section.

Sec.
15. RCW
13.40.160 and 1997 c 338 s 25 and 1997 c 265 s 1 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
The standard range disposition for a juvenile adjudicated of an offense is
determined according to RCW 13.40.0357.

(a)
When the court sentences an offender to a local sanction as provided in RCW
13.40.0357 option A, the court shall impose a determinate disposition within
the standard ranges, except as provided in subsections (2), (4), and (5) of
this section. The disposition may be comprised of one or more local sanctions.

(b)
When the court sentences an offender to a standard range as provided in RCW
13.40.0357 option A that includes a term of confinement exceeding thirty days,
commitment shall be to the department for the standard range of confinement,
except as provided in subsections (2), (4), and (5) of this section.

(2)
If the court concludes, and enters reasons for its conclusion, that disposition
within the standard range would effectuate a manifest injustice the court shall
impose a disposition outside the standard range, as indicated in option C of
RCW 13.40.0357. The court's finding of manifest injustice shall be supported
by clear and convincing evidence.

A
disposition outside the standard range shall be determinate and shall be
comprised of confinement or community supervision, or a combination thereof.
When a judge finds a manifest injustice and imposes a sentence of confinement
exceeding thirty days, the court shall sentence the juvenile to a maximum term,
and the provisions of RCW 13.40.030(2) shall be used to determine the range. A
disposition outside the standard range is appealable under RCW 13.40.230 by the
state or the respondent. A disposition within the standard range is not
appealable under RCW 13.40.230.

(3)
Where a respondent is found to have committed an offense for which the
respondent declined to enter into a diversion agreement, the court shall impose
a term of community supervision limited to the conditions allowed in a
diversion agreement as provided in RCW 13.40.080(2).

(4)
When a juvenile offender is found to have committed a sex offense, other than a
sex offense that is also a serious violent offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030,
and has no history of a prior sex offense, the court, on its own motion or the
motion of the state or the respondent, may order an examination to determine
whether the respondent is amenable to treatment.

The
report of the examination shall include at a minimum the following: The
respondent's version of the facts and the official version of the facts, the
respondent's offense history, an assessment of problems in addition to alleged
deviant behaviors, the respondent's social, educational, and employment
situation, and other evaluation measures used. The report shall set forth the
sources of the evaluator's information.

The
examiner shall assess and report regarding the respondent's amenability to
treatment and relative risk to the community. A proposed treatment plan shall
be provided and shall include, at a minimum:

(a)(i)
Frequency and type of contact between the offender and therapist;

(ii)
Specific issues to be addressed in the treatment and description of planned
treatment modalities;

(iii)
Monitoring plans, including any requirements regarding living conditions,
lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by family members, legal guardians, or
others;

(iv)
Anticipated length of treatment; and

(v)
Recommended crime-related prohibitions.

The
court on its own motion may order, or on a motion by the state shall order, a
second examination regarding the offender's amenability to treatment. The
evaluator shall be selected by the party making the motion. The defendant
shall pay the cost of any second examination ordered unless the court finds the
defendant to be indigent in which case the state shall pay the cost.

After
receipt of reports of the examination, the court shall then consider whether
the offender and the community will benefit from use of this special sex
offender disposition alternative and consider the victim's opinion whether the
offender should receive a treatment disposition under this section. If the
court determines that this special sex offender disposition alternative is appropriate,
then the court shall impose a determinate disposition within the standard range
for the offense, or if the court concludes, and enters reasons for its
conclusions, that such disposition would cause a manifest injustice, the court
shall impose a disposition under option C, and the court may suspend the
execution of the disposition and place the offender on community supervision
for at least two years. As a condition of the suspended disposition, the court
may impose the conditions of community supervision and other conditions,
including up to thirty days of confinement and requirements that the offender
do any one or more of the following:

(b)(i)
Devote time to a specific education, employment, or occupation;

(ii)
Undergo available outpatient sex offender treatment for up to two years, or
inpatient sex offender treatment not to exceed the standard range of
confinement for that offense. A community mental health center may not be used
for such treatment unless it has an appropriate program designed for sex
offender treatment. The respondent shall not change sex offender treatment
providers or treatment conditions without first notifying the prosecutor, the
probation counselor, and the court, and shall not change providers without
court approval after a hearing if the prosecutor or probation counselor object
to the change;

(iii)
Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the
probation counselor prior to any change in the offender's address, educational
program, or employment;

(iv)
Report to the prosecutor and the probation counselor prior to any change in a
sex offender treatment provider. This change shall have prior approval by the
court;

(v)
Report as directed to the court and a probation counselor;

(vi)
Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations, perform community ((service))
restitution, or any combination thereof;

(vii)
Make restitution to the victim for the cost of any counseling reasonably
related to the offense;

(viii)
Comply with the conditions of any court-ordered probation bond; or

(ix)
The court shall order that the offender may not attend the public or approved
private elementary, middle, or high school attended by the victim or the
victim's siblings. The parents or legal guardians of the offender are
responsible for transportation or other costs associated with the offender's
change of school that would otherwise be paid by the school district. The
court shall send notice of the disposition and restriction on attending the
same school as the victim or victim's siblings to the public or approved
private school the juvenile will attend, if known, or if unknown, to the
approved private schools and the public school district board of directors of
the district in which the juvenile resides or intends to reside. This notice
must be sent at the earliest possible date but not later than ten calendar days
after entry of the disposition.

The
sex offender treatment provider shall submit quarterly reports on the respondent's
progress in treatment to the court and the parties. The reports shall
reference the treatment plan and include at a minimum the following: Dates of
attendance, respondent's compliance with requirements, treatment activities,
the respondent's relative progress in treatment, and any other material
specified by the court at the time of the disposition.

At
the time of the disposition, the court may set treatment review hearings as the
court considers appropriate.

Except
as provided in this subsection (4), after July 1, 1991, examinations and
treatment ordered pursuant to this subsection shall only be conducted by sex
offender treatment providers certified by the department of health pursuant to
chapter 18.155 RCW. A sex offender therapist who examines or treats a juvenile
sex offender pursuant to this subsection does not have to be certified by the
department of health pursuant to chapter 18.155 RCW if the court finds that:
(A) The offender has already moved to another state or plans to move to another
state for reasons other than circumventing the certification requirements; (B)
no certified providers are available for treatment within a reasonable
geographical distance of the offender's home; and (C) the evaluation and
treatment plan comply with this subsection (4) and the rules adopted by the
department of health.

If
the offender violates any condition of the disposition or the court finds that
the respondent is failing to make satisfactory progress in treatment, the court
may revoke the suspension and order execution of the disposition or the court
may impose a penalty of up to thirty days' confinement for violating conditions
of the disposition. The court may order both execution of the disposition and
up to thirty days' confinement for the violation of the conditions of the
disposition. The court shall give credit for any confinement time previously
served if that confinement was for the offense for which the suspension is
being revoked.

For
purposes of this section, "victim" means any person who has sustained
emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or property
as a direct result of the crime charged. "Victim" may also include a
known parent or guardian of a victim who is a minor child unless the parent or
guardian is the perpetrator of the offense.

A
disposition entered under this subsection (4) is not appealable under RCW
13.40.230.

(5)
If the juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition of local
sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not committed an A- or B+
offense, the court may impose the disposition alternative under RCW 13.40.165.

(6)
RCW 13.40.193 shall govern the disposition of any juvenile adjudicated of
possessing a firearm in violation of RCW 9.41.040(1)(b)(iii) or any crime in
which a special finding is entered that the juvenile was armed with a firearm.

(7)
Whenever a juvenile offender is entitled to credit for time spent in detention
prior to a dispositional order, the dispositional order shall specifically
state the number of days of credit for time served.

(8)
Except as provided under subsection (4) or (5) of this section or RCW
13.40.127, the court shall not suspend or defer the imposition or the execution
of the disposition.

(9)
In no case shall the term of confinement imposed by the court at disposition
exceed that to which an adult could be subjected for the same offense.

Sec.
16. RCW
13.40.165 and 1997 c 338 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
When a juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition of local
sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not committed an A- or B+
offense, the court, on its own motion or the motion of the state or the
respondent if the evidence shows that the offender may be chemically dependent,
may order an examination by a chemical dependency counselor from a chemical
dependency treatment facility approved under chapter 70.96A RCW to determine if
the youth is chemically dependent and amenable to treatment.

(2)
The report of the examination shall include at a minimum the following: The
respondent's version of the facts and the official version of the facts, the
respondent's offense history, an assessment of drug-alcohol problems and
previous treatment attempts, the respondent's social, educational, and
employment situation, and other evaluation measures used. The report shall set
forth the sources of the examiner's information.

(3)
The examiner shall assess and report regarding the respondent's amenability to
treatment and relative risk to the community. A proposed treatment plan shall
be provided and shall include, at a minimum:

(a)
Whether inpatient and/or outpatient treatment is recommended;

(b)
Availability of appropriate treatment;

(c)
Monitoring plans, including any requirements regarding living conditions,
lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by family members, legal guardians, or
others;

(d)
Anticipated length of treatment;

(e)
Recommended crime-related prohibitions; and

(f)
Whether the respondent is amenable to treatment.

(4)
The court on its own motion may order, or on a motion by the state shall order,
a second examination regarding the offender's amenability to treatment. The
evaluator shall be selected by the party making the motion. The defendant
shall pay the cost of any examination ordered under this subsection (4) or
subsection (1) of this section unless the court finds that the offender is
indigent and no third party insurance coverage is available, in which case the
state shall pay the cost.

(5)(a)
After receipt of reports of the examination, the court shall then consider
whether the offender and the community will benefit from use of this chemical
dependency disposition alternative and consider the victim's opinion whether
the offender should receive a treatment disposition under this section.

(b)
If the court determines that this chemical dependency disposition alternative
is appropriate, then the court shall impose the standard range for the offense,
suspend execution of the disposition, and place the offender on community
supervision for up to one year. As a condition of the suspended disposition,
the court shall require the offender to undergo available outpatient
drug/alcohol treatment and/or inpatient drug/alcohol treatment. For purposes
of this section, the sum of confinement time and inpatient treatment may not
exceed ninety days. As a condition of the suspended disposition, the court may
impose conditions of community supervision and other sanctions, including up to
thirty days of confinement, one hundred fifty hours of community ((service))
restitution, and payment of legal financial obligations and restitution.

(6)
The drug/alcohol treatment provider shall submit monthly reports on the
respondent's progress in treatment to the court and the parties. The reports
shall reference the treatment plan and include at a minimum the following:
Dates of attendance, respondent's compliance with requirements, treatment
activities, the respondent's relative progress in treatment, and any other
material specified by the court at the time of the disposition.

At
the time of the disposition, the court may set treatment review hearings as the
court considers appropriate.

If
the offender violates any condition of the disposition or the court finds that
the respondent is failing to make satisfactory progress in treatment, the court
may revoke the suspension and order execution of the disposition. The court
shall give credit for any confinement time previously served if that
confinement was for the offense for which the suspension is being revoked.

(7)
For purposes of this section, "victim" means any person who has
sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or
property as a direct result of the offense charged.

(8)
Whenever a juvenile offender is entitled to credit for time spent in detention
prior to a dispositional order, the dispositional order shall specifically
state the number of days of credit for time served.

(9)
In no case shall the term of confinement imposed by the court at disposition
exceed that to which an adult could be subjected for the same offense.

(10)
A disposition under this section is not appealable under RCW 13.40.230.

Sec.
17. RCW
13.40.180 and 1981 c 299 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

Where
a disposition is imposed on a youth for two or more offenses, the terms shall
run consecutively, subject to the following limitations:

(1)
Where the offenses were committed through a single act or omission, omission,
or through an act or omission which in itself constituted one of the offenses
and also was an element of the other, the aggregate of all the terms shall not
exceed one hundred fifty percent of the term imposed for the most serious
offense;

(2)
The aggregate of all consecutive terms shall not exceed three hundred percent
of the term imposed for the most serious offense; and

(3)
The aggregate of all consecutive terms of community supervision shall not
exceed two years in length, or require payment of more than two hundred dollars
in fines or the performance of more than two hundred hours of community ((service))
restitution.

Sec.
18. RCW
13.40.200 and 1997 c 338 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
When a respondent fails to comply with an order of restitution, community
supervision, penalty assessments, or confinement of less than thirty days, the
court upon motion of the prosecutor or its own motion, may modify the order
after a hearing on the violation.

(2)
The hearing shall afford the respondent the same due process of law as would be
afforded an adult probationer. The court may issue a summons or a warrant to
compel the respondent's appearance. The state shall have the burden of proving
by a preponderance of the evidence the fact of the violation. The respondent
shall have the burden of showing that the violation was not a willful refusal
to comply with the terms of the order. If a respondent has failed to pay a
fine, penalty assessments, or restitution or to perform community ((service))
restitution hours, as required by the court, it shall be the
respondent's burden to show that he or she did not have the means and could not
reasonably have acquired the means to pay the fine, penalty assessments, or
restitution or perform community ((service)) restitution.

(3)
If the court finds that a respondent has willfully violated the terms of an
order pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section, it may impose a
penalty of up to thirty days' confinement. Penalties for multiple violations
occurring prior to the hearing shall not be aggregated to exceed thirty days'
confinement. Regardless of the number of times a respondent is brought to
court for violations of the terms of a single disposition order, the combined
total number of days spent by the respondent in detention shall never exceed
the maximum term to which an adult could be sentenced for the underlying
offense.

(4)
If a respondent has been ordered to pay a fine or monetary penalty and due to a
change of circumstance cannot reasonably comply with the order, the court, upon
motion of the respondent, may order that the unpaid fine or monetary penalty be
converted to community ((service)) restitution. The number of
hours of community ((service)) restitution in lieu of a monetary
penalty or fine shall be converted at the rate of the prevailing state minimum
wage per hour. The monetary penalties or fines collected shall be deposited in
the county general fund. A failure to comply with an order under this
subsection shall be deemed a failure to comply with an order of community
supervision and may be proceeded against as provided in this section.

(5)
When a respondent has willfully violated the terms of a probation bond, the
court may modify, revoke, or retain the probation bond as provided in RCW
13.40.054.

Sec.
19. RCW
13.40.205 and 1990 c 3 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A juvenile sentenced to a term of confinement to be served under the
supervision of the department shall not be released from the physical custody
of the department prior to the release date established under RCW 13.40.210
except as otherwise provided in this section.

(2)
A juvenile serving a term of confinement under the supervision of the
department may be released on authorized leave from the physical custody of the
department only if consistent with public safety and if:

(a)
Sixty percent of the minimum term of confinement has been served; and

(b)
The purpose of the leave is to enable the juvenile:

(i)
To visit the juvenile's family for the purpose of strengthening or preserving
family relationships;

(ii)
To make plans for parole or release which require the juvenile's personal
appearance in the community and which will facilitate the juvenile's reintegration
into the community; or

(iii)
To make plans for a residential placement out of the juvenile's home which
requires the juvenile's personal appearance in the community.

(3)
No authorized leave may exceed seven consecutive days. The total of all
pre-minimum term authorized leaves granted to a juvenile prior to final
discharge from confinement shall not exceed thirty days.

(4)
Prior to authorizing a leave, the secretary shall require a written leave plan,
which shall detail the purpose of the leave and how it is to be achieved, the
address at which the juvenile shall reside, the identity of the person
responsible for supervising the juvenile during the leave, and a statement by
such person acknowledging familiarity with the leave plan and agreeing to
supervise the juvenile and to notify the secretary immediately if the juvenile
violates any terms or conditions of the leave. The leave plan shall include
such terms and conditions as the secretary deems appropriate and shall be
signed by the juvenile.

(5)
Upon authorizing a leave, the secretary shall issue to the juvenile an
authorized leave order which shall contain the name of the juvenile, the fact
that the juvenile is on leave from a designated facility, the time period of
the leave, and the identity of an appropriate official of the department to
contact when necessary. The authorized leave order shall be carried by the
juvenile at all times while on leave.

(6)
Prior to the commencement of any authorized leave, the secretary shall give
notice of the leave to the appropriate law enforcement agency in the
jurisdiction in which the juvenile will reside during the leave period. The
notice shall include the identity of the juvenile, the time period of the
leave, the residence of the juvenile during the leave, and the identity of the
person responsible for supervising the juvenile during the leave.

(7)
The secretary may authorize a leave, which shall not exceed forty-eight hours
plus travel time, to meet an emergency situation such as a death or critical
illness of a member of the juvenile's family. The secretary may authorize a
leave, which shall not exceed the period of time medically necessary, to obtain
medical care not available in a juvenile facility maintained by the
department. In cases of emergency or medical leave the secretary may waive all
or any portions of subsections (2)(a), (3), (4), (5), and (6) of this section.

(8)
If requested by the juvenile's victim or the victim's immediate family, the
secretary shall give notice of any leave to the victim or the victim's
immediate family.

(9)
A juvenile who violates any condition of an authorized leave plan may be taken
into custody and returned to the department in the same manner as an adult in
identical circumstances.

(10)
Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a juvenile placed in minimum
security status may participate in work, educational, community ((service))
restitution, or treatment programs in the community up to twelve hours a
day if approved by the secretary. Such a release shall not be deemed a leave
of absence.

(11)
Subsections (6), (7), and (8) of this section do not apply to juveniles covered
by RCW 13.40.215.

Sec.
20. RCW
13.40.210 and 1997 c 338 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The secretary shall, except in the case of a juvenile committed by a court to a
term of confinement in a state institution outside the appropriate standard
range for the offense(s) for which the juvenile was found to be guilty
established pursuant to RCW 13.40.030, set a release or discharge date for each
juvenile committed to its custody. The release or discharge date shall be
within the prescribed range to which a juvenile has been committed except as
provided in RCW 13.40.320 concerning offenders the department determines are
eligible for the juvenile offender basic training camp program. Such dates
shall be determined prior to the expiration of sixty percent of a juvenile's
minimum term of confinement included within the prescribed range to which the
juvenile has been committed. The secretary shall release any juvenile
committed to the custody of the department within four calendar days prior to
the juvenile's release date or on the release date set under this chapter.
Days spent in the custody of the department shall be tolled by any period of
time during which a juvenile has absented himself or herself from the
department's supervision without the prior approval of the secretary or the
secretary's designee.

(2)
The secretary shall monitor the average daily population of the state's
juvenile residential facilities. When the secretary concludes that
in-residence population of residential facilities exceeds one hundred five
percent of the rated bed capacity specified in statute, or in absence of such
specification, as specified by the department in rule, the secretary may
recommend reductions to the governor. On certification by the governor that
the recommended reductions are necessary, the secretary has authority to
administratively release a sufficient number of offenders to reduce
in-residence population to one hundred percent of rated bed capacity. The
secretary shall release those offenders who have served the greatest proportion
of their sentence. However, the secretary may deny release in a particular
case at the request of an offender, or if the secretary finds that there is no
responsible custodian, as determined by the department, to whom to release the
offender, or if the release of the offender would pose a clear danger to
society. The department shall notify the committing court of the release at
the time of release if any such early releases have occurred as a result of
excessive in-residence population. In no event shall an offender adjudicated
of a violent offense be granted release under the provisions of this
subsection.

(3)(a)
Following the juvenile's release under subsection (1) of this section, the
secretary may require the juvenile to comply with a program of parole to be
administered by the department in his or her community which shall last no
longer than eighteen months, except that in the case of a juvenile sentenced
for rape in the first or second degree, rape of a child in the first or second
degree, child molestation in the first degree, or indecent liberties with
forcible compulsion, the period of parole shall be twenty-four months and, in
the discretion of the secretary, may be up to thirty-six months when the
secretary finds that an additional period of parole is necessary and appropriate
in the interests of public safety or to meet the ongoing needs of the
juvenile. A parole program is mandatory for offenders released under
subsection (2) of this section. The decision to place an offender on parole
shall be based on an assessment by the department of the offender's risk for
reoffending upon release. The department shall prioritize available parole
resources to provide supervision and services to offenders at moderate to high
risk for reoffending.

(b)
The secretary shall, for the period of parole, facilitate the juvenile's
reintegration into his or her community and to further this goal shall require
the juvenile to refrain from possessing a firearm or using a deadly weapon and
refrain from committing new offenses and may require the juvenile to: (i)
Undergo available medical, psychiatric, drug and alcohol, sex offender, mental
health, and other offense-related treatment services; (ii) report as directed
to a parole officer and/or designee; (iii) pursue a course of study, vocational
training, or employment; (iv) notify the parole officer of the current address
where he or she resides; (v) be present at a particular address during
specified hours; (vi) remain within prescribed geographical boundaries; (vii)
submit to electronic monitoring; (viii) refrain from using illegal drugs and
alcohol, and submit to random urinalysis when requested by the assigned parole
officer; (ix) refrain from contact with specific individuals or a specified
class of individuals; (x) meet other conditions determined by the parole
officer to further enhance the juvenile's reintegration into the community;
(xi) pay any court-ordered fines or restitution; and (xii) perform community ((service))
restitution. Community ((service)) restitution for the
purpose of this section means compulsory service, without compensation,
performed for the benefit of the community by the offender. Community ((service))
restitution may be performed through public or private organizations or
through work crews.

(c)
The secretary may further require up to twenty-five percent of the highest risk
juvenile offenders who are placed on parole to participate in an intensive
supervision program. Offenders participating in an intensive supervision
program shall be required to comply with all terms and conditions listed in (b)
of this subsection and shall also be required to comply with the following
additional terms and conditions: (i) Obey all laws and refrain from any
conduct that threatens public safety; (ii) report at least once a week to an
assigned community case manager; and (iii) meet all other requirements imposed
by the community case manager related to participating in the intensive
supervision program. As a part of the intensive supervision program, the
secretary may require day reporting.

(d)
After termination of the parole period, the juvenile shall be discharged from
the department's supervision.

(4)(a)
The department may also modify parole for violation thereof. If, after
affording a juvenile all of the due process rights to which he or she would be
entitled if the juvenile were an adult, the secretary finds that a juvenile has
violated a condition of his or her parole, the secretary shall order one of the
following which is reasonably likely to effectuate the purpose of the parole
and to protect the public: (i) Continued supervision under the same conditions
previously imposed; (ii) intensified supervision with increased reporting
requirements; (iii) additional conditions of supervision authorized by this
chapter; (iv) except as provided in (a)(v) of this subsection, imposition of a
period of confinement not to exceed thirty days in a facility operated by or
pursuant to a contract with the state of Washington or any city or county for a
portion of each day or for a certain number of days each week with the balance
of the days or weeks spent under supervision; and (v) the secretary may order
any of the conditions or may return the offender to confinement for the
remainder of the sentence range if the offense for which the offender was
sentenced is rape in the first or second degree, rape of a child in the first
or second degree, child molestation in the first degree, indecent liberties
with forcible compulsion, or a sex offense that is also a serious violent
offense as defined by RCW 9.94A.030.

(b)
If the department finds that any juvenile in a program of parole has possessed
a firearm or used a deadly weapon during the program of parole, the department
shall modify the parole under (a) of this subsection and confine the juvenile
for at least thirty days. Confinement shall be in a facility operated by or
pursuant to a contract with the state or any county.

(5)
A parole officer of the department of social and health services shall have the
power to arrest a juvenile under his or her supervision on the same grounds as
a law enforcement officer would be authorized to arrest the person.

(6)
If so requested and approved under chapter 13.06 RCW, the secretary shall
permit a county or group of counties to perform functions under subsections (3)
through (5) of this section.

Sec.
21. RCW
13.40.250 and 1997 c 338 s 36 are each amended to read as follows:

A
traffic or civil infraction case involving a juvenile under the age of sixteen
may be diverted in accordance with the provisions of this chapter or filed in
juvenile court.

(1)
If a notice of a traffic or civil infraction is filed in juvenile court, the
juvenile named in the notice shall be afforded the same due process afforded to
adult defendants in traffic infraction cases.

(2)
A monetary penalty imposed upon a juvenile under the age of sixteen who is
found to have committed a traffic or civil infraction may not exceed one
hundred dollars. At the juvenile's request, the court may order performance of
a number of hours of community ((service)) restitution in lieu of
a monetary penalty, at the rate of the prevailing state minimum wage per hour.

(3)
A diversion agreement entered into by a juvenile referred pursuant to this
section shall be limited to thirty hours of community ((service)) restitution,
or educational or informational sessions.

(4)
If a case involving the commission of a traffic or civil infraction or offense
by a juvenile under the age of sixteen has been referred to a diversion unit, an
abstract of the action taken by the diversion unit may be forwarded to the
department of licensing in the manner provided for in RCW 46.20.270(2).

Sec.
22. RCW
28A.225.090 and 1998 c 296 s 39 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A court may order a child subject to a petition under RCW 28A.225.035 to:

(a)
Attend the child's current school;

(b)
If there is space available and the program can provide educational services
appropriate for the child, order the child to attend another public school, an
alternative education program, center, a skill center, dropout prevention
program, or another public educational program;

(c)
Attend a private nonsectarian school or program including an education center.
Before ordering a child to attend an approved or certified private nonsectarian
school or program, the court shall: (i) Consider the public and private
programs available; (ii) find that placement is in the best interest of the
child; and (iii) find that the private school or program is willing to accept
the child and will not charge any fees in addition to those established by
contract with the student's school district. If the court orders the child to
enroll in a private school or program, the child's school district shall
contract with the school or program to provide educational services for the
child. The school district shall not be required to contract for a weekly rate
that exceeds the state general apportionment dollars calculated on a weekly
basis generated by the child and received by the district. A school district
shall not be required to enter into a contract that is longer than the
remainder of the school year. A school district shall not be required to enter
into or continue a contract if the child is no longer enrolled in the district;

(d)
Be referred to a community truancy board, if available; or

(e)
Submit to testing for the use of controlled substances or alcohol based on a
determination that such testing is appropriate to the circumstances and behavior
of the child and will facilitate the child's compliance with the mandatory
attendance law.

(2)
If the child fails to comply with the court order, the court may order the
child to be punished by detention, as provided in RCW 7.21.030(2)(e), or may
impose alternatives to detention such as community ((service)) restitution.
Failure by a child to comply with an order issued under this subsection shall
not be punishable by detention for a period greater than that permitted
pursuant to a civil contempt proceeding against a child under chapter 13.32A
RCW.

(3)
Any parent violating any of the provisions of either RCW 28A.225.010 or
28A.225.080 shall be fined not more than twenty-five dollars for each day of
unexcused absence from school. It shall be a defense for a parent charged with
violating RCW 28A.225.010 to show that he or she exercised reasonable diligence
in attempting to cause a child in his or her custody to attend school or that
the child's school did not perform its duties as required in RCW 28A.225.020.
The court may order the parent to provide community ((service)) restitution
instead of imposing a fine. Any fine imposed pursuant to this section may be
suspended upon the condition that a parent charged with violating RCW
28A.225.010 shall participate with the school and the child in a supervised
plan for the child's attendance at school or upon condition that the parent
attend a conference or conferences scheduled by a school for the purpose of
analyzing the causes of a child's absence.

Sec.
23. RCW
35.21.209 and 1984 c 24 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislative authority of a city or town may purchase liability insurance in an
amount it deems reasonable to protect the city or town, its officers, and
employees against liability for the wrongful acts of offenders or injury or
damage incurred by offenders in the course of court-ordered community ((service))
restitution, and may elect to treat offenders as employees and/or
workers under Title 51 RCW.

Sec.
24. RCW
35A.21.220 and 1984 c 24 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislative authority of a code city may purchase liability insurance in an
amount it deems reasonable to protect the code city, its officers, and
employees against liability for the wrongful acts of offenders or injury or
damage incurred by offenders in the course of court-ordered community ((service))
restitution, and may elect to treat offenders as employees and/or
workers under Title 51 RCW.

Sec.
25. RCW
36.16.139 and 1984 c 24 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislative authority of a county may purchase liability insurance in an amount
it deems reasonable to protect the county, its officers, and employees against
liability for the wrongful acts of offenders or injury or damage incurred by
offenders in the course of community ((service)) restitution
imposed by court order or pursuant to RCW 13.40.080. The legislative authority
of a county may elect to treat offenders as employees and/or workers under
Title 51 RCW.

Sec.
26. RCW
43.51.048 and 1996 c 263 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The commission shall establish a policy and procedures for supervising and
evaluating community ((service)) restitution activities that may
be imposed under RCW 70.93.060(3) including a description of what constitutes
satisfactory completion of community ((service)) restitution.

(2)
The commission shall inform each state park of the policy and procedures
regarding community ((service)) restitution activities, and each
state park shall then notify the commission as to whether or not the park
elects to participate in the community ((service)) restitution
program. The commission shall transmit a list notifying the district courts of
each state park that elects to participate.

Sec.
27. RCW
46.16.381 and 1998 c 294 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The director shall grant special parking privileges to any person who has a
disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk and meets one of the
following criteria, as determined by a licensed physician:

(a)
Cannot walk two hundred feet without stopping to rest;

(b)
Is severely limited in ability to walk due to arthritic, neurological, or
orthopedic condition;

(c)
Is so severely disabled, that the person cannot walk without the use of or
assistance from a brace, cane, another person, prosthetic device, wheelchair,
or other assistive device;

(d)
Uses portable oxygen;

(e)
Is restricted by lung disease to such an extent that forced expiratory
respiratory volume, when measured by spirometry is less than one liter per
second or the arterial oxygen tension is less than sixty mm/hg on room air at
rest;

(f)
Impairment by cardiovascular disease or cardiac condition to the extent that
the person's functional limitations are classified as class III or IV under
standards accepted by the American Heart Association; or

(g)
Has a disability resulting from an acute sensitivity to automobile emissions
which limits or impairs the ability to walk. The personal physician of the
applicant shall document that the disability is comparable in severity to the
others listed in this subsection.

(2)
The applications for disabled parking permits and temporary disabled parking
permits are official state documents. Knowingly providing false information in
conjunction with the application is a gross misdemeanor punishable under
chapter 9A.20 RCW. The following statement must appear on each application
form immediately below the physician's signature and immediately below the
applicant's signature: "A disabled parking permit may be issued only for
a medical necessity that severely affects mobility (RCW 46.16.381). Knowingly
providing false information on this application is a gross misdemeanor. The
penalty is up to one year in jail and a fine of up to $5,000 or both."

(3)
Persons who qualify for special parking privileges are entitled to receive from
the department of licensing a removable windshield placard bearing the
international symbol of access and an individual serial number, along with a
special identification card bearing the photograph, name, and date of birth of
the person to whom the placard is issued, and the placard's serial number. The
department shall design the placard to be displayed when the vehicle is parked
by suspending it from the rearview mirror, or in the absence of a rearview
mirror the card may be displayed on the dashboard of any vehicle used to
transport the disabled person. Instead of regular motor vehicle license
plates, disabled persons are entitled to receive special license plates bearing
the international symbol of access for one vehicle registered in the disabled
person's name. Disabled persons who are not issued the special license plates
are entitled to receive a second special placard upon submitting a written
request to the department. Persons who have been issued the parking privileges
and who are using a vehicle or are riding in a vehicle displaying the special
license plates or placard may park in places reserved for mobility disabled
persons. The director shall adopt rules providing for the issuance of special
placards and license plates to public transportation authorities, nursing homes
licensed under chapter 18.51 RCW, boarding homes licensed under chapter 18.20
RCW, senior citizen centers, private nonprofit agencies as defined in chapter
24.03 RCW, and vehicles registered with the department as cabulances that
regularly transport disabled persons who have been determined eligible for
special parking privileges provided under this section. The director may issue
special license plates for a vehicle registered in the name of the public
transportation authority, nursing home, boarding homes, senior citizen center,
private nonprofit agency, or cabulance service if the vehicle is primarily used
to transport persons with disabilities described in this section. Public
transportation authorities, nursing homes, boarding homes, senior citizen
centers, private nonprofit agencies, and cabulance services are responsible for
insuring that the special placards and license plates are not used improperly
and are responsible for all fines and penalties for improper use.

(4)
Whenever the disabled person transfers or assigns his or her interest in the
vehicle, the special license plates shall be removed from the motor vehicle.
If another vehicle is acquired by the disabled person and the vehicle owner
qualifies for a special plate, the plate shall be attached to the vehicle, and
the director shall be immediately notified of the transfer of the plate. If
another vehicle is not acquired by the disabled person, the removed plate shall
be immediately surrendered to the director.

(5)
The special license plate shall be renewed in the same manner and at the time
required for the renewal of regular motor vehicle license plates under this
chapter. No special license plate may be issued to a person who is temporarily
disabled. A person who has a condition expected to improve within six months
may be issued a temporary placard for a period not to exceed six months. If
the condition exists after six months a new temporary placard shall be issued
upon receipt of a new certification from the disabled person's physician. The
permanent parking placard and photo identification card of a disabled person
shall be renewed at least every five years, as required by the director, by
satisfactory proof of the right to continued use of the privileges. In the
event of the permit holder's death, the parking placard and photo
identification card must be immediately surrendered to the department. The
department shall match and purge its disabled permit data base with available
death record information at least every twelve months.

(6)
Each person who has been issued a permanent disabled parking permit on or
before July 1, 1998, must renew the permit no later than July 1, 2003, subject
to a schedule to be set by the department, or the permit will expire.

(7)
Additional fees shall not be charged for the issuance of the special placards
or the photo identification cards. No additional fee may be charged for the
issuance of the special license plates except the regular motor vehicle
registration fee and any other fees and taxes required to be paid upon
registration of a motor vehicle.

(8)
Any unauthorized use of the special placard, special license plate, or photo
identification card is a traffic infraction with a monetary penalty of two
hundred fifty dollars.

(9)
It is a parking infraction, with a monetary penalty of two hundred fifty
dollars for a person to make inaccessible the access aisle located next to a
space reserved for physically disabled persons. The clerk of the court shall
report all violations related to this subsection to the department.

(10)
It is a parking infraction, with a monetary penalty of two hundred fifty
dollars for any person to park a vehicle in a parking place provided on private
property without charge or on public property reserved for physically disabled
persons without a special license plate or placard. If a person is charged
with a violation, the person shall not be determined to have committed an
infraction if the person produces in court or before the court appearance the
special license plate or placard required under this section. A local
jurisdiction providing nonmetered, on-street parking places reserved for
physically disabled persons may impose by ordinance time restrictions of no
less than four hours on the use of these parking places. A local jurisdiction
may impose by ordinance time restrictions of no less than four hours on the use
of nonreserved, on-street parking spaces by vehicles displaying the special
parking placards. All time restrictions must be clearly posted.

(11)
The penalties imposed under subsections (9) and (10) of this section shall be
used by that local jurisdiction exclusively for law enforcement. The court may
also impose an additional penalty sufficient to reimburse the local
jurisdiction for any costs it may have incurred in removal and storage of the
improperly parked vehicle.

(12)
Except as provided by subsection (2) of this section, it is a traffic
infraction with a monetary penalty of two hundred fifty dollars for any person
willfully to obtain a special license plate, placard, or photo identification
card in a manner other than that established under this section.

(13)(a)
A law enforcement agency authorized to enforce parking laws may appoint
volunteers, with a limited commission, to issue notices of infractions for
violations of this section or RCW 46.61.581. Volunteers must be at least
twenty-one years of age. The law enforcement agency appointing volunteers may
establish any other qualifications the agency deems desirable.

(b)
An agency appointing volunteers under this section must provide training to the
volunteers before authorizing them to issue notices of infractions.

(c)
A notice of infraction issued by a volunteer appointed under this subsection
has the same force and effect as a notice of infraction issued by a police
officer for the same offense.

(d)
A police officer or a volunteer may request a person to show the person's photo
identification card or special parking placard when investigating the
possibility of a violation of this section. If the request is refused, the
person in charge of the vehicle may be issued a notice of infraction for a
violation of this section.

(14)
For second or subsequent violations of this section, in addition to a monetary
fine, the violator must complete a minimum of forty hours of:

(a)
Community ((service)) restitution for a nonprofit organization
that serves the disabled community or persons having disabling diseases; or

(b)
Any other community ((service)) restitution that may sensitize
the violator to the needs and obstacles faced by persons who have disabilities.

(15)
The court may not suspend more than one-half of any fine imposed under subsection
(8), (9), (10), or (12) of this section.

Sec.
28. RCW
46.20.031 and 1995 c 219 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department shall not issue a driver's license hereunder:

(1)
To any person who is under the age of sixteen years;

(2)
To any person whose license has been suspended during such suspension, nor to
any person whose license has been revoked, except as provided in RCW 46.20.311;

(3)
To any person who has been evaluated by a program approved by the department of
social and health services as being an alcoholic, drug addict, alcohol abuser,
and/or drug abuser: PROVIDED, That a license may be issued if the department
determines that such person has been granted a deferred prosecution, pursuant
to chapter 10.05 RCW, or is satisfactorily participating in or has successfully
completed an alcohol or drug abuse treatment program approved by the department
of social and health services and has established control of his or her alcohol
and/or drug abuse problem;

(4)
To any person who has previously been adjudged to be mentally ill or insane, or
to be incompetent due to any mental disability or disease, and who has not at
the time of application been restored to competency by the methods provided by
law: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That no person so adjudged shall be denied a license
for such cause if the superior court should find him able to operate a motor
vehicle with safety upon the highways during such incompetency;

(5)
To any person who is required by this chapter to take an examination, unless
such person shall have successfully passed such examination;

(6)
To any person who is required under the laws of this state to deposit proof of
financial responsibility and who has not deposited such proof;

(7)
To any person when the department has good and substantial evidence to
reasonably conclude that such person by reason of physical or mental disability
would not be able to operate a motor vehicle with safety upon the highways;
subject to review by a court of competent jurisdiction;

(8)
To a person when the department has been notified by a court that the person
has violated his or her written promise to appear, respond, or comply regarding
a notice of infraction issued for a violation of RCW 46.55.105, unless the department
has received notice from the court showing that the person has been found not
to have committed the violation of RCW 46.55.105, or that the person has paid
all monetary penalties owing, including completion of community ((service))
restitution, and that the court is satisfied that the person has made
restitution as provided by RCW 46.55.105(2).

Sec.
29. RCW
46.30.020 and 1991 sp.s. c 25 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
No person may operate a motor vehicle subject to registration under chapter
46.16 RCW in this state unless the person is insured under a motor vehicle
liability policy with liability limits of at least the amounts provided in RCW
46.29.090, is self-insured as provided in RCW 46.29.630, is covered by a
certificate of deposit in conformance with RCW 46.29.550, or is covered by a
liability bond of at least the amounts provided in RCW 46.29.090. Written
proof of financial responsibility for motor vehicle operation must be provided
on the request of a law enforcement officer in the format specified under RCW
46.30.030.

(b)
A person who drives a motor vehicle that is required to be registered in
another state that requires drivers and owners of vehicles in that state to
maintain insurance or financial responsibility shall, when requested by a law
enforcement officer, provide evidence of financial responsibility or insurance
as is required by the laws of the state in which the vehicle is registered.

(c)
When asked to do so by a law enforcement officer, failure to display an
insurance identification card as specified under RCW 46.30.030 creates a
presumption that the person does not have motor vehicle insurance.

(d)
Failure to provide proof of motor vehicle insurance is a traffic infraction and
is subject to penalties as set by the supreme court under RCW 46.63.110 or
community ((service)) restitution.

(2)
If a person cited for a violation of subsection (1) of this section appears in
person before the court and provides written evidence that at the time the
person was cited, he or she was in compliance with the financial responsibility
requirements of subsection (1) of this section, the citation shall be
dismissed. In lieu of personal appearance, a person cited for a violation of
subsection (1) of this section may, before the date scheduled for the person's
appearance before the court, submit by mail to the court written evidence that
at the time the person was cited, he or she was in compliance with the
financial responsibility requirements of subsection (1) of this section, in
which case the citation shall be dismissed without cost, except that the court
may assess court administrative costs of twenty-five dollars at the time of
dismissal.

(3)
The provisions of this chapter shall not govern:

(a)
The operation of a motor vehicle registered under RCW 46.16.305(1), governed by
RCW 46.16.020, or registered with the Washington utilities and transportation
commission as common or contract carriers; or

(b)
The operation of a motorcycle as defined in RCW 46.04.330, a motor-driven cycle
as defined in RCW 46.04.332, or a moped as defined in RCW 46.04.304.

(4) RCW 46.29.490 shall not be deemed to govern all motor vehicle
liability policies required by this chapter but only those certified for the
purposes stated in chapter 46.29 RCW.

Sec.
30. RCW
46.63.120 and 1979 ex.s. c 136 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
An order entered after the receipt of a response which does not contest the
determination, or after it has been established at a hearing that the
infraction was committed, or after a hearing for the purpose of explaining
mitigating circumstances is civil in nature.

(2)
The court may include in the order the imposition of any penalty authorized by
the provisions of this chapter for the commission of an infraction. The court
may, in its discretion, waive, reduce, or suspend the monetary penalty
prescribed for the infraction. At the person's request the court may order
performance of a number of hours of community ((service)) restitution
in lieu of a monetary penalty, at the rate of the then state minimum wage per
hour.

Sec.
31. RCW
66.20.200 and 1994 c 201 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

It
shall be unlawful for the owner of a card of identification to transfer the
card to any other person for the purpose of aiding such person to procure
alcoholic beverages from any licensee or store employee. Any person who shall
permit his or her card of identification to be used by another or transfer such
card to another for the purpose of aiding such transferee to obtain alcoholic
beverages from a licensee or store employee or gain admission to a premises or
portion of a premises classified by the board as off-limits to persons under
twenty-one years of age, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as
provided by RCW 9A.20.021, except that a minimum fine of two hundred fifty
dollars shall be imposed and any sentence requiring community ((service))
restitution shall require not fewer than twenty-five hours of ((such
service)) community restitution. Any person not entitled thereto
who unlawfully procures or has issued or transferred to him or her a card of
identification, and any person who possesses a card of identification not
issued to him or her, and any person who makes any false statement on any
certification card required by RCW 66.20.190, as now or hereafter amended, to
be signed by him or her, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as
provided by RCW 9A.20.021, except that a minimum fine of two hundred fifty
dollars shall be imposed and any sentence requiring community ((service))
restitution shall require not fewer than twenty-five hours of ((such
service)) community restitution.

Sec.
32. RCW
66.44.291 and 1987 c 101 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
person between the ages of eighteen and twenty, inclusive, who is convicted of
a violation of RCW 66.44.290 is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided
by RCW 9A.20.021, except that a minimum fine of two hundred fifty dollars shall
be imposed and any sentence requiring community ((service)) restitution
shall require not fewer than twenty-five hours of ((such service)) community
restitution.

Sec.
33. RCW
66.44.325 and 1987 c 101 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person who transfers in any manner an identification of age to
a minor for the purpose of permitting such minor to obtain alcoholic beverages
shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided by RCW 9A.20.021,
except that a minimum fine of two hundred fifty dollars shall be imposed and
any sentence requiring community ((service)) restitution shall
require not fewer than twenty-five hours of ((such service)) community
restitution: PROVIDED, That corroborative testimony of a witness other
than the minor shall be a condition precedent to conviction.

Sec.
34. RCW
69.50.425 and 1989 c 271 s 105 are each amended to read as follows:

A
person who is convicted of a misdemeanor violation of any provision of this
chapter shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than twenty-four
consecutive hours, and by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars.
On a second or subsequent conviction, the fine shall not be less than five
hundred dollars. These fines shall be in addition to any other fine or penalty
imposed. Unless the court finds that the imposition of the minimum
imprisonment will pose a substantial risk to the defendant's physical or mental
well-being or that local jail facilities are in an overcrowded condition, the
minimum term of imprisonment shall not be suspended or deferred. If the court
finds such risk or overcrowding exists, it shall sentence the defendant to a
minimum of forty hours of community ((service)) restitution. If
a minimum term of imprisonment is suspended or deferred, the court shall state
in writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts
upon which the suspension or deferral is based. Unless the court finds the
person to be indigent, the minimum fine shall not be suspended or deferred.

Sec.
35. RCW
70.93.060 and 1997 c 159 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No person shall throw, drop, deposit, discard, or otherwise dispose of litter
upon any public property in the state or upon private property in this state
not owned by him or her or in the waters of this state whether from a vehicle
or otherwise including but not limited to any public highway, public park,
beach, campground, forest land, recreational area, trailer park, highway, road,
street, or alley except:

(a)
When the property is designated by the state or its agencies or political
subdivisions for the disposal of garbage and refuse, and the person is
authorized to use such property for that purpose;

(b)
Into a litter receptacle in a manner that will prevent litter from being
carried away or deposited by the elements upon any part of said private or
public property or waters.

(2)(a)
Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, it is a class 3 civil
infraction as provided in RCW 7.80.120 for a person to litter in an amount less
than or equal to one cubic foot.

(b)
It is a class 1 civil infraction as provided in RCW 7.80.120 for a person to
litter in an amount greater than one cubic foot. Unless suspended or modified
by a court, the person shall also pay a litter cleanup fee of twenty-five
dollars per cubic foot of litter. The court may, in addition to or in lieu of
part or all of the cleanup fee, order the person to pick up and remove litter
from the property, with prior permission of the legal owner or, in the case of
public property, of the agency managing the property.

(3)
If the violation occurs in a state park, the court shall, in addition to any
other penalties assessed, order the person to perform twenty-four hours of
community ((service)) restitution in the state park where the
violation occurred if the state park has stated an intent to participate as
provided in RCW 43.51.048(2).

(4)
It is a class 1 civil infraction as provided in RCW 7.80.120 for a person to
discard, in violation of this section, a cigarette, cigar, or other tobacco
product that is capable of starting a fire.

Sec.
36. RCW
70.93.250 and 1998 c 257 s 10 and 1998 c 245 s 128 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall provide funding to local units of government to establish,
conduct, and evaluate community ((service)) restitution and other
programs for waste reduction, litter and illegal dump cleanup, and recycling.
Programs eligible for funding under this section shall include, but not be
limited to, programs established pursuant to RCW 72.09.260.

(2)
Funds may be offered for costs associated with community waste reduction,
litter cleanup and prevention, and recycling activities. The funding program
must be flexible, allowing local governments to use funds broadly to meet their
needs to reduce waste, control litter and illegal dumping, and promote
recycling. Local governments are required to contribute resources or in-kind
services. The department shall evaluate funding requests from local government
according to the same criteria as those developed in RCW 70.93.220, provide
funds according to the effectiveness and efficiency of local government litter
control programs, and monitor the results of all local government programs
under this section.

(3)
Local governments shall report information as requested by the department in
funding agreements entered into by the department and a local government. The
department shall report to the appropriate standing committees of the
legislature by December of even-numbered years on the effectiveness of local government
waste reduction, litter, and recycling programs funded under this section.

Sec.
37. RCW
70.155.080 and 1998 c 133 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person under the age of eighteen who purchases or attempts to purchase,
possesses, or obtains or attempts to obtain cigarettes or tobacco products
commits a class 3 civil infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW and is subject to a
fine as set out in chapter 7.80 RCW or participation in up to four hours of
community ((service)) restitution, or both. The court may also
require participation in a smoking cessation program. This provision does not
apply if a person under the age of eighteen, with parental authorization, is
participating in a controlled purchase as part of a liquor control board, law
enforcement, or local health department activity.

(2)
Municipal and district courts within the state have jurisdiction for
enforcement of this section.

Sec.
38. RCW
72.09.060 and 1989 c 185 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of corrections may be organized into such divisions or offices as
the secretary may determine, but shall include divisions for (1) correctional
industries, (2) prisons and other custodial institutions and (3) probation,
parole, community ((service)) restitution, restitution, and other
nonincarcerative sanctions. The secretary shall have at least one person on
his or her staff who shall have the responsibility for developing a
program which encourages the use of volunteers, for citizen advisory groups,
and for similar public involvement programs in the corrections area. Minimum
qualification for staff assigned to public involvement responsibilities shall
include previous experience in working with volunteers or volunteer agencies.

Sec.
39. RCW
72.09.100 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 19 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

It
is the intent of the legislature to vest in the department the power to provide
for a comprehensive inmate work program and to remove statutory and other
restrictions which have limited work programs in the past. For purposes of
establishing such a comprehensive program, the legislature recommends that the
department consider adopting any or all, or any variation of, the following
classes of work programs:

(1)
CLASS I: FREE VENTURE INDUSTRIES. The employer model industries in this class
shall be operated and managed in total or in part by any profit or nonprofit
organization pursuant to an agreement between the organization and the
department. The organization shall produce goods or services for sale to both
the public and private sector.

The
customer model industries in this class shall be operated and managed by the
department to provide Washington state manufacturers or businesses with
products or services currently produced or provided by out-of-state or foreign
suppliers. The correctional industries board of directors shall review these
proposed industries before the department contracts to provide such products or
services. The review shall include an analysis of the potential impact of the
proposed products and services on the Washington state business community and
labor market.

The
department of corrections shall supply appropriate security and custody
services without charge to the participating firms.

Inmates
who work in free venture industries shall do so at their own choice. They
shall be paid a wage comparable to the wage paid for work of a similar nature
in the locality in which the industry is located, as determined by the director
of correctional industries. If the director cannot reasonably determine the
comparable wage, then the pay shall not be less than the federal minimum wage.

An
inmate who is employed in the class I program of correctional industries shall
not be eligible for unemployment compensation benefits pursuant to any of the
provisions of Title 50 RCW until released on parole or discharged.

(2)
CLASS II: TAX REDUCTION INDUSTRIES. Industries in this class shall be
state-owned and operated enterprises designed to reduce the costs for goods and
services for tax-supported agencies and for nonprofit organizations. The
industries selected for development within this class shall, as much as
possible, match the available pool of inmate work skills and aptitudes with the
work opportunities in the free community. The industries shall be closely
patterned after private sector industries but with the objective of reducing
public support costs rather than making a profit. The products and services of
this industry, including purchased products and services necessary for a
complete product line, may be sold to public agencies, to nonprofit
organizations, and to private contractors when the goods purchased will be
ultimately used by a public agency or a nonprofit organization. Clothing
manufactured by an industry in this class may be donated to nonprofit
organizations that provide clothing free of charge to low-income persons. Correctional
industries products and services shall be reviewed by the correctional
industries board of directors before offering such products and services for
sale to private contractors. The board of directors shall conduct a yearly
marketing review of the products and services offered under this subsection.
Such review shall include an analysis of the potential impact of the proposed
products and services on the Washington state business community. To avoid
waste or spoilage and consequent loss to the state, when there is no public
sector market for such goods, byproducts and surpluses of timber, agricultural,
and animal husbandry enterprises may be sold to private persons, at private
sale. Surplus byproducts and surpluses of timber, agricultural and animal
husbandry enterprises that cannot be sold to public agencies or to private
persons may be donated to nonprofit organizations. All sales of surplus
products shall be carried out in accordance with rules prescribed by the
secretary.

Security
and custody services shall be provided without charge by the department of
corrections.

Inmates
working in this class of industries shall do so at their own choice and shall
be paid for their work on a gratuity scale which shall not exceed the wage paid
for work of a similar nature in the locality in which the industry is located
and which is approved by the director of correctional industries.

Subject
to approval of the correctional industries board, provisions of RCW 41.06.380
prohibiting contracting out work performed by classified employees shall not
apply to contracts with Washington state businesses entered into by the
department of corrections through class II industries.

(3)
CLASS III: INSTITUTIONAL SUPPORT INDUSTRIES. Industries in this class shall
be operated by the department of corrections. They shall be designed and
managed to accomplish the following objectives:

(a)
Whenever possible, to provide basic work training and experience so that the
inmate will be able to qualify for better work both within correctional
industries and the free community. It is not intended that an inmate's work
within this class of industries should be his or her final and total work
experience as an inmate.

(b)
Whenever possible, to provide forty hours of work or work training per week.

(c)
Whenever possible, to offset tax and other public support costs.

Supervising,
management, and custody staff shall be employees of the department.

All
able and eligible inmates who are assigned work and who are not working in
other classes of industries shall work in this class.

Except
for inmates who work in work training programs, inmates in this class shall be
paid for their work in accordance with an inmate gratuity scale. The scale
shall be adopted by the secretary of corrections.

(4)
CLASS IV: COMMUNITY WORK INDUSTRIES. Industries in this class shall be
operated by the department of corrections. They shall be designed and managed
to provide services in the inmate's resident community at a reduced cost. The
services shall be provided to public agencies, to persons who are poor or
infirm, or to nonprofit organizations.

Inmates
in this program shall reside in facilities owned by, contracted for, or
licensed by the department of corrections. A unit of local government shall provide
work supervision services without charge to the state and shall pay the
inmate's wage.

The
department of corrections shall reimburse participating units of local
government for liability and workers compensation insurance costs.

Inmates
who work in this class of industries shall do so at their own choice and shall
receive a gratuity which shall not exceed the wage paid for work of a similar
nature in the locality in which the industry is located.

(5)
CLASS V: COMMUNITY ((SERVICE)) RESTITUTION PROGRAMS. Programs
in this class shall be subject to supervision by the department of
corrections. The purpose of this class of industries is to enable an inmate,
placed on community supervision, to work off all or part of a community ((service))
restitution order as ordered by the sentencing court.

Employment
shall be in a community ((service)) restitution program operated
by the state, local units of government, or a nonprofit agency.

To
the extent that funds are specifically made available for such purposes, the
department of corrections shall reimburse nonprofit agencies for workers
compensation insurance costs.

Sec.
40. RCW
72.09.260 and 1990 c 66 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall assist local units of government in establishing community
((service)) restitution programs for litter cleanup. Community
((service)) restitution litter cleanup programs must include the
following: (a) Procedures for documenting the number of community ((service))
restitution hours worked in litter cleanup by each offender; (b) plans
to coordinate litter cleanup activities with local governmental entities
responsible for roadside and park maintenance; (c) insurance coverage for
offenders during litter cleanup activities pursuant to RCW 51.12.045; (d)
provision of adequate safety equipment and, if needed, weather protection gear;
and (e) provision for including felons and misdemeanants in the program.

(2)
Community ((service)) restitution programs established under this
section shall involve, but not be limited to, persons convicted of nonviolent,
drug-related offenses.

(3)
Nothing in this section shall diminish the department's authority to place
offenders in community ((service)) restitution programs or to determine
the suitability of offenders for specific programs.

(4) As used in this section, "litter cleanup" includes
cleanup and removal of solid waste that is illegally dumped.

---
END ---