BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 9.96 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Every person convicted of a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor offense who has
completed all of the terms of the sentence for the misdemeanor or gross
misdemeanor offense may apply to the sentencing court for a vacation of the
applicant's record of conviction for the offense. If the court finds the
applicant meets the tests prescribed in subsection (2) of this section, the
court may in its discretion clear the record of conviction by: (a) Permitting
the applicant to withdraw the applicant's plea of guilty and to enter a plea of
not guilty; or (b) if the applicant has been convicted after a plea of not
guilty, the court setting aside the verdict of guilty; and (c) the court
dismissing the information or indictment against the applicant.

(2)
An applicant may not have the record of conviction for a misdemeanor or gross
misdemeanor offense cleared if any one of the following is present: (a) There
are any criminal charges against the applicant pending in any court of this
state or another state, or in any federal court; (b) the offense was a violent
offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 or an attempt to commit a violent offense;
(c) the offense was a violation of RCW 46.61.502 (Driving while under the
influence), 46.61.504 (Actual physical control while under the influence), or
9.91.020 (Operating a railroad, etc. while intoxicated); (d) the offense was a
domestic violence offense as defined in RCW 10.99.020; (e) the offense was any
misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor attempt to commit a sex offense as defined in
RCW 9.94A.030; (f) the offense was any misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor
violation, including attempt, of chapter 9.68 (Obscenity and pornography) or
9.68A (Sexual exploitation of children) RCW; (g) the offense was a violation of
any of the following: RCW 9.12.010 (Barratry), 9.12.020 (Buying, demanding, or
promising reward by district judge or deputy), 9.16.030 (Counterfeiting
trademark, brand, etc.), 9.18.140 (Bidding offenses, false bidding), 9.24.010
(Fraud in stock subscriptions), 9.24.040 (Corporation doing business without
license), 9.38.020 (False representation concerning title), 9.41.040 (Unlawful
possession of firearms), 9.41.050 (Carrying firearms), 9.41.230 (Aiming or
discharging firearms), 9.41.250 (Dangerous weapons), 9.46.170 (Gambling: False
or misleading entries or statements, refusal to produce records), 9.46.190
(Gambling: Violations relating to fraud or deceit), 9.46.196 (Gambling:
Cheating), 9.46.222 (Professional gambling 3), 9.51.010 (Misconduct of officer
drawing jury), 9.51.030 (Misconduct of officer in charge of a jury), 9A.46.080
(Court order restricting contact), 9A.60.040 (Criminal impersonation),
9A.60.050 (False swearing under oath), 9A.72.140 (Jury tampering), 9A.72.150
(Tampering with physical evidence), or 9A.88.010 (Indecent exposure); (h) the
applicant has been convicted of a new crime in this state, another state, or
federal court since the date the applicant completed all of the terms of the
sentence for the misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor offense; or (i) less than five
years have passed since the date the applicant completed all of the terms of
the sentence for the misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor offense.

(3)
Once the court vacates a record of conviction under subsection (1) of this
section, the person shall be released from all penalties and disabilities
resulting from the offense, except that the fact that the person had been
convicted of the offense may be used in any subsequent criminal prosecution
consistent with any other legal use and may be included in the person's
criminal history for purposes of determining a sentence in any subsequent
conviction. For all other purposes, including responding to questions on
employment applications, a person whose conviction has been vacated may state
that the person has never been convicted of that crime.

(4) All costs incurred by the court and probation services shall be
paid by the person making the motion to vacate the record unless a
determination is made pursuant to chapter 10.101 RCW that the person making the
motion is indigent, at the time the motion is brought.

Sec.
2. RCW
9.94A.230 and 1987 c 486 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Every offender who has been discharged under RCW 9.94A.220 may apply to the
sentencing court for a vacation of the offender's record of conviction. If the
court finds the offender meets the tests prescribed in subsection (2) of this
section, the court may in its discretion clear the record of conviction
by: (a) Permitting the offender to withdraw the offender's plea of guilty and
to enter a plea of not guilty; or (b) if the offender has been convicted after
a plea of not guilty, ((by)) the court setting aside the verdict of
guilty; and (c) ((by)) the court dismissing the information or
indictment against the offender.

(2)
An offender may not have the record of conviction cleared if any one of the
following is present: (a) There are any criminal charges against the
offender pending in any court of this state or another state, or in any federal
court; (b) the offense was a violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; (c) the
offense was a domestic violence offense as defined in RCW 10.99.020; (d)
the offense was a crime against persons as defined in RCW 43.43.830; (((d)))
(e) the offender has been convicted of a new crime in this state,
another state, or federal court since the date of the offender's discharge
under RCW 9.94A.220; (((e))) (f) the offense is a class B felony
and less than ten years have passed since the date the applicant was discharged
under RCW 9.94A.220; ((and (f))) or (g) the offense was a class C
felony and less than five years have passed since the date the applicant was
discharged under RCW 9.94A.220.

(3)
Once the court vacates a record of conviction under subsection (1) of this section,
the fact that the offender has been convicted of the offense shall not be
included in the offender's criminal history for purposes of determining a
sentence in any subsequent conviction, and the offender shall be released from
all penalties and disabilities resulting from the offense. For all purposes,
including responding to questions on employment applications, an offender whose
conviction has been vacated may state that the offender has never been
convicted of that crime. Nothing in this section affects or prevents the use
of an offender's prior conviction in a later criminal prosecution.

(4)
All costs incurred by the court and probation services shall be paid by the
person making the motion to vacate the record unless a determination is made pursuant
to chapter 10.101 RCW that the person making the motion is indigent, at the
time the motion is brought.

Sec.
3. RCW
13.50.050 and 1999 c 198 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
This section governs records relating to the commission of juvenile offenses,
including records relating to diversions.

(2)
The official juvenile court file of any alleged or proven juvenile offender
shall be open to public inspection, unless sealed pursuant to subsection (12)
of this section.

(3)
All records other than the official juvenile court file are confidential and
may be released only as provided in this section, RCW 13.50.010, 13.40.215, and
4.24.550.

(4)
Except as otherwise provided in this section and RCW 13.50.010, records
retained or produced by any juvenile justice or care agency may be released to
other participants in the juvenile justice or care system only when an
investigation or case involving the juvenile in question is being pursued by
the other participant or when that other participant is assigned the
responsibility for supervising the juvenile.

(5)
Except as provided in RCW 4.24.550, information not in an official juvenile
court file concerning a juvenile or a juvenile's family may be released to the
public only when that information could not reasonably be expected to identify
the juvenile or the juvenile's family.

(6)
Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the release, to the
juvenile or his or her attorney, of law enforcement and prosecuting attorneys'
records pertaining to investigation, diversion, and prosecution of juvenile
offenses shall be governed by the rules of discovery and other rules of law
applicable in adult criminal investigations and prosecutions.

(7)
Upon the decision to arrest or the arrest, law enforcement and prosecuting
attorneys may cooperate with schools in releasing information to a school
pertaining to the investigation, diversion, and prosecution of a juvenile
attending the school. Upon the decision to arrest or the arrest, incident
reports may be released unless releasing the records would jeopardize the
investigation or prosecution or endanger witnesses. If release of incident
reports would jeopardize the investigation or prosecution or endanger
witnesses, law enforcement and prosecuting attorneys may release information to
the maximum extent possible to assist schools in protecting other students,
staff, and school property.

(8)
The juvenile court and the prosecutor may set up and maintain a central
record-keeping system which may receive information on all alleged juvenile
offenders against whom a complaint has been filed pursuant to RCW 13.40.070
whether or not their cases are currently pending before the court. The central
record-keeping system may be computerized. If a complaint has been referred to
a diversion unit, the diversion unit shall promptly report to the juvenile
court or the prosecuting attorney when the juvenile has agreed to diversion.
An offense shall not be reported as criminal history in any central
record-keeping system without notification by the diversion unit of the date on
which the offender agreed to diversion.

(9)
Upon request of the victim of a crime or the victim's immediate family, the
identity of an alleged or proven juvenile offender alleged or found to have
committed a crime against the victim and the identity of the alleged or proven
juvenile offender's parent, guardian, or custodian and the circumstance of the
alleged or proven crime shall be released to the victim of the crime or the
victim's immediate family.

(10)
Subject to the rules of discovery applicable in adult criminal prosecutions,
the juvenile offense records of an adult criminal defendant or witness in an
adult criminal proceeding shall be released upon request to prosecution and
defense counsel after a charge has actually been filed. The juvenile offense
records of any adult convicted of a crime and placed under the supervision of
the adult corrections system shall be released upon request to the adult
corrections system.

(11)
In any case in which an information has been filed pursuant to RCW 13.40.100 or
a complaint has been filed with the prosecutor and referred for diversion
pursuant to RCW 13.40.070, the person the subject of the information or
complaint may file a motion with the court to have the court vacate its order
and findings, if any, and, subject to subsection (23) of this section, order
the sealing of the official juvenile court file, the social file, and records
of the court and of any other agency in the case.

(12)
The court shall grant the motion to seal records made pursuant to subsection
(11) of this section if it finds that:

(a)
For class B offenses other than sex offenses, since the last date of release
from confinement, including full-time residential treatment, if any, or entry
of disposition, the person has spent ten consecutive years in the community
without committing any offense or crime that subsequently results in
conviction. For class C offenses, gross misdemeanors, and misdemeanors,
other than sex offenses, since the last date of release from confinement,
including full-time residential treatment, if any, or entry of disposition, the
person has spent five consecutive years in the community without committing any
offense or crime that subsequently results in conviction;

(b)
No proceeding is pending against the moving party seeking the conviction of a
juvenile offense or a criminal offense;

(c)
No proceeding is pending seeking the formation of a diversion agreement with
that person;

(d)
The person has not been convicted of a class A or sex offense; and

(e)
Full restitution has been paid.

(13)
The person making a motion pursuant to subsection (11) of this section shall
give reasonable notice of the motion to the prosecution and to any person or
agency whose files are sought to be sealed.

(14)
If the court grants the motion to seal made pursuant to subsection (11) of this
section, it shall, subject to subsection (23) of this section, order sealed the
official juvenile court file, the social file, and other records relating to
the case as are named in the order. Thereafter, the proceedings in the case
shall be treated as if they never occurred, and the subject of the records may
reply accordingly to any inquiry about the events, records of which are
sealed. Any agency shall reply to any inquiry concerning confidential or
sealed records that records are confidential, and no information can be given
about the existence or nonexistence of records concerning an individual.

(15)
Inspection of the files and records included in the order to seal may
thereafter be permitted only by order of the court upon motion made by the
person who is the subject of the information or complaint, except as otherwise
provided in RCW 13.50.010(8) and subsection (23) of this section.

(16)
Any adjudication of a juvenile offense or a crime subsequent to sealing has the
effect of nullifying the sealing order. Any charging of an adult felony
subsequent to the sealing has the effect of nullifying the sealing order for
the purposes of chapter 9.94A RCW.

(17)
A person eighteen years of age or older whose criminal history consists of only
one referral for diversion may request that the court order the records in that
case destroyed. The request shall be granted, subject to subsection (23) of
this section, if the court finds that two years have elapsed since completion
of the diversion agreement.

(18)
If the court grants the motion to destroy records made pursuant to subsection
(17) of this section, it shall, subject to subsection (23) of this section,
order the official juvenile court file, the social file, and any other records
named in the order to be destroyed.

(19)
The person making the motion pursuant to subsection (17) of this section shall
give reasonable notice of the motion to the prosecuting attorney and to any
agency whose records are sought to be destroyed.

(20)
Any juvenile to whom the provisions of this section may apply shall be given
written notice of his or her rights under this section at the time of his or
her disposition hearing or during the diversion process.

(21)
Nothing in this section may be construed to prevent a crime victim or a member
of the victim's family from divulging the identity of the alleged or proven
juvenile offender or his or her family when necessary in a civil proceeding.

(22)
Any juvenile justice or care agency may, subject to the limitations in
subsection (23) of this section and (a) and (b) of this subsection, develop
procedures for the routine destruction of records relating to juvenile offenses
and diversions.

(a)
Records may be routinely destroyed only when the person the subject of the
information or complaint has attained twenty-three years of age or older, or is
eighteen years of age or older and his or her criminal history consists
entirely of one diversion agreement and two years have passed since completion
of the agreement.

(b)
The court may not routinely destroy the official juvenile court file or
recordings or transcripts of any proceedings.

(23)
No identifying information held by the Washington state patrol in accordance
with chapter 43.43 RCW is subject to destruction or sealing under this
section. For the purposes of this subsection, identifying information includes
photographs, fingerprints, palmprints, soleprints, toeprints and any other data
that identifies a person by physical characteristics, name, birthdate or
address, but does not include information regarding criminal activity, arrest,
charging, diversion, conviction or other information about a person's treatment
by the criminal justice system or about the person's behavior.

(24)
Information identifying child victims under age eighteen who are victims of
sexual assaults by juvenile offenders is confidential and not subject to
release to the press or public without the permission of the child victim or
the child's legal guardian. Identifying information includes the child
victim's name, addresses, location, photographs, and in cases in which the
child victim is a relative of the alleged perpetrator, identification of the
relationship between the child and the alleged perpetrator. Information identifying
a child victim of sexual assault may be released to law enforcement,
prosecutors, judges, defense attorneys, or private or governmental agencies
that provide services to the child victim of sexual assault.

(25) All costs incurred by the court and probation services
shall be paid by the person making the motion unless a determination is made
pursuant to chapter 10.101 RCW that the person making the motion is indigent,
at the time the motion is brought.

---
END ---