BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.80.010 and 1995 c 256 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Vehicle wrecker" means every person, firm, partnership, association,
or corporation engaged in the business of buying, selling, or dealing in
vehicles of a type required to be licensed under the laws of this state, for
the purpose of wrecking, dismantling, disassembling, or substantially changing
the form of a vehicle, or who buys or sells integral second-hand parts of component
material thereof, in whole or in part, or who deals in second-hand vehicle
parts.

(2)
"Core" means a major component part received by a vehicle wrecker
in exchange for a like part sold by the wrecker and is not resold as a major
component part except for scrap metal value or for remanufacture.

(3)
"Established place of business" means a building or enclosure which
the vehicle wrecker occupies either continuously or at regular periods and
where his books and records are kept and business is transacted and which must
conform with zoning regulations.

(((3)))
(4) "Interim owner" means the owner of a vehicle who has the
original certificate of ownership for the vehicle, which certificate has been
released by the person named on the certificate and assigned to the person
offering to sell the vehicle to the wrecker.

(5)
"Major component part" includes at least each of the following
vehicle parts: (a) Engines and short blocks; (b) frame; (c) transmission
and/or transfer case; (d) cab; (e) door; (f) front or rear differential; (g)
front or rear clip; (h) quarter panel; (i) truck bed or box; (j) seat; (k)
hood; (l) bumper; (m) fender; and (n) airbag. The director may supplement this
list by rule.

(((4)))
(6) "Wrecked vehicle" means a vehicle which is disassembled or
dismantled or a vehicle which is acquired with the intent to dismantle or
disassemble and never again to operate as a vehicle, or a vehicle which has
sustained such damage that its cost to repair exceeds the fair market value of
a like vehicle which has not sustained such damage, or a damaged vehicle whose
salvage value plus cost to repair equals or exceeds its fair market value, if
repaired, or a vehicle which has sustained such damage or deterioration that it
may not lawfully operate upon the highways of this state for which the salvage
value plus cost to repair exceeds its fair market value, if repaired; further,
it is presumed that a vehicle is a wreck if it has sustained such damage or
deterioration that it may not lawfully operate upon the highways of this state.

Sec.
2. RCW
46.80.080 and 1995 c 256 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Every vehicle wrecker shall maintain books or files in which the wrecker shall
keep a record and a description of:

(a)
Every vehicle wrecked, dismantled, disassembled, or substantially altered by
the wrecker; and

(b)
Every major component part acquired by the wrecker; together with a bill of
sale signed by a seller whose identity has been verified and the name and
address of the person, firm, or corporation from whom the wrecker purchased the
vehicle or part. Major component parts other than cores shall be
further identified by the vehicle identification number of the vehicle from
which the part came.

(2)
The record shall also contain the following data regarding the wrecked or
acquired vehicle or vehicle that is the source of a major component part other
than a core:

(a)
The certificate of title number (if previously titled in this or any other
state);

(b)
Name of state where last registered;

(c)
Number of the last license number plate issued;

(d)
Name of vehicle;

(e)
Motor or identification number and serial number of the vehicle;

(f)
Date purchased;

(g)
Disposition of the motor and chassis;

(h)
Yard number assigned by the licensee to the vehicle or major component part,
which shall also appear on the identified vehicle or part; and

(i)
Such other information as the department may require.

(3)
The records shall also contain a bill of sale signed by the seller for other
minor component parts acquired by the licensee, identifying the seller by name,
address, and date of sale.

(4)
The records shall be maintained by the licensee at his or her established place
of business for a period of three years from the date of acquisition.

(5)
The record is subject to inspection at all times during regular business hours
by members of the police department, sheriff's office, members of the
Washington state patrol, or officers or employees of the department.

(6)
A vehicle wrecker shall also maintain a similar record of all disabled vehicles
that have been towed or transported to the ((motor)) vehicle wrecker's
place of business or to other places designated by the owner of the vehicle or
his or her representative. This record shall specify the name and description
of the vehicle, name of owner, number of license plate, condition of the
vehicle and place to which it was towed or transported.

(7)
Failure to comply with this section is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec.
3. RCW
46.80.090 and 1995 c 256 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

Within thirty days after acquiring a vehicle, the vehicle wrecker
shall furnish a written report to the department. This report shall be in such
form as the department shall prescribe and shall be accompanied by evidence of
ownership as determined by the department. No vehicle wrecker may acquire a
vehicle, including a vehicle from an interim owner, without first
obtaining evidence of ownership as determined by the department. For a
vehicle from an interim owner, the evidence of ownership may not require that a
title be issued in the name of the interim owner as required by RCW 46.12.101.
The vehicle wrecker shall furnish a monthly report of all acquired vehicles.
This report shall be made on forms prescribed by the department and contain
such information as the department may require. This statement shall be signed
by the vehicle wrecker or an authorized representative and the facts therein
sworn to before a notary public, or before an officer or employee of the
department designated by the director to administer oaths or acknowledge
signatures, pursuant to RCW 46.01.180.

---
END ---