BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
67.08.050 and 1999 c 282 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any promoter shall within seven days prior to the holding of any event file
with the department a statement setting forth the name of each licensee who is
a potential participant, his or her manager or managers, and such other
information as the department may require. Participant changes regarding a
wrestling event may be allowed after notice to the department, if the new
participant holds a valid license under this chapter. The department may stop
any wrestling event in which a participant is not licensed under this chapter.

(2)
Upon the termination of any event the promoter shall file with the designated
department representative a written report, duly verified as the department may
require showing the number of tickets sold for the event, the price charged for
the tickets and the gross proceeds thereof, and such other and further
information as the department may require. The promoter shall pay to the
department at the time of filing the report under this section a tax equal to
five percent of such gross receipts. However, the tax may not be less than
twenty-five dollars. The five percent of such gross receipts shall be
immediately paid by the department into the state general fund.

(3)
A complimentary ticket may not have a face value of less than the least
expensive ticket available for sale to the general public. The number of
untaxed complimentary tickets shall be limited to ((five)) ten
percent of the total tickets sold per event location, not to exceed ((three
hundred)) one thousand tickets. All complimentary tickets exceeding
this exemption shall be subject to taxation.

Sec.
2. RCW
67.08.015 and 1999 c 282 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In the interest of ensuring the safety and welfare of the participants, the
department shall have power and it shall be its duty to direct, supervise, and
control all boxing, martial arts, and wrestling events conducted within this state
and an event may not be held in this state except in accordance with the
provisions of this chapter. The department may, in its discretion, issue and
for cause, which includes concern for the safety and welfare of the
participants, deny, revoke, or suspend a license to promote, conduct, or
hold boxing, kickboxing, martial arts, or wrestling events where an admission
fee is charged by any person, club, corporation, organization, association, or
fraternal society.

(2)
All boxing, kickboxing, martial arts, or wrestling events that:

(a)
Are conducted by any common school, college, or university, whether public or
private, or by the official student association thereof, whether on or off the
school, college, or university grounds, where all the participating contestants
are bona fide students enrolled in any common school, college, or university,
within or without this state; or

(b)
Are entirely amateur events promoted on a nonprofit basis or for charitable
purposes;

are not
subject to the licensing provisions of this chapter. A boxing, martial arts,
kickboxing, or wrestling event may not be conducted within the state except
under a license issued in accordance with this chapter and the rules of the
department except as provided in this section.

(3) The director shall prohibit events unless all of the
contestants are either licensed under this chapter or trained by an amateur or
professional sanctioning body recognized by the department.

---
END ---