BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 9A.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of aggravated criminal trespass if he or she:

(a)
Knowingly enters or remains unlawfully in or upon the premises of another in a
manner that causes an interruption or impairment of the premises owner's or
operator's management, operation, or control of any commercial enterprise
conducted upon the premises; or

(b)
Knowingly enters or remains unlawfully in or upon the premises of another in a
manner that creates a substantial risk to the safety of persons who are
lawfully employed in or upon the premises or to any peace officer.

(2)
Aggravated criminal trespass is a class C felony.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
9.05.010 (Criminal anarchy defined) and 1941 c 215 s 1, 1909 c
249 s 310, & 1903 c 45 s 1;

(2) RCW
9.05.020 (Advocating criminal anarchy--Penalty) and 1992 c 7 s
1, 1941 c 215 s 2, 1909 c 249 s 311, & 1903 c 45 s 2;

(3) RCW
9.05.030 (Assemblages of anarchists) and 1992 c 7 s 2, 1909 c
249 s 314, & 1903 c 45 s 4;

(4) RCW
9.05.040 (Permitting premises to be used for assemblages of
anarchists) and 1909 c 249 s 315;

(5) RCW
9.05.050 (Evidence--Self-incrimination) and 1909 c 249 s 316;

(6) RCW
9.05.060 (Sabotage defined--Penalty) and 1919 c 173 s 1;

(7) RCW
9.05.070 (Interference with owner's control) and 1919 c 173 s 2;

(8) RCW
9.05.080 (Penalty for advocating sabotage) and 1919 c 173 s 3;

(9) RCW
9.05.090 (Provisions cumulative) and 1919 c 173 s 4;

(10) RCW
9.05.100 (Displaying emblems of seditious and anarchistic
groups) and 1919 c 181 s 1;

(11) RCW
9.05.110 (Possession of emblems unlawful) and 1919 c 181 s 2;

(12) RCW
9.05.120 (Penalty) and 1919 c 181 s 3;

(13) RCW
9.05.130 (Searches and seizures) and 1919 c 181 s 4;

(14) RCW
9.05.140 (Exceptions) and 1919 c 181 s 5;

(15) RCW
9.05.150 (Publishing matter inciting breach of peace) and 1909 c
249 s 312; and

(16) RCW
9.05.160 (Liability of editors and others) and 1909 c 249 s 313
& 1905 c 45 s 3.

---
END ---