BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
42.40.050 and 1992 c 118 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any person who is a whistleblower, as defined in RCW 42.40.020, and who ((as
a result of being a whistleblower)) has been subjected to workplace
reprisal or retaliatory action ((has)) is presumed to have
established a cause of action for the remedies provided under chapter 49.60
RCW. For the purpose of this section "reprisal or retaliatory
action" means but is not limited to any of the following:

(((1)))
(a) Denial of adequate staff to perform duties;

(((2)))
(b) Frequent staff changes;

(((3)))
(c) Frequent and undesirable office changes;

(((4)))
(d) Refusal to assign meaningful work;

(((5)))
(e) Unwarranted and unsubstantiated letters of reprimand or
unsatisfactory performance evaluations;

(((6)))
(f) Demotion;

(((7)))
(g) Reduction in pay;

(((8)))
(h) Denial of promotion;

(((9)))
(i) Suspension;

(((10)))
(j) Dismissal;

(((11)))
(k) Denial of employment; ((and))

(((12)))
(l) A supervisor or superior encouraging coworkers to behave in a
hostile manner toward the whistleblower; and

(m)
A change in the physical location of the employee or a change in the basic
nature of the employee's job, if either are in opposition to the employee's
expressed wish.

(2)
The agency presumed to have taken retaliatory action under subsection (1) of
this section may rebut that presumption by proving by a preponderance of the
evidence that the agency action or actions were justified by reasons unrelated
to the employee's status as a whistleblower.

(3) Nothing in this section prohibits an agency from making
any decision exercising its authority to terminate, suspend, or discipline an
employee who engages in workplace reprisal or retaliatory action against a
whistleblower. However, the agency also shall implement any order under
chapter 49.60 RCW (other than an order of suspension if the agency has
terminated the retaliator).

---
END ---