BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
department of transportation shall develop criteria to be used for evaluating
and prioritizing noise mitigation projects. The adopted criteria should be
consistent with federal standards for noise abatement, and must at a minimum
consider the current level of noise in the affected area, the number of persons
who would benefit from a reduction in noise, the reduction in decibels
resulting from the mitigation project, and the project cost.

For
the purposes of this section, "noise mitigation" means a structure,
combination of structures, materials, processes, or techniques that have the
intended result of permanently reducing, in a primarily residential area, noise
associated with the use of a state transportation facility. This definition
includes, but is not limited to, "noise wall retrofits" as that term
is used in the department's 1987 directive D22-22.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. Each
biennium the department shall apply the criteria developed under section 1 of
this act to develop a ranked priority list of noise mitigation projects. The
department shall identify the highest ranked project located in eastern
Washington; the highest ranked project located in the greater Puget Sound
region; and the highest ranked project in western Washington outside the
greater Puget Sound region. The remainder of the list must be displayed in
ranked order, without regard to geographic location. The department shall
submit the list in support of the biennial budget request under RCW 44.40.070
and 44.40.080.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
highway noise mitigation account is created in the transportation fund of the
state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes specified in
sections 1 and 2 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
legislature intends that the department of transportation carry out the
purposes of this act in a swift manner. Until the department has adopted the
project priority criteria specified in section 1 of this act and submitted the
list of ranked projects to the legislature, the department shall commence three
pilot projects:

(1)
A feasibility study and project design of a means for reducing noise reflected
from an overhead structure, such as a bridge deck. This pilot project should
be located in the Puget Sound region;

(2)
Noise mitigation retrofitting on a highway where lane widening is currently
planned, and where the noise mitigation structure can be constructed at
substantial cost savings by proceeding concurrently with highway improvements.
This pilot project should be located in eastern Washington;

(3)
Noise mitigation retrofitting in an area adjacent to a six-lane, fully
controlled, limited access highway, where the mitigation site is located within
one-quarter of a mile from an interchange. This pilot project should be
located in western Washington, outside the greater Puget Sound region.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5.
Sections 1 through 3 of this act are each added to chapter 47.40 RCW.

---
END ---