BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
39.86.120 and 1990 c 50 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsections (2) and (4) of this section, the initial
allocation of the state ceiling shall be for each year as follows:

((1989 and 1990 and

THEREAFTER THEREAFTER

(If the small (If the small

issue category issue category

is permitted is not permitted

BOND USE under
federal under federal

CATEGORY 1987 1988 law)
law)

Housing 5% 25% 25%
35%

Student
Loans 10% 15% 15% 15%

Exempt
Facility 40% 20% 20% 35%

Public
Utility 10% 10% 10% 10%

Small Issue 30% 25% 25% 0%

Remainder and

redevelopment 5% 5% 5%
5%))

BOND
USE 2000 and

CATEGORY THEREAFTER

Housing 35%

Student
Loans 15%

Public
Utility 10%

Small
Issue/Exempt Facilities 35%

Remainder
and Redevelopment 5%

(2)
Initial allocations may be modified by the agency only to reflect an issuer's
carryforward amount. Any reduction of the initial allocation shall be added to
the remainder and be available for allocation or reallocation.

(3)
The remainder shall be allocated by the agency among one or more issuers from
any bond use category with regard to the criteria specified in RCW 39.86.130.

(4)
Should any bond use category no longer be subject to the state ceiling due to
federal or state provisions of law, the agency shall divide the amount of that
initial allocation among the remaining categories as necessary or appropriate
with regard to the criteria specified in RCW 39.86.130.

(5)(a)
Prior to September 1 of each calendar year, any available portion of an initial
allocation may be allocated or reallocated only to an issuer within the same
bond use category, except that the remainder category, or portions thereof, may
be allocated at any time to any bond use category.

(b) Beginning September 1 of each calendar year, the agency may
allocate or reallocate any available portion of the state ceiling to any bond
use category with regard to the criteria specified in RCW 39.86.130.

---
END ---