BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 79.96 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department of natural resources shall implement a pilot program to test the
effectiveness of planting geoducks on state aquatic lands located in Puget
Sound. The program shall be developed and implemented in consultation with the
department of fish and wildlife. The program shall be designed to use test
plantings and monitoring of geoduck populations on the test sites to determine
if harvestable populations may be achieved in a manner that will increase
revenues over that achievable from natural regeneration while ensuring the
maintenance of sustainable populations of geoducks. The department of natural
resources shall design the test program to compare geoduck populations of the
test sites with other sites in Puget Sound providing comparable growing
conditions. The department shall use existing state facilities for the
production of seed stock. The department may contract with geoduck harvesters
licensed in accordance with chapter 75.28 RCW to plant the seed and to monitor
geoduck populations on the test sites.

(2)
The program shall be designed to test geoduck populations and growth rates for
a period no less than five years. No later than December 31, 2005, the
department of natural resources shall report the results of the program to the
natural resource committees of the legislature and make recommendations whether
the program should be expanded, otherwise modified, or terminated.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The
sum of one million two hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2001, from the
resource management cost account to the department of natural resources for the
purposes of this act.

---
END ---