BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.155.070 and 1997 c 429 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
To qualify for loans or pledges under this chapter the board must determine
that a local government meets all of the following conditions:

(a)
The city or county must be imposing a tax under chapter 82.46 RCW at a rate of
at least one-quarter of one percent;

(b)
The local government must have developed a long-term plan for financing public
works needs;

(c)
The local government must be using all local revenue sources which are
reasonably available for funding public works, taking into consideration local
employment and economic factors; and

(d)
Except where necessary to address a public health need or substantial
environmental degradation, a county, city, or town ((that is required or
chooses to plan)) planning under RCW 36.70A.040 must have adopted a
comprehensive plan ((in conformance with the requirements of chapter 36.70A
RCW, after it is required that the comprehensive plan be adopted, and must have
adopted development regulations in conformance with the requirements of chapter
36.70A RCW, after it is required that development regulations be adopted)) and
development regulations as required by RCW 36.70A.040. This subsection does
not require any county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 to adopt a
comprehensive plan or development regulations before requesting or receiving a
loan or loan guarantee under this chapter if such request is made before the
expiration of the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040. A county, city, or
town which has not adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations
within the time periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040 is not prohibited from
receiving a loan or loan guarantee under this chapter if the county, city, or
town adopts a comprehensive plan and development regulations as required by RCW
36.70A.040 before submitting a request for a loan or loan guarantee. However,
the capital facilities plan element of the comprehensive plan must be in place
before a county, city, or town under this subsection (1)(d) may qualify for a
loan or loan guarantee.

(2)
The board shall develop a priority process for public works projects as
provided in this section. The intent of the priority process is to maximize
the value of public works projects accomplished with assistance under this
chapter. The board shall attempt to assure a geographical balance in assigning
priorities to projects. The board shall consider at least the following
factors in assigning a priority to a project:

(a)
Whether the local government receiving assistance has experienced severe fiscal
distress resulting from natural disaster or emergency public works needs;

(b)
Whether the project is critical in nature and would affect the health and
safety of a great number of citizens;

(c)
The cost of the project compared to the size of the local government and amount
of loan money available;

(d)
The number of communities served by or funding the project;

(e)
Whether the project is located in an area of high unemployment, compared to the
average state unemployment;

(f)
Whether the project is the acquisition, expansion, improvement, or renovation
by a local government of a public water system that is in violation of health
and safety standards, including the cost of extending existing service to such
a system;

(g)
The relative benefit of the project to the community, considering the present
level of economic activity in the community and the existing local capacity to
increase local economic activity in communities that have low economic growth;
and

(h)
Other criteria that the board considers advisable.

(3)
Existing debt or financial obligations of local governments shall not be
refinanced under this chapter. Each local government applicant shall provide
documentation of attempts to secure additional local or other sources of
funding for each public works project for which financial assistance is sought under
this chapter.

(4)
Before November 1 of each year, the board shall develop and submit to the
appropriate fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives a
description of the loans made under RCW 43.155.065, 43.155.068, and subsection
(7) of this section during the preceding fiscal year and a prioritized list of
projects which are recommended for funding by the legislature, including one
copy to the staff of each of the committees. The list shall include, but not
be limited to, a description of each project and recommended financing, the
terms and conditions of the loan or financial guarantee, the local government
jurisdiction and unemployment rate, demonstration of the jurisdiction's
critical need for the project and documentation of local funds being used to
finance the public works project. The list shall also include measures of
fiscal capacity for each jurisdiction recommended for financial assistance,
compared to authorized limits and state averages, including local government
sales taxes; real estate excise taxes; property taxes; and charges for or taxes
on sewerage, water, garbage, and other utilities.

(5)
The board shall not sign contracts or otherwise financially obligate funds from
the public works assistance account before the legislature has appropriated
funds for a specific list of public works projects. The legislature may remove
projects from the list recommended by the board. The legislature shall not
change the order of the priorities recommended for funding by the board.

(6)
Subsection (5) of this section does not apply to loans made under RCW
43.155.065, 43.155.068, and subsection (7) of this section.

(7)(a)
Loans made for the purpose of capital facilities plans shall be exempted from
subsection (5) of this section. In no case shall the total amount of funds
utilized for capital facilities plans and emergency loans exceed the limitation
in RCW 43.155.065.

(b)
For the purposes of this section "capital facilities plans" means
those plans required by the growth management act, chapter 36.70A RCW, and
plans required by the public works board for local governments not subject to
the growth management act.

(8)
To qualify for loans or pledges for solid waste or recycling facilities under
this chapter, a city or county must demonstrate that the solid waste or
recycling facility is consistent with and necessary to implement the
comprehensive solid waste management plan adopted by the city or county under
chapter 70.95 RCW.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.160.060 and 1996 c 51 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board is authorized to make direct loans to political subdivisions of the state
for the purposes of assisting the political subdivisions in financing the cost
of public facilities, including development of land and improvements for public
facilities, as well as the construction, rehabilitation, alteration, expansion,
or improvement of the facilities. A grant may also be authorized for purposes
designated in this chapter, but only when, and to the extent that, a loan is
not reasonably possible, given the limited resources of the political
subdivision and the finding by the board that unique circumstances exist. The
board shall not obligate more than twenty percent of its biennial appropriation
as grants.

Application
for funds shall be made in the form and manner as the board may prescribe. In
making grants or loans the board shall conform to the following requirements:

(1)
The board shall not provide financial assistance:

(a)
For a project the primary purpose of which is to facilitate or promote a retail
shopping development or expansion.

(b)
For any project that evidence exists would result in a development or expansion
that would displace existing jobs in any other community in the state.

(c)
For the acquisition of real property, including buildings and other fixtures
which are a part of real property.

(2)
The board shall only provide financial assistance:

(a)
For those projects which would result in specific private developments or
expansions (i) in manufacturing, production, food processing, assembly,
warehousing, and industrial distribution; (ii) for processing recyclable
materials or for facilities that support recycling, including processes not
currently provided in the state, including but not limited to, de-inking
facilities, mixed waste paper, plastics, yard waste, and problem-waste
processing; (iii) for manufacturing facilities that rely significantly on
recyclable materials, including but not limited to waste tires and mixed waste
paper; (iv) which support the relocation of businesses from nondistressed urban
areas to distressed rural areas; or (v) which substantially support the trading
of goods or services outside of the state's borders.

(b)
For projects which it finds will improve the opportunities for the successful
maintenance, establishment, or expansion of industrial or commercial plants or
will otherwise assist in the creation or retention of long-term economic
opportunities.

(c)
When the application includes convincing evidence that a specific private
development or expansion is ready to occur and will occur only if the public
facility improvement is made.

(3)
Except where necessary to address a public health need or substantial
environmental degradation, a county, city, or town planning under RCW
36.70A.040 may not receive a grant or loan under this chapter unless it has
adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations as required by RCW
36.70A.040. This subsection does not require any county, city, or town
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 to adopt a comprehensive plan or development
regulations before requesting or receiving a grant or loan under this chapter
if such request is made before the expiration of the time periods specified in
RCW 36.70A.040. A county, city, or town which has not adopted a comprehensive
plan and development regulations within the time periods specified in RCW
36.70A.040 is not prohibited from receiving a grant or loan under this chapter
if the county, city, or town adopts a comprehensive plan and development
regulations as required by RCW 36.70A.040 before submitting a request for a
grant or loan. However, the capital facilities plan element of the
comprehensive plan must be in place before a county, city, or town under this subsection
may qualify for a grant or loan.

(4)
The board shall prioritize each proposed project according to the relative
benefits provided to the community by the jobs the project would create, not
just the total number of jobs it would create after the project is completed
and according to the unemployment rate in the area in which the jobs would be
located. As long as there is more demand for financial assistance than there
are funds available, the board is instructed to fund projects in order of their
priority.

(((4)))
(5) A responsible official of the political subdivision shall be present
during board deliberations and provide information that the board requests.

Before
any financial assistance application is approved, the political subdivision seeking
the assistance must demonstrate to the community economic revitalization board
that no other timely source of funding is available to it at costs reasonably
similar to financing available from the community economic revitalization
board.

Sec.
3. RCW
70.146.070 and 1997 c 429 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

When
making grants or loans for water pollution control facilities, the department
shall consider the following:

(1)
The protection of water quality and public health;

(2)
The cost to residential ratepayers if they had to finance water pollution
control facilities without state assistance;

(3)
Actions required under federal and state permits and compliance orders;

(4)
The level of local fiscal effort by residential ratepayers since 1972 in
financing water pollution control facilities;

(5)
The extent to which the applicant county or city, or if the applicant is
another public body, the extent to which the county or city in which the
applicant public body is located, has established programs to mitigate nonpoint
pollution of the surface or subterranean water sought to be protected by the
water pollution control facility named in the application for state assistance;
and

(6)
The recommendations of the Puget Sound action team and any other board,
council, commission, or group established by the legislature or a state agency
to study water pollution control issues in the state.

Except
where necessary to address a public health need or substantial environmental
degradation, a county, city, or town ((that is required or chooses to plan))
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may not receive a grant or loan for water
pollution control facilities unless it has adopted a comprehensive plan ((in
conformance with the requirements of chapter 36.70A RCW, after it is required
that the comprehensive plan be adopted, or unless it has adopted development
regulations in conformance with the requirements of chapter 36.70A RCW, after
it is required that development regulations be adopted)) and development
regulations as required by RCW 36.70A.040. This subsection does not require
any county, city, or town planning under RCW 36.70A.040 to adopt a comprehensive
plan or development regulations before requesting or receiving a grant or loan
under this chapter if such request is made before the expiration of the time
periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040. A county, city, or town which has not
adopted a comprehensive plan and development regulations within the time
periods specified in RCW 36.70A.040 is not prohibited from receiving a grant or
loan under this chapter if the county, city, or town adopts a comprehensive
plan and development regulations as required by RCW 36.70A.040 before
submitting a request for a grant or loan. However, the capital facilities plan
element of the comprehensive plan must be in place before a county, city, or
town under this subsection may qualify for a grant or loan.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. RCW
43.17.250 (County-wide planning policy incentives) and 1991 sp.s.
c 32 s 25 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This
act does not affect any existing right acquired or liability or obligation
incurred under the sections amended or repealed in this act or under any rule
or order adopted under those sections, nor does it affect any proceeding
instituted under those sections.

---
END ---