BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that changes have occurred in the electricity industry
because of federal deregulation of the wholesale electricity market and the
subsequent restructuring by several states of their retail electricity
markets. The legislature further finds that such changes impact the
electricity industry in the state of Washington and that the extent of those
impacts on the taxation of the changing electricity industry are not fully
comprehended. The legislature therefore intends to commission a study and
report to examine current state and local taxation of the electricity industry
in order to receive options for state and local taxes that avoid revenue loss,
promote competitive neutrality, and encourage economic development within the
electricity industry.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The department of revenue shall conduct a study and prepare a report of current
state and local taxation of the electricity industry and options for changes to
avoid revenue loss, promote competitive neutrality, and encourage economic
development within the electricity industry.

(2)
The study shall include an analysis of the following:

(a)
Current state and local taxation of the wholesale and retail electricity
industry, including tax incidence, rate, base, collection, and allocation of
the public utility tax, public utility district privilege tax, sales and use
tax, business and occupation tax, property tax, real estate excise tax, and
leasehold excise tax;

(b)
Trends in the wholesale and retail electricity markets affecting current and
future revenue streams, including power imports and exports by in-state and
out-of-state suppliers;

(c)
The extent to which existing state and local tax laws may be insufficient to
protect revenue streams in light of identifiable wholesale and retail market
changes;

(d)
Whether the tax code is adequate to fairly tax new participants in the market
such as brokers, marketers, aggregators, and traders; and

(e)
Options for state and local tax laws to protect existing revenue streams, to
promote competitive neutrality among wholesale and retail electricity market
participants, and to encourage economic development within the electricity
industry.

(3)
The report shall include recommendations for legislative action to implement
the options analyzed in subsection (2)(e) of this section that best accomplish
the avoidance of revenue loss, promotion of competitive neutrality, and
encouragement of economic development within the electricity industry.

(4)
The department shall conduct the study with support from the utilities and
transportation commission, the energy division of the department of community,
trade, and economic development, and the state auditor. The department shall
consult with energy utilities, retail electric customers, local governments,
independent power producers, brokers, marketers, traders, other interested
parties, and the chairs and ranking minority members of the committees of the
senate and the house of representatives with jurisdiction over electricity
issues periodically throughout the course of the study, and shall submit its
report to the legislature and the governor by December 1, 1999.

(5) All entities subject to current state and local taxes on assets
or activities related to the generation, transmission, distribution, or the
purchase and sale of electricity shall cooperate with the department in the
preparation of the study and the report required by this section, and shall
provide all information requested by the department in a timely manner so that
the study and report will be as thorough as possible and completed on schedule.

---
END ---