BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
FINDINGS. (1) The legislature finds that salmon recovery in
Washington state requires a state-wide strategy and actions that are tailored
to the unique characteristics of each major watershed in the state.

(2)
The legislature finds that:

(a)
The Puget Sound region contributes significantly to the economic vitality and
the natural resources of the state of Washington. The health and economic
prosperity of the region depends on a high quality environment;

(b)
Several species of salmon in Puget Sound are, or expected to be, listed as
threatened or endangered under the federal endangered species act. At present,
these species include chinook, chum, bull trout, and coho;

(c)
One or more listings under the federal endangered species act have the
potential to adversely affect nearly all aspects of the Puget Sound economy,
and a comprehensive solution will require significant involvement of the
private and public sectors; and

(d)
The legislature recognizes that a critical pathways mechanism was established
in 1998 to fund salmon habitat restoration. The legislature also recognizes
that there is an extensive network of federal, state, local, and tribal rules
and regulations to protect salmon habitat. In 1998, the legislature also
established a comprehensive approach to setting priorities for individual
watersheds through water resource inventory area planning.

(3)
The legislature further finds that:

(a)
Healthy salmon populations require a series of connected, high quality habitats
to support their unique life cycle;

(b)
An intensive, short-term effort to preserve quality habitat in Puget Sound is
an essential next step if the region is to realize the benefits of the
substantial ongoing investments made to protect and restore salmon habitat;

(c)
Highly productive salmon habitat still exists in Puget Sound but is
increasingly threatened by development and the manner in which land is
managed. There is a high degree of agreement among scientists that preserving
this remaining habitat is an essential action to protect salmon populations
over the long term;

(d)
While there are a number of public, nonprofit, and business entities involved
in acquiring land or easements to preserve habitat, the lack of dedicated
funding and a coordinated approach cause this effort to occur on a piecemeal
basis;

(e)
A private nongovernmental approach to preservation and restoration is necessary
to increase business and landowner participation, garner public support, and
increase the efficiency and effectiveness of habitat investments;

(f)
Adding a focused private preservation and restoration strategy to the state's
current effort of regulatory protection will provide the Puget Sound region
with the tools and flexibility it needs to develop a comprehensive, regionally
based strategy that implements watershed planning and conservation priorities
and effectively responds to the federal endangered species act listings of
salmon.

(4)
The legislature declares that habitat preservation is an essential tool that
must be used in concert with protection and restoration if salmon populations
are to survive and thrive in Puget Sound. The legislature also declares that
it is in the public interest to create a nonprofit foundation to guide private
investments for preservation and restoration of high quality salmon habitat in
Puget Sound.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
PURPOSE. The purpose of the Puget Sound salmon and river conservation program
is to establish a network of key habitats that, in combination with existing
regulatory and nonregulatory efforts, provides a stable base to support the
long-term survival of salmon in Puget Sound. The purpose of the Puget Sound
foundation is to guide private investments in the preservation and restoration
of the remaining high quality salmon habitat throughout Puget Sound.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. DEFINITIONS.
The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Puget Sound" means the twelve counties bordering Puget Sound.

(2)
"Foundation" means the entity created in section 4 of this act.

(3)
"Critical salmon habitat" means aquatic systems and surrounding land
that meet the criteria in section 6 of this act.

(4)
"Eligible grant recipients" includes tribes, local governments, state
agencies, and nonprofit organizations.

(5)
"Governor's salmon office" means the office established in RCW
75.46.040.

(6)
"Eligible projects" means any project or action that serves to
preserve, restore, or steward critical salmon habitat.

(7)
"Preserve" means a nonregulatory action that facilitates permanent
protection of critical salmon habitat and may include the purchase of
development or timber rights, conservation easements, or fee simple title.

(8)
"Restore" means an action to reestablish ecological conditions of
critical salmon habitat, including but not limited to actions that restore key
processes, functions, or structures that support salmon habitat.

(9)
"Stewardship" means activities necessary to maintain the quality of
habitat that has been acquired or restored for its benefits to salmon.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. THE
PUGET SOUND FOUNDATION. (1) By September 1, 1999, the governor shall file
articles of incorporation in accordance with the Washington nonprofit
corporation act, chapter 24.03 RCW, to establish the Puget Sound foundation.
The foundation shall not be an agency, instrumentality, or political
subdivision of the state and shall not disburse public funds.

(2)
The foundation shall have a board of directors consisting of eighteen members.
Fourteen nonlegislative members shall be appointed by the governor and
collectively have experience in business, conservation, tribal interests, or
government. Initial appointments shall be made by September 30, 1999, and
shall provide geographic representation from northern, central, southern, and
the Hood canal areas of the Puget Sound region. The remaining four members
shall be legislators representing each of the two major caucuses in both the
house of representatives and the senate. The two members of the house of representatives
shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and the two
senate members shall be appointed by the president of the senate.

(3)
Members other than legislative members shall serve three-year terms, except for
the initial terms, which shall be staggered by the governor to achieve a
balanced mix of terms on the board. Members may serve up to a maximum of three
terms. At the end of a term, a member may continue to serve until a successor
has been appointed. Terms for legislative members shall be two years.

(4)
The foundation shall meet at least four times per year.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
POWERS AND DUTIES. (1) By December 1, 1999, the foundation shall establish a
science panel.

(a)
The science panel shall be composed of scientists from the Puget Sound region
employed by or otherwise affiliated with universities, private industry,
environmental organizations, local and state governments, and tribes.

(b)
The science panel shall advise the foundation on the development of criteria to
guide private salmon habitat investments and evaluate grant requests to
preserve and restore salmon habitat in Puget Sound.

(2)
The foundation shall identify high quality salmon habitats for preservation and
associated opportunities for restoration generally as follows:

(a)
Before February 1, 2000, the foundation shall compile an inventory of the
remaining high quality habitats in Puget Sound. In preparing the inventory,
the foundation shall consult the governor's salmon office, the science panel
established in this section, the national marine fisheries service, water
resource inventory area committees, tribes, Washington department of
transportation, department of fish and wildlife, conservation commission,
interagency committee for outdoor recreation, department of ecology, and
department of natural resources, and local governments. The inventory shall be
depicted in map form.

(b)
A draft of the inventory shall be prepared by the foundation by February 1,
2000. No sooner than thirty days after the inventory is made publicly
available, the foundation shall hold at least two public meetings to solicit
comments.

(3)
The foundation shall actively seek funding and contributions from private
sources to fund the preservation and restoration of Puget Sound salmon habitat
as provided in this chapter and in accordance with the applicable laws.

(4)
The foundation shall develop supplemental criteria for guiding investments in
the preservation and restoration of salmon habitat consistent with section 6 of
this act.

(5)
A competitive grant process shall be conducted at least annually by the
foundation to award funds for preservation and restoration of high quality
habitats in each water resource inventory area of Puget Sound.

(6)
The results of preservation and restoration actions shall be monitored by the
foundation to ensure long-term benefits to salmon and the preservation of a
habitat network necessary for long-term survival of salmon. The foundation
shall frequently publicize the Puget Sound salmon and river conservation
program to the public and interested parties as well as the identified needs
for further action.

(7)
The foundation shall work with the salmon recovery funding board and the
interagency review team, both provided for in chapter 75.46 RCW, to coordinate
distribution of public and private funds to facilitate the best use of funds
for preservation and restoration of high quality habitat.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. GRANT
PROCESS AND SELECTION CRITERIA. (1) The foundation shall conduct a grant
process at least annually beginning in February 2000. Grants shall be awarded
consistent with the criteria developed by the foundation and shall be available
for acquisition of development or timber rights, conservation easements, fee
simple title, or other property interests. Grants shall also be available for
restoration projects where the land is held in the public interest, there is a
dedicated conservation easement, or the project is consistent with a long-term
preservation, restoration, or stewardship agreement between affected private
property owners and the grantee.

(2)
The foundation shall award funds to eligible applicants for acquisition of
habitat that best meet these criteria:

(a)
The habitat is critical or has high potential to support important salmon runs;

(b)
The habitat is likely to be degraded or threatened by conversion within the
next ten years;

(c)
The environmental conditions and protection programs in the surrounding watershed
support the long-term quality of the habitat.

(3)
In evaluating the importance of a salmon habitat the foundation shall consider:

(a)
The size and cultural importance of the salmon run that the habitat supports or
could reasonably support;

(b)
The degree to which it provides key functions or processes that support the
life cycle of the salmon in the fresh water or in estuarine environments;

(c)
The size of the watershed and whether it is large enough to support the range
and variability of conditions necessary to support freshwater life cycle needs
for salmon; and

(d)
The benefits to other wildlife and fish species.

(4)
In evaluating the extent and immediacy of threat to habitat degradation, the
foundation shall consider the extent to which:

(a)
Current land use plans and zoning allow for alteration of the habitat or key
watershed function;

(b)
Current rules and regulations or approved habitat conservation plans allow for
significant timber harvest, or modifications to the habitat or surrounding
drainage area;

(c)
The amount and pace of surrounding development as well as increasing property
values; and

(d)
Any pending development proposal consistent with local and state law has the
potential to compromise the long-term quality of the habitat.

(5)
In evaluating benefit of existing environmental conditions and protection
programs in the surrounding watershed to provide long-term support for critical
habitat, the foundation shall consider:

(a)
The health of the watershed to provide sustainable populations of salmon;

(b)
The ability of local regulations to prevent or significantly limit the
degradation of the habitat from upland or upstream human disturbances;

(c)
The existence of a watershed plan or approved habitat conservation plan that
recognizes the functional importance of the habitat and how it is connected to
key processes within the watershed that benefit salmon;

(d)
The commitment of local community organizations to promote habitat preservation
and restoration; and

(e)
Local commitment for the long-term stewardship of the habitat.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
GEOGRAPHIC DISTRIBUTION OF FUNDS. In awarding grants over the ten-year period
of the foundation, the foundation shall ensure to the maximum extent
practicable that each water resource inventory area in the Puget Sound region
receives grant funding for important preservation and restoration actions.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
REPORTING REQUIREMENTS. (1) By July 1, 2000, the foundation shall establish
performance measures to evaluate its progress toward its goal of establishing a
network of high quality habitats capable of supporting healthy populations of
salmon in Puget Sound.

(2)
Beginning November 1, 2000, and every two years thereafter, the foundation
shall submit a report to the governor's office and the appropriate standing
committees of the legislature summarizing the foundation's:

(a)
Progress to date based on the performance measures established under subsection
(1) of this section;

(b)
Success in leveraging private and in-kind funds;

(c)
Remaining preservation and stewardship needs; and

(d)
Expected results for the next two years.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9.
ANNUAL CONFERENCE. The foundation shall convene and host an annual conference,
in consultation with the science panel established in section 5 of this act, to
create an ongoing forum to ensure that the best available science is used to
preserve high quality salmon habitats in Puget Sound.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10.
EXPIRATION OF CHAPTER. This chapter expires June 30, 2009.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11.
CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Captions used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12.
Sections 1 through 11 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 75 RCW.

---
END ---