BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.32.045 and 1996 c 111 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, payments of the taxes imposed
under chapters 82.04, 82.08, 82.12, 82.14, and 82.16 RCW, along with reports
and returns on forms prescribed by the department, are due monthly within
twenty-five days after the end of the month in which the taxable activities
occur.

(2)
The department of revenue may relieve any taxpayer or class of taxpayers from
the obligation of remitting monthly and may require the return to cover other
longer reporting periods, but in no event may returns be filed for a period
greater than one year. For these taxpayers, tax payments are due on or before
the last day of the month next succeeding the end of the period covered by the
return.

(3)
The department of revenue may also require verified annual returns from any
taxpayer, setting forth such additional information as it may deem necessary to
correctly determine tax liability.

(4)
Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the department may
relieve any person of the requirement to file returns if the following
conditions are met:

(a)
The person's value of products, gross proceeds of sales, or gross income of the
business, from all business activities taxable under chapter 82.04 RCW, is less
than ((twenty-four)) twenty-eight thousand dollars per year;

(b)
The person's gross income of the business from all activities taxable under
chapter 82.16 RCW is less than twenty-four thousand dollars per year; and

(c)
The person is not required to collect or pay to the department of revenue any
other tax or fee which the department is authorized to collect.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---