BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that over twenty-five thousand state residents per year file
cases and complaints with the department of labor and industries alleging they
have been denied payment for work they performed. Each month an average of
over one million dollars in back wages is sought by workers.

The
legislature further finds that the Washington state minimum wage law and wage
claim laws do not require payment of interest on back wages owed and do not
authorize adequate penalties against violators. To improve compliance, the
department of labor and industries should be allowed to assess interest on back
wages and impose civil penalties against employers who are found to be not in
compliance with chapters 49.46 and 49.48 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 49.48 RCW to read as follows:

An
employer shall pay all wages due to each worker within six calendar days of the
last day of the established pay period unless the worker is covered by a
collective bargaining agreement that establishes a different payment
requirement and the employer complies with the payment requirement of the
collective bargaining agreement. Wage payments that are received by electronic
deposit, company mail, or any other mail service must be received by the worker
within the time period established under this section.

Sec.
3. RCW
49.46.100 and 1959 c 294 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any employer who hinders or delays the director or ((his)) the
director's authorized representatives in the performance of ((his)) the
director's duties in the enforcement of this chapter, or refuses to admit
the director or ((his)) the director's authorized representatives
to any place of employment, or fails to make, keep, and preserve any records as
required under the provisions of this chapter, or falsifies any such record, or
refuses to make any record accessible to the director or ((his)) the
director's authorized representatives upon demand, or refuses to furnish a
sworn statement of such record or any other information required for the proper
enforcement of this chapter to the director or ((his)) the director's
authorized representatives upon demand((, or pays or agrees to pay wages at
a rate less than the rate applicable under this chapter, or otherwise violates
any provision of this chapter or of any regulation issued under this chapter))
shall be deemed in violation of this chapter and shall((, upon conviction
therefor, be guilty of a gross misdemeanor)) be assessed a civil penalty
of not more than one thousand dollars depending on the size of the business and
the gravity of the violation.

(2)
((Any)) (a) An employer who pays or agrees to pay wages at a rate
less than the rate applicable under this chapter or any rule or order adopted
under this chapter may be assessed civil penalties of an amount equal to twenty
percent of the wage violation.

(b)
An employer who willfully or repeatedly pays or agrees to pay wages at a rate
less than the rate applicable under this chapter or a rule or order adopted
under this chapter is in violation of this chapter, and shall, upon conviction,
be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(c)
An employer who fails to pay wages due as required by this chapter may be
assessed civil penalties of:

(i)
Fifty dollars for each failure to pay each worker; and

(ii)
For each subsequent violation, or any willful or intentional violation, one
hundred dollars for each failure to pay each worker, plus twenty-five percent
of the amount of wages unlawfully withheld.

(d)
An employer who does not pay all wages owed within seventy-two hours of an
order issued by the department under RCW 49.48.040(1)(b) shall, in addition to
any other applicable penalty, be assessed a civil penalty equal to three times
the amount of wages due and not paid.

(3)
Upon a finding by the director that an employer who discharges or in any
other manner discriminates against any employee because such employee has made
any complaint to his or her employer, to the director, or his or her
authorized representatives that he or she has not been paid wages in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter, or that the employer has
violated any provision of this chapter, or because such employee has caused to
be instituted or is about to cause to be instituted any proceeding under or
related to this chapter, or because such employee has testified or is about to
testify in any such proceeding ((shall be deemed in violation of this
chapter and shall, upon conviction therefor, be guilty of a gross misdemeanor)),
the director may require an employer who has discharged or discriminated
against an employee in violation of this chapter to reinstate the employee to
the same position with back pay and interest up to one percent per month.

(4)
Civil penalties imposed under this chapter shall be paid to the director for
deposit in the general fund. Civil penalties may be recovered and other civil
remedies authorized by this chapter may be enforced in a civil action in the
name of the department brought in the superior court of the county where the
violation is alleged to have occurred, or the department may use the procedures
for collection of wages set forth in chapter 49.48 RCW.

Sec.
4. RCW
49.48.020 and 1971 ex.s. c 55 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
person, firm, or corporation which violates any of the provisions of RCW
49.48.010 through 49.48.030 ((and)), 49.48.060, and section 2
of this act shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Sec.
5. RCW
49.48.040 and 1987 c 172 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of labor and industries may:

(a)
Conduct investigations to ensure compliance with this chapter and chapters
39.12 and 49.46 RCW, upon obtaining information indicating an employer may
be committing a violation under this chapter and chapters 39.12((,))
and 49.46((, and 49.48 RCW, conduct investigations to ensure
compliance with chapters 39.12, 49.46, and 49.48)) RCW;

(b)
Order the payment of all wages owed the workers, including interest of up to
one percent per month on back wages owed, and institute actions necessary
for the collection of the sums determined owed; and

(c)
Take assignments of wage claims and prosecute actions for the collection of
wages and interest of up to one percent per month on back wages owed of
persons who are financially unable to employ counsel when in the judgment of
the director of the department the claims are valid and enforceable in the
courts.

(2)
Upon being informed of a wage claim against an employer or former employer,
the director shall, if such claim appears to be just, immediately notify the
employer or former employer, of such claim by mail. If the employer or former
employer fails to pay the claim or make satisfactory explanation to the
director of the failure to do so, within thirty days, the employer or former
employer is liable to a penalty of twenty percent of that portion of the claim
found to be justly due. The director shall have a cause of action against the
employer or former employer for the recovery of such penalty, and the same may
be included in any subsequent action by the director on the wage claim, or may
be exercised separately after adjustment of such wage claim without court
action.

(3)
The director of the department or any authorized representative may, for the
purpose of carrying out RCW 49.48.040 through 49.48.080: (a) Issue subpoenas to
compel the attendance of witnesses or parties and the production of books,
papers, or records; (b) administer oaths and examine witnesses under oath; (c)
take the verification of proof of instruments of writing; and (d) take
depositions and affidavits. If assignments for wage claims are taken, court
costs shall not be payable by the department for prosecuting such suits.

(((3)))
(4) The director shall have a seal inscribed "Department of Labor
and Industries‑-State of Washington" and all courts shall take
judicial notice of such seal. Obedience to subpoenas issued by the director or
authorized representative shall be enforced by the courts in any county.

(((4)))
(5) The director or authorized representative shall have free access to
all places and works of labor. Any employer or any agent or employee of such
employer who refuses the director or authorized representative admission
therein, or who, when requested by the director or authorized representative,
willfully neglects or refuses to furnish the director or authorized
representative any statistics or information pertaining to his or her lawful
duties, which statistics or information may be in his or her possession or
under the control of the employer or agent, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(6)
An action for relief under this section shall be commenced within three years
after the cause of action accrues, unless a longer period of time applies under
law.

Sec.
6. RCW
49.48.060 and 1971 ex.s. c 55 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If upon investigation by the director, after taking assignments of any wage
claim under RCW 49.48.040, it appears to the director that the employer is
representing to ((his)) employees that ((he)) the employer
is able to pay wages for their services and that the employees are not being
paid for their services or if the director determines an employer has
repeatedly violated the provisions of this chapter or chapter 39.12 or 49.46
RCW requiring payment of wages, the director may require the employer to
give a bond in such sum as the director deems reasonable and adequate in the
circumstances, with sufficient surety, conditioned that the employer will for a
definite future period not exceeding six months conduct ((his)) business
and pay ((his)) employees in accordance with the laws of the state of
Washington.

(2)
If within ten days after demand for such bond the employer fails to provide the
same, the director may commence a suit against the employer in the superior
court of appropriate jurisdiction to compel ((him)) the employer
to furnish such bond or cease doing business until ((he)) the
employer has done so. The employer shall have the burden of proving the
amount thereof to be excessive.

(3)
If the court finds that there is just cause for requiring such bond and that
the same is reasonable, necessary or appropriate to secure the prompt payment
of the wages of the employees of such employer and his compliance with RCW
49.48.010 through 49.48.080, the court shall enjoin such employer from doing
business in this state until the requirement is met, or shall make other, and
may make further, orders appropriate to compel compliance with the requirement.

((Upon
being informed of a wage claim against an employer or former employer, the
director shall, if such claim appears to be just, immediately notify the
employer or former employer, of such claim by mail. If the employer or former
employer fails to pay the claim or make satisfactory explanation to the
director of his failure to do so, within thirty days thereafter, the employer
or former employer shall be liable to a penalty of ten percent of that portion
of the claim found to be justly due. The director shall have a cause of action
against the employer or former employer for the recovery of such penalty, and
the same may be included in any subsequent action by the director on said wage
claim, or may be exercised separately after adjustment of such wage claim
without court action.))

Sec.
7. RCW
49.48.070 and 1935 c 96 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall be the duty of the director of labor and industries to
inquire diligently for any violations of RCW 49.48.040 through 49.48.080 and
section 2 of this act, and to institute the actions for penalties herein
provided, and to enforce generally the provisions of RCW 49.48.040 through
49.48.080 and section 2 of this act.

---
END ---