BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.07 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The secretary of state shall investigate the feasibility of implementing a
reciprocal corporate licensing system with other states to enhance Washington's
ability to provide opportunities for commerce to businesses registered in
Washington and in other states. The objective of this feasibility
investigation is to identify the legal, financial, technical, and political
issues to be resolved in implementing a reciprocal licensing system and to
propose solutions to those issues, if any, that are determined to be barriers
to reciprocal business licensure.

(2)
The results of the feasibility investigation shall be furnished to the
legislature by January 31, 2000.

(3) This section expires July 1, 2000.

---
END ---