BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
90.82.010 and 1997 c 442 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that the local development of watershed plans for managing
water resources and for protecting existing water rights is vital to both state
and local interests. The local development of these plans serves vital local
interests by placing it in the hands of people: Who have the greatest
knowledge of both the resources and the aspirations of those who live and work
in the watershed; and who have the greatest stake in the proper, long-term
management of the resources. The development of such plans serves the state's
vital interests by ensuring that the state's water resources are used wisely,
by protecting existing water rights, by protecting instream flows for fish, and
by providing for the economic well‑being of the state's citizenry and
communities. Therefore, the legislature believes it necessary for the
public, all water-related interests, and units of local, state, federal,
and tribal government throughout the state to engage in the orderly
development of these watershed plans.

Sec.
2. RCW
90.82.020 and 1997 c 442 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Department" means the department of ecology.

(2)
"Implementing rules" for a WRIA plan are the rules needed to give
force and effect to the parts of the plan that create rights or obligations for
any party including a state agency or that establish water management policy.

(3)
"Minimum instream flow" means a minimum flow under chapter 90.03 or
90.22 RCW or a base flow under chapter 90.54 RCW.

(4)
"WRIA" means a water resource inventory area established in chapter
173-500 WAC as it existed on January 1, 1997.

(5)
"Water supply utility" means a water, combined water-sewer,
irrigation, reclamation, or public utility district or other supplier
without limitation as to the source of law under which it is organized,
that provides water to persons or other water users within the district or a
division or unit responsible for administering a publicly governed water supply
system on behalf of a county.

(6)
"WRIA plan" or "plan" means the product of the planning
unit including any rules adopted in conjunction with the product of the
planning unit.

Sec.
3. RCW
90.82.030 and 1997 c 442 s 104 are each amended to read as follows:

In
order to have the best possible program for appropriating and administering
water use in the state, the legislature establishes the following principles
and criteria to carry out the purpose and intent of chapter 442, Laws of 1997.

(1)
All WRIA planning units established under this chapter shall develop a process
to assure that water resource user interests and directly involved interest
groups at the local level have the opportunity, in a fair and equitable manner,
to give input and direction to the process.

(2)
If a planning unit requests technical assistance from a state agency as part of
its planning activities under this chapter and the assistance is with regard to
a subject matter over which the agency has jurisdiction, the state agency shall
provide the technical assistance to the planning unit.

(3)
Plans developed under chapter 442, Laws of 1997 shall be consistent with and
not duplicative of efforts already under way in a WRIA, including but not
limited to water clean-up plans and activities, the development and
implementation of salmon recovery plans and projects, regional water supply
coordination plans, and watershed analysis conducted under state forest
practices statutes and rules.

Sec.
4. RCW
90.82.060 and 1998 c 247 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Planning conducted under this chapter must provide for a process to allow the
local citizens within a WRIA or multi-WRIA area to join together in an effort
to: (a) Assess the status of the water resources of their WRIA or multi-WRIA
area; and (b) determine how best to manage the water resources of the WRIA or
multi-WRIA area to balance the competing resource demands for that area within
the parameters under RCW 90.82.120.

(2)
Watershed planning under this chapter may be initiated for a WRIA only with the
concurrence of: (a) All counties within the WRIA; (b) the largest city or town
within the WRIA unless the WRIA does not contain a city or town; ((and))
(c) the water supply utility obtaining the largest quantity of water from the
WRIA; and (d) all tribal governments with reservation lands or fishing
rights within the WRIA. To apply for a grant for organizing the planning
unit as provided for under RCW 90.82.040(2)(a), these entities shall designate
the entity that will serve as the lead agency for the planning effort and
indicate how the planning unit will be staffed.

(3)
Watershed planning under this chapter may be initiated for a multi-WRIA area
only with the concurrence of: (a) All counties within the multi-WRIA area; (b)
the largest city or town in each WRIA unless the WRIA does not contain a city
or town; ((and)) (c) the water supply utility obtaining the largest
quantity of water in each WRIA; and (d) all tribal governments with
reservation lands or fishing rights within the multi-WRIA area.

(4)
((If entities in subsection (2) or (3) of this section decide jointly and
unanimously to proceed, they shall invite all tribes with reservation lands
within the management area.

(5))) The
entities in subsection (2) or (3) of this section((, including the tribes if
they affirmatively accept the invitation,)) constitute the initiating
governments for the purposes of this section.

(((6)))
(5) The organizing grant shall be used to organize the planning unit and
to determine the scope of the planning to be conducted. In determining the
scope of the planning activities, consideration shall be given to all existing
plans and related planning activities. The scope of planning must include
water quantity elements as provided in RCW 90.82.070, and may include water
quality elements as contained in RCW 90.82.090, habitat elements as contained
in RCW 90.82.100, and instream flow elements as contained in RCW 90.82.080.
The initiating governments shall work with state government, other local governments
within the management area, and affected tribal governments, in developing a
planning process. The initiating governments may hold public meetings as
deemed necessary to develop a proposed scope of work and a proposed composition
of the planning unit. In developing a proposed composition of the planning
unit, the initiating governments shall provide for representation of a wide
range of water resource interests.

(((7)))
(6) Each state agency with regulatory or other interests in the WRIA or
multi-WRIA area to be planned shall assist the local citizens in the planning
effort to the greatest extent practicable, recognizing any fiscal limitations.
In providing such technical assistance and to facilitate representation on the
planning unit, state agencies may organize and agree upon their representation
on the planning unit. Such technical assistance must only be at the request of
and to the extent desired by the planning unit conducting such planning. The
number of state agency representatives on the planning unit shall be determined
by the initiating governments in consultation with the governor's office.

(((8)))
(7) As used in this section, "lead agency" means the entity
that coordinates staff support of its own or of other local governments and receives
grants for developing a watershed plan.

Sec.
5. RCW
90.82.070 and 1998 c 247 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Watershed
planning under this chapter shall address water quantity in the management area
by undertaking an assessment of water supply and use in the management area and
developing strategies for future use.

(1)
The assessment shall include:

(a)
An estimate of the surface and ground water present in the management area;

(b)
An estimate of the surface and ground water available in the management area,
taking into account seasonal and other variations;

(c)
An estimate of the water in the management area represented by claims in the
water rights claims registry, water use permits, certificated rights, existing
minimum instream flow rules, federally reserved rights, and any other rights to
water. An estimate of water quantity for planning purposes under this
chapter is not a quantification of water rights and shall not be used to
formally determine or resolve any legal dispute regarding water rights, without
regard to the source of law of those rights;

(d)
An estimate of the surface and ground water actually being used in the
management area;

(e)
An estimate of the water needed in the future for use in the management area;

(f)
An identification of the location of areas where aquifers are known to recharge
surface bodies of water and areas known to provide for the recharge of aquifers
from the surface; and

(g)
An estimate of the surface and ground water available for further
appropriation, taking into account the minimum instream flows adopted by rule
or to be adopted by rule under this chapter for streams in the management area
including the data necessary to evaluate necessary flows for fish.

(2)
Strategies for increasing water supplies in the management area, which may
include, but are not limited to, increasing water supplies through water
conservation, water reuse, the use of reclaimed water, voluntary water
transfers, aquifer recharge and recovery, additional water allocations, or
additional water storage and water storage enhancements. The objective of
these strategies is to supply water in sufficient quantities to satisfy the
minimum instream flows for fish and to provide water for future out-of-stream
uses for water identified in subsection (1)(e) and (g) of this section and to
ensure that adequate water supplies are available for agriculture, energy
production, and population and economic growth under the requirements of the
state's growth management act, chapter 36.70A RCW. These strategies, in and of
themselves, shall not be construed to confer new water rights. The watershed
plan must address the strategies required under this subsection, except that
the strategy shall not address surface or ground water use or rights within
reservation lands unless the tribal government consents to its inclusion.

Sec.
6. RCW
90.82.080 and 1998 c 247 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
If the initiating governments choose, by majority vote, to include an instream
flow component, it shall be accomplished in the following manner and
consistent with the timelines established for those streams subject to
subsection (6) of this section:

(i)
If minimum instream flows have already been adopted by rule for a stream within
the management area, unless the members of the local governments and tribes on
the planning unit by a recorded unanimous vote request the department to modify
those flows, the minimum instream flows shall not be modified under this
chapter. If the members of local governments and tribes request the planning
unit to modify instream flows and unanimous approval of the decision to modify
such flow is not achieved, then the instream flows shall not be modified under
this section;

(ii)
If minimum stream flows have not been adopted by rule for a stream within the
management area, setting the minimum instream flows shall be a collaborative
effort between the department and members of the planning unit. The department
must attempt to achieve consensus and approval among the members of the
planning unit regarding the minimum flows to be adopted by the department.
Approval is achieved if all government members and tribes that have been
invited and accepted on the planning unit present for a recorded vote
unanimously vote to support the proposed minimum instream flows, and all
nongovernmental members of the planning unit present for the recorded vote, by
a majority, vote to support the proposed minimum instream flows.

(b)
The department shall undertake rule making to adopt flows under (a) of this
subsection. The department may adopt the rules either by the regular rules
adoption process provided in chapter 34.05 RCW, the expedited rules adoption
process as set forth in RCW 34.05.230, or through a rules adoption process that
uses public hearings and notice provided by the county legislative authority to
the greatest extent possible. Such rules do not constitute significant
legislative rules as defined in RCW 34.05.328, and do not require the
preparation of small business economic impact statements.

(c)
If approval is not achieved within four years of the date the planning unit
first receives funds from the department for conducting watershed assessments
under RCW 90.82.040, the department may promptly initiate rule making under
chapter 34.05 RCW to establish flows for those streams and shall have two
additional years to establish the instream flows for those streams for which
approval is not achieved.

(2)(a)
Notwithstanding RCW 90.03.345, minimum instream flows set under this section
for rivers or streams that do not have existing minimum instream flow levels
set by rule of the department shall have a priority date of two years after funding
is first received from the department under RCW 90.82.040, unless determined
otherwise by a unanimous vote of the members of the planning unit but in no
instance may it be later than the effective date of the rule adopting such
flow.

(b)
Any increase to an existing minimum instream flow set by rule of the department
shall have a priority date of the earlier of the effective date of the rule
establishing the flow or two years after funding is first received for
planning in the WRIA or multi-WRIA area from the department under RCW 90.82.040
and the priority date of the portion of the minimum instream flow previously
established by rule shall retain its priority date as established under RCW
90.03.345.

(c)
Any existing minimum instream flow set by rule of the department that is
reduced shall retain its original date of priority as established by RCW
90.03.345 for the revised amount of the minimum instream flow level.

(3)
Before setting minimum instream flows under this section, the department shall
engage in government-to-government consultation with affected tribes in the
management area regarding the setting of such flows.

(4)
Nothing in this chapter either: (a) Affects the department's authority to
establish flow requirements or other conditions under RCW 90.48.260 or the
federal clean water act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.) for the licensing or
relicensing of a hydroelectric power project under the federal power act (16
U.S.C. Sec. 791 et seq.); or (b) affects or impairs existing instream flow requirements
and other conditions in a current license for a hydroelectric power project
licensed under the federal power act.

(5)
If the planning unit is unable to obtain unanimity under subsection (1) of this
section, the department may adopt rules setting such flows.

(6)
The department shall inform the planning unit of stream segments that:

(a)
Lack adopted flow rules or have adopted flows that may require revision;

(b)
Support salmon or trout populations listed or candidates for listing under the
federal endangered species act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.); and

(c)
Have inadequate flows or levels identified as a limiting factor on recovery of
salmon or trout populations. When the planning unit has elected under
subsection (1) of this section to make recommendations regarding flows for such
a stream or streams, the department and the planning unit shall develop a
schedule for finalizing those recommendations before the scheduled adoption or
revision of a flow rule that shall be consistent with the state's salmon
recovery strategy.

Sec.
7. RCW
90.82.090 and 1998 c 247 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

If
the initiating governments choose to include a water quality component, the
watershed plan shall include the following elements:

(1)
An examination based on existing studies conducted by federal, state, and local
agencies of the degree to which legally established water quality standards are
being met in the management area;

(2)
An examination based on existing studies conducted by federal, state, and local
agencies of the causes of water quality violations in the management area,
including an examination of information regarding pollutants, point and
nonpoint sources of pollution, and pollution-carrying capacities of water
bodies in the management area. The analysis shall take into account seasonal
stream flow or level variations, natural events, and pollution from natural
sources that occurs independent of human activities;

(3)
An examination of the legally established characteristic uses of each of the
nonmarine bodies of water in the management area;

(4)
An examination of any total maximum daily load established for nonmarine bodies
of water in the management area, unless a total maximum daily load process has
begun in the management area as of the date the watershed planning process is
initiated under RCW 90.82.060;

(5)
An examination of existing data related to the impact of fresh water on marine
water quality;

(6)
A recommended approach for implementing the total maximum daily load
established for achieving compliance with water quality standards for the
nonmarine bodies of water in the management area((, unless a total maximum
daily load process has begun in the management area as of the date the
watershed planning process is initiated under RCW 90.82.060)). When the
department has scheduled activities for assessing a water body and developing a
total maximum daily load for a water body whose water quality is being
considered by the planning unit, the department shall inform the planning unit
and develop a schedule by which the planning unit's recommendations may be
submitted in a timely manner to the department; and

(7)
Recommended means of monitoring by appropriate government agencies whether
actions taken to implement the approach to bring about improvements in water
quality are sufficient to achieve compliance with water quality standards.

This
chapter does not obligate the state to undertake analysis or to develop
strategies required under the federal clean water act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et
seq.). This chapter does not authorize any planning unit, lead agency, or
local government to adopt water quality standards or total maximum daily loads
under the federal clean water act.

Sec.
8. RCW
90.82.130 and 1998 c 247 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
Upon completing its proposed watershed plan, the planning unit may approve the
proposal by consensus of all of the members of the planning unit or by
consensus among the members of the planning unit appointed to represent units
of government and a majority vote of the nongovernmental members of the
planning unit. Approval of the proposal requires the unanimous vote of all
initiating governments under RCW 90.82.060(2).

(b)
If the proposal is approved by the planning unit, the unit shall submit the
proposal to the counties with territory within the management area. If the
planning unit has received funding beyond the initial fifty thousand dollars
under RCW 90.82.040, such a proposal approved by the planning unit shall be
submitted to the counties within four years of the date the funding was first
received by the planning unit.

(c)
If the watershed plan is not approved by the planning unit, the planning unit
may submit the components of the plan for which agreement is achieved using the
procedure under (a) of this subsection, or the planning unit may terminate the
planning process.

(2)(a)
The legislative authority of each of the counties with territory in the
management area shall provide public notice of and conduct at least one public
hearing on the proposed watershed plan submitted under this section. After the
public hearings, the legislative authorities of these counties shall convene in
joint session to consider the proposal. The counties may approve or reject the
proposed watershed plan for the management area, but may not amend it.
Approval of such a proposal shall be made by a majority vote of the members of
each of the counties with territory in the management area.

(b)
If a proposed watershed plan is not approved, it shall be returned to the
planning unit with recommendations for revisions. Approval of such a revised
proposal by the planning unit and the counties shall be made in the same manner
provided for the original watershed plan. If approval of the revised plan is
not achieved, the process shall terminate.

(3)
The planning unit shall not add an element to its watershed plan that creates
an obligation unless each of the governments to be obligated has at least one
representative on the planning unit and the respective members appointed to
represent those governments agree to adding the element that creates the
obligation. A member's agreeing to add an element shall be evidenced by a
recorded vote of all members of the planning unit in which the members record
support for adding the element. If the watershed plan is approved under
subsections (1) and (2) of this section and the plan creates obligations: (a)
For agencies of state government, the agencies shall adopt by rule the
obligations of both state and county governments and rules implementing the
state obligations, the obligations on state agencies are binding upon adoption
of the obligations into rule, and the agencies shall take other actions to
fulfill their obligations as soon as possible; or (b) for counties, the
obligations are binding on the counties and the counties shall adopt any
necessary implementing ordinances and take other actions to fulfill their
obligations as soon as possible.

(4) As used in this section, "obligation" means any
action required as a result of this chapter that imposes upon a tribal
government, county government, or state government, either: A fiscal impact; a
redeployment of resources; or a change of existing policy.

---
END ---