BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
41.06.070 and 1998 c 245 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:

(a)
The members of the legislature ((or to any employee of, or position in, the
legislative branch of the state government including members, officers, and
employees of the legislative council, joint legislative audit and review
committee, statute law committee, and any interim committee of the legislature));

(b)
The justices of the supreme court, judges of the court of appeals, judges of
the superior courts or of the inferior courts, or to any employee of, or
position in the judicial branch of state government;

(c)
Officers, academic personnel, and employees of technical colleges;

(d)
The officers of the Washington state patrol;

(e)
Elective officers of the state;

(f)
The chief executive officer of each agency;

(g)
In the departments of employment security and social and health services, the
director and the director's confidential secretary; in all other departments,
the executive head of which is an individual appointed by the governor, the
director, his or her confidential secretary, and his or her statutory assistant
directors;

(h)
In the case of a multimember board, commission, or committee, whether the
members thereof are elected, appointed by the governor or other authority,
serve ex officio, or are otherwise chosen:

(i)
All members of such boards, commissions, or committees;

(ii)
If the members of the board, commission, or committee serve on a part-time
basis and there is a statutory executive officer: The secretary of the board,
commission, or committee; the chief executive officer of the board, commission,
or committee; and the confidential secretary of the chief executive officer of
the board, commission, or committee;

(iii)
If the members of the board, commission, or committee serve on a full-time
basis: The chief executive officer or administrative officer as designated by
the board, commission, or committee; and a confidential secretary to the chair
of the board, commission, or committee;

(iv)
If all members of the board, commission, or committee serve ex officio: The
chief executive officer; and the confidential secretary of such chief executive
officer;

(i)
The confidential secretaries and administrative assistants in the immediate
offices of the elective officers of the state, except legislators;

(j)
Assistant attorneys general;

(k)
Commissioned and enlisted personnel in the military service of the state;

(l)
Inmate, student, part-time, or temporary employees, and part-time professional
consultants, as defined by the Washington personnel resources board;

(m)
The public printer or to any employees of or positions in the state printing
plant;

(n)
Officers and employees of the Washington state fruit commission;

(o)
Officers and employees of the Washington state apple advertising commission;

(p)
Officers and employees of the Washington state dairy products commission;

(q)
Officers and employees of the Washington tree fruit research commission;

(r)
Officers and employees of the Washington state beef commission;

(s)
Officers and employees of any commission formed under chapter 15.66 RCW;

(t)
((Officers and employees of the state wheat commission formed under chapter
15.63 RCW;

(u)))
Officers and employees of agricultural commissions formed under chapter 15.65
RCW;

(((v)))
(u) Officers and employees of the nonprofit corporation formed under chapter
67.40 RCW;

(((w)))
(v) Executive assistants for personnel administration and labor
relations in all state agencies employing such executive assistants including
but not limited to all departments, offices, commissions, committees, boards,
or other bodies subject to the provisions of this chapter and this subsection
shall prevail over any provision of law inconsistent herewith unless specific
exception is made in such law;

(((x)))
(w) In each agency with fifty or more employees: Deputy agency heads, assistant
directors or division directors, and not more than three principal policy
assistants who report directly to the agency head or deputy agency heads;

(((y)))
(x) All employees of the marine employees' commission;

(((z)
Up to a total of five senior staff positions of the western library network
under chapter 27.26 RCW responsible for formulating policy or for directing
program management of a major administrative unit. This subsection (1)(z)
shall expire on June 30, 1997;

(aa))) (y)
Staff employed by the department of community, trade, and economic development
to administer energy policy functions and manage energy site evaluation council
activities under RCW 43.21F.045(2)(m);

(((bb)))
(z) Staff employed by Washington State University to administer energy
education, applied research, and technology transfer programs under RCW
43.21F.045 as provided in RCW 28B.30.900(5).

(2)
The following classifications, positions, and employees of institutions of
higher education and related boards are hereby exempted from coverage of this
chapter:

(a)
Members of the governing board of each institution of higher education and
related boards, all presidents, vice-presidents, and their confidential
secretaries, administrative, and personal assistants; deans, directors, and
chairs; academic personnel; and executive heads of major administrative or
academic divisions employed by institutions of higher education; principal
assistants to executive heads of major administrative or academic divisions;
other managerial or professional employees in an institution or related board
having substantial responsibility for directing or controlling program
operations and accountable for allocation of resources and program results, or
for the formulation of institutional policy, or for carrying out personnel
administration or labor relations functions, legislative relations, public
information, development, senior computer systems and network programming, or
internal audits and investigations; and any employee of a community college
district whose place of work is one which is physically located outside the
state of Washington and who is employed pursuant to RCW 28B.50.092 and assigned
to an educational program operating outside of the state of Washington;

(b)
((Student, part-time, or temporary employees, and part-time professional
consultants, as defined by the Washington personnel resources board, employed
by institutions of higher education and related boards;

(c))) The
governing board of each institution, and related boards, may also exempt from
this chapter classifications involving research activities, counseling of
students, extension or continuing education activities, graphic arts or
publications activities requiring prescribed academic preparation or special
training as determined by the board: PROVIDED, That no nonacademic employee
engaged in office, clerical, maintenance, or food and trade services may be
exempted by the board under this provision;

(((d)))
(c) Printing craft employees in the department of printing at the
University of Washington.

(3)
In addition to the exemptions specifically provided by this chapter, the
Washington personnel resources board may provide for further exemptions
pursuant to the following procedures. The governor or other appropriate elected
official may submit requests for exemption to the Washington personnel
resources board stating the reasons for requesting such exemptions. The
Washington personnel resources board shall hold a public hearing, after proper
notice, on requests submitted pursuant to this subsection. If the board
determines that the position for which exemption is requested is one involving
substantial responsibility for the formulation of basic agency or executive
policy or one involving directing and controlling program operations of an
agency or a major administrative division thereof, the Washington personnel
resources board shall grant the request and such determination shall be final
as to any decision made before July 1, 1993. The total number of additional
exemptions permitted under this subsection shall not exceed one percent of the
number of employees in the classified service not including employees of
institutions of higher education and related boards for those agencies not
directly under the authority of any elected public official other than the
governor, and shall not exceed a total of twenty-five for all agencies under
the authority of elected public officials other than the governor.

The
salary and fringe benefits of all positions presently or hereafter exempted
except for the chief executive officer of each agency, full-time members of
boards and commissions, administrative assistants and confidential secretaries
in the immediate office of an elected state official, and the personnel listed
in subsections (1)(j) through (((v))) (u), (((y), (z))) (x),
and (2) of this section, shall be determined by the Washington personnel
resources board. However, beginning with changes proposed for the 1997-99
fiscal biennium, changes to the classification plan affecting exempt salaries
must meet the same provisions for classified salary increases resulting from
adjustments to the classification plan as outlined in RCW 41.06.152.

Any
person holding a classified position subject to the provisions of this chapter
shall, when and if such position is subsequently exempted from the application
of this chapter, be afforded the following rights: If such person previously
held permanent status in another classified position, such person shall have a
right of reversion to the highest class of position previously held, or to a
position of similar nature and salary.

Any
classified employee having civil service status in a classified position who
accepts an appointment in an exempt position shall have the right of reversion
to the highest class of position previously held, or to a position of similar
nature and salary.

A
person occupying an exempt position who is terminated from the position for
gross misconduct or malfeasance does not have the right of reversion to a
classified position as provided for in this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 41.06 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The director shall, after consultation with legislative agencies and affected
employees, provide some or all rules for confidential secretaries and
administrative assistants that are separate from the rules adopted for other
employees. The rules must address at least the following: Recruitment,
appointments, examinations, a classification plan, disciplinary procedures,
overtime compensation for employees covered under the rules who are exempt from
state and federal wage and hour laws, and a salary schedule. To the extent
that these rules apply only to legislative employees, these rules take
precedence over rules adopted by the board and are not subject to review by the
board.

(2)
Rules adopted under this chapter shall provide for local administration and
management by legislative agencies.

(3)
Each legislative agency must designate an officer who shall perform duties as
personnel officer. The personnel officer shall direct, supervise, and manage
administrative and technical personnel activities for the classified service at
the legislative agency consistent with policies established by the legislative
agency and in accordance with this chapter and the rules adopted under this
chapter. Legislative agencies may undertake jointly with one or more other
legislative agencies to appoint a person qualified to perform the duties of
personnel officer and provide staff and financial support, and may engage
consultants to assist in the performance of specific projects. The services of
the department of personnel may also be used pursuant to RCW 41.06.080.

Sec.
3. RCW
41.40.023 and 1997 c 254 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

Membership
in the retirement system shall consist of all regularly compensated employees
and appointive and elective officials of employers, as defined in this chapter,
with the following exceptions:

(1)
Persons in ineligible positions;

(2)
((Employees of the legislature except the officers thereof elected by the
members of the senate and the house and legislative committees, unless
membership of such employees be authorized by the said committee;

(3)))(a)
Persons holding elective offices or persons appointed directly by the
governor: PROVIDED, That such persons shall have the option of applying for
membership during such periods of employment: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That any
persons holding or who have held elective offices or persons appointed by the governor
who are members in the retirement system and who have, prior to becoming such
members, previously held an elective office, and did not at the start of such
initial or successive terms of office exercise their option to become members,
may apply for membership to be effective during such term or terms of office,
and shall be allowed to establish the service credit applicable to such term or
terms of office upon payment of the employee contributions therefor by the
employee with interest as determined by the director and employer contributions
therefor by the employer or employee with interest as determined by the
director: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That all contributions with interest submitted
by the employee under this subsection shall be placed in the employee's
individual account in the employee's savings fund and be treated as any other
contribution made by the employee, with the exception that any contributions
submitted by the employee in payment of the employer's obligation, together
with the interest the director may apply to the employer's contribution, shall
not be considered part of the member's annuity for any purpose except
withdrawal of contributions;

(b)
A member holding elective office who has elected to apply for membership
pursuant to (a) of this subsection and who later wishes to be eligible for a
retirement allowance shall have the option of ending his or her membership in
the retirement system. A member wishing to end his or her membership under
this subsection must file, on a form supplied by the department, a statement
indicating that the member agrees to irrevocably abandon any claim for service
for future periods served as an elected official. A member who receives more
than fifteen thousand dollars per year in compensation for his or her elective
service, adjusted annually for inflation by the director, is not eligible for
the option provided by this subsection (((3))) (2)(b);

(((4)))
(3) Employees holding membership in, or receiving pension benefits
under, any retirement plan operated wholly or in part by an agency of the state
or political subdivision thereof, or who are by reason of their current
employment contributing to or otherwise establishing the right to receive
benefits from any such retirement plan: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, In any case where
the retirement system has in existence an agreement with another retirement
system in connection with exchange of service credit or an agreement whereby
members can retain service credit in more than one system, such an employee
shall be allowed membership rights should the agreement so provide: AND
PROVIDED FURTHER, That an employee shall be allowed membership if otherwise
eligible while receiving survivor's benefits: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That an
employee shall not either before or after June 7, 1984, be excluded from
membership or denied service credit pursuant to this subsection solely on
account of: (a) Membership in the plan created under chapter 2.14 RCW; or (b)
enrollment under the relief and compensation provisions or the pension
provisions of the volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension fund under
chapter 41.24 RCW;

(((5)))
(4) Patient and inmate help in state charitable, penal, and correctional
institutions;

(((6)))
(5) "Members" of a state veterans' home or state soldiers'
home;

(((7)))
(6) Persons employed by an institution of higher learning or community
college, primarily as an incident to and in furtherance of their education or
training, or the education or training of a spouse;

(((8)))
(7) Employees of an institution of higher learning or community college
during the period of service necessary to establish eligibility for membership
in the retirement plans operated by such institutions;

(((9)))
(8) Persons rendering professional services to an employer on a fee,
retainer, or contract basis or when the income from these services is less than
fifty percent of the gross income received from the person's practice of a
profession;

(((10)))
(9) Persons appointed after April 1, 1963, by the liquor control board
as agency vendors;

(((11)))
(10) Employees of a labor guild, association, or organization:
PROVIDED, That elective officials and employees of a labor guild, association,
or organization which qualifies as an employer within this chapter shall have
the option of applying for membership;

(((12)))
(11) Retirement system retirees: PROVIDED, That following reemployment
in an eligible position, a retiree may elect to prospectively become a member
of the retirement system if otherwise eligible;

(((13)))
(12) Persons employed by or appointed or elected as an official of a
first class city that has its own retirement system: PROVIDED, That any member
elected or appointed to an elective office on or after April 1, 1971, shall
have the option of continuing as a member of this system in lieu of becoming a
member of the city system. A member who elects to continue as a member of this
system shall pay the appropriate member contributions and the city shall pay
the employer contributions at the rates prescribed by this chapter. The city
shall also transfer to this system all of such member's accumulated
contributions together with such further amounts as necessary to equal all
employee and employer contributions which would have been paid into this system
on account of such service with the city and thereupon the member shall be
granted credit for all such service. Any city that becomes an employer as
defined in RCW 41.40.010(4) as the result of an individual's election under
this subsection shall not be required to have all employees covered for
retirement under the provisions of this chapter. Nothing in this subsection
shall prohibit a city of the first class with its own retirement system from:
(a) Transferring all of its current employees to the retirement system established
under this chapter, or (b) allowing newly hired employees the option of
continuing coverage under the retirement system established by this chapter.

Notwithstanding
any other provision of this chapter, persons transferring from employment with
a first class city of over four hundred thousand population that has its own
retirement system to employment with the state department of agriculture may
elect to remain within the retirement system of such city and the state shall
pay the employer contributions for such persons at like rates as prescribed for
employers of other members of such system;

(((14)))
(13) Employees who (a) are not citizens of the United States, (b) do not
reside in the United States, and (c) perform duties outside of the United
States;

(((15)))
(14) Employees who (a) are not citizens of the United States, (b) are
not covered by chapter 41.48 RCW, (c) are not excluded from membership under
this chapter or chapter 41.04 RCW, (d) are residents of this state, and (e)
make an irrevocable election to be excluded from membership, in writing, which
is submitted to the director within thirty days after employment in an eligible
position;

(((16)))
(15) Employees who are citizens of the United States and who reside and
perform duties for an employer outside of the United States: PROVIDED, That
unless otherwise excluded under this chapter or chapter 41.04 RCW, the employee
may apply for membership (a) within thirty days after employment in an eligible
position and membership service credit shall be granted from the first day of
membership service, and (b) after this thirty-day period, but membership service
credit shall be granted only if payment is made for the noncredited membership
service under RCW 41.50.165(2), otherwise service shall be from the date of
application;

(((17)))
(16) The city manager or chief administrative officer of a city or town,
other than a retiree, who serves at the pleasure of an appointing authority:
PROVIDED, That such persons shall have the option of applying for membership
within thirty days from date of their appointment to such positions. Persons
serving in such positions as of April 4, 1986, shall continue to be members in
the retirement system unless they notify the director in writing prior to
December 31, 1986, of their desire to withdraw from membership in the
retirement system. A member who withdraws from membership in the system under
this section shall receive a refund of the member's accumulated contributions.

Persons
serving in such positions who have not opted for membership within the
specified thirty days, may do so by paying the amount required under RCW
41.50.165(2) for the period from the date of their appointment to the date of
acceptance into membership;

(((18)))
(17) Persons enrolled in state-approved apprenticeship programs,
authorized under chapter 49.04 RCW, and who are employed by local governments
to earn hours to complete such apprenticeship programs, if the employee is a
member of a union-sponsored retirement plan and is making contributions to such
a retirement plan or if the employee is a member of a Taft-Hartley retirement
plan.

Sec.
4. RCW
41.60.010 and 1993 c 467 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"Board" means the productivity board.

(2)
"Employee suggestion program" means the program developed by the
board under RCW 41.60.020.

(3)
"Teamwork incentive program" means the program developed by the board
under RCW 41.60.100 through 41.60.120.

(4)
"State employees" means ((present)) employees in state
agencies ((and)), institutions of higher education, and the
legislature, except for elected officials, directors of such agencies and
institutions, and their confidential secretaries and administrative assistants
and others specifically ruled ineligible by the rules of the productivity
board.

Sec.
5. RCW
42.40.020 and 1995 c 403 s 509 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, the terms defined in this section shall have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Auditor" means the office of the state auditor.

(2)
"Employee" means any individual employed or holding office in any
department ((or)), agency, or branch of state government.

(3)(a)
"Improper governmental action" means any action by an employee:

(i)
Which is undertaken in the performance of the employee's official duties,
whether or not the action is within the scope of the employee's employment; and

(ii)
Which is in violation of any state law or rule, is an abuse of authority, is of
substantial and specific danger to the public health or safety, or is a gross
waste of public funds.

(b)
"Improper governmental action" does not include personnel actions
including but not limited to employee grievances, complaints, appointments,
promotions, transfers, assignments, reassignments, reinstatements,
restorations, reemployments, performance evaluations, reductions in pay,
dismissals, suspensions, demotions, violations of the state civil service law,
alleged labor agreement violations, reprimands, or any action which may be
taken under chapter 41.06 RCW, or other disciplinary action except as provided
in RCW 42.40.030.

(4)
"Use of official authority or influence" includes taking, directing
others to take, recommending, processing, or approving any personnel action
such as an appointment, promotion, transfer, assignment, reassignment,
reinstatement, restoration, reemployment, performance evaluation, or any
adverse action under chapter 41.06 RCW, or other disciplinary action.

(5)
"Whistleblower" means an employee who in good faith reports alleged
improper governmental action to the auditor, initiating an investigation under
RCW 42.40.040. For purposes of the provisions of this chapter and chapter
49.60 RCW relating to reprisals and retaliatory action, the term
"whistleblower" also means: (a) An employee who in good faith
provides information to the auditor in connection with an investigation under
RCW 42.40.040 and an employee who is believed to have reported alleged improper
governmental action to the auditor or to have provided information to the
auditor in connection with an investigation under RCW 42.40.040 but who, in
fact, has not reported such action or provided such information; or (b) an
employee who in good faith identifies rules warranting review or provides
information to the rules review committee, and an employee who is believed to
have identified rules warranting review or provided information to the rules
review committee but who, in fact, has not done so.

Sec.
6. RCW
49.12.005 and 1998 c 334 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

For
the purposes of this chapter:

(1)
The term "department" means the department of labor and industries.

(2)
The term "director" means the director of the department of labor and
industries, or the director's designated representative.

(3)
The term "employer" means any person, firm, corporation, partnership,
business trust, legal representative, or other business entity which engages in
any business, industry, profession, or activity in this state and employs one
or more employees, and ((for the purposes of RCW 49.12.270 through
49.12.295 and 49.12.450 also includes)) the state, any state institution,
any state agency, political subdivisions of the state, and any municipal
corporation or quasi-municipal corporation.

(4)
The term "employee" means an employee who is employed in the business
of the employee's employer whether by way of manual labor or otherwise.

(5)
The term "conditions of labor" shall mean and include the conditions
of rest and meal periods for employees including provisions for personal
privacy, practices, methods and means by or through which labor or services are
performed by employees and includes bona fide physical qualifications in
employment, but shall not include conditions of labor otherwise governed by
statutes and rules and regulations relating to industrial safety and health
administered by the department.

(6)
For the purpose of chapter 16, Laws of 1973 2nd ex. sess. a minor is defined to
be a person of either sex under the age of eighteen years.

Sec.
7. RCW
49.12.360 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 11 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
An employer must grant an adoptive parent or a stepparent, at the time of birth
or initial placement for adoption of a child under the age of six, the same
leave under the same terms as the employer grants to biological parents. As a
term of leave, an employer may restrict leave to those living with the child at
the time of birth or initial placement.

(2)
An employer must grant the same leave upon the same terms for men as it does
for women.

(3)
The department shall administer and investigate violations of this section.
Notices of infraction, penalties, and appeals shall be administered in the same
manner as violations under RCW 49.12.285.

(4)
((For purposes of this section, "employer" includes all private
and public employers listed in RCW 49.12.005(3).

(5))) For
purposes of this section, "leave" means any leave from employment
granted to care for a newborn or a newly adopted child at the time of placement
for adoption.

(((6)))
(5) Nothing in this section requires an employer to:

(a)
Grant leave equivalent to maternity disability leave; or

(b)
Establish a leave policy to care for a newborn or newly placed child if no such
leave policy is in place for any of its employees.

Sec.
8. RCW
49.46.010 and 1997 c 203 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"Director" means the director of labor and industries;

(2)
"Wage" means compensation due to an employee by reason of employment,
payable in legal tender of the United States or checks on banks convertible
into cash on demand at full face value, subject to such deductions, charges, or
allowances as may be permitted by rules of the director;

(3)
"Employ" includes to permit to work;

(4)
"Employer" includes any individual, partnership, association,
corporation, business trust, or any person or group of persons acting directly
or indirectly in the interest of an employer in relation to an employee;

(5)
"Employee" includes any individual employed by an employer but shall
not include:

(a)
Any individual (i) employed as a hand harvest laborer and paid on a piece rate
basis in an operation which has been, and is generally and customarily
recognized as having been, paid on a piece rate basis in the region of
employment; (ii) who commutes daily from his or her permanent residence to the
farm on which he or she is employed; and (iii) who has been employed in
agriculture less than thirteen weeks during the preceding calendar year;

(b)
Any individual employed in casual labor in or about a private home, unless
performed in the course of the employer's trade, business, or profession;

(c)
Any individual employed in a bona fide executive, administrative, or
professional capacity or in the capacity of outside salesman as those terms are
defined and delimited by rules of the director. However, those terms shall be
defined and delimited by the Washington personnel resources board pursuant to
chapter 41.06 RCW for employees employed under the board's jurisdiction;

(d)
Any individual engaged in the activities of an educational, charitable,
religious, state or local governmental body or agency, or nonprofit
organization where the employer-employee relationship does not in fact exist or
where the services are rendered to such organizations gratuitously. If the individual
receives reimbursement in lieu of compensation for normally incurred
out-of-pocket expenses or receives a nominal amount of compensation per unit of
voluntary service rendered, an employer-employee relationship is deemed not to
exist for the purpose of this section or for purposes of membership or
qualification in any state, local government or publicly supported retirement
system other than that provided under chapter 41.24 RCW;

(e)
Any individual employed full time by any state or local governmental body or
agency who provides voluntary services but only with regard to the provision of
the voluntary services. The voluntary services and any compensation therefor
shall not affect or add to qualification, entitlement or benefit rights under
any state, local government, or publicly supported retirement system other than
that provided under chapter 41.24 RCW;

(f)
Any newspaper vendor or carrier;

(g)
Any carrier subject to regulation by Part 1 of the Interstate Commerce Act;

(h)
Any individual engaged in forest protection and fire prevention activities;

(i)
Any individual employed by any charitable institution charged with child care
responsibilities engaged primarily in the development of character or
citizenship or promoting health or physical fitness or providing or sponsoring
recreational opportunities or facilities for young people or members of the
armed forces of the United States;

(j)
Any individual whose duties require that he or she reside or sleep at the place
of his or her employment or who otherwise spends a substantial portion of his
or her work time subject to call, and not engaged in the performance of active
duties;

(k)
Any resident, inmate, or patient of a state, county, or municipal correctional,
detention, treatment or rehabilitative institution;

(l)
Any individual who holds a public elective or appointive office of the state,
any county, city, town, municipal corporation or quasi municipal corporation,
political subdivision, or any instrumentality thereof((, or any employee of
the state legislature));

(m)
All vessel operating crews of the Washington state ferries operated by the
department of transportation;

(n)
Any individual employed as a seaman on a vessel other than an American vessel;

(6)
"Occupation" means any occupation, service, trade, business,
industry, or branch or group of industries or employment or class of employment
in which employees are gainfully employed;

(7) "Retail or service establishment" means an
establishment seventy-five percent of whose annual dollar volume of sales of
goods or services, or both, is not for resale and is recognized as retail sales
or services in the particular industry.

---
END ---