BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. In
the department of natural resources' program for planning and development of
primary and secondary forest roads, the department should be sensitive to
compatible public access. The department of natural resources should develop a
consistent policy for public needs and for trust needs. While the highest and
best use for trust lands is providing fiscal stability and economic gain for
the trust, the highest and best use of such lands for all the people of
Washington is the opportunity to use and enjoy access to public lands. Both
uses should be coordinated to assist programs such as watchable wildlife, horse
trails, all-terrain vehicle areas, and the widespread public use of lands for
family outings for all citizens of the state. The solitude under the forest
canopy and the enjoyment of the forest environment are vital elements in
calming a citizenry hard pressed to maintain positive social values.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
Primary and secondary forest roads in danger of failing should be part of an
ongoing upgrading process for future use. The department of natural resources
shall review the road system on public trust lands in order to develop a schedule
to upgrade those roads that will increase both the value of the trust and to
continue the public's ability to access trust lands. Improving the forest road
system is especially necessary to allow access to the many natural area
preserves, natural resource conservation areas, and other public lands that the
legislature has been creating by its funding.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
department of natural resources shall give special consideration to the federal
Americans with disabilities act in providing roads that will allow vehicle use
for those persons who are disabled.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
department of natural resources may stockpile road building materials and may
require the stockpiling of materials by persons harvesting or using public
lands when those persons are building roads.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
department of natural resources shall, as manager for the trust, as part of its
management program and in conjunction with the task force created in section 7
of this act, undertake a study and report back to the legislature by December
1, 2001, concerning:

(1)
A review of the state primary and secondary roads in the Cascade foothills with
recommendations on how to increase the number of roads available and how to
maintain such roads for future public use;

(2)
Problems on all public lands caused by vandalism and recommendations on how to
approach the problem;

(3)
Garbage and illegal dumping on public lands and recommendations on needed
legislation;

(4)
A review of misuse of public resources and how the department and the
legislature should address this problem;

(5)
Develop recommendations on road damage and on old road failure in order to
upgrade the road system to benefit both the trust and the general public; and

(6)
An analysis of road standards, public use, and the methods to ensure that roads
are built to standards that will provide a greater value to the trust and a
more permanent road system for the public's use and benefit.

(7)
For the purposes of this section, "Cascade foothills" means generally
the nonurbanized lands within the Cascade range and drainages lying between
three hundred and three thousand feet above mean sea level, and located within
the counties of Whatcom, Skagit, Snohomish, King, Pierce, and Thurston. Lands
lying at lower elevations that are in the immediate vicinity of the foothills
area, such as lower drainages, are also included within this term. These lands
include public lands that are devoted to developed, nonrecreational uses.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
department of natural resources shall, when making temporary primary and
secondary road closures, prepare a list of road closures at the beginning of
each year and notify the affected counties, cities, and all user groups of
proposed temporary road closures. The department of natural resources must
hold a hearing in the general area to discuss the temporary closure with the
public and with user groups. It is the department's responsibility to notify
as many user groups as possible prior to the hearing. The list submitted by
the department shall show the area and use pattern of each road to be
temporarily closed. The list shall include as much information on the
recreational and public use of the roads as possible.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
commissioner of public lands shall appoint a task force to work on increasing
public access to public lands. The task force shall include federal and state
land management agencies and representatives of private landowners. The task
force shall also include four members of the legislature, one from each of the
two largest caucuses of the senate and house of representatives, appointed by
the president of the senate and the co-speakers of the house of
representatives, respectively.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 2 through 4, 6, and 7 of this act are each added to chapter 79.38 RCW.

---
END ---