BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
29.13.047 and 1985 c 45 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever state officers or measures are voted upon at a state primary or
general election held ((in an odd-numbered year)) as specified
under RCW 29.13.070 or 29.13.010, the state of Washington shall assume a
prorated share of the costs of that state primary or general election.

(2)
Whenever a primary or vacancy election is held to fill a vacancy in the
position of United States senator or United States representative under chapter
29.68 RCW, the state of Washington shall assume a prorated share of the costs
of that primary or vacancy election.

(3)
The county auditor shall apportion the state's share of these expenses when
prorating election costs under RCW 29.13.045 and shall file such expense claims
with the secretary of state.

(4)
The secretary of state shall include in his or her biennial budget requests
sufficient funds to carry out this section. Reimbursements for election costs
shall be from appropriations specifically provided by law for that purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act takes effect January 1, 2002.

---
END ---