BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
LEGISLATIVE INTENT. The legislature finds that temporary, leased,
and contract employees are entitled to the state's basic safety net of job
protections. Third parties benefit from the labors of such employees, and
should be held accountable when temporary services agencies, employee leasing
companies, and other contract employers are unable to meet their employment-related
obligations. It is the intent of the legislature that third parties that
benefit from the labors of temporary, leased, and contract employees should be
subject to joint and several liability for unpaid unemployment insurance
contributions and workers' compensation premiums.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 50.24 RCW to read as follows:

UNEMPLOYMENT
COMPENSATION. (1) A temporary services agency, an employee leasing agency, or
any other entity that is responsible, under contract or in fact, for the
payment of wages to individuals in remuneration for personal services performed
for, or for the benefit of, a third party is liable for contributions due under
this title to insure individuals performing personal services for the third
party.

(2)
If a temporary services agency, an employee leasing agency, or any other entity
fails to pay contributions due under this title to insure individuals
performing one hundred fifty hours or more per quarter of personal services for
a third party, the third party is jointly and severally liable for such
contributions, interest, and penalties. The commissioner has all of the
remedies of collection against the third party under the provisions of this
title.

(3)
The temporary services agency, the employee leasing agency, or the other entity
must keep separate records and submit separate quarterly reports for each third
party for which one or more individuals perform one hundred fifty hours or more
per quarter of personal services.

(4)
The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.

(a)
"Employee leasing agency" means an individual or entity that, for a
fee, places the employees of a client onto its payroll and leases the employees
back to the client.

(b)
"Temporary services agency" means an individual or entity that is
engaged in the business of furnishing individuals to perform services on a part‑time
or temporary basis for a third party.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 51.16 RCW to read as follows:

WORKERS'
COMPENSATION. (1) A temporary services agency, an employee leasing agency, or
any other entity that is responsible, under contract or in fact, for the
payment of wages to individuals in remuneration for personal services performed
for, or for the benefit of, a third party is liable for premiums due under this
title to insure individuals performing personal services for the third party.

(2)
If a temporary services agency, an employee leasing agency, or any other entity
fails to pay premiums due under this title to insure individuals performing one
hundred fifty hours or more per quarter of personal services for a third party,
the third party is jointly and severally liable for such premiums, interest,
and penalties. The department shall have all of the remedies of collection
against the third party under the provisions of this title.

(3)
The temporary services agency, the employee leasing agency, or the other entity
must keep separate records and submit separate quarterly reports for each third
party for which one or more individuals perform one hundred fifty hours or more
per quarter of personal services.

(4)
The benefits and remedies conferred by this title upon individuals performing
one hundred fifty hours or more per quarter of personal services is to the
exclusion of any other remedy, proceeding, or compensation for personal
injuries or sickness, caused by the temporary services agency, the employee
leasing agency, the other entity, or the third party except as otherwise
provided in this title. All civil actions and civil causes of actions by such
individuals against the temporary services agency, the employee leasing agency,
the other entity, or the third party for personal injuries or sickness are
abolished, except as otherwise provided in this title.

(5)(a)
Every temporary services agency, employee leasing agency, or other entity shall
secure the payment of its obligations under this title by: (i) Insuring and
keeping insured the payment of such benefits with the state fund; or (ii)
qualifying as a self-insurer under this title. No temporary services agency,
employee leasing agency, or other entity shall secure the payment of its
obligations under this title by or through a third party.

(b)
Every third party shall secure the payment of compensation under this title
by: (i) Insuring and keeping insured the payment of such benefits with the
state fund; or (ii) qualifying as a self-insurer under this title. No third
party shall secure the payment of its obligations under this title by or
through a temporary services agency, employee leasing agency, or other entity.

(6)
The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.

(a)
"Employee leasing agency" means an individual or entity that, for a
fee, places the employees of a client onto its payroll and leases the employees
back to the client.

(b)
"Temporary services agency" means an individual or entity that is
engaged in the business of furnishing individuals to perform services on a part‑time
or temporary basis for a third party.

Sec.
4. RCW
51.16.060 and 1985 c 315 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
employer not qualifying as a self-insurer, shall insure with the state and
shall, on or before the last day of January, April, July and October of each
year thereafter, furnish the department with a true and accurate payroll for
the period in which workers were employed by it during the preceding calendar
quarter, the total amount paid to such workers during such preceding calendar
quarter, and a segregation of employment in the different classes established
pursuant to this title, and shall pay its premium thereon to the appropriate
fund. Premiums for a calendar quarter, whether reported or not, shall become
due and delinquent on the day immediately following the last day of the month
following the calendar quarter. The sufficiency of such statement shall be
subject to the approval of the director: PROVIDED, That the director may in
his or her discretion and for the effective administration of this title
require an employer in individual instances to furnish a supplementary report
containing the name of each individual worker, his or her hours worked, his or
her rate of pay and the class or classes in which such work was performed:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That in the event an employer shall furnish the department
with four consecutive quarterly reports wherein each such quarterly report
indicates that no premium is due the department may close the account:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That the department may promulgate rules and regulations in
accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW to establish other reporting periods and
payment due dates in lieu of reports and payments following each calendar
quarter, and may also establish terms and conditions for payment of premiums
and assessments based on estimated payrolls, with such payments being subject
to approval as to sufficiency of the estimated payroll by the department, and
also subject to appropriate periodic adjustments made by the department based
on actual payroll((: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That a temporary help company
which provides workers on a temporary basis to its customers shall be
considered the employer for purposes of reporting and paying premiums and
assessments under this title according to the appropriate rate classifications
as determined by the department: PROVIDED, That the employer shall be liable
for paying premiums and assessments, should the temporary help company fail to
pay the premiums and assessments under this title)).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5.
CAPTIONS. Captions used in this act are not any part of the law.

---
END ---