BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the intent of the legislature that Washington residents have access to colleges
and universities in this state that provide a high-quality education, preparing
students to become partners in improving their communities and this state. To
sustain excellence in higher education, adequate resources must be committed to
ensure quality in instruction, research, and public service. The legislature
is responsible for providing adequate funding to sustain excellence and develop
strategies to make improvements as necessary. To provide a reliable measure to
judge the adequacy of state funding, goals shall be established to achieve
funding levels of public institutions of higher education at or above the
average of public, per-student funding of peer institutions in other states.
In concert with state funding, part of the responsibility for quality higher
education is borne by student contributions in the form of tuition. The
legislature further intends that financial aid for needy students increases in
relation to increasing tuition. This act establishes a permanent tuition
policy for the state's public higher education system and establishes average
peer tuition levels as the goal for the University of Washington.

Sec.
2. RCW
28B.15.031 and 1996 c 142 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
term "operating fees" as used in this chapter shall include the fees,
other than building fees, charged all students registering at the state's
colleges and universities but shall not include fees for short courses,
self-supporting degree credit programs and courses, marine station work,
experimental station work, correspondence or extension courses, and individual
instruction and student deposits or rentals, disciplinary and library fines,
which colleges and universities shall have the right to impose, laboratory,
gymnasium, health, technology and student activity fees, or fees, charges, rentals,
and other income derived from any or all revenue producing lands, buildings and
facilities of the colleges or universities heretofore or hereafter acquired,
constructed or installed, including but not limited to income from rooms,
dormitories, dining rooms, hospitals, infirmaries, housing or student activity
buildings, vehicular parking facilities, land, or the appurtenances thereon, or
such other special fees as may be established by any college or university
board of trustees or regents from time to time. All moneys received as
operating fees at any institution of higher education shall be deposited in a
local account containing only operating fees revenue and related interest:
PROVIDED, That a minimum of three and one-half percent of operating fees shall
be retained by the institutions((, except the technical colleges,)) for
the purposes of RCW 28B.15.820. Local operating fee accounts shall not be
subject to appropriation by the legislature or allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW.

Sec.
3. RCW
28B.15.066 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 9 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

It
is the intent of the legislature that:

In
making appropriations from the state's general fund to institutions of higher
education, each appropriation shall conform to the following:

(1)
The appropriation shall not be reduced by the amount of operating fees revenue
estimated to be collected from students enrolled at the state-funded enrollment
level specified in the omnibus biennial operating appropriations act;

(2)
The appropriation shall not be reduced by the amount of operating fees revenue
collected from students enrolled above the state-funded level((, but within
the over-enrollment limitations,)) specified in the omnibus biennial operating
appropriations act; and

(3)
The general fund state appropriation shall not be reduced by the amount of
operating fees revenue collected as a result of waiving less operating fees
revenue than the amounts authorized under RCW 28B.15.910.

Sec.
4. RCW
28B.15.067 and 1997 c 403 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Tuition fees shall be established under the provisions of this chapter.

(2)
((Academic year tuition for full-time students at the state's institutions of
higher education for the 1997-98 academic year, other than the summer term,
shall be as provided in this subsection.

(a)
At the University of Washington and Washington State University:

(i)
For resident undergraduate students and other resident students not in
graduate, law, or first professional programs, two thousand nine hundred
eighty-eight dollars;

(ii)(A)
For nonresident undergraduate students and other nonresident students at the
University of Washington not in graduate, law, or first professional programs,
ten thousand two hundred seventy-eight dollars;

(B)
For nonresident undergraduate students and other nonresident students at
Washington State University not in graduate or first professional programs,
nine thousand eight hundred seventy dollars;

(iii)
For resident graduate students, four thousand eight hundred fifty-four dollars;

(iv)
For nonresident graduate students, twelve thousand five hundred eighty-eight
dollars;

(v)
For resident law students, five thousand ten dollars;

(vi)
For nonresident law students, twelve thousand nine hundred fifteen dollars;

(vii)
For resident first professional students, eight thousand one hundred twelve
dollars; and

(viii)
For nonresident first professional students, twenty-one thousand twenty-four
dollars.

(b)
At the regional universities and The Evergreen State College:

(i)
For resident undergraduate and all other resident students not in graduate
programs, two thousand two hundred eleven dollars;

(ii)
For nonresident undergraduate and all other nonresident students not in
graduate programs, eight thousand six hundred forty-six dollars;

(iii)
For resident graduate students, three thousand seven hundred twenty-six
dollars; and

(iv)
For nonresident graduate students, eleven thousand nine hundred seventy-six
dollars.

(c)
At the community colleges:

(i)
For resident students, one thousand three hundred eleven dollars; and

(ii)
For nonresident students, five thousand five hundred eighty-six dollars.

(3)))
Academic year tuition for full-time students at the state's institutions of
higher education beginning with the 1998-99 academic year, other than the
summer term, shall be as provided in this subsection ((unless different
rates are adopted in the omnibus appropriations act)).

(a)
At the University of Washington and Washington State University:

(i)
For resident undergraduate students and other resident students not in
graduate, law, or first professional programs, three thousand one hundred eight
dollars;

(ii)(A)
For nonresident undergraduate students and other nonresident students at the
University of Washington not in graduate, law, or first professional programs,
eleven thousand one hundred thirty dollars;

(B)
For nonresident undergraduate students and other nonresident students at
Washington State University not in graduate or first professional programs, ten
thousand two hundred sixty-six dollars;

(iii)
For resident graduate students, five thousand forty-six dollars;

(iv)
For nonresident graduate students, thirteen thousand ninety-two dollars;

(v)
For resident law students, five thousand three hundred seventy-six dollars;

(vi)
For nonresident law students, thirteen thousand seven hundred eighty-two
dollars;

(vii)
For resident first professional students, eight thousand four hundred
thirty-six dollars; and

(viii)
For nonresident first professional students, twenty-one thousand eight hundred
sixty-four dollars.

(b)
At the regional universities and The Evergreen State College:

(i)
For resident undergraduate and all other resident students not in graduate
programs, two thousand two hundred ninety-eight dollars;

(ii)
For nonresident undergraduate and all other nonresident students not in
graduate programs, eight thousand nine hundred ninety-one dollars;

(iii)
For resident graduate students, three thousand eight hundred seventy-six
dollars; and

(iv)
For nonresident graduate students, twelve thousand four hundred fifty-six
dollars.

(c)
At the community colleges:

(i)
For resident students, one thousand three hundred sixty-two dollars; and

(ii)
For nonresident students, five thousand eight hundred eight dollars.

(((4)))
(3) For the ((1997-98 and)) 1998-99 academic year((s)),
the University of Washington shall use at least ten percent of the revenue
received from the difference between a four percent increase in tuition fees
and the actual increase charged to law students to assist needy low and
middle-income resident law students. For the ((1997-98 and)) 1998-99
academic year((s)), the University of Washington shall use at least ten
percent of the revenue received from the difference between a four percent
increase in tuition fees and the actual increase charged to nonresident
undergraduate students and all other nonresident students not in graduate, law,
or first professional programs to assist needy low and middle-income resident
undergraduate students and all other resident students not enrolled in
graduate, law, or first professional programs. This requirement is in addition
to the deposit requirements of the institutional aid fund under RCW 28B.15.820.

(4)
For the 1999-2000 academic year and each academic year thereafter, the governing
boards of the state universities, regional universities, The Evergreen State
College, and the state board for community and technical colleges may reduce
full-time operating fees from the levels for academic year 1998-99 or from
levels for any year thereafter, may increase full-time operating fees no more
than five percent per year for resident undergraduate students, and may
increase full-time operating fees no more than twenty percent per academic year
for all other students during the academic year and all categories of students
during the summer term. However, with respect to full-time resident
undergraduate students, in order to provide the means to progress significantly
toward the goal of tuition rates approximating that of peer institutions, the
governing board of the University of Washington may instead increase the
previous quarter's operating fees for full-time, resident undergraduate
students up to fifty dollars per quarter for each quarter of academic years
1999-2000 and 2000-01.

(5)
The tuition fees established under this chapter shall not apply to high school
students enrolling in participating institutions of higher education under RCW
28A.600.300 through 28A.600.395.

Sec.
5. RCW
28B.15.069 and 1997 c 403 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
As used in this section, each of the following subsections is a separate
tuition category:

(a)
Resident undergraduate students and all other resident students not in first
professional, graduate, or law programs;

(b)
Nonresident undergraduate students and all other nonresident students not in
first professional graduate or law programs;

(c)
Resident graduate students;

(d)
Resident master's in business administration students;

(e)
Nonresident master's in business administration students;

(f)
Resident law students;

(((e)))
(g) Nonresident graduate students;

(((f)))
(h) Nonresident law students;

(((g)))
(i) Resident first professional students; ((and

(h))) (j)
Nonresident first professional students;

(k)
Resident medical students;

(l)
Nonresident medical students;

(m)
Resident dental students; and

(n)
Nonresident dental students.

(2)
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, as used in this section
"first professional programs" means programs leading to one of the
following degrees: Doctor of medicine, doctor of dental surgery, or doctor of
veterinary medicine.

(3)
The building fee for each academic year shall be a percentage of ((total
tuition fees)) the operating fee for each tuition category. This
percentage shall be ((calculated by the higher education coordinating board
and be based on)) the actual percentage the building fee ((is)) was
of ((total tuition)) the operating fee for each tuition category
in the 1994-95 academic year, rounded ((up)) to the nearest half
percent.

(4)
The governing boards of each institution of higher education, except for the
technical colleges, shall charge to and collect from each student a services
and activities fee. A governing board may increase the existing fee annually,
consistent with budgeting procedures set forth in RCW 28B.15.045, by a
percentage not to exceed the annual percentage increase in student tuition fees
for the applicable tuition category: PROVIDED, That such percentage increase
shall not apply to that portion of the services and activities fee previously
committed to the repayment of bonded debt. The services and activities fee
committee provided for in RCW 28B.15.045 may initiate a request to the
governing board for a fee increase.

(5)
Tuition and services and activities fees consistent with subsection (4) of this
section shall be set by the state board for community and technical colleges
for community college summer school students unless the community college
charges fees in accordance with RCW 28B.15.515.

(6)
Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, each governing board of a
community college may charge such fees for ungraded courses, noncredit courses,
community services courses, and self‑supporting courses as it, in its discretion,
may determine, consistent with the rules of the state board for community and
technical colleges.

Sec.
6. RCW
28B.15.100 and 1998 c 75 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The
Evergreen State College, and the community colleges shall charge to and collect
from each of the students registering at the particular institution for any
quarter or semester such tuition fees and services and activities fees, and
other fees as such board shall in its discretion determine. The total of all
fees shall be rounded to the nearest whole dollar amount((: PROVIDED, That
such tuition fees for other than the summer term shall be in the amounts for
the respective institutions as otherwise set forth in RCW 28B.15.067)).

(2)
Part-time students shall be charged tuition and services and activities fees
proportionate to full-time student rates established for residents and
nonresidents: PROVIDED, That students registered at the University of
Washington for fewer than two credit hours shall be charged tuition and
services and activities fees at the rate established for two credit hours:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That, subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, residents
of Idaho or Oregon who are enrolled in community college district number twenty
for six or fewer credits during any quarter or semester may be exempted from
payment of all or a portion of the nonresident tuition fees differential upon a
declaration by the higher education coordinating board that it finds Washington
residents from the community college district are afforded substantially
equivalent treatment by such other states.

(3)
Full-time students registered for more than eighteen credit hours shall be
charged an additional operating fee for each credit hour in excess of eighteen
hours at the applicable established per credit hour tuition fee rate for
part-time students: PROVIDED, That, subject to the limitations of RCW
28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state universities and the community
colleges may exempt all or a portion of the additional charge, for students who
are registered exclusively in first professional programs in medicine, dental
medicine, veterinary medicine, doctor of pharmacy, or law, or who are
registered exclusively in required courses in vocational preparatory programs.

Sec.
7. RCW
28B.20.130 and 1998 c 245 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

General
powers and duties of the board of regents are as follows:

(1)
To have full control of the university and its property of various kinds,
except as otherwise provided by law.

(2)
To employ the president of the university, his or her assistants, members of
the faculty, and employees of the institution, who except as otherwise provided
by law, shall hold their positions during the pleasure of said board of
regents.

(3)
Establish entrance requirements for students seeking admission to the
university which meet or exceed the standards specified under RCW
28B.80.350(2). Completion of examinations satisfactory to the university may
be a prerequisite for entrance by any applicant at the university's
discretion. Evidence of completion of public high schools and other
educational institutions whose courses of study meet the approval of the
university may be acceptable for entrance.

(4)
Establish such colleges, schools, or departments necessary to carry out the
purpose of the university and not otherwise proscribed by law.

(5)
With the assistance of the faculty of the university, prescribe the course of
study in the various colleges, schools, and departments of the institution and
publish the necessary catalogues thereof.

(6)
Grant to students such certificates or degrees as recommended for such students
by the faculty. The board, upon recommendation of the faculty, may also confer
honorary degrees upon persons other than graduates of this university in
recognition of their learning or devotion to literature, art, or science:
PROVIDED, That no degree shall ever be conferred in consideration of the
payment of money or the giving of property of whatsoever kind.

(7)
Accept such gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises, whether real or
personal property, or both, in trust or otherwise, for the use or benefit of
the university, its colleges, schools, departments, or agencies; and sell,
lease or exchange, invest or expend the same or the proceeds, rents, profits,
and income thereof except as limited by the terms of said gifts, grants,
conveyances, bequests, and devises. The board shall adopt proper rules to
govern and protect the receipt and expenditure of the proceeds of all fees, and
the proceeds, rents, profits, and income of all gifts, grants, conveyances,
bequests, and devises ((above-mentioned)) in this subsection.

(8)
Except as otherwise provided by law, to enter into such contracts as the
regents deem essential to university purposes.

(9)
To submit upon request such reports as will be helpful to the governor and to
the legislature in providing for the institution.

(10)
Subject to the approval of the higher education coordinating board pursuant to
RCW 28B.80.340, offer new degree programs, offer off-campus programs,
participate in consortia or centers, contract for off-campus educational
programs, and purchase or lease major off-campus facilities.

(11)
Establish operating fees tuition rates according to RCW 28B.15.067 except as
otherwise provided by state law.

(12)
Establish salary and wage compensation levels for all employees of the
university except as otherwise provided by state law or collective bargaining
agreements.

Sec.
8. RCW
28B.30.150 and 1998 c 245 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

The
regents of Washington State University, in addition to other duties prescribed
by law, shall:

(1)
Have full control of the university and its property of various kinds, except
as otherwise provided by law.

(2)
Employ the president of the university, his or her assistants, members of the
faculty, and employees of the university, who, except as otherwise provided by
law, shall hold their positions during the pleasure of said board of regents.

(3)
Establish entrance requirements for students seeking admission to the
university which meet or exceed the standards specified under RCW
28B.80.350(2). Completion of examinations satisfactory to the university may
be a prerequisite for entrance by any applicant, at the university's
discretion. Evidence of completion of public high schools and other
educational institutions whose courses of study meet the approval of the
university may be acceptable for entrance.

(4)
Establish such colleges, schools, or departments necessary to carry out the
purpose of the university and not otherwise proscribed by law.

(5)
Subject to the approval of the higher education coordinating board pursuant to
RCW 28B.80.340, offer new degree programs, offer off-campus programs,
participate in consortia or centers, contract for off-campus educational
programs, and purchase or lease major off-campus facilities.

(6)
With the assistance of the faculty of the university, prescribe the courses of
instruction in the various colleges, schools, and departments of the
institution and publish the necessary catalogues thereof.

(7)
Collect such information as the board deems desirable as to the schemes of
technical instruction adopted in other parts of the United States and foreign
countries.

(8)
Provide for holding agricultural institutes including farm marketing forums.

(9)
Provide that instruction given in the university, as far as practicable, be
conveyed by means of laboratory work and provide in connection with the
university one or more physical, chemical, and biological laboratories, and
suitably furnish and equip the same.

(10)
Provide training in military tactics for those students electing to participate
therein.

(11)
Establish a department of elementary science and in connection therewith
provide instruction in elementary mathematics, including elementary
trigonometry, elementary mechanics, elementary and mechanical drawing, and land
surveying.

(12)
Establish a department of agriculture and in connection therewith provide
instruction in physics with special application of its principles to
agriculture, chemistry with special application of its principles to
agriculture, morphology and physiology of plants with special reference to
common grown crops and fungus enemies, morphology and physiology of the lower
forms of animal life, with special reference to insect pests, morphology and
physiology of the higher forms of animal life and in particular of the horse,
cow, sheep, and swine, agriculture with special reference to the breeding and
feeding of livestock and the best mode of cultivation of farm produce, and
mining and metallurgy, appointing demonstrators in each of these subjects to
superintend the equipment of a laboratory and to give practical instruction
therein.

(13)
Establish agricultural experiment stations in connection with the department of
agriculture, including at least one in the western portion of the state, and
appoint the officers and prescribe regulations for their management.

(14)
Grant to students such certificates or degrees, as recommended for such
students by the faculty.

(15)
Confer honorary degrees upon persons other than graduates of the university in
recognition of their learning or devotion to literature, art, or science when
recommended thereto by the faculty: PROVIDED, That no degree shall ever be
conferred in consideration of the payment of money or the giving of property of
whatsoever kind.

(16)
Adopt plans and specifications for university buildings and facilities or
improvements thereto and employ skilled architects and engineers to prepare
such plans and specifications and supervise the construction of buildings or
facilities which the board is authorized to erect, and fix the compensation for
such services. The board shall enter into contracts with one or more
contractors for such suitable buildings, facilities, or improvements as the
available funds will warrant, upon the most advantageous terms offered at a
public competitive letting, pursuant to public notice under rules established
by the board. The board shall require of all persons with whom they contract
for construction and improvements a good and sufficient bond for the faithful
performance of the work and full protection against all liens.

(17)
Except as otherwise provided by law, direct the disposition of all money
appropriated to or belonging to the state university.

(18)
Receive and expend the money appropriated under the act of congress approved
May 8, 1914, entitled "An Act to provide for cooperative agricultural
extension work between the agricultural colleges in the several States
receiving the benefits of the Act of Congress approved July 2, 1862, and Acts
supplemental thereto and the United States Department of Agriculture" and
organize and conduct agricultural extension work in connection with the state
university in accordance with the terms and conditions expressed in the acts of
congress.

(19)
Except as otherwise provided by law, to enter into such contracts as the
regents deem essential to university purposes.

(20)
Acquire by lease, gift, or otherwise, lands necessary to further the work of
the university or for experimental or demonstrational purposes.

(21)
Establish and maintain at least one agricultural experiment station in an
irrigation district to conduct investigational work upon the principles and
practices of irrigational agriculture including the utilization of water and
its relation to soil types, crops, climatic conditions, ditch and drain
construction, fertility investigations, plant disease, insect pests, marketing,
farm management, utilization of fruit byproducts, and general development of
agriculture under irrigation conditions.

(22)
Supervise and control the agricultural experiment station at Puyallup.

(23)
Establish and maintain at Wenatchee an agricultural experiment substation for
the purpose of conducting investigational work upon the principles and
practices of orchard culture, spraying, fertilization, pollenization, new fruit
varieties, fruit diseases and pests, byproducts, marketing, management, and
general horticultural problems.

(24)
Accept such gifts, grants, conveyances, devises, and bequests, whether real or
personal property, in trust or otherwise, for the use or benefit of the
university, its colleges, schools, or departments; and sell, lease or exchange,
invest or expend the same or the proceeds, rents, profits, and income thereof
except as limited by the terms of said gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests,
and devises; and adopt proper rules to govern and protect the receipt and
expenditure of the proceeds of all fees, and the proceeds, rents, profits, and
income of all gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises.

(25)
Construct when the board so determines a new foundry and a mining, physical,
technological building, and fabrication shop at the university, or add to the
present foundry and other buildings, in order that both instruction and
research be expanded to include permanent molding and die casting with a
section for new fabricating techniques, especially for light metals, including
magnesium and aluminum; purchase equipment for the shops and laboratories in
mechanical, electrical, and civil engineering; establish a pilot plant for the
extraction of alumina from native clays and other possible light metal
research; purchase equipment for a research laboratory for technological
research generally; and purchase equipment for research in electronics,
instrumentation, energy sources, plastics, food technology, mechanics of
materials, hydraulics, and similar fields.

(26)
Make and transmit to the governor and members of the legislature upon request
such reports as will be helpful in providing for the institution.

(27)
Establish operating fees tuition rates according to RCW 28B.15.067 except as
otherwise provided by state law.

(28)
Establish salary and wage compensation levels for all employees of the
university except as otherwise provided by state law or collective bargaining
agreements.

Sec.
9. RCW
28B.35.120 and 1985 c 370 s 94 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to any other powers and duties prescribed by law, each board of
trustees of the respective regional universities:

(1)
Shall have full control of the regional university and its property of various
kinds, except as otherwise provided by law.

(2)
Shall employ the president of the regional university, his assistants, members
of the faculty, and other employees of the institution, who, except as
otherwise provided by law, shall hold their positions, until discharged
therefrom by the board for good and lawful reason.

(3)
With the assistance of the faculty of the regional university, shall prescribe
the course of study in the various schools and departments thereof and publish
such catalogues thereof as the board deems necessary: PROVIDED, That the state
board of education shall determine the requisites for and give program approval
of all courses leading to teacher certification by such board.

(4)
Establish such divisions, schools or departments necessary to carry out the
purposes of the regional university and not otherwise proscribed by law.

(5)
Except as otherwise provided by law, may establish and erect such new
facilities as determined by the board to be necessary for the regional
university.

(6)
May acquire real and other property as provided in RCW 28B.10.020, as now or
hereafter amended.

(7)
Except as otherwise provided by law, may purchase all supplies and purchase or
lease equipment and other personal property needed for the operation or
maintenance of the regional university.

(8)
May establish, lease, operate, equip and maintain self-supporting facilities in
the manner provided in RCW 28B.10.300 through 28B.10.330, as now or hereafter
amended.

(9)
Except as otherwise provided by law, to enter into such contracts as the
trustees deem essential to regional university purposes.

(10)
May receive such gifts, grants, conveyances, devises and bequests of real or
personal property from whatsoever source, as may be made from time to time, in
trust or otherwise, whenever the terms and conditions thereof will aid in
carrying out the regional university programs; sell, lease or exchange, invest
or expend the same or the proceeds, rents, profits and income thereof except as
limited by the terms and conditions thereof; and adopt regulations to govern
the receipt and expenditure of the proceeds, rents, profits and income thereof.

(11)
Subject to the approval of the higher education coordinating board pursuant to
RCW 28B.80.340, offer new degree programs, offer off-campus programs,
participate in consortia or centers, contract for off-campus educational
programs, and purchase or lease major off-campus facilities.

(12)
May promulgate such rules and regulations, and perform all other acts not
forbidden by law, as the board of trustees may in its discretion deem necessary
or appropriate to the administration of the regional university.

(13)
Establish operating fees tuition rates according to RCW 28B.15.067 except as
otherwise provided by state law.

(14)
Establish salary and wage compensation levels for all employees of the
university except as otherwise provided by state law or collective bargaining
agreements.

Sec.
10. RCW
28B.40.120 and 1985 c 370 s 95 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to any other powers and duties prescribed by law, the board of
trustees of The Evergreen State College:

(1)
Shall have full control of the state college and its property of various kinds,
except as otherwise provided by law.

(2)
Shall employ the president of the state college, his assistants, members of the
faculty, and other employees of the institution, who, except as otherwise
provided by law, shall hold their positions, until discharged therefrom by the
board for good and lawful reason.

(3)
With the assistance of the faculty of the state college, shall prescribe the
course of study in the various schools and departments thereof and publish such
catalogues thereof as the board deems necessary: PROVIDED, That the state
board of education shall determine the requisites for and give program approval
of all courses leading to teacher certification by such board.

(4)
Establish such divisions, schools or departments necessary to carry out the
purposes of the college and not otherwise proscribed by law.

(5)
Except as otherwise provided by law, may establish and erect such new
facilities as determined by the board to be necessary for the college.

(6)
May acquire real and other property as provided in RCW 28B.10.020, as now or
hereafter amended.

(7)
Except as otherwise provided by law, may purchase all supplies and purchase or
lease equipment and other personal property needed for the operation or
maintenance of the college.

(8)
May establish, lease, operate, equip and maintain self-supporting facilities in
the manner provided in RCW 28B.10.300 through 28B.10.330, as now or hereafter
amended.

(9)
Except as otherwise provided by law, to enter into such contracts as the
trustees deem essential to college purposes.

(10)
May receive such gifts, grants, conveyances, devises and bequests of real or
personal property from whatsoever source, as may be made from time to time, in
trust or otherwise, whenever the terms and conditions thereof will aid in
carrying out the college programs; sell, lease or exchange, invest or expend
the same or the proceeds, rents, profits and income thereof except as limited
by the terms and conditions thereof; and adopt regulations to govern the
receipt and expenditure of the proceeds, rents, profits and income thereof.

(11)
Subject to the approval of the higher education coordinating board pursuant to
RCW 28B.80.340, offer new degree programs, offer off-campus programs,
participate in consortia or centers, contract for off-campus educational
programs, and purchase or lease major off-campus facilities.

(12)
May promulgate such rules and regulations, and perform all other acts not
forbidden by law, as the board of trustees may in its discretion deem necessary
or appropriate to the administration of the college.

(13)
Establish operating fees tuition rates according to RCW 28B.15.067 except as
otherwise provided by state law.

(14)
Establish salary and wage compensation levels for all employees of the college
except as otherwise provided by state law or collective bargaining agreements.

Sec.
11. RCW
28B.50.090 and 1991 c 238 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

The
college board shall have general supervision and control over the state system
of community and technical colleges. In addition to the other powers and duties
imposed upon the college board by this chapter, the college board shall be
charged with the following powers, duties and responsibilities:

(1)
Review the budgets prepared by the boards of trustees, prepare a single budget
for the support of the state system of community and technical colleges and
adult education, and submit this budget to the governor as provided in RCW
43.88.090;

(2)
Establish guidelines for the disbursement of funds; and receive and disburse
such funds for adult education and maintenance and operation and capital
support of the college districts in conformance with the state and district
budgets, and in conformance with chapter 43.88 RCW;

(3)
Ensure, through the full use of its authority:

(a)
That each college district shall offer thoroughly comprehensive educational,
training and service programs to meet the needs of both the communities and
students served by combining high standards of excellence in academic transfer
courses; realistic and practical courses in occupational education, both graded
and ungraded; and community services of an educational, cultural, and
recreational nature; and adult education, including basic skills and general,
family, and work force literacy programs and services. However, technical
colleges, and college districts containing only technical colleges, shall
maintain programs solely for occupational education, basic skills, and literacy
purposes. For as long as a need exists, technical colleges may continue those
programs, activities, and services they offered during the twelve-month period
preceding May 17, 1991;

(b)
That each college district shall maintain an open-door policy, to the end that
no student will be denied admission because of the location of the student's
residence or because of the student's educational background or ability; that,
insofar as is practical in the judgment of the college board, curriculum
offerings will be provided to meet the educational and training needs of the
community generally and the students thereof; and that all students, regardless
of their differing courses of study, will be considered, known and recognized
equally as members of the student body: PROVIDED, That the administrative
officers of a community or technical college may deny admission to a prospective
student or attendance to an enrolled student if, in their judgment, the student
would not be competent to profit from the curriculum offerings of the college,
or would, by his or her presence or conduct, create a disruptive atmosphere
within the college not consistent with the purposes of the institution. This
subsection (b) shall not apply to competency, conduct, or presence associated
with a disability in a person twenty-one years of age or younger attending a
technical college;

(4)
Prepare a comprehensive master plan for the development of community and
technical college education and training in the state; and assist the office of
financial management in the preparation of enrollment projections to support
plans for providing adequate college facilities in all areas of the state;

(5)
Define and administer criteria and guidelines for the establishment of new
community and technical colleges or campuses within the existing districts;

(6)
Establish criteria and procedures for modifying district boundary lines
consistent with the purposes set forth in RCW 28B.50.020 as now or hereafter
amended and in accordance therewith make such changes as it deems advisable;

(7)
Establish minimum standards to govern the operation of the community and
technical colleges with respect to:

(a)
Qualifications and credentials of instructional and key administrative
personnel, except as otherwise provided in the state plan for vocational
education,

(b)
Internal budgeting, accounting, auditing, and financial procedures as necessary
to supplement the general requirements prescribed pursuant to chapter 43.88
RCW,

(c)
The content of the curriculums and other educational and training programs, and
the requirement for degrees and certificates awarded by the colleges,

(d)
Standard admission policies,

(e)
Eligibility of courses to receive state fund support;

(8)
Establish and administer criteria and procedures for all capital construction
including the establishment, installation, and expansion of facilities within
the various college districts;

(9)
Encourage innovation in the development of new educational and training
programs and instructional methods; coordinate research efforts to this end;
and disseminate the findings thereof;

(10)
Exercise any other powers, duties and responsibilities necessary to carry out
the purposes of this chapter;

(11)
Authorize the various community and technical colleges to offer programs and
courses in other districts when it determines that such action is consistent
with the purposes set forth in RCW 28B.50.020 as now or hereafter amended;

(12)
Notwithstanding any other law or statute regarding the sale of state property,
sell or exchange and convey any or all interest in any community and technical
college real and personal property, except such property as is received by a
college district in accordance with RCW 28B.50.140(8), when it determines that
such property is surplus or that such a sale or exchange is in the best
interests of the community and technical college system;

(13)
In order that the treasurer for the state board for community and technical
colleges appointed in accordance with RCW 28B.50.085 may make vendor payments,
the state treasurer will honor warrants drawn by the state board providing for
an initial advance on July 1, 1982, of the current biennium and on July 1 of
each succeeding biennium from the state general fund in an amount equal to
twenty-four percent of the average monthly allotment for such budgeted biennium
expenditures for the state board for community and technical colleges as
certified by the office of financial management; and at the conclusion of such
initial month and for each succeeding month of any biennium, the state
treasurer will reimburse expenditures incurred and reported monthly by the
state board treasurer in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW: PROVIDED, That the
reimbursement to the state board for actual expenditures incurred in the final
month of each biennium shall be less the initial advance made in such biennium;

(14)
Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (12) of this section, may receive
such gifts, grants, conveyances, devises, and bequests of real or personal
property from private sources as may be made from time to time, in trust or
otherwise, whenever the terms and conditions thereof will aid in carrying out
the community and technical college programs and may sell, lease or exchange,
invest or expend the same or the proceeds, rents, profits and income thereof
according to the terms and conditions thereof; and adopt regulations to govern
the receipt and expenditure of the proceeds, rents, profits and income thereof;

(15)
The college board shall have the power of eminent domain;

(16)
Provide general supervision over the state's technical colleges. The president
of each technical college shall report directly to the director of the state
board for community and technical colleges, or the director's designee, until
local control is assumed by a new or existing board of trustees as appropriate,
except that a college president shall have authority over program decisions of
his or her college until the establishment of a board of trustees for that
college. The directors of the vocational-technical institutes on March 1,
1991, shall be designated as the presidents of the new technical colleges;

(17)
Establish operating fees tuition rates for community college students according
to RCW 28B.15.067 except as otherwise provided by state law;

(18)
Establish salary and wage compensation levels for all employees of the
community and technical college system except as otherwise provided by state
law or collective bargaining agreements.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12. RCW
28B.15.110 and 1977 ex.s. c 126 s 1 are each repealed.

---
END ---