BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that state agencies use long-term temporary and leased
employees in lieu of state employees to fulfill statutory obligations and meet
demands for public services. These temporary and leased employees may earn
lower wages and often lack employment-based benefits. The legislature intends
that staffing levels in agencies be sufficient to fulfill statutory obligations
and to insure safe, timely, high quality, and effective provision of public
services. The legislature further intends that state agency use of long-term
temporary and leased employees be limited.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 39.29 RCW to read as follows:

Neither
personal services nor purchased services as defined in this chapter may be
procured through one or more temporary services agencies, employee leasing
agencies, or any other entities that are responsible, under contract or in
fact, for the payment of wages to individuals in remuneration for personal
services or purchased services performed for, or for the benefit of, an agency
for a period longer than three months in any one fiscal year.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 43.19 RCW to read as follows:

Services
may not be procured through one or more temporary services agencies, employee
leasing agencies, or any other entities that are responsible, under contract or
in fact, for the payment of wages to individuals in remuneration for services
performed for, or for the benefit of, an agency for a period longer than three
months in any one fiscal year.

Sec.
4. RCW
43.19.190 and 1995 c 269 s 1401 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director of general administration, through the state purchasing and material
control director, shall:

(1)
Establish and staff such administrative organizational units within the
division of purchasing as may be necessary for effective administration of the
provisions of RCW 43.19.190 through 43.19.1939;

(2)
Purchase all material, supplies, services, and equipment needed for the
support, maintenance, and use of all state institutions, colleges, community
colleges, technical colleges, college districts, and universities, the offices
of the elective state officers, the supreme court, the court of appeals, the
administrative and other departments of state government, and the offices of
all appointive officers of the state: PROVIDED, That the provisions of RCW
43.19.190 through 43.19.1937 do not apply in any manner to the operation of the
state legislature except as requested by the legislature: PROVIDED, That any
agency may purchase material, supplies, services, and equipment for which the
agency has notified the purchasing and material control director that it is
more cost-effective for the agency to make the purchase directly from the
vendor: PROVIDED, That primary authority for the purchase of specialized
equipment, instructional, and research material for their own use shall rest
with the colleges, community colleges, and universities: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That universities operating hospitals and the state purchasing and material
control director, as the agent for state hospitals as defined in RCW 72.23.010,
and for health care programs provided in state correctional institutions as
defined in RCW 72.65.010(3) and veterans' institutions as defined in RCW
72.36.010 and 72.36.070, may make purchases for hospital operation by
participating in contracts for materials, supplies, and equipment entered into
by nonprofit cooperative hospital group purchasing organizations: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That primary authority for the purchase of materials, supplies, and
equipment for resale to other than public agencies shall rest with the state
agency concerned: PROVIDED FURTHER, That authority to purchase services as
included herein does not apply to personal services as defined in chapter 39.29
RCW, unless such organization specifically requests assistance from the division
of purchasing in obtaining personal services and resources are available within
the division to provide such assistance: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the authority
for the purchase of insurance and bonds shall rest with the risk manager under
RCW 43.19.1935: PROVIDED FURTHER, That, except for the authority of the risk
manager to purchase insurance and bonds, the director is not required to
provide purchasing services for institutions of higher education that choose to
exercise independent purchasing authority under RCW 28B.10.029;

(3)
Have authority to delegate to state agencies authorization to purchase or sell,
which authorization shall specify restrictions as to dollar amount or to
specific types of material, equipment, services, and supplies. Acceptance of
the purchasing authorization by a state agency does not relieve such agency
from conformance with other sections of RCW 43.19.190 through 43.19.1939 and
section 2 of this act, or from policies established by the director. Also,
delegation of such authorization to a state agency, including an educational
institution to which this section applies, to purchase or sell material,
equipment, services, and supplies shall not be granted, or otherwise continued
under a previous authorization, if such agency is not in substantial compliance
with overall state purchasing and material control policies as established
herein;

(4)
Contract for the testing of material, supplies, and equipment with public and
private agencies as necessary and advisable to protect the interests of the
state;

(5)
Prescribe the manner of inspecting all deliveries of supplies, materials, and
equipment purchased through the division;

(6)
Prescribe the manner in which supplies, materials, and equipment purchased
through the division shall be delivered, stored, and distributed;

(7)
Provide for the maintenance of a catalogue library, manufacturers' and
wholesalers' lists, and current market information;

(8)
Provide for a commodity classification system and may, in addition, provide for
the adoption of standard specifications;

(9)
Provide for the maintenance of inventory records of supplies, materials, and
other property;

(10)
Prepare rules and regulations governing the relationship and procedures between
the division of purchasing and state agencies and vendors;

(11)
Publish procedures and guidelines for compliance by all state agencies,
including those educational institutions to which this section applies, which
implement overall state purchasing and material control policies;

(12)
Advise state agencies, including educational institutions, regarding compliance
with established purchasing and material control policies under existing
statutes.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5.
Nothing in this act shall be construed to alter the terms, conditions, or
practices contained in any collective bargaining agreement in effect at the
time of the effective date of this act until the expiration date of such
agreement.

---
END ---