BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that a consolidation of fish and wildlife officers into the
Washington state patrol would be beneficial to fish and wildlife resources, to
the public, and to individual enforcement officers. Many opportunities to
increase efficiency and to improve enforcement of fish and wildlife laws will
result from consolidation. The public will benefit from improved resource
protection and from a more effective and responsive ability to reduce the
increasing public safety hazards associated with conflicts between humans and
wildlife. The officers will benefit from improved morale, increased
compensation, greater advancement opportunity, improved equipment, and
increased training.

The
goal of this act is a consolidated fish and wildlife enforcement bureau that
will function as a well-equipped and highly professional unit, will produce
increased public support through greater protection and reduced response time,
and will be an important part of the Washington state patrol.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
Washington state patrol has the authority and duty to enforce Titles 75 and 77
RCW, and the rules adopted under those titles, relating to the time, place, and
manner of taking food fish, shellfish, game fish, game animals, fur-bearing
animals, protected wildlife, predatory animals, predatory birds, and game
birds. All fish and wildlife enforcement program personnel directly engaged in
the enforcement of Titles 75 and 77 RCW shall be transferred to and become
employees of the Washington state patrol. The chief of the Washington state
patrol shall provide any additional training needs to fully commission
transferred fish and wildlife enforcement officers, detectives, and sergeants
as Washington state patrol troopers, detectives, or sergeants. Enforcement
authority of transferred fish and wildlife enforcement personnel shall continue
until those personnel become commissioned officers of the Washington state
patrol.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
chief of the Washington state patrol may purchase, construct, lease, and
operate equipment, vehicles, aircraft, boats, and supplies as necessary to
carry out the duties of the Washington state patrol under section 2 of this
act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to Title 75 RCW to read as follows:

All
personnel engaged in the enforcement of this title and the rules adopted under
this title shall be employed, supervised, and controlled by the chief of the
Washington state patrol, who shall be the chief official charged with
enforcement of this title.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to Title 77 RCW to read as follows:

All
personnel engaged in the enforcement of this title and the rules adopted under
this title shall be employed, supervised, and controlled by the chief of the
Washington state patrol, who shall be the chief official charged with
enforcement of this title.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
Employees of the department of fish and wildlife enforcement program
transferred to the Washington state patrol shall have the option to retain
membership in the retirement and disability system in which they were members
prior to the transfer, or to become members of the Washington state patrol
retirement and disability system upon being commissioned.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. All
powers, duties, and functions of the department of fish and wildlife pertaining
to enforcement of Titles 75 and 77 RCW are transferred to the Washington state
patrol. All references to the director or the department of fish and wildlife
in the Revised Code of Washington mean the chief of the Washington state patrol
or the Washington state patrol when referring to the law enforcement functions
transferred in this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. There
is established a fish and wildlife bureau within the Washington state patrol.
The chief of the Washington state patrol shall select a bureau chief to oversee
the operation of the fish and wildlife bureau. The bureau chief shall report
to and serve at the pleasure of the chief of the Washington state patrol and
shall maintain a close working liaison with the fish and wildlife commission to
carry out the commission's goals, policies, and objectives. All officers,
sergeants, and detectives transferred to the Washington state patrol under this
act shall assume a rank and class which is equivalent to their counterparts in
the Washington state patrol. Second-line supervisors shall be assigned a rank
and classification which is the functional equivalent of their existing rank
and which best fits within the operational model of the Washington state
patrol. The chief of the Washington state patrol, in consultation with the
department of personnel, shall make the final determination regarding
second-line supervisors.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. All
reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, and written
material in the possession of the department of fish and wildlife pertaining to
the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be delivered to the custody
of the Washington state patrol. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment,
motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the department of fish
and wildlife in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall be made available to the Washington state patrol. All funds, credits, or
other assets held in connection with the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be assigned to the Washington state patrol.

All
full-time equivalent staff positions presently authorized and any
appropriations made to the department of fish and wildlife for carrying out the
powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on the effective date of this
section, be transferred and credited to the Washington state patrol.

If
any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books,
documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used
or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and
functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a
determination as to the proper allocation and certify that determination to the
state agencies concerned.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. All
employees of the department of fish and wildlife enforcement program engaged in
performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred are transferred to the
jurisdiction of the Washington state patrol. All employees classified under
chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the Washington
state patrol to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly,
without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate
thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil
service. However, if up to twelve law enforcement personnel wish to remain in
the department of fish and wildlife, the existing full-time equivalents and
appropriations supporting them may be retained by the department of fish and
wildlife, as though exempt from the operation of this chapter, for the purpose
of managing problem wildlife and animal damage control. Incumbents in those
retained positions shall not be authorized to carry law enforcement
commissions. Transferred fish and wildlife enforcement personnel shall
continue to respond to fish and wildlife issues involving human health and
safety.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. All
rules and all pending business before the department of fish and wildlife
pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be continued
and acted upon by the Washington state patrol. All existing contracts and
obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the Washington
state patrol.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. The
transfer of powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the department of fish
and wildlife shall not affect the validity of any act performed before the
effective date of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. If
apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed
by sections 9 though 11 of this act, the director of financial management shall
certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the
state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and
adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in
accordance with the certification.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14.
Nothing contained in sections 7 through 13 of this act may be construed to
alter any existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing
collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or until the
bargaining unit has been modified by action of the personnel board as provided
by law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. There
is established a fish and wildlife bureau transition committee, which shall be
chaired by the chief of the Washington state patrol and shall include one
member from each of the following entities: The department of fish and
wildlife; the department of personnel; the Washington state troopers'
association; the Washington federation of state employees‑-fish and
wildlife officers; the fish and wildlife sergeants' association; the fish and
wildlife captains' association; and the office of financial management. For
the efficient implementation of this act, the committee shall make
recommendations to the chief, who shall report to the legislature one year
following the effective date of this section, at which time the committee shall
be abolished.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16.
Sections 1 through 3 and 6 through 15 of this act are each added to chapter
43.43 RCW.

---
END ---