BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.71A.020 and 1998 c 132 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The commission shall adopt rules fixing the qualifications and the educational
and training requirements for licensure as a physician assistant or for those
enrolled in any physician assistant training program. The requirements shall
include completion of an accredited physician assistant training program
approved by the commission and ((eligibility to take)) within one
year successfully take and pass an examination approved by the commission,
if the examination tests subjects substantially equivalent to the curriculum of
an accredited physician assistant training program. An interim permit may
be granted by the department of health for one year provided the applicant
meets all other requirements. Physician assistants licensed by the board
of medical examiners, or the medical quality assurance commission as of
((June 7, 1990)) July 1, 1999, shall continue to be licensed.

(2)(a)
The commission shall adopt rules governing the extent to which:

(i)
Physician assistant students may practice medicine during training; and

(ii)
Physician assistants may practice after successful completion of a physician
assistant training course.

(b)
Such rules shall provide:

(i)
That the practice of a physician assistant shall be limited to the performance
of those services for which he or she is trained; and

(ii)
That each physician assistant shall practice medicine only under the
supervision and control of a physician licensed in this state, but such
supervision and control shall not be construed to necessarily require the
personal presence of the supervising physician or physicians at the place where
services are rendered.

(3)
Applicants for licensure shall file an application with the commission on a
form prepared by the secretary with the approval of the commission, detailing
the education, training, and experience of the physician assistant and such
other information as the commission may require. The application shall be
accompanied by a fee determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250
and 43.70.280. A surcharge of twenty-five dollars per year shall be charged on
each license renewal or issuance of a new license to be collected by the
department and deposited into the impaired physician account for physician
assistant participation in the impaired physician program. Each applicant
shall furnish proof satisfactory to the commission of the following:

(a)
That the applicant has completed an accredited physician assistant program approved
by the commission and is eligible to take the examination approved by the
commission;

(b)
That the applicant is of good moral character; and

(c)
That the applicant is physically and mentally capable of practicing medicine as
a physician assistant with reasonable skill and safety. The commission may
require an applicant to submit to such examination or examinations as it deems
necessary to determine an applicant's physical or mental capability, or both,
to safely practice as a physician assistant.

(4)
The commission may approve, deny, or take other disciplinary action upon the
application for license as provided in the Uniform Disciplinary Act, chapter
18.130 RCW. The license shall be renewed as determined under RCW 43.70.250 and
43.70.280. The commission may authorize the use of alternative supervisors who
are licensed either under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW.

Sec.
2. RCW
18.57A.020 and 1998 c 132 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The board shall adopt rules fixing the qualifications and the educational and
training requirements for licensure as an osteopathic physician assistant or
for those enrolled in any physician assistant training program. The
requirements shall include completion of an accredited physician assistant
training program approved by the board and ((eligibility to take)) within
one year successfully take and pass an examination approved by the board,
providing such examination tests subjects substantially equivalent to the
curriculum of an accredited physician assistant training program. An
interim permit may be granted by the department of health for one year provided
the applicant meets all other requirements. Physician assistants licensed by
the board of osteopathic medicine as of July 1, 1999, shall continue to be
licensed.

(2)(a)
The board shall adopt rules governing the extent to which:

(i)
Physician assistant students may practice medicine during training; and

(ii)
Physician assistants may practice after successful completion of a training
course.

(b)
Such rules shall provide:

(i)
That the practice of an osteopathic physician assistant shall be limited to the
performance of those services for which he or she is trained; and

(ii)
That each osteopathic physician assistant shall practice osteopathic medicine
only under the supervision and control of an osteopathic physician licensed in
this state, but such supervision and control shall not be construed to
necessarily require the personal presence of the supervising physicians at the
place where services are rendered. The board may authorize the use of
alternative supervisors who are licensed either under chapter 18.57 or 18.71
RCW.

(3)
Applicants for licensure shall file an application with the board on a form
prepared by the secretary with the approval of the board, detailing the
education, training, and experience of the physician assistant and such other
information as the board may require. The application shall be accompanied by
a fee determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.
A surcharge of twenty-five dollars per year may be charged on each license
renewal or issuance of a new license to be collected by the department of
health for physician assistant participation in an impaired practitioner
program. Each applicant shall furnish proof satisfactory to the board of the
following:

(a)
That the applicant has completed an accredited physician assistant program
approved by the board and is eligible to take the examination approved by the
board;

(b)
That the applicant is of good moral character; and

(c)
That the applicant is physically and mentally capable of practicing osteopathic
medicine as an osteopathic physician assistant with reasonable skill and
safety. The board may require any applicant to submit to such examination or
examinations as it deems necessary to determine an applicant's physical and/or
mental capability to safely practice as an osteopathic physician assistant.

(4) The board may approve, deny, or take other disciplinary action
upon the application for a license as provided in the uniform disciplinary act,
chapter 18.130 RCW. The license shall be renewed as determined under RCW 43.70.250
and 43.70.280.

---
END ---