BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.99.080 and 1995 c 166 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Moneys
transferred to the recreation resource account from the marine fuel tax refund
account may be used when appropriated by the legislature, as well as any
federal or other funds now or hereafter available, to pay the necessary
administrative and coordinative costs of the interagency committee for outdoor
recreation established by RCW 43.99.110. All moneys so transferred, except
those appropriated as aforesaid, shall be divided into two equal shares and
shall be used to benefit watercraft recreation in this state as follows:

(1)
One share as grants to state agencies for (a) acquisition of title to, or any
interests or rights in, marine recreation land, (b) capital improvement of
marine recreation land, including periodic dredging, if needed, to maintain
or make the facility more useful, or (c) matching funds in any case where
federal or other funds are made available on a matching basis for purposes
described in (a) or (b) of this subsection;

(2) One share as grants to public bodies to help finance (a) acquisition
of title to, or any interests or rights in, marine recreation land, or (b)
capital improvement of marine recreation land, including periodic dredging,
if needed, to maintain or make the facility more useful. A public body is
authorized to use a grant, together with its own contribution, as matching
funds in any case where federal or other funds are made available for purposes
described in (a) or (b) of this subsection. The committee may prescribe
further terms and conditions for the making of grants in order to carry out the
purposes of this chapter.

---
END ---