BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
69.51A.040 and 1999 c 2 s 5 (Initiative Measure No. 692) are each amended to
read as follows:

(1)
If charged with a violation of state law relating to marijuana, any qualifying
patient who is engaged in the medical use of marijuana, or any designated
primary caregiver who assists a qualifying patient in the medical use of
marijuana, will be deemed to have established an affirmative defense to such
charges by proof of his or her compliance with the requirements provided in
this chapter. Any person meeting the requirements appropriate to his or her
status under this chapter shall be considered to have engaged in activities
permitted by this chapter and shall not be penalized in any manner, or denied
any right or privilege, for such actions.

(2)
The qualifying patient, if eighteen years of age or older, shall:

(a)
Meet all criteria for status as a qualifying patient;

(b)
Possess no more marijuana than is necessary for the patient's personal, medical
use, not exceeding the amount necessary for a sixty-day supply, as
determined in rule by the department of health; and

(c)
Present his or her valid documentation to any law enforcement official who
questions the patient regarding his or her medical use of marijuana.

(3)
The qualifying patient, if under eighteen years of age, shall comply with
subsection (2)(a) and (c) of this section. However, any possession under
subsection (2)(b) of this section, as well as any production, acquisition, and
decision as to dosage and frequency of use, shall be the responsibility of the
parent or legal guardian of the qualifying patient.

(4)
The designated primary caregiver shall:

(a)
Meet all criteria for status as a primary caregiver to a qualifying patient;

(b)
Possess, in combination with and as an agent for the qualifying patient, no
more marijuana than is necessary for the patient's personal, medical use, not
exceeding the amount necessary for a sixty-day supply;

(c)
Present a copy of the qualifying patient's valid documentation required by this
chapter, as well as evidence of designation to act as primary caregiver by the
patient, to any law enforcement official requesting such information;

(d)
Be prohibited from consuming marijuana obtained for the personal, medical use
of the patient for whom the individual is acting as primary caregiver; and

(e) Be the primary caregiver to only one patient at any one time.

---
END ---