BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
definitions in this section apply throughout sections 2 and 3 of this act
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Alcohol" means ethyl alcohol, hydrated oxide of ethyl, or spirits of
wine, from whatever source or by whatever process produced.

(2)
"Alcohol test" means a chemical, biological, or physical instrumental
analysis administered for the purpose of determining the presence or absence of
alcohol within an individual's body systems.

(3)
"Chain of custody" means the methodology of tracking specimens for
the purpose of maintaining control and accountability from initial collection
to final disposition for all specimens and providing for accountability at each
stage in handling, testing, and storing specimens and reporting test results.

(4)
"Confirmation test" or "confirmed test" means a second
analytical procedure used to identify the presence of a specific drug or
metabolic in a specimen. Drug tests must be confirmed as specified in section
3(4) of this act. Alcohol tests must be confirmed by a second breath test or
as specified for drug tests.

(5)
"Department" means the department of social and health services.

(6)
"Drug" means amphetamines, cannabinoids, cocaine, phencyclidine
(PCP), methadone, methaqualone, opiates, barbiturates, benzodiazepines,
propoxyphene, or a metabolite of any such substances.

(7)
"Drug test" means a chemical, biological, or physical instrumental
analysis administered on a specimen sample for the purpose of determining the
presence or absence of a drug or its metabolites within the sample.

(8)
"Employee" means a person who is employed for salary, wages, or other
remuneration by an employer.

(9)
"Employer" means an employer subject to Title 51 RCW but does not
include the state or any department, agency, or instrumentality of the state;
any county; any city; any school district or educational service district; or
any municipal corporation.

(10)
"Initial test" means a sensitive, rapid, and reliable procedure to
identify negative and presumptive positive specimens. An initial drug test
must use an immunoassay procedure or an equivalent procedure or must use a more
accurate scientifically accepted method approved by the national institute on
drug abuse as more accurate technology becomes available in a cost-effective
form.

(11)
"Job applicant" means a person who has applied for employment with an
employer and has been offered employment conditioned upon successfully passing
a drug test and may have begun work pending the results of the drug test.

(12)
"Medical review officer" means a licensed physician trained in the
field of drug testing who provides medical assessment of positive test results,
requests reanalysis if necessary, and makes a determination whether or not drug
misuse has occurred.

(13)
"Nonprescription medication" means a drug or medication authorized
under federal or state law for general distribution and use without a
prescription in the treatment of human disease, ailments, or injuries.

(14)
"Prescription medication" means a drug or medication lawfully
prescribed by a physician, or other health care provider licensed to prescribe
medication, for an individual and taken in accordance with the prescription.

(15)
"Specimen" means breath or urine. "Specimen" may include
other products of the human body capable of revealing the presence of drugs or
their metabolites or of alcohol, if approved by the United States department of
health and human services and permitted by rules adopted under RCW 49.82.130.

(16)
"Substance" means drugs or alcohol.

(17)
"Substance abuse test" or "test" means a chemical,
biological, or physical instrumental analysis administered on a specimen sample
for the purpose of determining the presence or absence of a drug or its
metabolites or of alcohol within the sample.

(18)
"Threshold detection level" means the level at which the presence of
a drug or alcohol can be reasonably expected to be detected by an initial and
confirmation test performed by a laboratory meeting the standards specified in
this chapter. The threshold detection level indicates the level at which a
valid conclusion can be drawn that the drug or alcohol is present in the
employee's specimen.

(19)
"Verified positive test result" means a confirmed positive test
result obtained by a laboratory meeting the standards specified in this chapter
that has been reviewed and verified by a medical review officer in accordance
with medical review officer guidelines promulgated by the United States
department of health and human services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. If an
otherwise eligible individual submits to a preemployment drug test and the
outcome is a verified positive test result, that individual is no longer
eligible for benefits for five calendar weeks and until he or she has obtained
bona fide work and earned wages equal to five times his or her weekly benefit
amount.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
This section does not prohibit an employer from conducting other drug or
alcohol testing, such as upon reasonable suspicion or a random basis.

(2)
Specimen collection and substance abuse testing under this section must be
performed in accordance with regulations and procedures approved by the United
States department of health and human services and the United States department
of transportation regulations for alcohol and drug testing and must include
testing for marijuana, cocaine, amphetamines, opiates, and phencyclidine.
Employers may test for any drug listed in section 1(7) of this act.

(a)
A specimen must be collected with due regard to the privacy of the individual
providing the specimen and in a manner reasonably calculated to prevent substitution
or contamination of the specimen.

(b)
Specimen collection and analysis must be documented. The documentation
procedures must include:

(i)
Labeling of specimen containers so as to reasonably preclude the likelihood of
erroneous identification of test results; and

(ii)
An opportunity for the job applicant to provide to a medical review officer
information the applicant considers relevant to the drug test, including
identification of currently or recently used prescription or nonprescription
medication or other relevant medical information.

(c)
Specimen collection, storage, and transportation to the testing site must be
performed in a manner that reasonably precludes specimen contamination or
adulteration.

(d)
An initial and confirmation test conducted under this section, not including
the taking or collecting of a specimen to be tested, must be conducted by a
laboratory as described in subsection (3) of this section.

(e)
A specimen for a test may be taken or collected by any of the following persons:

(i)
A physician, a physician's assistant, a registered professional nurse, a
licensed practical nurse, a nurse practitioner, or a certified paramedic who is
present at the scene of an accident for the purpose of rendering emergency
medical service or treatment;

(ii)
A qualified person certified or employed by a laboratory certified by the
substance abuse and mental health administration or the college of American
pathologists; or

(iii)
A qualified person certified or employed by a collection company using
collection procedures adopted by the United States department of health and
human services and the United States department of transportation for alcohol
collection.

(f)
Within five working days after receipt of a verified positive test result from the
laboratory, an employer shall inform a job applicant in writing of the positive
test result, the consequences of the result, and the options available to the
job applicant.

(g)
The employer shall provide to the job applicant, upon request, a copy of the
test results.

(h)
An initial test having a positive result must be verified by a confirmation
test.

(i)
An employer who performs drug testing or specimen collection shall use chain of
custody procedures to ensure proper recordkeeping, handling, labeling, and
identification of all specimens to be tested.

(j)
An employer shall pay the cost of all drug or alcohol tests, initial and
confirmation, that the employer requires of employees.

(k)
A job applicant shall pay the cost of additional tests not required by the
employer.

(3)(a)
A laboratory may not analyze initial or confirmation drug specimens unless:

(i)
The laboratory is approved by the substance abuse and mental health
administration or the college of American pathologists;

(ii)
The laboratory has written procedures to ensure the chain of custody; and

(iii)
The laboratory follows proper quality control procedures including, but not
limited to:

(A)
The use of internal quality controls including the use of samples of known
concentrations that are used to check the performance and calibration of
testing equipment, and periodic use of blind samples for overall accuracy;

(B)
An internal review and certification process for test results, conducted by a
person qualified to perform that function in the testing laboratory;

(C)
Security measures implemented by the testing laboratory to preclude
adulteration of specimens and test results; and

(D)
Other necessary and proper actions taken to ensure reliable and accurate drug
test results.

(b)
A laboratory shall disclose to the employer a written test result report within
seven working days after receipt of the sample. A laboratory report of a
substance abuse test result must, at a minimum, state:

(i)
The name and address of the laboratory that performed the test and the positive
identification of the person tested;

(ii)
Positive results on confirmation tests only, or negative results, as
applicable;

(iii)
A list of the drugs for which the drug analyses were conducted; and

(iv)
The type of tests conducted for both initial and confirmation tests and the
threshold detection levels of the tests.

A
report may not disclose the presence or absence of a drug other than a specific
drug and its metabolites listed under this chapter.

(c)
A laboratory shall provide technical assistance through the use of a medical
review officer to the employer or job applicant for the purpose of interpreting
a positive confirmed drug test result that could have been caused by
prescription or nonprescription medication taken by the job applicant. The
medical review officer shall interpret and evaluate the laboratory's positive
drug test result and eliminate test results that could have been caused by
prescription medication or other medically documented sources in accordance
with the United States department of health and human services medical review
officer manual.

(4)
A positive initial drug test must be confirmed using the gas
chromatography/mass spectrometry method or an equivalent or more accurate
scientifically accepted method approved by the substance abuse and mental
health administration as the technology becomes available in a cost-effective
form.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4.
Sections 1 through 3 of this act are each added to chapter 50.20 RCW.

---
END ---