BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW to read as follows:

It
is the legislature's intent to ensure that Washington is positioned for
long-term economic vitality. To achieve this objective, economic development
efforts should be aimed at: (1) Keeping our growing companies in the state;
(2) helping troubled companies stay competitive; (3) marketing Washington state
as a viable business location; and (4) finding a strategy that meets two key
legislative goals - rural economic development and growth management.

To
implement these goals, the legislature finds it necessary to provide funds for
a state-wide business retention and expansion partnership and for state-wide
marketing and recruiting activities. Furthermore, an advisory board has been
created to ensure that funds are leveraged and targeted appropriately.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.31 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall:

(a)
Determine industries that best fit in Washington's rural communities in order
to enable the department to allocate incentive funding to encourage these
industries to operate within Washington;

(b)
Establish criteria to determine which rural counties and businesses should
receive financial assistance; and

(c)
Commence advertising and publicity efforts, organize tours for site location
consultants, print or publish collateral materials and fulfillment pieces, and
conduct telemarketing to support advertising and trade missions.

(2)
An advisory group shall be created to ensure that the funds dispersed under
sections 3 and 4 of this act are leveraged and targeted appropriately. The
advisory group will consist of at least five members, residing in small rural
communities, picked by the department. The members shall be individuals with
special expertise in rural economic development. The members shall be chosen
in a manner and form prescribed by the department.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The sum of one hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the
general fund to the department of community, trade, and economic development
for the purposes of section 2 of this act.

(2)
The sum of one hundred fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the
general fund to the department of community, trade, and economic development
for the purposes of section 2 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
The sum of four hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the
general fund to the department of community, trade, and economic development to
be used for state-wide marketing and recruiting activities described in section
1 of this act.

(2) The sum of four hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as
may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001,
from the general fund to the department of community, trade, and economic
development to be used for state-wide marketing and recruiting activities
described in section 1 of this act.

---
END ---