BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.105D.040 and 1997 c 406 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the following persons are
liable with respect to a facility:

(a)
The owner or operator of the facility;

(b)
Any person who owned or operated the facility at the time of disposal or
release of the hazardous substances;

(c)
Any person who owned or possessed a hazardous substance and who by contract,
agreement, or otherwise arranged for disposal or treatment of the hazardous
substance at the facility, or arranged with a transporter for transport for
disposal or treatment of the hazardous substances at the facility, or otherwise
generated hazardous wastes disposed of or treated at the facility;

(d)
Any person (i) who accepts or accepted any hazardous substance for transport to
a disposal, treatment, or other facility selected by such person from which
there is a release or a threatened release for which remedial action is
required, unless such facility, at the time of disposal or treatment, could
legally receive such substance; or (ii) who accepts a hazardous substance for transport
to such a facility and has reasonable grounds to believe that such facility is
not operated in accordance with chapter 70.105 RCW; and

(e)
Any person who both sells a hazardous substance and is responsible for written
instructions for its use if (i) the substance is used according to the
instructions and (ii) the use constitutes a release for which remedial action
is required at the facility.

(2)
Each person who is liable under this section is strictly liable, jointly and
severally, for all remedial action costs and for all natural resource damages
resulting from the releases or threatened releases of hazardous substances.
The attorney general, at the request of the department, is empowered to recover
all costs and damages from persons liable therefor.

(3)
The following persons are not liable under this section:

(a)
Any person who can establish that the release or threatened release of a
hazardous substance for which the person would be otherwise responsible was
caused solely by:

(i)
An act of God;

(ii)
An act of war; or

(iii)
An act or omission of a third party (including but not limited to a trespasser)
other than (A) an employee or agent of the person asserting the defense, or (B)
any person whose act or omission occurs in connection with a contractual
relationship existing, directly or indirectly, with the person asserting this
defense to liability. This defense only applies where the person asserting the
defense has exercised the utmost care with respect to the hazardous substance,
the foreseeable acts or omissions of the third party, and the foreseeable
consequences of those acts or omissions;

(b)
Any person who is an owner, past owner, or purchaser of a facility and who can
establish by a preponderance of the evidence that at the time the facility was
acquired by the person, the person had no knowledge or reason to know that any
hazardous substance, the release or threatened release of which has resulted in
or contributed to the need for the remedial action, was released or disposed of
on, in, or at the facility. This subsection (b) is limited as follows:

(i)
To establish that a person had no reason to know, the person must have
undertaken, at the time of acquisition, all appropriate inquiry into the
previous ownership and uses of the property, consistent with good commercial or
customary practice in an effort to minimize liability. Any court interpreting
this subsection (b) shall take into account any specialized knowledge or
experience on the part of the person, the relationship of the purchase price to
the value of the property if uncontaminated, commonly known or reasonably
ascertainable information about the property, the obviousness of the presence
or likely presence of contamination at the property, and the ability to detect
such contamination by appropriate inspection;

(ii)
The defense contained in this subsection (b) is not available to any person who
had actual knowledge of the release or threatened release of a hazardous
substance when the person owned the real property and who subsequently
transferred ownership of the property without first disclosing such knowledge
to the transferee;

(iii)
The defense contained in this subsection (b) is not available to any person
who, by any act or omission, caused or contributed to the release or threatened
release of a hazardous substance at the facility;

(c)
Any natural person who uses a hazardous substance lawfully and without
negligence for any personal or domestic purpose in or near a dwelling or
accessory structure when that person is: (i) A resident of the dwelling; (ii)
a person who, without compensation, assists the resident in the use of the
substance; or (iii) a person who is employed by the resident, but who is not an
independent contractor;

(d)
Any person who, for the purpose of growing food crops, prepares, stores,
mixes, transports, cleans residue of, applies, or otherwise uses
pesticides or fertilizers on the farm property without negligence and in
accordance with all applicable laws and regulations.

(4)
There may be no settlement by the state with any person potentially liable
under this chapter except in accordance with this section.

(a)
The attorney general may agree to a settlement with any potentially liable
person only if the department finds, after public notice and any required
hearing, that the proposed settlement would lead to a more expeditious cleanup
of hazardous substances in compliance with cleanup standards under RCW
70.105D.030(2)(e) and with any remedial orders issued by the department.
Whenever practicable and in the public interest, the attorney general may
expedite such a settlement with persons whose contribution is insignificant in
amount and toxicity. A hearing shall be required only if at least ten persons
request one or if the department determines a hearing is necessary.

(b)
A settlement agreement under this section shall be entered as a consent decree
issued by a court of competent jurisdiction.

(c)
A settlement agreement may contain a covenant not to sue only of a scope
commensurate with the settlement agreement in favor of any person with whom the
attorney general has settled under this section. Any covenant not to sue shall
contain a reopener clause which requires the court to amend the covenant not to
sue if factors not known at the time of entry of the settlement agreement are
discovered and present a previously unknown threat to human health or the
environment.

(d)
A party who has resolved its liability to the state under this section shall
not be liable for claims for contribution regarding matters addressed in the
settlement. The settlement does not discharge any of the other liable parties
but it reduces the total potential liability of the others to the state by the
amount of the settlement.

(e)
If the state has entered into a consent decree with an owner or operator under
this section, the state shall not enforce this chapter against any owner or
operator who is a successor in interest to the settling party unless under the
terms of the consent decree the state could enforce against the settling party,
if:

(i)
The successor owner or operator is liable with respect to the facility solely
due to that person's ownership interest or operator status acquired as a
successor in interest to the owner or operator with whom the state has entered
into a consent decree; and

(ii)
The stay of enforcement under this subsection does not apply if the consent
decree was based on circumstances unique to the settling party that do not
exist with regard to the successor in interest, such as financial hardship.
For consent decrees entered into before July 27, 1997, at the request of a
settling party or a potential successor owner or operator, the attorney general
shall issue a written opinion on whether a consent decree contains such unique
circumstances. For all other consent decrees, such unique circumstances shall
be specified in the consent decree.

(f)
Any person who is not subject to enforcement by the state under (e) of this
subsection is not liable for claims for contribution regarding matters addressed
in the settlement.

(5)(a)
In addition to the settlement authority provided under subsection (4) of this
section, the attorney general may agree to a settlement with a person not
currently liable for remedial action at a facility who proposes to purchase,
redevelop, or reuse the facility, provided that:

(i)
The settlement will yield substantial new resources to facilitate cleanup;

(ii)
The settlement will expedite remedial action consistent with the rules adopted
under this chapter; and

(iii)
Based on available information, the department determines that the
redevelopment or reuse of the facility is not likely to contribute to the
existing release or threatened release, interfere with remedial actions that
may be needed at the site, or increase health risks to persons at or in the
vicinity of the site.

(b)
The legislature recognizes that the state does not have adequate resources to
participate in all property transactions involving contaminated property. The
primary purpose of this subsection (5) is to promote the cleanup and reuse of
vacant or abandoned commercial or industrial contaminated property. The
attorney general and the department may give priority to settlements that will
provide a substantial public benefit, including, but not limited to the reuse
of a vacant or abandoned manufacturing or industrial facility, or the
development of a facility by a governmental entity to address an important
public purpose.

(6) Nothing in this chapter affects or modifies in any way any
person's right to seek or obtain relief under other statutes or under common
law, including but not limited to damages for injury or loss resulting from a
release or threatened release of a hazardous substance. No settlement by the
department or remedial action ordered by a court or the department affects any
person's right to obtain a remedy under common law or other statutes.

---
END ---