BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
66.24.540 and 1997 c 321 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

There
shall be a retailer's license to be designated as a motel license. The motel
license may be issued to a motel ((that)) regardless of whether it
holds ((no)) any other class of license under this title. No
license may be issued to a motel offering rooms to its guests on an hourly
basis. The license authorizes the licensee to:

(1)
Sell, at retail, in locked honor bars, spirits in individual bottles not to
exceed fifty milliliters, beer in individual cans or bottles not to exceed
twelve ounces, and wine in individual bottles not to exceed one hundred
eighty-seven milliliters, to registered guests of the motel for consumption in
guest rooms.

(a)
Each honor bar must also contain snack foods. No more than one-half of the
guest rooms may have honor bars. ((The board shall charge a reasonable fee
for this license.))

(b)
All spirits to be sold under the license must be purchased from the board.

(c)
The licensee shall require proof of age from the guest renting a guest room and
requesting the use of an honor bar. The guest shall also execute an affidavit
verifying that no one under twenty-one years of age shall have access to the
spirits, beer, and wine in the honor bar.

(2)
Provide without additional charge, to overnight guests of the motel, beer and
wine by the individual serving for on-premises consumption at a specified
regular date, time, and place as may be fixed by the board. Self-service by
attendees is prohibited. All beer and wine service must be done by an alcohol server
as defined in RCW 66.20.300 and comply with RCW 66.20.310.

The
annual fee for a motel license is five hundred dollars.

"Motel"
as used in this section means a ((facility or place offering three or more
self-contained units designated by number, letter, or some other method of
identification to travelers and transient guests)) transient
accommodation licensed under chapter 70.62 RCW.

As used in this section, "spirits," "beer," and
"wine" have the meanings defined in RCW 66.04.010.

---
END ---