BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature finds that military and naval veterans who have served their
country in the Korean conflict and World War II have risked their own lives to
defend both the lives of all Americans and the freedoms that define and
distinguish our nation. It is the intent of the legislature to honor World War
II veterans and Korean conflict veterans for the public service they have
provided to their country. It is the further intent of the legislature that,
for eligible Korean conflict veterans and World War II veterans, colleges and
universities may waive all or a portion of tuition and services and activities
fees.

(2)
Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state
universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the
community colleges may waive all or a portion of the tuition and services and
activities fees for Korean conflict veterans and World War II veterans who have
served in the active duty military forces of the United States, subject to the
following conditions:

(a)
The veteran must qualify as a resident student under RCW 28B.15.012; and

(b)
Such veterans shall register for and be enrolled in courses on a space
available basis and new course sections shall not be created as a result of the
registration.

(3)
For the purposes of this section, "veterans of the Korean conflict"
means those persons who have been on active federal service as a member of the
armed military or naval forces of the United States between a period commencing
June 25, 1950, and ending July 27, 1953.

(4)
For the purposes of this section, "veterans of World War II" means
those persons who have been on active federal service as a member of the armed
military or naval forces of the United States between a period commencing
December 7, 1941, and ending August 15, 1945.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW to read as follows:

Technical colleges are encouraged to provide veterans of the Korean
conflict as defined in section 1 of this act and World War II veterans as
defined in section 1 of this act with tuition waivers.

---
END ---