BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A person whose application has been approved by the department under this
section may take a credit against tax imposed by this chapter, subject to the
limitations in this section. For the purposes of this section,
"employer" means the same as "person" as defined in this
chapter. The credit under this program is only available to persons with five
hundred or fewer employees.

(2)(a)
The credit under this section is equal to fifty percent of the amount of
qualifying costs for work force training payments. A person may not receive
credit for amounts over five thousand dollars annual training costs per
employee. A person is not eligible to receive total credits over two hundred
fifty thousand dollars per calendar year. A person may only receive credit for
amounts expended on job classes covered by the federal fair labor standards
act.

(b)
As a precondition to approval by the department under subsection (4) of this
section, the person must have entered into a training contract with a public or
private accredited training institution. The work force training and education
coordinating board shall provide a list of accredited institutions to
interested persons and to the department. The training contracts must be for
the training of at least five employees. If am employer does not have five
employees to train, the person may coordinate with other employers who have
identical training needs to create groups to meet the five person threshold.

(3)
"Work force training payments" means the direct payments made under a
contract with a public or private accredited training institution for formal
technical or skill training, including basic skills. The term includes amounts
in the contract for costs of instruction, materials, equipment, rental of class
space, marketing, and overhead. "Work force training payments" do not
include employee tuition reimbursements unless the tuition reimbursement is
specifically included in a contract under subsection (2)(b) of this section.

(4)
Application for credits under this section shall be made to the department in a
form and manner as required by the department. The application shall include
an affidavit affirming the person's compliance with this section. The
department shall approve or deny application for credits using the criteria
under this section. The department shall require the person receiving approval
to keep such records as are necessary for the department to verify eligibility
under this section. A person shall apply for the credit after making an
expenditure. Tax credit applications shall not be approved for expenditures
that occurred before the effective date of this act.

(5)
Tax credits are available on a first-come basis, with priority based on the
date and time the application is received by the department. The total of
credits granted under this section and section 2 of this act shall be no more
than five million dollars of credits each fiscal year, with two million five
hundred thousand dollars of the five million dollars to be set aside and
allocated exclusively for training for jobs in a distressed county.
"Distressed county" means a county in which the average level of
unemployment for the three years before the year in which an application is
filed under this section exceeds the average state unemployment for those years
by twenty percent. The department shall keep a running total of all credits
approved. If the amount submitted for a credit will cause the cap to be
exceeded, the department shall give a partial approval of the application,
equal to the amount of remaining credit available for the fiscal year.

(6)
No person is eligible for tax credits under this section in excess of the
amount of tax that would otherwise be due under this chapter. Approved credit
may not be carried over to subsequent calendar years. The credit must be
claimed by the due date of the last tax return for the calendar year in which
the payment is made. Any unused credit expires. Refunds shall not be given in
place of credits.

(7)
If a person has used a credit granted under this section against tax due under
chapter 82.16 RCW the person may not use the same credit for tax due under this
chapter.

(8)
A person who takes credits under RCW 82.04.4333 may not take a credit under
this section for the same training.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.16 RCW to read as follows:

The
tax credit program under section 1 of this act is available to persons for tax
due under this chapter. If a person has used a credit granted under this
section against tax due under chapter 82.04 RCW, the person may not use the
same credit for tax due under this chapter. A person who takes credits under
RCW 82.04.4333 may not take a credit under this section for the same training.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---