BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 18.85 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A fee of ten dollars is created and shall be assessed on each real estate
broker, associate broker, and salesperson originally licensed after October 1,
1999, and upon each renewal of a license with an expiration date after October
1, 1999, including renewals of inactive licenses.

(2)
This section expires September 30, 2005.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 18.85 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The Washington real estate research account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. All receipts from the fee under section 1 of this act shall
be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be made only
upon the authorization of the director of the department of licensing, or a duly
authorized representative of the director, and may be used only to support a
real estate research center in Washington state. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required
for expenditures.

(2)
This section expires September 30, 2005.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 18.85 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The purpose of a real estate research center in Washington state is to provide
credible research, value-added information, education services, and
project-oriented research to real estate licensees, real estate consumers, real
estate service providers, institutional customers, public agencies, and
communities in Washington state and the Pacific Northwest region. The center
may:

(a)
Conduct studies and research on affordable housing and strategies to meet the
affordable housing needs of the state;

(b)
Conduct studies in all areas directly or indirectly related to real estate and
urban or rural economics and economically isolated communities;

(c)
Disseminate findings and results of real estate research conducted at or by the
center or elsewhere, using a variety of dissemination media;

(d)
Supply research results and educational expertise to the Washington state real
estate commission to support its regulatory functions, as requested;

(e)
Prepare information of interest to real estate consumers and make the
information available to the general public, universities, or colleges, and
appropriate state agencies;

(f)
Encourage economic growth and development within the state of Washington;

(g)
Support the professional development and continuing education of real estate
licensees in Washington;

(h)
Study and recommend changes in state statutes relating to real estate; and

(i)
Publish, within three months of the conclusion of each fiscal year, a report
that includes both a content review and a summary financial reporting of the
public funds expended by the center.

(2)
The director shall establish a memorandum of understanding with an institution
of higher learning that establishes a real estate research center for the
purposes under subsection (1) of this section.

(3)
This section expires September 30, 2005.

Sec.
4. RCW
43.79A.040 and 1998 c 268 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested, and reinvested
by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and
to the same extent as if the money were in the state treasury.

(2)
All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust fund shall be set
aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment
income account.

(3)
The investment income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased
banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not
limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state
treasurer or affected state agencies. The investment income account is subject
in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution
of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4)(a)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
investment income account to the state general fund except under (b) and (c) of
this subsection.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the
Washington international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the energy
account, the fair fund, the game farm alternative account, the grain inspection
revolving fund, the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium and exhibition
center account, the youth athletic facility grant account, the self-insurance
revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, ((and)) the
children's trust fund, and the Washington real estate research account.
However, the earnings to be distributed shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(c)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way revolving fund, the
advanced environmental mitigation revolving account, the federal narcotics
asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle account, the local rail
service assistance account, and the miscellaneous transportation programs
account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no trust
accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative
directive of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
Section 4 of this act expires September 30, 2005.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This
act takes effect October 1, 1999.

---
END ---