BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 47.28 RCW to read as follows:

For purposes of funding noise wall retrofit projects, in each
fiscal year the department of transportation shall expend, as a minimum, a sum
equal to five-tenths of one percent of all funds, both state and federal,
expended for the construction of state highways in that fiscal year, for that
specific purpose. In order to more efficiently program noise wall retrofit
projects, the department may defer any part of a fiscal year's appropriation
for a period not to exceed four years after the end of the fiscal year in which
the original appropriation was made. For a fiscal year in which the department
expends for noise wall retrofit purposes more than the minimum sum required by
this section, the amount of the excess expenditure constitutes a credit that
may be carried forward and applied to the minimum environmental retrofit
expenditure requirements for any of the next four fiscal years. The department
may apply a portion of this funding towards the review and maintenance of a
prioritized list of eligible noise wall retrofit projects. The department
shall complete its first review and update of the prioritized project list by
June 30, 2000. After the first review, the prioritized project list must be
reevaluated and, if needed, updated at least every four years, at which time
the department shall also review and confirm the criteria by which noise wall
retrofit projects are prioritized.

---
END ---