BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR CLASSIFIED EMPLOYEE
COST-OF-LIVING ADJUSTMENTS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 14,603,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 33,499,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 48,102,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$48,102,000 is provided for a cost-of-living adjustment of 3.0 percent effective
September 1, 1999, and another 3.0 percent effective September 1, 2000, for
state formula classified staff units. The appropriations include associated
incremental fringe benefit allocations at the rate of 12.20 percent.

(2) The appropriations in this section include the increased
portion of salaries and incremental fringe benefits for all relevant
state-funded school programs.

---
END ---