BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
39.30.060 and 1995 c 94 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Every invitation to bid on a contract that is expected to cost ((in
excess of)) one ((hundred thousand)) million dollars or
more for the construction, alteration, or repair of any public building or
public work of the state or a state agency or municipality as defined under RCW
39.04.010((,)) or an institution of higher education as defined
under RCW 28B.10.016((, or a school district)) shall require each bidder
to submit as part of the bid, or within one hour after the published bid
submittal time, the names of the subcontractors ((whose subcontract amount
is more than ten percent of the bid price)) with whom the bidder, if
awarded the contract, will subcontract for performance of the work ((designated
on the list to be submitted with the bid)) of heating, ventilation and
air conditioning, plumbing as described in chapter 18.106 RCW, and electrical
as described in chapter 19.28 RCW, or to name itself for the work. The
bidder shall not list more than one subcontractor for each category of work
identified, unless subcontractors vary with bid alternates, in which case the
bidder must indicate which subcontractor will be used for which alternate.
Failure of the bidder to submit as part of the bid the names
of such subcontractors or to name itself to perform such work or the
naming of two or more subcontractors to perform the same work shall render
the bidder's bid nonresponsive and, therefore, void. The requirement of
this section to name the bidder's proposed heating, ventilation and air
conditioning, plumbing, and electrical subcontractors applies only to proposed
heating, ventilation and air conditioning, plumbing, and electrical
subcontractors who will contract directly with the general contractor
submitting the bid to the public entity.

---
END ---