BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
41.26.160 and 1991 sp.s. c 11 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In the event of the death of any member who is in active service, or who has vested
under the provisions of RCW 41.26.090 with twenty or more service credit years
of service, or who is on disability leave or retired, whether for disability or
service, the surviving spouse shall become entitled to receive a monthly
allowance equal to fifty percent of the final average salary at the date of
death if active, or the amount of retirement allowance the vested member would
have received at age fifty, or the amount of the retirement allowance such
retired member was receiving at the time of death if retired for service or
disability. The amount of this allowance will be increased five percent of
final average salary for each child as defined in RCW 41.26.030(7), as now or
hereafter amended, subject to a maximum combined allowance of sixty percent of
final average salary: PROVIDED, That if the child or children is or are in the
care of a legal guardian, payment of the increase attributable to each child
will be made to the child's legal guardian or, in the absence of a legal
guardian and if the member has created a trust for the benefit of the child or
children, payment of the increase attributable to each child will be made to
the trust.

(2)
If at the time of the death of a vested member with twenty or more service
credit years of service as provided in subsection (1) of this section or a
member retired for service or disability, the surviving spouse has not been
lawfully married to such member for one year prior to ((retirement or
separation from service if a vested member)) the member's death, the
surviving spouse shall not be eligible to receive the benefits under this
section: PROVIDED, That if a member dies as a result of a disability incurred
in the line of duty, then if he or she was married at the time he or she was
disabled, the surviving spouse shall be eligible to receive the benefits under
this section.

(3)
If there be no surviving spouse eligible to receive benefits at the time of
such member's death, then the child or children of such member shall receive a
monthly allowance equal to thirty percent of final average salary for one child
and an additional ten percent for each additional child subject to a maximum
combined payment, under this subsection, of sixty percent of final average
salary. When there cease to be any eligible children as defined in RCW
41.26.030(7), as now or hereafter amended, there shall be paid to the legal
heirs of said member the excess, if any, of accumulated contributions of said
member at the time of death over all payments made to survivors on his or her
behalf under this chapter: PROVIDED, That payments under this subsection to
children shall be prorated equally among the children, if more than one. If
the member has created a trust for the benefit of the child or children, the
payment shall be made to the trust.

(4)
In the event that there is no surviving spouse eligible to receive benefits
under this section, and that there be no child or children eligible to receive
benefits under this section, then the accumulated contributions shall be paid
to the estate of said member.

(5)
If a surviving spouse receiving benefits under the provisions of this section
thereafter dies and there are children as defined in RCW 41.26.030(7), as now
or hereafter amended, payment to the spouse shall cease and the child or
children shall receive the benefits as provided in subsection (3) of this
section.

(6)
The payment provided by this section shall become due the day following the
date of death and payments shall be retroactive to that date.

Sec.
2. RCW
41.26.162 and 1991 sp.s. c 12 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
An ex spouse of a law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement
system retiree shall qualify as surviving spouse under RCW 41.26.160 if the ex
spouse((:

(a))) has
been provided benefits under any currently effective court decree of
dissolution or legal separation or in any court order or court-approved
property settlement agreement incident to any court decree of dissolution or
legal separation ((entered after the member's retirement and prior to
December 31, 1979; and

(b)
Was married to the retiree for at least thirty years, including at least twenty
years prior to the member's retirement or separation from service if a vested
member)).

(2)
If two or more persons are eligible for a surviving spouse benefit under this
subsection, benefits shall be divided between the surviving spouses based on
the percentage of total service credit the member accrued during each marriage.

(3) This section shall apply retroactively.

---
END ---