BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.95.060 and 1969 ex.s. c 134 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department ((in accordance with procedures prescribed by the
Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW, as now or hereafter amended,
may)) shall adopt ((such)) rules establishing minimum
functional standards for solid waste handling ((as it deems appropriate)),
consistent with the standards specified in this section. The department ((in
adopting such standards)) may classify areas of the state with respect to
population density, climate, geology, and other relevant factors bearing on
solid waste disposal standards.

(2)
In addition to the minimum functional standards adopted by the department under
subsection (1) of this section, each landfill facility whose area at its design
capacity will exceed one hundred acres and whose horizontal height at design
capacity will average one hundred feet or more above existing site elevations
shall comply with the standards of this subsection. This subsection applies
only to wholly new solid waste landfill facilities, no part or unit of which
has had construction commence before the effective date of this section.

(a)
No landfill specified in this subsection may be located:

(i)
So that the active area is closer than five miles to any national park or a
public or private nonprofit zoological park displaying native animals in their
native habitats; or

(ii)
Over a sole source aquifer designated under the federal safe drinking water
act, if such designation was effective before January 1, 1999.

(b)
Each landfill specified in this subsection (2) shall be constructed with an
impermeable berm around the entire perimeter of the active area of the landfill
of such height, thickness, and design as will be sufficient to contain all
material disposed in the event of a complete failure of the structural
integrity of the landfill.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---