BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.95.215 and 1985 c 436 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
((By July 1, 1987,)) Each holder or applicant of a permit for a
landfill disposal facility issued under this chapter shall establish a reserve
account to cover the costs of closing the facility in accordance with state and
federal regulations. The account shall be designed to ensure that there will
be adequate revenue available by the projected date of closure. Landfill
disposal facilities maintained on private property for the sole use of the
entity owning the site shall not be required to establish a reserve account if,
to the satisfaction of the department, they provide another form of financial
assurance adequate to comply with the requirements of this section.

(2)
((By July 1, 1986,)) The department shall adopt rules ((under
chapter 34.05 RCW)) to implement subsection (1) of this section. The rules
shall include but not be limited to:

(a)
Methods to estimate closure costs, including postclosure monitoring, pollution
prevention measures, and any other procedures required under state and federal
regulations;

(b)
Methods to ensure that reserve accounts receive adequate funds, including:

(i)
Requirements that the reserve account be generated by user fees. However, the
department may waive this requirement for existing landfills if user fees would
be prohibitively high;

(ii)
Requirements that moneys be placed in the reserve account on a regular basis
and that the reserve account be kept separate from all other accounts; and

(iii)
Procedures for the department to verify that adequate sums are deposited in the
reserve account; and

(c)
Methods to ensure that other types of financial assurance provided in
accordance with subsection (1) of this section are adequate to cover the costs
of closing the facility.

(3)
In addition to the reserve account required under subsections (1) and (2) of
this section, each holder or applicant for a new, above-ground landfill
disposal facility shall demonstrate sufficient financial capability in the form
of a surety bond to provide for any temporary or permanent facility clean up
and closure due to any unforeseen emergency event including, but not limited
to, a geologic or weather-related event or fire, that results in a breach of
integrity of the landfill. This financial assurance requirement shall be
incorporated as a condition of the permit issued for the facility by the
jurisdictional health department. The condition shall be jointly reviewed and
approved by the department of ecology and the jurisdictional health department.

For
purposes of this subsection, new, above-ground landfill disposal facilities are
those: (a) That as designed and when completed will exceed one hundred acres;
(b) whose horizontal height at design capacity averages one hundred feet or
more above existing site elevations; and (c) no part or unit of which has had
construction commence before the effective date of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---