BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART
I

CARRIER-TO-CARRIER SERVICE
QUALITY

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
FINDINGS AND INTENT. (1) The legislature finds that:

(a)
Congress has required, through the telecommunications act of 1996, P.L. 104-104
(110 Stat. 56), incumbent carriers to make available to new entrants in a
nondiscriminatory and just and reasonable manner the services and facilities
incumbent carriers use to provide retail services to their own customers; and

(b)
In order to take advantage of the service and facility offerings that congress
requires incumbent carriers to provide: (i) New entrants must receive a level
of interconnection that is at least equal in quality to that provided by an
incumbent carrier to itself; and (ii) new entrants must have access to the
operations support systems that incumbent carriers use to process orders from
their own customers.

(2)
The legislature further finds that:

(a)
Unlike robust wholesale markets where market forces furnish wholesalers with
the necessary incentive to provide timely and quality services to their buyers,
as the single supplier of wholesale facilities and services in the local
market, incumbent telecommunications carriers have no such incentive particularly
when purchasers of their wholesale offerings are also their retail competitors;
and

(b)
Carrier-to-carrier service quality standards are a fair and objective mechanism
through which competing carriers can monitor incumbent carriers' compliance, and
incumbent carriers can demonstrate their compliance, with statutory obligations
thereby: (i) Creating an important incentive for compliance; (ii) reducing the
need for regulatory oversight by encouraging self-policing; and (iii) providing
necessary information to facilitate timely and fair resolution of complaints
when regulatory intervention is required.

(3)
The legislature therefore intends to:

(a)
Promote more efficient competition between incumbent carriers and new entrants
by requiring carrier-to-carrier service quality standards related to access to
interconnection and operations support systems;

(b)
Direct the commission to establish carrier-to-carrier service quality standards
in such a way as to accomplish the following goals: (i) Promote more efficient
and effective communication between incumbent carriers and competing carriers;
(ii) make more transparent the extent to which incumbent carriers are meeting
their statutory obligations to provide to competing carriers, in a
nondiscriminatory and just and reasonable manner, the services and facilities
incumbent carriers use to provide retail services to their own customers; and
(iii) fairly balance the need for information about an incumbent carrier's
performance against the burdens imposed on an incumbent carrier in generating
and distributing this information.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this section apply throughout this act unless
the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Efficient and effective communication" means communication that
allows a competing carrier to: (a) Access the customer data necessary to sign
up customers; (b) place orders for services or facilities with the incumbent;
(c) track the progress of those orders to completion; (d) receive relevant
billing information from the incumbent; and (e) obtain prompt repair and
maintenance for the elements and services it obtains from the incumbent.

(2)
"Incumbent carrier" means an incumbent local exchange carrier, as
that term is defined in the telecommunications act of 1996, P.L. 104-104 (110
Stat. 56).

(3)
"Operations support systems" means the computer systems, data bases,
and personnel that incumbent carriers rely upon to discharge the internal
functions, including: (a) Preordering; (b) ordering; (c) provisioning; (d)
maintenance and repair; and (e) billing, necessary to provide service to their
customers.

(4)
"Performance measurements" means the measures used to collect data
regarding an incumbent carrier's performance, such as the period of time it
takes to order and provision a resold service.

(5)
"Performance standards" means specific performance goals or
benchmarks, such as a requirement that an incumbent carrier complete all or
some percentage of its resale orders for residential service within a specified
period of time.

(6)
"Reporting requirements" means the obligations of incumbent carriers
to collect performance measurements and provide the results of those
measurements to other parties.

(7)
"Technical standards" means the establishment of industry-wide
operations support systems interface specifications.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
INCUMBENT CARRIER DUTIES. (1) An incumbent carrier has a duty to provide
interconnection between its network and that of a requesting carrier that is at
least equal in quality to that which the incumbent provides itself, a
subsidiary, an affiliate, or any other party.

(2)(a)
For those operations support systems provided to competing carriers that are
analogous to functions that an incumbent carrier provides itself in connection
with retail service offerings, an incumbent carrier has a duty to provide
access to competing carriers that is equivalent to the level of access that the
incumbent provides itself in terms of quality, accuracy, and timeliness; and
(b) for those operations support system functions that have no direct retail
analog, an incumbent carrier has a duty to provide access sufficient to allow
an efficient competitor a meaningful opportunity to compete.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
WASHINGTON UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION RULES REGARDING
INTERCONNECTION AND OPERATIONS SUPPORT SYSTEMS. (1) Not later than December 1,
1999, the commission shall adopt by rule performance measurements that gauge
the timeliness and quality of an incumbent carrier's interconnection with
competing carriers.

(2)
Not later than December 1, 1999, the commission shall adopt by rule performance
measurements that gauge an incumbent carrier's ability to provision operations
support systems to competing carriers in terms of timeliness, quality, and
accuracy.

(3)
The rules adopted under this section shall not include technical standards.

(4)
For each of the performance measurements adopted under this section, the
commission rules may specify which incumbent carriers must make performance
measurement reports and under what circumstances, who may receive performance
measurement reports and under what circumstances, the frequency with which
reports must be generated and distributed, and appropriate auditing procedures.

(5)
The rules shall not require performance measurement reports by any rural
telephone company that is exempt from section 251(c) of the telecommunications
act of 1996, P.L. 104-104 (110 Stat. 56), unless and until the commission has
terminated the exemption pursuant to section 251(f) of the telecommunications
act of 1996, P.L. 104-104 (110 Stat. 56).

(6)
The rules shall address the circumstances under which competing carriers, the
commission, and the general public may receive copies of the reports.

(7)
In adopting its carrier-to-carrier service quality rules, the commission shall
consider all practical methodologies that would increase the consistency and
predictability of determining whether an incumbent carrier is meeting its
statutory obligations to provide interconnection and operations support
systems. Wherever possible, the rules shall also identify performance standards
for evaluating when an incumbent carrier's performance warrants further
regulatory scrutiny.

(8)
The commission shall consider, and periodically review, the performance
measurements and performance standards adopted and proposed by the federal
communications commission and other state commissions in an effort to promote
regional consistency and reduce unnecessarily duplicative or inconsistent
requirements.

PART
II

INTERCONNECTION
ENFORCEMENT AND EXPEDITED DISPUTE RESOLUTION

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
The commission is authorized and directed to handle on an expedited basis, as
provided in this section and by rule of the commission, any complaint by a
telecommunications company that another telecommunications company has
violated:

(a)
Any duty or obligation imposed upon telecommunications carriers under 47 U.S.C.
Sec. 251 (a) through (c);

(b)
Any agreement approved by the commission under 47 U.S.C. Sec. 252(e); or

(c)
Any act or practice which the commission may identify by rule as serving as a
barrier to competitive entry into the telecommunications market.

The
powers authorized in this section are in addition to, and not exclusive of, any
other powers granted to the commission. The remedies authorized in this
section are in addition to, and not exclusive of, any other remedies available
at law to the parties.

(2)
Upon the filing of a complaint seeking expedited relief under this section, the
complainant may petition the commission for emergency relief. The commission
may grant a petition for emergency relief at any time with or without an
evidentiary hearing. The commission may grant a petition for emergency relief
if it finds that:

(a)
The complainant is likely to succeed on the merits;

(b)
The complainant is likely to suffer irreparable harm if emergency relief is not
granted;

(c)
The emergency relief sought is technically feasible; and

(d)
An order granting emergency relief is in the public interest.

(3)
An order granting emergency relief shall direct the respondent
telecommunications company to act or refrain from acting as the commission
finds necessary to avoid, prevent, or mitigate the complained-of harm.
Violation of an order granting emergency relief shall subject the respondent telecommunications
company to penalties under section 6 of this act. An order granting emergency
relief shall set a deadline for compliance with the order before such penalties
are imposed against the respondent telecommunications company. An order
granting emergency relief without a hearing shall remain in effect for no more
than ten days but may be extended once for an additional ten-day period. An
order granting emergency relief after a hearing shall remain in effect until
the commission issues a final order on the complaint filed under subsection (1)
of this section.

(4)
As a condition to the issuance of any emergency order, the commission may
require the party requesting the emergency relief to provide an appropriate
bond or security.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. (1)
Every telecommunications company shall comply with all terms of an
interconnection agreement to which it is a party, that has been approved by the
commission under 47 U.S.C. Sec. 252(e). Any telecommunications company that
fails to comply with the terms of such an agreement, or any of its duties or
obligations arising under 47 U.S.C. Sec. 251 (a) through (c) shall be subject
to a penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars for each and every
violation. Each violation of such an interconnection agreement or obligation
is a separate and distinct offense and, in the case of a continuing violation,
every day's continuance is a separate and distinct offense.

(2)
Any telecommunications company that violates an order of the commission issued
to enforce the terms of an interconnection agreement approved under 47 U.S.C.
Sec. 252(e) or to enforce duties or obligations arising under 47 U.S.C. Sec.
251 (a) through (c), including an order granting emergency relief under section
5 of this act, shall be subject to a penalty of up to twenty-five thousand
dollars for each and every violation. Each violation of such an order shall be
a separate and distinct offense and, in the case of a continuing violation,
every day's continuance shall be a separate and distinct offense.

(3)
Payment of penalties imposed under this section shall be paid into the public
service revolving fund within thirty days of issuance by the commission of an
order imposing penalties. The commission may petition a court of competent
jurisdiction for enforcement of its order requiring payment of penalties
imposed under this section.

Sec.
7. RCW
80.01.060 and 1995 c 331 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The commission may designate employees of the commission as hearing examiners,
administrative law judges, and review judges when it deems such action
necessary for its general administration. The designated employees have power
to administer oaths, to issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the
production of papers, waybills, books, accounts, documents, and testimony, to
examine witnesses, and to receive testimony in any inquiry, investigation,
hearing, or proceeding in any part of the state, under such rules as the
commission may adopt.

(2)
In general rate increase filings by a natural gas, electric, or
telecommunications company, the designated employee may preside, but may not
enter an initial order unless expressly agreed to in writing by the company
making the filing. In all other cases, the designated employee may enter an
initial order including findings of fact and conclusions of law in accordance
with RCW 34.05.461(1)(a) and (c) and (3) through (9) or 34.05.485. RCW
34.05.461 (1)(b) and (2) do not apply to entry of orders under this section.

(3)
The designated employee may not enter final orders, except that the commission
may designate persons by rule to preside and enter final orders in emergency
adjudications under RCW 34.05.479 and expedited dispute resolution
proceedings under section 4 of this act.

(((3)))
(4) If the designated employee does not enter an initial order as
provided in subsection (2) of this section, then a majority of the members of
the commission who are to enter the final order must hear or review
substantially all of the record submitted by any party.

PART
III

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
Section captions and part headings used in this act are not any part of the
law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9.
Sections 1 through 6 of this act are each added to chapter 80.36 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---