BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 75.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The interagency review team established under RCW 75.46.080 shall maintain a
comprehensive inventory of barriers to fish passage. The inventory shall be
compiled from existing and ongoing inventories being conducted by the state
department of transportation, local governments, and facility owners. The team
shall place the highest priority upon building the inventory for those
geographic areas of the state with salmon stocks listed under the federal
endangered species act, and for which fish passage barriers are identified as a
factor limiting stock recovery. The team shall seek recommendations from the
independent science panel created under RCW 75.46.050 on criteria and methods
for identifying high priority salmon stocks and high priority passage barrier
facilities to assist with compiling and maintaining the inventory under this
subsection and the listing under subsection (2) of this section.

(2)
Not later than June 30, 2001, the team shall identify from the inventory those
passage barriers that pose the greatest limitations upon the recovery of salmon
stocks listed on the federal endangered species act, considering stocks
state-wide and the relative impact of these facilities on recovery and other
limiting factors. Before adding a facility to the list, the team shall notify
the facility owner of the proposed addition. The team shall not add a facility
for which the owner demonstrates to the team that construction to modify the
facility to eliminate the passage barrier will be commenced by July 1, 2003.
The list shall include not fewer than one hundred facilities posing passage
barriers.

(3)
Upon finalizing the list required in subsection (2) of this section, the team
shall notify the owners of the listed facilities and work with them to develop
reasonable plans and compliance schedules for modifying the facility to
eliminate the passage barrier. The plans shall include a design and
construction component, a plan for maintenance of the facility to prevent it
becoming a barrier to fish passage in the future, and a monitoring component to
assess the performance of the fish passage facility. The compliance schedule
shall establish a goal of early action to eliminate the barrier, consistent
with state recovery plans and consistent with applicable habitat work schedules
for the watershed in which the facility is located.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 75.46 RCW to read as follows:

Until
June 30, 2003, any state agency considering the award of grants or loans for a
project to eliminate fish passage barriers shall accord a preference for
applications addressing facilities listed under section 1 of this act and for
which the applicant has adopted a plan and compliance schedule approved by the
interagency review team.

Sec.
3. RCW
75.20.040 and 1998 c 190 s 85 are each amended to read as follows:

A
diversion device used for conducting water from a lake, river, or stream for
any purpose shall be equipped with a fish guard approved by the director to
prevent the passage of fish into the diversion device. The fish guard shall be
maintained at all times when water is taken into the diversion device. The
fish guards shall be installed at places and times prescribed by the director
upon thirty days' notice to the owner of the diversion device.

Each
day the diversion device is not equipped with an approved fish guard is a
separate offense. If within thirty days after notice to equip a diversion
device the owner fails to do so, the director may take possession of the
diversion device and close the device until it is properly equipped. Expenses
incurred by the department constitute the value of a lien upon the diversion
device and upon the real and personal property of the owner. Notice of the
lien shall be filed and recorded in the office of the county auditor of the
county in which the action is taken.

Until
June 30, 2003, the director shall not take action under this section where the
director determines that the owner is in compliance with a plan and compliance
schedule approved by the interagency review team under section 1 of this act.

Sec.
4. RCW
75.20.060 and 1998 c 190 s 86 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A dam or other obstruction across or in a stream shall be provided with a
durable and efficient fishway approved by the director. Plans and specifications
shall be provided to the department prior to the director's approval. The
fishway shall be maintained in an effective condition and continuously supplied
with sufficient water to freely pass fish.

(2)
If a person fails to construct and maintain a fishway or to remove the dam or
obstruction in a manner satisfactory to the director, then within thirty days
after written notice to comply has been served upon the owner, his agent, or
the person in charge, the director may construct a fishway or remove the dam or
obstruction. Expenses incurred by the department constitute the value of a
lien upon the dam and upon the personal property of the person owning the dam.
Notice of the lien shall be filed and recorded in the office of the county
auditor of the county in which the dam or obstruction is situated. The lien
may be foreclosed in an action brought in the name of the state.

(3)
If, within thirty days after notice to construct a fishway or remove a dam or
obstruction, the owner, his agent, or the person in charge fails to do so, the
dam or obstruction is a public nuisance and the director may take possession of
the dam or obstruction and destroy it. No liability shall attach for the
destruction.

(4)
Until June 30, 2003, the director shall not take action under subsections (2)
and (3) of this section where the director determines that the owner is in
compliance with a plan and compliance schedule approved by the interagency
review team under section 1 of this act.

Sec.
5. RCW
75.20.061 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 46 s 73 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If the director determines that a fishway or fish guard described in RCW
75.20.040 and 75.20.060 and in existence on September 1, 1963, is inadequate,
in addition to other authority granted in this chapter, the director may
remove, relocate, reconstruct, or modify the device, without cost to the
owner. The director shall not materially modify the amount of flow of water
through the device. After the department has completed the improvements, the
fishways and fish guards shall be operated and maintained at the expense of the
owner in accordance with RCW 75.20.040 and 75.20.060.

(2)
Until June 30, 2003, the director shall not take action under this section
where the director determines that the owner is in compliance with a plan and
compliance schedule approved by the interagency review team under section 1 of
this act.

Sec.
6. RCW
77.12.425 and 1980 c 78 s 90 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The director may authorize removal, relocation, reconstruction, or other
modification of an inadequate fishway or fish protective device required by RCW
77.16.210 and 77.16.220 which device was in existence on September 1, 1963,
without cost to the owner for materials and labor. The modification may not
materially alter the amount of water flowing through the fishway or fish
protective device. Following modification, the fishway or fish protective
device shall be maintained at the expense of the person or governmental agency
owning the obstruction or water diversion device.

(2)
Until June 30, 2003, the director shall not take action under this section
where the director determines that the owner is in compliance with a plan and
compliance schedule approved by the interagency review team under section 1 of
this act.

Sec.
7. RCW
75.46.030 and 1998 c 246 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Beginning
in December 2000, the governor shall submit a biennial state of the salmon
report to the legislature during the first week of December. The report may
include the following:

(1)
A description of the amount of in-kind and financial contributions, including
volunteer, private, and state, federal, tribal as available, and local
government money directly spent on salmon recovery in response to actual,
proposed, or expected endangered species act listings;

(2)
A summary of habitat projects including but not limited to:

(a)
A summary of accomplishments in removing barriers to salmon passage and an
identification of existing barriers;

(b)
A summary of salmon restoration efforts undertaken in the past two years;

(c)
A summary of the role which private volunteer initiatives contribute in salmon
habitat restoration efforts; and

(d)
A summary of efforts taken to protect salmon habitat;

(3)
A summary of collaborative efforts undertaken with adjoining states or Canada;

(4)
A summary of harvest and hatchery management activities affecting salmon
recovery;

(5)
A summary of information regarding impediments to successful salmon recovery
efforts;

(6)
A summary of the number and types of violations of existing laws pertaining
to: (a) Water quality; ((and)) (b) passage barriers; and (c)
salmon. The summary shall include information about the types of sanctions
imposed for these violations;

(7)
Information on the estimated carrying capacity of new habitat created pursuant
to chapter 246, Laws of 1998; ((and))

(8)
A summary of actions to eliminate passage barriers, including the inventory,
priority list, and project plans and compliance schedules under section 1 of
this act; and

(9)
Recommendations to the legislature that would further the success of salmon
recovery. The recommendations may include:

(a)
The need to expand or improve nonregulatory programs and activities; and

(b) The need to expand or improve state and local laws and
regulations.

---
END ---