BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the United States fish and wildlife service has listed
the Columbia river population segment of bull trout (Salvelinus confluentus)
as a threatened species under the endangered species act. A recovery plan for
this species is urgently needed to restore the bull trout population to good
health and to remove the burden of federal regulation. However, an adequate
recovery plan depends on information about the status of the species and a determination
of the strategies that will successfully recover bull trout. The department of
fish and wildlife has successfully developed and implemented recovery projects
on several stocks of salmon and is well suited to undertake this project.

The
legislature also finds that there is significant community interest in helping
the recovery process and that the recovery project can benefit greatly from the
involvement of the local citizens and organizations.

It
is the legislature's intent to create a bull trout recovery project in
northeastern Washington to begin the restoration process for this species, and
to create a cooperative project utilizing the scientific expertise of the
department and the interest and enthusiasm of the local community.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
There is established the northeastern Washington bull trout recovery project
for the purpose of developing a recovery plan for the bull trout stocks in
northeastern Washington. The recovery project shall:

(a)
Focus its investigations on the bull trout stocks in the northeastern
Washington salmon recovery region, including primarily Ferry, Stevens,
Okanogan, and Pend Oreille counties;

(b)
Determine the historic and current range of these stocks of bull trout and
their abundance;

(c)
Investigate and identify the factors that are responsible for the decline in
the abundance of these fish; and

(d)
Develop a plan for recovering this species that is adequate for the purposes of
the endangered species act.

(2)
The department shall administer the northeastern Washington bull trout recovery
project, and shall conduct the project in partnership with the local
conservation districts. The department should coordinate the activities of the
recovery project with the governor's salmon recovery office, the United States
fish and wildlife service, and shall seek additional funding from that agency
and other appropriate sources. The local conservation districts should
coordinate local involvement in the project, including volunteer support.

(3)
The department shall recommend to the legislature those remedies that are
needed to recover bull trout sufficiently that the species can be removed from
the federal list of threatened species.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
department is encouraged to seek out and accept funding from individual
contributions, government sources, private sources, and Indian tribes to
further the purposes of section 2 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
The sum of seventy thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the general fund to
the department of fish and wildlife for the purposes of this act.

(2)
The sum of seventy thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the general fund to
the department of fish and wildlife for the purposes of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 1999, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

---
END ---