BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 90.48 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A government entity seeking to control a limited infestation of Eurasian water
milfoil may use the pesticide 2,4-D to treat the milfoil infestation without
obtaining a permit under RCW 90.48.445 if the milfoil infestation is either
recently documented or remaining after the application of other control
measures, and is limited to twenty percent or less of the littoral zone of the
lake. In lieu of a permit, any application under this section must be made
according to all label requirements and adequate public notice shall be
provided.

(2)
Before applying 2,4-D, the government entity shall provide twenty-one days'
notice to the department of ecology, the department of fish and wildlife, the
department of agriculture, and the department of health, notify all lake
residents, post notices of the intent to treat weeds at all public access
points before making such treatment, and place informational buoys around the
treatment area. The department of fish and wildlife may impose timing
restrictions on the use of 2,4-D to protect salmon and other fish and wildlife.

(3)
The department shall enter into grant agreements with government entities by
March 1st of each year. In awarding grants under this section, the department
shall give priority funding consideration based on:

(a)
Lakes with public access;

(b)
Lakes with a first surveyed occurrence of milfoil in the lake or requiring spot
treatment of milfoil remaining after the application of other control measures;
and

(c)
The applicant's readiness to proceed immediately after the grant award.

(4)
The grant agreements may include reporting requirements, an assessment of the
treatment method, timelines, and a fund disbursement schedule based on agreed
project milestones.

(5)
Government entities using this section to apply 2,4-D, may apply for funds from
the freshwater aquatic weeds account consistent with the freshwater aquatic
weeds management program as provided in RCW 43.21A.660.

(6)
Government entities using this section shall consider development of long-term
control strategies for eradication and control of the Eurasian water milfoil.

(7)
For the purpose of this section, "government entity" includes cities,
counties, state agencies, tribes, special purpose districts, and county weed
boards.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The sum of one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may
be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from
the general fund to the department of ecology for the purposes of the Eurasian
milfoil projects. Up to three percent of the total amount may be used by the
department to cover administrative costs.

(2)
The sum of one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may
be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from
the general fund to the department of ecology for the purposes of the Eurasian
milfoil projects. Up to three percent of the total amount may be used by the
department to cover administrative costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3.
Section 2 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing
public institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---