BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The office of public defense shall develop a proposal to address the costs of
legal representation and expenses reasonably related to such representation for
indigent criminal defendants and indigent parents, guardians, legal custodians,
and children in dependency and termination hearings under chapter 13.34 RCW.
The proposal shall address the increased dependency and termination filings by
the state under chapter 13.34 RCW and the effect of this increase on indigent
defense costs. The proposal shall recommend strategies to ensure that an
equitable method of paying for indigent defense costs in criminal trial
proceedings and in dependency and termination proceedings is established.

(2) The office of public defense shall present the proposal
required under subsection (1) of this section to the appropriate standing
committees of the legislature by December 6, 1999.

---
END ---