BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 26.44 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that, state-wide, over six thousand child sexual abuse cases
were accepted for investigation in 1998. These cases require a significant
level of expertise. It is the intent of the legislature to create an
interdisciplinary team, under the direction of the Washington state institute
for public policy, to review the techniques for investigative interviews
conducted of children and adults during allegations of child sexual abuse and
to create state-wide protocols for conducting such interviews. The legislature
intends to improve the training and resources available to individuals who
conduct these interviews and to increase the accuracy of risk assessments and
determinations of fact associated with interviews. The legislature further
intends that a cadre of child sexual abuse specialists will be developed in the
state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) A
team to create protocols for use by the department of social and health
services, law enforcement, and prosecuting attorneys in conducting
investigative interviews of alleged child sexual abuse is established under the
direction of the Washington state institute for public policy, in collaboration
with the department of social and health services and the criminal justice
training commission.

(2)
The team shall include two representatives from the department of social and
health services, a mental health professional certified under chapter 18.19
RCW, a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW with substantial experience
in child sexual abuse examinations, a member of the Washington state bar whose
practice is primarily defense oriented, the attorney general, a superior court
judge, two prosecuting attorneys, two law enforcement officers who conduct
child sexual abuse investigations, a child development specialist, a
representative from an agency serving the developmentally disabled, an advanced
registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW, a foster
parent, a representative from a child-serving agency, and a victim's advocate.
Team members shall be qualified on the basis of knowledge and experience as may
contribute to the effectiveness of the team.

(3)
Each entity representing persons identified in subsection (2) of this section
shall be requested by the Washington state institute for public policy to
appoint a representative.

(4)
Members of the team, except public employees and elected officials, shall be compensated
in accordance with RCW 43.03.240. Each member shall be entitled to
reimbursement for travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties
as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(5)
The team shall conduct its business in a manner designed to permit public
participation and input in the development of the protocols.

(6)
The team shall be subject to chapter 42.30 RCW, the state's open meetings act
and chapter 42.17 RCW, the public disclosure act and all appropriate state and
federal laws regarding confidentiality of information sharing.

(7)(a)
The institute shall provide professional, clerical, and administrative support
to the team.

(b)
All state and local government agencies shall fully cooperate with the team in
the development of the protocols.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The team created in section 2 of this act shall develop state-wide protocols
for investigative interviews of allegations of child sexual abuse.

(2)
The protocols shall: (a) Be based on research-based practices and standards;
(b) minimize the trauma of all persons who are interviewed during abuse
investigations; (c) provide methods of reducing the number of investigative
interviews necessary whenever possible; (d) assure, to the extent possible,
that investigative interviews are thorough, objective, and complete; (e)
recognize needs of special populations, such as persons with developmental
disabilities; (f) recognize the nature and consequences of victimization; (g)
require investigative interviews to be conducted in a manner most likely to
permit the interviewed persons the maximum emotional comfort under the
circumstances; (h) address record retention and retrieval; and (i)
documentation of investigative interviews.

(3)
The protocols shall address the following: (a) Specialized and ongoing
training of law enforcement, prosecuting attorneys, and persons selected by the
department to conduct investigative interviews of child sexual abuse cases,
maximizing the use of existing resources within the state whenever possible;
(b) identification and referral of cases of alleged child sexual abuse,
including those involving multiple victims or multiple offenders, to specially
trained individuals; (c) provision for collaboration among the department, law
enforcement, defense attorneys, prosecutors, and victim advocates; (d)
recognition of the differing levels of child intellectual and emotional
development and the consequences of development levels on investigative
interview techniques; (e) appropriate training, qualifications, and
identification of physicians and other medical personnel who have expertise in
performing medical examinations of children who may be victims of child sexual
abuse; (f) appropriate training, qualification, and identification of
therapists who have expertise in child sexual abuse investigative interviews;
(g) law enforcement interviews of alleged child sexual abuse victims or
offenders involving child sexual abuse; (h) recommended interview team models;
and (i) periodic evaluation of child sexual abuse investigative interview
performance.

(4)
In addition to the development of protocols, the team is authorized and
encouraged to make any additional recommendations it finds appropriate to
improve the state's response to allegations of child sexual abuse including
specialized investigative interview techniques, recognition of different
geographical, economic, and cultural needs, and innovative facilities and
strategies to reduce child trauma and abuse.

(5)
The protocols developed by the team shall be presented to the legislature not
later than December 1, 1999.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 26.44 RCW to read as follows:

Protocols
for the investigation of child sexual abuse shall be implemented, according to
the implementation plan, July 1, 2000, and, within available funding, be
mandatory minimum requirements in conducting investigative interviews of
alleged child sexual abuse by the department of social and health services and
law enforcement. Specialized and ongoing training, for persons responsible for
investigating child sexual abuse including department personnel, law
enforcement, and prosecuting attorneys, shall be a priority.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 26.44 RCW to read as follows:

Every
employee of the department who conducts an interview of any person involved in
an allegation of abuse or neglect shall retain his or her original written records
or notes setting forth the content of the interview unless he or she has
entered a verbatim copy of the notes into the electronic system operated by the
department which is designed for storage, retrieval, and preservation of such
records.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
department shall conduct a pilot project in two of its administrative regions
in which investigative interviews of alleged child sexual abuse are recorded on
audiotape. The audiotapes may be used only in dependency or criminal
proceedings and all copies must be returned to the department at the conclusion
of the proceedings. The pilot project shall begin no later than September 1,
1999, and end June 31, 2002. The Washington state institute for public policy
shall evaluate the pilot project and report to the legislature by December 1,
2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 26.44 RCW to read as follows:

The
Washington state institute for public policy shall report once every two years
to the legislature and governor on the effectiveness of the protocols developed
under chapter . . ., Laws of 1999 (this act), their implementation,
changes that have been made in the protocols since the previous report, and recommendations
for the improvement of the protocols or their implementation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 2, 3, and 6 of this act shall not be codified.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9.
Sections 1 through 3 and 6 of this act expire January 31, 2002.

---
END ---