BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
47.06.050 and 1993 c 446 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
state-owned facilities component of the state-wide transportation plan shall be
consistent with RCW 47.06.040 and shall identify the most cost-effective
combination of transportation investments that maximizes the efficient movement
of people, freight, and goods within state transportation corridors, to include
public-private transportation initiatives. The identification process shall
include the modal comparison of highway, ferry, bicycle, and pedestrian
facilities, passenger rail, air transportation, public transit, transportation
demand measures, and high-capacity transportation improvements within a state
transportation corridor. The comparison of transportation modes shall include
an analysis of the public, private, and social costs and benefits of
transportation investments. The state-owned facilities component of the
state-wide transportation plan shall also consist of:

(1)
The state highway system plan, which identifies program and financing needs and
recommends specific and financially realistic improvements to preserve the
structural integrity of the state highway system, ensure acceptable operating
conditions, and provide for enhanced access to scenic, recreational, and
cultural resources. The state highway system plan shall contain the following
elements:

(a)
A system preservation element, which shall establish structural preservation
objectives for the state highway system including bridges, identify current and
future structural deficiencies based upon analysis of current conditions and
projected future deterioration, and recommend program funding levels and
specific actions necessary to preserve the structural integrity of the state
highway system consistent with adopted objectives. This element shall serve as
the basis for the preservation component of the six-year highway program and
the two-year biennial budget request to the legislature;

(b)
A capacity and operational improvement element, which shall establish
operational objectives, including safety considerations, for moving people and
goods on the state highway system, identify current and future capacity,
operational, and safety deficiencies, and recommend program funding levels and
specific improvements and strategies necessary to achieve the operational
objectives. In developing capacity and operational improvement plans the
department shall first assess strategies to enhance the operational efficiency
of the existing system before recommending system expansion. Congestion
relief must be a primary emphasis of the capacity and operational improvement
element. Strategies to enhance the operational efficiencies include but
are not limited to access management, transportation system management, demand
management, and high-occupancy vehicle facilities. The capacity and
operational improvement element must conform to the state implementation plan
for air quality and be consistent with regional transportation plans adopted
under chapter 47.80 RCW, and shall serve as the basis for the capacity and
operational improvement portions of the six-year highway program and the
two-year biennial budget request to the legislature;

(c)
A scenic and recreational highways element, which shall identify and recommend
designation of scenic and recreational highways, provide for enhanced access to
scenic, recreational, and cultural resources associated with designated routes,
and recommend a variety of management strategies to protect, preserve, and
enhance these resources. The department, affected counties, cities, and towns,
regional transportation planning organizations, and other state or federal
agencies shall jointly develop this element;

(d)
A paths and trails element, which shall identify the needs of nonmotorized
transportation modes on the state transportation systems and provide the basis
for the investment of state transportation funds in paths and trails, including
funding provided under chapter 47.30 RCW.

(2) The state ferry system plan, which shall guide capital and
operating investments in the state ferry system. The plan shall establish
service objectives for state ferry routes, forecast travel demand for the
various markets served in the system, and develop strategies for ferry system
investment that consider regional and state-wide vehicle and passenger needs,
support local land use plans, and assure that ferry services are fully
integrated with other transportation services. The plan shall assess the role
of private ferries operating under the authority of the utilities and
transportation commission and shall coordinate ferry system capital and
operational plans with these private operations. The ferry system plan must be
consistent with the regional transportation plans for areas served by the state
ferry system, and shall be developed in conjunction with the ferry advisory
committees.

---
END ---