BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the intent of the legislature to increase the reading skills of early learners
by encouraging parents to assist in the reading development of their children.
Scientific evidence indicates that children whose parents begin reading to them
at an early age learn to read sooner and achieve a greater degree of academic
success. Teachers find that children without a base in reading are a greater
challenge than those with some exposure to reading. Financial incentives
provided to parents and children are intended to assist teachers in teaching
basic reading.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

A
reading incentive program to compensate parents of first grade students who
have achieved appropriate reading accuracy and fluency skills is created. The
program shall be administered as follows:

(1)
Before the end of the academic year, first grade teachers may evaluate the
reading abilities of their students. The evaluation shall include the
student's skills in recognition of letter sounds, phonemic awareness, word
recognition, and reading connected text. Teachers have the sole discretion in
determining if a student has achieved the appropriate first grade reading
level.

(2)
Teachers shall provide a redeemable reading certificate to all first grade
students achieving the appropriate first grade reading level as determined
under subsection (1) of this section.

(3)
Parents of the children who received the certificates may endorse the reading
certificate and submit it to the superintendent of public instruction for
payment in the amount of fifty dollars, or the parent may choose to donate his
or her certificate to a reading endowment fund established by the district.

(4)
Upon receiving the certificates the superintendent of public instruction shall
redeem the certificates for the face amount. In the case of donated
certificates as provided in subsection (3) of this section the superintendent
of public instruction shall redeem the certificates in the name of the local
district's reading endowment fund.

(5)
The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to implement
subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The sum of three million five hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as
may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000,
from the general fund to the superintendent of public instruction for the
purposes of this act.

(2) The sum of three million five hundred thousand dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2001, from the general fund to the superintendent of public
instruction for the purposes of this act.

---
END ---