BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
19.27.031 and 1995 c 343 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as otherwise provided in this chapter, there shall be in effect in all counties
and cities the state building code, which shall consist of the following
codes which are hereby adopted by reference:

(1)
Uniform Building Code and Uniform Building Code Standards, published by the
International Conference of Building Officials;

(2)
Uniform Mechanical Code, including Chapter 13, Fuel Gas Piping, Appendix B,
published by the International Conference of Building Officials;

(3)
The Uniform Fire Code and Uniform Fire Code Standards, published by the International
Fire Code Institute: PROVIDED, That, notwithstanding any wording in this code,
participants in religious ceremonies shall not be precluded from carrying
hand-held candles;

(4)
((Except as provided in RCW 19.27.170, the Uniform Plumbing Code and Uniform
Plumbing Code Standards, published by the International Association of Plumbing
and Mechanical Officials: PROVIDED, That chapters 11 and 12 of such code are
not adopted; and

(5))) The
rules and regulations adopted by the council establishing standards for making
buildings and facilities accessible to and usable by the physically handicapped
or elderly persons as provided in RCW 70.92.100 through 70.92.160.

In
case of conflict among the codes enumerated in subsections (1), (2), and
(3)((, and (4))) of this section, the first named code shall govern over
those following and the plumbing code adopted in accordance with section 2
of this act.

The
codes enumerated in this section shall be adopted by the council as provided in
RCW 19.27.074.

The
council may issue opinions relating to the codes at the request of a local
official charged with the duty to enforce the enumerated codes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 18.106 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, there is in effect in all
counties and cities the Uniform Plumbing Code and Uniform Plumbing Code
Standards, published by the International Association of Plumbing and
Mechanical Officials. However, any provisions of such code affecting sewers,
and fuel gas and venting are not adopted.

(2)
The advisory board for plumbers shall:

(a)
Adopt and maintain the code and standards referenced in subsection (1) of this
section. In maintaining these codes, the advisory board shall regularly review
updated versions of the code and

standards
and other pertinent information and amend the codes as deemed appropriate by
the advisory board;

(b)
Approve or deny all county or city amendments to any code or standards referred
to in subsection (1) of this section to the degree the amendments apply to
single-family or multifamily residential buildings; and

(c)
Propose a budget for the operation of the advisory board to be submitted to the
office of financial management under RCW 43.88.090.

(3)
The advisory board may:

(a)
Appoint technical advisory committees that may include members of the advisory
board;

(b)
Employ permanent and temporary staff and contract for services; and

(c)
Conduct research into matters relating to any code or codes referred to in
subsection (1) of this section or any related matter.

(4)
All meetings of the advisory board are open to the public under the open public
meetings act, chapter 42.30 RCW. All actions of the advisory board that adopt
or amend any code of state-wide applicability must be done according to the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

(5)
All advisory board decisions relating to the codes set out in subsection (1) of
this section shall require approval by at least a majority of the members of
the advisory board.

(6) All decisions to adopt or amend codes of state-wide application
shall be made prior to December 1st of any year and do not take effect before
the end of the regular legislative session in the next year.

---
END ---