BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The emergency medical services assistance account is created in the state
treasury. Into this account shall be placed all moneys received by the state
under the settlement of the state's legal action against tobacco product
manufacturers, exclusive of costs and attorneys' fees. On the first day of the
months of January, April, July, and October of each year, the state treasurer
shall distribute the funds in the emergency medical services assistance account
to the counties ratably on the basis of population as last determined by the
office of financial management.

(2) Funds distributed from the emergency medical services
assistance account under this section shall be used only for the provision of
emergency medical care or emergency medical services, including related
personnel costs, training for such personnel, and related equipment, supplies,
vehicles, and structures needed for the provision of emergency medical care or
emergency medical services, or for distribution by the county to emergency
medical service districts, cities or towns, public hospital districts, urban
emergency medical service districts, or fire protection districts within the
county for the provision of emergency medical care or emergency medical
services.

---
END ---