BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
4.24.200 and 1969 ex.s. c 24 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The purpose of RCW 4.24.200 and 4.24.210 is to encourage owners or
others in lawful possession and control of land and water areas or channels to
make them available to the public for recreational purposes by limiting their
liability toward persons entering thereon and toward persons who may be injured
or otherwise damaged by the acts or omissions of persons entering thereon. However,
this chapter shall not apply to public roads or highways or adjacent shoulders
and rights-of-way.

---
END ---