BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 10.58 RCW to read as follows:

In the guilt phase of a criminal proceeding, the defendant may not
present evidence that a mental disease, disorder, or illness prevented the
defendant from forming the requisite mental state for the crime charged unless
the defendant has first pleaded not guilty by reason of insanity under chapter
10.77 RCW.

---
END ---