BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
29.07.025 and 1994 c 57 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each state agency designated under RCW 29.07.420 shall provide voter
registration services for employees and the public within each office of that
agency.

(2)
Each institution of higher education shall provide voter registration services
for students, employees, and the public at its office of enrollment.

(3)
The secretary of state shall design and provide a standard notice informing the
public of the availability of voter registration, which notice shall be posted
in each state agency and institution of higher education where such
services are available.

(((3))) (4) The secretary of state shall design and
provide standard voter registration forms for use by these state agencies and
institutions of higher education.

---
END ---