BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.16.010 and 1984 c 208 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature recognizes that the practices of cosmetology, barbering,
manicuring, esthetics, and shampooing involve((s)) the use of tools
and chemicals which may be dangerous when mixed or applied improperly, and
therefore finds it necessary in the interest of the public health, safety, and
welfare to regulate ((the)) those practices ((of
cosmetology)) in this state.

Sec.
2. RCW
18.16.020 and 1991 c 324 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless
the context clearly requires otherwise:

(1)
"Department" means the Washington department of licensing.

(2)
"Board" means the cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, ((and))
manicuring, and shampooing advisory board.

(((2)))
(3) "Director" means the director of the department of
licensing or the director's designee.

(((3)))
(4) "The practice of cosmetology" means the practice of arranging,
dressing, cutting, trimming, styling, shampooing, permanent waving,
chemical relaxing ((or)), straightening, curling,
bleaching, ((or)) lightening, coloring, waxing, tweezing,
shaving, mustache and beard design of the hair of the face, neck, and scalp
((and)); temporary removal of superfluous hair by use of
depilatories, waxing, or tweezing; manicuring and pedicuring, limited to
cleaning, shaping, polishing, decorating, and caring for and treatment of the
cuticles and nails of the hands and feet; esthetics limited to toning
the skin of the scalp, stimulating the skin of the body by the use of
preparations, tonics, lotions, or creams; applying eyelashes; and tinting eyelashes
and eyebrows.

(((4)))
(5) "Cosmetologist" means a person licensed under this chapter
to engage in the practice of cosmetology ((and who has completed sixteen
hundred hours of instruction at a school licensed under this chapter)).

(((5)))
(6) "The practice of barbering" means the cutting, trimming,
arranging, dressing, curling, ((waving and)) shampooing, shaving,
and mustache and beard design of the hair of the face, neck, and
scalp.

(((6)))
(7) "Barber" means a person licensed under this chapter to
engage in the practice of barbering.

(((7)))
(8) "Practice of manicuring" means the cleaning, shaping, or
polishing of the nails of the hands or feet, decoration of nails, and
the application and removal of sculptured or otherwise artificial nails by
hand or with mechanical or electrical apparatus or appliances.

(((8)))
(9) "Manicurist" means a person licensed under this chapter to
engage in the practice of manicuring.

(((9)))
(10) "Practice of esthetics" means ((skin care of the face,
neck, and hands)) stimulating of the skin of the body, except the scalp,
by application and use of preparations, antiseptics, tonics, essential oils,
exfoliants, or creams to induce chemical peel of the face and body or by any
device, electrical or otherwise, for the care of the skin, but limited to the
epidermis layer of the skin, body wraps, cleansing, conditioning, product
application and removal, involving hot compresses, ((massage,)) or
the use of approved electrical appliances or nonabrasive chemical compounds
formulated for professional application only((, and)); the
temporary removal of superfluous hair by means of lotions, creams, or
mechanical or electrical apparatus ((or)), appliance, waxing,
tweezing, or depilatories; application of eyelashes; tinting of eyelashes and
eyebrows; and lightening the hair, except the scalp, on another person.

(((10)))
(11) "Esthetician" means a person licensed under this chapter
to engage in the practice of esthetics.

(((11)))
(12) "Instructor-trainee" means a person who is currently
licensed in this state as a cosmetologist, barber, manicurist, ((or))
esthetician, or shampooer, and is enrolled in an ((approved
instructor-trainee program)) instructor-trainee curriculum in a
school licensed under this chapter.

(((12)))
(13) "School" means any establishment offering curriculum
of instruction in the practice of cosmetology, ((or)) barbering, ((or))
esthetics, ((or)) manicuring, shampooing, or instructor-trainee
to students and licensed under this chapter.

(((13)))
(14) "Student" means a person sixteen years of age or older
who is enrolled in a school licensed under this chapter and receives ((any
phase)) instruction in any of the curriculums of cosmetology,
barbering, esthetics ((or)), manicuring ((instruction)),
shampooing, or instructor-training with or without tuition, fee, or cost,
and who does not receive any wage or commission.

(((14)
"Instructor-operator-cosmetology)) (15) "Instructor"
means a person who gives instruction in ((the practice of cosmetology and
instructor-training in a school and who has the same qualifications as a
cosmetologist,)) a school in a curriculum in which he or she holds a
license under this chapter, has completed at least five hundred hours of
instruction in teaching techniques and lesson planning in a school or has
obtained a state certificate for vocational instructors through a state
approved vocational school, has one year of experience practicing in the
licensed practice, and has passed ((an)) a licensing
examination ((prepared or selected by the board and)) approved or
administered by the director. An applicant who holds a degree in education
from an accredited postsecondary institution and who is otherwise qualified
shall upon application be licensed as an ((instructor-operator with a
cosmetology endorsement)) instructor.

(((15)
"Instructor-operator-barber" means a person who gives instruction in
the practice of barbering and instructor training in a school, has the same
qualifications as a barber, has completed at least five hundred hours of
instruction in teaching techniques and lesson planning in a school, and has
passed an examination prepared or selected by the board and administered by the
director. An applicant who holds a degree in education from an accredited
postsecondary institution and who is otherwise qualified shall upon application
be licensed as an instructor-operator with a barber endorsement.

(16)
"Instructor-operator-manicure" means a person who gives instruction
in the practice of manicuring and instructor training in a school, has the same
qualifications as a manicurist, has completed at least five hundred hours of
instruction in teaching techniques and lesson planning in a school, and has
passed an examination prepared or selected by the board and administered by the
director. An applicant who holds a degree in education from an accredited
postsecondary institution and who is otherwise qualified shall upon application
be licensed as an instructor-operator with a manicurist endorsement.

(17)
"Instructor-operator-esthetics" means a person who gives instruction
in the practice of esthetics and instructor training in a school, has the same
qualifications as an esthetician, has completed at least five hundred hours of
instruction in teaching techniques and lesson planning in a school, and has
passed an examination prepared or selected by the board and administered by the
director. An applicant who holds a degree in education from an accredited
postsecondary institution and who is otherwise qualified shall upon application
be licensed as an instructor-operator with an esthetics endorsement.

(18)
"Vocational student" is a person who in cooperation with any senior
high, vocational technical institute, community college, or prep school, attends
a cosmetology school and participates in its student course of instruction and
has the same rights and duties as a student as defined in this chapter. The
person must have academically completed the eleventh grade of high school.
Every such vocational student shall receive credit for all creditable hours of
the approved course of instruction received in the school of cosmetology upon
graduation from high school. Hours shall be credited to a vocational student
if the student graduates from an accredited high school or receives a
certificate of educational competence.

(19)
"Booth renter" means a person who performs cosmetology, barbering,
esthetics, or manicuring services where the use of the salon/shop facilities is
contingent upon compensation to the owner of the salon/shop facilities and the
person receives no compensation or other consideration from the owner for the
services performed.

(20))) (16)
"Person" means any individual, partnership, professional service
corporation, joint stock association, joint venture, or any other entity
authorized to do business in this state.

(((21)))
(17) "Salon/shop" means any building, structure, ((or motor
home)) or any part thereof, other than a school, where the commercial
practice of cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, ((or)) manicuring, or
shampooing is conducted; provided that any person, except employees of a
salon/shop, who operates from a salon/shop shall be required to meet all
salon/shop licensing requirements.

(((22)))
(18) "Crossover training" means training approved by the
director as training hours that may be credited to current licensees for
similar training received in another profession licensed under this chapter.

(((23)))
(19) "Approved security" means surety bond, savings
assignment, or irrevocable letter of credit.

(((24)
"Mobile operator" means any person possessing a valid cosmetology,
barbering, manicuring, or esthetician's license that provides services in a
mobile salon/shop.

(25))) (20)
"Personal services ((operator))" means ((any person
possessing a valid)) a location license under this chapter where the
practice of cosmetology, barbering, manicuring, ((or esthetician's
license that provides services)) esthetics, or shampooing is performed
for clients in the client's home, office, or other location that is convenient
for the client.

(21)
"Individual license" means a cosmetology, barber, manicurist,
esthetician, shampooer, or instructor license issued under this chapter.

(22)
"Location license" means a license issued under this chapter for a
salon/shop, school, personal services, or mobile unit.

(23)
"Mobile unit" is a location license under this chapter where the
practice of cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, manicuring, or shampooing is
conducted in a mobile structure. Mobile units must conform to the health and
safety standards set by rule under this chapter.

(24)
"Curriculum" means the courses of study taught at a school, set by
rule under this chapter, and approved by the department. After consulting with
the board, the director may set by rule a percentage of a school's approved
hours in a curriculum that may be hours a student receives while training in a
salon/shop under a contract approved by the department. Each curriculum must
include at least the following required hours:

(a)
Cosmetologist, one thousand six hundred hours;

(b)
Barber, one thousand hours;

(c)
Manicurist, six hundred hours;

(d)
Esthetician, six hundred hours;

(e)
Shampooer, three hundred hours;

(f)
Instructor-trainee, five hundred hours.

(25)
"Student monthly report" means the student record of daily activities
that is prepared monthly by the school and provided to the student, audited
annually by the department including the number of hours taken in each course
of a curriculum, and kept on file by the school for three years.

(26)
"Practice of shampooing" means washing the hair of the scalp with a
cleansing agent and rinsing the hair of the scalp and may include conditioning
the hair of the scalp with a conditioning product.

(27)
"Shampooer" means a person licensed under this chapter to engage in
the practice of shampooing.

Sec.
3. RCW
18.16.030 and 1991 c 324 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to any other duties imposed by law, the director shall have the
following powers and duties:

(1)
To set all license, examination, and renewal fees in accordance with RCW
43.24.086;

(2)
To adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter;

(3)
To investigate alleged violations of this chapter and consumer complaints
involving the practice under this chapter of cosmetology, barbering,
esthetics, ((or)) manicuring, shampooing, instructing, and
schools offering ((training)) course curriculums in these ((areas))
practices, and salons/shops ((and booth renters offering)),
personal services, or mobile units where these ((services)) practices
are conducted;

(4)
To issue subpoenas, statements of charges, statements of intent, final orders,
stipulated agreements, and any other legal remedies necessary to enforce this
chapter;

(5)
To issue cease and desist ((letters)) orders and ((letters of
warning)) notices of correction for infractions of this chapter;

(6)
To conduct all disciplinary proceedings, impose sanctions, and assess fines for
violations of this chapter or any rules adopted under it;

(7)
To prepare and administer or approve the preparation and administration of
licensing examinations;

(8)
To establish minimum safety and sanitation standards for schools, instructors,
cosmetologists, barbers, manicurists, estheticians, ((and)) shampooer,
salons/shops, personal services, and mobile units;

(9)
To establish ((minimum instruction guidelines)) curriculums for
the training of students under this chapter;

(10)
To maintain the official department record of applicants and licensees;

(11)
To delegate in writing to a designee the authority to issue subpoenas,
statements of charges, cease and desist orders, and any other documents
necessary to enforce this chapter;

(12)
To establish by rule the procedures for an appeal of an examination failure;

(13)
To employ such administrative, investigative, inspection, audit, and
clerical staff as needed to implement this chapter;

(14)
To set license expiration dates and renewal periods for all licenses consistent
with this chapter; and

(15)
To make information available to the department of revenue to assist in
collecting taxes from persons required to be licensed under this chapter.

Sec.
4. RCW
18.16.050 and 1998 c 245 s 5 and 1998 c 20 s 1 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
There is created a state cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, ((and))
manicuring, and shampooing advisory board consisting of nine members
appointed by the director. These members of the board shall include: A
representative of ((a)) private ((cosmetology)) schools
licensed under this chapter; a representative of ((a)) public
vocational technical schools ((involved in cosmetology training))
licensed under this chapter; a consumer who is unaffiliated with the
cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, ((or)) manicuring, or shampooing
industry; and six members who are currently practicing licensees who have been
engaged in the practice of shampooing, manicuring, esthetics, barbering,
or cosmetology for at least three years. Members shall serve a term of three
years. Any board member may be removed for just cause. The director may
appoint a new member to fill any vacancy on the board for the remainder of the
unexpired term.

(2)
Board members shall be entitled to compensation pursuant to RCW 43.03.240 for
each day spent conducting official business and to reimbursement for travel
expenses as provided by RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(3)
The board may seek the advice and input of officials from the following state
agencies: (a) The work force training and education coordinating board; (b)
the department of employment security; (c) the department of labor and
industries; (d) the department of health; (e) the department of licensing; and
(f) the department of revenue.

Sec.
5. RCW
18.16.060 and 1991 c 324 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The director shall impose a fine of one thousand dollars on any person who ((does)),
after a hearing provided for in RCW 18.16.210, has been found to have done
any of the following without first obtaining the license required by this
chapter:

(a)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, commercial practice of
cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, manicuring, shampooing, or
instructing;

(b)
Instructs in a school;

(c)
Operates a school; or

(d)
Operates a salon/shop, personal services, or mobile unit. ((Each
booth renter shall be considered to be operating an independent salon/shop and
shall obtain a separate salon/shop license.))

(2)
A person who receives a license((d)) as ((a cosmetology
instructor-operator)) an instructor may engage in the commercial
practice ((of cosmetology)) for which he or she held a license when
applying for the instructor license without ((maintaining a
cosmetologist)) renewing the previously held license. ((A person
licensed as a barbering instructor-operator may engage in the commercial
practice of barbering without maintaining a barber license. A person licensed
as a manicuring instructor-operator may engage in the commercial practice of
manicuring without maintaining a manicurist license. A person licensed as an
esthetician instructor-operator may engage in the commercial practice of esthetics
without maintaining an esthetician license.)) A person whose license is
not or at any time was not renewed cannot engage in the commercial practice
previously permitted under that license unless that person renews the
previously held license.

Sec.
6. RCW
18.16.090 and 1991 c 324 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Examinations
for licensure under this chapter shall be conducted ((monthly)) at such
times and places as the director determines appropriate. Examinations shall
consist of tests designed to reasonably measure the applicant's knowledge of
safe and sanitary practices and this chapter and rules adopted pursuant to
this chapter. After consulting with the board, the director shall
establish by rule a practical examination and the minimum passing score
for all examinations and the requirements for reexamination of applicants who
fail the examination or examinations. The director may allow an independent
person to conduct the examinations at the expense of the applicants.

The
director shall take steps to ensure that after completion of the required
course, applicants may promptly take the examination and receive the results of
the examination.

Sec.
7. RCW
18.16.100 and 1991 c 324 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Upon completion of an application approved by the department and payment
of the proper fee, the director shall issue the appropriate license to any
person who:

(a)
Is at least seventeen years of age or older;

(b)
Has completed and graduated from a ((course)) school licensed under
this chapter in a curriculum approved by the director of sixteen hundred
hours of training in cosmetology, one thousand hours of training in barbering, ((five))
six hundred hours of training in manicuring, ((five)) six
hundred hours of training in esthetics, three hundred hours of training in
shampooing, and/or five hundred hours of training as an instructor-trainee,
or has met the requirements in RCW 18.16.020 or 18.16.130; and

(c)
Has received a passing grade on the appropriate licensing examination approved
or administered by the director.

(2)
A person currently licensed under this chapter may qualify for examination and
licensure, after the required examination is passed((, in another category
if he or she has completed the crossover training course approved by the
director)).

(3)
Upon completion of an application approved by the department, certification
of insurance, and payment of the proper fee, the director shall issue a ((salon/shop))
location license to the ((operator of a salon/shop if the salon/shop
meets the other requirements of this chapter as demonstrated by information
submitted by the operator)) applicant.

(4)
The director may consult with the state board of health and the department of
labor and industries in establishing training and examination requirements.

Sec.
8. RCW
18.16.110 and 1991 c 324 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The director shall issue the appropriate license to any applicant who meets the
requirements as outlined in this chapter.

(2)
Failure to renew ((a)) an individual license before its
expiration date subjects the holder to a penalty fee and payment of each year's
renewal fee, at the current rate((, up to a maximum of four years as
established by the director in accordance with RCW 43.24.086)). A person
whose license has not been renewed ((for four years)) within one year
after its expiration date shall be canceled and shall be required to submit
an application, fee, meet current licensing requirements, and pass the
applicable examination or examinations before the license may be reinstated((:
PROVIDED, That the director may waive this requirement for good cause shown)).

(3)
To renew a salon/shop, personal services, or mobile unit license, the
licensee shall ((provide proof of)) certify insurance as required
by RCW 18.16.175(1)(((h))) (g).

(((2)))
(4) Upon request and payment of an additional fee to be established by
the director, the director shall issue a duplicate license to an applicant.

Sec.
9. RCW
18.16.140 and 1991 c 324 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any person wishing to operate a school shall, before opening such a school,
file with the director for approval a license application and fee containing
the following information:

(a)
The names and addresses of all owners, managers, and instructors;

(b)
A copy of the school's curriculum satisfying the ((training guidelines))
curriculum requirements established by the director;

(c)
A sample copy of the school's catalog, brochure, enrollment contract, and
cancellation and refund policies that will be used or distributed by the school
to students and the public;

(d)
((A description and floor plan of the school's physical equipment and
facilities;

(e))) A
surety bond, irrevocable letter of credit, or savings assignment in an amount
not less than ten thousand dollars, or ten percent of the annual gross tuition
collected by the school, whichever is greater. The approved security shall not
exceed fifty thousand dollars and shall run to the state of Washington for the
protection of unearned prepaid student tuition. The school shall attest to its
gross tuition at least annually on forms provided by the department. When a
new school license is being applied for, the applicant will estimate its annual
gross tuition to establish a bond amount. This subsection shall not apply to
community colleges and vocational technical schools.

Upon
approval of the application and documents, the director shall issue a license
to operate a school ((with the appropriate certification or certifications)).

(2)
Changes to the information provided by schools shall be submitted to the
department within fifteen days of the implementation date.

(3)
A change involving the controlling interest of the school requires a new
license application and fee. The new application shall include all required
documentation, proof of ownership change, and be approved prior to a license
being issued.

(4)
School and instructor licenses issued by the department shall be posted in the
reception area of the school.

Sec.
10. RCW
18.16.170 and 1991 c 324 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to subsection (2) of this section, licenses issued under this chapter
expire as follows:

(a)
A salon/shop, personal services, or mobile unit license expires one year
from issuance or when the insurance required by RCW 18.16.175(1)(((h))) (g)
expires, whichever occurs first;

(b)
A school license expires one year from issuance; and

(c)
Cosmetologist, barber, manicurist, esthetician, shampooer, and
instructor licenses expire two years from issuance.

(2)
The director may provide for expiration dates other than those set forth in
subsection (1) of this section for the purpose of establishing staggered
renewal periods.

Sec.
11. RCW
18.16.175 and 1997 c 178 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A salon/shop or mobile unit shall meet the following minimum
requirements:

(a)
Maintain an outside entrance separate from any rooms used for sleeping or
residential purposes;

(b)
Provide and maintain for the use of its customers adequate toilet facilities
located within or adjacent to the salon/shop or mobile unit;

(c)
((Be operated under the direct supervision of a licensed cosmetologist
except that a salon/shop that is limited to barbering may be directly
supervised by a barber, a salon/shop that is limited to manicuring may be directly
supervised by a manicurist, and a salon/shop that is limited to esthetics may
be directly supervised by an esthetician;

(d))) Any
room used wholly or in part as a salon/shop or mobile unit shall not be
used for residential purposes, except that toilet facilities may be used
jointly for residential and business purposes;

(((e)))
(d) Meet the zoning requirements of the county, city, or town, as
appropriate;

(((f)))
(e) Provide for safe storage and labeling of chemicals used in the
practice ((of cosmetology)) under this chapter;

(((g)))
(f) Meet all applicable local and state fire codes;

(((h)
Provide proof)) (g) Certify that the salon/shop or mobile unit
is covered by a public liability insurance policy in an amount not less than
one hundred thousand dollars for combined bodily injury and property damage
liability; and

(((i)))
(h) Other requirements which the director determines are necessary for
safety and sanitation of salons/shops, personal services, or mobile units.
The director may consult with the state board of health and the department of
labor and industries in establishing minimum salon/shop, personal services,
and mobile unit safety requirements.

(2)
((A salon/shop shall post the notice to customers described in RCW
18.16.180.)) Personal services license holders shall certify coverage of
a public liability insurance policy in an amount not less than one hundred
thousand dollars for combined bodily injury and property damage liability.

(3)
Upon receipt of a written complaint that a salon/shop or mobile unit has
violated any provisions of this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter
or at least once every two years for an existing salon/shop or mobile unit,
the director or the director's designee shall inspect each salon/shop or mobile
unit. If the director determines that any salon/shop or mobile unit
is not in compliance with this chapter, the director shall send written notice
to the salon/shop or mobile unit. A salon/shop or mobile unit
which fails to correct the conditions to the satisfaction of the director
within a reasonable time shall, upon due notice, be subject to the penalties
imposed by the director under RCW 18.16.210. The director may enter any
salon/shop or mobile unit during business hours for the purpose of inspection.
The director may contract with health authorities of local governments to
conduct the inspections under this subsection.

(4)
A salon/shop, ((including a salon/shop operated by a booth renter,)) personal
services, or mobile unit shall obtain a certificate of registration from
the department of revenue.

(5)
This section does not prohibit the use of motor homes as mobile ((salon/shops))
units if the motor home meets the health and safety standards of this
section.

(6)
Salon/shop or mobile unit licenses issued by the department shall be posted in
the salon/shop or mobile unit's reception area.

(7)
Cosmetology, barbering, esthetics, manicuring, and shampooing licenses issued
by the department shall be posted at the licensed person's work station.

Sec.
12. RCW
18.16.200 and 1991 c 324 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
applicant or licensee under this chapter may be subject to disciplinary action
by the director if the licensee or applicant:

(1)
Has been found guilty of a crime ((related to the practice of cosmetology,
barbering, esthetics, manicuring, or instructing)) within the prior ten
years involving moral turpitude or has been found to have violated any
provisions of chapter 19.86 RCW;

(2)
Has made a material misstatement or omission in connection with an original
application or renewal;

(3)
Has engaged in false or misleading advertising;

(4)
Has performed services in an unsafe or unsanitary manner;

(5)
Has aided and abetted unlicensed activity;

(6)
Has engaged in the commercial practice of cosmetology, barbering, manicuring,
esthetics, or shampooing, or has instructed in or operated a
school, salon/shop, personal services, or mobile unit without first
obtaining the license required by this chapter;

(7)
Has engaged in the commercial practice of cosmetology, barbering,
manicuring, esthetics, or shampooing in a school;

(8)
Has not provided a safe, sanitary, and good moral environment for students and
public;

(9)
Has not provided records as required by this chapter;

(10)
Has not cooperated with the department in supplying records or assisting in an inspection,
investigation, or disciplinary procedure; ((or))

(11)
Failed to display licenses required in this chapter; or

(12)
Has violated any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted under it.

Sec.
13. RCW
18.16.210 and 1984 c 208 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

If,
following a hearing, the director finds that any person or an applicant
or licensee has violated any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted
under it, the director may impose one or more of the following penalties:

(1)
Denial of a license or renewal;

(2)
Revocation or suspension of a license;

(3)
A fine of not more than five hundred dollars per violation;

(4)
Issuance of a reprimand or letter of censure;

(5)
Placement of the licensee on probation for a fixed period of time;

(6)
Restriction of the licensee's authorized scope of practice;

(7)
Requiring the licensee to make restitution or a refund as determined by the
director to any individual injured by the violation; or

(8)
Requiring the licensee to obtain additional training or instruction.

Sec.
14. RCW
18.16.240 and 1997 c 58 s 815 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department shall immediately suspend the license of a person who has been
certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health
services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order ((or a
residential or visitation order)). If the person has continued to meet all
other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license
shall be automatic upon the department's receipt of a release issued by the
department of social and health services stating that the licensee is in
compliance with the order.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
18.16.165 (Licenses issued, students enrolled before January 1,
1992--Curricula updates) and 1991 c 324 s 8;

(2) RCW
18.16.180 (Salon/shop--Notice required) and 1991 c 324 s 16; and

(3) RCW
18.16.190 (Location of practice--Penalty--Placebound clients) and
1991 c 324 s 20.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. This
act takes effect January 1, 2000.

Sec.
17. RCW
18.16.900 and 1984 c 208 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Washington
cosmetologists, barbers, ((and)) manicurists, estheticians, and
shampooers act".

---
END ---