BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
39.04.240 and 1992 c 171 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The provisions of RCW 4.84.250 through 4.84.280 shall apply to an action
arising out of a public works contract in which the state or a municipality, or
other public body that contracts for public works, is a party, except that:
(a) The maximum ((amount of the pleading shall be two hundred fifty thousand
dollars)) dollar limitation in RCW 4.84.250 shall not apply; and (b)
in applying RCW 4.84.280, the time period for serving offers of settlement on
the adverse party shall be the period not less than thirty days and not more
than one hundred twenty days after completion of the service and filing of the
summons and complaint.

(2) The rights provided for under this section may not be waived by
the parties to a public works contract that is entered into on or after June
11, 1992, and a provision in such a contract that provides for waiver of these
rights is void as against public policy. However, this subsection shall not be
construed as prohibiting the parties from mutually agreeing to a clause in a
public works contract that requires submission of a dispute arising under the
contract to arbitration.

---
END ---