BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
It is the intent of the legislature that:

(a)
Businesses and agencies exercise reasonable care to prepare electronic
computing devices for which they are responsible to continue normal operation
after the year 2000;

(b)
Citizens and clients of agencies continue to receive statutorily mandated
services, entitlements, and compensation delivered through electronic computing
devices without interruption through and after the year 2000; and

(c)
Vendors and contractors providing goods and services to agencies continue to
receive payment for same without interruption through and after the year 2000.

(2)
However, the legislature recognizes that preparing business' and agencies'
electronic computing devices for year 2000 readiness is a complex and difficult
challenge, and that even reasonable care practices may result in some failures
of these devices.

(3)
In the event of such failures, it is the intent of the legislature that
affected citizens, clients, vendors, and contractors have recourse to existing
administrative or contractual remedies to obtain redress but not otherwise
compensate them for consequences of the failure.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
As used in this section:

(a)
"Agency" means any state or local government or any subdivision
thereof, including any board, commission, bureau, committee, department,
institution, division, or tribunal in the legislative, executive, or judicial
branch, including elective and legislative offices, institutions of higher
education created and supported by state government, counties, cities, towns,
special purpose districts, local service districts, municipal corporations,
quasi-municipal corporations, and political subdivisions of such agencies and
corporations.

(b)
"Business" means any business entity, including a sole
proprietorship, corporation, partnership, or other legal entity.

(c)
"Electronic computing device" means any computer hardware or
software, computer chip, embedded chip, process control equipment, or other
information system used to capture, store, manipulate, or process data, or that
controls, monitors, or assists in the operation of physical apparatus that is
not primarily used as a computer, but that relies on automation or digital
technology to function, including but not limited to vehicles, vessels,
buildings, structures, facilities, elevators, medical equipment, traffic
signals, factory machinery, and the like.

(d)
"Indirect or consequential damages" means any harm, loss, damage, or
mental injury of any nature whatsoever other than goods, entitlements,
services, or compensation that businesses and agencies are by contract,
statute, or rule obligated to provide.

(2)
No action may be brought against a business, its officers or directors, its
employees, or an agency or its employees for indirect or consequential damages
caused in whole or in part by computational or interpretive errors generated by
an electronic computing device owned, controlled, or operated by a business or
an agency and arising out of or in connection with the year 2000 date change.

(a)
A business, its officers, directors, or employees or an agency or its employees
may not be held liable in any other action whether based in tort, contract, or
otherwise for such damages.

(b)
This subsection does not prohibit an action otherwise permitted by law for such
damages if the claimant proves with clear and convincing evidence that the
damages were caused by the business' or agency's willful failure to attempt to
find and correct any such errors.

(c)
This section does not apply to human physical injuries that may occur or be
exacerbated as a result of a year 2000 error.

(3)
Nothing in this chapter may be interpreted to interfere with contractual
rights, obligations, duties, or warranties of private vendors supplying
electronic computing devices to agencies. In the event of an agency's or
contractor's failure to perform contractual obligations due to computational or
interpretive errors associated with the year 2000 date change, the remedies
available to the parties shall be as set forth in their written contract.

(4)
Nothing in this section may be interpreted to interfere with citizens' rights
to receive statutorily mandated services, entitlements, or compensation from
agencies. In the event of an agency's failure to deliver such services,
entitlements, or compensation due to computational or interpretive errors
associated with the year 2000 date change, the remedies available to the
citizen or client shall be the existing administrative procedures or remedies
provided by law, except as expressly limited by this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---