BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 18.73 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Every emergency medical services medical program director shall design a
training curriculum and develop protocols, subject to approval by the
secretary, to allow emergency medical technicians to carry and administer
epinephrine to patients under twenty-six years of age or any patient with
evidence of a prescription for epinephrine, by July 1, 2000. Every emergency
medical technician shall successfully complete the training program within six
months of the secretary's approval.

(2)
The secretary shall develop standards and procedures for evaluating the
training curriculum and protocols mentioned in subsection (1) of this section
by January 1, 2000.

(3)
Emergency medical technicians, performing patient care duties as an ambulance
operator or attendant or as a member of an aid service, shall carry and may
administer, according to protocols, epinephrine for the treatment of patients
who the emergency medical technician reasonably believes to be under twenty-six
years of age or with evidence of a prescription for epinephrine, and who are
experiencing anaphylaxis if the emergency medical technician has successfully
completed a training curriculum approved by the secretary.

(4)
Nothing in this section authorizes the administration of epinephrine by a first
responder.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act takes effect August 1, 1999.

---
END ---