BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature intends to clarify the administration and enforcement of Initiative
692. The legislature does not intend this act in any way to change or restrict
the policy of the people of Washington as expressed by their enactment of the
measure. The purpose of this act is to reinforce the legitimate medical
decisions made by physicians, primary caregivers, and qualifying patients
through adoption of necessary clarifying amendments. These amendments are
intended to reduce the opportunities for people who would not otherwise qualify
for protections under Initiative 692 to use its terms to abuse controlled
substances. Such abuse frustrates the intent of the people and threatens the
integrity of the initiative process.

Sec.
2. RCW
69.51A.040 and 1999 c 2 s 5 (Initiative Measure No. 692) are each amended to
read as follows:

(1)
If charged with a violation of state law relating to marijuana, any qualifying
patient who is engaged in the medical use of marijuana, or any designated
primary caregiver who assists a qualifying patient in the medical use of
marijuana, will be deemed to have established an affirmative defense to such
charges by proof of his or her compliance with the requirements provided in
this chapter. Any person meeting the requirements appropriate to his or her
status under this chapter shall be considered to have engaged in activities
permitted by this chapter and shall not be penalized in any manner, or denied
any right or privilege, for such actions.

(2)
The qualifying patient, if eighteen years of age or older, shall:

(a)
Meet all criteria for status as a qualifying patient;

(b)
Possess no more marijuana than is necessary for the patient's personal, medical
use, not exceeding the amount necessary for a sixty-day supply; and

(c)
Have in his or her immediate possession and present his or her valid
documentation to any law enforcement official who questions the patient
regarding his or her medical use of marijuana.

(3)
The qualifying patient, if under eighteen years of age, shall comply with
subsection (2)(a) and (c) of this section. However, any possession under
subsection (2)(b) of this section, as well as any production, acquisition, and
decision as to dosage and frequency of use, shall be the responsibility of the
parent or legal guardian of the qualifying patient.

(4)
The designated primary caregiver shall:

(a)
Meet all criteria for status as a primary caregiver to a qualifying patient;

(b)
Possess, in combination with and as an agent for the qualifying patient, no
more marijuana than is necessary for the patient's personal, medical use, not
exceeding the amount necessary for a sixty-day supply;

(c)
Have in his or her immediate possession and present a copy of the
qualifying patient's valid documentation required by this chapter, as well as
evidence of designation to act as primary caregiver by the patient, to any law
enforcement official requesting such information;

(d)
Be prohibited from consuming marijuana obtained for the personal, medical use
of the patient for whom the individual is acting as primary caregiver; and

(e)
Be the primary caregiver to only one patient at any one time.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 69.51A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
For the purposes of RCW 69.51A.040, "valid documentation" consists of
a completed form prepared by the physician in substantially the following form:

"(a). . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

Physician's Name Physician's Address Physician's
Office

Telephone

(b). . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

Primary Care- Primary Care- Primary
Care-

giver's Name giver's Address giver's
Daytime

Telephone

(c)
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

Date of Initial Documentation

from Physician under RCW 69.51A.030

(d)
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

Dosage Recommendation by Physician

(e)
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

. . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

Maximum Quantity Legally Possessed

Considering Dosage and 60-Day Limitation

(f)
. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .

Physician's Signature Date of Signature"

(2)
The physician must file a copy of the completed form specified in subsection
(1) of this section with the medical quality assurance commission within seven
days of the date that the physician provided the qualifying patient with valid
documentation under RCW 69.51A.030. The commission must make the information
available to law enforcement agencies upon request for the purpose of
investigating violations of this chapter.

(3)
Each qualifying patient must sign a release in order to obtain the valid documentation
from the physician that grants permission to disclose the information to law
enforcement agencies.

Sec.
4. RCW
69.51A.060 and 1999 c 2 s 8 (Initiative Measure No. 692) are each amended to
read as follows:

(1)
It ((shall be)) is a misdemeanor to use or display medical
marijuana in a manner or place which is open to the view of the general public.

(2)
Nothing in this chapter requires any health insurance provider to be liable for
any claim for reimbursement for the medical use of marijuana.

(3)
Nothing in this chapter requires any physician to authorize the use of medical
marijuana for a patient.

(4)
Nothing in this chapter requires any accommodation of any medical use of
marijuana in any place of employment, in any school bus or on any school
grounds, or in any youth center. Nothing in this act prohibits an employer
from removing an employee from his or her duties when the employee poses a
safety risk or is unable to perform his or her duties due to use of marijuana
under this chapter.

(5)
It is a class C felony to fraudulently produce any record purporting to be, or
tamper with the content of any record for the purpose of having it accepted as,
valid documentation under RCW 69.51A.010(5)(a).

(6) ((No person shall be entitled to claim the affirmative
defense provided in RCW 69.51A.040 for engaging in the medical use of marijuana
in a way that endangers the health or well-being of any person through the use
of a motorized vehicle on a street, road, or highway.)) Nothing in this
act is a defense against any infraction, violation, or offense specified in
chapter 46.20, 46.25, or 46.61 RCW, or RCW 88.12.025, or any equivalent local
ordinance.

---
END ---