BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
40.24.070 and 1998 c 138 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
secretary of state may not make any records in a program participant's file
available for inspection or copying, other than the address designated by the
secretary of state, except under the following circumstances:

(1)
If requested by a law enforcement agency, to the law enforcement agency;

(2)
If directed by a court order, to a person identified in the order; or

(3)
((If certification has been canceled; or

(4))) To
verify the participation of a specific program participant, in which case the
secretary may only confirm information supplied by the requester.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---