BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

Each carrier shall provide all enrollees with direct access to the
participating chiropractor of the enrollee's choice for covered chiropractic
health care without the necessity of prior referral. This section does not
prevent carriers from restricting patients to seeing only providers who have
signed participating provider agreements or from utilizing other managed care
and cost containment techniques and processes.

---
END ---