BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
49.22.010 and 1989 c 357 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless
the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Department" means the department of labor and industries.

(2)
"((Late night)) Evening retail establishment" means any
business or commercial establishment making sales to the public between the
hours of ((eleven)) eight o'clock p.m. and ((six)) seven
o'clock a.m., except restaurants, hotels, taverns, or any lodging facility.

(3)
"Employer" means the operator, lessee, or franchisee of ((a late
night)) an evening retail establishment whose standard industrial
code is "5411" or "5541" as established under the standard
industrial classification manual, or the equivalent code in a successor
classification as determined by the commissioner under Title 50 RCW.

Sec.
2. RCW
49.22.020 and 1989 c 357 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to providing crime prevention training ((as provided in section 2
of this act)), all employers operating ((late night)) evening
retail establishments shall:

(1)
Post a conspicuous sign in the window or door which states that there is a safe
on the premises and it is not accessible to the employees on the premises and
that the cash register contains only the minimal amount of cash needed to
conduct business: PROVIDED, That an employer shall not be subject to penalties
under RCW 49.22.030 for having moneys in the cash register in excess of the
minimal amount needed to conduct business;

(2)
So arrange all material posted in the window or door so as to provide a clear
and unobstructed view of the cash register, provided the cash register is
otherwise in a position visible from the street;

(3)
Have a drop-safe, limited access safe, or comparable device on the premises;
and

(4)
Operate the outside lights for that portion of the parking area that is necessary
to accommodate customers during all night hours the ((late night)) evening
retail establishment is open, if the ((late night)) evening
retail establishment has a parking area for its customers.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The department
of labor and industries shall review and update existing rules and
administrative procedures to reflect changes made by this act.

---
END ---