BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
49.60.010 and 1997 c 271 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

This
chapter shall be known as the "law against discrimination". It is an
exercise of the police power of the state for the protection of the public
welfare, health, and peace of the people of this state, and in fulfillment of
the provisions of the Constitution of this state concerning civil rights. The
legislature hereby finds and declares that practices of discrimination against
any of its inhabitants because of race, creed, color, national origin, families
with children, source of household income, sex, marital status, age, or
the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a
trained dog guide or service animal by a disabled person are a matter of state
concern, that such discrimination threatens not only the rights and proper
privileges of its inhabitants but menaces the institutions and foundation of a
free democratic state. A state agency is herein created with powers with respect
to elimination and prevention of discrimination in employment, in credit and
insurance transactions, in places of public resort, accommodation, or
amusement, and in real property transactions because of race, creed, color,
national origin, families with children, source of household income,
sex, marital status, age, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical
disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a disabled
person; and the commission established hereunder is hereby given general
jurisdiction and power for such purposes.

Sec.
2. RCW
49.60.030 and 1997 c 271 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The right to be free from discrimination because of race, creed, color,
national origin, sex, or the presence of any sensory, mental, or physical
disability or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a disabled
person is recognized as and declared to be a civil right. This right shall
include, but not be limited to:

(a)
The right to obtain and hold employment without discrimination;

(b)
The right to the full enjoyment of any of the accommodations, advantages,
facilities, or privileges of any place of public resort, accommodation,
assemblage, or amusement;

(c)
The right to engage in real estate transactions without discrimination,
including discrimination against families with children;

(d)
The right to engage in credit transactions without discrimination, which
includes discrimination because of source of household income when that source
can be verified as to its amount, length of time received, and regularity;

(e)
The right to engage in insurance transactions or transactions with health
maintenance organizations without discrimination: PROVIDED, That a practice
which is not unlawful under RCW 48.30.300, 48.44.220, or 48.46.370 does not
constitute an unfair practice for the purposes of this subparagraph; and

(f)
The right to engage in commerce free from any discriminatory boycotts or
blacklists. Discriminatory boycotts or blacklists for purposes of this section
shall be defined as the formation or execution of any express or implied
agreement, understanding, policy or contractual arrangement for economic
benefit between any persons which is not specifically authorized by the laws of
the United States and which is required or imposed, either directly or
indirectly, overtly or covertly, by a foreign government or foreign person in
order to restrict, condition, prohibit, or interfere with or in order to
exclude any person or persons from any business relationship on the basis of
race, color, creed, religion, sex, the presence of any sensory, mental, or
physical disability, or the use of a trained dog guide or service animal by a
disabled person, or national origin or lawful business relationship: PROVIDED
HOWEVER, That nothing herein contained shall prohibit the use of boycotts as
authorized by law pertaining to labor disputes and unfair labor practices.

(2)
Any person deeming himself or herself injured by any act in violation of this
chapter shall have a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction to
enjoin further violations, or to recover the actual damages sustained by the
person, or both, together with the cost of suit including reasonable attorneys'
fees or any other appropriate remedy authorized by this chapter or the United
States Civil Rights Act of 1964 as amended, or the Federal Fair Housing
Amendments Act of 1988 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3601 et seq.).

(3)
Except for any unfair practice committed by an employer against an employee or
a prospective employee, or any unfair practice in a real estate transaction
which is the basis for relief specified in the amendments to RCW 49.60.225 contained
in chapter 69, Laws of 1993, any unfair practice prohibited by this chapter
which is committed in the course of trade or commerce as defined in the
Consumer Protection Act, chapter 19.86 RCW, is, for the purpose of applying
that chapter, a matter affecting the public interest, is not reasonable in
relation to the development and preservation of business, and is an unfair or
deceptive act in trade or commerce.

Sec.
3. RCW
49.60.040 and 1997 c 271 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"Person" includes one or more individuals, partnerships,
associations, organizations, corporations, cooperatives, legal representatives,
trustees and receivers, or any group of persons; it includes any owner, lessee,
proprietor, manager, agent, or employee, whether one or more natural persons;
and further includes any political or civil subdivisions of the state and any
agency or instrumentality of the state or of any political or civil subdivision
thereof;

(2)
"Commission" means the Washington state human rights commission;

(3)
"Employer" includes any person acting in the interest of an employer,
directly or indirectly, who employs eight or more persons, and does not include
any religious or sectarian organization not organized for private profit;

(4)
"Employee" does not include any individual employed by his or her
parents, spouse, or child, or in the domestic service of any person;

(5)
"Labor organization" includes any organization which exists for the purpose,
in whole or in part, of dealing with employers concerning grievances or terms
or conditions of employment, or for other mutual aid or protection in
connection with employment;

(6)
"Employment agency" includes any person undertaking with or without
compensation to recruit, procure, refer, or place employees for an employer;

(7)
"Marital status" means the legal status of being married, single,
separated, divorced, or widowed;

(8)
"National origin" includes "ancestry";

(9)
"Full enjoyment of" includes the right to purchase any service,
commodity, or article of personal property offered or sold on, or by, any
establishment to the public, and the admission of any person to accommodations,
advantages, facilities, or privileges of any place of public resort,
accommodation, assemblage, or amusement, without acts directly or indirectly
causing persons of any particular race, creed, color, sex, national origin, or
with any sensory, mental, or physical disability, or the use of a trained dog
guide or service animal by a disabled person, to be treated as not welcome,
accepted, desired, or solicited;

(10)
"Any place of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement"
includes, but is not limited to, any place, licensed or unlicensed, kept for
gain, hire, or reward, or where charges are made for admission, service,
occupancy, or use of any property or facilities, whether conducted for the
entertainment, housing, or lodging of transient guests, or for the benefit,
use, or accommodation of those seeking health, recreation, or rest, or for the
burial or other disposition of human remains, or for the sale of goods,
merchandise, services, or personal property, or for the rendering of personal
services, or for public conveyance or transportation on land, water, or in the
air, including the stations and terminals thereof and the garaging of vehicles,
or where food or beverages of any kind are sold for consumption on the
premises, or where public amusement, entertainment, sports, or recreation of
any kind is offered with or without charge, or where medical service or care is
made available, or where the public gathers, congregates, or assembles for
amusement, recreation, or public purposes, or public halls, public elevators,
and public washrooms of buildings and structures occupied by two or more
tenants, or by the owner and one or more tenants, or any public library or
educational institution, or schools of special instruction, or nursery schools,
or day care centers or children's camps: PROVIDED, That nothing contained in
this definition shall be construed to include or apply to any institute, bona
fide club, or place of accommodation, which is by its nature distinctly
private, including fraternal organizations, though where public use is
permitted that use shall be covered by this chapter; nor shall anything
contained in this definition apply to any educational facility, columbarium,
crematory, mausoleum, or cemetery operated or maintained by a bona fide
religious or sectarian institution;

(11)
"Real property" includes buildings, structures, dwellings, real
estate, lands, tenements, leaseholds, interests in real estate cooperatives,
condominiums, and hereditaments, corporeal and incorporeal, or any interest
therein;

(12)
"Real estate transaction" includes the sale, appraisal, brokering,
exchange, purchase, rental, or lease of real property, transacting or applying
for a real estate loan, or the provision of brokerage services;

(13)
"Dwelling" means any building, structure, or portion thereof that is
occupied as, or designed or intended for occupancy as, a residence by one or
more families, and any vacant land that is offered for sale or lease for the
construction or location thereon of any such building, structure, or portion
thereof;

(14)
"Sex" means gender;

(15)
"Aggrieved person" means any person who: (a) Claims to have been
injured by an unfair practice in a real estate transaction; or (b) believes
that he or she will be injured by an unfair practice in a real estate
transaction that is about to occur;

(16)
"Complainant" means the person who files a complaint in a real estate
transaction;

(17)
"Respondent" means any person accused in a complaint or amended
complaint of an unfair practice in a real estate transaction;

(18)
"Credit transaction" includes any open or closed end credit
transaction, whether in the nature of a loan, retail installment transaction,
credit card issue or charge, or otherwise, and whether for personal or for
business purposes, in which a service, finance, or interest charge is imposed,
or which provides for repayment in scheduled payments, when such credit is
extended in the regular course of any trade or commerce, including but not
limited to transactions by banks, savings and loan associations or other
financial lending institutions of whatever nature, stock brokers, or by a
merchant or mercantile establishment which as part of its ordinary business
permits or provides that payment for purchases of property or service therefrom
may be deferred;

(19)
"Families with children status" means one or more individuals who
have not attained the age of eighteen years being domiciled with a parent or
another person having legal custody of such individual or individuals, or with
the designee of such parent or other person having such legal custody, with the
written permission of such parent or other person. Families with children
status also applies to any person who is pregnant or is in the process of
securing legal custody of any individual who has not attained the age of
eighteen years;

(20)
"Covered multifamily dwelling" means: (a) Buildings consisting of
four or more dwelling units if such buildings have one or more elevators; and
(b) ground floor dwelling units in other buildings consisting of four or more
dwelling units;

(21)
"Premises" means the interior or exterior spaces, parts, components,
or elements of a building, including individual dwelling units and the public
and common use areas of a building;

(22)
"Dog guide" means a dog that is trained for the purpose of guiding
blind persons or a dog that is trained for the purpose of assisting hearing
impaired persons;

(23)
"Service animal" means an animal that is trained for the purpose of
assisting or accommodating a disabled person's sensory, mental, or physical
disability;

(24)
"Source of household income" includes the receipt of social security;
supplemental security income; public assistance; other federal, state, or local
assistance; child support or spousal maintenance; or the receipt of federal,
state, or local housing assistance, including rental subsidies and rent
supplements.

Sec.
4. RCW
49.60.222 and 1997 c 400 s 3 and 1997 c 271 s 14 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
It is an unfair practice for any person, whether acting for himself, herself,
or another, because of sex, marital status, race, creed, color, national
origin, families with children status, source of household income, the
presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability, or the use of a
trained dog guide or service animal by a disabled person:

(a)
To refuse to engage in a real estate transaction with a person;

(b)
To discriminate against a person in the terms, conditions, or privileges of a
real estate transaction or in the furnishing of facilities or services in
connection therewith;

(c)
To refuse to receive or to fail to transmit a bona fide offer to engage in a
real estate transaction from a person;

(d)
To refuse to negotiate for a real estate transaction with a person;

(e)
To represent to a person that real property is not available for inspection,
sale, rental, or lease when in fact it is so available, or to fail to bring a
property listing to his or her attention, or to refuse to permit the person to
inspect real property;

(f)
To discriminate in the sale or rental, or to otherwise make unavailable or deny
a dwelling, to any person; or to a person residing in or intending to reside in
that dwelling after it is sold, rented, or made available; or to any person
associated with the person buying or renting;

(g)
To make, print, circulate, post, or mail, or cause to be so made or published a
statement, advertisement, or sign, or to use a form of application for a real
estate transaction, or to make a record or inquiry in connection with a
prospective real estate transaction, which indicates, directly or indirectly,
an intent to make a limitation, specification, or discrimination with respect
thereto;

(h)
To offer, solicit, accept, use, or retain a listing of real property with the
understanding that a person may be discriminated against in a real estate
transaction or in the furnishing of facilities or services in connection
therewith;

(i)
To expel a person from occupancy of real property;

(j)
To discriminate in the course of negotiating, executing, or financing a real
estate transaction whether by mortgage, deed of trust, contract, or other
instrument imposing a lien or other security in real property, or in
negotiating or executing any item or service related thereto including issuance
of title insurance, mortgage insurance, loan guarantee, or other aspect of the
transaction. Nothing in this section shall limit the effect of RCW 49.60.176
relating to unfair practices in credit transactions; or

(k)
To attempt to do any of the unfair practices defined in this section.

(2)
For the purposes of this chapter discrimination based on the presence of any
sensory, mental, or physical disability or the use of a trained dog guide or
service animal by a blind, deaf, or physically disabled person includes:

(a)
A refusal to permit, at the expense of the disabled person, reasonable
modifications of existing premises occupied or to be occupied by such person if
such modifications may be necessary to afford such person full enjoyment of the
dwelling, except that, in the case of a rental, the landlord may, where it is
reasonable to do so, condition permission for a modification on the renter
agreeing to restore the interior of the dwelling to the condition that existed
before the modification, reasonable wear and tear excepted;

(b)
To refuse to make reasonable accommodation in rules, policies, practices, or
services when such accommodations may be necessary to afford a person with the
presence of any sensory, mental, or physical disability and/or the use of a
trained dog guide or service animal by a blind, deaf, or physically disabled
person equal opportunity to use and enjoy a dwelling; or

(c)
To fail to design and construct covered multifamily dwellings and premises in
conformance with the federal fair housing amendments act of 1988 (42 U.S.C.
Sec. 3601 et seq.) and all other applicable laws or regulations pertaining to
access by persons with any sensory, mental, or physical disability or use of a
trained dog guide or service animal. Whenever the requirements of applicable
laws or regulations differ, the requirements which require greater
accessibility for persons with any sensory, mental, or physical disability
shall govern.

Nothing
in (a) or (b) of this subsection shall apply to: (i) A single-family house
rented or leased by the owner if the owner does not own or have an interest in
the proceeds of the rental or lease of more than three such single-family
houses at one time, the rental or lease occurred without the use of a real
estate broker or salesperson, as defined in RCW 18.85.010, and the rental or
lease occurred without the publication, posting, or mailing of any
advertisement, sign, or statement in violation of subsection (1)(g) of this
section; or (ii) rooms or units in dwellings containing living quarters
occupied or intended to be occupied by no more than four families living
independently of each other if the owner maintains and occupies one of the
rooms or units as his or her residence.

(3)
Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, it shall not be an unfair
practice or a denial of civil rights for any public or private educational
institution to separate the sexes or give preference to or limit use of
dormitories, residence halls, or other student housing to persons of one sex or
to make distinctions on the basis of marital or families with children status.

(4)
Except pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section, this section shall not be
construed to require structural changes, modifications, or additions to make
facilities accessible to a disabled person except as otherwise required by
law. Nothing in this section affects the rights, responsibilities, and
remedies of landlords and tenants pursuant to chapter 59.18 or 59.20 RCW,
including the right to post and enforce reasonable rules of conduct and safety
for all tenants and their guests, provided that chapters 59.18 and 59.20 RCW
are only affected to the extent they are inconsistent with the
nondiscrimination requirements of this chapter. Nothing in this section limits
the applicability of any reasonable federal, state, or local restrictions
regarding the maximum number of occupants permitted to occupy a dwelling.

(5)
Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, it shall not be an unfair
practice for any public establishment providing for accommodations offered for
the full enjoyment of transient guests as defined by RCW 9.91.010(1)(c) to make
distinctions on the basis of families with children status. Nothing in this
section shall limit the effect of RCW 49.60.215 relating to unfair practices in
places of public accommodation.

(6) Nothing in this chapter prohibiting discrimination based on
families with children status applies to housing for older persons as defined
by the federal fair housing amendments act of 1988, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 3607(b)(1)
through (3), as amended by the housing for older persons act of 1995, P.L.
104-76, as enacted on December 28, 1995. Nothing in this chapter authorizes
requirements for housing for older persons different than the requirements in
the federal fair housing amendments act of 1988, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 3607(b)(1)
through (3), as amended by the housing for older persons act of 1995, P.L.
104-76, as enacted on December 28, 1995.

---
END ---