BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
19.16.100 and 1994 c 195 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
a different meaning is plainly required by the context, the following words and
phrases as hereinafter used in this chapter shall have the following meanings:

(1)
"Person" includes individual, firm, partnership, trust, joint
venture, association, or corporation.

(2)
"Collection agency" means and includes:

(a)
Any person directly or indirectly engaged in soliciting claims for collection,
or collecting or attempting to collect claims owed or due or asserted to be
owed or due another person;

(b)
Any person who directly or indirectly furnishes or attempts to furnish, sells,
or offers to sell forms represented to be a collection system or scheme
intended or calculated to be used to collect claims even though the forms
direct the debtor to make payment to the creditor and even though the forms may
be or are actually used by the creditor himself in his own name;

(c)
Any person who in attempting to collect or in collecting his own claim uses a
fictitious name or any name other than his own which would indicate to the
debtor that a third person is collecting or attempting to collect such claim.

(3)
"Collection agency" does not mean and does not include:

(a)
Any individual engaged in soliciting claims for collection, or collecting or
attempting to collect claims on behalf of a licensee under this chapter, if
said individual is an employee of the licensee;

(b)
Any individual collecting or attempting to collect claims for not more than one
employer, if all the collection efforts are carried on in the name of the
employer and if the individual is an employee of the employer;

(c)
Any person whose collection activities are carried on in his or its true name
and are confined and are directly related to the operation of a business other
than that of a collection agency, such as but not limited to trust companies,
savings and loan associations, building and loan associations, abstract
companies doing an escrow business, real estate brokers, public officers acting
in their official capacities, persons acting under court order, lawyers,
insurance companies, credit unions, loan or finance companies, mortgage banks,
and banks;

(d)
Any person who on behalf of another person prepares or mails monthly or
periodic statements of accounts due if all payments are made to that other
person and no other collection efforts are made by the person preparing the
statements of account; or

(e)
An "out-of-state collection agency" as defined in this chapter.

(4)
"Out-of-state collection agency" means a person whose activities within
this state are limited to collecting debts from debtors located in this state
by means of interstate communications, including telephone, mail, or facsimile
transmission, from the person's location in another state on behalf of clients
located outside of this state.

(5)
"Claim" means any obligation for the payment of money or thing of
value arising out of any agreement or contract, express or implied.

(6)
"Statement of account" means a report setting forth only amounts
billed, invoices, credits allowed, or aged balance due.

(7)
"Director" means the director of licensing.

(8)
"Client" or "customer" means any person authorizing or
employing a collection agency to collect a claim.

(9)
"Licensee" means any person licensed under this chapter.

(10)
"Board" means the Washington state collection agency board.

(11)
"Debtor" means any person owing or alleged to owe a claim.

(12)
"Commercial claim" means any obligation for payment of money or thing
of value arising out of any agreement or contract, express or implied, where
the transaction which is the subject of the agreement or contract is not
primarily for personal, family, or household purposes, whether or not such
obligation has been reduced to judgment.

Sec.
2. RCW
19.16.250 and 1983 c 107 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

No
licensee or employee of a licensee shall:

(1)
Directly or indirectly aid or abet any unlicensed person to engage in business
as a collection agency in this state or receive compensation from such
unlicensed person: PROVIDED, That nothing in this chapter shall prevent a
licensee from accepting, as forwardee, claims for collection from a collection
agency or attorney whose place of business is outside the state.

(2)
Collect or attempt to collect a claim by the use of any means contrary to the
postal laws and regulations of the United States postal department.

(3)
Publish or post or cause to be published or posted, any list of debtors
commonly known as "bad debt lists" or threaten to do so. For
purposes of this chapter, a "bad debt list" means any list of natural
persons alleged to fail to honor their lawful debts. However, nothing herein
shall be construed to prohibit a licensee from communicating to its customers
or clients by means of a coded list, the existence of a check dishonored
because of insufficient funds, not sufficient funds or closed account by the
financial institution servicing the debtor's checking account: PROVIDED, That
the debtor's identity is not readily apparent: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the
licensee complies with the requirements of subsection (9)(e) of this section.

(4)
Have in his possession or make use of any badge, use a uniform of any law
enforcement agency or any simulation thereof, or make any statements which might
be construed as indicating an official connection with any federal, state,
county, or city law enforcement agency, or any other governmental agency, while
engaged in collection agency business.

(5)
Perform any act or acts, either directly or indirectly, constituting the
practice of law.

(6)
Advertise for sale or threaten to advertise for sale any claim as a means of
endeavoring to enforce payment thereof or agreeing to do so for the purpose of
soliciting claims, except where the licensee has acquired claims as an assignee
for the benefit of creditors or where the licensee is acting under court order.

(7)
Use any name while engaged in the making of a demand for any claim other than
the name set forth on his or its current license issued hereunder.

(8)
Give or send to any debtor or cause to be given or sent to any debtor, any
notice, letter, message, or form which represents or implies that a claim
exists unless it shall indicate in clear and legible type:

(a)
The name of the licensee and the city, street, and number at which he is
licensed to do business;

(b)
The name of the original creditor to whom the debtor owed the claim if such
name is known to the licensee or employee: PROVIDED, That upon written request
of the debtor, the licensee shall make a reasonable effort to obtain the name
of such person and provide this name to the debtor;

(c)
If the notice, letter, message, or form is the first notice to the debtor or if
the licensee is attempting to collect a different amount than indicated in his
or its first notice to the debtor, an itemization of the claim asserted must be
made including:

(i)
Amount owing on the original obligation at the time it was received by the
licensee for collection or by assignment;

(ii)
Interest or service charge, collection costs, or late payment charges, if any,
added to the original obligation by the original creditor, customer or assignor
before it was received by the licensee for collection, if such information is
known by the licensee or employee: PROVIDED, That upon written request of the
debtor, the licensee shall make a reasonable effort to obtain information on
such items and provide this information to the debtor;

(iii)
Interest or service charge, if any, added by the licensee or customer or
assignor after the obligation was received by the licensee for collection;

(iv)
Collection costs, if any, that the licensee is attempting to collect;

(v)
Attorneys' fees, if any, that the licensee is attempting to collect on his or
its behalf or on the behalf of a customer or assignor;

(vi)
Any other charge or fee that the licensee is attempting to collect on his or
its own behalf or on the behalf of a customer or assignor.

(9)
Communicate or threaten to communicate, the existence of a claim to a person
other than one who might be reasonably expected to be liable on the claim in
any manner other than through proper legal action, process, or proceedings
except under the following conditions:

(a)
A licensee or employee of a licensee may inform a credit reporting bureau of
the existence of a claim: PROVIDED, That if the licensee or employee of a
licensee reports a claim to a credit reporting bureau, the licensee shall upon
receipt of written notice from the debtor that any part of the claim is
disputed, forward a copy of such written notice to the credit reporting bureau;

(b)
A licensee or employee in collecting or attempting to collect a claim may
communicate the existence of a claim to a debtor's employer if the claim has
been reduced to a judgment;

(c)
A licensee or employee in collecting or attempting to collect a claim that has
not been reduced to judgment, may communicate the existence of a claim to a
debtor's employer if:

(i)
The licensee or employee has notified or attempted to notify the debtor in
writing at his last known address or place of employment concerning the claim
and the debtor after a reasonable time has failed to pay the claim or has
failed to agree to make payments on the claim in a manner acceptable to the
licensee, and

(ii)
The debtor has not in writing to the licensee disputed any part of the claim:
PROVIDED, That the licensee or employee may only communicate the existence of a
claim which has not been reduced to judgment to the debtor's employer once
unless the debtor's employer has agreed to additional communications.

(d)
A licensee may for the purpose of locating the debtor or locating assets of the
debtor communicate the existence of a claim to any person who might reasonably
be expected to have knowledge of the whereabouts of a debtor or the location of
assets of the debtor if the claim is reduced to judgment, or if not reduced to
judgment, when:

(i)
The licensee or employee has notified or attempted to notify the debtor in
writing at his last known address or last known place of employment concerning
the claim and the debtor after a reasonable time has failed to pay the claim or
has failed to agree to make payments on the claim in a manner acceptable to the
licensee, and

(ii)
The debtor has not in writing disputed any part of the claim.

(e)
A licensee may communicate the existence of a claim to its customers or clients
if the claim is reduced to judgment, or if not reduced to judgment, when:

(i)
The licensee has notified or attempted to notify the debtor in writing at his
last known address or last known place of employment concerning the claim and
the debtor after a reasonable time has failed to pay the claim or has failed to
agree to make payments on the claim in a manner acceptable to the licensee, and

(ii)
The debtor has not in writing disputed any part of the claim.

(10)
Threaten the debtor with impairment of his credit rating if a claim is not
paid.

(11)
Communicate with the debtor after notification in writing from an attorney
representing such debtor that all further communications relative to a claim
should be addressed to the attorney: PROVIDED, That if a licensee requests in
writing information from an attorney regarding such claim and the attorney does
not respond within a reasonable time, the licensee may communicate directly
with the debtor until he or it again receives notification in writing that an
attorney is representing the debtor.

(12)
Communicate with a debtor or anyone else in such a manner as to harass,
intimidate, threaten, or embarrass a debtor, including but not limited to
communication at an unreasonable hour, with unreasonable frequency, by threats
of force or violence, by threats of criminal prosecution, and by use of
offensive language. A communication shall be presumed to have been made for
the purposes of harassment if:

(a)
It is made with a debtor or spouse in any form, manner, or place, more than
three times in a single week;

(b)
It is made with a debtor at his or her place of employment more than one time
in a single week;

(c)
It is made with the debtor or spouse at his or her place of residence between
the hours of 9:00 p.m. and 7:30 a.m.

(13)
Communicate with the debtor through use of forms or instruments that simulate
the form or appearance of judicial process, the form or appearance of
government documents, or the simulation of a form or appearance of a
telegraphic or emergency message.

(14)
Communicate with the debtor and represent or imply that the existing obligation
of the debtor may be or has been increased by the addition of attorney fees,
investigation fees, service fees, or any other fees or charges when in fact
such fees or charges may not legally be added to the existing obligation of
such debtor.

(15)
Threaten to take any action against the debtor which the licensee cannot
legally take at the time the threat is made.

(16)
Send any telegram or make any telephone calls to a debtor or concerning a debt
or for the purpose of demanding payment of a claim or seeking information about
a debtor, for which the charges are payable by the addressee or by the person
to whom the call is made.

(17)
In any manner convey the impression that the licensee is vouched for, bonded to
or by, or is an instrumentality of the state of Washington or any agency or
department thereof.

(18)
Collect or attempt to collect in addition to the principal amount of a claim
any sum other than allowable interest, collection costs or handling fees
expressly authorized by statute, and, in the case of suit, attorney's fees and
taxable court costs. However, a licensee may collect or attempt to collect
collection costs and fees as authorized by a written agreement or contract,
between the client and the debtor, in the course of the collection of a
commercial claim.

(19) Procure from a debtor or collect or attempt to collect on any
written note, contract, stipulation, promise or acknowledgment under which a
debtor may be required to pay any sum other than principal, allowable interest,
except as noted in subsection (18) of this section, and, in the case of
suit, attorney's fees and taxable court costs.

---
END ---