BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9A.46.020 and 1997 c 105 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of harassment if:

(a)
Without lawful authority, the person knowingly threatens:

(i)
To cause bodily injury immediately or in the future to the person threatened or
to any other person; or

(ii)
To cause physical damage to the property of a person other than the actor; or

(iii)
To subject the person threatened or any other person to physical confinement or
restraint; or

(iv)
Maliciously to do any other act which is intended to substantially harm the person
threatened or another with respect to his or her physical or mental health or
safety; and

(b)
The person by words or conduct places the person threatened in reasonable fear
that the threat will be carried out.

(2)
A person who harasses another is guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable under
chapter 9A.20 RCW, except that the person is guilty of a class C felony if
either of the following applies: (a) The person has previously been convicted
in this or any other state of any crime of harassment, as defined in RCW
9A.46.060, of the same victim or members of the victim's family or household or
any person specifically named in a no-contact or no-harassment order; or (b)
the person harasses another person under subsection (1)(a)(i) of this section by
threatening to kill the person threatened or any other person, including the
publication or unintentional publication to a third party of a list of persons
the defendant is going to kill or identifies the persons on the list as
deserving to die.

(3)
The penalties provided in this section for harassment do not preclude the
victim from seeking any other remedy otherwise available under law.

(4)
Any person under the age of eighteen arrested on charges of a violation of
subsection (1)(a) of this section: (a) That occurs on public or private
elementary or secondary school premises, school provided transportation, or
areas of facilities being used exclusively by public or private schools for
school sponsored activities off the school grounds; or (b) that is directed at
a person acting under authority of the school district, including employees and
volunteers, shall be detained and confined by the arresting law enforcement
agency for a minimum of forty-eight hours unless released from custody by a
judicial authority after a determination regarding probable cause or sooner on
bail. A judge may not consider bail until an initial assessment has been made
and received by the court by the appropriate mental health professional.

Upon arrest of any person under the age of eighteen years on
charges of a violation of subsection (1) of this section, the arresting law
enforcement agency shall refer the arrested person to the county designated
mental health professional under chapter 71.34 RCW.

---
END ---