BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.315.020 and 1990 c 33 s 293 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"Change in the organization and extent of school districts" means the
formation and establishment of new school districts, the dissolution of
existing school districts, the alteration of the boundaries of existing school
districts, or all of them.

(2)
"Regional committee" means the regional committee on school district
organization created by this chapter.

(3)
"State board" means the state board of education.

(4)
"School district" means the territory under the jurisdiction of a
single governing board designated and referred to as the board of directors.

(5)
"Educational service district superintendent" means the educational
service district superintendent as provided for in RCW 28A.310.170 or his or
her designee.

(6)
"Master planned community" means a development that was or is to be
developed after January 1, 1985, pursuant to an integrated commercial and
residential development plan with over one thousand five hundred dwelling
units.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.315 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The governing body of a city, town, or county that includes a master planned
community, and where the master planned community is served by two school
districts, may call for a special election to be held. No person is entitled
to vote at such election unless that person is a qualified voter under the laws
in effect at the time of the election and has resided within the master planned
community for at least thirty days preceding the date of the election.

(2)
The special election shall be held on a special election date specified under
RCW 29.13.020.

(3)
The ballot proposition shall be in substantially the following form:

"TRANSFER OF TERRITORY(IES) WITHIN A MASTER PLANNED
COMMUNITY

Shall the territory(ies) described below and located
within . . . . . . Master Planned Community be
transferred from . . . . . . School District No.
. . . to . . . . . . School District
No. . . .?

(Provide description(s) of territory(ies) at issue)

9 YES 9
NO"

(4) If the ballot proposition is approved by a majority of at least
three-fifths of the voters voting in the election, the territory shall be
transferred from one school district to the other school district named in the
ballot proposition.

---
END ---