BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this title unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Board" means the K-20 educational network board.

(2)
"Network" means the K-20 telecommunications network under this
chapter.

(3)
"Network users" means those institutions of higher education, school
districts, educational service districts, public libraries, state agencies, and
others that use the network for distance education, data transmission, and
other uses permitted by the board.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
K-20 educational network board is created. The purpose of the board is to
ensure that the K-20 educational telecommunications network is operated in a
way that serves the broad public interest above the interest of any network
user.

(1)
The board shall comprise eleven voting and seven nonvoting members as follows:

(a)
Voting members shall include: A person designated by the governor; one member
of each caucus of the senate, appointed by the president of the senate; one
member of each caucus of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker
of the house of representatives; the superintendent of public instruction or
his or her designee; the executive director of the higher education
coordinating board or his or her designee; the executive director of the state
board for community and technical colleges or his or her designee; the chair of
the information services board, or his or her designee; the director of the
department of information services or his or her designee; and one citizen
member.

The
citizen member shall be appointed to a four-year term by the governor with the
consent of the senate. The governor shall appoint the citizen member of the
board by July 30, 1999.

(b)
Nonvoting members shall include one community or technical college president,
appointed by the state board for technical and community colleges; one
president of a public baccalaureate institution, appointed by the council of
presidents; the state librarian; one educational service district
superintendent, one school district superintendent, and one representative of
an approved private school, appointed by the superintendent of public
instruction; and one representative of independent baccalaureate institutions,
appointed by the Washington association of independent colleges and
universities.

(2)
The director of the department of information services or his or her designee
shall serve as chair of the board. A majority of the voting members of the
board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
board has the following powers and duties:

(1)
In cooperation with network partners and users and other interested parties, to
establish goals and measurable objectives for the network;

(2)
To ensure that the goals and measurable objectives of the network are the basis
for any decisions or recommendations regarding the technical development and
operation of the network;

(3)
To adopt, modify, and implement policies for network development, operation,
and expansion. Such policies may include but need not be limited to the
following issues: Quality of service; access to the network by recognized
organizations and accredited institutions that deliver educational programming,
including public libraries; prioritization of access to the system and the
sharing of technological advances; network security; identification and
evaluation of emerging technologies; future expansion or redirection of the
system; network fee structures; and costs for the development and operation of
the network;

(4)
To prepare and submit to the governor and the legislature a coordinated budget
for network development, operation, and expansion. The budget shall include
the recommendations of the board on any state funding requested for network
transport and equipment, hardware or software specific to the use of the
network, and proposed new network end site;

(5)
To adopt and monitor the implementation of a methodology to evaluate the
effectiveness of the network in achieving the goals and measurable objectives;

(6)
To approve modifications of the network design and implementation plan under
RCW 28D.02.020 and the phased technical plan under RCW 28D.02.070;

(7)
To authorize the release of funds from the K-20 technology account under RCW
28D.02.060 for network expenditures;

(8)
To appoint such advisory committees as appropriate; and

(9)
To adopt rules as necessary to implement this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
Actions of the K-20 telecommunications oversight and policy committee in effect
on June 30, 1999, shall remain in effect thereafter unless modified or repealed
by the board.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
information services board shall appoint a technical advisory committee to:
(1) Advise the K-20 educational network board on technical matters relating to
network design, deployment, operations, growth, and expansion, and (2)
undertake such duties as delegated by the information services board pursuant
to RCW 28D.02.070 and section 9 of this act. The technical advisory committee
shall include representation from K-12 and higher education, and the department
of information services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. (1)
The board is not intended to duplicate the statutory responsibilities of the
higher education coordinating board, the superintendent of public instruction,
the information services board, the state librarian, or the governing boards of
the institutions of higher education.

(2)
The board may not interfere in any curriculum or legally offered programming
offered over the network.

(3)
The coordination of telecommunications planning for institutions of higher
education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 remains the responsibility of the higher
education coordinating board under RCW 28B.80.600. The board may recommend but
not require revisions to the higher education coordinating board's
telecommunications plan.

(4)
The responsibility to review and approve standards and common specifications
for the network remains the responsibility of the information services board
under RCW 43.105.041.

(5)
The coordination of telecommunications planning for the common schools remains
the responsibility of the superintendent of public instruction. The board may
recommend but not require revisions to the superintendent's telecommunications
plans.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
citizen member of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW
43.03.250. The department of information services shall provide staffing to
the board.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. The
department of information services shall maintain, in consultation with the
network users and the board, the K-20 operations cooperative, which shall be
responsible for day-to-day network management, technical network status
monitoring, technical problem response coordination, and other duties as agreed
to by the department, the network users, and the board. Funding for the K-20
operations cooperative shall be provided from the education technology
revolving fund under RCW 28D.02.065.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. The
board shall establish by rule: (1) Conditions of network use, addressing technical
connections, operation, and management of the K-20 network; and (2) acceptable
use policies governing user eligibility for participation in the K-20 network,
acceptable uses of network resources, and procedures for enforcement of such
policies. The board shall set forth appropriate procedures for enforcement of
the conditions of use and acceptable use policies, that may include suspension
of network connections and removal of shared equipment for violations of
network conditions or policies. The information services board has
responsibility for the implementation of enforcement procedures relating to the
technical requirements of the conditions of use.

Sec.
10. RCW
28D.02.010 and 1996 c 137 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The K-20 telecommunications oversight and policy committee is established to:
Adopt policy goals and objectives for a K-20 telecommunications system, adopt a
network design and implementation plan, and authorize release of funds for network
purposes.

(2)
The duties of the committee shall include, but need not be limited to:

(a)
The adoption of system goals and objectives and timelines for submission of the
proposed plans under RCW 28D.02.030 through 28D.02.050 and 28D.02.070 by June
1, 1996;

(b)
The authorization of the construction and acquisition of a network backbone
upon its approval of phase one of a technical plan for the network as specified
in RCW 28D.02.070(1);

(c)
The preparation and subsequent updates of a network design and implementation
plan that includes locations to be served by the network, service delivery
specifications, a network governance structure, other appropriate components,
and a phased technical plan in accordance with RCW 28D.02.070(2). The plan
shall be adopted after considering the recommendations of the information
services board, the higher education coordinating board, and the superintendent
of public instruction;

(d)
The preparation of an implementation plan that prioritizes access to the
network backbone and other telecommunication components; and

(e)
The authorization of the release of funds for expenditures to construct the
network and distance education components.

(3)
By April 15, 1996, the department of information services shall convene the
committee. The committee shall include the following voting members or their
designees: The governor; one member from each caucus of the senate, appointed
by the president of the senate; one member from each caucus of the house of
representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; the
superintendent of public instruction; the chair of the higher education
coordinating board; and the chair of the information services board. On a
nonvoting basis, the committee shall include the following members or their
designees: One community college or technical college president, appointed by
the state board for community and technical colleges; one president of a public
baccalaureate institution, appointed by the council of presidents; the state
librarian; one educational service district superintendent, one school district
superintendent, and one representative of an approved private school, each
appointed by the superintendent of public instruction; one representative of
independent nonprofit baccalaureate institutions, appointed by the Washington
friends of higher education; and one representative of the computer or
telecommunications industry, appointed by the information services board. The
voting members must reach a consensus in approving the network design and
implementation plan. The department shall provide staff support to the
committee.

(4)
This section expires one month after the effective date of this act.

Sec.
11. RCW
28D.02.030 and 1996 c 137 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Within
the timelines specified by the committee, the higher education coordinating
board shall prepare and submit to the K-20 telecommunications oversight and
policy committee a proposed location plan of higher education delivery sites
proposed for connection to the K-20 education network. The development of the
plan shall begin immediately. For each site proposed for connection to the
network, the board shall recommend service delivery specifications that include,
but need not be limited to, an assessment of community needs and programming
and service levels that provide for effective use of network resources. The
board shall prioritize the implementation of the proposed location plan. The
board shall ensure that the proposed location plan adheres to the principles
described in RCW 28D.02.020 and the goals and objectives adopted by the
committee under RCW 28D.02.010.

This
section expires one month after the effective date of this act.

Sec.
12. RCW
28D.02.040 and 1996 c 137 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Within
timelines specified by the committee, the superintendent of public instruction
shall prepare and submit to the K-20 telecommunications oversight and policy
committee a proposed location plan of public education delivery sites proposed
for connection to the K-20 education network. The development of the plan
shall begin immediately. For each site proposed for connection to the network,
the superintendent shall approve service delivery specifications that include,
but need not be limited to, an assessment of community needs and programming
and service levels that provide for effective use of network resources. The
superintendent shall prioritize the implementation of the proposed location
plan. The superintendent shall ensure that the proposed location plan adheres
to the principles described in RCW 28D.02.020 and the goals and objectives
adopted by the committee under RCW 28D.02.010.

This
section expires one month after the effective date of this act.

Sec.
13. RCW
28D.02.050 and 1996 c 137 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Within
timelines specified by the committee, the higher education coordinating board
and the superintendent of public instruction shall recommend to the K-20
telecommunications oversight and policy committee network governance structure
that ensures participation by all members of the network and, to the extent
feasible, adheres to the goals and objectives adopted under RCW 28D.02.010.

This
section expires one month after the effective date of this act.

Sec.
14. RCW
28D.02.060 and 1997 c 180 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
K-20 technology account is hereby created in the state treasury. The
department of information services shall deposit into the account moneys
received from legislative appropriations, gifts, grants, and endowments for the
buildout and installation of the K-20 telecommunication system. The
account shall be subject to appropriation and may be expended solely for the
K-20 telecommunication system ((approved by the committee under RCW
28D.02.010)). Disbursements from the account shall be on authorization of
the director of the department of information services with approval of the ((committee
under RCW 28D.02.010)) board.

Sec.
15. RCW
28D.02.065 and 1997 c 180 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The education technology revolving fund is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All receipts from billings under subsection (2) of this section
must be deposited in the revolving fund. Only the director of the department of
information services or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from
the fund. The revolving fund shall be used ((only)) to pay for ((the
acquisition of)) network operations, transport, equipment, software,
supplies, and services, maintenance and depreciation of on-site data, and
shared infrastructure, and other costs incidental to the ((acquisition,))
development, operation, and administration of shared educational information
technology services, telecommunications, and systems. The revolving fund shall
not be used for the acquisition, maintenance, or operations of local ((networks
or)) telecommunications infrastructure or the maintenance or
depreciation of on-premises video equipment specific to a particular
institution or group of institutions.

(2)
The revolving fund and all disbursements from the revolving fund are subject to
the allotment procedure under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures. The department of information services shall, in
consultation with entities connected to the network under RCW 28D.02.070 and
subject to the review and approval of the office (([of])) of
financial management, establish and implement a billing structure ((to
assure that all network users pay an equitable share of the costs in relation
to their usage of the network)) for network services identified in
subsection (1) of this section.

(3)
The department shall charge those network users connected to the K-20
telecommunications network under RCW 28D.02.070 (1) and (2) an annual copayment
per unit of transport connection as determined by the board. This copayment
shall be deposited into the revolving fund to be used for the purposes set
forth in subsection (1) of this section. Current and future network users
shall prepare for future biennial budgets with the assumption that the
copayment shall continue to be in effect under the approval of the board. The
legislature shall appropriate to the revolving fund such moneys as necessary to
cover the remainder of the costs for transport, maintenance, and depreciation
of data equipment located at the individual institutions, maintenance and
depreciation of the network backbone, and services provided to the network
under section 8 of this act.

Sec.
16. RCW
28D.02.070 and 1996 c 137 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The
information services board shall prepare a technical plan for the design and
construction of the K-20 telecommunication system. The board shall ensure that
the technical plan adheres to the principles described in RCW 28D.02.020 and
the goals and objectives established by the ((committee under RCW 28D.02.010))
board. The board shall provide formal project approval and oversight
during the development and implementation of the K-20 telecommunications
network. In approving the plan, the board shall conduct a request for proposal
process. The technical plan shall be developed in phases as follows:

(1)
Phase one shall provide a telecommunication backbone connecting educational
service districts, the main campuses of public baccalaureate institutions, the
branch campuses of public research institutions, and the main campuses of
community colleges and technical colleges.

(2)
Phase two shall provide for (a) connection to the network by entities that
include, but need not be limited to: School districts, public higher education
off-campus and extension centers, branch campuses of community colleges and technical
colleges, and independent nonprofit baccalaureate institutions, as prioritized
by the (([K-20] telecommunications oversight and policy committee)) board;
and (b) distance education facilities and components for entities listed in ((subsections
(1) and (2) of)) this section.

(3)
Subsequent phases may include, but need not be limited to, connections to
public libraries, state and local governments, community resource centers, and
the private sector.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17.
Sections 1 through 9 of this act are each added to chapter 28D.02 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 18. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---