BE IT ENACTED BY
THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.46.113 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 166 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

Any county, city, or town which collects a tax on gambling
activities authorized pursuant to RCW 9.46.110 shall use the revenue from such
tax primarily for the purpose of enforcement of the provisions of this chapter
by the county, city, or town law enforcement agency. Of that portion
of revenue from a tax rate exceeding ten percent of the gross revenues from
social card games, seventy-five percent must be used solely to fund streets and
roads, and twenty-five percent must be used solely to fund compulsive gambling
education and awareness programs.

---
END ---