BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that antifreeze containing ethylene glycol poses a threat to
the health and well-being of children and animals. It further finds that a
phased-in ban on the use of ethylene glycol in antifreeze will improve the
general welfare of children and animals in the state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
After January 1, 2000, an antifreeze product sold in this state may not contain
more than sixty-seven percent ethylene glycol.

(2)
After January 1, 2002, an antifreeze product sold in this state may not contain
more than thirty-three percent ethylene glycol.

(3)
After January 1, 2003, an antifreeze product sold in this state may not contain
ethylene glycol.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The secretary of health is authorized to forbid the sale, and order the removal
from retail space, of any product the secretary believes to be in violation of
section 1 of this act.

(2)
The secretary of health is authorized to adopt rules concerning the sale of
antifreeze products under this section and section 1 of this act.

(3) A violation of this section or section 1 of this act, or the
rules adopted under this section or section 1 of this act, is a misdemeanor.

---
END ---