BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that improving the student to certificated instructional
staff ratio will give school districts additional, stable resources to support
student learning by providing the flexibility to lower class size and to
provide students with the individual attention they need to learn to the best
of their abilities and to reach the new and higher learning standards or to
provide additional staff to support student learning in other ways. The
legislature further finds that providing for additional staff will give school
districts the opportunity to provide a safer and more disciplined learning
environment. The legislature further intends to provide stability and improve
planning for school districts by placing improvements to the allocation formula
for kindergarten through third grade into statute. Further, the legislature
intends to improve the allocation formula based upon the number of students in
grades four and five and place those improvements into statute. By increasing
basic education funding the legislature is increasing the resources available
to local school districts while providing school districts with the flexibility
to best use those resources to hire certificated staff to improve learning in
the elementary grades.

Sec.
2. RCW
28A.150.260 and 1997 c 13 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
basic education allocation for each annual average full-time equivalent
student shall be determined in accordance with the following procedures:

(1)
The governor shall and the superintendent of public instruction may recommend
to the legislature a formula based on a ratio of students to staff for the
distribution of a basic education allocation for each annual average full-time
equivalent student enrolled in a common school. The distribution formula shall
have the primary objective of equalizing educational opportunities and shall
provide appropriate recognition of the following costs among the various
districts within the state:

(a)
Certificated instructional staff and their related costs;

(b)
Certificated administrative staff and their related costs;

(c)
Classified staff and their related costs;

(d)
Nonsalary costs;

(e)
Extraordinary costs of remote and necessary schools and small high schools,
including costs of additional certificated and classified staff; and

(f)
The attendance of students pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do
not reside within the servicing school district.

(2)(a)
This formula for distribution of basic education funds shall be reviewed
biennially by the superintendent and governor. The recommended formula shall
be subject to approval, amendment or rejection by the legislature. The formula
shall be for allocation purposes only. While the legislature intends that the
allocations for additional instructional staff be used to increase the ratio of
such staff to students, nothing in this section shall require districts to
reduce the number of administrative staff below existing levels.

(b)
The formula adopted by the legislature shall reflect the following ratios at a
minimum:

(i)
Forty-nine certificated instructional staff to one thousand annual average full-time
equivalent students enrolled in grades kindergarten through three plus an
additional five and three-tenths certificated instructional staff units for
grades kindergarten through three. However, a district shall only receive
allocations for staff above forty-nine certificated instructional staff to one
thousand full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through three if
the district documents an actual ratio equal to or greater than fifty-four and
three-tenths certificated instructional staff for one thousand full-time
equivalent students in grades kindergarten through three. For any school
district documenting a lower certificated instructional staff ratio, the
allocation shall be based on the higher of the district's actual certificated
instructional staff ratio for grades kindergarten through three or forty-nine
certificated instructional staff for one thousand full-time equivalent
students. Districts at or above fifty-one certificated instructional staff per
one thousand full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through three
may dedicate up to one and three-tenths of the fifty-four and three-tenths
funding ratio to employ additional classified instructional assistants assigned
to basic education classrooms in grades kindergarten through three. For
purposes of documenting a district's staff ratio under this subsection, funds
used by the district to employ additional classified instructional assistants
shall be converted to a certificated staff equivalent and added to the
district's actual certificated instructional staff ratio;

(ii)
Forty-eight and thirty-six one-hundredths certificated instructional staff
to one thousand annual full-time equivalent students enrolled in grades four
and five. Any funds provided for these additional two and thirty-six
one-hundredths certificated instructional staff units shall be allocated only
if the district documents an actual ratio equal to or greater than forty-eight
and thirty-six one-hundredths certificated instructional staff per thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades four and five. For any school district
documenting a lower certificated staff ratio, the allocation shall be based on
the higher of the district's actual fourth and fifth grade ratio or forty-six
certificated instructional staff per thousand. The staff may be used in grades
kindergarten through three if the district documents an actual average ratio of
forty-eight and thirty-six one-hundredths certificated instructional staff in
grades four and five;

(iii)
Forty-six certificated instructional staff to one thousand annual average
full-time equivalent students in grades ((four)) six
through twelve;

(((iii)))
(iv) Four certificated administrative staff to one thousand annual
average full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through
twelve; and

(((iv)))
(v) Sixteen and sixty-seven one-hundredths classified personnel to one
thousand annual average full-time equivalent students enrolled in grades
kindergarten through twelve.

(c)
In the event the legislature rejects the distribution formula recommended by the
governor, without adopting a new distribution formula, the distribution formula
for the previous school year shall remain in effect: PROVIDED, That the
distribution formula developed pursuant to this section shall be for state
apportionment and equalization purposes only and shall not be construed as
mandating specific operational functions of local school districts other than
those program requirements identified in RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.100. The
enrollment of any district shall be the annual average number of full-time
equivalent students and part-time students as provided in RCW
28A.150.350, enrolled on the first school day of each month and shall exclude
full-time equivalent students with disabilities recognized for the
purposes of allocation of state funds for programs under RCW 28A.155.010
through 28A.155.100. The definition of full-time equivalent student
shall be determined by rules of the superintendent of public instruction:
PROVIDED, That the definition shall be included as part of the superintendent's
biennial budget request: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That any revision of the present
definition shall not take effect until approved by the house appropriations
committee and the senate ways and means committee: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the
office of financial management shall make a monthly review of the
superintendent's reported full-time equivalent students in the common
schools in conjunction with RCW 43.62.050.

(3)(a)
Certificated instructional staff shall include those persons employed by a
school district who are nonsupervisory employees within the meaning of RCW
41.59.020(8): PROVIDED, That in exceptional cases, people of unusual
competence but without certification may teach students so long as a
certificated person exercises general supervision: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the
hiring of such classified people shall not occur during a labor dispute and
such classified people shall not be hired to replace certificated employees
during a labor dispute.

(b)
Certificated administrative staff shall include all those persons who are chief
executive officers, chief administrative officers, confidential employees,
supervisors, principals, or assistant principals within the meaning of RCW
41.59.020(4).

(4)
Each annual average full-time equivalent certificated classroom
teacher's direct classroom contact hours shall average at least twenty-five
hours per week. Direct classroom contact hours shall be exclusive of time
required to be spent for preparation, conferences, or any other nonclassroom
instruction duties. Up to two hundred minutes per week may be deducted from
the twenty-five contact hour requirement, at the discretion of the school
district board of directors, to accommodate authorized teacher/parent-guardian
conferences, recess, passing time between classes, and informal instructional
activity. Implementing rules to be adopted by the state board of education
pursuant to RCW 28A.150.220(4) shall provide that compliance with the direct
contact hour requirement shall be based upon teachers' normally assigned weekly
instructional schedules, as assigned by the district administration.
Additional record-keeping by classroom teachers as a means of accounting for
contact hours shall not be required. Waivers from contact hours may be
requested under RCW 28A.305.140.

Sec.
3. RCW
28A.150.260 and 1997 c 13 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
basic education allocation for each annual average full-time equivalent
student shall be determined in accordance with the following procedures:

(1)
The governor shall and the superintendent of public instruction may recommend
to the legislature a formula based on a ratio of students to staff for the
distribution of a basic education allocation for each annual average full-time
equivalent student enrolled in a common school. The distribution formula shall
have the primary objective of equalizing educational opportunities and shall
provide appropriate recognition of the following costs among the various
districts within the state:

(a)
Certificated instructional staff and their related costs;

(b)
Certificated administrative staff and their related costs;

(c)
Classified staff and their related costs;

(d)
Nonsalary costs;

(e)
Extraordinary costs of remote and necessary schools and small high schools,
including costs of additional certificated and classified staff; and

(f)
The attendance of students pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do
not reside within the servicing school district.

(2)(a)
This formula for distribution of basic education funds shall be reviewed
biennially by the superintendent and governor. The recommended formula shall
be subject to approval, amendment or rejection by the legislature. The formula
shall be for allocation purposes only. While the legislature intends that the
allocations for additional instructional staff be used to increase the ratio of
such staff to students, nothing in this section shall require districts to reduce
the number of administrative staff below existing levels.

(b)
The formula adopted by the legislature shall reflect the following ratios at a
minimum:

(i)
Forty-nine certificated instructional staff to one thousand annual average full-time
equivalent students enrolled in grades kindergarten through three plus an
additional five and three-tenths certificated instructional staff units for
grades kindergarten through three. However, a district shall only receive
allocations for staff above forty-nine certificated instructional staff to one
thousand full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through three if
the district documents an actual ratio equal to or greater than fifty-four and
three-tenths certificated instructional staff for one thousand full-time
equivalent students in grades kindergarten through three. For any school
district documenting a lower certificated instructional staff ratio, the
allocation shall be based on the higher of the district's actual certificated instructional
staff ratio for grades kindergarten through three or forty-nine certificated
instructional staff for one thousand full-time equivalent students. Districts
at or above fifty-one certificated instructional staff per one thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through three may dedicate
up to one and three-tenths of the fifty-four and three-tenths funding ratio to
employ additional classified instructional assistants assigned to basic
education classrooms in grades kindergarten through three. For purposes of
documenting a district's staff ratio under this subsection, funds used by the
district to employ additional classified instructional assistants shall be
converted to a certificated staff equivalent and added to the district's actual
certificated instructional staff ratio;

(ii)
Forty-eight and thirty-six one-hundredths certificated instructional staff
to one thousand annual full-time equivalent students enrolled in grades four
and five. Any funds provided for these additional two and thirty-six
one-hundredths certificated instructional staff units shall be allocated only
if the district documents an actual ratio equal to or greater than forty-eight
and thirty-six one-hundredths certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time
equivalent students in grades four and five. For any school district
documenting a lower certificated staff ratio, the allocation shall be based on
the higher of the district's actual fourth and fifth grade ratio or forty-six
certificated instructional staff per thousand. The staff may be used in grades
kindergarten through three if the district documents an actual average ratio of
forty-eight and thirty-six one-hundredths certificated instructional staff in
grades four and five;

(iii)
Forty-six certificated instructional staff to one thousand annual average
full-time equivalent students in grades ((four)) six
through twelve;

(((iii)))
(iv) Four certificated administrative staff to one thousand annual
average full-time equivalent students in grades kindergarten through
twelve; and

(((iv)))
(v) Sixteen and sixty-seven one-hundredths classified personnel to one
thousand annual average full-time equivalent students enrolled in grades
kindergarten through twelve.

(c)
In the event the legislature rejects the distribution formula recommended by
the governor, without adopting a new distribution formula, the distribution
formula for the previous school year shall remain in effect: PROVIDED, That
the distribution formula developed pursuant to this section shall be for state
apportionment and equalization purposes only and shall not be construed as
mandating specific operational functions of local school districts other than
those program requirements identified in RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.100. The
enrollment of any district shall be the annual average number of full-time
equivalent students and part-time students as provided in RCW
28A.150.350, enrolled on the first school day of each month and shall exclude
full-time equivalent students with disabilities recognized for the
purposes of allocation of state funds for programs under RCW 28A.155.010
through 28A.155.100. The definition of full-time equivalent student
shall be determined by rules of the superintendent of public instruction:
PROVIDED, That the definition shall be included as part of the superintendent's
biennial budget request: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That any revision of the present
definition shall not take effect until approved by the house appropriations
committee and the senate ways and means committee: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the
office of financial management shall make a monthly review of the
superintendent's reported full-time equivalent students in the common
schools in conjunction with RCW 43.62.050.

(3)(a)
Certificated instructional staff shall include those persons employed by a
school district who are nonsupervisory employees within the meaning of RCW
41.59.020(8): PROVIDED, That in exceptional cases, people of unusual
competence but without certification may teach students so long as a
certificated person exercises general supervision: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the
hiring of such classified people shall not occur during a labor dispute and
such classified people shall not be hired to replace certificated employees
during a labor dispute.

(b)
Certificated administrative staff shall include all those persons who are chief
executive officers, chief administrative officers, confidential employees,
supervisors, principals, or assistant principals within the meaning of RCW
41.59.020(4).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
Sections 1 and 2 of this act take effect September 1, 1999.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5.
Section 3 of this act shall take effect September 1, 2000. However, section 3
of this act shall not take effect if, by September 1, 2000, a law is enacted
stating that a school accountability and academic assessment system is not in
place.

---
END ---