BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW to read as follows:

RCW
84.36.381 notwithstanding, a person who otherwise qualifies under RCW 84.36.381
may apply for exemption by February 15th of the year in which the taxes are
payable if the person owns the property by February 15th and the property was
exempt from tax under RCW 84.36.381 in the previous year.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act applies to taxes levied for collection in 1999 and thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---