BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

"PROVISIONS
APPLICABLE TO ELECTRICAL INSTALLATIONS

AND TELECOMMUNICATIONS
INSTALLATIONS"

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
RCW 19.28.065 (as recodified by this act) through 19.28.390 (as recodified by
this act) apply throughout this chapter.

(2)
RCW 19.28.065 (as recodified by this act) through 19.28.390 (as recodified by
this act) constitute the subchapter "provisions applicable to electrical
installations and telecommunications installations."

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
Section 1 of this act and RCW 19.28.065, 19.28.070, 19.28.250, 19.28.310,
19.28.330, 19.28.340, 19.28.390, and 19.28.630 are codified or recodified
between RCW 19.28.065 (as recodified by this act) and 19.28.390 (as recodified
by this act).

Sec.
3. RCW
19.28.065 and 1988 c 81 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

There
is hereby created an electrical board, consisting of ((ten)) fourteen
members to be appointed by the governor with the advice of the director of
labor and industries as herein provided. It shall be the purpose and function
of the board to advise the director on all matters pertaining to the
enforcement of this chapter including, but not limited to standards of
electrical and telecommunications installation, minimum inspection
procedures, and the adoption of rules ((and regulations)) pertaining to
the electrical inspection division: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That no rules ((or
regulations)) shall be amended or repealed until the electrical board has
first had an opportunity to consider any proposed amendments or repeals and had
an opportunity to make recommendations to the director relative thereto. The
members of the electrical board shall be selected and appointed as follows:
One member shall be an employee or officer of a corporation or public agency
generating or distributing electric power; one member must be an employee or
officer of a facilities-based telecommunications service provider regulated by
the Washington state utilities and transportation commission; three members
shall be licensed electrical contractors: PROVIDED, That one of these members
may be a representative of a trade association in the electrical industry; one
member shall be a licensed telecommunications contractor; one member shall
be an employee, or officer, or representative of a corporation or firm engaged
in the business of manufacturing or distributing electrical and
telecommunications materials, equipment, or devices; one member shall be a
person with knowledge of the electrical industry, not related to the electrical
industry, to represent the public; three members shall be certified
electricians; ((and)) one member shall be a telecommunications
worker; one member shall be a licensed professional electrical engineer
qualified to do business in the state of Washington and designated as a
registered communications distribution designer; and one nonvoting member must
be a building official from an incorporated city or town with an electrical
inspection program established under RCW 19.28.360 (as recodified by this act).
The regular term of each member shall be four years: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, The
original board shall be appointed on June 9, 1988, for the following terms:
The first term of the member representing a corporation or public agency
generating or distributing electric power shall serve four years; two members
representing licensed electrical contractors shall serve three years; the
member representing a manufacturer or distributor of electrical equipment or
devices shall serve three years; the member representing the public and one
member representing licensed electrical contractors shall serve two years; the
three members selected as certified electricians shall serve for terms of one,
two, and three years, respectively; the member selected as the licensed
professional electrical engineer shall serve for one year. In appointing the
original board, the governor shall give due consideration to the value of
continuity in membership from predecessor boards. Thereafter, the governor
shall appoint or reappoint board members for terms of four years and to fill
vacancies created by the completion of the terms of the original members. When
new positions are created, the governor may appoint the initial members to the
new positions to staggered terms of one to three years. The governor shall
also fill vacancies caused by death, resignation, or otherwise for the
unexpired term of such members by appointing their successors from the same
business classification. The same procedure shall be followed in making such
subsequent appointments as is provided for the original appointments. The
board, at this first meeting shall elect one of its members to serve as chairman.
Any person acting as the chief electrical inspector shall serve as secretary of
the board during his or her tenure as chief state inspector. Meetings
of the board shall be held at least quarterly in accordance with a schedule
established by the board. Each member of the board shall receive compensation
in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in
accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 which shall be paid out of the
electrical license fund, upon vouchers approved by the director of labor and
industries.

Sec.
4. RCW
19.28.310 and 1997 c 58 s 844 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department has the power, in case of serious noncompliance with the
provisions of this chapter, to revoke or suspend for such a period as it
determines, any electrical or telecommunications contractor license or
electrical or telecommunications contractor administrator certificate
issued under this chapter. The department shall notify the holder of the
license or certificate of the revocation or suspension by certified mail. A
revocation or suspension is effective twenty days after the holder receives the
notice. Any revocation or suspension is subject to review by an appeal to the
board. The filing of an appeal stays the effect of a revocation or suspension
until the board makes its decision. The appeal shall be filed within twenty
days after notice of the revocation or suspension is given by certified mail
sent to the address of the holder of the license or certificate as shown on the
application for the license or certificate, and shall be effected by filing a
written notice of appeal with the department, accompanied by a certified check
for two hundred dollars, which shall be returned to the holder of the license
or certificate if the decision of the department is not sustained by the
board. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.
If the board sustains the decision of the department, the two hundred dollars
shall be applied by the department to the payment of the per diem and expenses
of the members of the board incurred in the matter, and any balance remaining
after payment of per diem and expenses shall be paid into the electrical
license fund.

(2)
The department shall immediately suspend the license or certificate of a person
who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social
and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order
((or a residential or visitation order)). If the person has continued
to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension,
reissuance of the license or certificate shall be automatic upon the
department's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health
services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the order.

Sec.
5. RCW
19.28.340 and 1935 c 169 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing
contained in this chapter will be construed to relieve from or lessen the
responsibility or liability of any person for injury or damage to person or
property caused by or resulting from any defect of any nature in any electrical
or telecommunications work performed by said person or in any electrical
or telecommunications equipment owned, controlled, installed, operated
or used by him or her; nor shall the state of Washington, or any
officer, agent, or employee thereof incur or be held as assuming any liability
by reason or in consequence of any permission, certificate of inspection,
inspection or approval authorized herein, or issued or given as herein
provided, or by reason of consequence of any things done or acts performed
pursuant to any provision of this chapter.

"PROVISIONS
APPLICABLE TO ELECTRICAL INSTALLATIONS"

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 101. RCW
19.28.005 (as recodified by this act) through 19.28.630 (as recodified by this
act) constitute the subchapter "provisions applicable to electrical
installations."

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 102. RCW
19.28.005, 19.28.015, 19.28.060, 19.28.120, 19.28.123, 19.28.125, 19.28.180,
19.28.190, 19.28.200, 19.28.210, 19.28.260, 19.28.300, 19.28.350, 19.28.360,
19.28.370, 19.28.510, 19.28.515, 19.28.520, 19.28.530, 19.28.540, 19.28.550, 19.28.560,
19.28.570, 19.28.580, 19.28.600, 19.28.610, and 19.28.620 are recodified
between RCW 19.28.005 (as recodified by this act) and 19.28.620 (as recodified
by this act).

Sec.
103. RCW
19.28.005 and 1993 c 275 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
definitions in this section apply throughout this ((chapter)) subchapter.

(1)
"Administrator" means a person designated by an electrical contractor
to supervise electrical work and electricians in accordance with the rules
adopted under this chapter.

(2)
"Board" means the electrical board under RCW 19.28.065.

(3)
"Chapter" or "subchapter" means ((chapter 19.28
RCW)) the subchapter, if no chapter number is referenced.

(4)
"Department" means the department of labor and industries.

(5)
"Director" means the director of the department or the director's
designee.

(6)
"Electrical construction trade" includes but is not limited to
installing or maintaining electrical wires and equipment that are used for
light, heat, or power and installing and maintaining remote control, signaling,
power limited, or communication circuits or systems.

(7)
"Electrical contractor" means a person, firm, partnership,
corporation, or other entity that offers to undertake, undertakes, submits a bid
for, or does the work of installing or maintaining wires or equipment that
convey electrical current.

(8)
"Equipment" means any equipment or apparatus that directly uses,
conducts, or is operated by electricity but does not mean plug-in household
appliances.

(9)
"Industrial control panel" means a factory-wired or user-wired
assembly of industrial control equipment such as motor controllers, switches,
relays, power supplies, computers, cathode ray tubes, transducers, and
auxiliary devices. The panel may include disconnect means and motor branch
circuit protective devices.

(10)
"Journeyman electrician" means a person who has been issued a
journeyman electrician certificate of competency by the department.

(11)
"Specialty electrician" means a person who has been issued a
specialty electrician certificate of competency by the department.

"PROVISIONS
APPLICABLE TO TELECOMMUNICATIONS INSTALLATIONS"

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 201.
Sections 203 through 219 of this act constitute the subchapter "provisions
applicable to telecommunications installations."

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 202.
Sections 202 through 219 of this act are each added to chapter 19.28 RCW under
subchapter heading "provisions applicable to telecommunications
installations."

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 203. It is
the intent of the legislature to maintain public safety and consumer protection
while ensuring that businesses involved in telecommunications do not face
unnecessary obstacles in the performance of their business activities. It is
the further intent of the legislature that the delegation of authority to the
director and the board under chapter . . ., Laws of 2000 (this act)
be strictly limited to the minimum delegation necessary to administer the clear
and unambiguous directives under chapter . . ., Laws of 2000 (this
act), and strict compliance with chapter 1, Laws of 2000 (Initiative Measure
No. 695), when adopting any fees.

Therefore,
the electrical board and the department are directed to work cooperatively with
all business sectors to ensure that this chapter is administered in a
responsive and efficient manner, that administrative rules reflect the
provisions of this section, and in particular that small businesses do not face
unnecessary obstacles in the telecommunications marketplace.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 204. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this subchapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Telecommunications backbone cabling systems" means a system that
provides interconnections between telecommunications closets, equipment rooms,
and entrance facilities in the telecommunications cabling system structure.
Backbone cabling consists of the backbone cables, intermediate and main
cross-connects, mechanical terminations, and patch cords or jumpers used for
backbone to backbone cross-connection. Backbone cabling also includes cabling
between buildings.

(2)
"Board" means the electrical board under RCW 19.28.065 (as recodified
by this act).

(3)
"Department" means the department of labor and industries.

(4)
"Director" means the director of the department or the director's
designee.

(5)
"Telecommunications horizontal cabling systems" means the portions of
the telecommunications cabling system that extends from the work area
telecommunications outlet or connector to the telecommunications closet. The
horizontal cabling includes the horizontal cables, the telecommunications
outlet or connector in the work area, the mechanical termination, and
horizontal cross-connections located in the telecommunications closet.

(6)
"Telecommunications network demarcation point" means the point or
interconnection between the service provider's communications cabling, terminal
equipment, and protective apparatus and the customer's premises
telecommunications cabling system. The location of this point for regulated
carriers is determined by federal and state regulations. The carrier should be
contacted to determine the location policies in effect in the area.

(7)
"Telecommunications scope of work" means the work of a
telecommunications contractor. This includes the installation, maintenance,
and testing of telecommunications systems, equipment, and associated hardware,
pathway systems, and cable management systems, which excludes cable tray and
conduit raceway systems. The scope also includes installation of open wiring
systems of telecommunications cables, surface nonmetallic raceways designated
and used exclusively for telecommunications, optical fiber innerduct raceway,
underground raceways designated and used exclusively for telecommunications and
installed for additions or extensions to existing telecommunications systems
not to exceed fifty feet inside the building, and incidental short sections of
circular or surface metal raceway, not to exceed ten feet, for access or
protection of telecommunications cabling and installation of cable trays and
ladder racks in telecommunications service entrance rooms, spaces, or closets.

(8)
A "telecommunications structured cabling system" is the complete
collective configuration of cabling and associated hardware at a given site and
installed to perform specific telecommunications functions.

(9)
"Telecommunications administrator" means a person designated by a
telecommunications contractor to supervise the installation of
telecommunications systems in accordance with rules adopted under this chapter.

(10)
"Telecommunications closet" means a room for housing
telecommunications equipment, cable terminations, and cross-connect wiring that
serve that particular floor. The closet is the recognized transition point
between the backbone and horizontal cabling systems.

(11)
"Telecommunications contractor" means a person, firm, partnership,
corporation, or other entity that advertises, offers to undertake, undertakes,
submits a bid for, or does the work of installing or maintaining
telecommunications systems.

(12)
"Telecommunications service entrance room or space" means a room or
space used as the building serving facility in which the joining of
inter-building and intra-building backbone facilities takes place. The service
entrance room may also house electronic equipment serving any
telecommunications function.

(13)
"Telecommunications systems" means structured cabling systems that
begin at the demarcation point between the local service provider and the
customer's premises structured cabling system.

(a)
Telecommunications systems encompass all forms of information generation,
processing, and transporting of signals conveyed electronically or optically
within or between buildings, including voice, data, video, and audio.

(b)
Telecommunications systems include structured cabling systems, compatible
connecting hardware, telecommunications equipment, premises switching
equipment, infrared, fiber optic, radio-frequency, and other limited-energy
interconnections associated with telecommunications systems or appliances.

(c)
Telecommunications systems do not include horizontal cabling used for fire
protection signaling systems, intrusion alarms, access control systems, patient
monitoring systems, energy management control systems, industrial and
automation control systems, HVAC/refrigeration control systems, lighting
control systems, and stand-alone amplified sound or public address systems.

(d)
Telecommunications systems may interface with other building signal systems
including security, alarms, and energy management at cross-connection junctions
within telecommunications closets or at extended points of demarcation.
Telecommunications systems do not include the installation or termination of
premises line voltage service, feeder, or branch circuit conductors or equipment.

(14)
"Telecommunications worker" means a person primarily and regularly
engaged in the installation and/or maintenance of telecommunications systems,
equipment, and infrastructure as defined in this chapter.

(15)
"Telecommunications workstation" means a building space where the
occupant normally interacts with telecommunications equipment. The
telecommunications outlet in the work area is the point at which end-user
equipment plugs into the building telecommunications utility formed by the
pathway, space, and building wiring system.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 205. (1)
All installations of wires and equipment defined as telecommunications systems
are subject to the requirements of this subchapter. Installations shall be in
conformity with approved methods of construction for safety to life and
property. The national electrical code, approved standards of the
telecommunications industries association, the electronic industries
association, the American national standards institute, and other safety
standards approved by the department shall be evidence of approved methods of
installation.

(2)
This chapter may not limit the authority or power of any city or town to enact
and enforce under authority given by law in RCW 19.28.360 (as recodified by
this act), any ordinance, or rule requiring an equal, higher, or better
standard of construction and an equal, higher, or better standard of materials,
devices, appliances, and equipment than that required by this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 206. (1)
It is unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity
to advertise, offer to do work, submit a bid, engage in, conduct, or carry on
the business of installing or maintaining telecommunications systems without
having a telecommunications contractor license. Electrical contractors
licensed as general electrical (01) or specialty electrical (06) contractors
under chapter 19.28 RCW and their designated administrators qualify to perform
all telecommunications work defined in this chapter. Telecommunications
contractors licensed under this chapter are not required to be registered under
chapter 18.27 RCW. All telecommunications licenses expire twenty-four calendar
months following the day of their issue. A telecommunications contractor
license is not required for a licensed specialty electrical contractor to
perform telecommunications installations or maintenance integral to the
equipment or occupancy limitations of their electrical specialty. A telecommunications
contractor license is not required for persons making telecommunications
installations or performing telecommunications maintenance on their own
property or for regularly employed employees working on the premises of their
employer, unless on a new building intended for rent, sale, or lease.

(2)
Application for a telecommunications contractor license shall be made in
writing to the department accompanied by the required fee. The applications
shall state:

(a)
The name and address of the applicant. In the case of firms or partnerships,
the applications shall state the names of the individuals composing the firm or
partnership. In the case of corporations, the applications shall state the
names of the corporation's managing officials;

(b)
The location of the place of business of the applicant and the name under which
the business is conducted;

(c)
The employer social security number or tax identification number;

(d)
Evidence of workers' compensation coverage for the applicant's employees
working in Washington, as follows:

(i)
The applicant's industrial insurance account number issued by the department;

(ii)
The applicant's self-insurer number issued by the department; or

(iii)
For applicants domiciled in a state or province of Canada subject to an
agreement entered into under RCW 51.12.120(7), as permitted by the agreement,
filing a certificate of coverage issued by the agency that administers the
workers' compensation law in the applicant's state or province of domicile
certifying that the applicant has secured the payment of compensation under the
other state's or province's workers' compensation law;

(e)
The employment security department number; and

(f)
The state excise tax registration number.

(3)
The unified business identifier account number may be substituted for the
information required by subsection (2)(d), (e), and (f) of this section if the
applicant will not employ employees in Washington.

(4)
The department may verify the workers' compensation coverage information
provided by the applicant under subsection (2)(d) of this section including,
but not limited to, information regarding the coverage of an individual
employee of the applicant. If coverage is provided under the laws of another
state, the department may notify the other state that the applicant is
employing employees in Washington.

(5)
To obtain a telecommunications contractor license the applicant must designate
an individual who currently possesses a telecommunications administrator
certificate. To obtain an administrator's certificate an individual must pass
an examination as set forth in this chapter. Examination criteria will be
determined by the board.

(6)
No examination may be required of any applicant for an initial
telecommunications administrator certificate qualifying under this section.
Applicants qualifying under this section shall be issued an administrator
certificate by the department upon making an application and paying the
required fee. Individuals must apply before July 1, 2001, to qualify for an
administrator certificate without examination under this section. The board
shall certify to the department the names of all persons entitled to this
administrator certificate.

Prior
to July 1, 2001, bona fide registered contractors under chapter 18.27 RCW
engaged in the business of installing or maintaining telecommunications wiring
in this state on or before the effective date of this act may designate the
following number of persons to receive a telecommunications administrator
certificate without examination:

(a)
One owner or officer of a contractor, registered under chapter 18.27 RCW on or
before the effective date of this act, currently engaged in the business of
installing telecommunications wiring;

(b)
One employee, principal, or officer, with a minimum of two years experience
performing telecommunications installations, per registered telecommunication
contractor; and

(c)
One employee for each one hundred employees, or fraction thereof, with a
minimum of two years experience performing telecommunications installations.

(7)
The application for a contractor license shall be accompanied by a bond in the
sum of four thousand dollars with the state of Washington named as obligee in
the bond, with good and sufficient surety, to be approved by the department.
The bond shall at all times be kept in full force and effect, and any
cancellation or revocation thereof, or withdrawal of the surety therefrom,
suspends the license issued to the principal until a new bond has been filed
and approved as provided in this section. Upon approval of a bond, the
department shall, on the next business day, deposit the fee accompanying the
application in the electrical license fund and shall file the bond in the
office. The department shall, upon request, furnish to any person, firm,
partnership, corporation, or other entity a certified copy of the bond upon the
payment of a fee that the department shall set by rule. The fee shall cover
but not exceed the cost of furnishing the certified copy. The bond shall be
conditioned that the principal will pay for all labor, including employee
benefits, and material furnished or used upon the work, taxes and contributions
to the state of Washington, and all damages that may be sustained by any
person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity due to a failure of the
principal to make the installation or maintenance in accordance with this
chapter. In lieu of the surety bond required by this section the applicant may
file with the department a cash deposit or other negotiable security acceptable
to the department. If the applicant has filed a cash deposit, the department
shall deposit the funds in a special trust savings account in a commercial
bank, mutual savings bank, or savings and loan association and shall pay
annually to the depositor the interest derived from the account.

(8)
Any person, firm, or corporation sustaining any damage or injury by reason of
the principal's breach of the conditions of the bond required under this
section may bring an action against the surety named therein, joining in the
action the principal named in the bond; the action shall be brought in the
superior court of any county in which the principal on the bond resides or
transacts business, or in the county in which the work was performed as a
result of which the breach is alleged to have occurred; the action shall be
maintained and prosecuted as other civil actions. Claims or actions against
the surety on the bond shall be paid in full in the following order of
priority: (a) Labor, including employee benefits, (b) materials and equipment
used upon such work, (c) taxes and contributions due to the state, (d) damages
sustained by any person, firm, or corporation due to the failure of the
principal to make the installation in accordance with this chapter, or any
ordinance, building code, or regulation applicable thereto. However, the total
liability of the surety on any bond may not exceed the sum of four thousand
dollars, and the surety on the bond may not be liable for monetary penalties.
Any action shall be brought within one year from the completion of the work in
the performance of which the breach is alleged to have occurred. The surety
shall mail a conformed copy of the judgment against the bond to the department
within seven days. In the event that a cash or securities deposit has been
made in lieu of the surety bond, and in the event of a judgment being entered
against the depositor and deposit, the director shall upon receipt of a
certified copy of a final judgment, pay the judgment from the deposit.

(9)
The department shall issue a telecommunications contractor license to
applicants meeting all of the requirements of this chapter applicable to
electrical and telecommunications installations. The provisions of this
chapter relating to the licensing of any person, firm, partnership,
corporation, or other entity including the requirement of a bond with the state
of Washington named as obligee and the collection of a fee for that bond, are
exclusive, and no political subdivision of the state of Washington may require
or issue any licenses or bonds or charge any fee for the same or a similar
purpose.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 207. (1)
Each applicant for a telecommunications contractor license shall designate a
supervisory employee or member of the firm to take the administrator's
examination. This person shall be designated as administrator under the
contractor's license and must be a full-time supervisory employee of the
applicant. No person may qualify as administrator for more than one
contractor. If the relationship of the administrator with the
telecommunications contractor is terminated, the contractor's license is void
within ninety days unless another administrator is qualified by the board.
However, if the administrator dies, the contractor's license is void within one
hundred eighty days unless another administrator is qualified by the board.

(2)
A certificate issued under this section is valid for two years from the nearest
birthdate of the administrator, unless revoked or suspended, and is
nontransferable. The certificate may be renewed for a two-year period without
examination by appropriate application unless the certificate has been revoked,
suspended, or not renewed within ninety days after the expiration date. If the
certificate is not renewed before the expiration date, the individual shall pay
twice the usual fee. A person may take the administrator's test as many times
as necessary to pass, without limit.

(3)
The administrator shall:

(a)
Be a member of the firm or a supervisory employee and shall be available during
working hours to carry out the duties of an administrator under this section;

(b)
Ensure that all telecommunications work complies with the telecommunication
installation laws and rules;

(c)
Ensure proper permits are required and inspections made;

(d)
See that corrective notices issued by an inspecting authority are complied
with; and

(e)
Notify the department in writing within ten days if the administrator
relationship is terminated with the telecommunications contractor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 208. It is
the purpose and function of the board to establish and administer written
examinations for telecommunications administrators' certificates. Examinations
shall be designed to reasonably ensure that telecommunications administrators'
certificate holders are competent to engage in and supervise the work regulated
under this subchapter and their respective licenses. The examinations shall
include questions to assure proper safety and protection for the general
public. The department, with the consent of the board, is permitted to enter
into a contract with a professional testing agency to develop, administer, and
score these examinations. The fee for the examination may be set by the
department in its contract with the professional testing agency. The
department, may direct that the applicant pay the fee to the professional
testing agency. The fee shall cover but not exceed the costs of preparing and
administering the examination.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 209. (1)
The director and the officials of all incorporated cities and towns where
electrical inspections are required by local ordinances, allowed by RCW
19.28.360 (as recodified by this act), may require by local ordinance the
enforcement of this subchapter in their respective jurisdictions. If an
incorporated city or town elects to enforce this subchapter, the city or town
has the power and shall enforce the provisions of this subchapter.

(2)
The director, through the chief electrical inspector and other inspectors
appointed under RCW 19.28.070 (as recodified by this act), shall enforce this
chapter. Compliance enforcement may be performed by contractor compliance
inspectors appointed under chapter 18.27 RCW. The expenses of the director and
the salaries and expenses of state inspectors incurred in carrying out the
provisions of this chapter shall be paid entirely out of the electrical license
fund, on vouchers approved by the director.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 210.
Disputes arising under this chapter regarding whether any city or town's
telecommunications rules, regulations, or ordinances are equal to the rules
adopted by the department shall be resolved by arbitration. The department
shall appoint two members of the board to serve on the arbitration panel, and
the city or town shall appoint two persons to serve on the arbitration panel.
These four persons shall choose a fifth person to serve. If the four persons
cannot agree on a fifth person, the presiding judge of the superior court of
the county in which the city or town is located shall choose a fifth person. A
decision of the arbitration panel may be appealed to the superior court of the
county in which the city or town is located within thirty days after the date
the panel issues its final decision.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 211. (1)
The director shall require permits and require an inspector to inspect all
installations of telecommunications systems on the customer side of the network
demarcation point for projects greater than ten outlets. However:

(a)
All projects penetrating fire barriers, passing through hazardous locations and
all backbone installations regardless of size shall be inspected;

(b)
All installations in single-family residences, duplex residences, and
horizontal cabling systems within apartment residential units, including
cooperatives and condominiums, do not require permits or inspections;

(c)
No permits or inspections may be required for installation or replacement of
cord and plug connected telecommunications equipment or for patch cord and
jumper cross-connected equipment;

(d)
The chief electrical inspector may allow a building owner or licensed
electrical/telecommunications contractor to apply for annual permitting and
regularly scheduled inspection of telecommunications installations made by
licensed electrical/telecommunications contractors or the building owner for
large commercial and industrial installations where:

(i)
The building owner or licensed electrical/telecommunications contractor has a
full-time telecommunications maintenance staff or a yearly maintenance contract
with a licensed electrical/telecommunications contractor;

(ii)
The permit is purchased before beginning any telecommunications work; and

(iii)
The building owner or licensed electrical/telecommunications contractor assumes
responsibility for correcting all installation deficiencies.

(2)
Upon request, the department shall make the required inspection within
forty-eight hours. The forty-eight hour period excludes holidays, Saturdays,
and Sundays.

(3)
A written report of the inspection, which plainly and clearly states any
corrections or changes required, shall be made by the inspector. A copy of the
report shall be furnished to the person or entity doing the installation work,
and a copy shall be filed by the department.

(4)
Whenever the installation of any telecommunications cabling and associated
hardware is not in accordance with this chapter, or is in such a condition as
to be dangerous to life or property, the person, firm, partnership,
corporation, or other entity owning, using, or operating it shall be notified
by the department and shall within fifteen working days, or such further
reasonable time as may upon request be granted, make such repairs and changes
as are required to remove the danger to life or property and to make it conform
to this chapter. The director, through the inspector, is empowered to
disconnect or order the discontinuance of the telecommunications cabling or
electrical service to conductors or equipment that are found to be in a
dangerous or unsafe condition and not in accordance with this chapter. Upon
making a disconnection, the inspector shall attach a notice stating that the
conductors have been found dangerous to life or property and are not in
accordance with this chapter. It is unlawful for any person to reconnect such
defective conductors or equipment without the approval of the department, and
until the conductors and equipment have been placed in a safe and secure
condition that complies with this chapter.

(5)
The director, through the electrical inspector, has the right during reasonable
hours to enter into and upon any building or premises in the discharge of his
or her official duties related to permitting activities for the purpose of
making any inspection or test of the installation of new or altered
telecommunications systems contained in or on the buildings or premises. No
telecommunications cabling subject to this chapter may be concealed until it
has been approved by the inspector making the inspection. At the time of the
inspection, wiring or equipment subject to this chapter must be sufficiently
accessible to permit the inspector to verify installation conformance with the
adopted codes and any other requirements of this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 212. (1)
It is unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity
to install or maintain any telecommunications cabling and associated hardware
in violation of this chapter. When the interpretation and application of the
installation or maintenance standards provided for in this chapter are in
dispute or in doubt, the board shall, upon application of any interested
person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity, determine the methods
of installation or maintenance of the cabling materials and hardware to be used
in the case submitted for its decision.

(2)
Any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity desiring a decision
of the board under this section shall, in writing, notify the director of such
desire and shall accompany the notice with a certified check payable to the
department in the sum of two hundred dollars. The notice shall specify the
ruling or interpretation desired and the contention of the person, firm,
partnership, corporation, or other entity as to the proper interpretation or
application on the question on which a decision is desired. If the board
determines that the contention of the applicant for a decision was proper, the
two hundred dollars shall be returned to the applicant; otherwise it shall be
used in paying the expenses and per diem of the members of the board in
connection with the matter. Any portion of the two hundred dollars not used in
paying the per diem and expenses of the board in the case shall be paid into
the electrical license fund.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 213. Any
person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity violating any of the
provisions of this chapter may be assessed a penalty of not less than one
hundred dollars or more than ten thousand dollars per violation. The
department, after consulting with the board and receiving the board's
recommendations, shall set by rule a schedule of penalties for violating this
chapter. The department shall notify the person, firm, partnership,
corporation, or other entity violating any of these provisions of the amount of
the penalty and of the specific violation. The notice shall be sent by
certified mail, return receipt requested, to the last known address of the
assessed party. Penalties are subject to review by an appeal to the board.
The filing of an appeal stays the effect of the penalty until the board makes
its decision. The appeal shall be filed within twenty days after notice of the
penalty is given to the assessed party, and shall be made by filing a written
notice of appeal with the department. The notice shall be accompanied by a
certified check for two hundred dollars, that shall be returned to the assessed
party if the decision of the department is not sustained by the board. If the
board sustains the decision of the department, the two hundred dollars shall be
applied by the department to the payment of the per diem and expenses of the members
of the board incurred in the matter, and any balance remaining after payment of
per diem and expenses shall be paid into the electrical license fund. The
hearing and review procedures shall be conducted in accordance with chapter
34.05 RCW. The board shall assign its hearings to an administrative law judge
to conduct the hearing and issue a proposed decision and order. The board
shall be allowed a minimum of twenty days to review a proposed decision and
shall issue its decision no later than the next regularly scheduled board
meeting.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 214. (1)
At the time of licensing and subsequent relicensing, the applicant shall
furnish insurance or financial responsibility in the form of an assigned
account in the amount of twenty thousand dollars for injury or damages to
property, fifty thousand dollars for injury or damage including death to any
one person, and one hundred thousand dollars for injury or damage including
death to more than one person, or financial responsibility to satisfy these
amounts.

(2)
Failure to maintain insurance or financial responsibility relative to the
contractor's activities is cause to suspend or deny the contractor's license.

(3)(a)
Proof of financial responsibility authorized in this section may be given by
providing, in the amount required by subsection (1) of this section, an
assigned account acceptable to the department. The assigned account shall be
held by the department to satisfy any execution on a judgment issued against the
contractor for damage to property or injury or death to any person occurring in
the contractor's contracting operation, according to the provisions of the
assigned account agreement. The department shall have no liability for payment
in excess of the amount of the assigned account.

(b)
The assigned account filed with the director as proof of financial
responsibility shall be canceled three years after:

(i)
The contractor's license has expired or been revoked;

(ii)
The contractor has furnished proof of insurance as required by subsection (1)
of this section; or

(iii)
No legal action has been instituted against the contractor or on the account at
the end of the three-year period.

(c)
If a contractor chooses to file an assigned account as authorized in this
section, the contractor shall, on a contracting project, notify each person
with whom the contractor enters into a contract or to whom the contractor
submits a bid, that the contractor has filed an assigned account in lieu of
insurance and that recovery from the account for any claim against the
contractor for property damage or personal injury or death occurring on the
project requires the claimant to obtain a court judgment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 215.
Individual worker certification is not required for work under this
subchapter. This subchapter does not preclude any person performing
telecommunications work from obtaining a limited energy credit towards an
electrical certificate of competency if they otherwise meet the certification
requirements under this chapter that are applicable to electrical
installations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 216. No
person, firm, or corporation engaging in or conducting or carrying on the
business of telecommunications installation shall be entitled to commence or
maintain any suit or action in any court of this state pertaining to any such
work or business, without alleging and proving that such person, firm or
corporation held, at the time of commencing and performing such work, an
unexpired, unrevoked, and unsuspended license issued under this subchapter; and
no city or town requiring by ordinance or regulation a permit for inspection or
installation of such telecommunications installation work, shall issue such
permit to any person, firm or corporation not holding such license.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 217. It is
unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity to
install or maintain telecommunications equipment not in accordance with this
subchapter. In cases where the interpretation and application of the
installation or maintenance standards under this subchapter are in dispute or
in doubt, the board shall, upon application of any interested person, firm,
partnership, corporation, or other entity, determine the methods of
installation or maintenance or the materials, devices, appliances, or equipment
to be used in the particular case submitted for its decision.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 218. Any
person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity desiring a decision of
the board pursuant to section 217 of this act shall, in writing, notify the
director of such desire and shall accompany the notice with a certified check
payable to the department in the sum of two hundred dollars. The notice shall
specify the ruling or interpretation desired and the contention of the person,
firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity as to the proper interpretation
or application on the question on which a decision is desired. If the board
determines that the contention of the applicant for a decision was proper, the
two hundred dollars shall be returned to the applicant; otherwise it shall be
used in paying the expenses and per diem of the members of the board in
connection with the matter. Any portion of the two hundred dollars not used in
paying the per diem and expenses of the board in the case shall be paid into
the electrical license fund.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 219. (1)
The director may adopt rules, make specific decisions, orders, and rulings,
including demands and findings, and take other necessary action for the
implementation and enforcement of this subchapter after consultation with the
board and receiving the board's recommendations. In the administration of this
subchapter the department shall not enter any controversy arising over work
assignments with respect to the trades involved in the construction industry.

(2)
Compliance with the rules adopted under subsection (1) of this section is prima
facie evidence of compliance with the subchapter. Copies of all rules shall be
maintained by the department and made available upon request.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 301. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302. The
sum of one million four hundred eight thousand dollars, or as much thereof as
may be necessary, is appropriated from the electrical license account to the
department of labor and industries for the biennium year ending June 30, 2001,
to carry out the purposes of this act.

---
END ---