BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
90.03.380 and 1997 c 442 s 801 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The right to the use of water which has been applied to a beneficial use in the
state shall be and remain appurtenant to the land or place upon which the same
is used: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the right may be transferred to another or to
others and become appurtenant to any other land or place of use without loss of
priority of right theretofore established if such change can be made without
detriment or injury to existing rights. The point of diversion of water for
beneficial use or the purpose of use may be changed, if such change can be made
without detriment or injury to existing rights. A change in the place of use,
point of diversion, and/or purpose of use of a water right to enable irrigation
of additional acreage or the addition of new uses may be permitted if such
change results in no increase in the annual consumptive quantity of water used
under the water right. For purposes of this section, "annual consumptive
quantity" means the estimated or actual annual amount of water diverted
pursuant to the water right, reduced by the estimated annual amount of return
flows, averaged over the most recent five-year period of continuous beneficial
use of the water right. Before any transfer of such right to use water or
change of the point of diversion of water or change of purpose of use can be
made, any person having an interest in the transfer or change, shall file a
written application therefor with the department, and the application shall not
be granted until notice of the application is published as provided in RCW
90.03.280. A change from one agricultural use to another agricultural use
does not constitute a change in the purpose of use. If it shall appear
that such transfer or such change may be made without injury or detriment to
existing rights, the department shall issue to the applicant a certificate in
duplicate granting the right for such transfer or for such change of point of
diversion or of use. The certificate so issued shall be filed and be made a
record with the department and the duplicate certificate issued to the
applicant may be filed with the county auditor in like manner and with the same
effect as provided in the original certificate or permit to divert water.

(2)
If an application for change proposes to transfer water rights from one
irrigation district to another, the department shall, before publication of
notice, receive concurrence from each of the irrigation districts that such
transfer or change will not adversely affect the ability to deliver water to
other landowners or impair the financial integrity of either of the districts.

(3)
A change in place of use by an individual water user or users of water provided
by an irrigation district need only receive approval for the change from the
board of directors of the district if the use of water continues within the
irrigation district, and when water is provided by an irrigation entity that is
a member of a board of joint control created under chapter 87.80 RCW, approval
need only be received from the board of joint control if the use of water
continues within the area of jurisdiction of the joint board and the change can
be made without detriment or injury to existing rights.

(4)
This section shall not apply to trust water rights acquired by the state
through the funding of water conservation projects under chapter 90.38 RCW or
RCW 90.42.010 through 90.42.070.

(5) "Agricultural use" as used in subsection (1) of
this section means the use of water for commercial production of an
agricultural commodity including horticultural, viticultural, floricultural,
vegetable, animal forage crop, milk, or other livestock products. The term
also includes those normal uses of water on a farm necessary to produce such
agricultural commodities.

---
END ---