BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the current practice of providing health care premium
subsidies for retired or disabled school and state employees does not provide
the fairness or certainty necessary for family financial planning. In
addition, the current system makes it difficult for the legislature to obtain
the accurate and timely information necessary for appropriating funds.
Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to establish a method of
determining subsidy amounts based on actual costs that provides predictability
for budget purposes and fairness and certainty for families.

Sec.
2. RCW
41.05.085 and 1994 c 153 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Beginning
with the appropriations act for the ((1995-1997)) 2001-2003
biennium, the legislature shall establish as part of both the state employees'
and the school and educational service district employees' insurance benefit
allocation the portion of the allocation to be used to provide a subsidy,
determined under section 3 of this act, to reduce the health care insurance
premiums charged to retired or disabled school district and educational service
district employees, or retired state employees, who are eligible for parts A
and B of medicare. The amount of any premium reduction shall be established by
the board in the manner set forth under section 3 of this act, but shall
not result in a premium reduction of more than fifty percent. The board may
also determine the amount of any subsidy to be available to spouses and
dependents.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a)
Beginning January 1, 2002, and each January 1st thereafter, a subsidy shall be
provided to disabled or retired employees under RCW 41.05.085 as set forth in
(b) of this subsection.

(b)
The subsidy provided each January 1st shall be based on the average of the
actual costs from the preceding two years.

(c)
The subsidy calculated under (b) of this subsection for any fiscal year may
never be lower than the subsidy for the preceding fiscal year.

(2) In a manner prescribed by the authority, by rule, school
districts and educational service districts shall remit to the authority for
deposit into the public employees' and retirees' insurance account an amount
determined by the authority, by rule, for each part-time and full-time
employee.

---
END ---