BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
90.36.030 and 1929 c 138 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, it shall be
the duty of every person, firm, corporation or company having possession or
control of any artesian well, as provided in RCW 90.36.020, to securely cap the
same over on or before the fifteenth day of October in each and every year in
such manner as to prevent the flow or escape of water therefrom, and to keep
the same securely capped and prevent the flow or escape of water therefrom
until the fifteenth day of March next ensuing((; PROVIDED, HOWEVER,)).

(2)
It ((shall and may be)) is lawful for any such person, firm,
corporation or company to insert a three-quarters inch stop and waste cock in
the piping of such well, and to take and use water therefrom through such stop
and waste cock at any time for household, stock, or domestic purposes, but not
otherwise.

(3)
Any well completed into a confined aquifer shall be allowed to flow freely for
public uses if:

(a)
The well is constructed according to state law and agency rules pertaining to
well construction;

(b)
The well has a discharge rate not to exceed twelve gallons per minute;

(c)
The well is within the limits of a city operating under the optional municipal
code with a population of thirty-six thousand or more and located within a
county with a population of less than four hundred thousand that is west of the
crest of the Cascade mountains;

(d)
The well is owned, operated, and maintained by a recognized public body;

(e)
The operator of the well ensures the unused portion of the flow is piped from
the well head and discharged directly into a surface water body within the
limits of the city; and

(f)
The discharge does not allow for any degradation of water quality.

As
used in this subsection, "public body" means the state of Washington
or any agency, political subdivision, taxing district, or municipal or public
corporation thereof.

Sec.
2. RCW
90.44.110 and 1987 c 109 s 114 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No public ground waters that have been withdrawn shall be wasted without
economical beneficial use. Except as provided in subsections (2), (3), and
(4) of this section, the department shall require:

(a)
All wells producing waters which contaminate other waters to be plugged or
capped((. The department shall also require)); and

(b)
All flowing wells to be so capped or equipped with valves that the flow of
water can be completely stopped when the wells are not in use under the terms
of their respective permits or approved declarations of vested rights((.
Likewise, the department shall also require)); and

(c)
Both flowing and nonflowing wells to be so constructed and maintained as to
prevent the waste of public ground waters through leaky casings, pipes,
fittings, valves, or pumps‑-either above or below the land surface((:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That)).

(2)
The withdrawal of reasonable quantities of public ground water in
connection with the construction, development, testing, or repair of a well
shall not be construed as waste((; also, that)).

(3)
The inadvertent loss of ((such)) water owing to breakage of a pump,
valve, pipe, or fitting shall not be construed as waste if reasonable diligence
is shown by the permittee in effecting the necessary repair.

(4)
Any well completed into a confined aquifer shall be allowed to flow freely for
public uses if:

(a)
The well is constructed according to state law and agency rules pertaining to
well construction;

(b)
The well has a discharge rate not to exceed twelve gallons per minute;

(c)
The well is within the limits of a city operating under the optional municipal
code with a population of thirty-six thousand or more and located within a
county with a population of less than four hundred thousand that is west of the
crest of the Cascade mountains;

(d)
The well is owned, operated, and maintained by a recognized public body;

(e)
The operator of the well ensures the unused portion of the flow is piped from
the well head and discharged directly into a surface water body within the
limits of the city; and

(f)
The discharge does not allow for any degradation of water quality.

As
used in this subsection, "public body" means the state of Washington
or any agency, political subdivision, taxing district, or municipal or public
corporation thereof.

(5) In the issuance of an original permit, or of an
amendment to an original permit or certificate of vested right to withdraw and
appropriate public ground waters under the provisions of this chapter, the
department may, as in ((his)) its judgment is necessary, specify
for the proposed well or wells or other works a manner of construction adequate
to accomplish the provisions of this section.

---
END ---