BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds and declares that there is a need for a consistent and
enforceable standard for the payment to Washington state health care facilities
and health care providers of claims submitted to health plans after health care
services are provided to health plan members. The legislature finds that
Washington state health care facilities and health care providers have
experienced mounting delays in reimbursement for services provided.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
For the purposes of this section:

(a)
"Payer" means any group or individual disability insurance policy,
health care service contract, and health maintenance agreement, the department
of labor and industries, the health care authority, public employees benefit
board, the medical assistance administration of the department of social and
health services, and any self-insured health plan subject to the jurisdiction
of the state of Washington. "Payer" does not include short-term care,
long-term care, dental, vision, accident, fixed indemnity, disability income
contracts, civilian health and medical program for the uniform services
(CHAMPUS), 10 U.S.C. 55, limited benefit or credit insurance, coverage issued
as a supplement to liability insurance, insurance arising out of the workers'
compensation or similar law, automobile medical payment insurance, or insurance
under which benefits are payable with or without regard to fault and which is
statutorily required to be contained in any liability insurance policy or
equivalent self-insurance.

(b)
"Claim" means a request for payment for health care services that is
submitted to a payer by a provider in a written, electronic, or other
equivalent format.

(c)
"Clean claim" means the same as the medicare standard set forth in
Title XVIII of the social security act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395u(C)(2)(A) as it
exists on the effective date of this act, and shall be accepted as uniform
billing number 92 and health care financing administration number 1500 forms
that are completed accurately or their electronic equivalent or other formats
adopted by the national uniform billing committee. The clean claim may be
submitted by electronic transfer. A payer may not impose as a condition of
payment any requirements on a provider to modify the uniform billing form or
its content or submit additional claims forms. Denial of a claim must be
communicated to the provider and must include the specific reason why the claim
was denied which indicates reasonable compliance with this law, such as no
information received from the employer, provider, or enrollee. When the
legitimacy or appropriateness of the health care service is disputed, a payer
may request additional medical information that describes and summarizes the
diagnosis, treatment, and services rendered to the member or subscriber. When
necessary to determine eligibility for benefits or for determination of
coverage, a payer may obtain additional information from the provider or its
subscriber or member, the employer of the subscriber or member, or any other
nonprovider third party.

(d)
"Provider" means any health care facility or professional health care
practitioner acting within the scope of its licensure or certification.

(e)
"All claims" means claims that are clean and claims that are not
clean.

(2)(a)
For covered services rendered to members or enrollees, a payer shall pay
providers as soon as practical but subject to the following minimum standards:
(i) Ninety-five percent of the volume of clean claims shall be paid within
thirty days; and (ii) ninety-five percent of the volume of all claims shall be
paid or denied within sixty days.

(b)
The date of a claim is when the payer receives written or electronic notice of
the claim, in accordance with health care financing administration guidelines
as they exist on the effective date of this act. If a payer and provider have
agreed in writing to the submission of claims by a specific mode of
transmission, the payer shall calculate the time period beginning on the date
that the claim is received in the agreed-upon mode of transmission.

(3)
Any payer failing to pay a claim within the standards established under
subsection (2) of this section shall pay interest on such claims beginning with
the sixty-first day for all claims. The interest shall be assessed at the rate
of one percent per month, and shall be calculated monthly as simple interest
prorated for any portion of a month. The payer shall add the interest payable
to the amount of the unpaid claim without the necessity for a claim for
interest due to be made by the provider. Any interest owed to the provider by
the payer shall not be applied by the payer to an enrollee's deductible, copay,
coinsurance, or any similar obligation of the enrollee.

(4)
Providers or payers may seek enforcement of this section through the following
means, in addition to any other available to them through other laws:

(a)
Binding arbitration pursuant to the procedures in chapter 7.04 RCW. The
arbitrating authority shall order the payment of restitution, interest, and any
costs incurred by the party or parties initiating the investigation, including
costs of arbitration and reasonable attorneys' fees.

(c)
Providers or payers who determine that any provision of this section has been
violated may seek enforcement by the department of health who shall take action
in the name of the department to enforce the provisions of this section only
upon the request of a provider or payer. The department shall investigate the
alleged violation and, within thirty days, upon finding that a violation has
occurred, shall refer the matter to the office of administrative hearings for a
hearing under the provisions of chapter 34.12 RCW. The decision of the administrative
law judge shall be the final administrative decision. The administrative law
judge shall be authorized to order the payment of restitution, together with
interest and any costs incurred by the party or parties initiating the
investigation, including reasonable attorneys' fees, and the payment of the
reasonable costs incurred by the department in investigating the violation and
participating in the hearing.

(5)(a)
The department of health shall establish an oversight board composed of a
seven-member panel composed of three representatives from payers, three
representatives from providers, and one representative from the department of
health.

(b)
The board shall study trends and issues and make recommendations regarding
future legislative, regulatory, or private solutions which will promote timely
and accurate payment of health claims.

(c)
The board shall consider and provide recommendations to payers and providers
regarding electronic billing and billing standards and develop a standard and
common procedure for all claims to be electronically accepted by payers by
January 1, 2001. The board shall also monitor the activity of the federal
committees charged with developing and reviewing standard claims forms.

(6)
Every payer shall be responsible for ensuring that any person acting on behalf
of or at the direction of the payer or acting pursuant to payer standards or
requirements complies with this section.

(7)
This section does not apply to claims about which there is substantial evidence
of fraud or misrepresentation by providers or patients, or instances where the
payer has not been granted reasonable access to information under the
provider's control.

(8)
Neither a provider nor a payer shall be required to comply with this section if
the failure to comply is occasioned by any act of God, bankruptcy, act of a
governmental authority responding to an act of God or other emergency, or the
result of a strike, lockout, or other labor dispute.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---