BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A new
section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

Any
carrier that offers a health plan and any self-insured health plan subject to
the jurisdiction of Washington state shall designate a medical director who is
licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW.

Sec.
2. RCW
51.04.020 and 1994 c 164 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director shall:

(1)
Establish and adopt rules governing the administration of this title;

(2)
Ascertain and establish the amounts to be paid into and out of the accident
fund;

(3)
Regulate the proof of accident and extent thereof, the proof of death and the
proof of relationship and the extent of dependency;

(4)
Supervise the medical, surgical, and hospital treatment to the intent that it
may be in all cases efficient and up to the recognized standard of modern
surgery;

(5)
Issue proper receipts for moneys received and certificates for benefits accrued
or accruing;

(6)
Investigate the cause of all serious injuries and report to the governor from
time to time any violations or laxity in performance of protective statutes or
regulations coming under the observation of the department;

(7)
Compile statistics which will afford reliable information upon which to base
operations of all divisions under the department;

(8)
Make an annual report to the governor of the workings of the department;

(9)
Be empowered to enter into agreements with the appropriate agencies of other
states relating to conflicts of jurisdiction where the contract of employment
is in one state and injuries are received in the other state, and insofar as
permitted by the Constitution and laws of the United States, to enter into
similar agreements with the provinces of Canada; and

(10)
Designate a medical director who is licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW.

Sec.
3. RCW
51.14.030 and 1977 ex.s. c 323 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director may issue a certification that an employer is qualified as a
self-insurer when such employer meets the following requirements:

(1)
He or she has fulfilled the requirements of RCW 51.14.020.

(2)
He or she has submitted to the department a payroll report for the preceding
consecutive twelve month period.

(3)
He or she has submitted to the department a sworn itemized statement
accompanied by an independent audit of the employer's books demonstrating to
the director's satisfaction that the employer has sufficient liquid assets to
meet his or her estimated liabilities as a self-insurer.

(4)
He or she has demonstrated to the department the existence of the safety organization
maintained by him or her within his or her establishment that indicates a
record of accident prevention.

(5)
He or she has submitted to the department a description of the administrative
organization to be maintained by him or her to manage industrial insurance
matters including:

(a)
The reporting of injuries;

(b)
The authorization of medical care;

(c)
The payment of compensation;

(d)
The handling of claims for compensation;

(e)
The name and location of each business location of the employer; ((and))

(f)
The qualifications of the personnel of the employer to perform this service;
and

(g)
The designation of a medical director who is licensed under chapter 18.57 or
18.71 RCW.

Such
certification shall remain in effect until withdrawn by the director or
surrendered by the employer with the approval of the director. An employer's
qualification as a self-insurer shall become effective on the date of
certification or any date specified in the certificate after the date of
certification.

Sec.
4. RCW
74.09.050 and 1979 c 141 s 335 are each amended to read as follows:

The
secretary shall appoint such professional personnel and other assistants and
employees, including professional medical screeners, as may be reasonably
necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. The medical screeners
shall be supervised by one or more physicians who shall be appointed by the
secretary or his designee. The secretary shall appoint a medical director
who is licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

The administrator shall designate a medical director who is
licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW.

---
END ---