BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.20 RCW to read as follows:

The board of regents shall adjust the salaries of the university
police force simultaneous with and in like proportion as salary adjustments
provided for the Washington state patrol.

---
END ---