BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature declares that the decision to authorize house-banked social card
games has increased employment opportunities for Washington residents and led
to increased tax revenues for local governments. The legislature further
declares that its policy of exclusive state authority for the licensing and
regulation of gambling activities has served the state well, and has
significantly reduced the opportunity for, or likelihood of, corruption in the
operation of social card games. The legislature further declares that further
study on the gambling policy of the state is advisable.

---
END ---