BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
58.17.020 and 1995 c 32 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, unless the context or subject matter clearly requires
otherwise, the words or phrases defined in this section shall have the
indicated meanings.

(1)
"Subdivision" is the division or redivision of land into five or more
lots, tracts, parcels, sites, or divisions for the purpose of sale,
lease, or transfer of ownership, except as provided in subsection (6) of this
section.

(2)
"Plat" is a map or representation of a subdivision, showing thereon
the division of a tract or parcel of land into lots, blocks, streets and alleys,
or other divisions and dedications.

(3)
"Dedication" is the deliberate appropriation of land by an owner for
any general and public uses, reserving to himself or herself no other
rights than such as are compatible with the full exercise and enjoyment of the
public uses to which the property has been devoted. The intention to dedicate
shall be evidenced by the owner by the presentment for filing of a final plat
or short plat showing the dedication thereon; and, the acceptance by the public
shall be evidenced by the approval of such plat for filing by the appropriate
governmental unit.

A
dedication of an area of less than two acres for use as a public park may
include a designation of a name for the park, in honor of a deceased individual
of good character.

(4)
"Preliminary plat" is a neat and approximate drawing of a proposed
subdivision showing the general layout of streets and alleys, lots, blocks, and
other elements of a subdivision consistent with the requirements of this
chapter. The preliminary plat shall be the basis for the approval or
disapproval of the general layout of a subdivision.

(5)
"Final plat" is the final drawing of the subdivision and dedication
prepared for filing for record with the county auditor and containing all
elements and requirements set forth in this chapter and in local regulations
adopted under this chapter.

(6)
"Short subdivision" is the division or redivision of land into four
or fewer lots, tracts, parcels, sites, or divisions for the purpose of
sale, lease, or transfer of ownership((: PROVIDED, That)). However,
the legislative authority of any city or town may by local ordinance increase
the number of lots, tracts, or parcels to be regulated as short subdivisions to
a maximum of nine. The legislative authority of any county planning under
RCW 36.70A.040 that has adopted a comprehensive plan and development
regulations in compliance with chapter 36.70A RCW may by ordinance increase the
number of lots, tracts, or parcels to be regulated as short subdivisions to a
maximum of nine in any urban growth area.

(7)
"Binding site plan" means a drawing to a scale specified by local
ordinance which: (a) Identifies and shows the areas and locations of all
streets, roads, improvements, utilities, open spaces, and any other matters
specified by local regulations; (b) contains inscriptions or attachments
setting forth such appropriate limitations and conditions for the use of the
land as are established by the local government body having authority to
approve the site plan; and (c) contains provisions making any development be in
conformity with the site plan.

(8)
"Short plat" is the map or representation of a short subdivision.

(9)
"Lot" is a fractional part of divided lands having fixed boundaries,
being of sufficient area and dimension to meet minimum zoning requirements for
width and area. The term shall include tracts or parcels.

(10)
"Block" is a group of lots, tracts, or parcels within well defined
and fixed boundaries.

(11)
"County treasurer" shall be as defined in chapter 36.29 RCW or the
office or person assigned such duties under a county charter.

(12)
"County auditor" shall be as defined in chapter 36.22 RCW or the
office or person assigned such duties under a county charter.

(13)
"County road engineer" shall be as defined in chapter 36.40 RCW or
the office or person assigned such duties under a county charter.

(14)
"Planning commission" means that body as defined in chapter((s))
36.70, 35.63, or 35A.63 RCW as designated by the legislative body to perform a
planning function or that body assigned such duties and responsibilities under
a city or county charter.

(15)
"County commissioner" shall be as defined in chapter 36.32 RCW or the
body assigned such duties under a county charter.

(16)
"Conservation parcel" means a parcel or lot of any size and
configuration created specifically to conserve, preserve, or protect land in
its undeveloped state or to restore the value and benefits of developed land to
its undeveloped state. Lands which may be included within a conservation
parcel include critical areas as defined in RCW 36.70A.030(5), open space
areas, riparian areas, forest lands, agricultural lands, or other lands
identified by counties or cities pursuant to section 3 of this act as eligible
for inclusion in a conservation parcel.

Sec.
1. RCW
58.17.040 and 1992 c 220 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

The
provisions of this chapter shall not apply to:

(1)
Cemeteries and other burial plots while used for that purpose;

(2)
Divisions of land into lots or tracts each of which is one-one hundred
twenty-eighth of a section of land or larger, or five acres or larger if the
land is not capable of description as a fraction of a section of land, unless
the governing authority of the city, town, or county in which the land is
situated shall have adopted a subdivision ordinance requiring plat approval of
such divisions: PROVIDED, That for purposes of computing the size of any lot
under this item which borders on a street or road, the lot size shall be
expanded to include that area which would be bounded by the center line of the
road or street and the side lot lines of the lot running perpendicular to such
center line;

(3)
Divisions made by testamentary provisions, or the laws of descent;

(4)
Divisions of land into lots or tracts classified for industrial or commercial
use when the city, town, or county has approved a binding site plan for the use
of the land in accordance with local regulations;

(5)
A division for the purpose of lease when no residential structure other than
mobile homes or travel trailers are permitted to be placed upon the land when
the city, town, or county has approved a binding site plan for the use of the
land in accordance with local regulations;

(6)
A division made for the purpose of alteration by adjusting boundary lines,
between platted or unplatted lots or both, which does not create any additional
lot, tract, parcel, site, or division nor create any lot, tract, parcel, site,
or division which contains insufficient area and dimension to meet minimum
requirements for width and area for a building site; ((and))

(7)
A division made for the purpose of creating a conservation parcel according
to the requirements of section 3 of this act; and

(8)
Divisions of land into lots or tracts if: (a) Such division is the result of
subjecting a portion of a parcel or tract of land to either chapter 64.32 or
64.34 RCW subsequent to the recording of a binding site plan for all such land;
(b) the improvements constructed or to be constructed thereon are required by
the provisions of the binding site plan to be included in one or more
condominiums or owned by an association or other legal entity in which the
owners of units therein or their owners' associations have a membership or
other legal or beneficial interest; (c) a city, town, or county has approved
the binding site plan for all such land; (d) such approved binding site plan is
recorded in the county or counties in which such land is located; and (e) the
binding site plan contains thereon the following statement: "All
development and use of the land described herein shall be in accordance with
this binding site plan, as it may be amended with the approval of the city,
town, or county having jurisdiction over the development of such land, and in
accordance with such other governmental permits, approvals, regulations,
requirements, and restrictions that may be imposed upon such land and the
development and use thereof. Upon completion, the improvements on the land
shall be included in one or more condominiums or owned by an association or
other legal entity in which the owners of units therein or their owners'
associations have a membership or other legal or beneficial interest. This
binding site plan shall be binding upon all now or hereafter having any
interest in the land described herein." The binding site plan may, but
need not, depict or describe the boundaries of the lots or tracts resulting
from subjecting a portion of the land to either chapter 64.32 or 64.34 RCW. A
site plan shall be deemed to have been approved if the site plan was approved
by a city, town, or county: (i) In connection with the final approval of a
subdivision plat or planned unit development with respect to all of such land;
or (ii) in connection with the issuance of building permits or final
certificates of occupancy with respect to all of such land; or (iii) if not
approved pursuant to (i) and (ii) of this subsection (7)(e), then pursuant to
such other procedures as such city, town, or county may have established for
the approval of a binding site plan.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 58.17 RCW to read as follows:

A
county, city, or town may adopt by ordinance procedures for the creation of
conservation parcels as an exemption to the procedures required by this
chapter. The ordinance must:

(1)
Identify the types of land which may qualify for designation as conservation
parcels, including all lands specified in RCW 58.17.020(3) and any other lands
the county, city, or town determines to have environmental, ecological,
habitat, or natural resource value and to need conservation, preservation,
restoration, or protection;

(2)
Prohibit any residential, commercial, industrial, or active agricultural or
forestry uses on conservation parcels;

(3)
Require that any existing residential, commercial, industrial, or active
agricultural or forestry uses be abated and mitigated;

(4)
To the maximum extent practicable, require that any existing residential,
commercial, industrial, or other developments or improvements be removed and
that the land be restored prior to approval of the conservation parcel;

(5)
Limit noncommercial recreation and open space uses on conservation parcels to
those activities which will not alter the character of the land or impact the
environmental, ecological, habitat, or natural resource value of the land; and

(6)
Require that title to a conservation parcel be:

(a)
Held by a public agency for conservation, preservation, restoration, or
protection purposes;

(b)
Held by a nonprofit nature conservancy corporation or association as defined in
RCW 84.34.250 for conservation, preservation, restoration, or protection
purposes; or

(c)
Encumbered by a perpetual conservation easement in favor of either a public
agency or a nonprofit nature conservancy corporation or association as defined
in RCW 84.34.250.

---
END ---