BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Independent advisor" means a business, financial, or advisory firm
or person: (a) With knowledge and experience in connection with wholesale
energy markets and general business; (b) that is acting as an advisor to the
public utility district and does not control or own a majority interest in any
other party engaged in transactions with the public utility district to which
the advisor is rendering advice and which are made under this chapter; and (c)
whose compensation is not wholly based upon completion of any transaction or a
percentage of any transaction or series of transactions made under this
chapter.

(2)
"Wholesale electric public utility district" is a public utility
district that is not a full requirements customer of Bonneville power
administration and has elected to engage in wholesale electric activities under
this chapter and has implemented the measures described in section 2 of this
act.

(3)
"Wholesale power" means electric capacity or energy, or rights
thereto, transacted for purposes of resale.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
Prior to engaging in any wholesale electric activities under section 3 or 4 of
this act, a public utility district shall develop and approve a written
implementation plan under subsection (2) of this section and adopt a resolution
under subsection (3) of this section.

(2)(a)
The implementation plan shall include the following: (i) A general description
of how the district intends to engage in the wholesale electric activities
under section 3 or 4 of this act; (ii) a discussion of how the public interest
will be served by engaging in wholesale electric activities under section 3 or
4 of this act; (iii) an explanation of the provisions made for the actual and
prospective electric energy needs of the district; (iv) a description of the
risk management program and other safeguards the district will employ to manage
any risks that may be associated with the wholesale electric activities under
section 3 or 4 of this act; and (v) policies and procedures governing the
wholesale electricity activities under section 3 or 4 of this act. The plan
and any amendments to it shall be reviewed by an independent advisor.

(b)
The independent advisor shall submit a report to the commission that includes
an analysis of the implementation plan and (i) the nature of and extent to
which the proposed wholesale electric activities under section 3 or 4 of this
act may entail financial risk, and (ii) the adequacy of proposed measures to
manage any potential risks. The independent advisor may include in the report
any recommendations the advisor deems pertinent to the purposes of the
analysis. The report shall be advisory only and not binding upon the
commission.

(c)
The plan, along with the independent advisor's report, shall be submitted to
the commission for approval. At least ten days prior to the public meeting at
which the plan is to be considered, a notice that includes a general
description of the implementation plan shall be published in a newspaper of
general circulation in the county in which the district is located. The plan
may be amended by the commission from time to time, as necessary, subject to
the same procedure as required for approval of the plan under this subsection.

(3)
After approval of the implementation plan, the commission may elect to engage
in wholesale electric activities under section 3 or 4 of this act by adopting a
resolution enabling such activities. The wholesale electric activities
undertaken under section 3 or 4 of this act shall be consistent with the implementation
plan approved under subsection (2) of this section.

(4)
A wholesale electric public utility district may at any time rescind the
resolution electing to engage in wholesale electric activities under this
chapter. After approval of a rescission resolution, a district may not engage
in the wholesale electric activities under this chapter other than to
discontinue and wind up the affairs conducted under this chapter. Any such
rescission shall not impair or modify any contracts or leases executed prior to
such rescission and the public utility district shall continue to have the
ability to engage in the wholesale electric activities for and in connection
with such existing contracts and leases. A rescission shall not prevent a
district at any time thereafter from electing to engage in wholesale activities
in accordance with this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
wholesale electric public utility district engaging in wholesale power
transactions to serve its customers' load requirements may:

(1)
Enter into contracts and agreements with any person or entity, within or
without the state, and may participate in the formation, function, and
operation and be members of or partners in: (a) A limited liability
partnership or limited liability company; (b) a nonprofit corporation; (c) a
mutual corporation or association; and (d) a cooperative association, within or
without the state, for carrying out any of the powers authorized in this title
as related to wholesale power activities, except those activities set forth in
section 4 of this act. When participating in such an entity, the wholesale
electric public utility district shall not assume joint liability for the debts
or acts of other participants, or obtain, or acquire stock ownership or
purchase, sell, exchange, exercise, or otherwise perform any physical or
financial risk management instruments beyond those authorized in subsection (3)
of this section.

(2)
Enter into transactions for the purchase or sale of wholesale power under this
chapter by means of a wholesale power contract or series of wholesale power
contracts having a total term of three years or less without regard to the
requirement of RCW 54.16.040. However, the contract or contracts may only be
made pursuant to a resolution of the commission introduced at least ten days
prior to the date of adoption of the resolution.

(3)
Purchase, sell, exchange, exercise, and otherwise perform any risk management
instrument for purposes of protecting against loss resulting from price or
market fluctuations or for the purposes of securing the district's electrical
energy supply. The wholesale electric public utility district shall separately
track and account for the transactions undertaken under this subsection.

(4)
A wholesale electric public utility district acting under this section shall
not acquire through condemnation electric generation plants and facilities,
accompanying transmission systems, contractual rights to the output of electric
generation plants and facilities, or contractual rights to access transmission
facilities. Nothing in this section affects the authority of a public utility
district when not acting under this chapter to condemn property or facilities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. In
addition to the activities provided in section 3 of this act, a wholesale
public utility district that is a surplus generator may:

(1)
Enter into contracts and agreements with any person or entity, within or
without the state, and may participate in the formation, function, and
operation and be members of or partners in: (a) A limited liability
partnership or limited liability company; (b) a nonprofit corporation; (c) a
mutual corporation or association; and (d) a cooperative association within or
without the state for carrying out the powers authorized in this title as
related to wholesale power activities and in this section. When participating
in such an entity, the wholesale public utility district shall not assume joint
liability for the debts or acts of other participants, obtain or acquire stock
ownership, or purchase, sell, exchange, exercise, or otherwise perform any
physical or financial risk management instruments beyond those authorized in
section 3(3) of this act.

(2)
Purchase, sell, and exchange wholesale power and other services related thereto
without limitation on the quantity of the purchases or sales, and may
construct, purchase, own, control, acquire or operate electric generation
plants and facilities and accompanying transmission systems for wholesale power
transactions without limitation on the quantity of the electric energy or
capacity generated. Nothing in this subsection is intended to modify the
energy financing voter approval act, chapter 80.52 RCW. A wholesale electric
public utility district acting under this section shall not acquire through
condemnation electric generation plants and facilities, accompanying
transmission systems, contractual rights to the output of electric generation
plants and facilities, or contractual rights to access transmission
facilities. Nothing in this section affects the authority of a public utility
district when not acting under this chapter to condemn property or facilities.

(3)
Lease its facilities, plants, and properties to maximize the operational and
economic efficiency of district's assets and may enter into leaseback
agreements, without regard to the procedures of RCW 54.16.180. The lease and
leaseback agreements may contain those terms and conditions as determined by
the commission to be necessary, including provisions to secure payments on the
lease. No lease shall be for a term longer than fifty years. At least ten
days prior to the public meeting at which the proposed lease is to be
considered, the commission shall cause to have published a notice that includes
a general description of the proposed lease transaction in a newspaper of
general circulation in the county in which the district is located. The
commission may use the procedure provided in this section or the procedure set
forth in RCW 54.16.180 when leasing any facilities, plants, and properties.

(4)
A public utility district is a surplus generator when during the year
immediately preceding the election made under section 2 of this act the
district's average annual net generation from projects or facilities owned and
operated by the district exceeds the district's average annual load requirement
to serve the needs of the district and its inhabitants and the district
continues to use its generation resources to serve those needs. In the event
that a district satisfies the requirements in this subsection for status as a
surplus generator at the time of election, any subsequent changes in the
district's net generation or load shall not effect the district's status as a
surplus generator.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
following are exempt from public inspection and copying requirements of chapter
42.17 RCW: Records of a wholesale electric public utility district obtained by
the district within one year of the request for disclosure that contain
confidential market data or pricing information relating to the purchase, sale,
or exchange of wholesale power or related services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
activities authorized in this chapter shall be in addition to other powers
previously conferred upon public utility districts. This chapter is intended
to clarify and supplement the authorities provided under existing law. No
inference may be drawn that any authority granted under this chapter is not
available under existing law. It is the intent of the legislature that public
utility districts be granted the ability by this chapter to engage in the
activities and practices as provided in this chapter, subject to the
limitations set forth, in addition to the authority for such activities that
are express or implied in other provisions of the law. Nothing in this chapter
shall be construed as affecting the authorities of a wholesale public utility
district or any other public utility district to act under existing law.
Except as specifically provided, nothing in this chapter shall be construed as
affecting a wholesale public utility district's obligations or responsibilities
to its own retail customers.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. This
act may be known and cited as the "public utility district wholesale
electric act."

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 54 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---