BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. Until
after April 1, 2000, the utilities and transportation commission may not grant
any new certificates under chapter 81.88 RCW in any areas where a public
transportation system has been formed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---