BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.37.530 and 1997 c 328 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
It is unlawful:

(a)
For any person to operate a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle not equipped with
mirrors on the left and right sides of the motorcycle which shall be so located
as to give the driver a complete view of the highway for a distance of at least
two hundred feet to the rear of the motorcycle or motor-driven cycle:
PROVIDED, That mirrors shall not be required on any motorcycle or motor-driven
cycle over twenty-five years old originally manufactured without mirrors and
which has been restored to its original condition and which is being ridden to
or from or otherwise in conjunction with an antique or classic motorcycle
contest, show, or other such assemblage: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no mirror is
required on any motorcycle manufactured prior to January 1, 1931;

(b)
For any person to operate a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle which does not
have a windshield unless wearing glasses, goggles, or a face shield of a type
conforming to rules adopted by the state patrol;

(c)
For any person to operate or ride upon a motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, or
moped on a state highway, county road, or city street unless wearing upon his
or her head a protective helmet of a type conforming to rules adopted by the
state patrol except when the vehicle is an antique motor-driven cycle or
automobile that is licensed as a motorcycle or when the vehicle is equipped
with seat belts and roll bars approved by the state patrol. The helmet must be
equipped with either a neck or chin strap which shall be fastened securely
while the motorcycle or motor-driven cycle is in motion. Persons operating
electric-assisted bicycles shall comply with all laws and regulations related
to the use of bicycle helmets;

(d)
For any person to transport a child under the age of ((five)) ten
on a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle unless the motorcycle or motor-driven
cycle:

(i)
Has three wheels;

(ii)
Is powered by an electric motor;

(iii)
Has a full body enclosed cab; and

(iv)
Has a seat belt assembly or a child restraint system for the driver and
passenger and the operator and passengers use the seat belt or child restraint
system;

(e)
For any person to sell or offer for sale a motorcycle helmet which does not
meet the requirements established by the state patrol.

(2) The state patrol is hereby authorized and empowered to adopt
and amend rules, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, concerning the
standards and procedures for conformance of rules adopted for glasses, goggles,
face shields, and protective helmets.

---
END ---