BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.34.108 and 1992 c 69 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
When land has once been classified under this chapter, a notation of such
classification shall be made each year upon the assessment and tax rolls and
such land shall be valued pursuant to RCW 84.34.060 or 84.34.065 until removal
of all or a portion of such classification by the assessor upon occurrence of
any of the following:

(a)
Receipt of notice from the owner to remove all or a portion of such
classification;

(b)
Sale or transfer to an ownership, except a transfer that resulted from a
default in loan payments made to or secured by a governmental agency that
intends to or is required by law or regulation to resell the property for the
same use as before, making all or a portion of such land exempt from ad valorem
taxation;

(c)
Sale or transfer of all or a portion of such land to a new owner, unless the
new owner has signed a notice of classification continuance, except transfer to
an owner who is an heir or devisee of a deceased owner shall not, by itself,
result in removal of classification. The signed notice of continuance shall be
attached to the real estate excise tax affidavit provided for in RCW ((82.45.120,
as now or hereafter amended)) 82.45.150. The notice of continuance
shall be on a form prepared by the department of revenue. If the notice of
continuance is not signed by the new owner and attached to the real estate
excise tax affidavit, all additional taxes calculated pursuant to subsection
(3) of this section shall become due and payable by the seller or transferor at
time of sale. The county auditor shall not accept an instrument of conveyance
of classified land for filing or recording unless the new owner has signed the
notice of continuance or the additional tax has been paid. The seller,
transferor, or new owner may appeal the new assessed valuation calculated under
subsection (3) of this section to the county board of equalization.
Jurisdiction is hereby conferred on the county board of equalization to hear
these appeals;

(d)
Determination by the assessor, after giving the owner written notice and an
opportunity to be heard, that all or a portion of such land no longer meets the
criteria for classification under this chapter. The criteria for
classification pursuant to this chapter continue to apply after classification
has been granted.

The
granting authority, upon request of an assessor, shall provide reasonable
assistance to the assessor in making a determination whether such land
continues to meet the qualifications of RCW 84.34.020 (1) or (3). The assistance
shall be provided within thirty days of receipt of the request.

(2)
Within thirty days after such removal of all or a portion of such land from
current use classification, the assessor shall notify the owner in writing,
setting forth the reasons for such removal. The seller, transferor, or owner
may appeal such removal to the county board of equalization.

(3)
Unless the removal is reversed on appeal, the assessor shall revalue the
affected land with reference to full market value on the date of removal from
classification. Both the assessed valuation before and after the removal of
classification shall be listed and taxes shall be allocated according to that
part of the year to which each assessed valuation applies. Except as provided
in subsection (((5))) (6) of this section, an additional tax,
applicable interest, and penalty shall be imposed which shall be due and
payable to the county treasurer thirty days after the owner is notified of the
amount of the additional tax. As soon as possible, the assessor shall compute
the amount of such an additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty and the
treasurer shall mail notice to the owner of the amount thereof and the date on
which payment is due. The amount of such additional tax, applicable interest,
and penalty shall be determined as follows:

(a)
The amount of additional tax shall be equal to the difference between the
property tax paid as "open space land", "farm and agricultural
land", or "timber land" and the amount of property tax otherwise
due and payable for the ((seven)) ten years last past had the
land not been so classified;

(b)
The amount of applicable interest shall be equal to the interest upon the
amounts of such additional tax paid at the same statutory rate charged on
delinquent property taxes from the dates on which such additional tax could
have been paid without penalty if the land had been assessed at a value without
regard to this chapter;

(c)
The amount of the penalty shall be as provided in RCW 84.34.080. The penalty
shall not be imposed if the removal satisfies the conditions of RCW 84.34.070.

(4)
Additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty, shall become a lien on such
land which shall attach at the time such land is removed from classification
under this chapter and shall have priority to and shall be fully paid and
satisfied before any recognizance, mortgage, judgment, debt, obligation or
responsibility to or with which such land may become charged or liable. Such
lien may be foreclosed upon expiration of the same period after delinquency and
in the same manner provided by law for foreclosure of liens for delinquent real
property taxes as provided in RCW 84.64.050 now or as hereafter amended. Any
additional tax unpaid on its due date shall thereupon become delinquent. From
the date of delinquency until paid, interest shall be charged at the same rate
applied by law to delinquent ad valorem property taxes.

(5)
Seventy percent of the taxes, penalties, and interest collected under this
section shall be distributed in the same manner as current property taxes
applicable to the land. The remaining thirty percent shall be distributed to
the county and used to purchase rights and interests in real property under RCW
84.34.210 and 84.34.220.

(6)
The additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty specified in subsection
(3) of this section shall not be imposed if the removal of classification
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section resulted solely from:

(a)
Transfer to a government entity in exchange for other land located within the
state of Washington;

(b)(i)
A taking through the exercise of the power of eminent domain, or (ii) sale or
transfer to an entity having the power of eminent domain in anticipation of the
exercise of such power, said entity having manifested its intent in writing or
by other official action;

(c)
A natural disaster such as a flood, windstorm, earthquake, or other such
calamity rather than by virtue of the act of the landowner changing the use of
such property;

(d)
Official action by an agency of the state of Washington or by the county or
city within which the land is located which disallows the present use of such
land;

(e)
Transfer of land to a church when such land would qualify for exemption
pursuant to RCW 84.36.020;

(f)
Acquisition of property interests by state agencies or agencies or
organizations qualified under RCW 84.34.210 and 64.04.130 for the purposes
enumerated in those sections: PROVIDED, That at such time as these property
interests are not used for the purposes enumerated in RCW 84.34.210 and
64.04.130 the additional tax specified in subsection (3) of this section shall
be imposed; or

(g)
Removal of land classified as farm and agricultural land under RCW
84.34.020(2)(d).

Sec.
2. RCW
84.34.080 and 1992 c 69 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

When
land which has been classified under this chapter as open space land, farm and
agricultural land, or timber land is applied to some other use, except through
compliance with RCW 84.34.070, or except as a result solely from any one of the
conditions listed in RCW 84.34.108(((5))) (6), the owner shall
within sixty days notify the county assessor of such change in use and
additional real property tax shall be imposed upon such land in an amount equal
to the sum of the following:

(1)
The total amount of the additional tax and applicable interest due under RCW
84.34.108; plus

(2)
A penalty amounting to twenty percent of the amount determined in subsection
(1) of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act takes effect January 1, 2001.

---
END ---