BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
1.50.005 and 1998 c 59 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that persons who donate organs help save the lives and
promote the well-being of others in a manner that demonstrates the noblest side
of human nature. Many families and friends of both the donors and the donees
may want to remember the special act of donation in a way that honors the
memory of the donor and encourages donation by others in the future.

To
recognize the special kindness of those who donate their organs, the
legislature establishes the Washington gift of life ((medal)) award.

Sec.
2. RCW
1.50.030 and 1998 c 59 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1)))
The governor's office shall ((award a)) present the Washington
gift of life ((medal)) award to ((all)) six
eligible families or persons per year under the following ((conditions)):

(((a)))
(1) The organ procurement organization shall ((determine whether the))
nominate the six individuals or persons ((requesting
the medal is)) eligible under this section ((to receive the medal
described in RCW 1.50.040)) to represent all those who have donated organs
and shall submit documentation supporting the eligibility of the individual or
person to the governor's office. If more than one organ procurement
organization is involved, they shall coordinate in harmony to designate by
consensus the organ procurement organization among them to have primary
administrative responsibility under this chapter.

(((b)))
(2) The governor's office shall ((award the medal and direct the
primary organ procurement organization to arrange for the presentation to a
family or person who requested a medal under this section and who has been
determined by the organ procurement organization to be eligible to receive a
medal under this section.

(2)(a)
Except as provided in (b) of this subsection and subsection (3) of this
section,)) present the awards on an annual basis in
coordination with the organ procurement organization. Only one ((medal))
award may be presented to the family of an organ donor.

(((b)
In the case of a family in which more than one member is an organ donor, the
governor shall award and the primary organ procurement organization shall
present an additional medal on behalf of each organ donor to his or her
eligible family.

(3)(a)
Duplicate medals may be purchased by the family or person eligible to receive
the medal. The price of the duplicate medal shall be sufficient to cover its
cost.

(b)
Anyone not eligible to receive a medal under this chapter may request from the
eligible family or person permission to purchase duplicate medals. The
family's or person's decision to grant or withhold permission shall be in
writing and shall be final. The family's or person's decision shall be honored
by the governor.))

Sec.
3. RCW
1.50.040 and 1998 c 59 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
Washington gift of life ((medal shall be of bronze and)) award
shall consist of the seal of the state of Washington((, surrounded by a
raised laurel wreath and suspended from a ring attached by a dark green
ribbon. The reverse of the decoration within the raised laurel wreath shall))
and be inscribed with the words: "For the greatest act of kindness
in donating organs to enhance the lives of others."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. RCW
1.50.020 (Application for medal) and 1998 c 59 s 3 are each
repealed.

---
END ---