BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.68.095 and 1994 c 179 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

All
moneys that have accrued or may accrue to the motor vehicle fund from the motor
vehicle fuel tax and special fuel tax imposed by RCW 82.36.025(5) shall be
distributed monthly by the state treasurer in the following proportions:

(1)
Through June 30, 1995, one and one-half cents shall be deposited in the transportation
improvement account and expended in accordance with RCW 47.26.084. After June
30, 1995, eighty-seven percent of one and one-half cents shall be deposited in
the transportation improvement account and expended in accordance with RCW
47.26.086 and thirteen percent of one and one-half cents shall be deposited in
the small city account and expended in accordance with RCW 47.26.115.

(2)
From April 1, 1991, seventy-five one-hundredths of one cent shall be deposited
in the special category C account in the motor vehicle fund for special
category C projects. Special category C projects are category C projects ((as
defined in RCW 47.05.030(3))) that, due to high cost only, will require
bond financing to complete construction.

The
following criteria, listed in order of priority, shall be used in determining
which special category C projects have the highest priority:

(a)
Accident experience; and

(b)
Fatal accident experience; and

(c)
Capacity to move people and goods safely and at reasonable speeds without undue
congestion; and

(d)
Continuity of development of the highway transportation network.

Moneys
deposited in the special category C account in the motor vehicle fund may be
used for payment of debt service on bonds the proceeds of which are used to
finance special category C projects under this subsection.

(3)
Twenty-five one-hundredths of one cent shall be deposited in the rural arterial
trust account in the motor vehicle fund.

(4)
Forty-five one-hundredths of one cent shall be deposited in the county arterial
preservation account. These funds shall be distributed by the county road
administration board to counties in proportions corresponding to the number of
paved arterial lane miles in the unincorporated area of each county and shall
be used for improvements to sustain the structural, safety, and operational
integrity of county arterials. The county road administration board shall
adopt reasonable rules and develop policies to implement this program and to
assure that a pavement management system is used.

(5)
One-half of one cent shall be allocated to cities and towns as provided in RCW
46.68.110.

(6)
From April 1, 1990, through March 31, 1991, thirty one-hundredths of one cent
and after March 31, 1991, fifty-five one-hundredths of one cent shall be
allocated to counties as provided in RCW 46.68.120.

(7)
One cent shall be deposited in the congestion relief account created in the
motor vehicle fund and shall be expended ((for highway purposes of the state
as defined in RCW 46.68.130)) for the design, right of way, and
construction of congestion relief corridors. Moneys deposited in the
congestion relief account in the motor vehicle fund shall be used to fund work
on the projects enumerated in section 2 of this act, or for the payment of debt
service associated with these projects as authorized by Referendum Bill No. 49.

Congestion
relief corridors, which are not adequately addressed by the prioritization
scheme in RCW 47.05.051, are designated to address congestion and economic
development in a comprehensive manner.

The
following criteria shall be used to designate corridors for funding from the
congestion relief account:

(a)
The benefit/cost ratio, calculated using a twenty-year project cost, is greater
than two; and

(b)
At least sixty-five percent of the corridor improvement's benefits must accrue
to the general motoring public.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 46.68 RCW to read as follows:

In
accordance with the criteria prescribed in RCW 46.68.095(7), the following
corridors are designated for funding from the congestion relief account:

(1)
State route number 18, 180th to interstate 90.

(2)
State route number 509, interstate 5 to south 188th.

(3)
State route number 395, North Spokane freeway.

(4)
State route number 522, state route number 9 to state route number 2.

(5)
State route number 525, interstate 5 to Paine Field boulevard.

(6)
State route number 539, Horton to International boundary.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 43.160 RCW to read as follows:

In
accordance with RCW 43.160.060 and 43.160.200, the community economic
revitalization board is authorized to provide grants, but not loans, for
transportation improvements in distressed counties as defined in RCW
43.160.020, in rural natural resources impact areas as defined in RCW
43.160.020(13), and in designated community empowerment zones approved under
RCW 43.63A.700. Funding for these improvements are from the transportation
equity act for the 21st century, surface transportation program and are subject
to surface transportation program federal fund eligibility and planning
requirements detailed in 23 U.S.C. Sec. 133(b) and Sec. 134. Up to twenty-two
percent of available surface transportation funds are made available for these
purposes, however beginning in 2000 in the event that such funds are not
obligated by June 1st of each year, they will revert in equal amount to the
other designated surface transportation program purposes. In accordance with
federal law, the department of transportation is responsible for administering
grants awarded by the board under this section.

Sec.
4. RCW
47.01.280 and 1985 c 433 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Upon receiving an application for improvements to an existing state highway or
highways pursuant to RCW 43.160.074 from the community economic revitalization
board, the transportation commission shall, in a timely manner, determine
whether or not the proposed state highway improvements:

(a)
Meet the safety and design criteria of the department of transportation;

(b)
Will impair the operational integrity of the existing highway system;

(c)
Will affect any other improvements planned by the department; and

(d)
Will be consistent with its policies developed pursuant to RCW 47.01.071.

(2)
Upon completion of its determination of the factors contained in subsection (1)
of this section and any other factors it deems pertinent, the transportation
commission shall forward its approval, as submitted or amended or disapproval
of the proposed improvements to the board, along with any recommendation it may
wish to make concerning the desirability and feasibility of the proposed
development. If the transportation commission disapproves any proposed
improvements, it shall specify its reasons for disapproval.

(3)
Upon notification from the board of an application's approval pursuant to RCW
43.160.074, the transportation commission shall direct the department of
transportation to carry out the improvements in coordination with the
applicant.

(4)
The transportation commission shall notify the legislative transportation
committee of all state highway improvements to be carried out pursuant to RCW
43.160.074 and this section.

(((5)
All state highway improvements that are approved pursuant to RCW 43.160.074 and
this section shall be charged to the economic development account of the motor
vehicle fund created by RCW 47.10.803.))

Sec.
5. RCW
43.84.092 and 1997 c 218 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated
with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement
act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter
43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of
interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of
interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement
act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office
of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal
government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of
financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed
necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act,
and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the
distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local
leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local
sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan I account, the public employees' retirement
system plan II account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource
management cost account, the site closure account, the special wildlife
account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance
reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension
account, the teachers' retirement system plan I account, the teachers'
retirement system plan II account, the transportation infrastructure account,
the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement
fund, the University of Washington building account, the volunteer fire
fighters' relief and pension principal account, the volunteer fire fighters'
relief and pension administrative account, the Washington judicial retirement
system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan I retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' system plan II retirement account, the Washington state patrol
retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the
Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control
revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital projects
account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural
permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school
fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to
be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation
to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the central Puget Sound public transportation account, the city
hardship assistance account, the congestion relief account, the county
arterial preservation account, the department of licensing services account,
the economic development account, the essential rail assistance account, the
essential rail banking account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the gasohol
exemption holding account, the grade crossing protective fund, the high
capacity transportation account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway
construction stabilization account, the highway safety account, the marine
operating fund, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education
account, the pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the
Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust account,
the safety and education account, the small city account, the special category
C account, the state patrol highway account, the transfer relief account, the
transportation capital facilities account, the transportation equipment fund,
the transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation revolving loan account, and the urban arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

Sec.
6. RCW
43.84.092 and 1998 c 341 s 708 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects
to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations
shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4)
of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local
leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the
local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan I account, the public employees' retirement
system plan II account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource
management cost account, the site closure account, the special wildlife
account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance
reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension
account, the teachers' retirement system plan I account, the teachers'
retirement system combined plan II and plan III account, the transportation
infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account,
the volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension principal account, the
volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension administrative account, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan I retirement account, the Washington
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan II retirement account,
the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan II and III
account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement
fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington
University capital projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances
of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state
university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary
accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall
first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the central Puget Sound public transportation account, the city
hardship assistance account, the congestion relief account, the county
arterial preservation account, the department of licensing services account,
the economic development account, the essential rail assistance account, the
essential rail banking account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the gasohol
exemption holding account, the grade crossing protective fund, the high
capacity transportation account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway
construction stabilization account, the highway safety account, the marine
operating fund, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education
account, the pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the
Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust account,
the safety and education account, the small city account, the special category
C account, the state patrol highway account, the transfer relief account, the
transportation capital facilities account, the transportation equipment fund,
the transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation revolving loan account, and the urban arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. (1)
Section 3 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing
public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

(2)
Section 6 of this act takes effect September 1, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8.
Section 5 of this act expires September 1, 2000.

---
END ---