BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The
department of social and health services, in concert with community-based
organizations, shall develop a plan for a comprehensive respite care system for
children and families. In developing the plan, the department shall assess the
current system, review available research, evaluate program needs, and evaluate
program models. The comprehensive plan shall identify necessary and
appropriate respite services for families with children who are in foster care,
for adoptive families, and for kinship placement families. The department
shall submit the plan to the appropriate committees of the senate and house of
representatives no later than December 31, 1999.

---
END ---