BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes that Washington state is experiencing a significant
shortage of quality foster homes and that the majority of children entering the
system are difficult to place due to their complex needs. The legislature
intends to provide additional assistance to those families willing to serve as
foster parents.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
United States department of agriculture issued a report that shows the current
foster parent reimbursement rate of four hundred nine dollars per month per
child represents forty-three percent of the actual cost of providing such
care. The department of social and health services shall increase the basic
reimbursement rate for foster children by three dollars per child per day and
shall pay a two hundred dollar per year per foster child clothing allowance.
The department shall also annually review how the basic foster care rates meet
the need for providing such care.

Sec.
3. RCW
74.14B.080 and 1991 c 283 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to subsection (2) of this section, the secretary of social and health
services shall provide liability insurance to foster parents licensed under
chapter 74.15 RCW. The coverage shall be for personal injury and property
damage caused by foster parents or foster children that occurred while the
children were in foster care. Such insurance shall cover acts of ordinary
negligence but shall not cover illegal conduct or bad faith acts taken by
foster parents in providing foster care. Moneys paid from liability insurance
for any claim are limited to the amount by which the claim exceeds the amount
available to the claimant from any valid and collectible liability insurance. The
liability insurance provided under this section shall reimburse foster parents
for the replacement value of the item damaged or destroyed.

(2)
The secretary of social and health services may purchase the insurance required
in subsection (1) of this section or may choose a self-insurance method. The
total moneys expended pursuant to this authorization shall not exceed ((five
hundred thousand)) one million dollars per biennium. If the
secretary elects a method of self-insurance, the expenditure shall include all
administrative and staff costs. If the secretary elects a method of
self-insurance, he or she may, by rule, place a limit on the maximum amount to
be paid on each claim.

(3)
Nothing in this section or RCW 4.24.590 is intended to modify the foster parent
reimbursement plan in place on July 1, 1991.

(4)
The liability insurance program shall be available by July 1, 1991.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
Foster parents are required to complete first aid/CPR and HIV/AIDS training to
become licensed. The cost of this mandatory training is a financial barrier
for some people considering becoming foster parents. The department of social
and health services shall provide all new and current foster parents with first
aid/CPR and HIV/AIDS training.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
sum of fifteen million three hundred thirty thousand dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the general fund to the
department of social and health services for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2000, to carry out the purposes of section 2 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
sum of two hundred ninety thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated from the general fund to the department of social
and health services for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, to carry out the
purposes of section 3 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
sum of one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated from the general fund to the department of social
and health services for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, to carry out the
purposes of section 4 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---