BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 84.40 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Valuation of unique real property and taxation procedures under the general
property tax system are consistent with the public interest only when due
consideration and recognition is given to all relevant factors in determining
the true and fair value in money of each tract or lot of real property that
contains a unique feature.

(2)
To assure equality and uniformity of taxation of unique real property, the
following uniform principles should be applied for determining the true and
fair value in money of such unique real property:

(a)
The valuation shall be based on a property that contains a comparable unique
feature and is located within a twenty-five mile radius of the property that is
to be valued; or

(b) If a comparable property is not found to satisfy the
requirements of (a) of this subsection, a real estate appraisal shall be used
to value the property.

---
END ---