BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.08.130 and 1998 c 54 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any taxpayer or taxing unit feeling aggrieved by the action of any county board
of equalization may appeal to the board of tax appeals by filing with the board
of tax appeals in accordance with RCW 1.12.070 a notice of appeal within thirty
days after the mailing of the decision of such board of equalization, which
notice shall specify the actions complained of; and in like manner any county
assessor may appeal to the board of tax appeals from any action of any county
board of equalization. There shall be no fee charged for the filing of an
appeal. The board shall transmit a copy of the notice of appeal to all named
parties within thirty days of its receipt by the board. Appeals which are not
filed as provided in this section shall be dismissed. The board of tax appeals
shall require the board appealed from to file a true and correct copy of its
decision in such action and all evidence taken in connection therewith, and may
receive further evidence, and shall make such order as in its judgment is just
and proper.

(2)
For all actions that are appealed unsuccessfully by the property owner, the
board of tax appeals may enter an order, pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section, that has effect up to the end of the assessment cycle used by the
assessor, if there has been no intervening change in the value during that
time.

(3)
For all actions that are appealed successfully by the property owner, the
following shall occur:

(a)
A copy of the order shall be kept by the board of tax appeals, and the county
board of equalization;

(b)
The order shall state the following:

(i)
The issue that was appealed;

(ii)
The basis of determination for the appeal; and

(iii)
That the issue was successfully appealed; and

(c) The order will not expire at the end of the assessment cycle
used by the assessor.

---
END ---