BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall coordinate with the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the Washington state
association of prosecuting attorneys, the Washington state trial lawyers
association, the Washington state patrol, school districts, school employee
groups, and others to develop and recommend to the superintendent of public
instruction state-wide mandatory minimum standards for training school security
personnel. The superintendent shall adopt the standards by rule. Upon
adoption, the standards shall be in effect in every school district within the
state and shall apply to persons hired on or after the effective date of this
section.

For the purposes of this section, "school security
personnel" means persons employed or contracted for by a school district
or educational service district whose primary duty with the district is
security related. It is not intended that teachers, administrative staff, or
other staff who have occasional security duties be considered school security
personnel.

---
END ---