BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
13.40.185 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 524 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any term of confinement imposed for an offense which exceeds ((thirty)) twenty
days shall be served under the supervision of the department. If the period of
confinement imposed for more than one offense exceeds ((thirty)) twenty
days but the term imposed for each offense is less than ((thirty)) twenty
days, the confinement may, in the discretion of the court, be served in a
juvenile facility operated by or pursuant to a contract with the state or a
county.

(2) Whenever a juvenile is confined in a detention facility or is
committed to the department, the court may not directly order a juvenile into a
particular county or state facility. The juvenile court administrator and the
secretary, assistant secretary, or the secretary's designee, as appropriate,
has the sole discretion to determine in which facility a juvenile should be
confined or committed. The counties may operate a variety of detention
facilities as determined by the county legislative authority subject to
available funds.

---
END ---