BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
It is unlawful for any person to direct light from a laser pointer at a school
bus driver, transit driver, or other public transportation employee in the
performance of his or her duties, or the marked service vehicle of any such
individual.

(2)
A person who violates this section is guilty of a class 1 civil infraction
under chapter 7.80 RCW.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "laser pointer"
means any device that emits light amplified by the stimulated emission of
radiation that is visible to the human eye.

---
END ---