BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.47.010 and 1993 c 492 s 208 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
The legislature finds that limitations on access to health care services for
enrollees in the state, such as in rural and underserved areas, are
particularly challenging for the basic health plan. Statutory restrictions
have reduced the options available to the administrator to address the access
needs of basic health plan enrollees. It is the intent of the legislature to
authorize the administrator to develop alternative purchasing strategies to
ensure access to basic health plan enrollees in all areas of the state,
including: (i) The use of differential rating for managed health care systems
based on geographic differences in costs; and (ii) limited use of
self-insurance in areas where adequate access cannot be assured through other
options.

(b)
In developing alternative purchasing strategies to address health care access
needs, the administrator shall consult with interested persons including health
carriers, health care providers, and health facilities, and with other
appropriate state agencies including the office of the insurance commissioner
and the office of community and rural health. In pursuing such alternatives,
the administrator shall continue to give priority to prepaid managed care as
the preferred method of assuring access to basic health plan enrollees.

(2)
The legislature further finds that:

(a)
A significant percentage of the population of this state does not have
reasonably available insurance or other coverage of the costs of necessary
basic health care services;

(b)
This lack of basic health care coverage is detrimental to the health of the
individuals lacking coverage and to the public welfare, and results in
substantial expenditures for emergency and remedial health care, often at the
expense of health care providers, health care facilities, and all purchasers of
health care, including the state; and

(c)
The use of managed health care systems has significant potential to reduce the
growth of health care costs incurred by the people of this state generally, and
by low-income pregnant women, and at-risk children and adolescents who need
greater access to managed health care.

(((2)))
(3) The purpose of this chapter is to provide or make more readily
available necessary basic health care services in an appropriate setting to
working persons and others who lack coverage, at a cost to these persons that
does not create barriers to the utilization of necessary health care services.
To that end, this chapter establishes a program to be made available to those
residents not eligible for medicare who share in a portion of the cost or who
pay the full cost of receiving basic health care services from a managed health
care system.

(((3)))
(4) It is not the intent of this chapter to provide health care services
for those persons who are presently covered through private employer-based
health plans, nor to replace employer-based health plans. However, the
legislature recognizes that cost-effective and affordable health plans may not
always be available to small business employers. Further, it is the intent of
the legislature to expand, wherever possible, the availability of private
health care coverage and to discourage the decline of employer-based coverage.

(((4)))
(5)(a) It is the purpose of this chapter to acknowledge the initial
success of this program that has (i) assisted thousands of families in their
search for affordable health care; (ii) demonstrated that low-income, uninsured
families are willing to pay for their own health care coverage to the extent of
their ability to pay; and (iii) proved that local health care providers are
willing to enter into a public-private partnership as a managed care system.

(b)
As a consequence, the legislature intends to extend an option to enroll to
certain citizens above two hundred percent of the federal poverty guidelines
within the state who reside in communities where the plan is operational and
who collectively or individually wish to exercise the opportunity to purchase
health care coverage through the basic health plan if the purchase is done at
no cost to the state. It is also the intent of the legislature to allow
employers and other financial sponsors to financially assist such individuals
to purchase health care through the program so long as such purchase does not
result in a lower standard of coverage for employees.

(c)
The legislature intends that, to the extent of available funds, the program be
available throughout Washington state to subsidized and nonsubsidized
enrollees. It is also the intent of the legislature to enroll subsidized
enrollees first, to the maximum extent feasible.

(d)
The legislature directs that the basic health plan administrator identify
enrollees who are likely to be eligible for medical assistance and assist these
individuals in applying for and receiving medical assistance. The
administrator and the department of social and health services shall implement
a seamless system to coordinate eligibility determinations and benefit coverage
for enrollees of the basic health plan and medical assistance recipients.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.47.020 and 1997 c 335 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"Washington basic health plan" or "plan" means the system
of enrollment and payment ((on a prepaid capitated basis)) for basic
health care services, administered by the plan administrator through
participating managed health care systems, created by this chapter.

(2)
"Administrator" means the Washington basic health plan administrator,
who also holds the position of administrator of the Washington state health
care authority.

(3)
"Managed health care system" means: (a) Any health care
organization, including health care providers, insurers, health care service
contractors, health maintenance organizations, or any combination thereof, that
provides directly or by contract basic health care services, as defined by the
administrator and rendered by duly licensed providers, ((on a prepaid
capitated basis)) to a defined patient population enrolled in the plan and
in the managed health care system; or (b) a self-funded or self-insured
method of providing insurance coverage to subsidized enrollees provided under
RCW 41.05.140 and subject to the limitations under RCW 70.47.100(6).

(4)
"Subsidized enrollee" means an individual, or an individual plus the
individual's spouse or dependent children: (a) Who is not eligible for
medicare; (b) who is not confined or residing in a government-operated
institution, unless he or she meets eligibility criteria adopted by the
administrator; (c) who resides in an area of the state served by a managed
health care system participating in the plan; (d) whose gross family income at
the time of enrollment does not exceed twice the federal poverty level as
adjusted for family size and determined annually by the federal department of
health and human services; and (e) who chooses to obtain basic health care
coverage from a particular managed health care system in return for periodic
payments to the plan.

(5)
"Nonsubsidized enrollee" means an individual, or an individual plus
the individual's spouse or dependent children: (a) Who is not eligible for
medicare; (b) who is not confined or residing in a government-operated
institution, unless he or she meets eligibility criteria adopted by the
administrator; (c) who resides in an area of the state served by a managed
health care system participating in the plan; (d) who chooses to obtain basic
health care coverage from a particular managed health care system; and (e) who
pays or on whose behalf is paid the full costs for participation in the plan,
without any subsidy from the plan.

(6)
"Subsidy" means the difference between the amount of periodic payment
the administrator makes to a managed health care system on behalf of a
subsidized enrollee plus the administrative cost to the plan of providing the
plan to that subsidized enrollee, and the amount determined to be the
subsidized enrollee's responsibility under RCW 70.47.060(2).

(7)
"Premium" means a periodic payment, based upon gross family income
which an individual, their employer or another financial sponsor makes to the
plan as consideration for enrollment in the plan as a subsidized enrollee or a
nonsubsidized enrollee.

(8)
"Rate" means the ((per capita)) amount, negotiated by the administrator
with and paid to a participating managed health care system, that is based upon
the enrollment of subsidized and nonsubsidized enrollees in the plan and in
that system.

Sec.
3. RCW
70.47.060 and 1998 c 314 s 17 and 1998 c 148 s 1 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

The
administrator has the following powers and duties:

(1)
To design and from time to time revise a schedule of covered basic health care
services, including physician services, inpatient and outpatient hospital
services, prescription drugs and medications, and other services that may be
necessary for basic health care. In addition, the administrator may, to the
extent that funds are available, offer as basic health plan services chemical
dependency services, mental health services and organ transplant services;
however, no one service or any combination of these three services shall
increase the actuarial value of the basic health plan benefits by more than
five percent excluding inflation, as determined by the office of financial
management. All subsidized and nonsubsidized enrollees in any participating
managed health care system under the Washington basic health plan shall be
entitled to receive covered basic health care services in return for premium
payments to the plan. The schedule of services shall emphasize proven
preventive and primary health care and shall include all services necessary for
prenatal, postnatal, and well-child care. However, with respect to coverage
for groups of subsidized enrollees who are eligible to receive prenatal and
postnatal services through the medical assistance program under chapter 74.09
RCW, the administrator shall not contract for such services except to the
extent that such services are necessary over not more than a one-month period
in order to maintain continuity of care after diagnosis of pregnancy by the
managed care provider. The schedule of services shall also include a separate
schedule of basic health care services for children, eighteen years of age and
younger, for those subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees who choose to secure
basic coverage through the plan only for their dependent children. In
designing and revising the schedule of services, the administrator shall
consider the guidelines for assessing health services under the mandated
benefits act of 1984, RCW 48.47.030, and such other factors as the
administrator deems appropriate.

However,
with respect to coverage for subsidized enrollees who are eligible to receive
prenatal and postnatal services through the medical assistance program under
chapter 74.09 RCW, the administrator shall not contract for such services
except to the extent that the services are necessary over not more than a
one-month period in order to maintain continuity of care after diagnosis of
pregnancy by the managed care provider.

(2)(a)
To design and implement a structure of periodic premiums due the administrator
from subsidized enrollees that is based upon gross family income, giving
appropriate consideration to family size and the ages of all family members.
The enrollment of children shall not require the enrollment of their parent or
parents who are eligible for the plan. The structure of periodic premiums
shall be applied to subsidized enrollees entering the plan as individuals
pursuant to subsection (9) of this section and to the share of the cost of the
plan due from subsidized enrollees entering the plan as employees pursuant to
subsection (10) of this section.

(b)
To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from nonsubsidized
enrollees. Premiums due from nonsubsidized enrollees shall be in an amount
equal to the cost charged by the managed health care system provider to the
state for the plan plus the administrative cost of providing the plan to those
enrollees and the premium tax under RCW 48.14.0201.

(c)
An employer or other financial sponsor may, with the prior approval of the
administrator, pay the premium, rate, or any other amount on behalf of a
subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollee, by arrangement with the enrollee and
through a mechanism acceptable to the administrator.

(d)
To develop, as an offering by every health carrier providing coverage identical
to the basic health plan, as configured on January 1, 1996, a basic health plan
model plan with uniformity in enrollee cost-sharing requirements.

(3)
To design and implement a structure of enrollee cost sharing due a managed
health care system from subsidized and nonsubsidized enrollees. The structure
shall discourage inappropriate enrollee utilization of health care services,
and may utilize copayments, deductibles, and other cost-sharing mechanisms, but
shall not be so costly to enrollees as to constitute a barrier to appropriate
utilization of necessary health care services.

(4)
To limit enrollment of persons who qualify for subsidies so as to prevent an
overexpenditure of appropriations for such purposes. Whenever the
administrator finds that there is danger of such an overexpenditure, the
administrator shall close enrollment until the administrator finds the danger
no longer exists.

(5)
To limit the payment of subsidies to subsidized enrollees, as defined in RCW
70.47.020. The level of subsidy provided to persons who qualify may be based
on the lowest cost plans, as defined by the administrator.

(6)
To adopt a schedule for the orderly development of the delivery of services and
availability of the plan to residents of the state, subject to the limitations
contained in RCW 70.47.080 or any act appropriating funds for the plan.

(7)
To solicit and accept applications from managed health care systems, as defined
in this chapter, for inclusion as eligible basic health care providers under
the plan. The administrator shall endeavor to assure that covered basic health
care services are available to any enrollee of the plan from among a selection
of two or more participating managed health care systems. In adopting any
rules or procedures applicable to managed health care systems and in its
dealings with such systems, the administrator shall consider and make suitable
allowance for the need for health care services and the differences in local
availability of health care resources, along with other resources, within and
among the several areas of the state. Contracts with participating managed
health care systems shall ensure that basic health plan enrollees who become
eligible for medical assistance may, at their option, continue to receive
services from their existing providers within the managed health care system if
such providers have entered into provider agreements with the department of
social and health services.

(8)
To receive periodic premiums from or on behalf of subsidized and nonsubsidized
enrollees, deposit them in the basic health plan operating account, keep
records of enrollee status, and authorize periodic payments to managed health
care systems on the basis of the number of enrollees participating in the
respective managed health care systems.

(9)
To accept applications from individuals residing in areas served by the plan,
on behalf of themselves and their spouses and dependent children, for
enrollment in the Washington basic health plan as subsidized or nonsubsidized
enrollees, to establish appropriate minimum-enrollment periods for enrollees as
may be necessary, and to determine, upon application and on a reasonable
schedule defined by the authority, or at the request of any enrollee,
eligibility due to current gross family income for sliding scale premiums.
Funds received by a family as part of participation in the adoption support
program authorized under RCW 26.33.320 and 74.13.100 through 74.13.145 shall
not be counted toward a family's current gross family income for the purposes
of this chapter. When an enrollee fails to report income or income changes
accurately, the administrator shall have the authority either to bill the enrollee
for the amounts overpaid by the state or to impose civil penalties of up to two
hundred percent of the amount of subsidy overpaid due to the enrollee
incorrectly reporting income. The administrator shall adopt rules to define
the appropriate application of these sanctions and the processes to implement
the sanctions provided in this subsection, within available resources. No
subsidy may be paid with respect to any enrollee whose current gross family
income exceeds twice the federal poverty level or, subject to RCW 70.47.110,
who is a recipient of medical assistance or medical care services under chapter
74.09 RCW. If a number of enrollees drop their enrollment for no apparent good
cause, the administrator may establish appropriate rules or requirements that
are applicable to such individuals before they will be allowed to reenroll in
the plan.

(10)
To accept applications from business owners on behalf of themselves and their
employees, spouses, and dependent children, as subsidized or nonsubsidized
enrollees, who reside in an area served by the plan. The administrator may
require all or the substantial majority of the eligible employees of such
businesses to enroll in the plan and establish those procedures necessary to
facilitate the orderly enrollment of groups in the plan and into a managed
health care system. The administrator may require that a business owner pay at
least an amount equal to what the employee pays after the state pays its
portion of the subsidized premium cost of the plan on behalf of each employee
enrolled in the plan. Enrollment is limited to those not eligible for medicare
who wish to enroll in the plan and choose to obtain the basic health care
coverage and services from a managed care system participating in the plan. The
administrator shall adjust the amount determined to be due on behalf of or from
all such enrollees whenever the amount negotiated by the administrator with the
participating managed health care system or systems is modified or the
administrative cost of providing the plan to such enrollees changes.

(11)
To determine the rate to be paid to each participating managed health care
system in return for the provision of covered basic health care services to
enrollees in the system. Although the schedule of covered basic health care
services will be the same or actuarially equivalent for similar
enrollees, the rates negotiated with participating managed health care systems
may vary among the systems. In negotiating rates with participating systems,
the administrator shall consider the characteristics of the populations served
by the respective systems, economic circumstances of the local area, the need
to conserve the resources of the basic health plan trust account, and other
factors the administrator finds relevant.

(12)
To monitor the provision of covered services to enrollees by participating
managed health care systems in order to assure enrollee access to good quality
basic health care, to require periodic data reports concerning the utilization
of health care services rendered to enrollees in order to provide adequate
information for evaluation, and to inspect the books and records of
participating managed health care systems to assure compliance with the
purposes of this chapter. In requiring reports from participating managed
health care systems, including data on services rendered enrollees, the
administrator shall endeavor to minimize costs, both to the managed health care
systems and to the plan. The administrator shall coordinate any such reporting
requirements with other state agencies, such as the insurance commissioner and
the department of health, to minimize duplication of effort.

(13)
To evaluate the effects this chapter has on private employer-based health care
coverage and to take appropriate measures consistent with state and federal
statutes that will discourage the reduction of such coverage in the state.

(14)
To develop a program of proven preventive health measures and to integrate it
into the plan wherever possible and consistent with this chapter.

(15)
To provide, consistent with available funding, assistance for rural residents,
underserved populations, and persons of color.

(16)
In consultation with appropriate state and local government agencies, to
establish criteria defining eligibility for persons confined or residing in
government-operated institutions.

Sec.
4. RCW
70.47.100 and 1987 1st ex.s. c 5 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A managed health care systems participating in the plan shall do so by
contract with the administrator and shall provide, directly or by contract with
other health care providers, covered basic health care services to each
enrollee covered by its contract with the administrator as long as
payments from the administrator on behalf of the enrollee are current. A
participating managed health care system may offer, without additional cost,
health care benefits or services not included in the schedule of covered
services under the plan. A participating managed health care system shall not
give preference in enrollment to enrollees who accept such additional health
care benefits or services. Managed health care systems participating in the
plan shall not discriminate against any potential or current enrollee based
upon health status, sex, race, ethnicity, or religion. The administrator may
receive and act upon complaints from enrollees regarding failure to provide
covered services or efforts to obtain payment, other than authorized
copayments, for covered services directly from enrollees, but nothing in this
chapter empowers the administrator to impose any sanctions under Title 18 RCW
or any other professional or facility licensing statute.

(2)
The plan shall allow, at least annually, an opportunity for enrollees to
transfer their enrollments among participating managed health care systems
serving their respective areas. The administrator shall establish a period of
at least twenty days in a given year when this opportunity is afforded
enrollees, and in those areas served by more than one participating managed
health care system the administrator shall endeavor to establish a uniform
period for such opportunity. The plan shall allow enrollees to transfer their
enrollment to another participating managed health care system at any time upon
a showing of good cause for the transfer.

((Any
contract between a hospital and a participating managed health care system
under this chapter is subject to the requirements of RCW 70.39.140(1) regarding
negotiated rates.))

(3)
Prior to negotiating with any managed health care system, the administrator
shall determine, on an actuarially sound basis, the reasonable cost of
providing the schedule of basic health care services, expressed in terms of
upper and lower limits, and recognizing variations in the cost of providing the
services through the various systems and in different areas of the state.

(4)
In negotiating with managed health care systems for participation in the plan,
the administrator shall adopt a uniform procedure that includes at least the
following:

(((1)))
(a) The administrator shall issue a request for proposals, including
standards regarding the quality of services to be provided; financial integrity
of the responding systems; and responsiveness to the unmet health care needs of
the local communities or populations that may be served;

(((2)))
(b) The administrator shall then review responsive proposals and may
negotiate with respondents to the extent necessary to refine any proposals;

(((3)))
(c) The administrator may then select one or more systems to provide the
covered services within a local area; and

(((4)))
(d) The administrator may adopt a policy that gives preference to
respondents, such as nonprofit community health clinics, that have a history of
providing quality health care services to low-income persons.

(5)
The administrator may establish procedures and policies to further negotiate
and contract with managed health care systems following completion of the
request for proposal process in subsection (4) of this section, upon a
determination by the administrator that it is necessary to provide access to
covered basic health care services at an affordable price. For purposes of
this section, "access" shall be as defined in the request for
proposals document. "Affordable" means a price which is (a) no less
than one hundred thirty-three percent of the state-wide benchmark price
established through the request for proposals; and (b) no greater than the cost
of providing such services through a self-funded or self-insured method as
provided under RCW 41.05.140.

(6)
The administrator shall establish policies and procedures which enable the
authority, after completion of the request for proposal process and any further
negotiation, to implement a self-funded or self-insured method of providing
insurance coverage to subsidized enrollees as provided under RCW 41.05.140.
The authority shall provide such coverage in a given area within ninety days of
its determination that: (a) No other managed health care system is willing and
able to provide, through an adequate network of health care providers, access
to covered basic health care services for all subsidized enrollees in that area
at an affordable price; and (b) funding for adequate reserves is available in
the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account.

Sec.
5. RCW
41.05.140 and 1994 c 153 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except for property and casualty insurance, the authority may self-fund,
self-insure, or enter into other methods of providing insurance coverage for insurance
programs under its jurisdiction ((except property and casualty insurance)),
including the basic health plan as provided in chapter 70.47 RCW. The
authority shall contract for payment of claims or other administrative services
for programs under its jurisdiction. If a program does not require the
prepayment of reserves, the authority shall establish such reserves within a
reasonable period of time for the payment of claims as are normally required
for that type of insurance under an insured program. The authority shall
endeavor to reimburse basic health plan health care providers under this
section at rates similar to the average reimbursement rates offered by the
state-wide benchmark plan determined through the request for proposal process.

(2)
Reserves established by the authority for employee and retiree benefit programs
shall be held in a separate trust fund by the state treasurer and shall be
known as the public employees' and retirees' insurance reserve fund. The state
investment board shall act as the investor for the funds and, except as
provided in RCW 43.33A.160, one hundred percent of all earnings from these
investments shall accrue directly to the public employees' and retirees'
insurance reserve fund.

(3)
Any savings realized as a result of a program created for employees and
retirees under this section shall not be used to increase benefits unless such
use is authorized by statute.

(4)
Reserves established by the authority to provide insurance coverage for the
basic health plan under chapter 70.47 RCW shall be held in a separate trust
account in the custody of the state treasurer and shall be known as the basic
health plan self-insurance reserve account. The state investment board shall
act as the investor for the funds and, except as provided in RCW 43.33A.160,
one hundred percent of all earnings from these investments shall accrue
directly to the basic health plan self-insurance reserve account.

(5)
Any program created under this section shall be subject to the examination
requirements of chapter 48.03 RCW as if the program were a domestic insurer.
In conducting an examination, the commissioner shall determine the adequacy of
the reserves established for the program.

(((5)))
(6) The authority shall keep full and adequate accounts and records of
the assets, obligations, transactions, and affairs of any program created under
this section.

(((6)))
(7) The authority shall file a quarterly statement of the financial
condition, transactions, and affairs of any program created under this section
in a form and manner prescribed by the insurance commissioner. The statement
shall contain information as required by the commissioner for the type of
insurance being offered under the program. A copy of the annual statement
shall be filed with the speaker of the house of representatives and the
president of the senate.

Sec.
6. RCW
43.79A.040 and 1999 c 384 s 8 and 1999 c 182 s 2 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested, and reinvested
by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and
to the same extent as if the money were in the state treasury.

(2)
All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust fund shall be set
aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment
income account.

(3)
The investment income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased
banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not
limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state
treasurer or affected state agencies. The investment income account is subject
in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution
of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4)(a)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
investment income account to the state general fund except under (b) and (c) of
this subsection.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the
agricultural local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the
basic health plan self-insurance reserve account, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund, the game
farm alternative account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile
accountability incentive account, the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium
and exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility grant account, the
self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, and the
children's trust fund. However, the earnings to be distributed shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.

(c)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way revolving fund, the advanced
environmental mitigation revolving account, the federal narcotics asset
forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle account, the local rail service
assistance account, and the miscellaneous transportation programs account.

(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without
the specific affirmative directive of this section.

---
END ---