BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
It is unlawful for any person to direct light from a laser pointer at a
uniformed police officer, uniformed security guard, uniformed school safety
officer, uniformed traffic enforcement officer, uniformed member of a paid or
volunteer fire department, uniformed emergency medical service worker,
uniformed ambulance worker, or other uniformed city, state, or federal peace
officer, investigator, or emergency service worker, or the marked service
vehicle of any such individual.

(2)
A violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable under RCW 9.92.030.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "laser pointer"
means any device that emits light amplified by the stimulated emission of
radiation that is visible to the human eye.

---
END ---