BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
41.40.188 and 1998 c 340 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Upon retirement for service as prescribed in RCW 41.40.180 or retirement for
disability under RCW 41.40.210 or 41.40.230, a member shall elect to have the
retirement allowance paid pursuant to one of the following options calculated
so as to be actuarially equivalent to each other.

(a)
Standard allowance. A member electing this option shall receive a retirement
allowance payable throughout such member's life. However, if the retiree dies
before the total of the retirement allowance paid to such retiree equals the
amount of such retiree's accumulated contributions at the time of retirement,
then the balance shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or
persons, trust, or organization as the retiree shall have nominated by written
designation duly executed and filed with the department; or if there be no such
designated person or persons still living at the time of the retiree's death,
then to the surviving spouse; or if there be neither such designated person or
persons still living at the time of death nor a surviving spouse, then to the retiree's
legal representative.

(b)
The department shall adopt rules that allow a member to select a retirement
option that pays the member a reduced retirement allowance and upon death, such
portion of the member's reduced retirement allowance as the department by rule
designates shall be continued throughout the life of and paid to a person
nominated by the member by written designation duly executed and filed with the
department at the time of retirement. The options adopted by the department
shall include, but are not limited to, a joint and one hundred percent survivor
option and a joint and fifty percent survivor option.

(c)
A member may elect to include the benefit provided under RCW 41.40.640 along
with the retirement options available under this section. This retirement
allowance option shall be calculated so as to be actuarially equivalent to the
options offered under this subsection.

(2)(a)
A member, if married, must provide the written consent of his or her spouse to
the option selected under this section, except as provided in (b) of this
subsection. If a member is married and both the member and the member's spouse
do not give written consent to an option under this section, the department
shall pay a joint and fifty percent survivor benefit calculated to be
actuarially equivalent to the benefit options available under subsection (1) of
this section unless spousal consent is not required as provided in (b) of this
subsection.

(b)
If a copy of a dissolution order designating a survivor beneficiary under RCW
41.50.790 has been filed with the department at least thirty days prior to a
member's retirement:

(i)
The department shall honor the designation as if made by the member under
subsection (1) of this section; and

(ii)
The spousal consent provisions of (a) of this subsection do not apply.

(3)(a)
Any member who retired before January 1, 1996, and who elected to receive a
reduced retirement allowance under subsection (1)(b) or (2) of this section is
entitled to receive a retirement allowance adjusted in accordance with (b) of
this subsection, if they meet the following conditions:

(i)
The retiree's designated beneficiary predeceases or has predeceased the
retiree; and

(ii)
The retiree provides to the department proper proof of the designated
beneficiary's death.

(b)
The retirement allowance payable to the retiree, as of July 1, 1998, or the
date of the designated beneficiary's death, whichever comes last, shall be
increased by the percentage derived in (c) of this subsection.

(c)
The percentage increase shall be derived by the following:

(i)
One hundred percent multiplied by the result of (c)(ii) of this subsection
converted to a percent;

(ii)
Subtract one from the reciprocal of the appropriate joint and survivor option
factor;

(iii)
The joint and survivor option factor shall be from the table in effect as of
July 1, 1998.

(d)
The adjustment under (b) of this subsection shall accrue from the beginning of
the month following the date of the designated beneficiary's death or from July
1, 1998, whichever comes last.

(e)
A retiree who is receiving state-funded long-term care services is not eligible
for the increase provided by this subsection if the increase would make the
retiree ineligible for state-funded long-term care services. For the purposes
of this subsection (3)(e) "state-funded long-term care services"
means a state-funded adult family home, adult residential care, assisted
living, enhanced adult residential care, in-home care, or nursing home service,
as defined in RCW 74.39A.009, for which the retiree is required to contribute
all income other than a specified amount reserved for the retiree's personal
maintenance needs. Retirees who are subject to this subsection (3)(e) shall
notify the department in writing. The department has no affirmative duty to
identify retirees who are subject to this subsection (3)(e). If a retiree
receives overpayments due to the failure, for any reason, of the department to
withhold payment of the increase, the department shall modify the retirement
allowance on a prospective basis and shall not reduce the retirement allowance
to recover past overpayments.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act applies to all payments under RCW 41.40.188(3) made on or after the
effective date of this act, regardless of the date of retirement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions,
and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---