BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.150.260 and 1997 c 13 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
basic education allocation for each annual average full-time equivalent
student shall be determined in accordance with the following procedures:

(1)
The governor shall and the superintendent of public instruction may recommend
to the legislature a formula based on a ratio of students to staff for the
distribution of a basic education allocation for each annual average full-time
equivalent student enrolled in a common school. The distribution formula shall
have the primary objective of equalizing educational opportunities and shall
provide appropriate recognition of the following costs among the various
districts within the state:

(a)
Certificated instructional staff and their related costs;

(b)
Certificated administrative staff and their related costs;

(c)
Classified staff and their related costs;

(d)
Nonsalary costs;

(e)
Extraordinary costs of remote and necessary schools and small high schools,
including costs of additional certificated and classified staff; and

(f)
The attendance of students pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do
not reside within the servicing school district.

(2)(a)
This formula for distribution of basic education funds shall be reviewed
biennially by the superintendent and governor. The recommended formula shall
be subject to approval, amendment or rejection by the legislature. The formula
shall be for allocation purposes only. While the legislature intends that the
allocations for additional instructional staff be used to increase the ratio of
such staff to students, nothing in this section shall require districts to
reduce the number of administrative staff below existing levels.

(b)
The formula adopted by the legislature shall reflect the following ratios at a
minimum:

(i)
Forty-nine certificated instructional staff to one thousand annual average full-time
equivalent students enrolled in grades kindergarten through three;

(ii)
Forty-six certificated instructional staff to one thousand annual
average full-time equivalent students in grades four through ((twelve))
six. An additional maximum of four certificated instructional staff per one
thousand full-time equivalent students in grades four through six for the
addition of teachers solely to reduce class size. Any funds provided for these
additional four certificated instructional staff units shall not be considered
basic education funding and shall be allocated only if the district documents
an actual ratio equal to or greater than fifty certificated instructional staff
per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades four through six. For any
school district documenting a lower certificated staff ratio, the allocation
shall be based on the higher of the district's actual fourth through sixth
grade ratio or forty-six certificated instructional staff per thousand;

(iii)
Forty-six certificated instructional staff to one thousand annual average
full-time equivalent students in grades seven through twelve;

(iv)
Four certificated administrative staff to one thousand annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades kindergarten through twelve; and

(((iv)))
(v) Sixteen and sixty-seven one-hundredths classified personnel to one
thousand annual average full-time equivalent students enrolled in grades
kindergarten through twelve.

(c)
In the event the legislature rejects the distribution formula recommended by
the governor, without adopting a new distribution formula, the distribution
formula for the previous school year shall remain in effect: PROVIDED, That
the distribution formula developed pursuant to this section shall be for state
apportionment and equalization purposes only and shall not be construed as
mandating specific operational functions of local school districts other than
those program requirements identified in RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.100. The
enrollment of any district shall be the annual average number of full-time
equivalent students and part-time students as provided in RCW
28A.150.350, enrolled on the first school day of each month and shall exclude
full-time equivalent students with disabilities recognized for the
purposes of allocation of state funds for programs under RCW 28A.155.010
through 28A.155.100. The definition of full-time equivalent student
shall be determined by rules of the superintendent of public instruction:
PROVIDED, That the definition shall be included as part of the superintendent's
biennial budget request: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That any revision of the present
definition shall not take effect until approved by the house appropriations
committee and the senate ways and means committee: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the
office of financial management shall make a monthly review of the
superintendent's reported full-time equivalent students in the common
schools in conjunction with RCW 43.62.050.

(3)(a)
Certificated instructional staff shall include those persons employed by a
school district who are nonsupervisory employees within the meaning of RCW
41.59.020(8): PROVIDED, That in exceptional cases, people of unusual
competence but without certification may teach students so long as a
certificated person exercises general supervision: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the
hiring of such classified people shall not occur during a labor dispute and
such classified people shall not be hired to replace certificated employees
during a labor dispute.

(b)
Certificated administrative staff shall include all those persons who are chief
executive officers, chief administrative officers, confidential employees,
supervisors, principals, or assistant principals within the meaning of RCW
41.59.020(4).

(4)
Each annual average full-time equivalent certificated classroom
teacher's direct classroom contact hours shall average at least twenty-five
hours per week. Direct classroom contact hours shall be exclusive of time
required to be spent for preparation, conferences, or any other nonclassroom
instruction duties. Up to two hundred minutes per week may be deducted from
the twenty-five contact hour requirement, at the discretion of the school
district board of directors, to accommodate authorized teacher/parent-guardian
conferences, recess, passing time between classes, and informal instructional
activity. Implementing rules to be adopted by the state board of education
pursuant to RCW 28A.150.220(4) shall provide that compliance with the direct
contact hour requirement shall be based upon teachers' normally assigned weekly
instructional schedules, as assigned by the district administration.
Additional record-keeping by classroom teachers as a means of accounting for
contact hours shall not be required. Waivers from contact hours may be
requested under RCW 28A.305.140.

Sec.
2. RCW
28A.150.260 and 1997 c 13 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
basic education allocation for each annual average full-time equivalent
student shall be determined in accordance with the following procedures:

(1)
The governor shall and the superintendent of public instruction may recommend
to the legislature a formula based on a ratio of students to staff for the
distribution of a basic education allocation for each annual average full-time
equivalent student enrolled in a common school. The distribution formula shall
have the primary objective of equalizing educational opportunities and shall
provide appropriate recognition of the following costs among the various
districts within the state:

(a)
Certificated instructional staff and their related costs;

(b)
Certificated administrative staff and their related costs;

(c)
Classified staff and their related costs;

(d)
Nonsalary costs;

(e)
Extraordinary costs of remote and necessary schools and small high schools,
including costs of additional certificated and classified staff; and

(f)
The attendance of students pursuant to RCW 28A.335.160 and 28A.225.250 who do
not reside within the servicing school district.

(2)(a)
This formula for distribution of basic education funds shall be reviewed
biennially by the superintendent and governor. The recommended formula shall
be subject to approval, amendment or rejection by the legislature. The formula
shall be for allocation purposes only. While the legislature intends that the
allocations for additional instructional staff be used to increase the ratio of
such staff to students, nothing in this section shall require districts to
reduce the number of administrative staff below existing levels.

(b)
The formula adopted by the legislature shall reflect the following ratios at a
minimum:

(i)
Forty-nine certificated instructional staff to one thousand annual average full-time
equivalent students enrolled in grades kindergarten through three;

(ii)
Forty-six certificated instructional staff to one thousand annual
average full-time equivalent students in grades four through ((twelve))
six. An additional maximum of four certificated instructional staff per one
thousand full-time equivalent students in grades four through six for the
addition of teachers solely to reduce class size. Any funds provided for these
additional four certificated instructional staff units shall not be considered
basic education funding and shall be allocated only if the district documents
an actual ratio equal to or greater than fifty certificated instructional staff
per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades four through six. For any
school district documenting a lower certificated staff ratio, the allocation
shall be based on the higher of the district's actual fourth through sixth
grade ratio or forty-six certificated instructional staff per thousand;

(iii)
Forty-six certificated instructional staff to one thousand annual average
full-time equivalent students in grades seven through twelve;

(iv)
Four certificated administrative staff to one thousand annual average full-time
equivalent students in grades kindergarten through twelve; and

(((iv)))
(v) Sixteen and sixty-seven one-hundredths classified personnel to one
thousand annual average full-time equivalent students enrolled in grades
kindergarten through twelve.

(c)
In the event the legislature rejects the distribution formula recommended by
the governor, without adopting a new distribution formula, the distribution
formula for the previous school year shall remain in effect: PROVIDED, That
the distribution formula developed pursuant to this section shall be for state
apportionment and equalization purposes only and shall not be construed as
mandating specific operational functions of local school districts other than
those program requirements identified in RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.100. The
enrollment of any district shall be the annual average number of full-time
equivalent students and part-time students as provided in RCW
28A.150.350, enrolled on the first school day of each month and shall exclude
full-time equivalent students with disabilities recognized for the
purposes of allocation of state funds for programs under RCW 28A.155.010
through 28A.155.100. The definition of full-time equivalent student
shall be determined by rules of the superintendent of public instruction:
PROVIDED, That the definition shall be included as part of the superintendent's
biennial budget request: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That any revision of the present
definition shall not take effect until approved by the house appropriations
committee and the senate ways and means committee: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the
office of financial management shall make a monthly review of the
superintendent's reported full-time equivalent students in the common
schools in conjunction with RCW 43.62.050.

(3)(a)
Certificated instructional staff shall include those persons employed by a
school district who are nonsupervisory employees within the meaning of RCW
41.59.020(8): PROVIDED, That in exceptional cases, people of unusual
competence but without certification may teach students so long as a
certificated person exercises general supervision: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the
hiring of such classified people shall not occur during a labor dispute and
such classified people shall not be hired to replace certificated employees
during a labor dispute.

(b)
Certificated administrative staff shall include all those persons who are chief
executive officers, chief administrative officers, confidential employees,
supervisors, principals, or assistant principals within the meaning of RCW
41.59.020(4).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
sum of ninety-two million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2001, from the general fund to
the office of the superintendent of public instruction for the purposes of this
act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
Section 1 of this act takes effect September 1, 1999.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5.
Section 2 of this act takes effect September 1, 2000. However, section 2 of
this act shall not take effect if, by September 1, 2000, a law is enacted
stating that a school accountability and academic assessment system is not in
place.

---
END ---