BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
59.18.063 and 1997 c 84 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A landlord shall provide, upon the request of a tenant or within
thirty days, whichever is earlier, a written receipt signed by the
landlord for any payments made by the tenant.

---
END ---