BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that: (1) Homeless families with young children are at
significant risk of being unable to develop long-term economic independence;
(2) children in such situations are likely to experience immediate and future
adverse consequences due to potential instability in their living arrangements
and lack of access to services; and (3) homeless families with young children
are inadequately served in terms of access to child care and that such
inadequacy acts to impair the abilities of these families to locate housing,
employment, and other basic family needs. The legislature intends to require
the department of social and health services to dedicate an effort to the
development of a comprehensive, research-based, integrated plan to expand the
availability and delivery of child care services to homeless families with
children. The goals of the plan shall be to increase the stability in the
lives of families, offer safe and nurturing places for children, and provide
expanded opportunities for economic independence.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
For purposes of this section:

(a)
"Homeless family" means a family with children lacking a fixed and
regular nighttime residence or a family whose primary nighttime residence is a:

(i)
Supervised shelter designed to provide temporary accommodations;

(ii)
Halfway house or similar institution providing temporary residence for persons
needing or coming out of institutionalization;

(iii)
Temporary accommodation in the residence of another person for not more than
ninety days; or

(iv)
Place not designed for, or ordinarily used as, a regular sleeping accommodation
for humans; and

(b)
"Child" or "children" means a child or children who have
not reached their fourteenth birthday.

(2)
Not later than June 1, 2000, the secretary shall develop, and present to the
legislature and governor, a plan for determining the need for child care
services for children in homeless families and a method for providing the child
care services.

(3)
The plan shall include the following, at a minimum:

(a)
A determination, by age, of the number of children who are in homeless
families;

(b)
A determination of the number of child care slots which are dedicated to the
children identified in this subsection;

(c)
A determination of how many child care slots in addition to those identified in
(b) of this subsection are necessary to be dedicated to children in homeless
families to reasonably assure that any homeless family which seeks child care
slots and lacks the resources to obtain the slots can obtain state-supported
child care while they are homeless. The dedication of such slots shall not
result in the loss of any child care slots for which state support is
available;

(d)
A cost estimate for providing the slots identified in (c) of this subsection;

(e)
An assumed implementation date of July 1, 2001.

(4)
The plan shall assume that children in homeless families are not eligible to
continue in child care slots dedicated for children in homeless families longer
than thirty calendar days following the date the family is no longer homeless.

(5)
The plan shall assume that children in homeless families are not eligible to
continue in child care slots dedicated for children in homeless families longer
than twelve consecutive months.

(6)
The plan shall be developed in consultation with a representative group of
persons from those entities which provide child care to homeless children.

(7) The department is required to make certain that services
delivered to persons receiving temporary assistance for needy families under
chapter 74.08A RCW, and to persons who are receiving child care support under
the plan developed under this section, are coordinated. The plan shall have a
goal of delivering child care support in a manner that persons enrolled under
chapter 74.08A RCW and are receiving child care support remain, to the greatest
extent possible, eligible for support under both programs as they attempt to
obtain economic independence and stabilized housing.

---
END ---