BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.17.020 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

There
shall be a chief executive officer of each department to be known as: (1) The
secretary of social and health services, (2) the director of ecology, (3) the
director of labor and industries, (4) the director of agriculture, (5) the
director of fish and wildlife, (6) the secretary of transportation, (7) the
director of licensing, (8) the director of general administration, (9) the
director of community, trade, and economic development, (10) the director of
veterans affairs, (11) the director of revenue, (12) the director of retirement
systems, (13) the secretary of corrections, and (14) the secretary of health,
and (15) the director of financial institutions.

Such
officers, except the ((secretary of transportation and the)) director of
fish and wildlife, shall be appointed by the governor, with the consent of the
senate, and hold office at the pleasure of the governor. ((The secretary of
transportation shall be appointed by the transportation commission as
prescribed by RCW 47.01.041.)) The director of fish and wildlife shall be
appointed by the fish and wildlife commission as prescribed by RCW 77.04.055.

Sec.
2. RCW
47.01.041 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 53 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

The
executive head of the department of transportation shall be the secretary of
transportation, who shall be appointed by the ((transportation commission,
and)) governor with the consent of the senate. The secretary shall
be paid a salary to be fixed by the governor in accordance with the provisions
of RCW 43.03.040. ((The secretary shall be an ex officio member of the
commission without a vote. The secretary shall be the chief executive officer
of the commission and be responsible to it, and shall be guided by policies
established by it.)) The secretary shall serve until removed by the ((commission))
governor, but only for incapacity, incompetence, neglect of duty,
malfeasance in office, or failure to carry out the ((commission's)) governor's
policies. Before a motion for dismissal shall be acted on ((by the
commission)), the secretary shall be granted a hearing on formal written
charges before the ((full commission)) state supreme court. An
action by the ((commission)) state supreme court to remove the
secretary shall be final.

Sec.
3. RCW
47.01.101 and 1987 c 505 s 48 and 1987 c 179 s 1 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

The
secretary shall have the authority and it shall be his or her duty, subject to
policy guidance from the ((commission)) governor:

(1)
To serve as chief executive officer of the department with full administrative
authority to direct all its activities;

(2)
To organize the department as he or she may deem necessary to carry out the
work and responsibilities of the department effectively;

(3)
To designate and establish such transportation district or branch offices as
may be necessary or convenient, and to appoint assistants and delegate any
powers, duties, and functions to them or any officer or employee of the
department as deemed necessary to administer the department efficiently;

(4)
To direct and coordinate the programs of the various divisions of the
department to assure that they achieve the greatest possible mutual benefit,
produce a balanced overall effort, and eliminate unnecessary duplication of
activity;

(5)
To adopt all department rules that are subject to the adoption procedures
contained in the state Administrative Procedure Act((,
except rules subject to adoption by the commission pursuant to statute));

(6)
To maintain and safeguard the official records of the department((,
including the commission's recorded resolutions and orders));

(7)
((To provide full staff support to the commission to assist it in carrying
out its functions, powers, and duties and to execute the policy established by
the commission pursuant to its legislative authority;

(8))) To
propose policies to be adopted by the legislature designed to assure the
development and maintenance of a comprehensive and balanced state‑wide
transportation system that will meet the needs of the people of this state for
safe and efficient transportation services. Wherever appropriate the policies
will provide for the use of integrated, intermodal transportation systems to
implement the social, economic, and environmental policies, goals, and
objectives of the people of the state, and especially to conserve nonrenewable
natural resources including land and energy. To this end the secretary shall:

(a)
Develop transportation policies that are based on the policies, goals, and
objectives expressed and inherent in existing state laws;

(b)
Inventory the adopted policies, goals, and objectives of the local and area‑wide
governmental bodies of the state and define the role of the state, regional,
and local governments in determining transportation policies, in transportation
planning, and in implementing the state transportation plan;

(c)
Provide for effective coordination of state transportation planning with
national transportation policy, state and local land use policies, and local
and regional transportation plans and programs;

(d)
Establish a procedure for review and revision of state transportation policies
and for submission of proposed changes to the legislature;

(e)
Integrate the state‑wide transportation plan with the needs of the
elderly and handicapped, and coordinate federal and state programs directed at
assisting local governments to answer such needs;

(f)
Provide for public involvement in transportation designed to elicit the
public's views both with respect to adequate transportation services and
appropriate means of minimizing adverse social, economic, environmental, and
energy impact of transportation programs;

(g)
Provide for the administration of grants-in-aid and other financial assistance
to counties and municipal corporations for transportation purposes;

(h)
Provide for the management, sale, and lease of property or property rights
owned by the department that are not required for transportation purposes;

(i)
Ensure federal laws and regulations relating to the planning, construction, and
operation of transportation facilities are taken into account;

(8)
To approve and propose to the governor and to the legislature before the
convening of each regular session during an odd‑numbered year a
recommended budget for the operation of the department and for carrying out the
program of the department for the ensuing biennium. The proposed budget must
separately state the appropriations to be made from the motor vehicle fund for
highway purposes in accordance with constitutional limitations and
appropriations and expenditures to be made from the general fund, or accounts
thereof, and other available sources for other operations and programs of the
department;

(9)
To review and authorize all departmental requests for legislation;

(10)
To approve the issuance and sale of all bonds authorized by the legislature for
capital construction of state highways, toll facilities, Columbia Basin county
roads (for which reimbursement to the motor vehicle fund has been provided),
urban arterial projects, and aviation facilities;

(11)
To execute and implement the biennial operating budget for the operation of the
department in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW and with legislative
appropriation and, in such manner as prescribed therein, to make and report to
the ((commission)) governor and the chairs of the transportation
committees of the senate and house of representatives, including one copy to
the staff of each of the committees, deviations from the planned biennial ((category
A and H)) highway construction programs necessary to adjust to unexpected
delays or other unanticipated circumstances((.));

(((9)))
(12) To exercise all other powers and perform all other duties as are
now or hereafter provided by law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 47.01 RCW to read as follows:

All
references in the Revised Code of Washington to the transportation commission
that assign committee membership, or administrative or policy-making authority,
are transferred to the secretary of transportation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
47.01.051 (Commission created--Appointment of
members--Terms--Qualifications--Removal) and 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 5;

(2) RCW
47.01.061 (Commission--Procedures and internal operations) and
1987 c 364 s 2, 1984 c 287 s 94, 1983 1st ex.s. c 53 s 29, 1981 c 59 s 1, &
1977 ex.s. c 151 s 6; and

(3) RCW
47.01.071 (Commission--Functions, powers, and duties) and 1981 c
59 s 2, 1980 c 87 s 45, & 1977 ex.s. c 151 s 7.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This
act takes effect January 1, 2000.

---
END ---