BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.09.020 and 1986 c 206 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter the following words and phrases have the designated
meanings unless a different meaning is expressly provided or the context
otherwise clearly indicates:

"Person"
means any individual, firm, partnership, association, or corporation.

"Nonhighway
vehicle" means any motorized vehicle when used for recreation travel on
trails and nonhighway roads or for recreation cross-country travel on any one
of the following or a combination thereof: Land, water, snow, ice, marsh,
swampland, and other natural terrain. Such vehicles include but are not
limited to, off-road vehicles, two, three, or four-wheel vehicles, motorcycles,
four-wheel drive vehicles, dune buggies, amphibious vehicles, ground effects or
air cushion vehicles, and any other means of land transportation deriving
motive power from any source other than muscle or wind.

Nonhighway
vehicle does not include:

(1)
Any vehicle designed primarily for travel on, over, or in the water;

(2)
Snowmobiles or any military vehicles; or

(3)
Any vehicle eligible for a motor vehicle fuel tax exemption or rebate under
chapter 82.36 RCW while an exemption or rebate is claimed. This exemption
includes but is not limited to farm, construction, and logging vehicles.

"Off-road
vehicle" or "ORV" means any nonhighway vehicle when used for
cross-country travel on trails or on any one of the following or a combination
thereof: Land, water, snow, ice, marsh, swampland and other natural terrain.

"ORV
use permit" means a permit issued for operation of an off-road vehicle
under this chapter.

"ORV
trail" means a multiple-use corridor designated and maintained for
recreational travel by off-road vehicles that is not normally suitable for
travel by conventional two-wheel drive vehicles and is posted or designated by
the managing authority of the property that the trail traverses as permitting
ORV travel.

"ORV
use area" means the entire area of a parcel of land except for camping and
approved buffer areas that is posted or designated for ORV use in accordance
with rules adopted by the managing authority.

"ORV
recreation facility" includes ORV trails and ORV use areas that are not
in a governmentally inventoried roadless area.

"Owner"
means the person other than the lienholder, having an interest in or title to a
nonhighway vehicle, and entitled to the use or possession thereof.

"Operator"
means each person who operates, or is in physical control of, any nonhighway
vehicle.

"Dealer"
means a person, partnership, association, or corporation engaged in the
business of selling off-road vehicles at wholesale or retail in this state.

"Department"
means the department of licensing.

"Hunt"
means any effort to kill, injure, capture, or purposely disturb a wild animal
or wild bird.

"Nonhighway
road" means any road owned or managed by a public agency, or any private
road for which the owner has granted a permanent easement for public use of the
road, other than a highway generally capable of travel by a conventional
two-wheel drive passenger automobile during most of the year and in use by such
vehicles and that is not built or maintained with appropriations from the motor
vehicle fund.

"Highway,"
for the purpose of this chapter only, means the entire width between the
boundary lines of every way publicly maintained by the state department of
transportation or any county or city when any part thereof is generally open to
the use of the public for purposes of vehicular travel as a matter of right.

"Organized
competitive event" means any competition, advertised in advance through
written notice to organized clubs or published in local newspapers, sponsored
by recognized clubs, and conducted at a predetermined time and place.

"Nonhighway road recreation facility" includes trails
designated for nonmotorized use.

---
END ---