BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.118.010 and 1977 ex.s. c 133 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that over one million, two hundred thousand persons in the
state are not served by sanitary sewers and that they must rely on septic tank
systems. The failure of large numbers of such systems has resulted in
significant health hazards, loss of property values, and water quality
degradation. The legislature further finds that failure of such systems could
be reduced by utilization of nonwater-carried sewage disposal systems, or other
alternative methods of treatment and effluent disposal, as a
correctional measure. Waste water volume diminution and disposal of most of
the high bacterial waste through composting or other alternative methods of treatment
and effluent disposal would result in restorative improvement or correction
of existing substandard systems.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.118.020 and 1994 c 281 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, the terms defined in this section shall have the meanings
indicated unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.

(1)
"Nonwater-carried sewage disposal devices" means any device that
stores and treats nonwater-carried human urine and feces.

(2)
"Alternative methods of effluent treatment and disposal" means
systems either certified as meeting national sanitation foundation standard
40, or approved by the department of health, or both, including at
least, mound systems, alternating drain fields, anaerobic filters, subsurface
irrigation, evapotranspiration systems, ((and)) aerobic systems,
and proprietary devices.

(3)
"Failure" means: (a) Effluent has been discharged on the surface of
the ground prior to approved treatment; or (b) effluent has percolated to the
surface of the ground; or (c) effluent has contaminated or threatens to
contaminate a ground water supply.

(4)
"Additive" means any commercial product intended to affect the
performance or aesthetics of an on-site sewage disposal system.

(5)
"Department" means the department of health.

(6)
"On-site sewage disposal system" means any system of piping,
treatment devices, or other facilities that convey, store, treat, or dispose of
sewage on the property where it originates or on nearby property under the
control of the user where the system is not connected to a public sewer
system. For purposes of this chapter, an on-site sewage disposal system does
not include indoor plumbing and associated fixtures.

(7)
"Proprietary device" means an on-site septic system in which the
treatment or disposal process is owned by a person or company and has a registered
trademark or patent, or utilizes a trademark as certified by the national
sanitation foundation or other approved testing laboratories testing to
national sanitation foundation standard 40 for class I systems.

(8)
"Chemical additive" means those additives containing acids, bases, or
other chemicals deemed unsafe by the department for use in an on-site sewage
disposal system.

(((8)))
(9) "Additive manufacturer" means any person who manufactures,
formulates, blends, packages, or repackages an additive product for sale, use,
or distribution within the state.

(10)
"Treatment standard 1" means ten or less parts per million
biochemical oxygen demand, ten or less parts per million total suspended
solids, and a fecal count of not more than two hundred.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 70.118 RCW to read as follows:

Counties
must approve a proprietary device or an alternative method of treatment and
effluent disposal for use within the county if the method is certified by the
national sanitation foundation under standard 40 for class I systems or other
certifying agency using the same protocol. The alternative method of treatment
and effluent disposal must be installed in accordance with national sanitation
foundation standard 40 certification, suggested manufacturer's recommendations,
and by a factory certified installer.

Sec.
4. RCW
70.118.050 and 1989 c 349 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

If the legislative authority of a county or city finds that more
restrictive standards than those ((contained in section 2 of this act or those))
adopted by the state board of health ((for systems allowed under section 2
of this act)) or limitations on expansion of a residence are necessary to
ensure protection of the public health, attainment of state water quality
standards, and the protection of shellfish and other public resources, the
legislative authority may adopt ordinances or resolutions setting standards as
they may find necessary for implementing their findings and may preclude the
use of any alternative method of treatment or effluent disposal not meeting
treatment standard 1. The legislative authority may identify the
geographic areas where it is necessary to implement the more restrictive
standards. In addition, the legislative authority may adopt standards for the
design, construction, maintenance, and monitoring of sewage disposal systems in
accordance with the manufacturer's recommendations and the national sanitation
foundation certification or certification by another certifying agency using
national sanitation foundation standard 40 protocol for class I systems.

---
END ---