BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.20.020 and 1991 c 3 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"Aged person" means a person of the age sixty-five years or more, or
a person of less than sixty-five years who by reason of infirmity requires
domiciliary care.

(2)
"Boarding home" means any home or other institution, however named,
which is advertised, announced or maintained for the express or implied purpose
of providing board and domiciliary care to three or more aged persons not related
by blood or marriage to the operator. It shall not include facilities
certified as group training homes pursuant to RCW 71A.22.040, nor any home,
institution or section thereof which is otherwise licensed and regulated under
the provisions of state law providing specifically for the licensing and
regulation of such home, institution or section thereof. Nor shall it include
any independent senior housing, independent living units in continuing care
retirement communities, or other similar living situations including those
subsidized by the department of housing and urban development. It may not
include any unit solely occupied by an independent resident not receiving
domiciliary care regardless if that unit is otherwise included in the licensed
room capacity of the facility. If the unit is shared by more than one person,
any of whom receive domiciliary care, the department has the obligation to
inspect and investigate the unit for the purposes of promoting safe and
adequate care of the individual or individuals receiving domiciliary care.

(3)
"Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation,
company, association, or joint stock association, and the legal successor
thereof.

(4)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health.

(5)
"Department" means the state department of health.

(6)
"Authorized department" means any city, county, city-county health
department or health district authorized by the secretary of health to carry
out the provisions of this chapter.

Sec.
2. RCW
18.20.020 and 1998 c 272 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"Aged person" means a person of the age sixty-five years or more, or
a person of less than sixty-five years who by reason of infirmity requires
domiciliary care.

(2)
"Boarding home" means any home or other institution, however named,
which is advertised, announced or maintained for the express or implied purpose
of providing board and domiciliary care to three or more aged persons not
related by blood or marriage to the operator. It shall not include facilities
certified as group training homes pursuant to RCW 71A.22.040, nor any home,
institution or section thereof which is otherwise licensed and regulated under
the provisions of state law providing specifically for the licensing and
regulation of such home, institution or section thereof. Nor shall it include
any independent senior housing, independent living units in continuing care
retirement communities, or other similar living situations including those
subsidized by the department of housing and urban development. It may not
include any unit solely occupied by an independent resident not receiving
domiciliary care regardless if that unit is otherwise included in the licensed
room capacity of the facility. If the unit is shared by more than one person,
any of whom receive domiciliary care, the department has the obligation to
inspect and investigate the unit for the purposes of promoting safe and
adequate care of the individual or individuals receiving domiciliary care.

(3)
"Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation,
company, association, or joint stock association, and the legal successor
thereof.

(4)
"Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.

(5)
"Department" means the state department of social and health
services.

(6)
"Authorized department" means any city, county, city-county health
department or health district authorized by the secretary to carry out the
provisions of this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
Section 1 of this act takes effect if section 2 of this act is not reauthorized
by the legislature.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4.
Section 2 of this act expires July 1, 2000, unless reauthorized by the
legislature.

---
END ---