BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 48.20 RCW to read as follows:

Notwithstanding
any provision of any disability insurance contract as provided for in this
chapter, benefits shall not be denied thereunder for any health care service
performed by a holder of a license for pharmacy issued pursuant to chapter
18.64 RCW if: (1) The service performed was within the lawful scope of such
person's license; and (2) such contract would have provided benefits if such
service had been performed by a holder of a license issued pursuant to chapter
18.71 RCW: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That no provision of chapter 18.71 RCW shall be
asserted to deny benefits under this section.

The
provisions of this section are intended to be remedial and procedural to the
extent they do not impair the obligation of any existing contract.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 48.21 RCW to read as follows:

Notwithstanding
any provision of any group disability insurance contract or blanket disability
insurance contract as provided for in this chapter, benefits shall not be
denied thereunder for any health service performed by a holder of a license for
pharmacy issued pursuant to chapter 18.64 RCW if: (1) The service performed
was within the lawful scope of such person's license; and (2) such contract
would have provided benefits if such service had been performed by a holder of
a license issued pursuant to chapter 18.71 RCW: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That no
provision of chapter 18.71 RCW shall be asserted to deny benefits under this
section.

The
provisions of this section are intended to be remedial and procedural to the
extent they do not impair the obligation of any existing contract.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 48.44 RCW to read as follows:

Notwithstanding
any provision of this chapter, for any health care service contract thereunder
which is entered into or renewed after the effective date of this act, benefits
shall not be denied under such contract for any health care service performed
by a holder of a license for pharmacy issued pursuant to chapter 18.64 RCW if:
(1) The service performed was within the lawful scope of such person's license;
and (2) such contract would have provided benefits if such service had been
performed by a holder of a license issued pursuant to chapter 18.71 RCW:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That no provision of chapter 18.71 RCW shall be asserted to
deny benefits under this section.

The provisions of this section are intended to be remedial and
procedural to the extent that they do not impair the obligation of any existing
contract.

---
END ---