BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW to read as follows:

In
any civil action brought for damages for the injury or death of a patron of a
commercial establishment, when the injury or death is proximately caused by the
selling of alcohol to that patron, the trier of fact may consider the following:

(1)
The person's appearance at the time the intoxicating liquor was furnished to
that person including but not limited to slurred speech and physical
impairment;

(2)
Evidence of the amount and type of alcohol consumed; and

(3) The length of time the person remained in the establishment
consuming alcohol.

---
END ---