BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
It is a traffic infraction for a person to drive or be in physical control of a
motor vehicle after consuming alcohol if the person operates or is in physical
control of a motor vehicle within this state and the person:

(a)
Is age twenty-one or over; and

(b)
Has, within two hours after operating or being in physical control of the motor
vehicle, an alcohol concentration of at least 0.02 but less than the concentration
specified in RCW 46.61.502, as shown by analysis of the person's breath or
blood made under RCW 46.61.506. Before a law enforcement officer may
administer a test or tests of breath or blood, the officer must have reasonable
grounds to believe the person to have been driving or in actual physical
control of a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug.

(2)
The department shall suspend for thirty days the license or permit to drive, or
the nonresident driving privilege, of a person found to have committed a
violation of this section.

(3) The legislature respectfully requests that the supreme court,
as provided by RCW 46.63.110, set the penalty for a violation of this section
at five hundred dollars.

---
END ---