BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A social host who furnishes alcohol is civilly liable to any injured individual
or his or her estate for injury to such individual or damage to property
suffered, including any action for wrongful death, when the intoxication of the
person to whom the social host furnished alcohol was a proximate cause of the
injury, death, or property damage and:

(a)
It is proven that the social host knew or reasonably should have known that the
person to whom he or she furnished alcohol was intoxicated; and

(b)
The civil action is commenced within one year of the date of furnishing the
alcohol.

(2) It is an affirmative defense to an action brought under this
section that the social host had a reasonable belief the person to whom he or
she furnished alcohol would not drive a vehicle while under the influence of or
affected by the alcohol.

---
END ---