BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.53.010 and 1989 c 36 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The practice of optometry is defined as the examination of the human eye, the
examination and ascertaining any defects of the human vision system ((and)),
the analysis of the process of vision, and the treatment of the human eye
and the human vision system. The practice of optometry ((may))
includes, but is not ((necessarily be)) limited to, the
following:

(a)
The employment of any objective or subjective means or method, including
the use of drugs ((topically applied to the eye)), for diagnostic
and therapeutic purposes by those licensed under this chapter and who meet the
requirements of subsections (2) and (3) of this section, and the use of any
diagnostic instruments or devices for the examination or analysis of the human
vision system, the measurement of the powers or range of human vision, or the
determination of the refractive powers of the human eye or its functions in
general; and

(b)
The prescription and fitting of lenses, prisms, therapeutic or refractive
contact lenses and the adaption or adjustment of frames and lenses used in
connection therewith; and

(c)
The prescription and provision of visual therapy, therapeutic aids, and
other optical devices((, and the treatment with topically applied drugs by
those licensed under this chapter and who meet the requirements of subsections
(2) and (3) of this section)); and

(d)
The ascertainment of the perceptive, neural, muscular, or pathological
condition of the visual system; and

(e)
The adaptation of prosthetic eyes.

(2)(a)
Those persons using drugs for diagnostic purposes in the practice of optometry
shall have a minimum of sixty hours of didactic and clinical instruction in
general and ocular pharmacology as applied to optometry((, and for
therapeutic purposes, an additional minimum of seventy-five hours of didactic
and clinical instruction)) as established by the board, and certification
from an institution of higher learning, accredited by those agencies recognized
by the United States office of education or the council on postsecondary
accreditation to qualify for certification by the optometry board of Washington
to use drugs for diagnostic and therapeutic purposes.

(b)
Those persons using or prescribing topical drugs for therapeutic purposes in
the practice of optometry shall be certified under (a) of this subsection, and
shall have an additional minimum of seventy-five hours of didactic and clinical
instruction as established by the board, and certification from an institution
of higher learning, accredited by those agencies recognized by the United
States office of education or the council on postsecondary accreditation to
qualify for certification by the optometry board of Washington to use drugs for
therapeutic purposes.

(c)
Those persons using or prescribing drugs administered orally for therapeutic
purposes in the practice of optometry shall be certified under (b) of this
subsection, and shall have an additional minimum of twenty hours of didactic
and clinical instruction as established by the board, and certification from an
institution of higher learning, accredited by those agencies recognized by the
United States office of education or the council on postsecondary accreditation
to qualify for certification by the optometry board of Washington to use drugs
administered orally for therapeutic purposes.

(d)
Such course or courses shall be the fiscal responsibility of the participating
and attending optometrist.

(3)
The board shall establish a schedule of drugs for diagnostic and treatment
purposes limited to the practice of optometry, and no person licensed pursuant
to this chapter shall prescribe, dispense, purchase, possess, or administer
drugs except as authorized and to the extent permitted by the board.

(a)
The board shall establish, by rule, specific guidelines for the prescription
and administration of drugs by optometrists, so that licensed optometrists and
persons filling their prescriptions have a clear understanding of which drugs
and which dosages or forms are included in the authority granted by this
section.

(b)
Optometrists shall not prescribe, dispense, or administer a controlled
substance for pain for more than seven days in treating a particular patient
for a single trauma, episode, or condition. Following seven days, if a
patient's condition has not improved and requires further treatment the
optometrist must consult with the ophthalmologist identified in the protocol.
Optometrists may only prescribe, dispense, or administer Schedule II controlled
substances subject to a protocol between the optometrist and an ophthalmologist
licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW. The board, the medical quality
assurance commission, and the board of osteopathic medicine and surgery shall
adopt rules for establishing protocols. The board with the board of pharmacy
shall establish by rule a formulary of controlled substances for the treatment
of pain.

(c)
The prescription or administration of drugs as authorized in this section is
specifically limited to those drugs appropriate to treatment of diseases or
conditions of the vision system that are within the scope of practice of
optometry. Optometrists shall not administer drugs by injection. The
prescription or administration of drugs for any other purpose is not authorized
by this section.

(4)
The board shall develop a means of identification and verification of
optometrists certified to use therapeutic drugs for the purpose of issuing
prescriptions as authorized by this section.

Sec.
2. RCW
18.53.140 and 1991 c 3 s 138 are each amended to read as follows:

It
shall be unlawful for any person:

(1)
To sell or barter, or offer to sell or barter any license issued by the
secretary; or

(2)
To purchase or procure by barter any license with the intent to use the same as
evidence of the holder's qualification to practice optometry; or

(3)
To alter with fraudulent intent in any material regard such license; or

(4)
To use or attempt to use any such license which has been purchased,
fraudulently issued, counterfeited or materially altered as a valid license; or

(5)
To practice optometry under a false or assumed name, or as a representative or
agent of any person, firm or corporation with which the licensee has no
connection: PROVIDED, Nothing in this chapter nor in the optometry law shall
make it unlawful for any lawfully licensed optometrist or association of
lawfully licensed optometrists to practice optometry under the name of any
lawfully licensed optometrist who may transfer by inheritance or otherwise the
right to use such name; or

(6)
To practice optometry in this state either for him or herself or any other
individual, corporation, partnership, group, public or private entity, or any
member of the licensed healing arts without having at the time of so doing a
valid license issued by the secretary of health; or

(7)
To in any manner barter or give away as premiums either on his own account or
as agent or representative for any other purpose, firm or corporation, any
eyeglasses, spectacles, lenses or frames; or

(8)
To use drugs in the practice of optometry, except ((those topically applied
for diagnostic or therapeutic purposes)) as authorized under RCW 18.53.010;
or

(9)
To use advertising whether printed, radio, display, or of any other nature,
which is misleading or inaccurate in any material particular, nor shall any
such person in any way misrepresent any goods or services (including but
without limitation, its use, trademark, grade, quality, size, origin,
substance, character, nature, finish, material, content, or preparation) or
credit terms, values, policies, services, or the nature or form of the business
conducted; or

(10)
To advertise the "free examination of eyes," "free
consultation," "consultation without obligation," "free
advice," or any words or phrases of similar import which convey the
impression to the public that eyes are examined free or of a character tending
to deceive or mislead the public, or in the nature of "bait
advertising;" or

(11)
To use an advertisement of a frame or mounting which is not truthful in
describing the frame or mounting and all its component parts. Or advertise a
frame or mounting at a price, unless it shall be depicted in the advertisement
without lenses inserted, and in addition the advertisement must contain a
statement immediately following, or adjacent to the advertised price, that the
price is for frame or mounting only, and does not include lenses, eye examination
and professional services, which statement shall appear in type as large as
that used for the price, or advertise lenses or complete glasses, viz.: frame
or mounting with lenses included, at a price either alone or in conjunction
with professional services; or

(12)
To use advertising, whether printed, radio, display, or of any other nature,
which inaccurately lays claim to a policy or continuing practice of generally
underselling competitors; or

(13)
To use advertising, whether printed, radio, display or of any other nature
which refers inaccurately in any material particular to any competitors or
their goods, prices, values, credit terms, policies or services; or

(14)
To use advertising whether printed, radio, display, or of any other nature, which
states any definite amount of money as "down payment" and any
definite amount of money as a subsequent payment, be it daily, weekly, monthly,
or at the end of any period of time.

Sec.
3. RCW
69.41.030 and 1996 c 178 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

It
shall be unlawful for any person to sell, deliver, or possess any legend drug
except upon the order or prescription of a physician under chapter 18.71 RCW,
an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW, an optometrist
licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under
RCW 18.53.010, a dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW, a podiatric physician and
surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW, a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW, a
commissioned medical or dental officer in the United States armed forces or
public health service in the discharge of his or her official duties, a duly
licensed physician or dentist employed by the veterans administration in the
discharge of his or her official duties, a registered nurse or advanced
registered nurse practitioner under chapter 18.79 RCW when authorized by the
nursing care quality assurance commission, an osteopathic physician assistant
under chapter 18.57A RCW when authorized by the board of osteopathic medicine
and surgery, a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW when authorized by
the medical quality assurance commission, a physician licensed to practice
medicine and surgery or a physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine
and surgery, a dentist licensed to practice dentistry, a podiatric physician
and surgeon licensed to practice podiatric medicine and surgery, or a
veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary medicine, in any province of
Canada which shares a common border with the state of Washington or in any
state of the United States: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the above provisions shall
not apply to sale, delivery, or possession by drug wholesalers or drug
manufacturers, or their agents or employees, or to any practitioner acting within
the scope of his or her license, or to a common or contract carrier or
warehouseman, or any employee thereof, whose possession of any legend drug is
in the usual course of business or employment: PROVIDED FURTHER, That nothing
in this chapter or chapter 18.64 RCW shall prevent a family planning clinic
that is under contract with the department of social and health services from
selling, delivering, possessing, and dispensing commercially prepackaged oral
contraceptives prescribed by authorized, licensed health care practitioners.

Sec.
4. RCW
69.50.101 and 1998 c 222 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, definitions of terms shall be as
indicated where used in this chapter:

(a)
"Administer" means to apply a controlled substance, whether by
injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, directly to the body of a
patient or research subject by:

(1)
a practitioner authorized to prescribe (or, by the practitioner's authorized
agent); or

(2)
the patient or research subject at the direction and in the presence of the
practitioner.

(b)
"Agent" means an authorized person who acts on behalf of or at the
direction of a manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser. It does not include a
common or contract carrier, public warehouseperson, or employee of the carrier
or warehouseperson.

(c)
"Board" means the state board of pharmacy.

(d)
"Controlled substance" means a drug, substance, or immediate
precursor included in Schedules I through V as set forth in federal or state
laws, or federal or board rules.

(e)(1)
"Controlled substance analog" means a substance the chemical
structure of which is substantially similar to the chemical structure of a
controlled substance in Schedule I or II and:

(i)
that has a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central
nervous system substantially similar to the stimulant, depressant, or
hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of a controlled substance
included in Schedule I or II; or

(ii)
with respect to a particular individual, that the individual represents or
intends to have a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the
central nervous system substantially similar to the stimulant, depressant, or
hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of a controlled substance
included in Schedule I or II.

(2)
The term does not include:

(i)
a controlled substance;

(ii)
a substance for which there is an approved new drug application;

(iii)
a substance with respect to which an exemption is in effect for investigational
use by a particular person under Section 505 of the federal Food, Drug and
Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 355, to the extent conduct with respect to the
substance is pursuant to the exemption; or

(iv)
any substance to the extent not intended for human consumption before an
exemption takes effect with respect to the substance.

(f)
"Deliver" or "delivery," means the actual or constructive
transfer from one person to another of a substance, whether or not there is an
agency relationship.

(g)
"Department" means the department of health.

(h)
"Dispense" means the interpretation of a prescription or order for a
controlled substance and, pursuant to that prescription or order, the proper
selection, measuring, compounding, labeling, or packaging necessary to prepare
that prescription or order for delivery.

(i)
"Dispenser" means a practitioner who dispenses.

(j)
"Distribute" means to deliver other than by administering or
dispensing a controlled substance.

(k)
"Distributor" means a person who distributes.

(l)
"Drug" means (1) a controlled substance recognized as a drug in the
official United States pharmacopoeia/national formulary or the official
homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, or any supplement to them; (2)
controlled substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation,
treatment, or prevention of disease in individuals or animals; (3) controlled
substances (other than food) intended to affect the structure or any function
of the body of individuals or animals; and (4) controlled substances intended
for use as a component of any article specified in (1), (2), or (3) of this
subsection. The term does not include devices or their components, parts, or
accessories.

(m)
"Drug enforcement administration" means the drug enforcement
administration in the United States Department of Justice, or its successor
agency.

(n)
"Immediate precursor" means a substance:

(1)
that the state board of pharmacy has found to be and by rule designates as
being the principal compound commonly used, or produced primarily for use, in
the manufacture of a controlled substance;

(2)
that is an immediate chemical intermediary used or likely to be used in the
manufacture of a controlled substance; and

(3)
the control of which is necessary to prevent, curtail, or limit the manufacture
of the controlled substance.

(o)
"Isomer" means an optical isomer, but in RCW 69.50.101(r)(5),
69.50.204(a) (12) and (34), and 69.50.206(a)(4), the term includes any
geometrical isomer; in RCW 69.50.204(a) (8) and (42), and 69.50.210(c) the term
includes any positional isomer; and in RCW 69.50.204(a)(35), 69.50.204(c), and
69.50.208(a) the term includes any positional or geometric isomer.

(p)
"Manufacture" means the production, preparation, propagation,
compounding, conversion, or processing of a controlled substance, either
directly or indirectly or by extraction from substances of natural origin, or
independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction
and chemical synthesis, and includes any packaging or repackaging of the
substance or labeling or relabeling of its container. The term does not
include the preparation, compounding, packaging, repackaging, labeling, or
relabeling of a controlled substance:

(1)
by a practitioner as an incident to the practitioner's administering or
dispensing of a controlled substance in the course of the practitioner's
professional practice; or

(2)
by a practitioner, or by the practitioner's authorized agent under the
practitioner's supervision, for the purpose of, or as an incident to, research,
teaching, or chemical analysis and not for sale.

(q)
"Marijuana" or "marihuana" means all parts of the plant
Cannabis, whether growing or not; the seeds thereof; the resin extracted from
any part of the plant; and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative,
mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seeds or resin. The term does not
include the mature stalks of the plant, fiber produced from the stalks, oil or
cake made from the seeds of the plant, any other compound, manufacture, salt,
derivative, mixture, or preparation of the mature stalks (except the resin
extracted therefrom), fiber, oil, or cake, or the sterilized seed of the plant
which is incapable of germination.

(r)
"Narcotic drug" means any of the following, whether produced directly
or indirectly by extraction from substances of vegetable origin, or
independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction
and chemical synthesis:

(1)
Opium, opium derivative, and any derivative of opium or opium derivative,
including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, whenever the existence of
the salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific
chemical designation. The term does not include the isoquinoline alkaloids of
opium.

(2)
Synthetic opiate and any derivative of synthetic opiate, including their
isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers,
whenever the existence of the isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible
within the specific chemical designation.

(3)
Poppy straw and concentrate of poppy straw.

(4)
Coca leaves, except coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves from which cocaine,
ecgonine, and derivatives or ecgonine or their salts have been removed.

(5)
Cocaine, or any salt, isomer, or salt of isomer thereof.

(6)
Cocaine base.

(7)
Ecgonine, or any derivative, salt, isomer, or salt of isomer thereof.

(8)
Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any quantity of any substance
referred to in subparagraphs (1) through (7).

(s)
"Opiate" means any substance having an addiction-forming or
addiction-sustaining liability similar to morphine or being capable of
conversion into a drug having addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining
liability. The term includes opium, substances derived from opium (opium
derivatives), and synthetic opiates. The term does not include, unless
specifically designated as controlled under RCW 69.50.201, the dextrorotatory
isomer of 3-methoxy-n-methylmorphinan and its salts (dextromethorphan). The
term includes the racemic and levorotatory forms of dextromethorphan.

(t)
"Opium poppy" means the plant of the species Papaver somniferum L.,
except its seeds.

(u)
"Person" means individual, corporation, business trust, estate,
trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government, governmental
subdivision or agency, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(v)
"Poppy straw" means all parts, except the seeds, of the opium poppy,
after mowing.

(w)
"Practitioner" means:

(1)
A physician under chapter 18.71 RCW, a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A
RCW, an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW, an
optometrist licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry
board under RCW 18.53.010 subject to any limitations in RCW 18.53.010, a
dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW, a podiatric physician and surgeon under
chapter 18.22 RCW, a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW, a registered nurse,
advanced registered nurse practitioner, or licensed practical nurse under
chapter 18.79 RCW, a pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW or a scientific
investigator under this chapter, licensed, registered or otherwise permitted
insofar as is consistent with those licensing laws to distribute, dispense,
conduct research with respect to or administer a controlled substance in the
course of their professional practice or research in this state.

(2)
A pharmacy, hospital or other institution licensed, registered, or otherwise
permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or to
administer a controlled substance in the course of professional practice or
research in this state.

(3)
A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery, a physician licensed to
practice osteopathic medicine and surgery, a dentist licensed to practice dentistry,
a podiatric physician and surgeon licensed to practice podiatric medicine and
surgery, or a veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary medicine in any
state of the United States.

(x)
"Prescription" means an order for controlled substances issued by a
practitioner duly authorized by law or rule in the state of Washington to
prescribe controlled substances within the scope of his or her professional
practice for a legitimate medical purpose.

(y)
"Production" includes the manufacturing, planting, cultivating,
growing, or harvesting of a controlled substance.

(z)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.

(aa)
"State," unless the context otherwise requires, means a state of the
United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or a
territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United
States.

(bb)
"Ultimate user" means an individual who lawfully possesses a
controlled substance for the individual's own use or for the use of a member of
the individual's household or for administering to an animal owned by the
individual or by a member of the individual's household.

(cc)
"Electronic communication of prescription information" means the
communication of prescription information by computer, or the transmission of
an exact visual image of a prescription by facsimile, or other electronic means
for original prescription information or prescription refill information for a
Schedule III-V controlled substance between an authorized practitioner and a
pharmacy or the transfer of prescription information for a controlled substance
from one pharmacy to another pharmacy.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---