BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
31.04.105 and 1998 c 28 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
licensee may:

(1)
Lend money at a rate that does not exceed twenty-five percent per annum as
determined by the simple interest method of calculating interest owed;

(2)
In connection with the making of a loan, charge the borrower a nonrefundable,
prepaid, loan origination fee not to exceed ((four)) six percent
((of the first twenty thousand dollars and two percent thereafter)) of
the principal amount of the loan advanced to or for the direct benefit of the
borrower, which fee may be included in the principal balance of the loan;

(3)
Agree with the borrower for the payment of fees to third parties other than the
licensee who provide goods or services to the licensee in connection with the
preparation of the borrower's loan, including, but not limited to, credit
reporting agencies, title companies, appraisers, structural and pest
inspectors, and escrow companies, when such fees are actually paid by the
licensee to a third party for such services or purposes and may include such
fees in the amount of the loan. However, no charge may be collected unless a
loan is made, except for reasonable fees properly incurred in connection with
the appraisal of property by a qualified, independent, professional,
third-party appraiser selected by the borrower and approved by the lender or in
the absence of borrower selection, selected by the lender;

(4)
Charge and collect a penalty of ten cents or less on each dollar of any
installment payment delinquent ten days or more;

(5)
Collect from the debtor reasonable attorneys' fees, actual expenses, and costs
incurred in connection with the collection of a delinquent debt, a
repossession, or a foreclosure when a debt is referred for collection to an
attorney who is not a salaried employee of the licensee;

(6)
Make open-end loans as provided in this chapter;

(7)
Charge and collect a fee for dishonored checks in an amount approved by the
director; and

(8) In accordance with Title 48 RCW, sell insurance covering real
and personal property, covering the life or disability or both of the borrower,
and covering the involuntary unemployment of the borrower.

---
END ---