BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall, by September 1, 1999, adopt emergency rules revising the
bloodborne pathogen standard governing occupational exposure to blood and other
potentially infectious materials in accordance with subsection (3) of this
section. Following adoption of the emergency rules, the department shall
complete the rule adoption process and formally adopt rules embodying a
bloodborne pathogen standard meeting the requirements of subsection (4) of this
section. This permanent rule shall become operative within six months of the
date the emergency rules were issued. The emergency rules adopted under this
section shall remain in effect until the permanent rules become operative.

(2)
The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.

(a)
"Bloodborne pathogens" means pathogenic microorganisms that are
present in human blood and can cause disease in humans. These pathogens
include, but are not limited to, hepatitis B virus, hepatitis C virus, and
human immunodeficiency virus.

(b)
"Employer" means each employer having an employee with occupational
exposure to human blood or other material potentially containing bloodborne
pathogens.

(c)
"Engineering controls" means controls including, but not limited to,
needleless systems and sharps with engineered sharps injury protection that
isolate or remove the bloodborne pathogens hazard from the workplace.

(d)
"Engineered sharps injury protection" means either:

(i)
A physical attribute built into a needle device used for withdrawing body
fluids, accessing a vein or artery, or administering medications or other
fluids, that effectively reduces the risk of an exposure incident by a
mechanism such as barrier creation, blunting, encapsulation, withdrawal,
retraction, destruction, or other effective mechanisms; or

(ii)
A physical attribute built into any other type of needle device, or into a nonneedle
sharp, which effectively reduces the risk of an exposure incident.

(e)
"Front-line health care worker" means a nonmanagerial employee
responsible for direct patient care with potential occupational exposure to
sharps-related injuries.

(f)
"Needleless system" means a device that does not use needles for:

(i)
The withdrawal of body fluids after initial venous or arterial access is
established;

(ii)
The administration of medication or fluids; and

(iii)
Any other procedure involving the potential for an exposure incident.

(g)
"Sharp" means any object used or encountered in a health care setting
that can be reasonably anticipated to penetrate the skin or any other part of
the body, and to result in an exposure incident, including, but not limited to,
needle devices, scalpels, lancets, broken capillary tubes, exposed ends of
dental wires and dental knives, drills, and burs.

(h)
"Sharps injury" means any injury caused by a sharp, including, but
not limited to, cuts, abrasions, or needle sticks.

(i)
"Sharps injury log" means a written or electronic record satisfying
the requirements of subsection (4)(d) of this section.

(j)
"Small business" means an employer subject to this section with less
than eleven employees at any time during the calendar year immediately
preceding the current calendar year.

(3)
The emergency rules adopted under subsection (1) of this section shall require
each employer to conduct product evaluations of needleless systems and sharps,
with engineered sharps injury protections commencing by the effective date of
the emergency rules. Product evaluations should include, but not be limited
to, the following categories of devices as used in the employer's facilities:

(a)
I.V. catheters;

(b)
I.V. access devices and I.V. connectors;

(c)
Vacuum-tube blood collection devices;

(d)
Blood-drawing devices such as phlebotomy needle/tube holders, butterfly-type
devices, and syringes;

(e)
Syringes used for purposes other than blood drawing;

(f)
Suture needles;

(g)
Scalpel devices; and

(h)
Any other category of device used at the employer's facility where there is a
sharps injury risk.

For
each category of device, product evaluations should be conducted by front-line
health care workers representing all wards and medical specialties where they
are used. The product evaluation period should continue for not less than six
months from the date of commencement.

(4)
The department shall adopt a standard, as described in subsection (1) of this
section, to be developed within six months of the date the emergency rules were
issued. However, any violation of this standard within six months of the
effective date may result only in a warning being issued to the offending
employer. The standard shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a)
A requirement that needleless systems and sharps with engineered sharps injury
protection be included as engineering and work practice controls. However, the
engineering control is not required if:

(i)
It is not available in the marketplace;

(ii)
An evaluation committee, established by the employer, at least half the members
of which are front-line health care workers from a variety of occupational
classifications and departments, including but not limited to nurses, nurses
aides, technicians, phlybotomists, and physicians, determines by means of
objective product evaluation criteria that use of such devices will jeopardize
patient or employee safety with regard to a specific medical procedure; or

(iii)
The employer can demonstrate by means of objective product evaluation criteria
that the engineering control is not more effective in preventing exposure
incidents than the alternative used by the employer. In making this
determination, the employer must certify:

(A)
That the employees using the engineering controls were adequately trained and
demonstrated proficiency in utilizing the device before implementation in
patient care settings; and

(B)
That the device has been used for a period of time sufficient to allow for the
normal adjustment period after implementation of new devices.

(b)
A requirement that written exposure control plans include an effective
procedure for identifying and selecting existing needleless systems and sharps
with engineered sharps injury protection. Any procedure adopted should provide
that the evaluation committee described in (a) of this subsection has
responsibility for identifying and selecting such devices;

(c)
A requirement that written exposure control plans be updated when necessary to
reflect progress in implementing needleless systems and sharps with engineered
sharps injury protection as determined by the evaluation committee described in
(a) of this subsection, but in no event should updating occur less than once
every year;

(d)
A requirement that information concerning exposure incidents be recorded in a
sharps injury log, including, but not limited to:

(i)
Date and time of the exposure incident;

(ii)
Type and brand of sharp involved in the exposure incident; and

(iii)
Description of the exposure incident that shall include:

(A)
Job classification of the exposed employee;

(B)
Department or work area where the exposure incident occurred;

(C)
The procedure that the exposed employee was performing at the time of the
incident;

(D)
How the incident occurred;

(E)
The body part involved in the exposure incident;

(F)
If the sharp had engineered sharps injury protection, whether the protective
mechanism was activated, and whether the injury occurred before the protective
mechanism was activated, during activation of the mechanism or after activation
of the mechanism;

(G)
If the sharp had no engineered sharps injury protection, the injured employee's
opinion as to whether and how such a mechanism could have prevented the injury,
as well as the basis for the opinion; and

(H)
The employee's opinion about whether any other engineering, administrative, or
work practice control could have prevented the injury, as well as the basis for
the opinion.

(5)
In complying with this section, a small business may:

(a)
Evaluate new technology through its own evaluation committee, a joint
evaluation committee, established by multiple small business employers, at
least half the members of which are front-line health care workers, or an
evaluation committee established under the auspices of the department, at least
half the members of which are front-line health care workers;

(b)
Use a joint evaluation committee to develop and update the written procedure
for identifying and selecting devices as required by subsection (4)(b) and (c)
of this section; and

(c)
Comply with provisions of subsection (4)(d) of this section by recording the
required sharps injury data in its OSHA 200 log.

(6)
The department shall: Promulgate additional amendments to the bloodborne
pathogen standard necessary to implement this section; and, to the extent that
funds are available, evaluate the impact of this section on the reduction of
needle stick and sharps injuries and costs of employer operations.

(7) The department of health shall compile and maintain a list of
existing needleless systems and sharps with engineered sharps injury
protection, that is available to assist employers in complying with the
requirements of the bloodborne pathogen standard adopted under this section.
The list may be developed from existing sources of information including, but
not limited to, the federal food and drug administration, the federal centers
for disease control, the national institute of occupational safety and health,
and the United States department of veterans affairs.

---
END ---