BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.155.020 and 1993 c 507 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

A
person who holds a license issued under RCW ((82.24.520)) 82.24.510(1)(b)
or 82.24.530 shall:

(1)
Display the license or a copy in a prominent location at the outlet for which
the license is issued; and

(2)
Display a sign concerning the prohibition of tobacco sales to minors.

Such
sign ((shall)) must:

(a)
Be posted so that it is clearly visible to anyone purchasing tobacco products
from the licensee;

(b)
Be designed and produced by the department of health to read: "THE SALE
OF TOBACCO PRODUCTS TO PERSONS UNDER AGE 18 IS STRICTLY PROHIBITED BY STATE
LAW. IF YOU ARE UNDER 18, YOU COULD BE PENALIZED FOR PURCHASING OR
POSSESSING A TOBACCO PRODUCT; PHOTO ID REQUIRED"; and

(c)
Be provided free of charge by the liquor control board.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.155.030 and 1994 c 202 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No person shall sell or permit to be sold any tobacco product through any
device that mechanically dispenses tobacco products unless the device is
located fully within premises from which minors are prohibited or in industrial
worksites where minors are not employed and not less than ten feet from all
entrance or exit ways to and from each premise. The board shall adopt rules
that allow an exception to the requirement that a device be located not less
than ten feet from all entrance or exit ways to and from a premise if it is
architecturally impractical for the device to be located not less than ten feet
from all entrance and exit ways.

(2)
Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, beginning July 1, 2001,
self-service displays of tobacco products are prohibited. All in-store tobacco
products must be sold from behind the counter or from within locked display
units. This section does not apply to retailers who sell tobacco products
exclusively. Further, this section does not apply to sales from within
premises where minors are prohibited by statute.

Sec.
3. RCW
70.155.040 and 1993 c 507 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No person shall sell or permit to be sold cigarettes not in the original
unopened packages or containers to which the stamps required by
RCW 82.24.060 have been affixed.

(2)
Packages of fewer than twenty cigarettes may be sold only in premises where
minors are prohibited by statute.

(3)
This section does not apply to the sale of loose leaf tobacco by a retail
business that generates a minimum of sixty percent of annual gross sales from
the sale of tobacco products.

Sec.
4. RCW
70.155.050 and 1993 c 507 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No person may engage in the business of sampling tobacco products within
the state unless licensed to do so by the board. If a firm contracts with a
manufacturer to distribute samples of the manufacturer's products, that firm is
deemed to be the person engaged in the business of sampling.

(2)
The board shall issue a license to a sampler not otherwise disqualified by RCW
70.155.100 upon application and payment of the fee.

(3)
A sampler's license expires on the thirtieth day of June of each year and must
be renewed annually upon payment of the appropriate fee.

(4)
The board shall annually determine the fee for a sampler's license and each
renewal. However, the fee for a manufacturer whose employees distribute
samples within the state is five hundred dollars per annum, and the fee for all
other samplers must be not less than fifty dollars per annum.

(5)
A sampler's license entitles the licensee, and employees or agents of the
licensee, to distribute samples at any lawful location in the state during the
term of the license. A person engaged in sampling under the license shall
carry the license or a copy at all times.

Sec.
5. RCW
70.155.100 and 1998 c 133 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The liquor control board may suspend or revoke a retailer's license held by a
business at any location, or may impose a monetary penalty as set forth in
subsection (2) of this section, if the liquor control board finds that the
licensee has violated RCW 26.28.080, 70.155.020, 70.155.030, 70.155.040,
70.155.050, 70.155.060, 70.155.070, or 70.155.090.

(2)
The sanctions that the liquor control board may impose against a person
licensed under RCW 82.24.530 and 70.155.050 and 70.155.060 based upon one or
more findings under subsection (1) of this section may not exceed the
following:

(a)
For violation of RCW 26.28.080 or 70.155.020:

(i)
A monetary penalty of one hundred dollars for the first violation within any
two-year period;

(ii)
A monetary penalty of three hundred dollars for the second violation within any
two-year period;

(iii)
A monetary penalty of one thousand dollars and suspension of the license for a
period of six months for the third violation within any two-year period;

(iv)
A monetary penalty of one thousand five hundred dollars and suspension of the
license for a period of twelve months for the fourth violation within any
two-year period;

(v)
Revocation of the license with no possibility of reinstatement for a period of
five years for the fifth or more violation within any two-year period;

(b)
For violations of RCW 70.155.030, a monetary penalty in the amount of one
hundred dollars for each day upon which such violation occurred;

(c)
For violations of RCW 70.155.040 occurring on the licensed premises:

(i)
A monetary penalty of one hundred dollars for the first violation within any
two-year period;

(ii)
A monetary penalty of three hundred dollars for the second violation within any
two-year period;

(iii)
A monetary penalty of one thousand dollars and suspension of the license for a
period of six months for the third violation within any two-year period;

(iv)
A monetary penalty of one thousand five hundred dollars and suspension of the
license for a period of twelve months for the fourth violation within any
two-year period;

(v)
Revocation of the license with no possibility of reinstatement for a period of
five years for the fifth or more violation within any two-year period;

(d)
For violations of RCW 70.155.050 and 70.155.060, a monetary penalty in the
amount of three hundred dollars for each violation;

(e)
For violations of RCW 70.155.070, a monetary penalty in the amount of one
thousand dollars for each violation.

(3)
The liquor control board may impose a monetary penalty upon any person other
than a licensed cigarette retailer or licensed sampler if the liquor control
board finds that the person has violated RCW 26.28.080, 70.155.020, 70.155.030,
70.155.040, 70.155.050, 70.155.060, 70.155.070, or 70.155.090.

(4)
The monetary penalty that the liquor control board may impose based upon one or
more findings under subsection (3) of this section may not exceed the
following:

(a)
For violation of RCW 26.28.080 or 70.155.020, fifty dollars for the first
violation and one hundred dollars for each subsequent violation;

(b)
For violations of RCW 70.155.030, one hundred dollars for each day upon which
such violation occurred;

(c)
For violations of RCW 70.155.040, one hundred dollars for each violation;

(d)
For violations of RCW 70.155.050 and 70.155.060, three hundred dollars for each
violation;

(e)
For violations of RCW 70.155.070, one thousand dollars for each violation.

(5)
The liquor control board may impose sanctions against a person licensed
under RCW 82.24.510(1)(b) or 82.24.530 for violations of rules under this
chapter and for which a statutory penalty is not prescribed.

(6)
The liquor control board may develop and offer a class for retail clerks and
use this class in lieu of a monetary penalty for the clerk's first violation.

(((6)))
(7) The liquor control board may issue a cease and desist order to any
person who is found by the liquor control board to have violated or intending
to violate the provisions of this chapter, RCW 26.28.080 or 82.24.500,
requiring such person to cease specified conduct that is in violation. The
issuance of a cease and desist order shall not preclude the imposition of other
sanctions authorized by this statute or any other provision of law.

(((7)))
(8) The liquor control board may seek injunctive relief to enforce the
provisions of RCW 26.28.080 or 82.24.500 or this chapter. The liquor control
board may initiate legal action to collect civil penalties imposed under this
chapter if the same have not been paid within thirty days after imposition of
such penalties. In any action filed by the liquor control board under this
chapter, the court may, in addition to any other relief, award the liquor
control board reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.

(((8)))
(9) All proceedings under subsections (1) through (((6))) (5)
and (7) of this section shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05
RCW.

(((9)))
(10) The liquor control board may reduce or waive either the penalties
or the suspension or revocation of a license, or both, as set forth in this
chapter where the elements of proof are inadequate or where there are mitigating
circumstances. Mitigating circumstances may include, but are not limited to,
an exercise of due diligence by a retailer. Further, the board may exceed
penalties set forth in this chapter based on aggravating circumstances.

Sec.
6. RCW
70.155.110 and 1993 c 507 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The liquor control board shall, in addition to the board's other powers and
authorities, have the authority to enforce the provisions of this chapter and
RCW 26.28.080(((4))) and 82.24.500. The liquor control board shall have
full power to revoke or suspend the license of any retailer or wholesaler in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 70.155.100.

(2)
The liquor control board and the board's authorized agents or employees shall
have full power and authority to enter any place of business where tobacco
products are sold for the purpose of enforcing the provisions of this chapter.

(3)
For the purpose of enforcing the provisions of this chapter and RCW 26.28.080(((4)))
and 82.24.500, a peace officer or enforcement officer of the liquor control
board who has reasonable grounds to believe a person observed by the officer
purchasing, attempting to purchase, or in possession of tobacco products is
under the age of eighteen years of age, may detain such person for a reasonable
period of time and in such a reasonable manner as is necessary to determine the
person's true identity and date of birth. Further, tobacco products possessed
by persons under the age of eighteen years of age are considered contraband and
may be seized by a peace officer or enforcement officer of the liquor control
board.

(4)
The liquor control board may work with local county health departments or
districts and local law enforcement agencies to conduct random, unannounced,
inspections to assure compliance.

(5)
The liquor control board may adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter
and RCW 26.28.080 relating to the enforcement of provisions regarding
distribution of tobacco products, especially relating to minors.

(6)
No person may knowingly or willfully resist or oppose a state, county, or
municipal peace officer, or liquor enforcement officer, in the discharge of his
or her duties under this chapter, or aid and abet the resistance or
opposition. A violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor.

Sec.
7. RCW
82.24.110 and 1999 c 193 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each of the following acts is a gross misdemeanor and punishable as such:

(a)
To sell, except as a licensed wholesaler engaged in interstate commerce as to
the article being taxed herein, without the stamp first being affixed;

(b)
To sell in Washington as a wholesaler to a retailer who does not possess and is
required to possess a current cigarette retailer's license;

(c)
To use or have in possession knowingly or intentionally any forged or
counterfeit stamps;

(d)
For any person other than the department of revenue or its duly authorized
agent to sell any stamps not affixed to any of the articles taxed herein
whether such stamps are genuine or counterfeit;

(e)
To violate any of the provisions of this chapter;

(f)
To violate any lawful rule made and published by the department of revenue or
the board;

(g)
To use any stamps more than once;

(h)
To refuse to allow the department of revenue or its duly authorized agent, on
demand, to make full inspection of any place of business where any of the
articles herein taxed are sold or otherwise hinder or prevent such inspection;

(i)
Except as provided in this chapter, for any retailer to have in possession in
any place of business any of the articles herein taxed, unless the same have the
proper stamps attached;

(j)
For any person to make, use, or present or exhibit to the department of revenue
or its duly authorized agent, any invoice for any of the articles herein taxed
which bears an untrue date or falsely states the nature or quantity of the
goods therein invoiced;

(k)
For any wholesaler or retailer or his or her agents or employees to fail to
produce on demand of the department of revenue all invoices of all the articles
herein taxed or stamps bought by him or her or received in his or her place of
business within five years prior to such demand unless he or she can show by
satisfactory proof that the nonproduction of the invoices was due to causes
beyond his or her control;

(l)
For any person to receive in this state any shipment of any of the articles
taxed herein, when the same are not stamped, for the purpose of avoiding
payment of tax. It is presumed that persons other than dealers who purchase or
receive shipments of unstamped cigarettes do so to avoid payment of the tax imposed
herein;

(m)
For any person to possess or transport in this state a quantity of ((sixty))
thirty thousand cigarettes or less unless the proper stamps required by
this chapter have been affixed or unless: (i) Notice of the possession or
transportation has been given as required by RCW 82.24.250; (ii) the person
transporting the cigarettes has in actual possession invoices or delivery
tickets which show the true name and address of the consignor or seller, the
true name and address of the consignee or purchaser, and the quantity and
brands of the cigarettes so transported; and (iii) the cigarettes are consigned
to or purchased by any person in this state who is authorized by this chapter
to possess unstamped cigarettes in this state;

(n)
To possess, sell, or transport within this state any container or package of
cigarettes that does not comply with this chapter.

(2)
It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally to possess or to
transport in this state a quantity in excess of ((sixty)) thirty
thousand cigarettes unless the proper stamps required by this chapter are
affixed thereto or unless: (a) Proper notice as required by RCW 82.24.250 has
been given; (b) the person transporting the cigarettes actually possesses
invoices or delivery tickets showing the true name and address of the consignor
or seller, the true name and address of the consignee or purchaser, and the
quantity and brands of the cigarettes so transported; and (c) the cigarettes
are consigned to or purchased by a person in this state who is authorized by
this chapter to possess unstamped cigarettes in this state. Violation of this
section shall be punished as a class C felony under Title 9A RCW.

(3)
All agents, employees, and others who aid, abet, or otherwise participate in
any way in the violation of the provisions of this chapter or in any of the
offenses described in this chapter shall be guilty and punishable as
principals, to the same extent as any wholesaler or retailer or any other
person violating this chapter.

Sec.
8. RCW
82.24.130 and 1999 c 193 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The following are subject to seizure and forfeiture:

(a)
Subject to RCW 82.24.250, any articles taxed in this chapter that are found at
any point within this state, which articles are held, owned, or possessed by
any person, and that do not have the stamps affixed to the packages or
containers; and any container or package of cigarettes possessed or held for
sale that does not comply with this chapter.

(b)
All conveyances, including aircraft, vehicles, or vessels, which are used, or
intended for use, to transport, or in any manner to facilitate the
transportation, for the purpose of sale or receipt of property described in (a)
of this subsection, except:

(i)
A conveyance used by any person as a common or contract carrier having in
actual possession invoices or delivery tickets showing the true name and
address of the consignor or seller, the true name of the consignee or
purchaser, and the quantity and brands of the cigarettes transported, unless it
appears that the owner or other person in charge of the conveyance is a
consenting party or privy to a violation of this chapter;

(ii)
A conveyance subject to forfeiture under this section by reason of any act or
omission of which the owner thereof establishes to have been committed or
omitted without his or her knowledge or consent;

(iii)
A conveyance encumbered by a bona fide security interest if the secured party
neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or omission.

(c)
Any vending machine used for the purpose of violating the provisions of this
chapter.

(2)
Property subject to forfeiture under this chapter may be seized by any agent of
the department authorized to collect taxes, any enforcement officer of the
board, or law enforcement officer of this state upon process issued by any
superior court or district court having jurisdiction over the property.
Seizure without process may be made if:

(a)
The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search warrant or an
inspection under an administrative inspection warrant; or

(b)
The department, the board, or the law enforcement officer has probable cause to
believe that the property was used or is intended to be used in violation of
this chapter and exigent circumstances exist making procurement of a search
warrant impracticable.

(3)
Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, articles taxed in
this chapter which are in the possession of a wholesaler or retailer, licensed
under Washington state law, for a period of time necessary to affix the stamps
after receipt of the articles, shall not be considered contraband.

(4)
The director of the department of licensing may suspend for six months the
driver's license of a person found to be operating a conveyance transporting
property subject to forfeiture under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. A
new section is added to chapter 70.155 RCW to read as follows:

No
tobacco manufacturer, wholesaler, or agent thereof, may pay the monetary
penalty of a tobacco retailer licensed under Title 82 RCW, nor may a tobacco retailer
licensed under Title 82 RCW accept money for payment of a monetary penalty from
a tobacco manufacturer, wholesaler, or agent thereof. A violation of this
section is a gross misdemeanor punishable by a minimum fine of two thousand
five hundred dollars for the first offense and five thousand dollars for each
offense thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---