BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
purpose of this act is to provide all employers in Washington state a choice of
carriers from whom to purchase workers' compensation insurance; to provide
employers and their employees the benefits of a competitive system; to provide
workers the benefits of safety systems developed by private enterprise, as well
as those provided by government; to provide private industry in Washington
state the opportunity to do business with government regulation; to eliminate a
government monopoly to small employers; and to increase the operating skills of
Washington's government run workers' compensation industry by introducing
competition into the business of workers' compensation insurance.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 51.04 RCW to read as follows:

Effective
January 1, 2001, employers in this state may purchase workers' compensation
insurance, and related coverage, from an insurer holding a certificate of authority
under Title 48 RCW and certified by the department of labor and industries
under this title.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
An implementing committee shall develop legislation for implementing this act
and report its recommendations to the legislature by January 1, 2000.

(2)
The committee consists of the following:

(a)
Two members of the senate, one from each major caucus to be appointed by the
lieutenant governor;

(b)
Two members of the house of representatives, one from each major caucus to be
appointed by the co-speakers of the house of representatives;

(c)
A representative of employers; a representative of workers; a representative of
the insurance industry; a representative of the Washington state bar
association; a representative of the Washington state medical association, each
of whom shall be chosen by a majority vote of the legislative members.

(3)
Each committee member has one vote.

(4)
The committee may add up to three members ex officio, who have the right to
speak and make motions, but have no vote.

(5)
The committee must hire staff and counsel to carry out its mission.

(6) The commission members shall receive no compensation.
Legislators shall be reimbursed for their travel expenses as provided in RCW
44.04.120. Other members of the commission shall be reimbursed for travel
expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

---
END ---