BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.95B.080 and 1987 c 357 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

((Certificates
shall be issued without examination under the following conditions:

(1)
Certificates, in appropriate classifications, shall be issued without
application fee to operators who, on July 1, 1973, hold certificates of
competency attained by examination under the voluntary certification program
sponsored jointly by the state department of social and health services, health
services division, and the Pacific Northwest pollution control association.

(2)
Certificates, in appropriate classifications, shall be issued to persons
certified by a governing body or owner to have been the operator in responsible
charge of a waste treatment plant on July 1, 1973. A certificate so issued
will be valid only for the existing plant.

(3))) A temporary
nonrenewable certificate((, temporary in nature,)) may be issued,
without the required examination, for a period not to exceed twelve months,
to an operator who fills a vacated position required to be filled by a
certified operator. Only one such certificate may be issued subsequent to each
instance of vacation of any such position. An operator issued a temporary
certificate must meet the conditions as established by rule.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.95B.090 and 1987 c 357 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
issuance and renewal of a certificate shall be subject to the following
conditions:

(1)
A certificate shall be issued if the operator has satisfactorily passed a
written examination, or has met the requirements of RCW ((70.95B.080)) 70.95B.130,
and has met the requirements specified in the rules ((and regulations))
as authorized by this chapter, and has paid the department ((an application
fee. Such application fee shall not exceed fifty dollars)) the required
certification fees.

(2)
The term for all certificates shall be from the first of January of the year of
issuance until the thirty-first of December of the renewal year. The renewal
period, not to exceed three years, shall be set by agency rule. Every
certificate shall be renewed upon the payment of a renewal fee and satisfactory
evidence presented to the director that the operator demonstrates continued
professional growth in the field. ((Such renewal fee shall not exceed
thirty dollars.

(3)
Individuals who fail to renew their certificates before December 31 of the
renewal year, upon notice by the director shall have their certificates
suspended for sixty days. If, during the suspension period, the renewal is not
completed, the director shall give notice of revocation to the employer and to
the operator and the certificate will be revoked ten days after such notice is
given. An operator whose certificate has been revoked must reapply for
certification and will be requested to meet the requirements of a new
applicant.))

(3)
The director shall notify individuals who fail to renew their certificates by
December 31st that their certificates expire the last day of February, and
shall notify the owners of the wastewater treatment plants last known to employ
those individuals. An operator whose certificate is invalid and who wishes to
become certified must reapply for certification and must meet the requirements
of a new applicant.

Sec.
3. RCW
70.95B.095 and 1987 c 357 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

((Effective
January 1, 1988)) To support the wastewater operator certification
program, the department shall establish rules for the collection of fees
for ((the issuance and renewal of certificates as provided for in RCW
70.95B.090. Beginning January 1, 1992, these fees shall be sufficient to
recover the costs of the certification program.)) wastewater treatment
plant operators and for wastewater treatment plants. Fees shall be established
in amounts to recover expenses incurred by the department in administering the
wastewater operator certification program. No wastewater treatment plant
annual certification program fee shall be less than the annual renewal fee for
certified operators.

Sec.
4. RCW
70.95B.100 and 1995 c 269 s 2903 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director may, after conducting a hearing, revoke a certificate found to have
been obtained by fraud or deceit, or for gross negligence in the operation of a
waste treatment plant, or for violating the requirements of this chapter or any
lawful rule, order or regulation of the department. No person whose
certificate is revoked under provisions of this section shall be
eligible to apply for a certificate for a minimum of one year from the
effective date of this final order or revocation.

Sec.
5. RCW
70.95B.130 and 1973 c 139 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

((On
or after July 1, 1973,)) Current and valid certification of wastewater
treatment plant operators issued by any state which((, as
determined by the director,)) accepts certifications made or certification
requirements deemed satisfied pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, shall
be accorded reciprocal treatment and shall be recognized as valid and sufficient
evidence of wastewater treatment plant operating competence within the
purview of this chapter, if in the judgment of the director the certification
requirements of such state are substantially equivalent to the requirements of
this chapter ((or)) and any rules ((or regulations))
promulgated hereunder. Such operators may be granted wastewater treatment
plant operator certificates in an appropriate grade upon receipt of a completed
application accompanied by payment of required fees.

In
making determinations pursuant to this section, the director ((shall consult
with the board and)) may consider any generally applicable criteria and
guidelines developed by the nationally recognized association of certification
authorities.

Sec.
6. RCW
70.95B.150 and 1973 c 139 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

The
wastewater operator certification account is created in the general fund of the
state treasury. All ((receipts realized in the administration of this
chapter)) fees paid in accordance with this chapter, and any other
receipts, shall be ((paid)) deposited into the ((general
fund)) account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. The department shall use moneys from the account to carry out
the purposes of the wastewater operator certification program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. This
act takes effect January 1, 2000. Before January 1, 2000, the department of
ecology shall adopt the rules necessary to implement this act.

---
END ---