BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. As
used in this chapter, except where the context clearly indicates otherwise:

(1)
The term "residence" shall mean a single-family dwelling unit whether
such unit be separate or part of a multiunit dwelling, including the land on
which such dwelling stands not to exceed one acre. The term shall also include
a share ownership in a cooperative housing association, corporation, or
partnership if the person claiming exemption can establish that his or her
share represents the specific unit or portion of such structure in which he or
she resides. The term shall also include a single-family dwelling situated
upon lands the fee of which is vested in the United States or any
instrumentality thereof including an Indian tribe or in the state of
Washington, and notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 84.04.080 and 84.04.090,
such a residence shall be deemed real property.

(2)
The term "real property" shall also include a mobile home which has
substantially lost its identity as a mobile unit by virtue of its being fixed
in location upon land owned or leased by the owner of the mobile home and
placed on a foundation (posts or blocks) with fixed pipe connections with
sewer, water, or other utilities: PROVIDED, That a mobile home located on land
leased by the owner of the mobile home shall be subject, for tax billing,
payment, and collection purposes, only to the personal property provisions of
chapter 84.56 RCW and RCW 84.60.040.

(3)
"Department" means the state department of revenue.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
person shall be exempt from any legal obligation to pay all or a portion of the
amount of excess and regular real property taxes due and payable in the year
following the year in which a claim is filed, and thereafter, in accordance
with the following:

(1)
The property taxes must have been imposed upon a residence which was occupied
by the person claiming the exemption as a principal place of residence as of
the time of filing: PROVIDED, That any person who sells, transfers, or is
displaced from his or her residence may transfer his or her exemption status to
a replacement residence, but no claimant shall receive an exemption on more
than one residence in any year: PROVIDED FURTHER, That confinement of the
person to a hospital or nursing home shall not disqualify the claim of
exemption if:

(a)
The residence is temporarily unoccupied;

(b)
The residence is occupied by a spouse and/or a person financially dependent on
the claimant for support; or

(c)
The residence is rented for the purpose of paying nursing home or hospital
costs;

(2)
The person claiming the exemption must have owned, at the time of filing, in
fee, as a life estate, or by contract purchase, the residence on which the
property taxes have been imposed or if the person claiming the exemption lives
in a cooperative housing association, corporation, or partnership, such person
must own a share therein representing the unit or portion of the structure in
which he or she resides. For purposes of this subsection, a residence owned by
a marital community or owned by cotenants shall be deemed to be owned by each
spouse or cotenant, and any lease for life shall be deemed a life estate;

(3)
The person claiming the exemption must be a veteran of the armed forces of the
United States with a one hundred percent service-connected disability:
PROVIDED, That any surviving spouse of a person who was receiving an exemption
at the time of the person's death shall qualify if the surviving spouse is
fifty-seven years of age or older and otherwise meets the requirements of this
section; and

(4)
A person who otherwise qualifies under this section shall be exempt from all
excess property taxes and shall be exempt from all regular property taxes on
fifty percent of the valuation of his or her residence.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) A
claim for exemption under section 2 of this act shall be made and filed at any
time during the year for exemption from taxes payable the following year and
thereafter and solely upon forms as prescribed and furnished by the department
of revenue. However, an exemption from tax under section 2 of this act shall
continue for no more than four years unless a renewal application is filed as
provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(2)
A person granted an exemption under section 2 of this act shall inform the
county assessor of any change in status affecting the person's entitlement to
the exemption on forms prescribed and furnished by the department of revenue.

(3)
Each person exempt from taxes under this chapter shall file with the county
assessor a renewal application not later than December 31st of the year the
assessor notifies such person of the requirement to file the renewal
application. The county assessor shall notify each person exempt from taxes
under this chapter of the requirement to file a renewal application by March
1st of the year in which the renewal application is due.

(4)
If the assessor finds that the applicant does not meet the qualifications set
forth in section 2 of this act, the claim for exemption shall be denied but
such denial shall be subject to appeal under RCW 84.48.010. If the applicant
had received exemption in prior years based on erroneous information, the taxes
shall be collected subject to penalties as provided in RCW 84.40.130 for a
period not to exceed three years.

(5)
The department and each local assessor is hereby directed to publicize the
qualifications and manner of making claims under this chapter, through
communications media, including such paid advertisements or notices as it deems
appropriate. Notice of the qualifications, method of making applications, the
penalties for not reporting a change in status, and availability of further
information shall be included on or with property tax statements and
revaluation notices for all residential property including mobile homes, except
rental properties.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
All claims for exemption shall be made and signed by the person entitled to the
exemption, by his or her attorney in fact or in the event the residence of such
person is under mortgage or purchase contract requiring accumulation of
reserves out of which the holder of the mortgage or contract is required to pay
real estate taxes, by such holder or by the owner, either before two witnesses
or the county assessor or his or her deputy in the county where the real
property is located: PROVIDED, That if a claim for exemption is made by a
person living in a cooperative housing association, corporation, or
partnership, such claim shall be made and signed by the person entitled to the
exemption and by the authorized agent of such cooperative.

(2)
If the taxpayer is unable to submit his or her own claim, the claim shall be
submitted by a duly authorized agent or by a guardian or other person charged
with the care of the person or property of such taxpayer.

(3)
Any person signing a false claim with the intent to defraud or evade the
payment of any tax shall be guilty of the offense of perjury.

(4)
The tax liability of a cooperative housing association, corporation, or
partnership shall be reduced by the amount of tax exemption to which a claimant
residing therein is entitled and such cooperative shall reduce any amount owed
by the claimant to the cooperative by such exact amount of tax exemption or, if
no amount be owed, the cooperative shall make payment to the claimant of such
exact amount of exemption.

(5)
A remainderman or other person who would have otherwise paid the tax on real
property that is the subject of an exemption granted under section 2 of this
act for an estate for life shall reduce the amount which would have been
payable by the life tenant to the remainderman or other person to the extent of
the exemption. If no amount is owed or separately stated as an obligation
between these persons, the remainderman or other person shall make payment to
the life tenant in the exact amount of the exemption.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
The director of revenue shall adopt such rules and prescribe such forms as may
be necessary and appropriate for implementation and administration of this
chapter subject to chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act.

(2)
The department may conduct such audits of the administration of this chapter
and the claims for exemption filed thereunder as it considers necessary. The
powers of the department under chapter 84.08 RCW apply to these audits.

Sec.
6. RCW
84.69.020 and 1998 c 306 s 2 and 1997 c 393 s 18 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

On
the order of the county treasurer, ad valorem taxes paid before or after
delinquency shall be refunded if they were:

(1)
Paid more than once;

(2)
Paid as a result of manifest error in description;

(3)
Paid as a result of a clerical error in extending the tax rolls;

(4)
Paid as a result of other clerical errors in listing property;

(5)
Paid with respect to improvements which did not exist on assessment date;

(6)
Paid under levies or statutes adjudicated to be illegal or unconstitutional;

(7)
Paid as a result of mistake, inadvertence, or lack of knowledge by any person
exempted from paying real property taxes or a portion thereof pursuant to RCW
84.36.381 through 84.36.389((, as now)) or ((hereafter amended)) chapter
84.-- RCW (sections 1 through 5 of this act);

(8)
Paid as a result of mistake, inadvertence, or lack of knowledge by either a
public official or employee or by any person with respect to real property in
which the person paying the same has no legal interest;

(9)
Paid on the basis of an assessed valuation which was appealed to the county
board of equalization and ordered reduced by the board;

(10)
Paid on the basis of an assessed valuation which was appealed to the state
board of tax appeals and ordered reduced by the board: PROVIDED, That the
amount refunded under subsections (9) and (10) of this section shall only be
for the difference between the tax paid on the basis of the appealed valuation
and the tax payable on the valuation adjusted in accordance with the board's
order;

(11)
Paid as a state property tax levied upon property, the assessed value of which
has been established by the state board of tax appeals for the year of such
levy: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the amount refunded shall only be for the
difference between the state property tax paid and the amount of state property
tax which would, when added to all other property taxes within the one percent
limitation of Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution equal one
percent of the assessed value established by the board;

(12)
Paid on the basis of an assessed valuation which was adjudicated to be unlawful
or excessive: PROVIDED, That the amount refunded shall be for the difference
between the amount of tax which was paid on the basis of the valuation adjudged
unlawful or excessive and the amount of tax payable on the basis of the
assessed valuation determined as a result of the proceeding;

(13)
Paid on property acquired under RCW 84.60.050, and canceled under RCW
84.60.050(2);

(14)
Paid on the basis of an assessed valuation that was reduced under RCW
84.48.065; or

(15)
Paid on the basis of an assessed valuation that was reduced under RCW
84.40.039.

No
refunds under the provisions of this section shall be made because of any error
in determining the valuation of property, except as authorized in subsections
(9), (10), (11), and (12) of this section nor may any refunds be made if a bona
fide purchaser has acquired rights that would preclude the assessment and collection
of the refunded tax from the property that should properly have been charged
with the tax. Any refunds made on delinquent taxes shall include the
proportionate amount of interest and penalties paid. The county treasurer may
deduct from moneys collected for the benefit of the state's levy, refunds of
the state levy including interest on the levy as provided by this section and
chapter 84.68 RCW.

The
county treasurer of each county shall make all refunds determined to be
authorized by this section, and by the first Monday in February of each year,
report to the county legislative authority a list of all refunds made under
this section during the previous year. The list is to include the name of the
person receiving the refund, the amount of the refund, and the reason for the
refund.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. This
act applies to taxes levied for collection in 2000 and thereafter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 84 RCW.

---
END ---