BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
68.60.050 and 1989 c 44 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any person who knowingly removes, mutilates, defaces, injures, or destroys any
historic grave shall be guilty of a class C felony punishable under chapter
9A.20 RCW. Persons disturbing historic graves through inadvertence, including
disturbance through construction, shall reinter the human remains under the
supervision of the ((cemetery board)) office of archaeology and
historic preservation. Expenses to reinter such human remains are to be
provided by the office of archaeology and historic preservation to the
extent that funds for this purpose are appropriated by the legislature.

(2)
This section does not apply to actions taken in the performance of official law
enforcement duties.

(3) It shall be a complete defense in a prosecution under
subsection (1) of this section if the defendant can prove by a preponderance of
evidence that the alleged acts were accidental or inadvertent and that
reasonable efforts were made to preserve the remains accidentally disturbed or
discovered, and that the accidental discovery or disturbance was properly
reported.

---
END ---