BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
There is created a K-12 transportation safety net and a transportation safety
net committee. The K-12 transportation safety net is for school districts
which apply for safety net funds and convincingly demonstrate the following to
the K-12 transportation safety net committee:

(a)
The district's direct transportation costs eligible for state funding exceed
the state allocation for such costs by at least twenty-eight percent;

(b)
The district's transportation program is operated in a reasonably efficient
manner and the reasons the district's direct costs exceed state allocations are
not due to the district's program choices, labor contracts, or buses in the
district's fleet which have been fully depreciated according to the state
lifetime schedules.

(2)
The superintendent of public instruction shall, by rule, establish procedures
and standards for the allocation of funds appropriated for transportation
safety net purposes. Prior to adopting any standards, procedures, or processes
required to implement this section, the superintendent shall consult with the
office of financial management.

(3)
School districts shall submit requests for safety net funds to the state
transportation safety net committee. Membership of the committee shall consist
of the following:

(a)
One staff from the office of financial management;

(b)
One staff from the office of the state auditor;

(c)
Two staff from the office of the superintendent of public instruction, one from
the pupil transportation division who shall chair the committee, and one from
the apportionment section;

(d)
One or more representatives appointed by the superintendent of public
instruction from school districts or educational service districts
knowledgeable in the pupil transportation program or school finance.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
joint legislative audit and review committee shall either conduct or contract
for a study on student transportation, with emphasis on the allocation provided
for in RCW 28A.160.150 through 28A.160.190. The study shall include an
analysis of the adequacy of the allocation to fund home-to-school and return
transportation in support of the basic education program. The study also shall
examine school district costs in funding other transportation in support of the
basic education program. The study shall include, but not be limited to, a
review of the effect of the following factors on student transportation costs:
Traffic congestion and resulting increases in driver time; the need to
transport students within a one-mile radius of a school due to hazardous
walking conditions; school district transportation scheduling practices;
current and potential use of mass transit; school districts contracting for
transportation services with private providers; various geographic features;
weather conditions; state rules that provide for counting only those students
riding to school, not those riding home from school; state rules that limit
when ridership counts may be reported for allocation, and when the counts may
be adjusted; and state rules for counting mid-day kindergarten students for
funding.

Relevant
statutes and rules that affect student transportation funding shall be
reviewed. The joint legislative audit and review committee shall use the
office of the superintendent of public instruction and the regional
transportation supervisors in planning and conducting the study. The results
and recommendations shall be reported to the house of representatives and
senate education committees, the house of representatives appropriations
committee, the senate ways and means committee, and the office of financial
management by December 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The sum of five hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the
general fund to the joint legislative audit and review committee for the
purpose of conducting the study in this act.

(2)
The sum of five million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the general fund to
the superintendent of public instruction for the purpose of providing safety
net funds in accordance with section 1 of this act.

(3) The sum of five million dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the
general fund to the superintendent of public instruction for the purpose of
providing safety net funds in accordance with section 1 of this act.

---
END ---