BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
86.16.041 and 1989 c 64 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Beginning July 26, 1987, every county and incorporated city and town shall
submit to the department of ecology any new flood plain management ordinance or
amendment to any existing flood plain management ordinance. Such ordinance or
amendment shall take effect thirty days from filing with the department unless
the department disapproves such ordinance or amendment within that time period.

(2)
The department may disapprove any ordinance or amendment submitted to it under
subsection (1) of this section if it finds that an ordinance or amendment does
not comply with any of the following:

(a)
Restriction of land uses within designated floodways including the prohibition
of construction or reconstruction of residential structures except for: (i)
Repairs, reconstruction, or improvements to a structure which do not increase
the ground floor area; and (ii) repairs, reconstruction, or improvements to a
structure the cost of which does not exceed fifty percent of the market value
of the structure either, (A) before the repair, reconstruction, or repair is
started, or (B) if the structure has been damaged, and is being restored,
before the damage occurred. Work done on structures to comply with existing
health, sanitary, or safety codes or to structures identified as historic
places shall not be included in the fifty percent determination. However,
the floodway prohibition in this subsection does not apply to existing
farmhouses in designated floodways that meet the provisions of subsection (3)
of this section. For the purposes of this section, "farmhouse" means
a single family dwelling necessary to the operation of a commercial farm
engaged in agriculture where the occupants of the dwelling derive their
principal livelihood from the farm site upon which the farmhouse is located;

(b)
The minimum requirements of the national flood insurance program; and

(c)
The minimum state requirements adopted pursuant to RCW 86.16.031(8) that are
applicable to the particular county, city, or town.

(3)
Repairs, reconstruction, replacement, or improvements to existing farmhouse
structures located in designated floodways and which are located on lands designated
as agricultural lands of long-term commercial significance under RCW 36.70A.170
as identified by a particular county, city, or town's growth management act
comprehensive plan shall be permitted subject to the following:

(a)
The new farmhouse is a replacement for an existing farmhouse on the same farm
site;

(b)
There is no potential building site for a replacement farmhouse on the same
farm outside the designated floodway;

(c)
Repairs, reconstruction, or improvements to a farmhouse shall not increase the
total square footage of encroachment of the existing farmhouse;

(d)
A replacement farmhouse shall not exceed the total square footage of
encroachment of the structure it is replacing;

(e)
A farmhouse being replaced shall be removed, in its entirety, including
foundation, from the floodway within ninety days after occupancy of a new
farmhouse;

(f)
For substantial improvements, and replacement farmhouses, the elevation of the
lowest floor of the improvement and farmhouse respectively, including basement,
is one foot higher than the base flood elevation;

(g)
New and replacement water supply systems are designed to eliminate or minimize
infiltration of flood waters into the system;

(h)
New and replacement sanitary sewerage systems are designed and located to
eliminate or minimize infiltration of flood water into the system and discharge
from the system into the flood waters; and

(i) All other utilities and connections to public utilities are
designed, constructed, and located to eliminate or minimize flood damage.

---
END ---