BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the intent of the legislature to prohibit deceptive advertising in the retail
delivery of cut flower arrangements.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Local telephone number" means a telephone number that can be dialed
without incurring long distance charges from telephones located within the area
covered by the local telephone directory in which the number is listed. The
term does not include long distance numbers or 800 or 900 exchange numbers
listed in a local telephone directory.

(2)
"Person" means an individual, partnership, limited liability
partnership, corporation, or limited liability corporation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. No
person engaged in the retail delivery of cut flower arrangements may
misrepresent the geographic location of his or her business in any telephone
directory intended for free distribution by:

(1)
Listing a local telephone number, if: (a) The person does not operate a
physical location to prepare cut flower arrangements within the calling area
covered by the local telephone directory; or (b) the person fails to disclose
in the local telephone directory the city where calls to the local telephone
number will be answered;

(2)
Using a fictitious or assumed business name that includes a local geographic
location, if: (a) The person does not operate a physical location to prepare
cut flower arrangements within the boundaries of the geographic location named
or within the calling area covered by the local telephone directory associated
with the named geographic location; or (b) the person fails to disclose in the
local telephone directory the city where calls to the business will be
answered.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
legislature finds that the practices covered by this chapter are matters
vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer
protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not
reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business and is
an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of
competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter
19.86 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5.
Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

---
END ---