BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall endeavor to sell the property known as Whidbey Island game
farm, Island county.

(2)
If the sale takes place one year or less from the effective date of this section,
the property may be sold only to a nonprofit corporation, a consortium of
nonprofit corporations, or a municipal corporation that intends to preserve, to
the extent practicable, the property for purposes of undeveloped open space and
historical preservation.

(3)
If the sale takes place more than one year after the effective date of this
section, the conditions in subsection (2) of this section do not apply.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. If
the department of fish and wildlife has not sold the property known as Whidbey
Island game farm, Island county, by June 30, 1999, then the treasurer shall
lend six hundred ninety-four thousand dollars from the state general fund to
the wildlife account. The department shall repay the loan by June 30, 2001, or
when the department sells the property, whichever occurs earlier.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---