BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
For the period August 15, 1999, through August 21, 1999, the tax levied by RCW
82.08.020 does not apply to sales of clothing and footwear for human use if the
consideration given or contracted to be given for the clothing or footwear is
less than fifty dollars per item, including any charge for alteration, but
exclusive of sales and use taxes and delivery charges.

(2)
The exemption under this section includes fabric, thread, yarn, buttons, snaps,
hooks, zippers, and other items used or consumed to make or repair clothing if
the item becomes a physical component part of such clothing.

(3)
The exemption under this section does not apply to costumes or rented formal
wear; items made from real or imitation pearls, precious or semiprecious
stones, jewels, or metals; athletic equipment; or protective devices such as
motorcycle helmets.

(4)
The department may adopt rules to implement this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
For the period August 15, 1999, through August 21, 1999, the provisions of this
chapter do not apply with respect to the use of clothing and footwear for human
use if the consideration given or contracted to be given for the clothing or
footwear is less than fifty dollars per item, including any charge for
alteration, but exclusive of sales and use taxes and delivery charges.

(2)
The exemption under this section includes fabric, thread, yarn, buttons, snaps,
hooks, zippers, and other items used or consumed to make or repair clothing if
the item becomes a physical component part of such clothing.

(3)
The exemption under this section does not apply to costumes or rented formal
wear; items made from real or imitation pearls, precious or semiprecious
stones, jewels, or metals; athletic equipment; or protective devices such as
motorcycle helmets.

(4)
The department may adopt rules to implement this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---