BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

There may be credited against the tax imposed by this chapter, for
any taxpayer required to be licensed by RCW 69.07.040, the cost to the taxpayer
of providing hepatitis A immunizations to the taxpayer's full and part-time
employees.

---
END ---