BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
42.17.390 and 1993 c 2 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

One
or more of the following civil remedies and sanctions may be imposed by court
order in addition to any other remedies provided by law:

(1)
((If the court finds that the violation of any provision of this chapter by
any candidate or political committee probably affected the outcome of any
election, the result of said election may be held)) The court shall
presume that a material and substantial violation of this chapter has affected
the outcome of the election. Unless the presumption is defeated by a
preponderance of the evidence, the court shall declare the election void
and a special election held within sixty days of such finding. Any action to
void an election shall be commenced within one year of the date of the election
in question. It is intended that this remedy be imposed freely in all
appropriate cases to protect the right of the electorate to an informed and
knowledgeable vote.

(2)
If any lobbyist or sponsor of any grass roots lobbying campaign violates any of
the provisions of this chapter, his registration may be revoked or suspended
and he may be enjoined from receiving compensation or making expenditures for
lobbying: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That imposition of such sanction shall not excuse
said lobbyist from filing statements and reports required by this chapter.

(3)
Any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter may be subject to
a civil penalty of not more than ((ten)) forty thousand dollars
for each such violation. However, a person or entity who violates RCW
42.17.640 may be ordered to return a contribution illegally accepted and may
be subject to a civil penalty of ((ten)) twenty thousand
dollars or three times the amount of the contribution illegally made or
accepted, whichever is greater.

(4)
Any person who fails to file a properly completed statement or report within
the time required by this chapter may be subject to a civil penalty of ten
dollars per day for each day each such delinquency continues.

(5)
Any person who fails to report a contribution or expenditure may be subject to
a civil penalty equivalent to the amount he failed to report.

(6)
A person who makes an unreported contribution that exceeds the amount
required to be reported when that contribution would otherwise have been an
independent expenditure but for the fact that it was made because of the
encouragement, approval, or collaboration of a candidate is subject to a
penalty of up to three times the amount of the unlawful expenditure.

(7)
If a candidate or an officer of a candidate's authorized committee or of a
political committee is found to have intentionally violated this chapter, he or
she may be ordered to pay any civil penalty that is imposed from personal
funds.

(8)
The court may enjoin any person to prevent the doing of any act ((herein))
prohibited by this chapter, or to compel the performance of any act
required ((herein)) by this chapter.

Sec.
2. RCW
42.17.395 and 1989 c 175 s 91 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The commission may (a) determine whether an actual violation of this chapter
has occurred; and (b) issue and enforce an appropriate order following such
determination.

(2)
The commission, in cases where it chooses to determine whether an actual
violation of this chapter has occurred, shall hold a hearing pursuant to the
Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW, to make such determination.
Any order that the commission issues under this section shall be pursuant to
such hearing.

(3)
In lieu of holding a hearing or issuing an order under this section, the
commission may refer the matter to the attorney general or other enforcement
agency as provided in RCW 42.17.360.

(4)
The person against whom an order is directed under this section shall be
designated as the respondent. The order may require the respondent to cease
and desist from the activity that constitutes a violation and in addition, or
alternatively, may impose one or more of the remedies provided in RCW
42.17.390(((1) (b), (c), (d), or (e))) (2), (3), (4), or (5):
PROVIDED, That no individual penalty assessed by the commission may exceed ((one))
two thousand dollars, and in any case where multiple violations are
involved in a single complaint or hearing, the maximum aggregate penalty may
not exceed ((two)) five thousand ((five hundred)) dollars.

(5)
An order issued by the commission under this section shall be subject to
judicial review under the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW. If
the commission's order is not satisfied and no petition for review is filed
within thirty days as provided in RCW 34.05.542, the commission may petition a
court of competent jurisdiction of any county in which a petition for review
could be filed under that section, for an order of enforcement. Proceedings in
connection with the commission's petition shall be in accordance with RCW
42.17.397.

(6)
Beginning on the first day of an election cycle, a candidate who has not
complied with an order issued under RCW 42.17.390 or this section during the
previous election cycle, and the remedies imposed thereunder, shall not solicit
or accept contributions or make expenditures until the candidate has complied
with the order and the remedies so imposed.

(7)(a)
Beginning on the first day of an election cycle, a political committee that has
not complied with an order issued under RCW 42.17.390 or this section during
the previous election cycle, and the remedies imposed thereunder, shall not
solicit or accept contributions or make expenditures until it has complied with
the order and the remedies so imposed. This restriction applies to the
political committee against whom the order and remedies were issued as well as
a political committee that has a majority of the same officers as the committee
that is subject to the order.

(b)
Beginning on the first day of an election cycle, a political committee that has
an officer who has not complied with an order issued under RCW 42.17.390 or
this section during the previous election cycle, and the remedies imposed
thereunder, shall not solicit or accept contributions or make expenditures
until the officer has complied with the order and the remedies so imposed.
This restriction applies to the committee of which the individual subject to
the order was an officer at the time of the violation as well as any other
political committee of which the individual is an officer.

(8)
Beginning on January 1 of each year, a person who has not complied with an
order issued under RCW 42.17.390 or this section during the previous year, and
the remedies imposed thereunder, shall not register as a lobbyist, receive
compensation as a lobbyist, or make expenditures for lobbying expenses until
the person has complied with the order and the remedies so imposed. If the
person is presently registered as a lobbyist or a lobbyist employer, the
commission may suspend or revoke the person's registration.

(9)
Beginning on January 1 of each year, a sponsor of a grass roots lobbying
campaign that has not complied with an order issued under RCW 42.17.390 or this
section during the previous year, and the remedies imposed thereunder, may not
receive contributions or make expenditures for grass roots lobbying purposes
until the sponsor has complied with the order and the remedies so imposed.

---
END ---