BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
42.17.020 and 1995 c 397 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
"Agency" includes all state agencies and all local agencies.
"State agency" includes every state office, department, division,
bureau, board, commission, or other state agency. "Local agency"
includes every county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal
corporation, or special purpose district, or any office, department, division,
bureau, board, commission, or agency thereof, or other local public agency.

(2)
"Authorized committee" means the political committee authorized by a
candidate, or by the public official against whom recall charges have been
filed, to accept contributions or make expenditures on behalf of the candidate
or public official.

(3)
"Ballot proposition" means any "measure" as defined by RCW
29.01.110, or any initiative, recall, or referendum proposition proposed to be
submitted to the voters of the state or any municipal corporation, political
subdivision, or other voting constituency from and after the time when the
proposition has been initially filed with the appropriate election officer of
that constituency prior to its circulation for signatures.

(4)
"Benefit" means a commercial, proprietary, financial, economic, or
monetary advantage, or the avoidance of a commercial, proprietary, financial,
economic, or monetary disadvantage.

(5)
"Bona fide political party" means:

(a)
An organization that has filed a valid certificate of nomination with the
secretary of state under chapter 29.24 RCW;

(b)
The governing body of the state organization of a major political party, as
defined in RCW 29.01.090, that is the body authorized by the charter or bylaws
of the party to exercise authority on behalf of the state party; or

(c)
The county central committee or legislative district committee of a major
political party. There may be only one legislative district committee for each
party in each legislative district.

(6)
"Depository" means a bank designated by a candidate or political
committee pursuant to RCW 42.17.050.

(7)
"Treasurer" and "deputy treasurer" mean the individuals
appointed by a candidate or political committee, pursuant to RCW 42.17.050, to
perform the duties specified in that section.

(8)
"Candidate" means any individual who seeks nomination for election or
election to public office. An individual seeks nomination or election when he
or she first:

(a)
Receives contributions or makes expenditures or reserves space or facilities
with intent to promote his or her candidacy for office;

(b)
Announces publicly or files for office;

(c)
Purchases commercial advertising space or broadcast time to promote his or her
candidacy; or

(d)
Gives his or her consent to another person to take on behalf of the individual
any of the actions in (a) or (c) of this subsection.

(9)
"Caucus political committee" means a political committee organized
and maintained by the members of a major political party in the state senate or
state house of representatives.

(10)
"Commercial advertiser" means any person who sells the service of
communicating messages or producing printed material for broadcast or
distribution to the general public or segments of the general public whether
through the use of newspapers, magazines, television and radio stations,
billboard companies, direct mail advertising companies, printing companies, or
otherwise.

(11)
"Commission" means the agency established under RCW 42.17.350.

(12)
"Compensation" unless the context requires a narrower meaning,
includes payment in any form for real or personal property or services of any
kind: PROVIDED, That for the purpose of compliance with RCW 42.17.241, the
term "compensation" shall not include per diem allowances or other
payments made by a governmental entity to reimburse a public official for
expenses incurred while the official is engaged in the official business of the
governmental entity.

(13)
"Continuing political committee" means a political committee that is
an organization of continuing existence not established in anticipation of any
particular election campaign.

(14)(a)
"Contribution" includes:

(i)
A loan, gift, deposit, subscription, forgiveness of indebtedness, donation,
advance, pledge, payment, transfer of funds between political committees, or
anything of value, including personal and professional services for less than
full consideration;

(ii)
An expenditure made by a person in cooperation, consultation, or concert with,
or at the request or suggestion of, a candidate, a political committee, or
their agents;

(iii)
The financing by a person of the dissemination, distribution, or republication,
in whole or in part, of broadcast, written, graphic, or other form of political
advertising prepared by a candidate, a political committee, or its authorized
agent;

(iv)
Sums paid for tickets to fund-raising events such as dinners and parties,
except for the actual cost of the consumables furnished at the event.

(b)
"Contribution" does not include:

(i)
Standard interest on money deposited in a political committee's account;

(ii)
Ordinary home hospitality;

(iii)
A contribution received by a candidate or political committee that is returned
to the contributor within five business days of the date on which it is
received by the candidate or political committee;

(iv)
A news item, feature, commentary, or editorial in a regularly scheduled news
medium that is of primary interest to the general public, that is in a news
medium controlled by a person whose business is that news medium, and that is
not controlled by a candidate or a political committee;

(v)
An internal political communication primarily limited to the members of or
contributors to a political party organization or political committee, or to
the officers, management staff, or stockholders of a corporation or similar
enterprise, or to the members of a labor organization or other membership
organization;

(vi)
The rendering of personal services of the sort commonly performed by volunteer
campaign workers, or incidental expenses personally incurred by volunteer campaign
workers not in excess of fifty dollars personally paid for by the worker.
"Volunteer services," for the purposes of this section, means
services or labor for which the individual is not compensated by any person;

(vii)
Messages in the form of reader boards, banners, or yard or window signs
displayed on a person's own property or property occupied by a person.
However, a facility used for such political advertising for which a rental
charge is normally made must be reported as an in-kind contribution and counts
towards any applicable contribution limit of the person providing the facility;

(viii)
Legal or accounting services rendered to or on behalf of:

(A)
A political party or caucus political committee if the person paying for the
services is the regular employer of the person rendering such services; or

(B)
A candidate or an authorized committee if the person paying for the services is
the regular employer of the individual rendering the services and if the
services are solely for the purpose of ensuring compliance with state election
or public disclosure laws.

(c)
Contributions other than money or its equivalent are deemed to have a monetary
value equivalent to the fair market value of the contribution. Services or
property or rights furnished at less than their fair market value for the
purpose of assisting any candidate or political committee are deemed a
contribution. Such a contribution must be reported as an in-kind contribution
at its fair market value and counts towards any applicable contribution limit
of the provider.

(15)
"Elected official" means any person elected at a general or special
election to any public office, and any person appointed to fill a vacancy in
any such office.

(16)
"Election" includes any primary, general, or special election for
public office and any election in which a ballot proposition is submitted to
the voters: PROVIDED, That an election in which the qualifications for voting
include other than those requirements set forth in Article VI, section 1
(Amendment 63) of the Constitution of the state of Washington shall not be
considered an election for purposes of this chapter.

(17)
"Election campaign" means any campaign in support of or in opposition
to a candidate for election to public office and any campaign in support of, or
in opposition to, a ballot proposition.

(18)
"Election cycle" means the period beginning on the first day of
December after the date of the last previous general election for the office
that the candidate seeks and ending on November 30th after the next election
for the office. In the case of a special election to fill a vacancy in an
office, "election cycle" means the period beginning on the day the
vacancy occurs and ending on November 30th after the special election.

(19)
"Expenditure" includes a payment, contribution, subscription,
distribution, loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money or anything of value,
and includes a contract, promise, or agreement, whether or not legally
enforceable, to make an expenditure. The term "expenditure" also
includes a promise to pay, a payment, or a transfer of anything of value in
exchange for goods, services, property, facilities, or anything of value for
the purpose of assisting, benefiting, or honoring any public official or
candidate, or assisting in furthering or opposing any election campaign. For
the purposes of this chapter, agreements to make expenditures, contracts, and
promises to pay may be reported as estimated obligations until actual payment
is made. The term "expenditure" shall not include the partial or
complete repayment by a candidate or political committee of the principal of a
loan, the receipt of which loan has been properly reported.

(20)
"Final report" means the report described as a final report in RCW
42.17.080(2).

(21)
"General election" means the election that results in the election of
a person to a state office. It does not include a primary.

(22)
"Gift," is as defined in RCW 42.52.010.

(23)
"Immediate family" includes the spouse, dependent children, and other
dependent relatives, if living in the household. For the purposes of RCW
42.17.640 through 42.17.790, "immediate family" means an individual's
spouse, and child, stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent, grandparent,
brother, half brother, sister, or half sister of the individual and the spouse
of any such person and a child, stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent,
grandparent, brother, half brother, sister, or half sister of the individual's
spouse and the spouse of any such person.

(24)(a)
"Independent expenditure" means an expenditure that ((has each of
the following elements)):

(((a)
It)) (i) Is made in support of or in opposition to a candidate for
office or a ballot proposition by a person who is not (((i))) (A)
a candidate for that office or an authorized committee of that candidate,
(((ii) an authorized committee of that candidate for that office, (iii)))
(B) a political committee formed to support or oppose that ballot
proposition, or (C) a person who has received the candidate's encouragement
or approval to make the expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in
part for political advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the
defeat of any other candidate or candidates for that office, or (((iv) a
person with whom the candidate has collaborated for the purpose of making the
expenditure, if the expenditure pays in whole or in part for political
advertising supporting that candidate or promoting the defeat of any other
candidate or candidates for that office)) in the case of a ballot
proposition, a person who has received the encouragement or approval of the
political committee formed to support the ballot proposition or the political
committee formed to oppose the ballot proposition;

(((b)
The expenditure)) (ii) Pays in whole or in part for political
advertising that either specifically names the candidate or ballot
proposition supported or opposed, or clearly and beyond any doubt
identifies the candidate without using the candidate's name or the ballot
proposition without using the ballot proposition's title or serial number;
and

(((c)
The expenditure, alone or in conjunction with another expenditure or other
expenditures of the same person in support of or opposition to that candidate,))
(iii) Has a value of five hundred dollars or more, alone or in
conjunction with another expenditure or other expenditures of that person in
support of or opposition to that candidate or ballot proposition. A series
of expenditures, each of which is under five hundred dollars, constitutes one
independent expenditure if their cumulative value is five hundred dollars or
more.

(b)
"Independent expenditure" does not include: (i) An internal
political communication primarily limited to the contributors to a political
party organization or political action committee, or the officers, management
staff, and stockholders of a corporation or similar enterprise, or the members
of a labor organization or other membership organization; or (ii) the rendering
of personal services of the sort commonly performed by volunteer campaign
workers, or incidental expenses personally incurred by volunteer campaign
workers not in excess of fifty dollars personally paid for by the worker.

(25)
"Independent expenditure committee" means a political committee established
for the purpose of making independent expenditures.

(26)(a)
"Intermediary" means an individual who transmits a contribution to a
candidate or committee from another person unless the contribution is from the
individual's employer, immediate family as defined for purposes of RCW
42.17.640 through 42.17.790, or an association to which the individual belongs.

(b)
A treasurer or a candidate is not an intermediary for purposes of the committee
that the treasurer or candidate serves.

(c)
A professional fund-raiser is not an intermediary if the fund-raiser is
compensated for fund-raising services at the usual and customary rate.

(d)
A volunteer hosting a fund-raising event at the individual's home is not an
intermediary for purposes of that event.

(((26)))
(27) "Legislation" means bills, resolutions, motions,
amendments, nominations, and other matters pending or proposed in either house
of the state legislature, and includes any other matter that may be the subject
of action by either house or any committee of the legislature and all bills and
resolutions that, having passed both houses, are pending approval by the
governor.

(((27)))
(28) "Lobby" and "lobbying" each mean attempting to
influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the legislature of the
state of Washington, or the adoption or rejection of any rule, standard, rate,
or other legislative enactment of any state agency under the state
Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW. Neither "lobby" nor
"lobbying" includes an association's or other organization's act of
communicating with the members of that association or organization.

(((28)))
(29) "Lobbyist" includes any person who lobbies either in his
or her own or another's behalf.

(((29)))
(30) "Lobbyist's employer" means the person or persons by whom
a lobbyist is employed and all persons by whom he or she is compensated for
acting as a lobbyist.

(((30)))
(31) "Mass telephone or electronic communications" means any
recorded, scripted, or written message that is made, conveyed, sent, delivered,
or relayed, by telephone wires, satellite hook-up, or the Internet, to one
thousand or more individuals. Messages that are nearly identical or closely
related in content, and that are made, conveyed, sent, delivered, or relayed
within seven days of each other, are considered to be identical and must be
counted accordingly.

(32)
"Person" includes an individual, partnership, joint venture, public
or private corporation, association, federal, state, or local governmental
entity or agency however constituted, candidate, committee, political
committee, political party, executive committee thereof, or any other
organization or group of persons, however organized.

(((31)))
(33) "Person in interest" means the person who is the subject
of a record or any representative designated by that person, except that if
that person is under a legal disability, the term "person in
interest" means and includes the parent or duly appointed legal
representative.

(((32)))
(34) "Political advertising" includes any advertising
displays, newspaper ads, billboards, signs, brochures, articles, tabloids,
flyers, letters, radio or television presentations, mass telephone or
electronic communications, or other means of mass communication, used for
the purpose of appealing, directly or indirectly, for votes or for financial or
other support in any election campaign.

(((33)))
(35) "Political committee" means any person (except a
candidate or an individual dealing with his or her own funds or property)
having the expectation of receiving contributions or making expenditures in
support of, or opposition to, any candidate or any ballot proposition.

(((34)))
(36) "Primary" means the procedure for nominating a candidate
to state office under chapter 29.18 or 29.21 RCW or any other primary for an
election that uses, in large measure, the procedures established in chapter
29.18 or 29.21 RCW.

(((35)))
(37) "Public office" means any federal, state, county, city,
town, school district, port district, special district, or other state
political subdivision elective office.

(((36)))
(38) "Public record" includes any writing containing
information relating to the conduct of government or the performance of any
governmental or proprietary function prepared, owned, used, or retained by any
state or local agency regardless of physical form or characteristics. For the
office of the secretary of the senate and the office of the chief clerk of the
house of representatives, public records means legislative records as defined
in RCW 40.14.100 and also means the following: All budget and financial
records; personnel leave, travel, and payroll records; records of legislative
sessions; reports submitted to the legislature; and any other record designated
a public record by any official action of the senate or the house of
representatives.

(((37)))
(39) "Recall campaign" means the period of time beginning on
the date of the filing of recall charges under RCW 29.82.015 and ending thirty
days after the recall election.

(((38)))
(40) "State legislative office" means the office of a member
of the state house of representatives or the office of a member of the state
senate.

(((39)))
(41) "State office" means state legislative office or the
office of governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney general,
commissioner of public lands, insurance commissioner, superintendent of public
instruction, state auditor, or state treasurer.

(((40)))
(42) "State official" means a person who holds a state office.

(((41)))
(43) "Surplus funds" mean, in the case of a political
committee or candidate, the balance of contributions that remain in the
possession or control of that committee or candidate subsequent to the election
for which the contributions were received, and that are in excess of the amount
necessary to pay remaining debts incurred by the committee or candidate prior
to that election. In the case of a continuing political committee,
"surplus funds" mean those contributions remaining in the possession
or control of the committee that are in excess of the amount necessary to pay
all remaining debts when it makes its final report under RCW 42.17.065.

(((42)))
(44) "Writing" means handwriting, typewriting, printing,
photostating, photographing, and every other means of recording any form of
communication or representation, including, but not limited to, letters, words,
pictures, sounds, or symbols, or combination thereof, and all papers, maps,
magnetic or paper tapes, photographic films and prints, motion picture, film
and video recordings, magnetic or punched cards, discs, drums, diskettes, sound
recordings, and other documents including existing data compilations from which
information may be obtained or translated.

As
used in this chapter, the singular shall take the plural and any gender, the
other, as the context requires.

Sec.
2. RCW
42.17.040 and 1989 c 280 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Every political committee, within two weeks after its organization or, within
two weeks after the date when it first has the expectation of receiving
contributions or making expenditures in any election campaign, whichever is
earlier, shall file a statement of organization with the commission and with
the county auditor or elections officer of the county in which the candidate
resides, or in the case of any other political committee, the county in which
the treasurer resides. A political committee organized within the last three
weeks before an election and having the expectation of receiving contributions
or making expenditures during and for that election campaign shall file a
statement of organization within three business days after its organization or
when it first has the expectation of receiving contributions or making
expenditures in the election campaign, whichever is earlier.

(2)
An independent expenditure committee that is either organized or has the
expectation of receiving contributions or making expenditures in an election
campaign more than thirty days before an election shall file a statement of
organization within the time prescribed in subsection (1) of this section or
within thirty days of the election, whichever is earlier. The statement of
organization shall include but not be limited to:

(a)
The name and address of the committee;

(b)
The names and addresses of all related or affiliated committees or other
persons, and the nature of the relationship or affiliation;

(c)
The names, addresses, and titles of its officers; or if it has no officers, the
names, addresses, and titles of its responsible leaders;

(d)
The name and address of its treasurer and depository;

(e)
A statement whether the committee is a continuing one;

(f)
The name, office sought, and party affiliation of each candidate whom the
committee is supporting or opposing, and, if the committee is supporting the
entire ticket of any party, the name of the party;

(g)
The ballot proposition concerned, if any, and whether the committee is in favor
of or opposed to such proposition;

(h)
What distribution of surplus funds will be made, in accordance with RCW
42.17.095, in the event of dissolution;

(i)
The street address of the place and the hours during which the committee will
make available for public inspection its books of account and all reports filed
in accordance with RCW 42.17.080; and

(j)
Such other information as the commission may ((by regulation)) prescribe
by rule, in keeping with the policies and purposes of this chapter.

(((3)))
(4) Any material change in information previously submitted in a
statement of organization shall be reported to the commission and to the
appropriate county elections officer within the ten days following the change.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

Every
statement of organization, report, or other filing required by this chapter to
be filed by an independent expenditure committee for an expenditure made in
support of or in opposition to a candidate must be filed with the commission
and the appropriate county elections officer. The appropriate county elections
officer for an elected office, other than state offices that are not state-wide
but that represent all or part of more than one county, is the county auditor
or other elections officer of the county in which the candidate supported or
opposed resides. If the candidate who is supported or opposed is running for
an elective state office that is not state-wide but who represents all or part
of more than one county, then the appropriate county elections officer is the
county auditor or the other elections officer from each county represented by
the elected office.

Sec.
4. RCW
42.17.100 and 1995 c 397 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
For the purposes of this section and RCW 42.17.550 the term "independent
expenditure" ((means any expenditure that is made in support of or in
opposition to any candidate or ballot proposition and is not)) does not
include expenditures otherwise required to be reported pursuant to RCW
42.17.060, 42.17.080, or 42.17.090. (("Independent expenditure"
does not include: An internal political communication primarily limited to the
contributors to a political party organization or political action committee,
or the officers, management staff, and stockholders of a corporation or similar
enterprise, or the members of a labor organization or other membership
organization; or the rendering of personal services of the sort commonly
performed by volunteer campaign workers, or incidental expenses personally
incurred by volunteer campaign workers not in excess of fifty dollars
personally paid for by the worker. "Volunteer services," for the
purposes of this section, means services or labor for which the individual is
not compensated by any person.))

(2)
Within five days after the date ((of making)) upon which an
independent expenditure ((that by itself or when added to all other such
independent expenditures made during the same election campaign by the same
person equals one hundred dollars or more, or within five days after the date
of making an independent expenditure for which no reasonable estimate of
monetary value is practicable, whichever occurs first)) is published,
mailed, or otherwise presented to the public, the person who made the
independent expenditure shall file ((with the commission and the county
elections officer of the county of residence for the candidate supported or
opposed by the independent expenditure (or in the case of an expenditure made
in support of or in opposition to a local ballot proposition, the county of
residence for the person making the expenditure))) an initial report of all
independent expenditures made during the campaign prior to and including such
date.

(3)
At the following intervals each person who is required to file an initial
report pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall file ((with the
commission and the county elections officer of the county of residence for the
candidate supported or opposed by the independent expenditure (or in the case
of an expenditure made in support of or in opposition to a ballot proposition,
the county of residence for the person making the expenditure))) a further
report of the independent expenditures made since the date of the last report:

(a)
On the twenty-first day and the seventh day preceding the date on which the
election is held; and

(b)
On the tenth day of the first month after the election; and

(c)
On the tenth day of each month in which no other reports are required to be
filed pursuant to this section. However, the further reports required by this
subsection (3) shall only be filed if the reporting person has made an
independent expenditure since the date of the last previous report filed.

The
report filed pursuant to ((paragraph (a))) (b) of this subsection
(((3))) shall be the final report, and upon submitting such final report
the duties of the reporting person shall cease, and there shall be no
obligation to make any further reports.

(4)
All reports filed pursuant to this section shall be certified as correct by the
reporting person.

(5)
Each report required by subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall disclose
for the period beginning at the end of the period for the last previous report
filed or, in the case of an initial report, beginning at the time of the first
independent expenditure, and ending not more than one business day before the
date the report is due:

(a)
The name and address of the person filing the report;

(b)
The name and address of each person ((to)) on behalf of whom an
independent expenditure was made ((in the aggregate amount of more than
fifty dollars)), and the amount, date, and purpose of each such
expenditure((. If no reasonable estimate of the monetary value of a
particular independent expenditure is practicable, it is sufficient to report
instead)), including a precise description of services, property, or
rights furnished through the expenditure ((and where appropriate to attach a
copy of the item produced or distributed by the expenditure));

(c)
The total sum of all independent expenditures made during the campaign to date;
and

(d)
Such other information as shall be required by the commission by rule in
conformance with the policies and purposes of this chapter.

(6)
No person may make independent expenditures in support of or in opposition to a
specific candidate that in the aggregate exceed five thousand dollars within
the twenty-one days before a primary or general election.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

An
independent expenditure committee that publishes, mails, or otherwise presents
to the public a political advertisement within twenty-one days before an
election shall file a special report of the independent expenditure within
twenty-four hours or on the first working day after the political advertising
is published, mailed, or otherwise presented to the public. The special report
must be filed in the same manner provided under RCW 42.17.105 for a special
report of a contributing political committee. The special report must contain
the same information required in RCW 42.17.100(5).

Sec.
6. RCW
42.17.510 and 1995 c 397 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All written political advertising, whether relating to candidates or ballot
propositions, shall include the sponsor's name and address. All radio and
television political advertising, whether relating to candidates or ballot
propositions, shall include the sponsor's name. All mass telephone and
electronic political advertising, whether relating to candidates or ballot
propositions, must include the sponsor's name. The use of an assumed name
shall be unlawful. The party with which a candidate files shall be clearly
identified in political advertising for partisan office.

(2)
In addition ((to the materials required by subsection (1) of this section)),
all written political advertising undertaken as an independent
expenditure ((by a person or entity other than a party organization))
must include the following statement on the communication "NOTICE TO
VOTERS (Required by law): This advertisement is an independent expenditure
of funds not authorized or approved by any candidate. It is paid for by
(name, address, city, state, committee president's name, daytime address and
telephone number, treasurer's name, daytime address and telephone number)."
If either the president or treasurer is acting on behalf of his or her
employer in making the expenditure, then the name of the employer must be
listed after that individual's name and before his or her address and telephone
number. If ((the)) an advertisement undertaken as an
independent expenditure is ((undertaken by a nonindividual other than a
party organization)) paid for by an independent expenditure committee,
then the notice must (a) disclose the general nature of the interests
represented by the independent expenditure committee, as determined by the
commission under section 8 of this act, immediately after the name of the
committee; and (b) include the following notation ((must also be
included)): "Top Five Contributors," followed by a listing of
the name((s)) of each of the five persons or entities making the
largest contributions reportable under this chapter during the twelve-month
period before the date of the advertisement. The nature of interests
represented by each person other than an individual making such a contribution,
as determined by the commission under section 8 of this act, must be disclosed
immediately after the name of that person or entity.

(3)
The statements and listings of contributors required by ((subsections (1)
and (2) of)) this section shall:

(a)
Appear on the first page or fold of the written communication in at least
ten-point type, or in type at least ten percent of the largest size type used
in a written communication directed at more than one voter, such as a billboard
or poster, whichever is larger;

(b)
Not be subject to the half-tone or screening process;

(c)
Be set apart from any other printed matter; and

(d)
Be clearly spoken on any broadcast advertisement.

(4)
Political yard signs are exempt from the requirement of ((subsections (1)
and (2) of)) this section that the name and address of the sponsor of
political advertising be listed on the advertising. In addition, the ((public
disclosure)) commission shall, by rule, exempt from the identification
requirements of ((subsections (1) and (2) of)) this section forms of
political advertising such as campaign buttons, balloons, pens, pencils,
sky-writing, inscriptions, and other forms of advertising where identification
is impractical.

(5) For the purposes of this section, "yard sign" means
any outdoor sign with dimensions no greater than eight feet by four feet.

Sec.
7. RCW
42.17.550 and 1993 c 2 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

A
person or entity other than a party organization making an independent
expenditure by mailing one thousand or more identical or nearly identical
cumulative pieces of political advertising in a single calendar year shall,
within two working days after the date of the mailing, file a statement
disclosing the number of pieces in the mailing and ((an example)) a
sample of the mailed political advertising ((with the election officer
of the county or residence for the candidate supported or opposed by the
independent campaign expenditure or, in the case of an expenditure made in
support of or in opposition to a ballot proposition, the county of residence
for the person making the expenditure)).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The commission shall assign a brief descriptive phrase indicating the general
nature of interests represented by each independent expenditure committee. As
provided under RCW 42.17.510, this phrase must be included immediately after
the name of the committee in each advertisement relating to a candidate that
the committee undertakes as an independent expenditure.

(2)
The commission shall assign a brief descriptive phrase indicating the general
nature of interests represented by each person or entity making a contribution
to an independent expenditure committee. As provided under RCW 42.17.510, this
phrase must be included immediately after the name of each person or entity
listed as one of the top five contributors to the committee sponsoring the
advertisement.

Sec.
9. RCW
42.36.040 and 1982 c 229 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Prior
to declaring as a candidate for public office or while campaigning for public
office as defined by RCW 42.17.020 (((5) and (25))), no public
discussion or expression of an opinion by a person subsequently elected to a
public office, on any pending or proposed quasi-judicial actions, shall be a
violation of the appearance of fairness doctrine.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---