BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds there is insufficient affordable housing for low-income
persons residing in the state of Washington and that the need for affordable
housing is acute in Indian communities within the state. It is the intent of
the legislature to encourage and promote tribal government efforts to develop
affordable housing programs for its tribal members of low income and for other
persons of low income within their service areas. This act is intended to
provide tax exempt status to properties owned by tribal housing authorities and
intertribal housing authorities so as to enable such authorities to use funds
provided by the federal government under the Native American housing assistance
and self determination act in compliance with that act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The real property owned by a tribal government, tribal housing authority, or
intertribal housing authority which has been expressly designated for and used
in tribal low-income housing, including real property held in fee title located
on trust land or within an Indian reservation or Indian housing service area,
and personal property used by a tribal government, tribal housing authority, or
intertribal housing authority in the operation and administration of tribal
housing programs shall be exempt from taxation. Where improvements, services,
or facilities are furnished to the property by a city, county, state, or
political subdivision for the benefit of a tribal housing project, the tribal
government, tribal housing authority, or intertribal housing authority shall
make to the city, county, state, or other political subdivision, reasonable
reimbursements of its fair share of the cost of such improvement or facility or
reasonable payments for services provided. In no event may any reimbursement
for costs exceed the amount that would otherwise be levied as an annual tax of
such city, county, state, or political subdivision upon the property if it were
not exempt nor may any payments for services exceed payments made by other
individual low-income users for the same services.

(2)
To qualify for exemption under this section, the tribal government, tribal
housing authority, or intertribal housing authority shall notify the county
assessor of property that may qualify for exemption under this section, and of
any change in status of the property, on forms prescribed by the department and
signed by an authorized agent of the tribal government, tribal housing
authority, or intertribal housing authority.

(3)
This section only applies to property that would otherwise be subject to tax under
this title.

(4)
As used in this section:

(a)
"Tribal government" means the governing body of a federally
recognized Indian tribe.

(b)
"Tribal member" means an enrolled member of a federally recognized
Indian tribe.

(c)
"Tribal housing authority" means the tribal government or an agency
or branch of the tribal government which operates and administers housing
programs for tribal members who are considered persons of low income.

(d)
"Intertribal housing authority" means a housing authority created by
a consortium of tribal governments to operate and administer housing programs
for and on behalf of such tribes.

(e)
"Indian reservation" means all lands within the exterior boundaries
of an Indian reservation.

(f)
"Trust land" means lands held by the federal government in trust for
a tribe and under the jurisdiction of the tribal government.

(g)
"Indian housing service area" means the service area designated and
approved by the federal government as the geographical area and service
population within which and to whom a tribal government, tribal housing
authority, or intertribal housing authority provides its services.

(h) "Persons of low income" has the same meaning as in
RCW 35.82.020.

---
END ---