BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
4.92.130 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 92 are each amended to read as follows:

A
liability account in the custody of the treasurer is hereby created as a
nonappropriated account to be used solely and exclusively for the payment of
liability settlements and judgments against the state under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1981
et seq. or for the tortious conduct of its officers, employees, and volunteers and
all related legal defense costs.

(1)
The purpose of the liability account is to: (a) Expeditiously pay legal
liabilities and defense costs of the state resulting from tortious
conduct; (b) promote risk control through a cost allocation system which
recognizes agency loss experience, levels of self-retention, and levels of risk
exposure; and (c) establish an actuarially sound system to pay incurred losses,
within defined limits.

(2)
The liability account shall be used to pay claims for injury and property
damages ((exclusive of)) and legal defense costs ((and)) exclusive
of agency-retained expenses otherwise budgeted.

(3)
No money shall be paid from the liability account, except for defense costs,
unless all proceeds available to the claimant from any valid and collectible
liability insurance shall have been exhausted and unless:

(a)
The claim shall have been reduced to final judgment in a court of competent
jurisdiction; or

(b)
The claim has been approved for payment.

(4)
The liability account shall be financed through annual premiums assessed to
state agencies, based on sound actuarial principles, and shall be for liability
coverage in excess of agency-budgeted self-retention levels.

(5)
Annual premium levels shall be determined by the risk manager, with the
consultation and advice of the risk management advisory committee and
concurrence from the office of financial management. An actuarial study shall
be conducted to assist in determining the appropriate level of funding.

(6)
Disbursements for claims from the liability account shall be made to the
claimant, or to the clerk of the court for judgments, upon written request to
the state treasurer from the risk manager.

(7)
The director of the office of financial management may direct agencies to
transfer moneys from other funds and accounts to the liability account if
premiums are delinquent.

(8)
The liability account shall not exceed fifty percent of the actuarial value of
the outstanding liability as determined annually by the office of risk
management. If the account exceeds the maximum amount specified in this
section, premiums may be adjusted by the office of risk management in order to
maintain the account balance at the maximum limits. If, after adjustment of
premiums, the account balance remains above the limits specified, the excess
amount will be prorated back to the appropriate funds.

Sec.
2. RCW
4.92.135 and 1991 c 187 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

((The
tort claims revolving fund is created in the custody of the treasurer to be
used solely and exclusively for the payment of claims arising out of tortious
conduct taking place prior to July 1, 1990 and against both the state and its
officers, employees, and volunteers for whom the defense of the claims was
authorized under RCW 4.92.070.

Moneys
paid from the revolving fund for any claim are limited to the amount by which
the claim exceeds the amount available to the claimant from any valid and
collectible liability insurance. Payment from the revolving fund shall not be
made until the claim has been approved for payment in accordance with RCW
4.92.210.))

Moneys
in the tort claims revolving fund shall be deposited in the liability account
on July 1, 1999, to be used for payment of settlements, judgments, and legal
defense costs as provided in RCW 4.92.130.

Sec.
3. RCW
4.92.160 and 1991 c 187 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Payment
of claims and judgments arising out of tortious conduct or pursuant to 42
U.S.C. Sec. 1981 et seq. shall not be made by any agency or department of state
government with the exception of the risk management office, and that office
shall authorize and direct the payment of moneys only from the ((tort claims
revolving fund)) liability account whenever:

(1)
The head or governing body of any agency or department of state or the designee
of any such agency certifies to the risk management office that a claim has
been settled; or

(2)
The clerk of court has made and forwarded a certified copy of a final judgment
in a court of competent jurisdiction and the attorney general certifies that
the judgment is final and was entered in an action on a claim arising out of
tortious conduct or under and pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1981 et seq. Payment
of a judgment shall be made to the clerk of the court for the benefit of the
judgment creditors. Upon receipt of payment, the clerk shall satisfy the
judgment against the state.

Sec.
4. RCW
4.92.070 and 1989 c 403 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

If
the attorney general shall find that said officer, employee, or volunteer's
acts or omissions were, or were purported to be in good faith, within the scope
of that person's official duties, or, in the case of a foster parent, that the
occurrence arose from the good faith provision of foster care services, said
request shall be granted, in which event the necessary expenses of the defense
of said action or proceeding relating to a state officer, employee, or
volunteer shall be paid as provided in RCW 4.92.130. In the case of a
foster parent, necessary expenses of the defense shall be paid from the
appropriations made for the support of the department to which such ((officer,
employee, volunteer, or)) foster parent is attached. In such cases the
attorney general shall appear and defend such officer, employee, volunteer, or
foster parent, who shall assist and cooperate in the defense of such suit.
However, the attorney general may not represent or provide private
representation for a foster parent in an action or proceeding brought by the
department of social and health services against that foster parent.

Sec.
5. RCW
28B.10.842 and 1975 c 40 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever
any action, claim, or proceeding is instituted against any regent, trustee,
officer, employee, or agent of an institution of higher education or member of
the governing body, officer, employee, or agent of an educational board arising
out of the performance or failure of performance of duties for, or employment
with such institution or educational board, the board of regents or board of
trustees of the institution or governing body of the educational board may
grant a request by such person that the attorney general be authorized to
defend said claim, suit, or proceeding, and the costs of defense of such action
shall be paid ((from the appropriation made for the support of the
institution or educational board to which said person is attached)) as
provided in RCW 4.92.130. If a majority of the members of a board of
regents or trustees or educational board is or would be personally affected by
such findings and determination, or is otherwise unable to reach any decision
on the matter, the attorney general is authorized to grant a request. When a
request for defense has been authorized, then any obligation for payment
arising from such action, claim, or proceedings shall be paid from the ((tort
claims revolving fund)) liability account, notwithstanding the
nature of the claim, pursuant to the provisions of RCW 4.92.130 through
4.92.170, as now or hereafter amended: PROVIDED, That this section shall not
apply unless the authorizing body has made a finding and determination by
resolution that such regent, trustee, member of the educational board, officer,
employee, or agent was acting in good faith.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---