BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the intent of the legislature that managed competition be implemented at the
discretion of a state agency as an additional management strategy or tool to
maximize the effectiveness and efficiency of government services. The state
director of personnel shall provide assistance with implementation and
coordination of managed competition by a state agency and shall ensure that
managed competition is administered in adherence to the criteria described in
sections 2 through 5 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 41.06 RCW to read as follows:

The
definitions in this section apply throughout sections 3 through 5 of this act
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Business unit" means a group of employees submitting a bid under
section 3 or 4 of this act.

(2)
"Contract" means any type of state agreement for the acquisition of
services.

(3)
"Core service" means, as determined by the director of the department
of general administration, a service for which the public's interest in having
a particular function performed directly by state government is outweighed by
the potential economic advantage of contracting for the service with a private
entity. In assessing the public's interest, the director of the department of
general administration shall take into account:

(a)
The consequences and potential mitigation of improper or failed performance by
the contractor; and

(b)
Whether performance of the contract involves the improper delegation of a
policy-making function.

(4)
"Indirect overhead costs" means the pro rata share of existing
administrative salaries and benefits, rent, equipment costs, utilities, and
materials.

(5)
"Managed competition" means the process by which a state agency
authorizes employees of the agency to compete with private businesses or firms
for a personal services contract.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 41.06 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Any department, agency, or institution of higher education may purchase
services, including services that have been customarily and historically
provided by employees in classified service under this chapter, by contracting
with individuals, nonprofit organizations, businesses, or other entities if the
following criteria are met:

(a)
The service is not a core service;

(b)
The invitation for bid or request for proposal details performance standards
and expectations for the performance of the contract;

(c)
The agency has allowed state employee business units to participate in the
bidding process through the implementation of managed competition as required
by section 4 of this act;

(d)
At least two private entities exist that provide the service to be contracted
for or at least two competitive bids for the service have been made by private
entities to the state agency; and

(e)
The personal services contract includes a provision directing a private entity
that is awarded the contract to consider offering employment to state agency
employees to perform the services under such a contract.

(2)
Any provision contrary to or in conflict with this section in any collective
bargaining agreement in effect on the effective date of this section is not
effective beyond the expiration date of the agreement.

(3)
This section does not apply to the purchase of services or to any contracting
for services that was authorized by law prior to the effective date of this
section.

(4)
Nothing in sections 2 through 5 of this act shall be interpreted as meaning
that the decision to contract out services shall be subject to collective
bargaining.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 41.06 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Any department, agency, or institution of higher education may implement
managed competition for a personal services contract by soliciting bids or
proposals from business units in accordance with the following criteria:

(a)
At least thirty days prior to requesting bids or proposals from private
entities for a personal services contract, the head of the state agency shall
notify the employees of the state agency regarding the request for bids or proposals;
and

(b)
If employees of a state agency inform the director of the department of
personnel of their desire to submit a bid through one or more business units
established for the sole purpose of providing the personal services that are
the subject of the request for bids, the department of personnel shall provide
the business unit or units with training on the bidding process and shall
provide adequate technical assistance in preparing the bid.

(2)
The state director of the department of general administration shall define in
advance and implement procedures by rule to ensure an objective and fair
evaluation process, including but not limited to a prohibition against bid
evaluation participation by any personnel who assisted in preparing a business
unit's bid or who work in a business unit that has within its scope of
responsibility the provision of any of the personal services to be contracted
for.

(3)
If the head of a state agency determines to award a contract to a business unit
of the agency, the award may not be made unless the business unit received no
advantage over other bidders, and the evaluation process was objective and
fair. The state agency shall provide a reasonable opportunity for private
businesses and other business units to comment regarding the evaluation process
and shall consider those comments in making the final contract award.

(4)
A business unit may submit a bid and be awarded a contract to provide personal
services, subject to the requirements of this section including the following
conditions:

(a)
The business unit shall be subject to the same bidding requirements as private
parties bidding on the contract, and may not receive any advantage over other
bidders;

(b)
The business unit's bid price may not be less than its attributable fully
allocated costs for the personal services. The business unit's cost shall
include the salaries and benefits of staff that would be needed and the cost of
space, equipment, and materials needed to perform the function. The business
unit's cost shall not include the state's indirect overhead costs unless the
costs can be attributed solely to the function in question and would not exist
if that function were not performed in state service;

(c)
The business unit must be bound by the same terms, conditions, financial
penalties, and standards as would have applied to a private business if it had
been awarded the contract under the request for bids. However, this subsection
is not intended to expand the personal liability of state employees who are
performing their official duties; and

(d)
If, during any financial quarter during the term of the contract, the cost of
the business unit attributable to the service provided under any request for
bids exceeds the contract price for the period for the service, the state
agency shall cancel the contract and issue new requests for bids for the
service provided under the contract.

(5)
In order to fully realize the benefits of managed competition, the head of the
state agency, in conjunction with the director of the department of general
administration shall monitor on a monthly basis the performance of the service
provider selected, whether it is a business unit within the agency or a private
service provider. If the service delivery does not meet the performance
standards and the deficiencies are not corrected within sixty days, the state
agency shall cancel the contract and issue new requests for bids for the
service provided under the contract.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A new
section is added to chapter 41.06 RCW to read as follows:

If
an employee is displaced as a direct result of an agency's contract with a
private entity under section 3 of this act, the department of personnel shall
make a reasonable effort to offer the employee placement in another position in
state service.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. This
act may be known and cited as the fair competition act of 1999.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
41.06.380 (Purchasing services by contract not
prohibited--Limitations) and 1979 ex.s. c 46 s 2; and

(2) RCW
41.06.382 (Purchasing services by contract not
prohibited--Limitations) and 1979 ex.s. c 46 s 1.

---
END ---