BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
42.52.180 and 1995 c 397 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No state officer or state employee may use or authorize the use of facilities
of an agency, directly or indirectly, for the purpose of assisting a campaign
for election of a person to an office or for the promotion of or opposition to
a ballot proposition. Knowing acquiescence by a person with authority to
direct, control, or influence the actions of the state officer or state
employee using public resources in violation of this section constitutes a
violation of this section. Facilities of an agency include, but are not
limited to, use of stationery, postage, machines, and equipment, use of state
employees of the agency during working hours, vehicles, office space,
publications of the agency, and clientele lists of persons served by the
agency.

(2)
This section shall not apply to the following activities:

(a)
Action taken at an open public meeting by members of an elected legislative
body to express a collective decision, or to actually vote upon a motion,
proposal, resolution, order, or ordinance, or to support or oppose a ballot
proposition as long as (i) required notice of the meeting includes the title
and number of the ballot proposition, and (ii) members of the legislative body
or members of the public are afforded an approximately equal opportunity for
the expression of an opposing view;

(b)
A statement by an elected official in support of or in opposition to any ballot
proposition at an open press conference or in response to a specific inquiry.
For the purposes of this subsection, it is not a violation of this section for
an elected official to: (i) Respond to an inquiry regarding a ballot
proposition, ((to)) (ii) make incidental remarks concerning a
ballot proposition in an official communication, (iii) as a state senator or
state representative, initiate one individualized letter to his or her
legislative district constituents explaining his or her position on a ballot
proposition, or (iv) otherwise comment on a ballot proposition
without an actual, measurable expenditure of public funds. The ethics boards
shall adopt by rule a definition of measurable expenditure;

(c)
Activities that are part of the normal and regular conduct of the office or
agency; and

(d)
De minimis use of public facilities by state-wide elected officials and
legislators incidental to the preparation or delivery of permissible
communications, including written and verbal communications initiated by them
of their views on ballot propositions that foreseeably may affect a matter that
falls within their constitutional or statutory responsibilities.

(3) As to state officers and employees, this section operates to
the exclusion of RCW 42.17.130.

---
END ---