BE IT ENACTED BY
THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
35A.08.030 and 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.08.030 are each amended to read as
follows:

The legislative body of any city having ten thousand or more
inhabitants may, by resolution, provide for submission to the voters of the
question whether the city shall become a charter code city and be governed in
accordance with a charter to be adopted by the voters under the provisions of
this title. The legislative body must provide for such an election upon
receipt of a sufficient petition therefor signed by qualified electors in
number equal to not less than ten percent of the votes cast at the last general
municipal election therein. The question may be submitted to the voters at the
next general municipal election if one is to be held within one hundred and eighty
days or at a special election held for that purpose not less than ninety nor
more than one hundred and eighty days after the passage of the resolution or
the filing of the certificate of sufficiency of the petition. At such election
provision shall also be made for the election of fifteen freeholders who, upon
a favorable vote on the question, shall constitute the charter commission
charged with the duty of framing a charter for submission to the voters. If
the vote in favor of adopting a charter receives forty percent or less of the
total vote on the question of charter adoption, no new election on the question
of charter adoption may be held for a period of two years from the date of the
election in which the charter proposal failed.

---
END ---