BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
36.70A.010 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that uncoordinated and unplanned growth, together with a lack
of common goals expressing the public's interest in the conservation and the
wise use of our lands, pose a threat to the environment, sustainable economic
development, and the health, safety, and high quality of life enjoyed by
residents of this state. It is in the public interest that citizens,
communities, local governments, and the private sector cooperate and coordinate
with one another in comprehensive land use planning. It is in the public
interest to direct growth to urban areas and accommodate housing for all
economic segments of the population. To achieve these goals, the legislature
finds that communities must plan for the density necessary to accommodate the
population growth projected, implement measures to provide the necessary
infrastructure, and encourage an adequate supply of housing in urban areas,
particularly on lands in proximity to frequent transit service. Further,
the legislature finds that it is in the public interest that economic
development programs be shared with communities experiencing insufficient
economic growth.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

In
addition to the requirements of RCW 36.70A.210, a county with a population of
one million five hundred thousand or more shall address, in its county-wide planning
policy, policies that consider the need for affordable housing, such as housing
for all economic segments of the population and parameters for its distribution
to the urban, unincorporated areas of the county and each of the cities within
the county. By December 31, 1999, county-wide planning policies shall
incorporate goals for housing production for the county and each city, in
ten-year intervals, sufficient to accommodate housing needs based upon
twenty-year population growth projected by the office of financial management.
Nothing in this section is intended to change the duties of the office of
financial management under RCW 43.62.035. New goals shall be established when
the office of financial management issues new population projections.

Sec.
3. RCW
36.70A.215 and 1997 c 429 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to the limitations in subsection (7) of this section, a county shall
adopt, in consultation with its cities, county-wide planning policies to
establish a review and evaluation program. This program shall be in addition
to the requirements of RCW 36.70A.110, 36.70A.130, and 36.70A.210. In
developing and implementing the review and evaluation program required by this
section, the county and its cities shall consider information from other
appropriate jurisdictions and sources. The purpose of the review and
evaluation program shall be to:

(a)
Determine whether a county and its cities are achieving urban densities within
urban growth areas by comparing growth and development assumptions, targets,
and objectives contained in the county-wide planning policies and the county
and city comprehensive plans with actual growth and development that has
occurred in the county and its cities; and

(b)
Identify reasonable measures, other than adjusting urban growth areas, that
will be taken to comply with the requirements of this chapter.

(2)
The review and evaluation program shall:

(a)
Encompass land uses and activities both within and outside of urban growth
areas and provide for annual collection of data on urban and rural land uses,
development, critical areas, and capital facilities to the extent necessary to
determine the quantity and type of land suitable for development, both for
residential and employment-based activities;

(b)
Provide for evaluation of the data collected under (a) of this subsection every
five years as provided in subsection (3) of this section. The first evaluation
shall be completed not later than September 1, 2002. The county and its cities
may establish in the county-wide planning policies indicators, benchmarks, and
other similar criteria to use in conducting the evaluation;

(c)
Provide for methods to resolve disputes among jurisdictions relating to the
county-wide planning policies required by this section and procedures to
resolve inconsistencies in collection and analysis of data; and

(d)
Provide for the amendment of the county-wide policies and county and city
comprehensive plans as needed to remedy an inconsistency identified through the
evaluation required by this section, or to bring these policies into compliance
with the requirements of this chapter.

(3)
At a minimum, the evaluation component of the program required by subsection
(1) of this section shall:

(a)
Determine whether there is sufficient suitable land to accommodate the
county-wide population projection established for the county pursuant to RCW
43.62.035 and the subsequent population allocations within the county and
between the county and its cities and the requirements of RCW 36.70A.110;

(b)
Determine the actual density of housing that has been constructed and the
actual amount of land developed for commercial and industrial uses within the
urban growth area since the adoption of a comprehensive plan under this chapter
or since the last periodic evaluation as required by subsection (1) of this
section; and

(c)
Based on the actual density of development as determined under (b) of this
subsection, review commercial, industrial, and housing needs by type and
density range to determine the amount of land needed for commercial,
industrial, and housing for the remaining portion of the twenty-year planning
period used in the most recently adopted comprehensive plan.

(4)
If the evaluation required by subsection (3) of this section demonstrates an
inconsistency between what has occurred since the adoption of the county-wide
planning policies and the county and city comprehensive plans and development
regulations and what was envisioned in those policies and plans and the
planning goals and the requirements of this chapter, as the inconsistency
relates to the evaluation factors specified in subsection (3) of this section,
the county and its cities shall adopt and implement measures that are
reasonably likely to increase consistency during the subsequent five-year
period. If necessary, a county, in consultation with its cities as required by
RCW 36.70A.210, shall adopt amendments to county-wide planning policies to
increase consistency. The county and its cities shall annually monitor the
measures adopted under this subsection to determine their effect and may revise
or rescind them as appropriate.

(5)(a)
Not later than July 1, 1998, the department shall prepare a list of methods
used by counties and cities in carrying out the types of activities required by
this section. The department shall provide this information and appropriate
technical assistance to counties and cities required to or choosing to comply
with the provisions of this section.

(b)
By December 31, 2007, the department shall submit to the appropriate committees
of the legislature a report analyzing the effectiveness of the activities
described in this section in achieving the goals envisioned by the county-wide
planning policies and the comprehensive plans and development regulations of
the counties and cities.

(6)
From funds appropriated by the legislature for this purpose, the department
shall provide grants to counties, cities, and regional planning organizations
required under subsection (7) of this section to conduct the review and perform
the evaluation required by this section.

(7)
The provisions of this section shall apply to counties, and the cities within
those counties, that were greater than one hundred fifty thousand in population
in 1995 as determined by office of financial management population estimates
and that are located west of the crest of the Cascade mountain range but
does not apply to any county with a population of one million five hundred
thousand or more nor to the cities within such county. Any other county
planning under RCW 36.70A.040 may carry out the review, evaluation, and
amendment programs and procedures as provided in this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to the limitations in subsection (12) of this section, a county subject
to this section shall adopt, in consultation with its cities, county-wide
planning policies to establish a review and evaluation program. This program
shall be in addition to the requirements of RCW 36.70A.110, 36.70A.130, and
36.70A.210. In developing and implementing the review and evaluation program
required by this section, the county and its cities shall consider information
from other appropriate jurisdictions and sources. The purpose of the review
and evaluation program shall be to:

(a)
Determine whether the county and its cities are achieving urban densities
within urban growth areas by comparing growth and development assumptions,
targets, and objectives contained in the county-wide planning policies and the
county and city comprehensive plans and development regulations with actual
growth and development that has occurred in the county and its cities;

(b)
Determine whether the county and each of its cities are achieving goals
established for net new housing units to be produced in ten-year intervals to
meet twenty-year household projections, as provided by the county-wide planning
policy and comprehensive plan, and are making adequate provision for existing
and projected housing needs of all economic segments of the community; and

(c)
Identify reasonable measures, other than adjusting urban growth areas, that
will be taken to comply with the requirements of this chapter.

(2)
The review and evaluation program shall:

(a)
Encompass land uses and activities both within and outside of urban growth
areas and provide for annual collection and reporting of data to the department
on urban and rural land uses, development, critical areas, and capital
facilities to the extent necessary to determine the quantity and type of land
suitable for development, both for residential and employment-based activities;

(b)
Development data collected shall, at a minimum, include:

(i)
The number of applications made for residential development, and the number of
residential units;

(ii)
The number of applications approved, the number of residential units, and
density of residential units compared to maximum density allowed on the site;

(iii)
The net number of new residential dwelling units;

(iv)
The number of applications made for commercial and industrial development;

(v)
The number of applications approved for commercial and industrial development,
including the square footage and estimated number of employees;

(vi)
The estimated net number of new jobs created reported on a biennial basis from
existing data;

(vii)
An assessment of market factors including a county-wide analysis of housing
availability inside and outside urban growth boundaries; and

(viii)
An assessment of the availability of public services and facilities to serve
the population growth.

(c)
Provide for evaluation of the data collected under (a) of this subsection every
ten years as provided in subsection (3) of this section. The first evaluation
shall be completed not later than September 1, 2002. The county and its cities
may establish in the county-wide planning policies indicators, benchmarks, and
other similar criteria to use in conducting the evaluation;

(d)
Provide for methods to resolve disputes among jurisdictions relating to the
county-wide planning policies required by this section and procedures to
resolve inconsistencies in collection and analysis of data; and

(e)
Provide for the amendment of the county-wide policies and county and city
comprehensive plans and development regulations as needed to remedy an
inconsistency identified through the evaluation required by this section, or to
bring these policies into compliance with the requirements of this chapter.

(3)
At a minimum, the evaluation component of the program required by subsection
(1) of this section shall:

(a)
Require a joint report from the county and its cities regarding regional growth
patterns, trends, comparing employment, housing growth, and market conditions;
and compiling data on new development;

(b)
Determine whether there is sufficient land suitable for development to
accommodate the county-wide population projection established for the county
pursuant to RCW 43.62.035 and the subsequent population allocations within the
county and between the county and its cities and the requirements of RCW
36.70A.110;

(c)
Determine the actual density of housing that has been constructed, the actual
amount of land developed for commercial and industrial uses within the urban
growth area since the adoption of a comprehensive plan under this chapter or
since the last periodic evaluation as required by subsection (1) of this
section, and the amount of known environmentally sensitive land and public open
space that cannot be built upon; and

(d)
Based on the actual density of development as determined under (c) of this
subsection, review commercial, industrial, and housing needs by type and
density range to determine the amount of land needed for commercial,
industrial, and housing for the remaining portion of the twenty-year planning
period used in the most recently adopted comprehensive plan.

(4)
If the evaluation required by subsection (3) of this section demonstrates an
inconsistency between what has occurred since the adoption of the county-wide
planning policies and the county and city comprehensive plans and development
regulations and what was envisioned in those policies and plans and the
planning goals and the requirements of this chapter, as the inconsistency
relates to the evaluation factors specified in subsection (3) of this section;
or demonstrates that the county or any city has fallen short of its ten-year
goal for new residential construction by more than fifteen percent, or is not
developing per the land use designations and densities planned for the
jurisdiction in its comprehensive plan based on the evaluation factors
specified in subsection (3) of this section, the county or city shall revise
its comprehensive land use plan and development or other regulations as
necessary. The county or city not meeting the criteria shall adopt and
implement measures within one year or within the next cycle to revise local
planning documents that will increase consistency during the subsequent
ten-year period and ensure that the jurisdiction can accommodate the
residential units necessary for population growth and density projected for the
jurisdiction in the county-wide planning policy and its comprehensive plan. If
necessary, a county, in consultation with its cities as required by RCW
36.70A.210, shall adopt amendments to county-wide planning policies to increase
consistency. Failure to make appropriate changes in the period specified shall
make the jurisdiction subject to petition to the growth management hearings
board for noncompliance. The county and its cities shall annually monitor the
measures adopted under this subsection to determine their effect and may revise
or rescind them as appropriate. Measures to accommodate growth include, but
are not limited to, the following:

(a)
Upzoning or revising zoning designations for land within the boundaries of the
jurisdiction in a manner that encourages development to occur at densities
sufficient to accommodate residential, commercial, and industrial needs for
twenty years; and

(b)
Amending the jurisdiction's comprehensive plan or development regulations to
include incentive-based measures that encourage development to occur at
densities sufficient to accommodate residential, commercial, and industrial
needs for twenty years. Incentive-based measures may include, but are not
limited to:

(i)
Financial incentives and regulatory flexibility for higher density housing;

(ii)
Redevelopment and infill strategies;

(iii)
Authorization of housing types not previously allowed by the comprehensive plan
or development regulations;

(iv)
Allowing for subdivisions to achieve lot size reductions;

(v)
Encouraging mixed use development through zoning and incentives; and

(vi)
Subsidizing fees or taxes for housing accommodating low-income and
moderate-income households.

(5)
In establishing that actions and measures adopted under subsection (4) of this
section encourage development to occur at densities sufficient to accommodate
residential, commercial, and industrial needs for twenty years, the county or
city shall, at a minimum, demonstrate to the department that all urban land
designated for housing and commercial and industrial uses is zoned at density
ranges that are demonstrably more likely than not to be achieved by the market.

(6)
Amendments to comprehensive plans and development regulations by the county and
its cities must comply with this chapter.

(7)
On and after the effective date of this act, jurisdictions participating in the
review and evaluation program established by this section, and whose zoning is
consistent with its comprehensive plan, shall be entitled to incentive provisions
to help accommodate growth and achieve goals, including:

(a)
Authorization to use their portion of the local option real estate excise tax
for capital costs of low-income housing as prescribed by RCW 82.46.010;

(b)
Authorization to utilize state funding for "transfer of development
rights" banks and amenities to accommodate growth as provided for in the
state general fund budget;

(c)
Eligibility for property tax abatement for multifamily housing, as prescribed
by chapter 84.14 RCW;

(d)
Upon achieving growth of not less than fifteen percent below projected goals,
additional points shall be granted in funding formulas used to award state
grants as prescribed by RCW 43.17.250, 43.160.060, and 70.146.070. Such
additional points shall only be considered when comparing grant applications
from jurisdictions subject to and in compliance with this section; and

(e)
Upon achieving growth of not less than fifteen percent below projected goals,
additional points shall be awarded for allocation of transit and transportation
funding as prescribed by RCW 47.80.050. Such points shall only be considered
when comparing applications from jurisdictions subject to and in compliance
with this section.

(8)
County-wide planning policies may contain additional incentive provisions and
enforcement measures to accommodate growth and achieve housing goals.

(9)(a)
Not later than July 1, 1998, the department shall prepare a list of methods
used by counties and cities in carrying out the types of activities required by
this section. The department shall provide this information and appropriate
technical assistance to counties and cities required to or choosing to comply
with the provisions of this section.

(b)
By December 31, 2003 and 2008, the department shall submit to the appropriate
committees of the legislature a report analyzing the effectiveness of the
activities described and measures taken by the counties and cities in this
section in achieving the goals envisioned by the county-wide planning policies
and the comprehensive plans and development regulations of the counties and
cities.

(10)
From funds appropriated by the legislature for this purpose, the department
shall provide grants to counties, cities, and regional planning organizations
required under subsection (12) of this section to conduct the review and
perform the evaluation required by this section.

(11)
For the purposes of this section, "land suitable for development"
means all vacant, partially used, redevelopable, or underutilized land that,
after taking into account the protection of critical areas, is: (a) Designated
for commercial, industrial, or residential use; and (b) not intended for public
use.

(12)
This section applies only to a county with a population of one million five
hundred thousand or more and to any city within such county.

Sec.
5. RCW
36.70A.345 and 1994 c 249 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

The
governor may impose a sanction or sanctions specified under RCW 36.70A.340 on:

(1)
A county or city that fails to designate critical areas, agricultural lands,
forest lands, or mineral resource lands under RCW 36.70A.170 by the date such
action was required to have been taken;

(2)
A county or city that fails to adopt development regulations under RCW
36.70A.060 protecting critical areas or conserving agricultural lands, forest
lands, or mineral resource lands by the date such action was required to have
been taken;

(3)
A county that fails to designate urban growth areas under RCW 36.70A.110
by the date such action was required to have been taken; ((and))

(4)
A county or city that fails to adopt its comprehensive plan or
development regulations when such actions are required to be taken;

(5)
A county or city that fails to provide sufficient land suitable for development
to accommodate its share of a county-wide population projection established for
the county pursuant to RCW 43.62.035 and the subsequent population allocations
within the county and between the county and its cities and the requirements of
RCW 36.70A.110;

(6)
A county or city that fails to sufficiently plan to accommodate growth, or
provide incentive measures as necessary to encourage development to accommodate
residential needs, as prescribed in section 4 of this act;

(7)
A county or city that fails to achieve not less than fifteen percent below
housing goals, or make significant progress toward eliminating housing
production obstacles and deficiencies within three years, as prescribed in
section 4 of this act;

(8)
Subsections (5), (6), and (7) of this section apply only to a county with a
population of one million five hundred thousand or more, and any city within
such county.

Imposition
of a sanction or sanctions under this section shall be preceded by written findings
by the governor, that either the county or city is not proceeding in good faith
to meet the requirements of the act; or that the county or city has
unreasonably delayed taking the required action. The governor shall consult
with and communicate his or her findings to the appropriate growth management
hearings board prior to imposing the sanction or sanctions. For those counties
or cities that are not required to plan or have not opted in, the governor in
imposing sanctions shall consider the size of the jurisdiction relative to the
requirements of this chapter and the degree of technical and financial
assistance provided.

Sec.
6. RCW
47.80.050 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 57 are each amended to read as follows:

Biennial
appropriations to the department of transportation to carry out the regional
transportation planning program shall set forth the amounts to be allocated as
follows:

(1)
A base amount per county for each county within each regional transportation
planning organization, to be distributed to the lead planning agency;

(2)
An amount to be distributed to each lead planning agency on a per capita basis;
((and))

(3)
An amount to be administered by the department of transportation as a
discretionary grant program for special regional planning projects, including
grants to allow counties which have significant transportation interests in
common with an adjoining region to also participate in that region's planning
efforts; and

(4)
An amount to be administered by the department of transportation for grants to
counties and cities subject to and in compliance with section 4 of this act.

Sec.
7. RCW
82.46.010 and 1994 c 272 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
The legislative authority of any county or city shall identify in the adopted
budget the capital projects funded in whole or in part from the proceeds of the
tax authorized in this section, and shall indicate that such tax is intended to
be in addition to other funds that may be reasonably available for such capital
projects.

(b)
The legislative authority of any county with a population of one million five
hundred thousand or more and any city within such county shall identify in the
adopted budget the capital projects and low-income housing activities funded in
whole or in part from the proceeds of the tax authorized in this section, and
shall indicate that such tax is intended to be in addition to other funds that
may be reasonably available for such capital projects and low-income housing
activities.

(2)
The legislative authority of any county or any city may impose an excise tax on
each sale of real property in the unincorporated areas of the county for the
county tax and in the corporate limits of the city for the city tax at a rate
not exceeding one-quarter of one percent of the selling price. The revenues
from this tax shall be used by any city or county with a population of five
thousand or less and any city or county that does not plan under RCW 36.70A.040
for any capital purpose identified in a capital improvements plan and local
capital improvements, including those listed in RCW 35.43.040.

((After
April 30, 1992,)) Revenues generated from the tax imposed under this
subsection in counties over five thousand population and cities over five
thousand population that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040
shall be used solely for financing capital projects specified in a capital
facilities plan element of a comprehensive plan and housing relocation assistance
under RCW 59.18.440 and 59.18.450, except as provided in section 4 of this
act for jurisdictions subject to and in compliance with section 4 of this act.
However, revenues (a) pledged by such counties and cities to debt retirement
prior to April 30, 1992, may continue to be used for that purpose until the
original debt for which the revenues were pledged is retired, or (b) committed
prior to April 30, 1992, by such counties or cities to a project may continue
to be used for that purpose until the project is completed.

(3)
In lieu of imposing the tax authorized in RCW 82.14.030(2), the legislative authority
of any county or any city may impose an additional excise tax on each sale of
real property in the unincorporated areas of the county for the county tax and
in the corporate limits of the city for the city tax at a rate not exceeding
one-half of one percent of the selling price.

(4)
Taxes imposed under this section shall be collected from persons who are
taxable by the state under chapter 82.45 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable
event within the unincorporated areas of the county or within the corporate
limits of the city, as the case may be. (5) Taxes imposed under this section
shall comply with all applicable rules, regulations, laws, and court decisions
regarding real estate excise taxes as imposed by the state under chapter 82.45
RCW.

(6)
As used in this section((,)):

(a)
"City" means any city or town ((and));

(b)
"Capital project" means those public works projects of a local
government for planning, acquisition, construction, reconstruction, repair,
replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of streets; roads; highways;
sidewalks; street and road lighting systems; traffic signals; bridges; domestic
water systems; storm and sanitary sewer systems; parks; recreational
facilities; law enforcement facilities; fire protection facilities; trails;
libraries; administrative and/or judicial facilities; river and/or waterway flood
control projects by those jurisdictions that, prior to June 11, 1992, have
expended funds derived from the tax authorized by this section for such
purposes; ((and, until December 31, 1995, housing projects for those
jurisdictions that, prior to June 11, 1992, have expended or committed to
expend funds derived from the tax authorized by this section or the tax
authorized by RCW 82.46.035 for such purposes))

(c)
"Low-income housing activities" include the capital costs for
planning, acquisition, building, improving, or restoring publicly owned
low-income housing, granting funds to nonprofit organizations for low-income
housing, and other financial aid or grants to individuals or organizations,
provided the amounts are dedicated solely to the capital costs for planning,
building, improvement, restoration, or provision of low-income housing, from a
local government subject to section 4 of this act. A plan for the expenditure
of the excise tax proceeds for this purpose shall be prepared by the
legislative authority prior to the adoption of this plan, and a public hearing
shall be held to obtain public input;

(d)
"Low-income housing" means housing provided for low-income
households; and

(e)
"Low-income household" means a single person, family, or unrelated persons
living together whose income is at or below fifty percent of the median income,
adjusted for household size, in the county where the low-income housing is
located.

Sec.
8. RCW
43.17.250 and 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever
a state agency is considering awarding grants or loans for a county, city, or
town to finance public facilities, it shall consider whether the county, city,
or town that is requesting the grant or loan is a party to a county-wide
planning policy under RCW 36.70A.210 relating to the type of public facility
for which the grant or loan is sought((, and)); shall accord
additional preference to the county, city, or town if such county-wide planning
policy exists; and shall grant priority status to any county, city, or town
subject to and in compliance with section 4 of this act. Such priority status
shall only be granted when comparing grant applications from jurisdictions
subject to section 4 of this act. Whenever a state agency is considering
awarding grants or loans to a special district for public facilities, it shall
consider whether the county, city, or town in whose planning jurisdiction the
proposed facility is located is a party to a county-wide planning policy under
RCW 36.70A.210 relating to the type of public facility for which the grant or
loan is sought.

Sec.
9. RCW
43.160.060 and 1996 c 51 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board is authorized to make direct loans to political subdivisions of the state
for the purposes of assisting the political subdivisions in financing the cost
of public facilities, including development of land and improvements for public
facilities, as well as the construction, rehabilitation, alteration, expansion,
or improvement of the facilities. A grant may also be authorized for purposes
designated in this chapter, but only when, and to the extent that, a loan is
not reasonably possible, given the limited resources of the political
subdivision and the finding by the board that unique circumstances exist. The
board shall not obligate more than twenty percent of its biennial appropriation
as grants.

Application
for funds shall be made in the form and manner as the board may prescribe. In
making grants or loans the board shall conform to the following requirements:

(1)
The board shall not provide financial assistance:

(a)
For a project the primary purpose of which is to facilitate or promote a retail
shopping development or expansion.

(b)
For any project that evidence exists would result in a development or expansion
that would displace existing jobs in any other community in the state.

(c)
For the acquisition of real property, including buildings and other fixtures
which are a part of real property.

(2)
The board shall only provide financial assistance:

(a)
For those projects which would result in specific private developments or
expansions (i) in manufacturing, production, food processing, assembly,
warehousing, and industrial distribution; (ii) for processing recyclable
materials or for facilities that support recycling, including processes not
currently provided in the state, including but not limited to, de-inking
facilities, mixed waste paper, plastics, yard waste, and problem-waste processing;
(iii) for manufacturing facilities that rely significantly on recyclable
materials, including but not limited to waste tires and mixed waste paper; (iv)
which support the relocation of businesses from nondistressed urban areas to
distressed rural areas; or (v) which substantially support the trading of goods
or services outside of the state's borders.

(b)
For projects which it finds will improve the opportunities for the successful
maintenance, establishment, or expansion of industrial or commercial plants or
will otherwise assist in the creation or retention of long-term economic
opportunities.

(c)
When the application includes convincing evidence that a specific private
development or expansion is ready to occur and will occur only if the public facility
improvement is made.

(3)
The board shall prioritize each proposed project according to the relative
benefits provided to the community by the jobs the project would create, not
just the total number of jobs it would create after the project is completed
and according to the unemployment rate in the area in which the jobs would be
located. As long as there is more demand for financial assistance than there
are funds available, the board is instructed to fund projects in order of their
priority.

(4)
A responsible official of the political subdivision shall be present during
board deliberations and provide information that the board requests.

(5)
Before any financial assistance application is approved, the political
subdivision seeking the assistance must demonstrate to the ((community
economic revitalization)) board that no other timely source of funding is
available to it at costs reasonably similar to financing available from the ((community
economic revitalization)) board.

(6)
The board shall grant priority status to any political subdivision subject to
and in compliance with section 4 of this act. Such priority status shall only
be granted when comparing grant applications from jurisdictions subject to
section 4 of this act.

Sec.
10. RCW
70.146.070 and 1997 c 429 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

When
making grants or loans for water pollution control facilities, the department
shall consider the following:

(1)
The protection of water quality and public health;

(2)
The cost to residential ratepayers if they had to finance water pollution
control facilities without state assistance;

(3)
Actions required under federal and state permits and compliance orders;

(4)
The level of local fiscal effort by residential ratepayers since 1972 in
financing water pollution control facilities;

(5)
The extent to which the applicant county or city, or if the applicant is
another public body, the extent to which the county or city in which the
applicant public body is located, has established programs to mitigate nonpoint
pollution of the surface or subterranean water sought to be protected by the
water pollution control facility named in the application for state assistance;
and

(6)
The recommendations of the Puget Sound action team and any other board,
council, commission, or group established by the legislature or a state agency
to study water pollution control issues in the state.

Except
where necessary to address a public health need or substantial environmental
degradation, a county, city, or town that is required or chooses to plan under
RCW 36.70A.040 may not receive a grant or loan for water pollution control facilities
unless it has adopted a comprehensive plan in conformance with the requirements
of chapter 36.70A RCW, after it is required that the comprehensive plan be
adopted, or unless it has adopted development regulations in conformance with
the requirements of chapter 36.70A RCW, after it is required that development
regulations be adopted; and, if the applicant county or city is subject to
section 4 of this act, it is in compliance with section 4 of this act.

Sec.
11. RCW
84.14.010 and 1997 c 429 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"City" means either:

(a)
A city or town with a population of at least one hundred thousand ((or));

(b)
The largest city or town, if there is no city or town with a population
of at least one hundred thousand, located in a county planning under the growth
management act; or

(c)
Any city or town subject to and in compliance with section 4 of this act.

(2)
"Governing authority" means the local legislative authority of a city
having jurisdiction over the property for which an exemption may be applied for
under this chapter.

(3)
"Growth management act" means chapter 36.70A RCW.

(4)
"Multiple-unit housing" means a building having four or more dwelling
units not designed or used as transient accommodations and not including hotels
and motels. Multifamily units may result from new construction or
rehabilitated or conversion of vacant, underutilized, or substandard buildings
to multifamily housing.

(5)
"Owner" means the property owner of record.

(6)
"Permanent residential occupancy" means multiunit housing that
provides either rental or owner occupancy on a nontransient basis. This includes
owner-occupied or rental accommodation that is leased for a period of at least
one month. This excludes hotels and motels that predominately offer rental
accommodation on a daily or weekly basis.

(7)
"Rehabilitation improvements" means modifications to existing
structures, that are vacant for twelve months or longer, that are made to
achieve a condition of substantial compliance with existing building codes or
modification to existing occupied structures which increase the number of
multifamily housing units.

(8)
"Residential targeted area" means an area within an urban center that
has been designated by the governing authority as a residential targeted area
in accordance with this chapter.

(9)
"Substantial compliance" means compliance with local building or
housing code requirements that are typically required for rehabilitation as
opposed to new construction.

(10)
"Urban center" means a compact identifiable district where urban
residents may obtain a variety of products and services. An urban center must
contain:

(a)
Several existing or previous, or both, business establishments that may include
but are not limited to shops, offices, banks, restaurants, governmental
agencies;

(b)
Adequate public facilities including streets, sidewalks, lighting, transit,
domestic water, and sanitary sewer systems; and

(c) A mixture of uses and activities that may include housing,
recreation, and cultural activities in association with either commercial or
office, or both, use.

---
END ---