BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.71.015 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 303 are each amended to read as follows:

The
Washington state medical quality assurance commission is established,
consisting of thirteen individuals licensed to practice medicine in the state
of Washington under this chapter, two individuals who are licensed as physician
assistants under chapter 18.71A RCW, and four individuals who are members of
the public. Each congressional district now existing or hereafter created in
the state must be represented by at least one physician member of the
commission. The terms of office of members of the commission are not affected
by changes in congressional district boundaries. Public members of the
commission may not be a member of any other health care licensing board or
commission, or have a fiduciary obligation to a facility rendering health
services regulated by the commission, or have a material or financial interest
in the rendering of health services regulated by the commission.

The
members of the commission shall be appointed by the governor. Members of the
initial commission may be appointed to staggered terms of one to four years,
and thereafter all terms of appointment shall be for four years. The governor
shall consider such physician and physician assistant members who are
recommended for appointment by the appropriate professional associations in the
state. In appointing the initial members of the commission, it is the intent
of the legislature that, to the extent possible, the existing members of the
board of medical examiners and medical disciplinary board repealed under
section 336, chapter 9, Laws of 1994 sp. sess. be appointed to the commission.
No member may serve more than two consecutive full terms. Each member shall
hold office until a successor is appointed.

Each
member of the commission must be a citizen of the United States, must be an
actual resident of this state, and, if a physician, must have been licensed to
practice medicine in this state for at least five years.

The
commission shall meet as soon as practicable after appointment and elect
officers each year. Meetings shall be held at least four times a year and at
such place as the commission determines and at such other times and places as
the commission deems necessary. A majority of the commission members appointed
and serving constitutes a quorum for the transaction of commission business.

The
affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the commission is required to
carry any motion or resolution, to adopt any rule, or to pass any measure. The
commission may appoint panels consisting of at least three members. A quorum
for the transaction of any business by a panel is a minimum of three members.
A majority vote of a quorum of the panel is required to transact business
delegated to it by the commission.

Each
member of the commission shall be compensated in ((accordance with RCW
43.03.240 and)) an amount not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars per
day during which the member attends an official meeting of the group or
performs statutorily prescribed duties approved by the chair of the
commission. In addition ((thereto)) each member shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in carrying out the duties of the
commission in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Any such expenses
shall be paid from funds appropriated to the department of health.

Whenever
the governor is satisfied that a member of a commission has been guilty of
neglect of duty, misconduct, or malfeasance or misfeasance in office, the
governor shall file with the secretary of state a statement of the causes for
and the order of removal from office, and the secretary shall forthwith send a
certified copy of the statement of causes and order of removal to the last
known post office address of the member.

Vacancies
in the membership of the commission shall be filled for the unexpired term by
appointment by the governor.

The
members of the commission are immune from suit in an action, civil or criminal,
based on its disciplinary proceedings or other official acts performed in good
faith as members of the commission.

Whenever the workload of the commission requires, the commission
may request that the secretary appoint pro tempore members of the commission.
When serving, pro tempore members of the commission have all of the powers,
duties, and immunities, and are entitled to all of the emoluments, including
travel expenses, of regularly appointed members of the commission.

---
END ---