BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 42.40 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The director of the department of personnel shall establish a rotational
registry system to appoint and monitor advocates for those whistleblowers who
allege retaliation under RCW 42.40.050.

(2)
Advocates shall be limited to representation of the whistleblower under RCW
49.60.230 and 49.60.240, including the conference and conciliation stage under
RCW 49.60.240. The advocate shall provide the commission all documents and
records, and shall cooperate with the commission in its function as
representative of the whistleblower. If the parties proceed under RCW
49.60.250, the whistleblower may retain independent counsel at his or her
expense. The whistleblower retaliation advocate shall not accept private employment
by the whistleblower under RCW 49.60.250.

(3)
The advocate's appointment by the department of personnel shall be pursuant to
a contract of employment awarded and administered by the department of
personnel.

(4)
To be eligible for placement in the registry, a person must:

(a)
Be admitted to the practice of law in the state of Washington;

(b)
Be engaged in private practice;

(c)
Not have provided legal representation for the alleged retaliating agency for
the five years previous to the date on which his or her appointment to the case
would occur; and

(d)
Be able to demonstrate that he or she has completed training in arbitration or
mediation.

The
director may establish additional criteria.

(5)
Eligibility for a whistleblower to receive appointment of an advocate on his or
her behalf shall be determined by the department of personnel and shall be
limited to those whistleblowers whose income is less than two hundred percent
of the federal poverty level for a person whose family size is the same as the
whistleblower.

Whistleblowers
who are unemployed at the time they request appointment of an advocate under
this chapter are eligible to receive appointment of an advocate until such time
as they obtain employment at a level of compensation that would disqualify them
from eligibility under this section.

(6)
The rotational registry system shall list advocates in the order in which they
are established as being qualified by the department of personnel for listing
on the registry. A whistleblower who wishes to be represented by an advocate
shall apply to the department. The first three names on the list shall be
given to the whistleblower and the whistleblower shall select his or her
representative from among those three, however, if none of the first three
choices is acceptable to the whistleblower then the next three names shall be
given to the whistleblower from which to make his or her choice. If the
whistleblower rejects the names from the second list, he or she shall accept
the next name on the list or seek alternative representation at his or her own
expense. The name of any advocate who either serves or is rejected is placed,
in order, on the bottom of the list.

(7)
The amount of compensation for the advocate shall be calculated at the rate of
one hundred dollars per hour. The maximum compensation for an advocate shall
not exceed five thousand dollars for each case to which the advocate is
assigned. The whistleblower shall pay twenty percent of this compensation.
This shall constitute the sole and entire compensation of the advocate. Costs
for all office, clerical, and other support services required by the advocate
shall be borne by the advocate.

The
department of personnel shall monitor compliance with the terms and conditions
of the contract. The department of personnel shall terminate any contract when
the department determines that the advocate has failed substantially to comply
with the terms and conditions of the contract. The whistleblower may terminate
the services of the advocate at any time for any cause. If the whistleblower
terminates the services of the advocate, the whistleblower shall accept the
next name on the list at the time of the termination or seek alternative
representation at his or her own expense. The secretary shall review all
terminations at the end of each year to determine whether an advocate has
failed substantially to comply with terms of his or her contracts. Any
advocate who is found to have failed substantially to comply shall be removed
from the registry by the director.

(8)
The registry is established January 1, 2000, and may be used for any case open
at the time of its creation. The director of personnel shall adopt rules as
necessary to implement this section.

(9)
The department of personnel shall report to the governor, the legislature, and
the human rights commission in January of every odd-numbered year. This report
shall include but not be limited to statistics on the use of the registry,
costs to the state, results of cases that received appointment of an advocate,
time expended between the filing of a complaint with the human rights
commission and the conclusion of the complaint, and any other matter of
interest or use to the governor or legislature.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The sum of . . . . . dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the
general fund to the department of personnel for the purposes of section 1 of
this act.

(2) The sum of . . . . . dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2001, from the general fund to the department of personnel for the purposes
of section 1 of this act.

---
END ---