BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1) A
joint select committee on problem gambling is established. The joint select
committee shall consist of eight members, as follows:

(a)
Two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate, appointed by
the president of the senate, who are members of the senate commerce, trade,
housing and financial institutions committee;

(b)
Two members from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of
representatives, appointed by the co-speakers of the house of representatives,
who are members of the house commerce and labor committee;

(c)
In addition, the following agencies shall cooperate with the joint select
committee and maintain a liaison with the committee: The Washington state
gambling commission, the Washington state lottery commission, the Washington
state horse racing commission, the department of social and health services,
and the department of health. The committee shall choose its co-chairs from
among its legislative membership.

(2)
The committee shall review the following issues:

(a)
The need to develop policies and programs to address problem and pathological
gambling and the response of the gambling industry to the demonstrated need;

(b)
The need for public awareness programs about problem and pathological gambling,
including programs targeting youth, and the effectiveness of current programs;

(c)
The level of service provided to gamblers and their families through the help
line and the best method of providing help line services;

(d)
The availability of instate treatment services for problem and pathological
gamblers and their families; and

(e)
The appropriate level of public involvement in treatment services including
public funding.

(3)
The committee may consult with individuals from the gambling industry,
nonprofit organizations with expertise in problem gambling issues, community
mental health organizations, tribal governments involved in gaming, and law
enforcement agencies.

(4)
The committee shall use legislative facilities and staff from senate committee
services and the office of program research, but may hire additional staff with
specific technical expertise if such expertise is necessary to carry out the
mandates of this study. All expenses of the committee, including travel, shall
be paid jointly by the senate and the house of representatives.

(5)
The committee shall report its findings and recommendations to the legislature
by December 1, 1999.

(6) This section expires July 1, 2000.

---
END ---