BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise:

(1)
"Appliances, fixtures, and items of equipment" means furnaces,
boilers, oil tanks and fittings, air purifiers, air handling equipment, ventilating
fans, ceiling fans, air conditioning equipment, water heaters, pumps, stoves,
ranges, ovens, refrigerators, garbage disposals, compactors, dishwashers,
automatic door openers, washers and dryers, bathtubs, sinks, toilets, faucets
and fittings, lighting fixtures, lighting control and energy management
systems, security systems, circuit breakers, and other similar items.

(2)
"Residential builder" means any person, corporation, partnership,
general contractor, or other legal entity that:

(a)
Is engaged in the business of erecting or otherwise constructing a new home; or

(b)
Purchases a completed new home for resale in the course of its business.

(3)
"Electrical systems" means all wiring, electrical boxes, switches,
outlets, and connections up to the public utility connection.

(4)
"Heating, cooling, and ventilating systems" means all duct work, gas,
steam, water and refrigerant lines, registers, convectors, solar panels,
radiation elements, and dampers.

(5)
"Load-bearing portions of the home" means the load-bearing portions
of the:

(a)
Foundation system and footings;

(b)
Beams;

(c)
Girders;

(d)
Lintels;

(e)
Columns;

(f)
Walls and partitions;

(g)
Floor systems; and

(h)
Roof framing systems.

(6)(a)
"New home" means:

(i)
Every newly constructed private dwelling unit in the state and the fixtures and
structure that are made a part of a newly constructed private dwelling unit at
the time of construction; and

(ii)
A condominium, as defined in RCW 64.34.020, used for residential purposes, as
defined in RCW 64.34.020.

(b)
"New home" does not mean:

(i)
A residential timeshare, as defined in RCW 64.36.010;

(ii)
A manufactured home or mobile home, as defined in RCW 65.20.020;

(iii)
Outbuildings, including detached garages and detached carports, except
outbuildings that contain plumbing, electrical, heating, cooling, or
ventilation systems serving the new home, and then only to the extent that defects
would affect these systems;

(iv)
Driveways;

(v)
Walkways;

(vi)
Boundary walls;

(vii)
Retaining walls not necessary for the structural stability of the new home;

(viii)
Landscaping;

(ix)
Sprinkler or irrigation systems;

(x)
Fences;

(xi)
Off-site improvements;

(xii)
Appurtenant recreational facilities; and

(xiii)
Other similar items as determined by the director of the department of labor
and industries by rule.

(7)
"New home warranty" means the warranty created in section 2 of this
act.

(8)"Owner"
means the purchaser of a new home.

(9)
"Plumbing systems" means:

(a)
Gas supply lines and fittings;

(b)
Water supply, waste, and vent pipes and their fittings;

(c)
Septic tanks and their drain fields; and

(d)
Water, gas, and sewer service piping and their extensions to the tie-in of a
public utility connection; or on-site wells and sewage disposal systems.

(10)(a)
"Structural defect" means any defect in the load-bearing portions of
a new home that adversely affects its load-bearing function to the extent that
the home becomes or is in serious danger of becoming unsafe, unsanitary, or
otherwise not reasonably safely inhabitable.

(b)
"Structural defect" includes damage due to subsidence, expansion, or
lateral movement of soil that has been disturbed or relocated by the
residential builder.

(c)
"Structural defect" does not include damage caused by movement of the
soil:

(i)
Resulting from a flood or earthquake; or

(ii)
For which compensation has been provided.

(11)
"Warranty date" means the first day that the owner occupies the new
home, closes on the new home, makes the final contract payment on the new home,
or obtains an occupancy permit for the new home if the home is built on the
owner's property, whichever is earlier.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
(1)(a) Except as excluded under (b) of this subsection, every contract for the
construction or sale of a new home includes, as a matter of law, a warranty
from the residential builder that shall warrant at a minimum that:

(i)
For one year, beginning on the warranty date, the new home is free from any
defects in materials and workmanship;

(ii)
For three years, beginning on the warranty date, the new home is free from any
defects in the electrical, plumbing, heating, cooling, and ventilating systems,
except that in the case of appliances, fixtures, and items of equipment, the
warranty need not exceed the length and scope of the warranty offered by the
manufacturer, and the warranty of merchantability, fitness and all other
implied warranties with respect to appliances, fixtures, and items of equipment
shall be governed by the Washington uniform commercial code;

(iii)
For five years, beginning on the warranty date, the new home is free from any
defects resulting in water penetration; and

(iv)
For ten years, beginning on the warranty date, the new home is free from any
structural defects.

(b)
The new home warranty excludes the following:

(i)
Damage to real property that is not part of the home covered by the warranty or
that is not included in the purchase price of the home;

(ii)
Bodily injury or damage to personal property;

(iii)
Any defect in materials supplied or work performed by anyone other than the
residential builder or the residential builder's employees, agents, or
subcontractors;

(iv)
Any damage that the owner has not taken timely action to minimize;

(v)
Normal wear and tear or normal deterioration;

(vi)
Insect damage, except where the residential builder has failed to use proper
materials or construction methods designed to prevent insect infestation;

(vii)
Any loss or damage that arises while the home is being used primarily for
nonresidential purposes;

(viii)
Any damage to the extent it is caused or made worse by negligence, improper
maintenance, or improper operations by anyone other than the residential
builder or its employees, agents, or subcontractors;

(ix)
Any damage to the extent it is caused or made worse by changes of the grading
of the ground by anyone other than the residential builder, its employees,
agents, or subcontractors; and

(x)
Any loss or damage caused by acts of God.

(2)
The warranty created by this section runs from the residential builder to the
owner. This warranty entitles the owner to recover from the residential
builder all costs associated with repairing the defect, together with the cost
of repair of damage proximately caused by the defect, including the cost of
repairing driveways, sidewalks, lawns, landscaping, or similar associated
facilities and fixtures necessarily damaged as a result of the required
repairs. The liability of a residential builder under the new home warranty
shall be limited to the purchase price of the home in the first good faith sale
thereof or the fair market value of the home on its completion date if there is
no good faith sale. Absence of privity of contract between the owner and the
residential builder is not a defense to the enforcement of this warranty.

(3)
If the defect is the result of work performed by a subcontractor, the
residential builder has a right of contribution from that subcontractor for
amounts paid to the owner as a result of the new home warranty.

(4)
No action to enforce the new home warranty created by this section may be commenced
after one hundred eighty days from the time the defect is discovered, or with
reasonable diligence, should have been discovered. Providing written notice
and reasonable description of a defect to the residential builder has the
effect of tolling the limitation periods established by this subsection and
subsection (5) of this section. Such tolling shall continue until the
residential builder completes the repair to the satisfaction of the owner, or
the residential builder gives the owner written notice that the residential
builder refuses to make the repair or has completed as much of the repair as
the residential builder intends to complete.

(5)
Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, no action to enforce the
new home warranty created by this section may be filed later than the time
periods described in subsection (1)(a) of this section.

(6)
The new home warranty is a cumulative remedy, and shall not have the effect of
diminishing or replacing any other remedy or warranty created by law or equity
or agreement between the parties. The new home warranty is in addition to the
warranties created under chapter 64.34 RCW.

(7)
The new home warranty does not expire on the subsequent sale of a new home by
the owner to subsequent purchaser, but continues to protect subsequent
purchasers until the warranties provided in subsection (1)(a) of this section
expire.

(8)
A general disclaimer of the new home warranty is not effective except that a
purchaser of real property consisting of, or improved by, more than four
dwelling units may make a written disclaimer of the new home warranty. A
residential builder and any owner or any successor in title to the owner may
disclaim liability in a written instrument signed by the purchaser for a
specified defect, if the defect entered into and became a part of the basis of
the bargain.

Sec.
3. RCW
4.16.300 and 1986 c 305 s 703 are each amended to read as follows:

RCW
4.16.300 through 4.16.320 shall apply to all claims or causes of action of any
kind against any person, arising from such person having constructed, altered
or repaired any improvement upon real property, or having performed or
furnished any design, planning, surveying, architectural or construction or
engineering services, or supervision or observation of construction, or
administration of construction contracts for any construction, alteration or
repair of any improvement upon real property. This section is intended to
benefit only those persons referenced herein and shall not apply to claims or
causes of action against manufacturers. This section does not apply to a
new home warranty under chapter 64.-- RCW (sections 1 and 2 of this act).

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4.
Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 64 RCW.

---
END ---