BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply to sales to a day-care facility
licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW of tangible personal property used primarily
to provide child care, but only if the buyer provides the seller with an
exemption certificate in a form and manner prescribed by the department. The
exemption in this section does not apply to motor vehicles or to tangible
personal property that becomes an ingredient or component of new or existing
buildings or other structures during the course of constructing, repairing,
decorating, or improving the new or existing buildings or other structures.

(2)
The department of social and health services shall provide the department with
a current list of licensed day-care facilities on a quarterly basis.

(3)
The department shall adopt rules providing which tangible personal property is
exempt under this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The provisions of this chapter do not apply in respect to the use by a day-care
facility licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW of tangible personal property used
primarily to provide child care. The exemption in this section does not apply
to motor vehicles or to tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient
or component of new or existing buildings or other structures during the course
of constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving the new or existing
buildings or other structures.

(2)
The department of social and health services shall provide the department with
a current list of licensed day-care facilities on a quarterly basis.

(3) The department shall adopt rules providing which tangible
personal property is exempt under this section.

---
END ---