BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.54.030 and 1984 c 279 s 54 are each amended to read as follows:

The
initial composition of the optometry board includes the three members of the
examining committee for optometry plus two more optometrists to be appointed by
the governor.

The
governor must make all appointments to the optometry board. Only optometrists
who are citizens of the United States, residents of this state, having been
licensed to practice and practicing optometry in this state for a period of at
least four years immediately preceding the effective date of appointment, and
who have no connection with any school or college embracing the teaching of
optometry or with any optical supply business may be appointed.

The
governor may set the terms of office of the initial board at his or her
discretion, to establish the following perpetual succession: The terms of the
initial board include one position for one year, two for two years and two for
three years; and upon the expiration of the terms of the initial board, all
appointments are for three years.

In
addition to the members specified in this section, the governor shall appoint a
consumer member of the board, a public member of the board, and an
ophthalmologist licensed to practice in this state, who shall serve for a
term of three years.

In the event that a vacancy occurs on the board in the middle of an
appointee's term, the governor must appoint a successor for the unexpired
portion of the term only.

Sec.
2. RCW
18.71.015 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 303 are each amended to read as follows:

The
Washington state medical quality assurance commission is established,
consisting of thirteen individuals licensed to practice medicine in the state
of Washington under this chapter, two individuals who are licensed as physician
assistants under chapter 18.71A RCW, one individual licensed to practice
optometry under chapter 18.53 RCW, and four individuals who are members of
the public. Each congressional district now existing or hereafter created in
the state must be represented by at least one physician member of the
commission. The terms of office of members of the commission are not affected
by changes in congressional district boundaries. Public members of the
commission may not be a member of any other health care licensing board or
commission, or have a fiduciary obligation to a facility rendering health
services regulated by the commission, or have a material or financial interest
in the rendering of health services regulated by the commission.

The
members of the commission shall be appointed by the governor. Members of the
initial commission may be appointed to staggered terms of one to four years,
and thereafter all terms of appointment shall be for four years. The governor
shall consider such physician and physician assistant members who are
recommended for appointment by the appropriate professional associations in the
state. In appointing the initial members of the commission, it is the intent
of the legislature that, to the extent possible, the existing members of the
board of medical examiners and medical disciplinary board repealed under
section 336, chapter 9, Laws of 1994 sp. sess. be appointed to the commission.
No member may serve more than two consecutive full terms. Each member shall
hold office until a successor is appointed.

Each
member of the commission must be a citizen of the United States, must be an
actual resident of this state, and, if a physician or optometrist, must
have been licensed to practice medicine or optometry, respectively, in
this state for at least five years.

The
commission shall meet as soon as practicable after appointment and elect
officers each year. Meetings shall be held at least four times a year and at
such place as the commission determines and at such other times and places as
the commission deems necessary. A majority of the commission members appointed
and serving constitutes a quorum for the transaction of commission business.

The
affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the commission is required to
carry any motion or resolution, to adopt any rule, or to pass any measure. The
commission may appoint panels consisting of at least three members. A quorum
for the transaction of any business by a panel is a minimum of three members.
A majority vote of a quorum of the panel is required to transact business
delegated to it by the commission.

Each
member of the commission shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240
and in addition thereto shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in
carrying out the duties of the commission in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060. Any such expenses shall be paid from funds appropriated to the
department of health.

Whenever
the governor is satisfied that a member of a commission has been guilty of
neglect of duty, misconduct, or malfeasance or misfeasance in office, the
governor shall file with the secretary of state a statement of the causes for
and the order of removal from office, and the secretary shall forthwith send a
certified copy of the statement of causes and order of removal to the last
known post office address of the member.

Vacancies
in the membership of the commission shall be filled for the unexpired term by
appointment by the governor.

The
members of the commission are immune from suit in an action, civil or criminal,
based on its disciplinary proceedings or other official acts performed in good
faith as members of the commission.

Whenever
the workload of the commission requires, the commission may request that the
secretary appoint pro tempore members of the commission. When serving, pro
tempore members of the commission have all of the powers, duties, and
immunities, and are entitled to all of the emoluments, including travel
expenses, of regularly appointed members of the commission.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---