BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
35.58.273 and 1998 c 321 s 25 (Referendum Bill No. 49) are each amended to read
as follows:

(1)
A municipality is authorized to levy and collect a special excise tax not
exceeding ((.725)) .815 percent on the value, as determined under
chapter 82.44 RCW, of every motor vehicle owned by a resident of such
municipality for the privilege of using such motor vehicle provided that in no
event shall the tax be less than one dollar and, subject to RCW 82.44.150 (3)
and (4), the amount of such tax shall be credited against the amount of the
excise tax levied by the state under RCW 82.44.020(1). Before utilization of
any excise tax moneys collected under authorization of this section for
acquisition of right of way or construction of a mass transit facility on a
separate right of way the municipality shall adopt rules affording the public
an opportunity for "corridor public hearings" and "design public
hearings" as herein defined, which rule shall provide in detail the
procedures necessary for public participation in the following instances: (a)
Prior to adoption of location and design plans having a substantial social,
economic or environmental effect upon the locality upon which they are to be
constructed or (b) on such mass rapid transit systems operating on a separate
right of way whenever a substantial change is proposed relating to location or
design in the adopted plan. In adopting rules the municipality shall adhere to
the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act.

(2)
A "corridor public hearing" is a public hearing that: (a) Is held
before the municipality is committed to a specific mass transit route proposal,
and before a route location is established; (b) is held to afford an
opportunity for participation by those interested in the determination of the
need for, and the location of, the mass rapid transit system; (c) provides a
public forum that affords a full opportunity for presenting views on the mass
rapid transit system route location, and the social, economic and environmental
effects on that location and alternate locations: PROVIDED, That such hearing
shall not be deemed to be necessary before adoption of an overall mass rapid
transit system plan by a vote of the electorate of the municipality.

(3)
A "design public hearing" is a public hearing that: (a) Is held
after the location is established but before the design is adopted; and (b) is
held to afford an opportunity for participation by those interested in the
determination of major design features of the mass rapid transit system; and
(c) provides a public forum to afford a full opportunity for presenting views
on the mass rapid transit system design, and the social, economic,
environmental effects of that design and alternate designs.

(4)
A municipality imposing a tax under subsection (1) of this section may also
impose a sales and use tax, in addition to the tax authorized by RCW 82.14.030,
upon retail car rentals within the municipality that are taxable by the state
under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW. The rate of tax shall not exceed 1.944
percent. The rate of tax imposed under this subsection shall bear the same
ratio to the 1.944 percent rate authorized that the rate imposed under
subsection (1) of this section bears to the rate authorized under subsection
(1) of this section. The base of the tax shall be the selling price in the
case of a sales tax or the rental value of the vehicle used in the case of a
use tax. The tax imposed under this section shall be deducted from the amount
of tax otherwise due under RCW 82.08.020(2). The revenue collected under this
subsection shall be distributed in the same manner as special excise taxes
under subsection (1) of this section.

Sec.
2. RCW
82.44.150 and 1998 c 321 s 6 (Referendum Bill No. 49) are each amended to read
as follows:

(1)
The director of licensing shall, on the twenty-fifth day of February, May,
August, and November of each year, advise the state treasurer of the total
amount of motor vehicle excise taxes imposed by RCW 82.44.020(1) remitted to
the department during the preceding calendar quarter ending on the last day of
March, June, September, and December, respectively, except for those payable
under RCW 82.44.030, from motor vehicle owners residing within each
municipality which has levied a tax under RCW 35.58.273, which amount of excise
taxes shall be determined by the director as follows:

The
total amount of motor vehicle excise taxes remitted to the department, except
those payable under RCW 82.44.020(2) and 82.44.030, from each county shall be
multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is the population of the
municipality residing in such county, and the denominator of which is the total
population of the county in which such municipality or portion thereof is
located. The product of this computation shall be the amount of excise taxes
from motor vehicle owners residing within such municipality or portion
thereof. Where the municipality levying a tax under RCW 35.58.273 is located
in more than one county, the above computation shall be made by county, and the
combined products shall provide the total amount of motor vehicle excise taxes
from motor vehicle owners residing in the municipality as a whole. Population
figures required for these computations shall be supplied to the director by
the office of financial management, who shall adjust the fraction annually.

(2)
On the first day of the months of January, April, July, and October of each
year, the state treasurer based upon information provided by the department
shall, from motor vehicle excise taxes deposited in the transportation fund
under RCW 82.44.110, make the following deposits:

(a)
To the high capacity transportation account created in RCW 47.78.010, a sum
equal to four and five-tenths percent of the special excise tax levied under
RCW 35.58.273 by those municipalities authorized to levy a special excise tax
within each county that has a population of one hundred seventy-five thousand
or more and has an interstate highway within its borders; except that in a case
of a municipality located in a county that has a population of one hundred
seventy-five thousand or more that does not have an interstate highway located
within its borders, that sum shall be deposited in the passenger ferry account;
and

(b)
To the ((central Puget Sound)) public transportation capital
account created in RCW 82.44.180((, within a county with a population of one
million or more and a county with a population of from two hundred thousand to
less than one million bordering a county with a population of one million or
more)) for revenues distributed after June 30, 1999, a sum equal to
the difference between (i) the special excise tax levied and collected under
RCW 35.58.273 by those municipalities authorized to levy and collect a special
excise tax subject to the requirements of subsections (3) and (4) of this
section and (ii) the special excise tax that the municipality would otherwise
have been eligible to levy and collect at a tax rate of .815 percent ((and
been able to match with locally generated tax revenues, other than the excise
tax imposed under RCW 35.58.273, budgeted for any public transportation
purpose. Before this deposit, the sum shall be reduced by an amount equal to
the amount distributed under (a) of this subsection for each of the
municipalities within the counties to which this subsection (2)(b) applies;
however, any transfer under this subsection (2)(b) must be greater than zero;
and

(c)
To the public transportation systems account created in RCW 82.44.180, within
counties not described in (b) of this subsection, a sum equal to the difference
between (i) the special excise tax levied and collected under RCW 35.58.273 by
those municipalities authorized to levy and collect a special excise tax
subject to the requirements of subsections (3) and (4) of this section and (ii)
the special excise tax that the municipality would otherwise have been eligible
to levy and collect at a tax rate of .815 percent and been able to match with locally
generated tax revenues, other than the excise tax imposed under RCW 35.58.273,
budgeted for any public transportation purpose. Before this deposit, the sum
shall be reduced by an amount equal to the amount distributed under (a) of this
subsection for each of the municipalities within the counties to which this
subsection (2)(c) applies; however, any transfer under this subsection (2)(c)
must be greater than zero)) notwithstanding the
requirements set forth in subsections (3) through (6) of this section and RCW
82.14.046.

(3)
On the first day of the months of January, April, July, and October of each
year, the state treasurer, based upon information provided by the department,
shall remit motor vehicle excise tax revenues imposed and collected under RCW
35.58.273 as follows:

(a)
The amount required to be remitted by the state treasurer to the treasurer of
any municipality levying the tax shall not exceed in any calendar year the total
of revenues derived from fare revenues, vanpools, charters, advertising, and
interest earnings, and the amount of locally-generated tax revenues,
excluding (i) the excise tax imposed under RCW 35.58.273 for the purposes of
this section, which shall have been budgeted by the municipality to be
collected in such calendar year for any public transportation purposes
including but not limited to operating costs, capital costs, and debt service
on general obligation or revenue bonds issued for these purposes; and (ii) the
sales and use tax equalization distributions provided under RCW 82.14.046; and

(b)
In no event may the amount remitted in a single calendar quarter exceed the
amount collected on behalf of the municipality under RCW 35.58.273 during the
calendar quarter next preceding the immediately preceding quarter, excluding
the sales and use tax equalization distributions provided under RCW 82.14.046.

(4)
At the close of each calendar year accounting period, but not later than April
1, each municipality that has received motor vehicle excise taxes under
subsection (3) of this section shall transmit to the director of licensing and
the state auditor a written report showing by source the previous year's
budgeted tax revenues and revenues derived from fare revenues, vanpools,
charters, advertising, and interest earnings for public transportation
purposes as compared to actual collections. Any municipality that has not
submitted the report by April 1 shall cease to be eligible to receive motor
vehicle excise taxes under subsection (3) of this section until the report is
received by the director of licensing. If a municipality has received more or
less money under subsection (3) of this section for the period covered by the
report than it is entitled to receive by reason of its locally-generated
collected tax revenues and revenues derived from fare revenues, vanpools,
charters, advertising, and interest earnings, the director of licensing
shall, during the next ensuing quarter that the municipality is eligible to
receive motor vehicle excise tax funds, increase or decrease the amount to be
remitted in an amount equal to the difference between the locally-generated
budgeted tax revenues and the locally-generated collected tax revenues. In no
event may the amount remitted for a calendar year exceed the amount collected
on behalf of the municipality under RCW 35.58.273 during that same calendar
year excluding the sales and use tax equalization distributions provided under
RCW 82.14.046. At the time of the next fiscal audit of each municipality, the
state auditor shall verify the accuracy of the report submitted and notify the
director of licensing of any discrepancies.

(5)
The motor vehicle excise taxes imposed under RCW 35.58.273 and required to be
remitted under this section and RCW 82.14.046 shall be remitted without
legislative appropriation.

(6)
Any municipality levying and collecting a tax under RCW 35.58.273 which does
not have an operating, public transit system or a contract for public
transportation services in effect within one year from the initial effective
date of the tax shall return to the state treasurer all motor vehicle excise
taxes received under subsection (3) of this section.

Sec.
3. RCW
82.44.180 and 1998 c 321 s 41 (Referendum Bill No. 49) are each amended to read
as follows:

(1)
The transportation fund is created in the state treasury. Revenues under RCW
82.44.110 and 82.50.510 shall be deposited into the fund as provided in those
sections.

Moneys
in the fund may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the fund
may be used only for transportation purposes and activities and operations of
the Washington state patrol not directly related to the policing of public
highways and that are not authorized under Article II, section 40 of the state
Constitution.

(2)(a)
There is hereby created the ((central Puget Sound)) public
transportation capital account within the transportation fund. Moneys
deposited into the account under RCW 82.44.150(2)(b) shall be appropriated to
the transportation improvement board and allocated by the transportation
improvement board to public transportation projects within the region from
which the funds are derived, solely for:

(((a)
Planning)) (i) Bus or van acquisition;

(((b)))
(ii) Development of capital projects;

(((c)))
(iii) Development of high capacity transportation systems as defined in
RCW 81.104.015;

(((d)))
(iv) Development of high occupancy vehicle lanes and related facilities
as defined in RCW 81.100.020; ((and

(e))) (v)
Public transportation system contributions required to fund projects under
federal programs and those approved by the transportation improvement board
from other fund sources; and

(vi)
Other public transportation system related roadway projects on state highways,
county roads, or city streets.

(((3)
There is hereby created the public transportation systems account within the
transportation fund. Moneys deposited into the account under RCW
82.44.150(2)(c) shall be appropriated to the transportation improvement board
and allocated by the transportation improvement board to public transportation
projects submitted by the public transportation systems from which the funds
are derived, solely for:

(a)
Planning;

(b)
Development of capital projects;

(c)
Development of high capacity transportation systems as defined in RCW
81.104.015;

(d)
Development of high occupancy vehicle lanes and related facilities as defined
in RCW 81.100.020;

(e)
Other public transportation system-related roadway projects on state highways,
county roads, or city streets; and

(f)
Public transportation system contributions required to fund projects under
federal programs and those approved by the transportation improvement board
from other fund sources.))

(b)
The transportation improvement board shall allocate (i) sixty percent of the
funds from the account to public transportation benefit areas, metropolitan
municipal corporations, and regional transportation authorities operating
within counties whose population is three hundred thousand or greater, and (ii)
forty percent of the funds from the account to municipal corporations, as
defined in RCW 35.58.272, that provide public transportation services that are
not eligible for the sixty percent distribution in (i).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
office of the state treasurer may transfer any public transportation systems
account and central Puget Sound public transportation account balances into the
public transportation capital account.

Projects
obligated by the transportation improvement board before July 1, 1999, and
funded from the predecessor public transportation systems account and central
Puget Sound public transportation account programs are eligible projects for
reimbursement from the public transportation capital account.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
Section 1 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing
public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

(2) Sections 2, 3, and 4 of this act take effect January 1, 2000.

---
END ---