BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
It is the intent of the legislature to ensure that the commission provide the
general public timely access to all contribution and expenditure reports
submitted by candidates, continuing political committees, bona fide political
parties, lobbyists, and lobbyists' employers. The legislature finds that
failure to comply with this chapter's requirements for full and timely
disclosure threatens to undermine our electoral process.

(2)
Beginning January 1, 2001, the commission shall establish goals that all
reports, copies of reports, or copies of the data or information included in
reports, filed under RCW 42.17.040, 42.17.065, 42.17.080, 42.17.100, 42.17.105,
42.17.150, 42.17.170, 42.17.175, and 42.17.180, that are:

(a)
Submitted electronically via modem, satellite, or the Internet, shall be
accessible in the commission's office and via the commission's web site within
two business days of the commission's receipt of the report; and

(b)
Submitted in any format or via any method other than those listed in (a) of
this subsection, shall be accessible in the commission's office and via the
commission's web site within four business days of the commission's receipt of
the report.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The commission shall appoint an executive director who shall perform such
duties and have such powers as the commission, consistent with this chapter,
may prescribe and delegate to implement and enforce this chapter efficiently
and effectively. The commission shall set the compensation of the executive
director within the limits established by the committee on agency officials'
salaries under RCW 43.03.028. The commission may not delegate its authority to
adopt, amend, or rescind rules; nor may it delegate authority to determine
whether an actual violation of this chapter has occurred or to assess penalties
for such violations.

(2)
The executive director shall appoint an assistant executive director for
information services, who is responsible for maintaining and enhancing the
collection of and public access to information through electronic means.

(3)
The executive director and the assistant executive director for information
services are responsible for ensuring that the requirements regarding public
disclosure set forth in section 1 of this act are met.

Sec.
3. RCW
42.17.370 and 1995 c 397 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

The
commission is empowered to:

(1)
Adopt, ((promulgate,)) amend, and rescind suitable administrative rules
to carry out the policies and purposes of this chapter, which rules shall be
adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW. Any rule relating to campaign finance,
political advertising, or related forms that would otherwise take effect after
June 30th of a general election year shall take effect no earlier than the day
following the general election in that year;

(2)
((Appoint and set, within the limits established by the committee on agency
officials' salaries under RCW 43.03.028, the compensation of an executive
director who shall perform such duties and have such powers as the commission
may prescribe and delegate to implement and enforce this chapter efficiently
and effectively. The commission shall not delegate its authority to adopt,
amend, or rescind rules nor shall it delegate authority to determine whether an
actual violation of this chapter has occurred or to assess penalties for such
violations;

(3)))
Prepare and publish such reports and technical studies as in its judgment will
tend to promote the purposes of this chapter, including reports and statistics
concerning campaign financing, lobbying, financial interests of elected
officials, and enforcement of this chapter;

(((4)))
(3) Make from time to time, on its own motion, audits and field
investigations;

(((5)))
(4) Make public the time and date of any formal hearing set to determine
whether a violation has occurred, the question or questions to be considered,
and the results thereof;

(((6)))
(5) Administer oaths and affirmations, issue subpoenas, and compel
attendance, take evidence and require the production of any books, papers,
correspondence, memorandums, or other records relevant or material for the
purpose of any investigation authorized under this chapter, or any other
proceeding under this chapter;

(((7)))
(6) Adopt and promulgate a code of fair campaign practices;

(((8)))
(7) Relieve, by rule, candidates or political committees of obligations
to comply with the provisions of this chapter relating to election campaigns,
if they have not received contributions nor made expenditures in connection
with any election campaign of more than one thousand dollars;

(((9)))
(8) Adopt rules prescribing reasonable requirements for keeping accounts
of and reporting on a quarterly basis costs incurred by state agencies,
counties, cities, and other municipalities and political subdivisions in
preparing, publishing, and distributing legislative information. The term
"legislative information," for the purposes of this subsection, means
books, pamphlets, reports, and other materials prepared, published, or
distributed at substantial cost, a substantial purpose of which is to influence
the passage or defeat of any legislation. The state auditor in his or her
regular examination of each agency under chapter 43.09 RCW shall review the
rules, accounts, and reports and make appropriate findings, comments, and
recommendations in his or her examination reports concerning those agencies;

(((10)))
(9) After hearing, by order approved and ratified by a majority of the
membership of the commission, suspend or modify any of the reporting
requirements of this chapter in a particular case if it finds that literal
application of this chapter works a manifestly unreasonable hardship and if it
also finds that the suspension or modification will not frustrate the purposes
of the chapter. The commission shall find that a manifestly unreasonable
hardship exists if reporting the name of an entity required to be reported
under RCW 42.17.241(1)(g)(ii) would be likely to adversely affect the
competitive position of any entity in which the person filing the report or any
member of his or her immediate family holds any office, directorship, general
partnership interest, or an ownership interest of ten percent or more. Any
suspension or modification shall be only to the extent necessary to
substantially relieve the hardship. The commission shall act to suspend or
modify any reporting requirements only if it determines that facts exist that
are clear and convincing proof of the findings required under this section.
Requests for renewals of reporting modifications may be heard in a brief
adjudicative proceeding as set forth in RCW 34.05.482 through 34.05.494 and in
accordance with the standards established in this section. No initial request
may be heard in a brief adjudicative proceeding and no request for renewal may
be heard in a brief adjudicative proceeding if the initial request was granted
more than three years previously or if the applicant is holding an office or
position of employment different from the office or position held when the
initial request was granted. The commission shall adopt administrative rules
governing the proceedings. Any citizen has standing to bring an action in
Thurston county superior court to contest the propriety of any order entered
under this section within one year from the date of the entry of the order; ((and

(11))) (10)
Revise, at least once every five years but no more often than every two years,
the monetary reporting thresholds and reporting code values of this chapter.
The revisions shall be only for the purpose of recognizing economic changes as
reflected by an inflationary index recommended by the office of financial
management. The revisions shall be guided by the change in the index for the
period commencing with the month of December preceding the last revision and
concluding with the month of December preceding the month the revision is
adopted. As to each of the three general categories of this chapter (reports
of campaign finance, reports of lobbyist activity, and reports of the financial
affairs of elected and appointed officials), the revisions shall equally affect
all thresholds within each category. Revisions shall be adopted as rules under
chapter 34.05 RCW. The first revision authorized by this subsection shall
reflect economic changes from the time of the last legislative enactment
affecting the respective code or threshold through December 1985;

(((12)))
(11) Develop and provide to filers a system for certification of reports
required under this chapter which are transmitted by facsimile or
electronically to the commission. Implementation of the program is contingent
on the availability of funds.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

By
July 1st of each year, the commission shall calculate and make available to the
public the following performance measures:

(1)
The average number of days that elapse between the commission's receipt of
reports filed under RCW 42.17.065, 42.17.080, and 42.17.100 and the time that
the report, a copy of the report, or a copy of the data or information included
in the report, is first accessible to the general public (a) in the
commission's office, and (b) via the commission's web site;

(2)
The average number of days that elapse between the commission's receipt of
reports filed under RCW 42.17.105 and the time that the report, a copy of the
report, or a copy of the data or information included in the report, is first
accessible to the general public (a) in the commission's office, and (b) via
the commission's web site;

(3)
The average number of days that elapse between the commission's receipt of
reports filed under RCW 42.17.150, 42.17.170, 42.17.175, and 42.17.180 and the
time that the report, a copy of the report, or a copy of the data or
information included in the report, is first accessible to the general public
(a) in the commission's office, and (b) via the commission's web site;

(4)
The percentage of candidates, categorized as state-wide, state legislative, or
local, that have used each of the following methods to file reports under RCW
42.17.080 or 42.17.105: (a) Hard copy paper format; (b) electronic format via
diskette; (c) electronic format via modem or satellite; (d) electronic format
via the Internet; and (e) any other format or method;

(5)
The percentage of continuing political committees that have used each of the
following methods to file reports under RCW 42.17.065 or 42.17.105: (a) Hard
copy paper format; (b) electronic format via diskette; (c) electronic format
via modem or satellite; (d) electronic format via the Internet; and (e) any
other format or method; and

(6)
The percentage of lobbyists and lobbyists' employers that have used each of the
following methods to file reports under RCW 42.17.150, 42.17.170, 42.17.175, or
42.17.180: (a) Hard copy paper format; (b) electronic format via diskette; (c)
electronic format via modem or satellite; (d) electronic format via the
Internet; and (e) any other format or method.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The commission shall develop an information technology plan consistent with
plans or portfolios required by chapter 43.105 RCW.

(2)
The plan must include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a)
A baseline assessment of the agency's information technology resources and
capabilities that will serve as the benchmark for subsequent planning and
performance measures;

(b)
A statement of the agency's mission, goals, and objectives for information
technology, including goals and objectives for achieving electronic access to
agency records, information, and services for at least the next five years;

(c)
An explanation of how the agency's mission, goals, and objectives for
information technology support and conform to the state strategic information
technology plan;

(d)
An implementation strategy to enhance electronic access to public records and
information required to be filed with and disclosed by the commission. This
implementation strategy must be assembled to include:

(i)
Adequate public notice and opportunity for comment;

(ii)
Consideration of a variety of electronic technologies, including those that
help to transcend geographic locations, standard business hours, economic
conditions of users, and disabilities;

(iii)
Methods to educate agency employees, the public, and the news media in the
effective use of agency technology;

(iv)
Ways to simplify and improve public access to information held by the
commission through electronic means;

(e)
Projects and resources required to meet the objectives of the plan; and

(f)
If feasible, estimated schedules and funding required to implement identified
projects.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

In
preparing the information technology plan, the commission shall consult with
affected state agencies, the department of information services, and
stakeholders in the commission's work, including representatives of political
committees, bona fide political parties, news media, and the general public.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

The
commission shall submit the information technology plan to the senate and house
fiscal committees, the governor, the senate's state and local government
committee, the house's state government committee, and the department of
information services by January 1, 2000. It is the intent of the legislature
that the commission thereafter comply with the requirements of chapter 43.105
RCW with respect to preparation and submission of biennial performance reports
on the commission's information technology.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

The
commission shall prepare and submit to the department of information services a
biennial performance report in accordance with chapter 43.105 RCW.

The
report must include:

(1)
An evaluation of the agency's performance relating to information technology;

(2)
An assessment of progress made toward implementing the agency information
technology plan;

(3)
An analysis of the commission's performance measures, set forth in section 4 of
this act, that relate to the electronic filing of reports and timely public
access to those reports via the commission's web site;

(4)
A comprehensive description of the methods by which citizens may interact with
the agency in order to obtain information and services from the commission; and

(5)
An inventory of agency information services, equipment, and proprietary
software.

Sec.
9. RCW
42.17.365 and 1993 c 2 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

The
commission shall conduct a sufficient number of audits and field investigations
so as to provide a statistically valid finding regarding the degree of
compliance with the provisions of this chapter by all required filers. Any
documents, records, reports, computer files, papers, or materials provided to
the commission for use in conducting audits and investigations must be returned
to the candidate, campaign, or political committee from which they were
received within two weeks of the commission's receipt.

Sec.
10. RCW
42.17.367 and 1994 c 40 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

By
January 1, ((1995)) 2000, the ((public disclosure))
commission shall ((design a program for electronic access to public
documents filed with the commission. The program may include on-line access to
the commission's magic and electronic bulletin board systems, providing
information for the internet system, fax-request service, automated telephone
service, electronic filing of reports, and other service delivery options.
Documents available in the program shall include, but are not limited to,
public documents filed with the public disclosure commission, including, but
not limited to, commission meeting schedules, financial affairs reports, contribution
reports, expenditure reports, and gift reports. Implementation of the program
is contingent on the availability of funds)) operate a web site or
contract for the operation of a web site that allows access to reports, copies
of reports, or copies of data and information submitted in reports, filed with
the commission under RCW 42.17.040, 42.17.065, 42.17.080, 42.17.100, 42.17.105,
42.17.170, 42.17.175, and 42.17.180. In addition, the commission shall attempt
to make available via the web site other public records submitted to or
generated by the commission that are required by this chapter to be available
for public use or inspection.

Sec.
11. RCW
42.17.420 and 1995 c 397 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, when any application,
report, statement, notice, or payment required to be made under the provisions
of this chapter has been deposited postpaid in the United States mail properly
addressed, it shall be deemed to have been received on the date of mailing. It
shall be presumed that the date shown by the post office cancellation mark on
the envelope is the date of mailing. The provisions of this section do not
apply to reports required to be delivered under RCW 42.17.105 and 42.17.175.

(2)
When a report is filed electronically with the commission, it is deemed to have
been received on the file transfer date. The commission shall notify the
filer of receipt of the electronically filed report. Such notification may be
sent by mail, facsimile, or electronic mail. If the notification of receipt of
the electronically filed report is not received by the filer, the filer may
offer his or her own proof of sending the report, and such proof shall be
treated as if it were a receipt sent by the commission. Electronic filing
may be used for purposes of filing the special reports required to be delivered
under RCW 42.17.105 and 42.17.175.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. A
new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
By July 1, 1999, the commission shall offer every candidate, political
committee, and party organization that is required to file reports under this
chapter the option of filing financial affairs reports, contribution reports,
and expenditure reports electronically by diskette or via modem, satellite, or
the Internet. The commission shall make available to each candidate, political
committee, and party organization an electronic copy of the appropriate
reporting forms at no charge.

(2)
By January 1, 2001, the commission shall offer all lobbyists and lobbyists'
employers required to file reports under RCW 42.17.150, 42.17.170, 42.17.175,
or 42.17.180 the option of filing these reports electronically by diskette or
via modem, satellite, or the Internet.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. A
new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning January 1, 2000, each continuing political committee
shall file all contribution reports and expenditure reports required by this
chapter electronically by diskette or via modem, satellite, or the Internet.
Failure by a continuing political committee to comply with this section is a
violation of this chapter.

---
END ---