BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.36A.010 and 1987 c 447 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that it is necessary to regulate the practice of ((naturopaths))
naturopathic physicians in order to protect the public health, safety,
and welfare. It is the legislature's intent that only individuals who meet and
maintain minimum standards of competence and conduct may provide service to the
public.

Sec.
2. RCW
18.36A.020 and 1991 c 3 s 87 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Department" means the department of health.

(2)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.

(3)
"((Naturopath)) Naturopathic physician" means an
individual licensed under this chapter.

(4)
"Committee" means the Washington state naturopathic practice advisory
committee.

(5)
"Educational program" means ((a)) an accredited program
preparing persons for the practice of ((naturopathy)) naturopathic
medicine.

(6)
"Nutrition and food science" means the prevention and treatment of
disease or other human conditions through the use of foods, water, herbs,
roots, bark, or natural food elements.

(7)
"Manual manipulation" or "mechanotherapy" means
manipulation of a part or the whole of the body by hand or by mechanical means.

(8)
"Physical modalities" means use of physical, chemical, electrical,
and other noninvasive modalities including, but not limited to heat, cold, air,
light, water in any of its forms, sound, massage, and therapeutic exercise.

(9)
"Homeopathy" means a system of medicine based on the use of
infinitesimal doses of medicines capable of producing symptoms similar to those
of the disease treated, as listed in the homeopathic pharmacopeia of the United
States.

(10)
(("Medicines of mineral, animal, and botanical origin" means
medicines derived from animal organs, tissues, and oils, minerals, and plants
administered orally and topically, excluding legend drugs with the following
exceptions: Vitamins, minerals, whole gland thyroid, and substances as
exemplified in traditional botanical and herbal pharmacopoeia, and nondrug
contraceptive devices excluding interuterine devices. The use of intermuscular
injections are limited to vitamin B‑12 preparations and combinations when
clinical and/or laboratory evaluation has indicated vitamin B‑12
deficiency. The use of controlled substances is prohibited.)) "Naturopathic
medicines" include legend drugs and drugs in schedules III-V of the
uniform controlled substances act consistent with naturopathic medical practice
and in accordance with rules adopted by the secretary, excluding controlled
substances listed in Schedules I and II of the uniform controlled substances
act, chapter 69.50 RCW; vitamins; minerals; botanical medicines; homeopathic
medicines; hormones; and other physiologic substances as exemplified in
standard naturopathic medical texts, journals, and pharmacopeia, including
nondrug contraceptive devices. Naturopathic physicians may administer
intermuscular, intramuscular, intravenous, subcutaneous, and intradermal
injections of substances appropriate to naturopathic medicine, including providing
saline infusion for dehydrated patients. The secretary shall determine, by
rule, which other substances are appropriate.

(11)
"Hygiene and immunization" means the use of such preventative
techniques as personal hygiene, asepsis, public health, and immunizations, to
the extent allowed by rule.

(12)
"Minor office procedures" means minor surgical care and
procedures incident thereto of superficial lacerations, lesions, and
abrasions, and the removal of foreign bodies located in superficial structures,
not to include the eye; trigger point therapy, dermal stimulation, and
allergy testing and treatment; and the use of antiseptics and topical or
local anesthetics in connection therewith.

(13)
"Common diagnostic procedures" means the use of venipuncture ((to
withdraw blood)) consistent with naturopathic medical practice,
commonly used diagnostic modalities consistent with naturopathic practice,
health history taking, physical examination, radiography, examination of body
orifices excluding endoscopy, ((and)) laboratory medicine ((which
obtains)), and obtaining samples of human tissues ((products)),
((including superficial scrapings)) but excluding ((procedures which
would require)) surgical ((incision)) excision beyond that which
is authorized as minor office procedure.

(14)
"Suggestion" means techniques including but not limited to
counseling, biofeedback, and hypnosis.

(15)
"Radiography" means the ordering, but not the interpretation,
of radiographic diagnostic and other imaging studies and the taking and
interpretation of standard radiographs. Radiography includes the ordering,
but not the interpretation, of ultrasonic images.

Sec.
3. RCW
18.36A.030 and 1991 c 3 s 88 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No person may practice naturopathy or naturopathic medicine or represent
himself or herself as a ((naturopath)) naturopathic physician
without first applying for and receiving a license from the secretary to
practice naturopathy or naturopathic medicine.

(2)
A person represents himself or herself as a ((naturopath)) naturopathic
physician when that person adopts or uses any title or any description of
services that incorporates one or more of the following terms or designations:
Naturopath, naturopathic physician, natural medicine practitioner, or
doctor of naturopathic medicine.

Sec.
4. RCW
18.36A.040 and 1991 c 3 s 89 are each amended to read as follows:

Naturopathic
medicine or naturopathy is the practice by ((naturopaths)) naturopathic
physicians of the art and science of the diagnosis, prevention, and
treatment of disorders of the body by stimulation or support, or both, of the
natural processes of the human body. A ((naturopath)) naturopathic
physician is responsible and accountable to the consumer for the quality of
naturopathic care rendered.

The
practice of naturopathy or naturopathic medicine includes manual
manipulation (mechanotherapy), the prescription, administration, dispensing,
and use, except for the treatment of malignancies ((or neoplastic disease)),
of nutrition and food science, physical modalities, minor office procedures,
homeopathy, certain medicines of mineral, animal, and botanical origin, hygiene
and immunization, common diagnostic procedures, and suggestion; however,
nothing in this chapter shall prohibit consultation and treatment of a patient
in concert with a practitioner licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW. No
person licensed under this chapter may employ the term "chiropractic"
to describe any services provided by a ((naturopath)) naturopathic
physician under this chapter. No person licensed under this chapter may
employ the term "acupuncture" to describe any services provided by a
naturopathic physician under this chapter.

Sec.
5. RCW
18.36A.050 and 1991 c 3 s 90 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing
in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit or restrict:

(1)
The practice of a profession by individuals who are licensed, certified, or
registered under other laws of this state who are performing services within
their authorized scope of practice;

(2)
The practice of naturopathic medicine by an individual employed by the
government of the United States while the individual is engaged in the performance
of duties prescribed for him or her by the laws and regulations of the United
States;

(3)
The practice of naturopathic medicine by students enrolled in a school approved
by the secretary. The performance of services shall be pursuant to a course of
instruction or assignments from an instructor and under the supervision of the
instructor. The instructor shall be a ((naturopath)) naturopathic
physician licensed pursuant to this chapter; or

(4)
The practice of oriental medicine or oriental herbology, or the rendering of
other dietary or nutritional advice.

Sec.
6. RCW
18.36A.070 and 1991 c 3 s 92 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is hereby created the Washington state naturopathic advisory committee
consisting of five members appointed by the secretary who shall advise the
secretary concerning the administration of this chapter. Three members of the
initial committee shall be persons who would qualify for licensing under this
chapter. Their successors shall be ((naturopaths)) naturopathic
physicians who are licensed under this chapter. Two members of the
committee shall be individuals who are unaffiliated with the profession. For
the initial committee, one unaffiliated member and one ((naturopath)) naturopathic
physician shall serve four-year terms, one unaffiliated member and one ((naturopath))
naturopathic physician shall serve three-year terms, and one ((naturopath))
naturopathic physician shall serve a two-year term. The term of office
for committee members after the initial committee is four years. Any committee
member may be removed for just cause including a finding of fact of
unprofessional conduct, impaired practice, or more than three unexcused
absences. The secretary may appoint a new member to fill any vacancy on the
committee for the remainder of the unexpired term.

No
committee member may serve more than two consecutive terms, whether full or
partial.

(2)
Committee members shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and
reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(3)
The committee may elect annually a chair and vice-chair to direct the meetings
of the committee. The committee shall meet at least once each year, and may
hold additional meetings as called by the secretary or the chair.

Sec.
7. RCW
18.06.050 and 1991 c 3 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
person seeking to be examined shall present to the secretary at least
forty-five days before the commencement of the examination:

(1)
A written application on a form or forms provided by the secretary setting
forth under affidavit such information as the secretary may require; and

(2)
Proof that the candidate has:

(a)
Successfully completed a course, approved by the secretary, of didactic
training in basic sciences and acupuncture over a minimum period of two
academic years. The training shall include such subjects as anatomy,
physiology, bacteriology, biochemistry, pathology, hygiene, and a survey of
western clinical sciences. The basic science classes must be equivalent to
those offered at the collegiate level. However, if the applicant is a licensed
chiropractor under chapter 18.25 RCW or a ((naturopath)) naturopathic
physician licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW, the requirements of this
subsection relating to basic sciences may be reduced by up to one year
depending upon the extent of the candidate's qualifications as determined under
rules adopted by the secretary;

(b)
Successfully completed a course, approved by the secretary, of clinical
training in acupuncture over a minimum period of one academic year. The
training shall include a minimum of: (i) Twenty-nine quarter credits of
supervised practice, consisting of at least four hundred separate patient
treatments involving a minimum of one hundred different patients, and (ii) one
hundred hours or nine quarter credits of observation which shall include case
presentation and discussion.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
new section is added to chapter 18.36A RCW to read as follows:

A
naturopathic physician may employ persons to assist in the preparation and
monitoring of equipment and procedures involved in colonic therapy. The
secretary shall adopt rules establishing protocols for the delegation and
supervision of colonic therapy, including the qualifications of unlicensed
persons performing colonic therapy.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. A
new section is added to chapter 18.36A RCW to read as follows:

From
his or her office, a naturopathic physician may compound, dispense, or sell
naturopathic medicines not commonly available by prescription to meet the needs
of individual patients on a case-by-case basis, excluding controlled substances
or legend drugs. Injectable medications shall not be compounded unless
provided for by the secretary in rule under the authority granted in RCW
18.36A.020(10).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. A
new section is added to chapter 19.68 RCW to read as follows:

A
naturopathic physician, licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW, is exempt from this
chapter when dispensing or selling naturopathic medicines or products from his
or her own office in accordance with the limitations and exclusions in section
9 of this act.

Sec.
11. RCW
18.74.010 and 1997 c 275 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Board" means the board of physical therapy created by RCW 18.74.020.

(2)
"Department" means the department of health.

(3)
"Physical therapy" means the treatment of any bodily or mental
condition of any person by the use of the physical, chemical, and other
properties of heat, cold, air, light, water, electricity, sound, massage, and
therapeutic exercise, which includes posture and rehabilitation procedures; the
performance of tests and measurements of neuromuscular function as an aid to
the diagnosis or treatment of any human condition; performance of treatments on
the basis of test findings after consultation with and periodic review by an
authorized health care practitioner except as provided in RCW 18.74.012;
supervision of selective forms of treatment by trained supportive personnel;
and provision of consultative services for health, education, and community
agencies. The use of Roentgen rays and radium for diagnostic and therapeutic
purposes, the use of electricity for surgical purposes, including
cauterization, and the use of spinal manipulation or manipulative mobilization
of the spine and its immediate articulations, are not included under the term
"physical therapy" as used in this chapter.

(4)
"Physical therapist" means a person who practices physical therapy as
defined in this chapter but does not include massage operators as defined in
RCW 18.108.010.

(5)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health.

(6)
Words importing the masculine gender may be applied to females.

(7)
"Authorized health care practitioner" means and includes licensed
physicians, osteopathic physicians, chiropractors, ((naturopaths)) naturopathic
physicians, podiatric physicians and surgeons, dentists, and advanced
registered nurse practitioners: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That nothing herein shall
be construed as altering the scope of practice of such practitioners as defined
in their respective licensure laws.

Sec.
12. RCW
18.120.020 and 1997 c 334 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

The
definitions contained in this section shall apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Applicant group" includes any health professional group or
organization, any individual, or any other interested party which proposes that
any health professional group not presently regulated be regulated or which
proposes to substantially increase the scope of practice of the profession.

(2)
"Certificate" and "certification" mean a voluntary process
by which a statutory regulatory entity grants recognition to an individual who
(a) has met certain prerequisite qualifications specified by that regulatory
entity, and (b) may assume or use "certified" in the title or
designation to perform prescribed health professional tasks.

(3)
"Grandfather clause" means a provision in a regulatory statute
applicable to practitioners actively engaged in the regulated health profession
prior to the effective date of the regulatory statute which exempts the
practitioners from meeting the prerequisite qualifications set forth in the
regulatory statute to perform prescribed occupational tasks.

(4)
"Health professions" means and includes the following health and
health-related licensed or regulated professions and occupations: Podiatric
medicine and surgery under chapter 18.22 RCW; chiropractic under chapter 18.25
RCW; dental hygiene under chapter 18.29 RCW; dentistry under chapter 18.32 RCW;
denturism under chapter 18.30 RCW; dispensing opticians under chapter 18.34
RCW; hearing instruments under chapter 18.35 RCW; ((naturopaths)) naturopathic
physicians under chapter 18.36A RCW; embalming and funeral directing under
chapter 18.39 RCW; midwifery under chapter 18.50 RCW; nursing home
administration under chapter 18.52 RCW; optometry under chapters 18.53 and
18.54 RCW; ocularists under chapter 18.55 RCW; osteopathic medicine and surgery
under chapters 18.57 and 18.57A RCW; pharmacy under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A
RCW; medicine under chapters 18.71 and 18.71A RCW; emergency medicine under
chapter 18.73 RCW; physical therapy under chapter 18.74 RCW; practical nurses
under chapter 18.79 RCW; psychologists under chapter 18.83 RCW; registered
nurses under chapter 18.79 RCW; occupational therapists licensed under chapter
18.59 RCW; respiratory care practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89 RCW;
veterinarians and animal technicians under chapter 18.92 RCW; health care
assistants under chapter 18.135 RCW; massage practitioners under chapter 18.108
RCW; acupuncturists licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW; persons registered or
certified under chapter 18.19 RCW; dietitians and nutritionists certified by
chapter 18.138 RCW; radiologic technicians under chapter 18.84 RCW; and nursing
assistants registered or certified under chapter 18.88A RCW.

(5)
"Inspection" means the periodic examination of practitioners by a
state agency in order to ascertain whether the practitioners' occupation is
being carried out in a fashion consistent with the public health, safety, and
welfare.

(6)
"Legislative committees of reference" means the standing legislative
committees designated by the respective rules committees of the senate and
house of representatives to consider proposed legislation to regulate health
professions not previously regulated.

(7)
"License," "licensing," and "licensure" mean
permission to engage in a health profession which would otherwise be unlawful
in the state in the absence of the permission. A license is granted to those
individuals who meet prerequisite qualifications to perform prescribed health
professional tasks and for the use of a particular title.

(8)
"Professional license" means an individual, nontransferable
authorization to carry on a health activity based on qualifications which
include: (a) Graduation from an accredited or approved program, and (b)
acceptable performance on a qualifying examination or series of examinations.

(9)
"Practitioner" means an individual who (a) has achieved knowledge and
skill by practice, and (b) is actively engaged in a specified health
profession.

(10)
"Public member" means an individual who is not, and never was, a
member of the health profession being regulated or the spouse of a member, or
an individual who does not have and never has had a material financial interest
in either the rendering of the health professional service being regulated or
an activity directly related to the profession being regulated.

(11)
"Registration" means the formal notification which, prior to
rendering services, a practitioner shall submit to a state agency setting forth
the name and address of the practitioner; the location, nature and operation of
the health activity to be practiced; and, if required by the regulatory entity,
a description of the service to be provided.

(12)
"Regulatory entity" means any board, commission, agency, division, or
other unit or subunit of state government which regulates one or more
professions, occupations, industries, businesses, or other endeavors in this
state.

(13)
"State agency" includes every state office, department, board,
commission, regulatory entity, and agency of the state, and, where provided by
law, programs and activities involving less than the full responsibility of a
state agency.

Sec.
13. RCW
18.130.040 and 1998 c 243 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
This chapter applies only to the secretary and the boards and commissions
having jurisdiction in relation to the professions licensed under the chapters
specified in this section. This chapter does not apply to any business or
profession not licensed under the chapters specified in this section.

(2)(a)
The secretary has authority under this chapter in relation to the following
professions:

(i)
Dispensing opticians licensed under chapter 18.34 RCW;

(ii)
((Naturopaths)) Naturopathic physicians licensed under chapter
18.36A RCW;

(iii)
Midwives licensed under chapter 18.50 RCW;

(iv)
Ocularists licensed under chapter 18.55 RCW;

(v)
Massage operators and businesses licensed under chapter 18.108 RCW;

(vi)
Dental hygienists licensed under chapter 18.29 RCW;

(vii)
Acupuncturists licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW;

(viii)
Radiologic technologists certified and X-ray technicians registered under
chapter 18.84 RCW;

(ix)
Respiratory care practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89 RCW;

(x)
Persons registered or certified under chapter 18.19 RCW;

(xi)
Persons registered as nursing pool operators under chapter 18.52C RCW;

(xii)
Nursing assistants registered or certified under chapter 18.88A RCW;

(xiii)
Health care assistants certified under chapter 18.135 RCW;

(xiv)
Dietitians and nutritionists certified under chapter 18.138 RCW;

(xv)
Chemical dependency professionals certified under chapter 18.205 RCW;

(xvi)
Sex offender treatment providers certified under chapter 18.155 RCW;

(xvii)
Persons licensed and certified under chapter 18.73 RCW or RCW 18.71.205;

(xviii)
Persons registered as adult family home providers and resident managers under
RCW 18.48.020;

(xix)
Denturists licensed under chapter 18.30 RCW; and

(xx)
Orthotists and prosthetists licensed under chapter 18.200 RCW.

(b)
The boards and commissions having authority under this chapter are as follows:

(i)
The podiatric medical board as established in chapter 18.22 RCW;

(ii)
The chiropractic quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.25
RCW;

(iii)
The dental quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.32 RCW;

(iv)
The board of hearing and speech as established in chapter 18.35 RCW;

(v)
The board of examiners for nursing home administrators as established in
chapter 18.52 RCW;

(vi)
The optometry board as established in chapter 18.54 RCW governing licenses
issued under chapter 18.53 RCW;

(vii)
The board of osteopathic medicine and surgery as established in chapter 18.57
RCW governing licenses issued under chapters 18.57 and 18.57A RCW;

(viii)
The board of pharmacy as established in chapter 18.64 RCW governing licenses
issued under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW;

(ix)
The medical quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.71 RCW
governing licenses and registrations issued under chapters 18.71 and 18.71A
RCW;

(x)
The board of physical therapy as established in chapter 18.74 RCW;

(xi)
The board of occupational therapy practice as established in chapter 18.59 RCW;

(xii)
The nursing care quality assurance commission as established in chapter 18.79
RCW governing licenses issued under that chapter;

(xiii)
The examining board of psychology and its disciplinary committee as established
in chapter 18.83 RCW; and

(xiv)
The veterinary board of governors as established in chapter 18.92 RCW.

(3)
In addition to the authority to discipline license holders, the disciplining
authority has the authority to grant or deny licenses based on the conditions
and criteria established in this chapter and the chapters specified in
subsection (2) of this section. This chapter also governs any investigation,
hearing, or proceeding relating to denial of licensure or issuance of a
license conditioned on the applicant's compliance with an order entered
pursuant to RCW 18.130.160 by the disciplining authority.

(4) All disciplining authorities shall adopt procedures to ensure
substantially consistent application of this chapter, the Uniform Disciplinary
Act, among the disciplining authorities listed in subsection (2) of this
section.

Sec.
14. RCW
43.70.470 and 1993 c 492 s 277 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department may establish by rule the conditions of participation in the
liability insurance program by retired primary care providers at clinics
utilizing retired ((physicians [primary care providers])) primary
care providers for the purposes of this section and RCW 43.70.460. These
conditions shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1)
The participating primary care provider associated with the clinic shall hold a
valid license to practice as a physician under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW, a ((naturopath))
naturopathic physician under chapter 18.36A RCW, a physician assistant
under chapter 18.71A or 18.57A RCW, an advanced registered nurse practitioner
under chapter 18.88 RCW, a dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW, or other health
professionals as may be deemed in short supply in the health personnel resource
plan under chapter 28B.125 RCW. All primary care providers must be in
conformity with current requirements for licensure as a retired primary care
provider, including continuing education requirements;

(2)
The participating primary care provider shall limit the scope of practice in
the clinic to primary care. Primary care shall be limited to noninvasive procedures
and shall not include obstetrical care, or any specialized care and treatment.
Noninvasive procedures include injections, suturing of minor lacerations, and
incisions of boils or superficial abscesses. Primary dental care shall be
limited to diagnosis, oral hygiene, restoration, and extractions and shall not
include orthodontia, or other specialized care and treatment;

(3)
The provision of liability insurance coverage shall not extend to acts outside
the scope of rendering medical services pursuant to this section and RCW
43.70.460;

(4)
The participating primary care provider shall limit the provision of health
care services to primarily low-income persons provided that clinics may, but
are not required to, provide means tests for eligibility as a condition for
obtaining health care services;

(5)
The participating primary care provider shall not accept compensation for
providing health care services from patients served pursuant to this section
and RCW 43.70.460, nor from clinics serving these patients.
"Compensation" shall mean any remuneration of value to the
participating primary care provider for services provided by the primary care
provider, but shall not be construed to include any nominal copayments charged
by the clinic, nor reimbursement of related expenses of a participating primary
care provider authorized by the clinic in advance of being incurred; and

(6)
The use of mediation or arbitration for resolving questions of potential
liability may be used, however any mediation or arbitration agreement format
shall be expressed in terms clear enough for a person with a sixth grade level
of education to understand, and on a form no longer than one page in length.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. The
department of health shall conduct an analysis of the appropriateness of
naturopathic physicians using naturopathic techniques including, but not
limited to, auricular, hand therapy, and other practices that may overlap with
the acupuncture scope of practice. The secretary of health shall appoint a
work group of affected parties which shall identify areas that should require
an endorsement to the naturopathic license and what the requirements for such
an endorsement should be. The secretary shall report to the legislature on any
needed legislative changes. In addition, this report shall include an
evaluation of the following:

(1)
Establishing an endorsement process to allow naturopaths to perform specific
acupuncture-related practices if they can demonstrate competency;

(2)
Increasing the naturopathic scope of practice to include these
acupuncture-related practices consistent with naturopathic medicine; and

(3)
The appropriate level of education, training, and experience needed to support
any increase in the scope of practice and any endorsement.

The
report and proposed legislation shall be provided to the appropriate committees
of the legislature by January 10, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 16.
Sections 1 through 14 of this act take effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---