BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the intent of the legislature:

(1)
That the managing task force establish and direct a process that will provide
the best reasonable and necessary habitat along salmon bearing streams. It
will provide a process that will protect those streams from undesirable
sediments and other harmful substances coming from the land as a direct use of
the land;

(2)
That the coordinated resource management standards created under RCW 79.01.295
should be used to complete agreements concerning land uses under this act;

(3)
That only ongoing governmental processes be utilized to accomplish the purposes
of this chapter, including statutorily authorizing watershed enhancement groups
and voluntary salmon enhancement groups;

(4)
That there is established a broad-based task force of citizens affected by this
chapter to coordinate the implementation of this section while depending on
agency and tribal expertise;

(5)
That there be full cooperation with tribal government and nontribal commercial
fisheries representatives in order to allow them to meet their harvest needs
from hatchery salmon while each works with the state on how to ensure that
endangered wild salmon stocks have total escapement opportunity until there are
adequate wild salmon;

(6)
That a neutral and unbiased process established by the task force be utilized
to inspect all pertinent harvesting activities and report back to the
legislature concerning compliance with the provisions of this section;

(7)
That the task force be fully accountable to the legislature and the governor as
to the progress and success of the implementation of this chapter;

(8)
That legislative policy and directives on salmon habitat and related water
quality programs provide productive solutions;

(9)
That prior to implementing other efforts, the state, cooperating with landowners,
must ensure the control and management of surplus runoff water to provide more
and cleaner water for fish while avoiding environmental damage;

(10)
That there be legislative directives to put a salmon harvest and escapement
program in place at the earliest possible time;

(11)
That a state salmon recovery plan be put in place at the earliest possible time
to meet the requirements of the federal endangered species act and the federal
clean water act especially in regards to the portion of federal law addressed
by this act;

(12)
That fish predation is a major obstacle to salmon recovery and this problem
must be satisfactorily addressed to obtain the necessary cooperation needed to
put a successful salmon recovery program in place;

(13)
That the principles that guide this act are (a) to utilize, to the fullest
extent possible, ongoing procedures such as conservation district development
of land use plans with an added element of agreed upon implementation assurance
and a monitoring process to obtain compliance; (b) additional involvement with
state and federal agencies plus tribal input to the fullest extent possible;
and (c) to bring about salmon habitat and water quality conditions considered
adequate to restore salmon, utilizing a cooperative process with the landowner
that establishes agreed upon proper land use that is compatible with salmon
recovery efforts; and

(14)
That a priority to be followed is to minimize land purchases and land rentals
by the government and to minimize compensation while maximizing land use
agreements and using available funds to support programs and processes that
bring about salmon recovery in the most effective, efficient, cooperative
manner with landowners.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
legislature establishes the following requirements, guidelines, priorities,
timelines, targets, and accountability for salmon habitat and water quality
process programs to be developed and implemented as described in this act:

(1)
Institute a coordinated program that landowners and other affected persons will
comfortably participate in;

(2)
Place top priority on addressing instream spawning conditions first where water
is adequate for spawning;

(3)
Provide more and cleaner water by controlling excess runoff with many small
retain and release structures;

(4)
Have instream and streambank salmon spawning projects in one quarter of the
appropriate tributary streams each year for four years;

(5)
After four years, have an action-oriented program that will meet the necessary
requirements of federal laws, such as the endangered species act and the clean
water act;

(6)
Create a proper citizen's body responsible for reviewing, monitoring, and
reporting to the legislature, the governor's office, and the news media.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Owner" means the legal owner, lessor-operator of property and
municipalities.

(2)
"Task force" means the managing task force created in section 4 of
this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) A
managing task force is created to oversee the implementation of this act as
well as monitor and report progress to the legislature and governor at regular
and reasonable intervals.

(2)
The task force is authorized to select a director and secretarial personnel to
fulfill the members' needs to carry out the intent of this act.

(3)
Ten regular members shall be appointed by the legislature, shared equally
between the majority leader and minority leaders in the senate and the
co-speakers of the house of representatives, and two members appointed by the
governor with state agencies as nonvoting ex officio members. Tribes will be
asked to place four regular members, one each from four different regions of
the state.

(4)
Members appointed to fill the indicated number of positions shall come from
nominees offered from commercial fisheries, one recreational fishery, one city
government, one county government, one directly affected business, one small
landowner from the west side of the state, one agriculture from irrigated,
nonirrigated, livestock from eastern Washington, three, agriculture from
western Washington, two.

The
governor will appoint two regular members at large, one from eastern Washington
and one from the governor's salmon recovery office.

Ex
officio agency members shall come from the departments of fish and wildlife,
ecology, agriculture, as well as the conservation commission, and the
association of conservation districts.

Regular
members will serve on a part-time basis.

(5)
Chairs, co-chairs, and ranking members of the natural resources, environmental
quality and water resources, and agriculture and rural economic development
committees in the house of representatives and senate will be nonvoting ex
officio members of the task force. Directors or their designees from the
departments of fish and wildlife, ecology, agriculture, the conservation
commission, conservation districts, the governor's office, and Washington State
University will each serve on the task force as nonvoting ex officio members.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
duties and responsibilities of the task force are to:

(1)
Elect a chair and vice-chair from the regular membership each biennium;

(2)
Oversee the implementation of this act;

(3)
Monitor all activities covered in this act;

(4)
Report the progress quarterly to the natural resources committees of each house
of the legislature and the governor;

(5)
Employ a director and other necessary staff to serve at the discretion of the
task force in a manner chosen by the task force;

(6)
Adopt a plan of action at the earliest possible time after the effective date
of this section, following consultation with appropriate persons in the
legislature; and

(7)
The task force is responsible for the accountability factor, collecting all
possible information concerning how this act and other salmon recovery efforts
are progressing, including but not limited to harvest, hatchery, and predator
review processes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
three elements of habitat, harvest, and hatchery programs shall be developed in
unison, and be dependent on each other as to when the habitat portion will be
implemented.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. All
private lands involved in salmon habitat improvement programs shall be managed
in a manner that provides reasonable and necessary habitat improvements for
salmon and also provides reasonable economic use by the owner so that very
little compensation is required.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. The
governor's salmon office is authorized to negotiate with federal agencies to
accomplish the goal of meeting the requirements of the federal clean water act
and the federal endangered species act. The legislature must ratify the final
agreement.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. (1)
For the purposes of this act, the governor's office will be the sole
coordinator during the process of formulating any cooperative arrangements
between the tribes and the task force. After the governor's office has
communicated and cooperated with the tribes, the results will be reported to
the task force by the tribes.

(2)
Whenever the task force activities or expected results relate directly to the
objective of bringing about a state salmon recovery plan that complies with the
federal endangered species act and the clean water act, the governor's office
will be the sole coordinator with federal agencies. The governor's office must
report results of their communications and recommendations to the task force.

(3)
The task force will make every possible effort to alert the governor's office
at the earliest possible time of activities relating to the federal agencies
and also move in a positive manner to incorporate the federal agencies'
recommendations that relate directly to the task force's legislatively directed
responsibilities.

(4)
All meetings held by the governor's office that concern this act are open to
the public.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. (1)
Additional funds will be provided for the following agencies in order to allow
its staff to participate in the field application of this act: The department
of ecology, the department of agriculture, the department of fish and wildlife,
and the conservation commission.

(2)
Federal agencies should participate as ex officio members of or advisors to the
task force at their discretion.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. (1)
Each federally recognized tribe is invited to participate in the implementation
of this act.

(2)
There is no intent that tribal lands within the boundaries of a reservation be
included in the implementation of this act, unless requested by that tribe, or
classified timber lands of more than twenty acres under one ownership.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. Every
possible effort must be made to attract private property owners and affected
businesses and municipalities to participate in this voluntary program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. (1) A
coordinated resource management planning process, with standards established
under RCW 79.01.295 and 79.01.2951, is a tool that must be fully utilized as
part of obtaining the goals of this act.

(2) For the purposes of accomplishing the intent of section 1 of
this act, when land use is under consideration, the coordinated resource
management planning process, RCW 79.01.295 and 79.01.2951 should be used
whenever possible.

Sec.
14. RCW
79.01.2951 and 1996 c 163 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that many wild stocks of salmonids in the state of Washington
are in a state of decline. Stocks of salmon on the Columbia and Snake rivers
have been listed under the federal endangered species act, and the bull trout
has been petitioned for listing. Some scientists believe that numerous other
stocks of salmonids in the Pacific Northwest are in decline or possibly
extinct. The legislature declares that to lose wild stocks is detrimental to
the genetic diversity of the fisheries resource and the economy, and will
represent the loss of a vital component of Washington's aquatic ecosystems.
The legislature further finds that there is a continuing loss of habitat for
fish and wildlife. The legislature declares that steps must be taken in the
areas of wildlife and fish habitat management, water conservation, wild
salmonid stock protection, and education to prevent further losses of
Washington's fish and wildlife heritage from a number of causes including urban
and rural subdivisions, shopping centers, industrial park, and other land use
activities.

The
legislature finds that the maintenance and restoration of Washington's
rangelands ((and)), shrub-steppe vegetation, and privately
owned agricultural and other private land is vital to the long-term benefit
of the people of the state. The legislature finds that approximately
one-fourth of the state is open range or open-canopied grazable woodland. The
legislature finds that these lands provide forage for livestock, habitat for
wildlife, and innumerable recreational opportunities including hunting, hiking,
and fishing.

The
legislature finds that the development of coordinated resource management
plans, that take into consideration the needs of wildlife, fish, livestock,
timber production, water quality protection, and rangeland conservation on all
state-owned grazing lands and privately owned lands will improve the
stewardship of these lands and allow for the increased development and
maintenance of fish and wildlife habitat and other multipurpose benefits the
public derives from these lands.

The
legislature finds that the state currently provides insufficient technical
support for coordinated resource management plans to be developed for all
state-owned lands and for many of the private lands desiring to develop such
plans. As a consequence of this lack of technical assistance, our state
grazing and other lands, including fish and wildlife habitat and other
resources provided by these lands, are not achieving their potential. The
legislature also finds that with many state lands being intermixed with private
grazing lands, development of coordinated resource management plans on
state-owned and managed lands provides an opportunity to improve the management
and enhance the conditions of adjacent private lands.

A
purpose of chapter 4, Laws of 1993 sp. sess. is to establish state grazing
lands as the model in the state for the development and implementation of
standards that can be used in coordinated resource management plans and to
thereby assist the timely development of coordinated resource management plans
for all state-owned grazing lands and privately owned lands. Every
lessee of state lands who wishes to participate in the development and
implementation of a coordinated resource management plan shall have the
opportunity to do so.

Sec.
15. RCW
79.01.2955 and 1996 c 163 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
It is the purpose of chapter 163, Laws of 1996 that all state agricultural
lands, grazing lands, and grazable woodlands shall be managed in keeping with
the statutory and constitutional mandates under which each agency operates.
Chapter 163, Laws of 1996 is consistent with section 1, chapter 4, Laws of 1993
sp. sess.

(2)
The ecosystem standards developed under chapter 4, Laws of 1993 sp. sess. for
state-owned agricultural ((and)), grazing, privately owned,
and other lands are defined as desired ecological conditions. The
standards are not intended to prescribe practices. For this reason, land
managers are encouraged to use an adaptive management approach in selecting and
implementing practices that work towards meeting the standards based on the
best available science and evaluation tools.

(3)
For as long as the chapter 4, Laws of 1993 sp. sess. ecosystem standards remain
in effect, they shall be applied through a collaborative process that
incorporates the following principles:

(a)
The ((land manager and lessee or permittee)) landowners and
appropriate agencies shall look at the land together and make every effort
to reach agreement on management and resource objectives for the land under
consideration;

(b)
They will then discuss management options and make every effort to reach
agreement on which of the available options will be used to achieve the
agreed-upon objectives;

(c)
No land manager or owner ever gives up his or her management prerogative;

(d)
Efforts will be made to make land management plans economically feasible for
landowners, managers, and lessees and to make the land management plan
compatible with the ((lessee's)) owner's entire operation;

(e)
Coordinated resource management planning is encouraged where either multiple
ownerships, or management practices, or both, are involved;

(f)
The department of fish and wildlife shall consider multiple use, including
grazing, on lands owned or managed by the department of fish and wildlife where
it is compatible with the management objectives of the land; and

(g)
The department of natural resources shall allow multiple use on lands owned or
managed by the department of natural resources where multiple use can be
demonstrated to be compatible with RCW 79.68.010, 79.68.020, and 79.68.050.

(4)
The ecosystem standards are to be achieved by applying appropriate land
management practices on riparian lands and on the uplands in order to reach the
desired ecological conditions.

(5)
The legislature urges that state agencies that manage grazing lands make
planning and implementation of chapter 163, Laws of 1996, using the coordinated
resource management and planning process, a high priority, especially where
either multiple ownerships, or multiple use resources objectives, or both, are
involved. In all cases, the choice of using the coordinated resource
management planning process will be a voluntary decision by all concerned
parties including agencies, private landowners, lessees, permittees, and other
interests.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. This
act does not apply to timber land units of more than twenty acres each.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17.
During the implementation of this act, sections 1 and 4 of this act must be
recognized as the guide for the remainder of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. A
state general fund bond is the method preferred for funding of salmon recovery
projects.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19.
Conservation links, being the critical link between the people and governmental
agencies, have a statutory role in a broad spectrum of activities with the
public and landowners that relate to clean, abundant water through proper land
use and other local projects. State and federal funding is vital for their work.
Conservation districts are to be the coordinators of the coordinated resource
management planning process, created in RCW 79.01.295 and 79.01.2951, with
state funds being provided to personnel in each district through the
conservation commission, as recommended by the task force.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 20.
During the implementation of the this act:

(1)
The utmost flexibility possible is desirable when habitat improvement programs
are being implemented on private land.

(2)
When a reasonable portion of a potential salmon bearing stream has been
reinhabited, that stream should be considered as qualified.

(3)
Volunteer group activities to reclaim or enhance salmon populations shall be a
high priority for assistance and funding.

(4)
Salmon habitat improvement projects on smaller tributaries shall receive
exemptions from normally required permitting by state agencies.

(5)
The department of fish and wildlife shall place a high priority on assisting
local efforts when incubators are requested.

(6)
During the establishment of buffer zones and riparian area uses, special
emphasis will be placed on the multiple use concept while adequately enhancing
salmon recovery.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 21.
Sections 1 through 13 and 16 through 20 of this act constitute a new chapter in
Title 75 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 22. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 23. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---