BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
trip reduction program is hereby created. The purpose of the program is to
provide incentive grants to public and private entities for developing
innovative projects and programs that reduce the trips made by single-occupancy
vehicles. The transportation improvement board shall develop rules necessary
to implement the program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The trip reduction program account is hereby created in the transportation
fund. The transportation improvement board shall adopt rules and procedures to
govern the allocation of funds in the account when funds become available.

(2)
The board shall allocate funds from the account by June 30th of each year for
the ensuing fiscal year and shall endeavor to provide geographic diversity in
selecting trip reduction projects or programs to be funded from the account.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
To be eligible for funds from the trip reduction program account, a project or
program must:

(a)
Be proposed by a business, traffic management area, nonprofit organization,
city, town, or county, and be partially funded by local government or private
contributions, or a combination of these contributions; and

(b)
Demonstrate how trip reductions will be achieved as a direct result of the
project or program.

(2)
The transportation improvement board shall develop and implement criteria for
ranking trip reduction projects and shall allocate funds from the trip
reduction program account for projects or programs that demonstrate innovation
and yield measurable benefits. The criteria may include, but are not limited
to:

(a)
Providing preferential parking, reduced parking charges, or both, for
high-occupancy vehicles;

(b)
Instituting or increasing parking charges for single-occupancy vehicles;

(c)
Providing commuter-aided ride-matching services to facilitate employee
ride-sharing for commute trips;

(d)
Providing subsidies for transit fares;

(e)
Providing vans for van pools;

(f)
Providing subsidies for car pooling and van pooling;

(g)
Permitting the use of employers' vehicles for car pooling and van pooling;

(h)
Permitting flexible work schedules to facilitate employee use of transit, car
pools, or van pools;

(i)
Cooperating with transportation providers to provide additional regular or
express service to the worksite;

(j)
Providing a program of parking incentives, such as rebates for employees who do
not use parking facilities;

(k)
Establishing a program to permit employees to work part or full time at home, or
at an alternative worksite closer to home;

(l)
Establishing a program of alternative work schedules, such as compressed work
week schedules to reduce commuting; and

(m)
Implementing other measures designed to facilitate the use of high-occupancy
vehicles, such as on-site day care facilities and emergency taxi services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
legislature intends for each regional office within the department of
transportation to propose innovative transportation-demand management
strategies to meet demands on existing state infrastructure. To provide
incentives, the corridor transportation demand management program is hereby
created. The purpose of the program is to encourage corridor demand management
strategies for existing state transportation facilities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
department shall develop and implement a program that provides incentive grants
available to transportation regions on a competitive basis. Funding for this
grant program may be derived from any fund source designated by the
legislature, by specific legislative appropriation, or through the
administration of funds within the department's discretion.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
department is authorized to adopt and implement rules necessary to carry out
the purposes of this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
pedestrian safety and access program is hereby created. The purpose of the
program is to provide grants to counties, cities, towns, and other political
subdivisions of the state for constructing, maintaining, or promoting
pedestrian facilities and programs that contribute to pedestrian safety or
improve pedestrian access.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. The
pedestrian safety and access program account is hereby created in the
transportation fund. The transportation improvement board shall adopt rules
and procedures to govern the allocation of funds in the account when funds
become available.

The
board shall allocate funds from the account by June 30th of each year for the
ensuing fiscal year and shall endeavor to provide geographic diversity in
selecting pedestrian safety and pedestrian access projects and programs to be
funded from the account.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. The
transportation improvement board is authorized to adopt rules necessary to
implement the pedestrian safety and access program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. The
bicycle facilities program is hereby created. The purpose of the program is to
provide grants to counties, cities, towns, and other political subdivisions of
the state for constructing, maintaining, or promoting bicycle facilities and
programs that contribute to bicycle safety, reduce congestion, or improve
bicycle facilities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. The
bicycle program account is hereby created in the transportation fund. The
transportation improvement board shall adopt rules and procedures to govern the
allocation of funds in the account when funds become available.

The
board shall allocate funds from the account by June 30th of each year for the
ensuing fiscal year and shall endeavor to provide geographic diversity in
selecting bicycle facilities projects and programs to be funded from the
account.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. The
transportation improvement board is authorized to adopt rules necessary to
implement the bicycle facilities program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13.
Sections 1 through 12 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 47 RCW.

---
END ---