BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that:

(1)
The inappropriate shifting of costs of the electric system between or among
customers does not constitute fair and efficient competition, is contrary to
the public interest, and should be avoided;

(2)
The threat of uneconomic bypass is real and immediate. Several companies are
presently making concerted efforts to bypass their local utilities, and shift
costs to other customers;

(3)
In order to preserve options for legislative action, protect all customers
against unfair cost shifting, and promote continued investment needed for
reliability and system improvements, the status quo in the electric utility
industry should be maintained for a reasonable period until comprehensive
legislative policy is enacted to protect consumers and guarantee fair and
efficient competition. However, a comprehensive legislative policy must be
adopted within five years;

(4)
A moratorium on bypassing the facilities of local electric utilities will
preserve the status quo; and

(5)
An exception to the moratorium on bypassing the facilities of local electric
utilities is warranted for customers who reimburse costs that they would
otherwise shift to other customers by bypassing the facilities of their local
electric utility.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Bypassing the facilities of a local electric utility" means the
transmitting or distributing of electricity to customer premises or facilities
by a person who, as of January 1, 1999, had not provided these services to the
premises or facilities and where an electric utility that had provided these
services before January 1, 1999, is willing and able to provide services under
its normal terms and conditions of service or otherwise.

(2)
"Electric utility" includes an electric company subject to the
jurisdiction of the Washington utilities and transportation commission, a
municipal corporation or special district that owns or operates any electric
plant or service, municipal electric utility, public utility district, and
cooperative or mutual electric company.

(3)
"Person" means an individual, company, corporation, municipal
corporation, governmental district, agency of government, partnership,
association, limited liability company, or other form of entity and includes an
electric utility.

(4)
"Public utility regulatory policies act (PURPA) costs" means the
above-market portion of costs, as determined under section 4(2) of this act,
incurred under contracts for the output of electric cogeneration plants owned
or operated by nonutility generators.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. There
is established a moratorium on bypassing the facilities of local electric
utilities. During this moratorium: (1) No electric utility or any other
person may offer or provide facilities or services for bypassing the facilities
of a local electric utility and no person may bypass the facilities of a local
electric utility; and (2) no electric utility or any other person may apply for
permits for, construct, or have constructed on its behalf or for its use or
benefit any electric line or other facility for the transmission or
distribution of electricity that will be used to bypass the facilities of a
local electric utility.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
An electric utility may establish a cost-shifting reimbursement fee as provided
in this section. A person who pays a cost-shifting reimbursement fee is exempt
from the moratorium imposed by section 3 of this act. A cost-shifting
reimbursement fee shall recover the following items related to the person:

(a)
The fair value of bypassed transmission and distribution facilities;

(b)
Past, present, and future charges for conservation, PURPA costs, and for other
public purposes;

(c)
The difference, if any, between the state and local taxes payable after bypass
and the state and local taxes that would be payable if the person continued to
be served by the local electric utility; and

(d)
Any other costs that may be shifted to other customers as a result of bypassing
the facilities of the electric utility, as determined by the Washington
utilities and transportation commission in the case of an electric utility
subject to its jurisdiction or by the governing body of an electric utility not
subject to the jurisdiction of the commission.

(2)
PURPA costs shall be the amount, if any, by which the payments by the
electrical company for the remaining duration of all of its agreements for the
purchase of the output of electric cogeneration plants owned or operated by
nonutility generators (taking into account existing mitigation of such payments
in effect as of the date of determination of PURPA costs for a specific person)
exceeds the market value of electricity during the remaining duration of the
agreements, determined monthly by using the Dow Jones mid columbia, or a
comparable successor market index, monthly average market price of electricity.

(3)
Costs related to a person shall be based on the amount of electricity
previously transmitted or distributed to the person and the previous charges
paid by such a person.

(4)
An electric company subject to the jurisdiction of the Washington utilities and
transportation commission that proposes to establish a cost-shifting
reimbursement fee for a specific customer shall make a filing setting forth the
proposed fee. Within sixty days after the date of filing, the Washington
utilities and transportation commission shall approve the fee if it finds that
the fee conforms to the requirements of this chapter. If the commission finds
that the proposed fee does not conform to the requirements of this chapter, it
shall specify any changes required to conform to the requirements of this
chapter. The company may submit a revised proposed fee and the review and
approval process of this subsection shall recommence.

(5)
The amount of a cost-shifting reimbursement fee of a municipal electric
utility, public utility district, or cooperative or mutual company shall be
established in accordance with rules adopted by its governing board.

(6)
An electric utility shall be entitled to and shall recover the full amount of
its investments and costs identified in subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this
section related to a person who bypasses its transmission and distribution
facilities. Exemption from the moratorium created in section 3 of this act
shall constitute a contract between the person so exempted and the electric
utility that the person will pay the cost-shifting reimbursement fee until such
costs are fully recovered. The person shall pay the cost-shifting reimbursement
fee directly to the electric utility. The utility shall forward the portions
of the fee identified in subsection (1)(c) of this section to state or local
taxing authorities as directed by the Washington utilities and transportation
commission or the governing board and shall make the disposition of the portion
of the fee identified in subsection (1)(d) of this section as directed in the
order of the commission or governing board determining such costs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
Washington utilities and transportation commission may bring an action in the
superior court for Thurston county for an injunction against any act that may
adversely affect an electric utility subject to its jurisdiction where such an
act violates or may result in a violation of section 3 of this act. An
electric utility that is adversely affected by an act that violates or that may
result in a violation of section 3 of this act may bring an action in the
superior court for the county in which its principal office is located for an
injunction against such an act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
Section 3 of this act expires June 30, 2004.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 80 RCW.

---
END ---