BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 12.40 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
If the losing party fails to pay the judgment within thirty days, the
prevailing party may retain at any time thereafter, without regard to whether
or not the judgment has been certified, a collection agency licensed under
chapter 19.16 RCW for the purpose of collecting the monetary judgment from the
judgment debtor.

(2)
If a prevailing party retains a collection agency, the collection agency must
submit an affidavit attesting to the actual amount of the collection agency's
fee. Upon submission, the judgment shall be increased by any reasonable
collection fee of up to fifty percent of the outstanding judgment including all
court costs without regard to the jurisdictional limits on the small claims
department.

(3)
No judgment may be assigned to a collection agency unless: (a) There has been
an attempt to advise the debtor (i) of the existence of the judgment, and (ii)
that the judgment may be assigned to a collection agency for collection if the
judgment is not paid; and (b) at least thirty days have elapsed from the time
the notice was attempted.

Sec.
2. RCW
12.40.105 and 1998 c 52 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If the losing party fails to pay the judgment within thirty days or within the
period otherwise ordered by the court, the judgment shall be increased by: (((1)))
(a) An amount sufficient to cover costs of certification of the judgment
under RCW 12.40.110; ((and (2))) (b) the amount specified in RCW
36.18.012(2); and (c) any reasonable fee of up to fifty percent of the
amount of the judgment, including all court costs, when the judgment creditor
retains a collection agency licensed under chapter 19.16 RCW, without
regard to the jurisdictional limits on the small claims department.

(2) If the judgment creditor intends to retain a collection
agency and thereby increase the judgment under subsection (1)(c) of this
section, the collection agency must submit an affidavit attesting to the actual
amount of the collection agency's fee.

Sec.
3. RCW
12.40.110 and 1998 c 52 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If the losing party fails to pay the judgment according to the terms and
conditions thereof within thirty days or is in arrears on any payment plan, and
the prevailing party so notifies the court, the court shall certify the
judgment in substantially the following form:

Washington.

In
the District Court of . . . . . . County.

............................. Plaintiff,

vs.

............................. Defendant.

In the Small Claims Department.

This
is to certify that: (1) In a certain action on the . . . . day
of . . . . . . 19. . ., wherein
. . . . . . . . . was plaintiff and
. . . . . . . . . defendant,
jurisdiction of said defendant having been had by personal service (or
otherwise) as provided by law, judgment was entered against
. . . . . . in the sum of
. . . . . . dollars; (2) the judgment has not been
paid within ((twenty)) thirty days or the period otherwise
ordered by the court; and (3) pursuant to RCW 12.40.105, the amount of the
judgment is hereby increased by any costs of certification under this section,
any reasonable collection agency fees, and the amount specified in RCW
36.18.012(2).

Witness
my hand this . . . . day of
. . . . . ., 19. . .

.............................................

Clerk
of the Small Claims Department.

(2)
The clerk shall forthwith enter the judgment transcript on the judgment docket
of the district court; and thereafter garnishment, execution, and other process
on execution provided by law may issue thereon, as in other judgments of
district courts.

(3) Transcripts of such judgments may be filed and entered in
judgment lien dockets in superior courts with like effect as in other cases.

---
END ---