BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
Washington state department of licensing and the Washington state interagency
committee for outdoor recreation shall jointly contract with an independent
entity to study the source and determine the distribution and use of funds
provided to off-road vehicle and nonhighway road recreational activities under
RCW 46.09.170. The study shall analyze and determine the relative portion of
the motor vehicle fuel tax revenues deposited to the general fund under RCW
46.09.170 that are attributable to:

(1)
Nonhighway road recreational use for the purpose of trailhead access by hikers,
skiers, and other nonmotorized recreational uses; and

(2)
Nonhighway road recreational use and associated off-road vehicle trail use by
off-road vehicle recreational users.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The
Washington state interagency committee for outdoor recreation and the
Washington state department of licensing shall review the analysis and submit
their report to the standing committees of the legislature, including
recommendations regarding amendments to RCW 46.09.170 to allocate revenues
consistent with the relative proportion of the uses generating such revenues.

---
END ---