BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 49.44 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
An employee noncompetition agreement entered into by an employer in the
broadcasting industry after December 31, 1999, is against public policy and is
void and unenforceable.

(2)
An employer enforcing or attempting to enforce an employee noncompetition
agreement in violation of this section is liable for economic damages suffered
by an employee as a result of the violation, and for reasonable attorney fees
and court costs related to the violation.

(3)
Nothing in this section restricts the right of an employer to protect trade
secrets or other proprietary information by lawful means in equity or under
applicable law.

(4)
Nothing in this section has the effect of terminating, or in any way modifying,
any rights or liabilities resulting from an employee noncompetition agreement
that was entered into before December 31, 1999.

(5)
The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.

(a)
"Employee" means an employee who is employed in the business of an
employer whether by way of manual labor or otherwise, and also includes
professionals licensed, certified, or registered under Title 18 RCW.

(b)
"Employer" means any person, firm, corporation, partnership, business
trust, legal representative, or other entity which engages in any business,
industry, profession, or activity in this state and employs one or more
employees, and includes the state, counties, cities, and all municipal
corporations, public corporations, political subdivisions of the state, and
charitable organizations.

(c)
"Employee noncompetition agreement" means an agreement, written or
oral, express or implied, between an employer and employee under which the employee
agrees not to compete, either alone or as an employee of another, with the
employer in providing services after termination of employment.

(d) "Broadcasting industry" means employers that
distribute or transmit electronic signals to the public at large using
television (VHF or UHF), radio (AM or FM), or cable television technologies, or
which prepare, develop, or create programs or messages to be transmitted by
electronic signal using television, radio, or cable technology.

---
END ---