BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the policy of the state of Washington that laws enacted to protect public
health, natural resources, and the environment be enforced. Limitations on
governmental abilities to enforce those laws, due to the high volume of
activities to which health and environmental standards apply and the finite
nature of governmental resources, are recognized. The purpose of this chapter
is to empower citizens to supplement government enforcement of those laws.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Citizen" means any person or persons.

(2)
"Environmental or public health standard or requirement" means:

(a)
Any condition placed in or on the issuance of any permit or authorization under
chapter 43.21C RCW;

(b)
Any prohibition or requirement adopted under chapters 15.58, 35.66, 35A.63,
36.70, 36.70A, 58.17, 70.94, 70.95, 70.105, 75.20, 76.09, 90.03, 90.14, 90.44,
90.48, 90.58, and 90.76 RCW, or other zoning or land use law that has been
enacted or adopted for the purpose of protecting sensitive areas, natural
resources, or human health.

(3)
"Person" means an individual, corporation, partnership, association,
commission, or other governmental entity.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any citizen may
commence a civil action on his or her own behalf against any person who is
alleged to have violated or to be in violation of:

(i)
An environmental or public health standard or requirement; or

(ii)
An order issued by a governmental agency with respect to an environmental or
health standard or requirement.

(b)
The civil action may be brought in the superior court for the county in which
the alleged violation occurred or occurs, or as otherwise provided in chapter
4.12 RCW or RCW 36.01.050. The superior court has jurisdiction to:

(i)
Enforce the environmental or public health standard, requirement, or order;

(ii)
Grant other injunctive relief as justice may require;

(iii)
Assess civil penalties consistent with subsection (4) of this section; and

(iv)
Award costs of litigation, including reasonable attorneys' and expert witness
fees consistent with subsection (5) of this section.

(2)
No action may be commenced under subsection (1) of this section unless:

(a)
There is evidence of more than one day or instance of violation;

(b)
The plaintiff has given sixty days' notice by certified mail or personal
service of the violation to:

(i)
The alleged violator of the standard or requirement;

(ii)
The attorney general of Washington; and

(iii)
The agency with primary responsibility for enforcement of the standard or
requirement. The notice must be specific enough to allow the alleged violator
to identify the actions, conduct, or circumstances that will be the subject of
the action. The notice is considered served on the date it is mailed, or date
of actual service, whichever is earlier. An action under subsection (1) of
this section may be brought immediately upon giving notice only if the
violations present a substantial risk of immediate and irreparable endangerment
to human health or the environment.

(c)
An agency with authority to enforce the standard or requirement alleged to be
violated has not already commenced an administrative or in-court action.
However, an action may be brought under subsection (1) of this section if the
agency action:

(i)
Does not result in a cessation of all alleged violations;

(ii)
Imposes a monetary penalty that is less than the violator's economic benefit
from the violations; or

(iii)
Allows significant opportunity for public participation.

(3)
Whenever an action is brought under subsection (1) of this section, the
plaintiff shall serve, by first class mail, copies of the complaint on the
attorney general of Washington and the agency with primary responsibility for
enforcement of the standard or requirement alleged to be violated.

(4)
The superior court, upon finding violation of an environmental or public health
standard or requirement, shall assess a civil penalty against the violator in
an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars per violation per day of violation
unless justice so requires. In determining an appropriate penalty, the court
shall consider the seriousness of the violations, any good-faith efforts to
comply, the duration of the violations, the economic benefit of the violations
to the violator, and such other matters as justice may require. Unless
injustice would result, the court shall assess a civil penalty greater than
the economic benefit of the violations to the violator. Civil penalties
assessed under this section may be paid to the state's general fund, the
operating budget of the agency with primary responsibility for enforcement of
the standard or requirement violated, or an environmental restoration or
enhancement project proposed by the plaintiff as the court determines
appropriate.

(5)
Unless injustice would result, the court, in issuing any final order in any
action brought under this section, shall award costs of litigation, including
reasonable attorneys' and expert witness fees, to a prevailing or substantially
prevailing party, payable by the opposing party or parties.

(6)
Nothing in this section shall restrict any right which any person or class of
persons may have under any statute or common law to seek enforcement of any
standard or requirement, or to seek any other relief.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
Nothing in this chapter alters or diminishes any legal obligation otherwise
required in common law or by statute, and nothing in this chapter creates or
enlarges any defense in any action to enforce a legal obligation. Penalties
and sanctions imposed under this chapter are in addition to any penalties or
sanctions otherwise prescribed by law. However, nothing in this chapter shall
impose any additional liability upon any local government for failure to
enforce any violation subject to this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5.
Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 7 RCW.

---
END ---