BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The commission may handle on an expedited basis, as provided in this section,
any complaint by a telecommunications company that another telecommunications
company has violated:

(a)
Any duty or obligation imposed upon telecommunications companies, local
exchange carriers, and incumbent local exchange carriers under 47 U.S.C. Sec.
251 (a) through (c);

(b)
Any agreement approved by the commission under 47 U.S.C. Sec. 252(e); or

(c)
Any act or practice which the commission may identify by rule as serving as a
barrier to competitive entry in the telecommunications market.

(2)
Before filing a complaint with the commission, the complainant
telecommunications company must serve notice to the defendant
telecommunications company of its intent to file a complaint with the
commission alleging a violation under subsection (1) of this section and
provide a forty-eight hour period for the alleged violation to be corrected.

(3)
If the defendant telecommunications company fails to cure the alleged violation
within forty-eight hours, the complainant telecommunications company shall file
a complaint, application for expedited review, and any petition for emergency
relief with the commission and serve the defendant with the same. The
complainant telecommunications company shall attach to the complaint a copy of
the written notification that was served on the defendant telecommunications
company and any written response that was received thereto.

(4)
The defendant telecommunications company shall have seven days to answer a
complaint and shall file its answer and any other responsive pleadings with the
commission and serve the complainant with the same.

(5)
Within three working days of a complaint, application for expedited review, and
any petition for emergency relief being filed with the commission, all parties
shall serve on each other any discovery requests for the production of data.
Each party shall have ten days to respond to the other party's requests. Any
objections to the discovery requests shall be served on the other party and
filed with the commission within five days after receipt of the discovery
request.

(6)
Once the defendant files an answer to the complaint, the commission or its
designee shall within three working days determine whether to:

(a)
Approve the application for expedited review and begin an expedited
adjudicative proceeding under this section; or

(b)
Deny the application and instead proceed with a regular adjudicative proceeding
under RCW 80.04.110.

(7)(a)
If the commission or its designee approves an application for expedited review,
the commission may concurrently issue an order granting a petition for
emergency relief. An order for emergency relief may be granted without an
evidentiary hearing. To issue an order for emergency relief the commission or
its designee must find that:

(i)
The complainant is likely to succeed on the merits of the complaint;

(ii)
The complainant will likely suffer irreparable harm in its ability to serve
customers if emergency relief is not granted;

(iii)
The emergency relief sought is technically feasible; and

(iv)
An order granting emergency relief is in the public interest.

(b)
An order for emergency relief shall direct the defendant telecommunications
company to act or refrain from acting as the commission or its designee finds
necessary to avoid, prevent, or mitigate the complained of harm. An order for
emergency relief shall set a deadline for the defendant telecommunications
company to comply with the order before penalties are imposed under section 3
of this act. The order granting emergency relief shall remain in effect until
the commission issues a final order deciding the complaint filed under
subsection (3) of this section.

(8)
If an application for expedited review is approved:

(a)
The commission shall designate a commissioner or other person to preside over
the expedited adjudicative proceeding;

(b)
Within fourteen days of approving the application for expedited review, the
presiding officer shall schedule a prehearing conference which may be conducted
by telephone. During the prehearing conference the presiding officer shall:

(i)
Resolve all outstanding discovery disputes and establish a schedule for
completion of any additional discovery; and

(ii)
Confirm that an attempt to resolve the dispute through nonbinding mediation
under section 2 of this act has been or is being conducted;

(c)
The presiding officer shall schedule a hearing to commence within thirty days
of the complaint being filed. During the hearing evidence may be presented by
the parties and commission staff both orally and in written form. Any
individual who testifies either orally or in written form must be available for
cross-examination;

(d)
The presiding officer shall issue a written decision within forty-five days of
the complaint being filed. The presiding officer's decision shall be based on
the facts and no finding of an intent to impede market entry by a competitor
shall be necessary in order to determine that a violation has occurred. The
decision shall set forth the reasoning for the decision and, if the decision
finds that a violation under subsection (1) of this section has occurred,
directions and a deadline for correcting the violation. The decision shall
state the amount of any penalties imposed under section 3 of this act;

(e)
The decision of the presiding officer shall be a final order of the commission
unless exceptions are filed within seven days after service of the decision
upon the parties or the commission takes up the matter on its own motion within
seven days after service of the decision upon the parties.

(i)
If exceptions are filed or the commission takes up the matter on its own
motion, then the commission shall fifteen days after service of the presiding
officer's decision issue a final order.

(ii)
Responses to any exceptions filed under this subsection shall be made within
three business days after service of the exceptions.

(iii)
Any party may file a petition for reconsideration of a commission final order
as provided for by commission rule.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever the commission or its designee approves an application for expedited
review of a complaint under section 1 of this act, the commission or its
designee shall conduct at least one mediation session with the parties.

(2)
The mediation session shall be held no later than the date scheduled for a
prehearing conference under section 1(8) of this act. An individual with
authority to negotiate and settle the matter shall be present from each party.

(3)
The mediation session shall be confidential and any verbal statements made
during the session shall not be disclosed.

(4)
Any agreement of the parties resolving any disputed issue shall be submitted to
the mediator for approval. Approval shall be granted unless the mediator finds
that the agreement is based upon a mistake in material fact or that the
agreement is not in the public interest. The approved agreement shall be
deemed to constitute a final order of the commission, unless the commission
enters its own order within six working days following the mediator's approval
of the agreement.

(5)
Any agreement or order resolving a dispute through mediation shall be
considered part of the public record and shall be made available by the
commission upon request.

(6)
Willful or negligent failure to attend the mediation conference or to comply
with the mediator's directions shall be reported to the mediator or the
commission in writing.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
If the commission or its designee finds that a violation under section 1(1) of
this act has occurred, the commission may impose penalties up to one hundred
thousand dollars per violation. Additionally, the commission or its designee
may impose a penalty of one hundred thousand dollars for each day beyond the
deadline set in the decision issued under section 1(8) of this act that a
violation continues.

(2)
If parties are able to resolve a dispute through mediation, as provided in
section 2 of this act, there shall be no assessment of one hundred thousand
dollars per violation. Nonetheless, if a violation is not corrected by the
date specified in any mediation agreement, the commission or its designee may
impose a penalty of one hundred thousand dollars for each day beyond the
specified date that a violation continues.

(3)
If the commission or its designee issues an order granting a petition for
emergency relief under section 1(7) of this act and the defendant
telecommunications company fails to comply with the deadline set in that order,
then the commission or its designee may impose a penalty of one hundred
thousand dollars for each day beyond the deadline that noncompliance continues.

(4)
Any imposition of penalties shall be by order of the commission, after
providing for notice and a hearing.

(5)
Penalties imposed under this section shall be in addition to any monetary
payments ordered by the commission under an interconnection agreement and shall
not restrict a complainant's ability to recover damages under any other remedy
that may be available under any other provision of state or federal law.

(6)
Payment of penalties imposed under this section shall be made to the public
service revolving fund within thirty days of issuance by the commission of an order
imposing penalties. The commission is authorized to apply to a court of
competent jurisdiction for an order requiring payment of any penalties imposed
under this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 80.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
To the extent that the provisions of this section and sections 2 and 3 of this
act may differ with the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative
procedure act, the provisions of this section and sections 2 and 3 of this act
shall govern.

(2)
In implementing the provisions of this section and sections 2 and 3 of this
act, the commission may:

(a)
Adopt rules as needed;

(b)
Obtain external resources and contract for outside persons to serve as
presiding officers, mediators, or consultants for the purposes of facilitating
the prompt disposition of expedited proceedings authorized under this section;
and

(c)
Establish by rule fees to be paid by persons seeking commission action and by
parties to proceedings under this section and sections 1 through 3 of this act
to offset in whole or part the commission's expenses.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---