BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.29A RCW to read as follows:

The legislature finds that the definition of "leasehold
interest" was intended to include only those interests in publicly owned
property which confer both possession and use of such property to a person who
would not be exempt from property taxes if that person owned the property in
fee. Agreements, licenses, or permits which grant use but not possession do
not satisfy both elements of this requirement and are not within the definition
of "leasehold interest" for the purpose of this section. Examples of
agreements which merely grant use but not possession include permits to enter
publicly owned land for the purpose of guiding packing and river rafting
expeditions, licenses to operate guided excursions, permits to backpack on
public lands, and season tickets for seats in publicly owned stadiums. The
legislature directs the department of revenue to adopt administrative rules
consistent with this finding.

---
END ---