BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
superintendent of public instruction shall establish an academic choice in
education scholarship program to be initially piloted in the five school
districts with the largest student populations in grades kindergarten through
twelve.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
"Eligible private school" means an approved private school located
within an eligible school district that: (a) Complies with chapter 28A.195
RCW; (b) complies with all the health and safety laws and rules that apply to
public schools; (c) is free from sectarian control or influence; (d)
voluntarily participates in the academic choice in education scholarship
program; and (e) agrees to comply with the requirements of the academic choice
in education scholarship program.

(2)
"Eligible school district" means any of the five school districts in
the state of Washington with the largest total student populations in public
and private schools in grades kindergarten through twelve.

(3)
"Eligible student" means a student in grades kindergarten through
twelve who: (a) Resides in one of the eligible school districts; (b) qualifies
for free or reduced-priced meal programs under RCW 28A.235.140; and (c) during
the previous school year was either (i) enrolled in the eligible school
district; (ii) attending an eligible private school as an eligible student
admitted through the scholarship program; or (iii) not enrolled in school.

(4)
"Education-related expenses" means expenses necessarily incurred by
an eligible student to participate fully in any required or optional academic
curriculum offered by the eligible private school.

(5)
"Scholarship program" means the academic choice in education
scholarship program.

(6)
"Superintendent" means the superintendent of public instruction of
the state of Washington.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The scholarship program shall be a pilot program and shall begin in the
1999-2000 school year.

(2)
The superintendent shall design the scholarship program to meet the following
requirements:

(a)
Up to seven percent of an eligible school district's student population in
grades kindergarten through twelve may participate in the scholarship program
during the 1999-2000 school year. Beginning in the 2000-01 school year and
thereafter, up to fifteen percent of an eligible school district's student
population may participate in the scholarship program.

(b)
Up to sixty-five percent of an eligible private school's enrollment may consist
of eligible students attending the private school under the scholarship
program.

(c)
By May 1st of each year, an eligible private school must notify the
superintendent of its intent to participate in the scholarship program the
following school year. The notice must specify the maximum number of eligible
students the private school will accept under the scholarship program. An
eligible private school must also notify the superintendent when the private
school accepts an applicant, when the eligible private school has reached its
sixty-five percent maximum enrollment, and if any of the accepted eligible
students drop out or are expelled during the school year.

(d)
Any eligible student or the eligible student's parents or legal guardian may
submit an application to an eligible private school that the student wishes to
attend the following school year. The superintendent shall provide the
application forms to the eligible school districts, which shall make the forms
available to applicants. The applicant must submit the application no later
than a date established by the superintendent. Within sixty days of receiving
the application, the eligible private school shall notify the applicant in
writing whether the school has accepted the applicant. Eligible private
schools must accept applications on a random basis except that the eligible
private school may give preference in accepting applications to siblings of
eligible students accepted on a random basis.

(e)
If the eligible private school rejects an eligible student because the school
has insufficient space available, the eligible student may transfer his or her
application to another participating eligible private school that has available
space.

(f)
Upon receipt from the eligible private school of proof of the student's
enrollment in the school, the superintendent shall pay to the school a total of
three thousand five hundred dollars for purposes of payment of tuition and
education-related expenses. To participate in the scholarship program, an eligible
private school must agree to accept the three thousand five hundred dollar
payment as payment for the entire cost of the student's tuition and
education-related expenses at the school for the school year. The
superintendent shall pay fifty percent of the total amount in September and
fifty percent in May. Nothing in this subsection (2)(f) prohibits the eligible
private school from accepting donations or grants.

(g)
For administrative purposes, the superintendent may make the check payable to
the eligible private school on behalf of an enrolled eligible student. If more
than one eligible student is enrolled in an eligible private school, the
superintendent may consolidate payments made to the school on behalf of those
students.

(h)
The eligible school district shall provide transportation for students
attending an eligible private school and shall receive state funding for the
operating costs of transporting those students.

(i)
The superintendent shall adopt rules to implement the pilot project and
allocate funding.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
superintendent shall:

(1)
Adjust the annual payments to the eligible school districts to reflect the
payments to eligible school districts to transport the accepted students to the
private schools;

(2)
Develop a process, in cooperation with the eligible school districts, to notify
students and parents annually of students who reside in eligible school
districts about the scholarship program and the participating eligible private schools;

(3)
Develop a process, in cooperation with the eligible school districts and the
participating eligible private schools, to inform the superintendent, the
participating private school, and the students and parents in the eligible
school district, when the eligible school districts and the participating
private schools have reached their maximum enrollments for the upcoming school
year;

(4)
Monitor the scholarship program as provided in section 5 of this act; and

(5)
No later than December 1, 2002, recommend to the appropriate committees of the
legislature whether to expand, modify, or discontinue the scholarship program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
Each eligible private school participating in the scholarship program shall
meet at least one of the following standards:

(a)
At least seventy percent of the students in the scholarship program advance one
grade level each year;

(b)
The private school's average attendance rate for the students in the
scholarship program is at least ninety percent as measured by a standard
established by the superintendent;

(c)
At least eighty percent of the students in the scholarship program demonstrate
significant academic progress as measured by the private school; and

(d)
At least seventy percent of the students in the scholarship program meet parent
involvement criteria established by the private school.

(2)
The superintendent shall monitor the performance of the students attending the
participating eligible private schools. If the superintendent determines in
any school year that a participating eligible private school is not meeting at
least one of the standards under subsection (1) of this section, that private
school may not participate in the scholarship program in the following school
year.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. This
chapter may be known and cited as the academic choice in education scholarship
program act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 28A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. The
secretary of state shall submit this act to the people for their adoption and
ratification, or rejection, at the next general election to be held in this
state, in accordance with Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and
the laws adopted to facilitate its operation.

---
END ---