BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the period between birth and two to three years of age
is the most valuable time for language development. If hearing impaired
children are not identified early, it is difficult, if not impossible, for many
of them to acquire the fundamental language, social, and cognitive skills that
provide the foundation for later schooling and success in society. The
legislature further finds that it has been estimated that over four hundred
children will be born in Washington state with significant hearing loss. The
average age at which children with hearing loss are first identified and begin
intervention in Washington is eighteen months and is higher in rural areas.
Only twenty-five percent of children with hearing loss in Washington are
identified and are receiving services by three years of age. Unfortunately,
this situation is made additionally difficult because we find that only
children and families living in metropolitan areas have access to a wide range
of services, including a variety of early intervention options. The
legislature further finds that local communities want to improve their early
detection, diagnosis, and intervention services for children with hearing loss
and their families, but need technical assistance and guidance.

It
is the intent of this act to promote the development of a pilot early hearing
loss detection, diagnosis, and intervention system linked to community
resources.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
department of health shall establish ten early hearing loss detection,
diagnosis, and intervention pilot programs linked to community resources
throughout Washington, including metropolitan and rural areas. The department
of health early hearing loss detection, diagnosis, and intervention pilot
programs shall ensure the following:

(1)
All newborn infants shall be screened for hearing loss by three months of age
in the area identified as the pilot program catchment area by the department of
health;

(2)
Screening should occur prior to hospital discharge at the time of birth, with
coordination to screen home births;

(3)
All infants who fail the screen shall be diagnosed for hearing loss by six
months of age; and

(4)
That appropriate intervention is provided to all infants who are diagnosed with
significant hearing loss.

The
department of health may receive gifts, grants, or endowments from public or
private sources that are made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the
use and benefit of the purposes of the pilot programs created in this section
and spend gifts, grants, or endowments or income from the public or private
sources according to their terms, unless the receipt of the gifts, grants, or
endowments violates RCW 42.17.710.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
department of health shall establish a state-wide advisory committee of
consumers, and medical, audiology, and educational professionals to provide
guidance and assistance in the design, development, and implementation of the
pilot program created in section 2 of this act. The department of health in
coordination with the advisory board shall: (1) Develop a strategy to identify
best practices standards for the pilot program; (2) develop an educational
component to inform the appropriate professional medical communities of the
value of the pilot program; and (3) implement a system to evaluate the outcome
of the pilot program based on performance standards.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
department of health shall report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature on the progress of the pilot program created in section 2 of this
act by January 1, 2000, and provide a final report by December 12, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
The sum of four hundred ninety thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 1999, from the
general fund to the department of health for the purposes of this act.

(2)
The sum of two hundred sixty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the
general fund to the department of health for the purposes of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
For purposes of this section, "health carrier" or "carrier"
means disability insurers regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, health
care services contractors regulated under chapter 48.44 RCW, health maintenance
organizations regulated under chapter 48.46 RCW, plans operating under the
health care authority under chapter 41.05 RCW, the state health insurance pool
operating under chapter 48.41 RCW, and insuring entities regulated under this
chapter.

(2)
Every health carrier that provides coverage for child birth services shall
include as a part of its coverage hearing loss screening for newborns. Hearing
loss screening services shall include:

(a)
Screening for hearing loss for all newborn infants prior to discharge from the
hospital, and by three months of age for all infants born at home;

(b)
Diagnosis for all infants who are determined to have impaired hearing to take
place by six months of age; and

(c)
Appropriate intervention for all infants who are diagnosed with significant
hearing loss.

(3)
Every health carrier must provide notice to policyholders regarding the
coverage required under this section. The notice must be in writing and must
be transmitted at the earliest of the next mailing to the policyholder, the
yearly summary of benefits sent to the policyholder, or January 1st of the next
year following the effective date of this section.

(4) All health plans issued or renewed after July 1, 1999, are
required to be in accordance with this section.

---
END ---