BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
44.40.010 and 1980 c 87 s 39 are each amended to read as follows:

The
joint fact-finding committee on highways, streets, and bridges originally
created by chapter 111, Laws of 1947, recreated and renamed the joint committee
on highways by chapter 3, Laws of 1963 extraordinary session, is hereby
recreated and renamed the legislative transportation committee. The renaming
of said committee shall not affect any powers invested in it or its duties
imposed upon it by any other statute. All appropriations made to the committee
under its former name shall continue to be available to said committee as
renamed, the legislative transportation committee. The committee shall consist
of ((eleven)) twelve senators to be appointed by the president of
the senate and twelve members of the house of representatives to be appointed
by the speaker thereof. Not more than six members from each house may be
from the same political party. A list of appointees shall be submitted
before the close of each regular legislative session during an odd-numbered
year or any successive special session convened by the governor or the
legislature prior to the close of such regular session or successive special
session(s) for confirmation of senate members, by the senate, and house
members, by the house. Vacancies occurring shall be filled by the appointing
authority. All vacancies must be filled from the same political party and
from the same house as the member whose seat was vacated.

The
chair will be elected biennially by the membership of the committee. After
January 1, 2001, each succeeding chair must be from the opposite house of the
current chair, and be from the majority party. The vice-chair must be from the
opposite house and the opposite political party.

On
the effective date of this act, the president of the senate shall appoint an
additional senate member as provided by the 1999 amendment of this section.
With the appointment of the additional member, the terms of officers elected
before the effective date of this act are terminated, and the committee shall
hold a new election of officers. The 1999 amendment of this section does not
affect the 1997-1999 committee members, but applies only to members appointed
at the close of the 1999 session.

The
committee shall adopt rules and procedures for its orderly operation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 44.40 RCW to read as follows:

The
members of the legislative transportation committee shall form an executive
committee consisting of two members from each of the four major political
caucuses, which will include the chair and vice-chair of the legislative
transportation committee. There will be four alternates to the executive
committee, one from each of the four major political caucuses. Each alternate
may represent a member from the same political caucus from which they were
chosen when that member is absent, and have voting privileges during that
absence.

The
executive committee is responsible for performing all general administrative
and personnel duties assigned to it in the rules and procedures adopted by the
committee, as well as other duties delegated to it by the committee. Except
when those responsibilities are assumed by the legislative transportation
committee, the executive committee is responsible for adopting interim work plans
and meeting schedules, approving all contracts signed on behalf of the
committee, approving policies for travel of members and staff, and setting
policies for staff utilization.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---