BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
state of Washington recognizes the valuable contribution to quality instruction
provided by the part-time faculty in the community and technical colleges. The
part-time faculty are essential to the success of the open access opportunities
provided by the two-year colleges to the citizens of Washington. The two-year
colleges employ a core of skilled, well-trained faculty whose contributions are
critical to the quality and breadth of program offerings, and the legislature
intends to provide fair compensation and retirement for part-time faculty. The
legislature finds that the community and technical colleges have an essential
role in educating and retraining high-skilled workers who are vital to the
economic health of the communities of Washington.

The
legislature recognizes that low and stagnating salaries as well as the lack of
career advancement options for part-time faculty are detrimental to the morale
of all faculty. Low salaries create a work and learning environment that is
not conducive to bringing out the best that the faculty and the students have
to offer. It is the long-term intent of the legislature to recognize the years
of experience as well as the level of education that the part-time faculty
bring to their positions and ultimately, to compensate part-time faculty at one
hundred percent of the rate that full-time faculty are compensated.

Part-time
faculty contribute to the learning environment offered to the students through
advising and attention that all good educators bring to their profession.
Because the two-year colleges could not offer educational opportunities to the
large and diverse student population that they serve without the significant
contributions of the part-time faculty, the legislature intends that part-time
faculty employed in the public community and technical colleges receive fair
compensation and increased access to retirement benefits.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
This section applies to state-funded part-time faculty of public community and
technical colleges.

(2)
To the extent that funds are specifically appropriated therefor, state-funded
part-time faculty under this section shall receive proportional pay.

(3)
Unless this context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this
subsection apply throughout this section.

(a)
"Proportional" means that part-time faculty will be paid at a rate
based on no less than ninety-one percent of a full-time faculty member's
workload with the long-term goal of the legislature that part-time faculty will
be paid on a one hundred percent pro rata basis with full-time faculty. A
faculty member's workload includes classroom instruction, preparation, office
hours, and other contact with students.

(b)
"State-funded part-time faculty" means nontenured instructors
employed by public community or technical college districts for any percentage
of a full-time workload.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) A
joint select committee on community and technical college part-time faculty
compensation is established.

(2)
The committee shall be composed of one member of each of the two major parties
of each of the following four standing committees: The house of
representatives committees on higher education and appropriations; and the
senate committees on higher education and ways and means. The co-speakers of
the house of representatives shall select house of representative members of
the committee and the president of the senate shall select senate members of
the committee.

(3)
The committee shall identify: (a) Resources to address long-term strategies
for part-time faculty compensation to be paid on a one hundred percent pro rata
basis with full-time faculty compensation rates; (b) practices that would
ensure part-time faculty consideration in the hiring process for full-time
positions, and to achieve an appropriate ratio between full and part-time
faculty; (c) resources to increase part-time faculty members' access to health
care coverage; and (d) strategies that will provide equitable retirement
benefits to part-time faculty.

(4)
The committee shall submit its findings and proposal to appropriate committees
of the legislature by December 1, 2000.

(5) This section expires June 30, 2001.

---
END ---