BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that retaining and enhancing economic viability of farms is
vital to improving the prosperity of our rural economies. The legislature
finds that farm land will not be retained unless farming operations are
profitable. In order to improve the profitability of farms, market demand for
the agricultural products needs to be enhanced.

The
legislature further finds that consumers are increasingly concerned about the
variety of growing conditions, additives, and residues that may result from
food growth and production methods in other countries and are demanding more
information about the country of origin of the food products they consume.

The
purpose of this act is to explore ways to improve consumer information,
consumer choice, and market demand for domestically grown agricultural
products, including a "Grown in Washington" promotional program and
country of origin labeling.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) A
food labeling task force is created. The task force shall be comprised of
fourteen members, who are appointed as follows:

(a)
Two members of the house of representatives, one from each major caucus,
appointed by the co-speakers of the house of representatives;

(b)
Two members of the senate, one from each major caucus, appointed by the
president of the senate;

(c)
A representative of the department of agriculture, appointed by the director of
agriculture;

(d)
A representative of fruit growers, appointed by agreement of the co-speakers of
the house of representatives and the president of the senate;

(e)
A representative of vegetable growers, appointed by agreement of the
co-speakers of the house of representatives and the president of the senate;

(f)
A representative of meat producers, appointed by agreement of the co-speakers
of the house of representatives and the president of the senate;

(g)
A representative of poultry producers, appointed by agreement of the
co-speakers of the house of representatives and the president of the senate;

(h)
A representative of fish growers, appointed by agreement of the co-speakers of
the house of representatives and the president of the senate;

(i)
A representative of food retailers, appointed by agreement of the co-speakers
of the house of representatives and the president of the senate;

(j)
A representative of food wholesalers, appointed by agreement of the co-speakers
of the house of representatives and the president of the senate;

(k)
A representative of food manufacturers, appointed by agreement of the co-speakers
of the house of representatives and the president of the senate; and

(l)
A representative of the dairy industry appointed by the dairy products
commission.

(2)
The task force shall convene as soon as possible upon appointment of its
members. The task force shall elect a chair and adopt rules for conducting the
business of the task force. The house of representatives office of program
research and senate committee services shall provide staff support for the task
force.

(3)
The task force shall conduct an inquiry into and, by December 10, 1999, make
recommendations to the legislature regarding:

(a)
Country of origin labeling, for retail sale to the ultimate consumer, of
agricultural products including bulk fruits and vegetables, meats, poultry,
fish, and milk products; and

(b)
The feasibility of developing a "Grown in Washington" promotional
program for agricultural products produced in Washington state.

(4) This section expires December 31, 1999.

---
END ---