BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
50.20.050 and 1993 c 483 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
An individual shall be disqualified from benefits beginning with the first day
of the calendar week in which he or she has left work voluntarily without good
cause and thereafter for five calendar weeks and until he or she has obtained
bona fide work and earned wages equal to five times his or her weekly benefit
amount.

The
disqualification shall continue if the work obtained is a mere sham to qualify
for benefits and is not bona fide work. In determining whether work is of a
bona fide nature, the commissioner shall consider factors including but not
limited to the following:

(a)
The duration of the work;

(b)
The extent of direction and control by the employer over the work; and

(c)
The level of skill required for the work in light of the individual's training
and experience.

(2)
An individual shall not be considered to have left work voluntarily without
good cause when:

(a)
He or she has left work to accept a bona fide offer of bona fide work as
described in subsection (1) of this section;

(b)
The separation was because of the illness or disability of the claimant or the
death, illness, or disability of a member of the claimant's immediate family if
the claimant took all reasonable precautions, in accordance with any
regulations that the commissioner may prescribe, to protect his or her
employment status by having promptly notified the employer of the reason for
the absence and by having promptly requested reemployment when again able to
assume employment: PROVIDED, That these precautions need not have been taken
when they would have been a futile act, including those instances when the
futility of the act was a result of a recognized labor/management dispatch
system; ((or))

(c)
The separation was to allow the claimant to care for the claimant's newborn
child under the age of six weeks or the claimant's newly adopted child for up
to six weeks after placement, if, in circumstances where the necessity for
leave was foreseeable based on an expected birth or placement, the claimant
gave the employer notice at least thirty days before leave was to begin or,
where the birth or placement required leave to begin in less than thirty days,
as much notice as was practicable. No otherwise eligible individual may be
denied benefits for any week during the period in which the individual is on
leave for the purpose described in this subsection because of RCW 50.20.010(3),
50.20.080, or 50.22.020(1) relating to availability for work and active search
for work, or failure to apply for or refusal to accept suitable work; or

(d)
He or she has left work to relocate for the spouse's employment that is outside
the existing labor market area if the claimant remained employed as long as was
reasonable prior to the move.

(3)
In determining under this section whether an individual has left work
voluntarily without good cause, the commissioner shall only consider
work-connected factors such as the degree of risk involved to the individual's
health, safety, and morals, the individual's physical fitness for the work, the
individual's ability to perform the work, and such other work connected factors
as the commissioner may deem pertinent, including state and national
emergencies. Good cause shall not be established for voluntarily leaving work
because of its distance from an individual's residence where the distance was
known to the individual at the time he or she accepted the employment and
where, in the judgment of the department, the distance is customarily traveled
by workers in the individual's job classification and labor market, nor
because of any other significant work factor which was generally known and
present at the time he or she accepted employment, unless the related
circumstances have so changed as to amount to a substantial involuntary
deterioration of the work factor or unless the commissioner determines that
other related circumstances would work an unreasonable hardship on the
individual were he or she required to continue in the employment.

(4)
Subsections (1) and (3) of this section shall not apply to an individual whose
marital status or domestic responsibilities cause him or her to leave
employment. Such an individual shall not be eligible for unemployment
insurance benefits beginning with the first day of the calendar week in which
he or she left work and thereafter for five calendar weeks and until he or she
has requalified, either by obtaining bona fide work and earning wages equal to
five times his or her weekly benefit amount or by reporting in person to the
department during ten different calendar weeks and certifying on each occasion
that he or she is ready, able, and willing to immediately accept any suitable
work which may be offered, is actively seeking work pursuant to customary trade
practices, and is utilizing such employment counseling and placement services
as are available through the department. This subsection does not apply to
individuals covered by subsection (2) (b) or (((c))) (d) of this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. If
any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state or
the eligibility of employers in this state for federal unemployment tax
credits, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent
of the conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the operation
of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by
the state or the granting of federal unemployment tax credits to employers in
this state.

---
END ---