BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.36 RCW to read as follows:

It
is the intent of the legislature to promote and enhance government to
government cooperation between the state of Washington and Indian tribes in the
state by authorizing the governor to execute motor vehicle fuel tax compacts
with tribal governments concerning the taxation of the use, distribution, and
sales of motor vehicle fuels. It is the intent of the legislature through this
act to provide the governor with flexibility in executing these cooperative
compacts, if certain statutory requirements are met.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.36 RCW to read as follows:

The
definitions set forth in this section apply throughout sections 1 through 5 of
this act.

(1)
"Indian reservation" means all lands within the exterior boundaries
of an Indian reservation and all lands that are held in trust by the federal
government and are under the jurisdiction of a federally recognized Indian
tribe.

(2)
"Motor vehicle fuel" means "motor vehicle fuel" as defined
in RCW 82.36.010 and also includes "special fuels" as defined in RCW
82.38.020.

(3)
"Motor vehicle fuel tax compact" means any compact entered into
between the state of Washington and a tribal government under the authority of
section 3 of this act.

(4)
"Tribal government" means the governing body of a federally
recognized Indian tribe.

(5)
"Tribal government owned enterprise" means an enterprise that is at
least fifty-one percent owned and operated by a tribal government.

(6)
"Tribal member" means an enrolled member of a federally recognized
Indian tribe.

(7)
"Tribally licensed business" means a business that holds a current
license from an Indian tribe to do business on the tribe's reservation. For
the purposes of sections 1 through 5 of this act, a business is not considered
"tribally licensed" if it is operating in violation of a compact
executed under section 3 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 82.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The governor may execute individual compacts with each of the federally
recognized Indian tribes in Washington concerning the sales and taxation of
motor vehicle fuel. All cooperative compacts executed under the authority of
this chapter must meet the requirements of this section. The governor may
appoint the director of the department of licensing or any other appropriate
agency as the governor's agent to negotiate and execute these compacts.

(2)
In accordance with sections 4 and 5 of this act, the taxes under this chapter
and chapter 82.38 RCW do not apply to motor fuel sold by a tribal government, a
tribal government owned enterprise, or a tribally licensed business operating
on the Indian reservation of a tribe that has executed a compact with the
state.

(3)
Compacts executed by the governor may provide for a tribal motor vehicle fuel
tax in lieu of all state motor vehicle fuel taxes and all state and local sales
and use taxes on the sale of motor vehicle fuel by tribal governments, tribal
government owned enterprises, or tribally licensed businesses.

(4)
Compacts executed by the governor may provide for payment by tribal governments
to the state of Washington, on a postsale and quarterly basis, a portion of the
tribal motor vehicle fuel tax collected by the tribe on sales to nontribal
members. Revenues received under this subsection must be distributed in the
same manner as other fuel tax revenues under this chapter and chapter 82.38
RCW.

(5)
When negotiating the terms of a compact the governor must consider: (a) The
tribe's economic, geographic, and other circumstances; (b) the costs to the
tribe associated with administering the tax; (c) the percentage of state fuel
tax revenue distributed to other local governments; and (d) the amount of the
expenditure by the state on roads within the reservation.

(6)
Compacts must provide that tribal governments, tribal government owned
enterprises, and tribally licensed businesses only make sales of motor vehicle
fuel where the physical transfer of possession of the motor vehicle fuel from
the seller to the buyer occurs within the Indian reservation.

(7)
Compacts may provide that the compact may be amended upon the agreement of both
parties.

(8)
Compacts may permit the submission of disputes regarding the interpretation and
administration of their provisions to arbitration or judicial resolution, if a
waiver of sovereign immunity by the state is conditioned upon a similar waiver
of sovereign immunity by the tribal government.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 82.36 RCW to read as follows:

Subject
to the conditions and limitations of a compact executed under section 3 of this
act, the tax levied under this chapter does not apply to the sale, use,
consumption, handling, possession, or distribution of motor fuels by a tribal
government, tribal government owned enterprise, or tribally licensed business
during the effective period of a motor vehicle fuel tax compact entered into
between the tribal government and the state under section 3 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 82.38 RCW to read as follows:

Subject
to the conditions and limitations of a compact executed under section 3 of this
act, the tax levied under this chapter does not apply with respect to the use
or sale of special fuels by a tribal government, tribal government owned
enterprise, or tribally licensed business during the effective period of a
motor vehicle fuel tax compact entered into between the tribal government and
the state under section 3 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 82.36 RCW to read as follows:

Sections
1 through 5 of this act may be known and cited as the Tribal-State Motor Fuel
Tax Compact Act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
82.36.450 (Agreement with tribe for imposition, collection, use)
and 1995 c 320 s 2; and

(2) RCW
82.38.310 (Agreement with tribe for imposition, collection, use)
and 1995 c 320 s 3.

---
END ---