BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
19.34.010 and 1996 c 250 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

This
chapter shall be construed consistently with what is commercially reasonable
under the circumstances and to effectuate the following purposes:

(1)
To facilitate commerce by means of reliable electronic messages;

(2)
To ensure that electronic signatures are not denied legal recognition solely
because they are in electronic form;

(3)
To provide a voluntary licensing mechanism for digital signature certification
authorities by which businesses, consumers, courts, government agencies, and
other entities can reasonably be assured as to the integrity, authenticity, and
nonrepudiation of a digitally signed electronic communication;

(4)
To establish procedures governing the use of digital signatures for official
public business to provide reasonable assurance of the integrity, authenticity,
and nonrepudiation of an electronic communication;

(5)
To minimize the incidence of forged digital signatures and fraud in electronic
commerce;

(((3)))
(6) To implement legally the general import of relevant standards((,
such as X.509 of the international telecommunication union, formerly known as
the international telegraph and telephone consultative committee)); and

(((4)))
(7) To establish, in coordination with ((multiple)) states and
other jurisdictions, uniform rules regarding the authentication and
reliability of electronic messages.

Sec.
2. RCW
19.34.020 and 1997 c 27 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter:

(1)
"Accept a certificate" means ((either:

(a))) to
manifest approval of a certificate, while knowing or having notice of its
contents((; or

(b)
To apply to a licensed certification authority for a certificate, without
canceling or revoking the application by delivering notice of the cancellation
or revocation to the certification authority and obtaining a signed, written
receipt from the certification authority, if the certification authority
subsequently issues a certificate based on the application)). Such
approval may be manifested by the use of the certificate.

(2)
"Accept a digital signature" means to verify a digital signature or
take an action in reliance on a digital signature.

(3)
"Asymmetric cryptosystem" means an algorithm or series of algorithms
that provide a secure key pair.

(4)
"Certificate" means a computer-based record that:

(a)
Identifies the certification authority issuing it;

(b)
Names or identifies its subscriber;

(c)
Contains the subscriber's public key; and

(d)
Is digitally signed by the certification authority issuing it.

(5)
"Certification authority" means a person who issues a certificate.

(6)
"Certification authority disclosure record" means an on-line,
publicly accessible record that concerns a licensed certification authority and
is kept by the secretary. ((A certification authority disclosure record has
the contents specified by rule by the secretary under RCW 19.34.030.))

(7)
"Certification practice statement" means a declaration of the
practices that a certification authority employs in issuing certificates ((generally,
or employed in issuing a material certificate)).

(8)
"Certify" means to declare with reference to a certificate, with
ample opportunity to reflect, and with a duty to apprise oneself of all
material facts.

(9)
"Confirm" means to ascertain through appropriate inquiry and
investigation.

(10)
"Correspond," with reference to keys, means to belong to the same key
pair.

(11)
"Digital signature" means an electronic signature that is a
transformation of a message using an asymmetric cryptosystem such that a person
having the initial message and the signer's public key can accurately
determine:

(a)
Whether the transformation was created using the private key that corresponds
to the signer's public key; and

(b)
Whether the initial message has been altered since the transformation was made.

(12)
"Electronic" means electrical, digital, magnetic, optical,
electromagnetic, or any other form of technology that entails capabilities
similar to these technologies.

(13)
"Electronic record" means a record generated, communicated, received,
or stored by electronic means for use in an information system or for
transmission from one information system to another.

(14)
"Electronic signature" means a signature in electronic form attached
to or logically associated with an electronic record, including but not limited
to a digital signature.

(15)
"Financial institution" means a national or state-chartered
commercial bank or trust company, savings bank, savings association, or credit
union authorized to do business in the state of Washington and the deposits of
which are federally insured.

(((13)))
(16) "Forge a digital signature" means either:

(a)
To create a digital signature without the authorization of the rightful holder
of the private key; or

(b)
To create a digital signature verifiable by a certificate listing as subscriber
a person who either:

(i)
Does not exist; or

(ii)
Does not hold the private key corresponding to the public key listed in the
certificate.

(((14)))
(17) "Hold a private key" means to be authorized to utilize a
private key.

(((15)))
(18) "Incorporate by reference" means to make one message a
part of another message by identifying the message to be incorporated and
expressing the intention that it be incorporated.

(((16)))
(19) "Issue a certificate" means the acts of a certification
authority in creating a certificate and notifying the subscriber listed in the
certificate of the contents of the certificate.

(((17)))
(20) "Key pair" means a private key and its corresponding
public key in an asymmetric cryptosystem, keys which have the property that the
public key can verify a digital signature that the private key creates.

(((18)))
(21) "Licensed certification authority" means a certification
authority to whom a license has been issued by the secretary and whose license
is in effect.

(((19)))
(22) "Message" means a digital representation of information.

(((20)))
(23) "Notify" means to communicate a fact to another person in
a manner reasonably likely under the circumstances to impart knowledge of the
information to the other person.

(((21)))
(24) "Official public business" means any legally authorized
transaction or communication among state agencies, tribes, and local
governments, or between a state agency, tribe, or local government and a
private person or entity.

(25)
"Operative personnel" means one or more natural persons acting as a
certification authority or its agent, or in the employment of, or under
contract with, a certification authority, and who have:

(a)
((Managerial or policymaking responsibilities for the certification authority;
or

(b)
Duties directly involving the issuance of certificates, creation of private
keys, or administration of a certification authority's computing facilities)) Direct
responsibility for the secure operation of the trustworthy system used by the certification
authority or any recognized repository;

(b)
Direct responsibility, beyond general supervisory authority, for establishing
or adopting policies regarding the operation and security of the certification
authority; or

(c)
Such other responsibilities or duties as the secretary may establish by rule.

(((22)))
(26) "Person" means a human being or an organization capable
of signing a document, either legally or as a matter of fact.

(((23)))
(27) "Private key" means the key of a key pair used to create
a digital signature.

(((24)))
(28) "Public key" means the key of a key pair used to verify a
digital signature.

(((25)))
(29) "Publish" means to ((record or file in a repository))
make information publicly available.

(((26)))
(30) "Qualified right to payment" means an award of damages
against a licensed certification authority by a court having jurisdiction over
the certification authority in a civil action for violation of this chapter.

(((27)))
(31) "Recipient" means a person who has received a certificate
and a digital signature verifiable with reference to a public key listed in the
certificate and is in a position to rely on it.

(((28)))
(32) "Recognized repository" means a repository recognized by
the secretary under RCW 19.34.400.

(((29)))
(33) "Recommended reliance limit" means the monetary amount
recommended for reliance on a certificate under RCW 19.34.280(1).

(((30)))
(34) "Repository" means a system for storing and retrieving
certificates and other information relevant to digital signatures.

(((31)))
(35) "Revoke a certificate" means to make a certificate
ineffective permanently from a specified time forward. Revocation is effected
by notation or inclusion in a set of revoked certificates, and does not imply
that a revoked certificate is destroyed or made illegible.

(((32)))
(36) "Rightfully hold a private key" means the authority to
utilize a private key:

(a)
That the holder or the holder's agents have not disclosed to a person in
violation of RCW 19.34.240(1); and

(b)
That the holder has not obtained through theft, deceit, eavesdropping, or other
unlawful means.

(((33)))
(37) "Secretary" means the secretary of state.

(((34)))
(38) "Subscriber" means a person who:

(a)
Is the subject listed in a certificate;

(b)
Applies for or accepts the certificate; and

(c)
Holds a private key that corresponds to a public key listed in that
certificate.

(((35)))
(39) "Suitable guaranty" means either a surety bond executed
by a surety authorized by the insurance commissioner to do business in this
state, or an irrevocable letter of credit issued by a financial institution
authorized to do business in this state, which, in either event, satisfies all
of the following requirements:

(a)
It is issued payable to the secretary for the benefit of persons holding
qualified rights of payment against the licensed certification authority named
as the principal of the bond or customer of the letter of credit;

(b)
It is in an amount specified by rule by the secretary under RCW 19.34.030;

(c)
It states that it is issued for filing under this chapter;

(d)
It specifies a term of effectiveness extending at least as long as the term of
the license to be issued to the certification authority; and

(e)
It is in a form prescribed or approved by rule by the secretary.

A
suitable guaranty may also provide that the total annual liability on the
guaranty to all persons making claims based on it may not exceed the face
amount of the guaranty.

(((36)))
(40) "Suspend a certificate" means to make a certificate
ineffective temporarily for a specified time forward.

(((37)))
(41) "Time stamp" means either:

(a)
To append or attach ((to a message, digital signature, or certificate))
a digitally signed notation indicating at least the date, time, and identity of
the person appending or attaching the notation to a message, digital
signature, or certificate; or

(b)
The notation thus appended or attached.

(((38)))
(42) "Transactional certificate" means a ((valid))
certificate ((incorporating by reference one or more digital signatures))
designated for use in a specific transaction identified in the certificate
or identified by reference in the certificate.

(((39)))
(43) "Trustworthy system" means computer hardware and software
that:

(a)
Are reasonably secure from intrusion and misuse; and

(b)
((Provide a reasonable level of availability, reliability, and correct
operation; and

(c)
Are reasonably suited to performing their intended functions)) Conform
with the requirements established by the secretary by rule.

(((40)))
(44) "Valid certificate" means a certificate that:

(a)
A licensed certification authority has issued;

(b)
The subscriber listed in it has accepted;

(c)
Has not been revoked or suspended; and

(d)
Has not expired.

((However,
a transactional certificate is a valid certificate only in relation to the
digital signature incorporated in it by reference.

(41))) (45)
"Verify a digital signature" means, in relation to a given digital
signature, message, and public key, to determine accurately that:

(a)
The digital signature was created by the private key corresponding to the
public key; and

(b)
The message has not been altered since its digital signature was created.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 19.34 RCW to read as follows:

Information,
records, and signatures shall not be denied legal effect, validity, or
enforceability solely on the grounds that they are in electronic form.
However, the presumptions of validity and reasonableness of conduct, and the
limitations on liability in this chapter do not apply to electronic records or
electronic signatures except for digital signatures created in conformance with
all of the requirements of this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter.

Sec.
4. RCW
19.34.030 and 1997 c 27 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The secretary must ((maintain a publicly accessible data base containing))
publish a certification authority disclosure record for each licensed
certification authority, and a list of all judgments filed with the secretary,
within the previous five years, under RCW 19.34.290. ((The secretary must
publish the contents of the data base in at least one recognized repository.))

(2)
The secretary may adopt rules consistent with this chapter and in furtherance
of its purposes:

(a)
To ((govern licensed)) license certification authorities ((and)),
((recognized)) recognize repositories,((their practice, and
the termination of a licensed certification authority's or recognized
repository's practice)) certify operative personnel, and govern the
practices of each;

(b)
To determine ((an)) the form and amount reasonably appropriate
for a suitable guaranty, in light of the burden a suitable guaranty places upon
licensed certification authorities and the assurance of quality and financial
responsibility it provides to persons who rely on certificates issued by
licensed certification authorities;

(c)
To specify reasonable requirements for information to be contained in or
the form of certificates, including transactional certificates, issued
by licensed certification authorities, in accordance with generally accepted
standards for digital signature certificates;

(d)
To specify reasonable requirements for recordkeeping by licensed certification
authorities;

(e)
To specify reasonable requirements for the content, form, and sources of
information in certification authority disclosure records, the updating and
timeliness of the information, and other practices and policies relating to
certification authority disclosure records;

(f)
To specify the form of and information required in certification practice
statements, as well as requirements regarding the publication of
certification practice statements;

(g)
To specify the procedure and manner in which a certificate may be suspended or
revoked, as consistent with this chapter; ((and))

(h)
To specify the procedure and manner by which the laws of other jurisdictions
may be recognized, in order to further uniform rules regarding the
authentication and reliability of electronic messages; and

(i)
Otherwise to give effect to and implement this chapter.

(3)
The secretary may act as a certification authority, and the certificates issued
by the secretary shall be treated as having been issued by a licensed
certification authority.

Sec.
5. RCW
19.34.100 and 1998 c 33 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
To obtain or retain a license, a certification authority must:

(a)
((Be the subscriber of a certificate published in a recognized repository,
which may include any repository maintained by the secretary;

(b)
Knowingly employ as operative personnel only persons who have not been
convicted within the past seven years of a felony and have never been convicted
of a crime involving fraud, false statement, or deception. The secretary may
provide by rule for the manner in which criminal background information is
provided as part of the licensing process. For purposes of this provision, a
certification authority knowingly employs such a person if the certification
authority knew of a conviction, or should have known based upon the background
information required by rule of the secretary;

(c)
Employ as operative personnel only persons who have demonstrated knowledge and
proficiency in following the requirements of this chapter;

(d))) Provide
proof of identity to the secretary;

(b)
Employ only certified operative personnel in appropriate positions;

(c)
File with the secretary ((a)) an appropriate, suitable guaranty,
unless the certification authority is a city or county that is self-insured or
the department of information services;

(((e)))
(d) Use a trustworthy system((, including a secure means for limiting
access to its private key));

(((f)))
(e) Maintain an office in this state or have established a registered
agent for service of process in this state; and

(((g)))
(f) Comply with all further licensing and practice requirements
established by rule by the secretary.

(2)
((The secretary must issue a license to a certification authority that:

(a)
Is qualified under subsection (1) of this section;

(b)
Applies in writing to the secretary for a license; and

(c)
Pays a filing fee adopted by rule by the secretary.

(3))) The
secretary may by rule ((classify licenses)) create license
classifications according to specified limitations, ((such as a maximum
number of outstanding certificates, cumulative maximum of recommended reliance
limits in certificates issued by the certification authority, or issuance only
within a single firm or organization,)) and the secretary may issue
licenses restricted according to the limits of each classification. ((The
liability limits of RCW 19.34.280 do not apply to a certificate issued by a
certification authority that exceeds the restrictions of the certification
authority's license.))

(3)
The secretary may impose license restrictions specific to the practices of an
individual certification authority. The secretary shall set forth in writing
and maintain as part of the certification authority's license application file
the basis for such license restrictions.

(4)
The secretary may revoke or suspend a certification authority's license, in
accordance with the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, for
failure to comply with this chapter or for failure to remain qualified under
subsection (1) of this section. The secretary may order the summary suspension
of a license pending proceedings for revocation or other action, which must be
promptly instituted and determined, if the secretary includes within a written
order a finding that the certification authority has either:

(a)
Utilized its license in the commission of a violation of a state or federal
criminal statute or of chapter 19.86 RCW; or

(b)
Engaged in conduct giving rise to a serious risk of loss to public or private
parties if the license is not immediately suspended.

(5)
The secretary may recognize by rule the licensing or authorization of
certification authorities by other governmental entities, in whole or in
part, provided that those licensing or authorization requirements are
substantially similar to those of this state. If licensing by another
government is so recognized:

(a)
RCW 19.34.300 through 19.34.350 apply to certificates issued by the
certification authorities licensed or authorized by that government in the same
manner as it applies to licensed certification authorities of this state; and

(b)
The liability limits of RCW 19.34.280 apply to the certification authorities
licensed or authorized by that government in the same manner as they apply to
licensed certification authorities of this state.

(6)
((Unless the parties provide otherwise by contract between themselves, the
licensing requirements in this section do not affect the effectiveness,
enforceability, or validity of any digital signature, except that RCW 19.34.300
through 19.34.350 do not apply to a certificate, and associated digital
signature, issued by an unlicensed certification authority.

(7))) A
certification authority that has not obtained a license is not subject to the
provisions of this chapter, except as specifically provided.

Sec.
6. RCW
19.34.110 and 1997 c 27 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A licensed certification authority shall obtain a compliance audit((, as may
be more fully defined by rule of the secretary, at least once every year. The
auditor shall issue an opinion evaluating the degree to which the certification
authority conforms to the requirements of this chapter and the administrative
rules adopted by)) at such times and in such manner as directed by rule
of the secretary. If the certification authority is also a recognized
repository, the audit must include the repository.

(2)
The certification authority shall file a copy of the audit report with the
secretary. The secretary may provide by rule for filing of the report in an
electronic format((. The secretary shall)) and may publish the
report in the certification authority disclosure record it maintains for the
certification authority.

Sec.
7. RCW
19.34.111 and 1997 c 27 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(((a)))
An auditor signing a report of opinion as to a compliance audit required by RCW
19.34.110 must:

(((i)))
(a) Be a certified public accountant, licensed under chapter 18.04 RCW
or equivalent licensing statute of another jurisdiction; ((or)) and

(((ii)))
(b) Meet such other qualifications as the secretary may establish by
rule.

(((b)
Auditors must either possess such computer security qualifications as are
necessary to conduct the audit or employ, contract, or associate with firms or
individuals who do. The secretary may adopt rules establishing qualifications
as to expertise or experience in computer security.))

(2)
The compliance audits of state agencies and local governments who are licensed
certification authorities, and the secretary, must be performed under the
authority of the state auditor. The state auditor may contract with private
entities as needed to comply with this chapter.

Sec.
8. RCW
19.34.120 and 1997 c 27 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The secretary may investigate the activities of a licensed certification
authority material to its compliance with this chapter and issue orders to a
certification authority to further its investigation and secure compliance with
this chapter.

(2)
The secretary may suspend or revoke the license of a certification authority
for its failure to comply with an order of the secretary.

(3)
The secretary may by order impose and collect a civil ((monetary))
penalty against a licensed certification authority for a violation of this
chapter ((in an amount)). The penalty shall not ((to))
exceed ten thousand dollars per incident, or ninety percent of the recommended
reliance limit of a material certificate, whichever is less. In case of a
violation continuing for more than one day, each day is considered a separate
incident. The secretary may adopt rules setting forth the standards governing
the exercise of the secretary's discretion as to penalty amounts. In the
case of a state agency authorized by law to be a licensed certification
authority, the sole penalty imposed under this subsection shall consist of
specific findings of noncompliance and an order requiring compliance with this
chapter and the rules of the secretary. Any penalty imposed under this chapter
and chapter 34.05 RCW shall be enforceable in any court of competent
jurisdiction.

(4)
The secretary may order a certification authority, which it has found to be in
violation of this chapter, to pay the costs incurred by the secretary in
prosecuting and adjudicating proceedings relative to the order, and enforcing
it.

(5)
The secretary must exercise authority under this section in accordance with the
administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, and a licensed certification
authority may obtain judicial review of the secretary's actions as prescribed
by chapter 34.05 RCW. The secretary may also seek injunctive relief to compel
compliance with an order.

Sec.
9. RCW
19.34.130 and 1996 c 250 s 204 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No certification authority, whether licensed or not, may conduct its business
in a manner that creates an unreasonable risk of loss to subscribers of the
certification authority, to persons relying on certificates issued by the
certification authority, or to a repository.

(2)
The secretary may publish ((in the repository it provides, or elsewhere,))
brief statements advising subscribers, persons relying on digital signatures,
or other repositories about activities of a certification authority, whether
licensed or not, that create a risk prohibited by subsection (1) of this
section. The certification authority named in a statement as creating or
causing such a risk may protest the publication of the statement by filing a
written defense of ten thousand bytes or less. Upon receipt of such a protest,
the secretary must publish the protest along with the secretary's statement,
and must promptly give the protesting certification authority notice and an
opportunity to be heard. Following the hearing, the secretary must rescind the
advisory statement if its publication was unwarranted under this section,
cancel it if its publication is no longer warranted, continue or amend it if it
remains warranted, or take further legal action to eliminate or reduce a risk
prohibited by subsection (1) of this section. The secretary must publish its
decision in the repository it provides.

(3)
In the manner provided by the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW,
the secretary may issue orders and obtain injunctions or other civil relief to
prevent or restrain a certification authority from violating this section,
regardless of whether the certification authority is licensed. This section
does not create a right of action in a person other than the secretary.

Sec.
10. RCW
19.34.200 and 1997 c 27 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A licensed certification authority ((or subscriber)) shall use only a
trustworthy system((:

(a))) to
issue, suspend, or revoke ((a certificate;

(b))) certificates.
A licensed certification authority shall use a recognized repository to
publish or give notice of the issuance, suspension, or revocation of a
certificate((; or

(c)
To create a private key)).

(2)
A licensed certification authority ((must disclose any material
certification practice statement, and any fact material to either the
reliability of a certificate that it has issued or its ability to perform its
services. A certification authority may require a signed, written, and
reasonably specific inquiry from an identified person, and payment of
reasonable compensation, as conditions precedent to effecting a disclosure
required in this subsection.)) shall publish a certification practice
statement in accordance with the rules established by the secretary. The
secretary shall publish the certification practice statements of licensed
certification authorities submitted as part of the licensing process in a
manner similar to the publication of the certification authority disclosure
record.

(3)
A licensed certification authority shall knowingly employ as operative
personnel only persons who have not been convicted within the past seven years
of a felony and have never been convicted of a crime involving fraud, false
statement, or deception. For purposes of this subsection, a certification
authority knowingly employs such a person if the certification authority knew
of a conviction, or should have known based on information required by rule of
the secretary. Operative personnel employed by a licensed certification
authority must also be persons who have demonstrated knowledge and proficiency
in following the requirements of this chapter. The secretary may provide by
rule for the certification of operative personnel, and provide by rule for the
manner in which criminal background information is provided as part of the
certification process, as well as the manner in which knowledge and proficiency
in following the requirements of this chapter may be demonstrated.

Sec.
11. RCW
19.34.210 and 1997 c 27 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A licensed certification authority may issue a certificate to a subscriber only
after all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a)
The certification authority has received a request for issuance signed by the
prospective subscriber; and

(b)
The certification authority has confirmed that:

(i)
The prospective subscriber is the person to be listed in the certificate to be
issued;

(ii)
If the prospective subscriber is acting through one or more agents, the
subscriber duly authorized the agent or agents to have custody of the
subscriber's private key and to request issuance of a certificate listing the
corresponding public key;

(iii)
The information in the certificate to be issued is accurate;

(iv)
The prospective subscriber rightfully holds the private key corresponding to
the public key to be listed in the certificate;

(v)
The prospective subscriber holds a private key capable of creating a digital
signature;

(vi)
The public key to be listed in the certificate can be used to verify a digital
signature affixed by the private key held by the prospective subscriber; and

(vii)
The certificate provides information sufficient to locate or identify one or
more repositories in which notification of the revocation or suspension of the
certificate will be listed if the certificate is suspended or revoked.

(c)
The requirements of this subsection may not be waived or disclaimed by either
the licensed certification authority, the subscriber, or both.

(2)
((If the subscriber accepts the issued certificate, the certification
authority must publish a signed copy of the certificate in a recognized
repository, as the certification authority and the subscriber named in the
certificate may agree, unless a contract)) In confirming that the
prospective subscriber is the person to be listed in the certificate to be
issued, a licensed certification authority shall make a reasonable inquiry into
the subscriber's identity in light of:

(a)
Any statements made by the certification authority regarding the reliability of
the certificate;

(b)
The reliance limit of the certificate;

(c)
Any recommended uses or applications for the certificate; and

(d)
Whether the certificate is a transactional certificate or not.

(3)
A certification authority shall be presumed to have confirmed that the
prospective subscriber is the person to be listed in a certificate where:

(a)
The certification authority has been presented identification documents
consisting of at least one of the following:

(i)
A current identification document issued by or under the authority of the
United States, or such similar identification document issued under the
authority of another country;

(ii)
A current driver's license issued by a state of the United States; or

(iii)
A current personal identification card issued by a state of the United States;
and

(b)
Operative personnel certified according to law or a notary has reviewed and
accepted the identification information of the subscriber.

(4)
The certification authority may establish policies regarding the publication of
certificates in its certification practice statement, which must be adhered to
unless an agreement between the certification authority and the subscriber
provides otherwise. If the ((subscriber does not accept the certificate, a
licensed certification authority must not publish it, or must cancel its
publication if the certificate has already been published)) certification
authority does not establish such a policy, the certification authority must
publish a signed copy of the certificate in a recognized repository.

(((3)))
(5) Nothing in this section precludes a licensed certification authority
from conforming to standards, certification practice statements, security
plans, or contractual requirements more rigorous than, but nevertheless
consistent with, this chapter.

(((4)))
(6) After issuing a certificate, a licensed certification authority must
revoke it immediately upon confirming that it was not issued as required by
this section. A licensed certification authority may also suspend a
certificate that it has issued for a ((reasonable)) period not exceeding
((ninety-six hours)) one week as needed for an investigation to
confirm grounds for revocation under this subsection. The certification
authority must give notice to the subscriber as soon as practicable after a
decision to revoke or suspend under this subsection.

(((5)))
(7) The secretary may order the licensed certification authority to
suspend or revoke a certificate that the certification authority issued, if,
after giving any required notice and opportunity for the certification
authority and subscriber to be heard in accordance with the administrative
procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, the secretary determines that:

(a)
The certificate was issued without substantial compliance with this section;
and

(b)
The noncompliance poses a significant risk to persons ((reasonably))
relying on the certificate.

Upon
determining that an emergency requires an immediate remedy, and in accordance
with the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, the secretary may
issue an order suspending a certificate for a period not to exceed ((ninety-six
hours)) one week.

Sec.
12. RCW
19.34.231 and 1997 c 27 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If a signature of a unit of state or local government, including its
appropriate officers or employees, ((may)) is required by statute,
administrative rule, court rule, or requirement of the office of financial
management, that unit of state or local government shall become a
subscriber to a certificate issued by a licensed certification authority
for purposes of conducting official public business((, but only if
the certificate is issued by a licensed certification authority. A unit of
state government, except the secretary and the department of information
services, may not act as a certification authority)) with electronic
records.

(2)
A city or county may become a licensed certification authority under RCW
19.34.100 for purposes of providing services to local government, if authorized
by ordinance adopted by the city or county legislative authority.

(3)
((The limitation to licensed certification authorities in subsection (1) of
this section does not apply to uses of digital signatures or key pairs limited
to internal agency procedures, as to which the signature is not required by
statute, administrative rule, court rule, or requirement of the office of
financial management.)) A unit of state government, except the secretary
and the department of information services, may not act as a certification
authority.

Sec.
13. RCW
19.34.250 and 1997 c 27 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Unless the certification authority ((and the subscriber agree)) provides
otherwise in the certificate or its certification practice statement,
the licensed certification authority that issued a certificate that is not a
transactional certificate must suspend the certificate for a period not to
exceed ((ninety-six hours)) one week:

(a)
Upon request by a person whom the certification authority reasonably believes
to be: (i) The subscriber named in the certificate; (ii) a person duly
authorized to act for that subscriber; or (iii) a person acting on behalf of
the unavailable subscriber; or

(b)
By order of the secretary under RCW 19.34.210(5).

The
certification authority need not confirm the identity or agency of the person
requesting suspension. The certification authority may require the person
requesting suspension to provide evidence, including a statement under oath or
affirmation, regarding the requestor's identity, authorization, or the
unavailability of the subscriber. Law enforcement agencies may investigate
suspensions for possible wrongdoing by persons requesting suspension.

(2)
Unless the ((certificate)) certification authority provides
otherwise ((or)) in the certificate ((is a transactional
certificate)) or its certification practice statement, the secretary
may suspend a certificate issued by a licensed certification authority for a
period not to exceed ((ninety-six hours)) one week, if:

(a)
A person identifying himself or herself as the subscriber named in the
certificate, a person authorized to act for that subscriber, or a person acting
on behalf of that unavailable subscriber [requests suspension]; and

(b)
The requester represents that the certification authority that issued the
certificate is unavailable.

The
secretary may require the person requesting suspension to provide evidence,
including a statement under oath or affirmation, regarding his or her identity,
authorization, or the unavailability of the issuing certification authority,
and may decline to suspend the certificate in its discretion. Law enforcement
agencies may investigate suspensions by the secretary for possible wrongdoing
by persons requesting suspension.

(3)
Immediately upon suspension of a certificate by a licensed certification authority,
the licensed certification authority must give notice of the suspension
according to the specification in the certificate. If one or more repositories
are specified, then the licensed certification authority must publish a signed
notice of the suspension in all the repositories. If a repository no longer
exists or refuses to accept publication, or if no repository is recognized
under RCW 19.34.400, the licensed certification authority must also publish the
notice in a recognized repository. If a certificate is suspended by the
secretary, the secretary must give notice as required in this subsection for a
licensed certification authority, provided that the person requesting
suspension pays in advance any fee required by a repository for publication of
the notice of suspension.

(4)
A certification authority must terminate a suspension initiated by request
only:

(a)
If the subscriber named in the suspended certificate requests termination of
the suspension, the certification authority has confirmed that the person
requesting suspension is the subscriber or an agent of the subscriber
authorized to terminate the suspension; or

(b)
When the certification authority discovers and confirms that the request for
the suspension was made without authorization by the subscriber. However, this
subsection (4)(b) does not require the certification authority to confirm a
request for suspension.

(5)
The contract between a subscriber and a licensed certification authority may
limit or preclude requested suspension by the certification authority, or may
provide otherwise for termination of a requested suspension. However, if the
contract limits or precludes suspension by the secretary when the issuing
certification authority is unavailable, the limitation or preclusion is
effective only if notice of it is published in the certificate.

(6)
No person may knowingly or intentionally misrepresent to a certification
authority his or her identity or authorization in requesting suspension of a
certificate. Violation of this subsection is a gross misdemeanor.

(7)
The secretary may authorize other state or local governmental agencies to
perform any of the functions of the secretary under this section upon a
regional basis. The authorization must be formalized by an agreement under
chapter 39.34 RCW. The secretary may provide by rule the terms and conditions
of the regional services.

(8)
A suspension under this section must be completed within twenty-four hours of
receipt of all information required in this section.

(9)
A certification authority is not required to provide for suspension of
certificates; however, the certification authority that does not provide for
suspension must clearly state in its certification practice statement that
suspension of certificates is not available.

Sec.
14. RCW
19.34.280 and 1997 c 27 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
By clearly specifying a recommended reliance limit ((in a certificate))
on a certificate or in the certification practice statement, the issuing
certification authority recommends that persons rely on the certificate only to
the extent that the total amount at risk does not exceed the recommended
reliance limit.

(2)
Subject to subsection (3) of this section, unless a licensed certification
authority waives application of this subsection, a licensed certification
authority is:

(a)
Not liable for a loss caused by reliance on a false or forged digital signature
of a subscriber, if, with respect to the false or forged digital signature, the
certification authority complied with all material requirements of this
chapter;

(b)
Not liable in excess of the amount specified in the certificate as its
recommended reliance limit for either:

(i)
A loss caused by reliance on a misrepresentation in the certificate of a fact
that the licensed certification authority is required to confirm; or

(ii)
Failure to comply with RCW 19.34.210 in issuing the certificate;

(c)
Not liable for:

(i)
Punitive or exemplary damages. Nothing in this chapter may be interpreted to
permit punitive or exemplary damages that would not otherwise be permitted by
the law of this state; or

(ii)
Damages for pain or suffering.

(3)
Nothing in subsection (2)(a) of this section relieves a licensed certification
authority of its liability for breach of any of the warranties or
certifications it gives under RCW 19.34.220 or for its lack of good faith,
which warranties and obligation of good faith may not be disclaimed. However,
the standards by which the performance of a licensed certification authority's
obligation of good faith is to be measured may be determined by agreement or
notification complying with subsection (4) of this section if the standards are
not manifestly unreasonable. The liability of a licensed certification authority
under this subsection is subject to the limitations in subsection (2)(b) and
(c) of this section unless the limits are waived by the licensed certification
authority.

(4)
Consequential or incidental damages may be liquidated, or may otherwise be limited,
altered, or excluded unless the limitation, alteration, or exclusion is
unconscionable. A licensed certification authority may liquidate, limit,
alter, or exclude consequential or incidental damages as provided in this
subsection by agreement or by notifying any person who will rely on a
certificate of the liquidation, limitation, alteration, or exclusion before the
person relies on the certificate.

Sec.
15. RCW
19.34.330 and 1996 c 250 s 404 are each amended to read as follows:

A
((copy of a)) digitally signed message ((is as effective, valid, and
enforceable as the original of the message, unless it is evident that the
signer designated an instance of the digitally signed message to be a unique
original, in which case only that instance constitutes the valid, effective,
and enforceable)) shall be deemed to be an original of the message.

Sec.
16. RCW
19.34.340 and 1997 c 27 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1)))
Unless otherwise provided by law ((or contract, if so provided in the
certificate issued by a licensed certification authority)) or agreement,
a digital signature verified by reference to the public key listed in a valid
certificate issued by a licensed certification authority satisfies the
requirements for an acknowledgment under RCW 42.44.010(4) and for
acknowledgment of deeds and other real property conveyances under RCW 64.04.020
((if words of an express acknowledgment appear with the digital signature
regardless of whether the signer personally appeared before either the
certification authority or some other person authorized to take acknowledgments
of deeds, mortgages, or other conveyance instruments under RCW 64.08.010 when
the digital signature was created, if that digital signature is:

(a)
Verifiable by that certificate; and

(b)
Affixed when that certificate was valid.

(2)
If the digital signature is used as an acknowledgment, then the certification
authority is responsible to the same extent as a notary up to the recommended
reliance limit for failure to satisfy the requirements for an acknowledgment.
The certification authority may not disclaim or limit, other than as provided
in RCW 19.34.280, the effect of this section)).

Sec.
17. RCW
19.34.400 and 1997 c 27 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The secretary must recognize one or more repositories, after finding that a
repository to be recognized:

(a)
Is a licensed certification authority;

(b)
Includes, or will include, a data base containing:

(i)
Certificates published in the repository;

(ii)
Notices of suspended or revoked certificates published by licensed
certification authorities or other persons suspending or revoking certificates;
and

(iii)
((Certification authority disclosure records for licensed certification
authorities;

(iv)
All orders or advisory statements published by the secretary in regulating
certification authorities; and

(v)))
Other information adopted by rule by the secretary;

(c)
Operates by means of a trustworthy system, that may, under administrative rule
of the secretary, include additional or different attributes than those
applicable to a certification authority that does not operate as a recognized
repository;

(d)
Contains no significant amount of information that is known or likely to be
untrue, inaccurate, or not reasonably reliable;

(e)
((Contains certificates published by certification authorities that conform
to legally binding requirements that the secretary finds to be substantially
similar to, or more stringent toward the certification authorities, than those
of this state;

(f)))
Keeps ((an archive)) a record of certificates that have been
suspended or revoked, or that have expired, ((within at least the past three
years)) in accordance with requirements adopted by rule by the secretary;
and

(g)
Complies with other reasonable requirements adopted by rule by the secretary.

(2)
A repository may apply to the secretary for recognition by filing a written
request and providing evidence to the secretary sufficient for the secretary to
find that the conditions for recognition are satisfied, in accordance with
requirements adopted by rule by the secretary.

(3)
A repository may discontinue its recognition by filing thirty days' written
notice with the secretary, upon meeting any conditions for discontinuance
adopted by rule by the secretary. In addition the secretary may
discontinue recognition of a repository in accordance with the administrative
procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, if the secretary concludes that the
repository no longer satisfies the conditions for recognition listed in this
section or in rules adopted by the secretary.

Sec.
18. RCW
19.34.410 and 1997 c 27 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Notwithstanding a disclaimer by the repository or a contract to the contrary
between the repository, a certification authority, or a subscriber, a
repository is liable for a loss incurred by a person reasonably relying on a
digital signature verified by the public key listed in a certificate that
has been suspended or revoked by the licensed certification authority
that issued the certificate, if loss was incurred more than one business
day after receipt by the repository of a request from the issuing licensed
certification authority to publish notice of the suspension or revocation,
and the repository had failed to publish the notice when the person relied on
the digital signature.

(2)
Unless waived, a recognized repository or the owner or operator of a recognized
repository is:

(a)
Not liable for failure to record publication of a suspension or revocation,
unless the repository has received notice of publication and one business day
has elapsed since the notice was received;

(b)
Not liable under subsection (1) of this section in excess of the amount
specified in the certificate as the recommended reliance limit;

(c)
Not liable under subsection (1) of this section for:

(i)
Punitive or exemplary damages; or

(ii)
Damages for pain or suffering;

(d)
Not liable for misrepresentation in a certificate published by a licensed
certification authority;

(e)
Not liable for accurately recording or reporting information that a licensed
certification authority, or court clerk, or the secretary has published as required
or permitted in this chapter, including information about suspension or
revocation of a certificate;

(f)
Not liable for reporting information about a certification authority, a
certificate, or a subscriber, if the information is published as required or
permitted in this chapter or a rule adopted by the secretary, or is published
by order of the secretary in the performance of the licensing and regulatory
duties of that office under this chapter.

(3)
Consequential or incidental damages may be liquidated, or may otherwise be
limited, altered, or excluded unless the limitation, alteration, or exclusion
is unconscionable. A recognized repository may liquidate, limit, alter, or
exclude damages as provided in this subsection by agreement, or by notifying
any person who will rely on a digital signature verified by the public key
listed in a suspended or revoked certificate of the liquidation, limitation,
alteration, or exclusion before the person relies on the certificate.

Sec.
19. RCW
43.105.320 and 1997 c 27 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of information services may become a licensed certification
authority, under chapter 19.34 RCW, for the purpose of providing services to ((state
and local government)) agencies, local governments, and other entities
and persons for purposes of official state business. The department is not
subject to RCW 19.34.100(1)(a). The department shall only issue certificates,
as defined in RCW 19.34.020, in which the subscriber is:

(1)
The state of Washington or a department, office, or agency of the state;

(2)
A city, county, district, or other municipal corporation, or a department,
office, or agency of the city, county, district, or municipal corporation;

(3)
An agent or employee of an entity described by subsection (1) or (2) of this
section, for purposes of official public business; ((or))

(4)
Any other person or entity engaged in matters of official public business,
however, such certificates shall be limited only to matters of official public
business; or

(5)
An applicant for a license as a certification authority for the purpose of
compliance with RCW 19.34.100(1)(a).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 20. (1)
The office of financial management shall convene a task force, which shall
include both governmental and nongovernmental representatives, to review the
practice of the state issuing certificates to nongovernmental entities or
individuals for the purpose of conducting official public business. The task
force shall prepare and submit its findings to the appropriate legislative
committees by December 31, 2000.

(2)
This section expires June 30, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---