BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART
I

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

Sec.
101. 1998
c 346 s 101 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE HOUSE
OF REPRESENTATIVES

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 24,221,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((25,907,000))

25,889,000

Department
of Retirement Systems Expense

Account
Appropriation...................... $ 25,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((50,153,000))

50,135,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$75,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $75,000 of the
general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation are provided solely for the
independent operations of the legislative ethics board. Expenditure decisions
of the board, including employment of staff, shall be independent of the senate
and house of representatives.

(2)
The department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided
solely to implement the provisions relating to the actuarial audit of the
pension contribution rates in Substitute House Bill No. 2544 (funding state
retirement systems). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the
appropriation shall lapse.

(3)
$125,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely for a review of the memorandum of agreement signed between the
United States environmental protection agency and the department of ecology.
The agreement requires the department to conduct total maximum daily loads on
polluted water bodies as defined by the federal clean water act. The review
may include but is not limited to the department's program for implementing the
settlement, an examination of the decisions that affect how water quality
problems are defined, the causes of those problems, and the means by which
solutions to these problems are to be developed and implemented.

Sec.
102. 1998
c 346 s 102 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SENATE

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 19,357,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((20,838,000))

20,826,000

Department
of Retirement Systems Expense Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 25,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((40,220,000))

40,208,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$75,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $75,000 of the
general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation are provided solely for the
independent operations of the legislative ethics board. Expenditure decisions
of the board, including employment of staff, shall be independent of the senate
and house of representatives.

(2)
$100,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 is provided
solely for a study of financial aid and tuition by the senate committee on ways
and means and the house of representatives committee on appropriations.

(a)
The study shall report on the current usage and distribution of financial aid,
investigate other resources available to financial aid recipients, and shall
compare alternative methods of financial aid distribution and their impacts on
the sectors of higher education and students served within each sector.

(b)
The study shall also provide comparative data from other states on methods of
establishing tuition rates and the relationship of tuition to state funding.

(3)
The department of retirement systems expense account appropriation is provided
solely to implement the provisions relating to the actuarial audit of the
pension contribution rates in Substitute House Bill No. 2544 (funding state
retirement systems). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the
appropriation shall lapse.

(4)
$25,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for the legislature and the office of financial management to
contract jointly for a performance review of the state long-term care system.
The review shall result in recommendations by October 1, 1998, on strategies
for increasing the long-term affordability and cost-effectiveness of the
system, and shall include a review of topics such as methods for matching
service levels to recipient needs, options for managing growth in entitlement
caseloads, and techniques for projecting the number of persons in need of
publicly funded services.

(5)
$125,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely for a review of the memorandum of agreement signed between the
United States environmental protection agency and the department of ecology.
The agreement requires the department to conduct total maximum daily loads on
polluted water bodies as defined by the federal clean water act. The review
may include but is not limited to the department's program for implementing the
settlement, an examination of the decisions that affect how water quality
problems are defined, the causes of those problems, and the means by which
solutions to these problems are to be developed and implemented.

Sec.
103. 1998
c 346 s 105 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE COURT
OF APPEALS

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 10,340,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((10,307,000))

10,318,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION.............. ... $ ((20,647,000))

20,658,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$271,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation is provided solely
for an additional judge position and related support staff in division I in
King county, effective July 1, 1998.

(2)
$490,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation is provided solely
for remodeling existing space in division I court facilities to house
additional staff.

Sec.
104. 1998
c 346 s 106 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE COMMISSION
ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 692,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((714,000))

719,000

TOTAL APPROPRIATION................. $ ((1,406,000))

1,411,000

Sec.
105. 1998
c 346 s 107 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE ADMINISTRATOR
FOR THE COURTS

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 12,723,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((12,770,000))

12,217,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((27,709,000))

27,876,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-

Local
Appropriation........................ $ 2,000

Judicial
Information Systems Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((17,489,000))

17,486,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((70,691,000))

70,304,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Funding provided in the judicial information systems account appropriation
shall be used for the operations and maintenance of technology systems that
improve services provided by the supreme court, the court of appeals, the
office of public defense, and the office of the administrator for the courts.
$400,000 of the judicial information systems account appropriation is provided
solely for the year 2000 date conversion.

(2)
No moneys appropriated in this section may be expended by the administrator for
the courts for payments in excess of fifty percent of the employer contribution
on behalf of superior courts judges for insurance and health care plans and
federal social security and medicare and medical aid benefits. Consistent with
Article IV, section 13 of the state Constitution and 1996 Attorney General's
Opinion No. 2, it is the intent of the legislature that the cost of these
employer contributions shall be shared equally between the state and county or
counties in which the judges serve. The administrator for the courts shall
continue to implement procedures for the collection and disbursement of these
employer contributions.

(3)
$3,255,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for the continuation of treatment alternatives to street crimes (TASC)
programs in Pierce, Snohomish, Clark, King, Spokane, and Yakima counties.

(4)
$125,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for the workload associated with the increase in state cases filed in
Thurston county superior court.

(5)
$223,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for the gender and justice commission.

(6)
$308,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for the minority and justice commission.

(7)
$100,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $100,000 of the
general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation are provided solely for judicial
program enhancements. Within the funding provided in this subsection, the
office of administrator of courts in consultation with the supreme court shall
determine the program or programs to receive an enhancement.

(8)
$35,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation is provided solely
for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1771 (guardian
certification). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(9)
$100,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation is provided solely
for the Snohomish county preprosecution diversion program.

(10)
$175,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is provided
solely for costs associated with the publication and distribution of a judicial
voter pamphlet for the 1998 primary election.

Sec.
106. 1998
c 346 s 108 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE OFFICE
OF PUBLIC DEFENSE

Public
Safety and Education Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((12,103,000))

11,503,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The cost of defending indigent offenders in death penalty cases has escalated
significantly over the last four years. The office of public defense advisory
committee shall analyze the current methods for reimbursing private attorneys
and shall develop appropriate standards and criteria designed to control costs
and still provide indigent defendants their constitutional right to
representation at public expense. The office of public defense advisory
committee shall report its findings and recommendations to the supreme court
and the appropriate legislative committees by September 30, 1998.

(2)
$688,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely to increase the reimbursement for private attorneys providing
constitutionally mandated indigent defense in nondeath penalty cases.

Sec.
107. 1998
c 346 s 110 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE PUBLIC
DISCLOSURE COMMISSION

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 1,568,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((1,262,000))

1,519,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((2,830,000))

3,087,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$306,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $72,000 of the
general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation are provided solely for technology
for customer service improvements.

(2)
$111,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund appropriation ((is)) and
$115,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund appropriation are provided
for attorney general services for the public disclosure commission's
investigations of the Washington education association and the building
industry association of Washington, and other cases.

Sec.
108. 1998
c 346 s 111 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SECRETARY
OF STATE

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 7,970,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((7,899,000))

7,889,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 2,000

Archives
& Records Management Account--State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((4,032,000))

4,030,000

Archives
& Records Management Account--Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ ((2,833,000))

2,858,000

Department
of Personnel Service Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 663,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((23,397,000))

23,412,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$2,255,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 is provided
solely to reimburse counties for the state's share of primary and general
election costs and the costs of conducting mandatory recounts on state
measures.

(2)
$2,011,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$2,536,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided
solely for the verification of initiative and referendum petitions, maintenance
of related voter registration records, and the publication and distribution of
the voters and candidates pamphlet.

(3)
$99,000 of the general fund appropriation is provided solely for the state's
participation in the United States census block boundary suggestion program.

(4)
$125,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund appropriation is provided solely
for legal advertising of state measures under RCW 29.27.072.

(5)
$45,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation is provided solely
for an economic feasibility study of a state horse park.

(6)
The election review section under chapter 29.60 RCW shall be administered in a
manner consistent with Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5565 (election procedures
review).

(7)(a)
$1,850,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is provided
solely for contracting with a nonprofit organization to produce gavel-to-gavel
television coverage of state government deliberations and other events of
state-wide significance during fiscal year 1999. An eligible nonprofit
organization must be formed solely for the purpose of, and be experienced in,
providing gavel-to-gavel television coverage of state government deliberations
and other events of state-wide significance and must have received a
determination of tax-exempt status under section 501(c)(3) of the federal
internal revenue code.

(b)
The legislature finds that the commitment of on-going funding is necessary to
ensure continuous, autonomous, and independent coverage of public affairs. For
that purpose, the secretary of state shall enter into a four-year contract with
the nonprofit organization to provide public affairs coverage through June 30,
2002. The funding level for each year of the contract shall be based on the
amount provided in this subsection and adjusted to reflect the implicit price
deflator for the previous year. The nonprofit organization shall be required
to raise contributions or commitments to make contributions, in cash or in kind,
in an amount equal to forty percent of the state contribution.

(c)
The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent audit, an annual
financial statement, and an annual report, including benchmarks that measure
the success of the nonprofit organization in meeting the intent of the program.

(d)
No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection may be used,
directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:

(i)
Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the
legislature of the state of Washington, by any county, city, town, or other
political subdivision of the state of Washington, or by the congress, or the
adoption or rejection of any rule, standard, rate, or other legislative
enactment of any state agency;

(ii)
Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or

(iii)
Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel, lodging, meals, or
entertainment to a public officer or employee.

(8)
$280,000 of the archives and records management account--private/local
appropriation is provided solely for preserving and restoring security
microfilm.

Sec.
109. 1998
c 346 s 113 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE
AUDITOR

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 688,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ 1,193,000

State
Auditing Services Revolving Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((12,373,000))

12,370,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((14,254,000))

14,251,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Audits of school districts by the division of municipal corporations shall
include findings regarding the accuracy of: (a) Student enrollment data; and
(b) the experience and education of the district's certified instructional
staff, as reported to the superintendent of public instruction for allocation
of state funding.

(2)
$420,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $420,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for
staff and related costs to audit special education programs that exhibit
unusual rates of growth, extraordinarily high costs, or other characteristics
requiring attention of the state safety net committee, and other school
districts for baseline purposes and to determine if there are common errors.
The auditor shall consult with the superintendent of public instruction
regarding training and other staffing assistance needed to provide expertise to
the audit staff.

(3)
$250,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $250,000 of the
general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation are provided solely for the budget
and reporting system (BARS) to improve the reporting of local government fiscal
data. Audits of counties and cities by the division of municipal corporations
shall include findings regarding the completeness, accuracy, and timeliness of
BARS data reported to the state auditor's office.

(4)
The state auditor shall develop recommendations and curricula for preventing
instances of improper governmental actions as defined in chapter 42.20 RCW, the
state whistleblower act. In developing these recommendations and curricula,
the state auditor shall involve the office of financial management, office of
the attorney general, executive ethics board, department of personnel, employee
organizations, and other interested parties. These recommendations shall be
submitted to the governor and the legislature by June 30, 1998.

(5)
$120,000 of the auditing services revolving fund appropriation is provided
solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2881 (auditing
state contractors). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6)
$25,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation is provided solely
to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2831 (a joint report to
the legislature on the results of cost studies and service quality and
reliability reports from electric utilities). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. No fee may
be collected from the electric utilities for this joint report.

(7)
$10,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $490,000 of the
general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation are provided solely for staff and
related costs to: Verify the accuracy of reported school district data
submitted for state funding purposes or program audits of state funded public
school programs; and establish the specific amount of funds to be recovered
whenever the amount is not firmly established in the course of any public
school audits conducted by the state auditor's office. The results of the
audits shall be submitted to the superintendent of public instruction for
corrections of data and adjustments of funds.

Sec.
110. 1998
c 346 s 114 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE CITIZENS'
COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 11,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((63,000))

126,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((74,000))

137,000

Sec.
111. 1998
c 346 s 115 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL

General
Fund--State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 4,161,000

General
Fund--State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((3,831,000))

3,916,000

General
Fund--Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 2,248,000

Public
Safety and Education Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,291,000

New
Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,094,000

Legal
Services Revolving Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((125,758,000))

129,192,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((138,383,000))

141,902,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual legal services
expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for each agency receiving
legal services. The report shall be submitted to the office of financial
management and the fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives
no later than ninety days after the end of each fiscal year.

(2)
The attorney general shall include, at a minimum, the following information
with each bill sent to agencies receiving legal services: (a) The number of
hours and cost of attorney services provided during the billing period; (b)
cost of support staff services provided during the billing period; (c) attorney
general overhead and central support costs charged to the agency for the
billing period; (d) direct legal costs, such as filing and docket fees, charged
to the agency for the billing period; and (e) other costs charged to the agency
for the billing period. The attorney general may, with approval of the office
of financial management change its billing system to meet the needs of its user
agencies.

(3)
$300,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund--state appropriation ((is))
and $63,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state appropriation
are provided for a comprehensive assessment of environmental and public
health impacts and for other costs related to pursuing remedies for pollution
in the Spokane river basin.

(4)
$440,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund--state appropriation and $410,000
of the fiscal year 1999 general fund--state appropriation are provided solely
to implement the supervision management and recidivist tracking program to
allow the department of corrections and local law enforcement agencies to share
information concerning the activities of offenders on community supervision.

Sec.
112. 1998
c 346 s 118 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE OFFICE
OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

General
Fund--State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 10,626,000

General
Fund--State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((11,160,000))

11,155,000

General
Fund--Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 23,331,000

General
Fund‑-Local Appropriation.............. $ 190,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((45,307,000))

45,302,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The office of financial management, in cooperation with the higher education
coordinating board and the state board for community and technical colleges,
shall develop long-term higher education enrollment forecasting models for
consideration by the legislature. To the extent possible, the pilot models
shall incorporate trends in demography, higher education applications, K-12
graduation rates, labor market needs, and state and national higher education
policy and economic considerations. The public institutions of education shall
cooperate in the development of models by providing any necessary data in a
timely and organized manner. The private education institutions of the state
are encouraged to participate in this effort. A preliminary report shall be
provided to the appropriate committees of the legislature by November 1, 1998,
and a final report shall be provided by January 15, 1999.

(2)
$139,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2880
(task force on vendor contracting practices). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3)
$250,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely to (a) contract with an outside management consultant to
review the department of fish and wildlife's financial operations and
management practices and (b) contract with an outside consultant to develop
a strategic information technology plan for the department.

(4)
$25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for the legislature and the office of financial management to
contract jointly for a performance review of the state long-term care system.
The review shall result in recommendations by October 1, 1998, on strategies
for increasing the long-term affordability and cost-effectiveness of the
system, and shall include a review of topics such as methods for matching
service levels to recipient needs, options for managing growth in entitlement
caseloads, and techniques for projecting the number of persons in need of
publicly funded services.

Sec.
113. 1998
c 346 s 121 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS--OPERATIONS

Dependent
Care Administrative Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 357,000

Department
of Retirement Systems Expense Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((34,481,000))

34,593,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((34,838,000))

34,950,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
(($1,373,000)) $527,000 of the department of retirement systems
expense account appropriation is provided solely for the information systems
project known as the electronic document image management system. Authority to
expend this amount is conditioned on compliance with section 902 of this act.

(2)
$1,259,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely for the information systems project known as
the receivables management system. Authority to expend this amount is
conditioned on compliance with section 902 of this act.

(3)
The department of retirement systems shall complete a study examining whether
it would be cost-effective to contract out the administration functions for the
dependent care assistance program and shall report to the fiscal committees of
the legislature by December 15, 1997.

(4)
$118,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account appropriation
is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2491
(TRS/PERS plan I gain sharing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5)
$920,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account appropriation
is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 6306 (creating the
Washington school employees' retirement system). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6)
$42,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6305
(death benefits for port and university police). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7)
$74,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account appropriation
is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5030 (Washington
state patrol survivor benefits). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8)
$38,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account appropriation
is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1024 (PERS 1 and TRS
1 options). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided
in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec.
114. 1997
c 149 s 140 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

General
Fund--State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 1,302,000

General
Fund--State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((1,278,000))

1,223,000

General
Fund--Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 2,402,000

General
Fund--Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 400,000

Motor
Transport Account Appropriation.......... $ 14,120,000

Air
Pollution Control Account Appropriation.... $ 391,000

General
Administration Facilities and Services

Revolving
Account Appropriation............. $ 22,299,000

Central
Stores Revolving Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,306,000

Energy
Efficiency Services Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 180,000

Risk
Management Account Appropriation.......... $ 2,328,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((48,006,000))

47,951,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$1,200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$1,200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for the purchase of food for distribution to the state's food
assistance network and related expenses.

(2)
$25,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 is
provided solely for the World War II memorial on the condition that the
currently approved design for the World War II memorial be sited on the
location selected by the World War II advisory committee and approved and
recommended by the capitol campus design advisory committee. This site is
immediately south of the Columbia street and 11th avenue axial on the west
capitol campus.

(3)
Except for the World War II memorial, no additional monuments may be placed on
the capitol campus until the completion of the capitol campus monuments and
memorial policy by the department of general administration, adoption of the
policy by the state capitol committee, and inclusion of the policy in the
department of general administration's administrative code.

(4)
The department shall not purchase any travel product for any state employee or
state official from a vendor who is not a Washington-based seller of travel
licensed under chapter 19.138 RCW.

(5)
The department shall study the state motor pool vehicle fleet to develop a plan
for meeting and exceeding the minimum vehicle mileage standards established by
the federal government. The department shall report its findings and
conclusions to the appropriate legislative committees by December 1, 1997.

(6)
The department shall sell or contract for sale all surplus motor pool fleet
vehicles and shall, when cost effective, contract out for the reconditioning,
transport, and delivery of the vehicles prior to their sale at auction.

Sec.
115. 1998
c 346 s 117 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

General
Fund--State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 57,078,000

General
Fund--State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((61,451,000))

62,402,000

General
Fund--Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 164,000,000

General
Fund--Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 6,903,000

Public
Safety and Education Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 8,720,000

Public
Works Assistance Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,223,000

Building
Code Council Account Appropriation.... $ 1,366,000

Administrative
Contingency Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,776,000

Low-Income
Weatherization Assistance Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 923,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 6,042,000

Manufactured
Home Installation Training Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 250,000

Washington
Housing Trust Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 7,999,000

Public
Facility Construction Loan Revolving Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 515,000

Clean
Washington Account Appropriation (FY 1998) $ 11,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((319,257,000))

320,208,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$2,962,500 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $3,602,500 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for a contract with the Washington technology center.
For work essential to the mission of the Washington technology center and
conducted in partnership with universities, the center shall not pay any
increased indirect rate nor increases in other indirect charges above the absolute
amount paid during the 1995-97 biennium.

(2)
$155,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$445,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for a contract with the Washington manufacturing extension
partnership.

(3)
$9,964,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is provided solely for
the drug control and system improvement formula grant program, to be
distributed in state fiscal year 1998 as follows:

(a)
$3,603,250 to local units of governments to continue the multi-jurisdictional
narcotics task forces;

(b)
$500,000 to the department to continue the state-wide drug prosecution
assistance program in support of multijurisdictional narcotics task forces;

(c)
$1,306,075 to the Washington state patrol for coordination, investigative, and
supervisory support to the multijurisdictional narcotics task forces and for
methamphetamine education and response;

(d)
$240,000 to the department for grants to support tribal law enforcement needs;

(e)
$900,000 to drug courts in eastern and western Washington;

(f)
$300,000 to the department for grants to provide sentencing alternatives
training programs to defenders;

(g)
$200,000 for grants to support substance-abuse treatment in county jails;

(h)
$517,075 to the department for legal advocacy for victims of domestic violence
and for training of local law enforcement officers and prosecutors on domestic
violence laws and procedures;

(i)
$903,000 to the department to continue youth violence prevention and
intervention projects;

(j)
$91,000 for the governor's council on substance abuse;

(k)
$99,000 for program evaluation and monitoring;

(l)
$100,000 for the department of corrections for a feasibility study of replacing
or updating the offender based tracking system.

(m)
$498,200 for development of a state-wide system to track criminal history
records; and

(n)
No more than $706,400 to the department for grant administration and
reporting.

These
amounts represent the maximum Byrne grant expenditure authority for each
program. No program may expend Byrne grant funds in excess of the amounts
provided in this section. If moneys in excess of those appropriated in this
section become available, whether from prior or current fiscal year Byrne grant
distributions, the department shall hold these moneys in reserve and may not
expend them without a specific appropriation. These moneys shall be carried
forward and applied to the pool of moneys available for appropriation for
programs and projects in the succeeding fiscal year. As part of its budget
request for the succeeding fiscal year, the department shall estimate and
request authority to spend any funds remaining in reserve as a result of this
subsection.

(4)
$11,715,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided solely
for the drug control and system improvement formula grant program, to be
distributed in state fiscal year 1999 as follows:

(a)
$3,878,250 to local units of government to continue multijurisdictional narcotics
task forces;

(b)
$531,000 to the department to continue the drug prosecution assistance program
in support of multijurisdictional narcotics task forces;

(c)
$1,363,075 to the Washington state patrol for coordination, investigative, and
supervisory support to the multijurisdictional narcotics task forces and for
methamphetamine education and response;

(d)
$256,000 to the department for grants to support tribal law enforcement needs;

(e)
$1,093,000 to drug courts in eastern and western Washington;

(f)
$312,000 to the department for grants assisting in the development, conduct,
and training on sentencing alternatives;

(g)
$261,000 to the department to continue a substance-abuse treatment in jails
program, to test the effect of treatment on future criminal behavior;

(h)
$581,075 to the department to continue domestic violence legal advocacy;

(i)
$949,000 to the department to continue youth violence prevention and
intervention projects;

(j)
$91,000 to the department to continue the governor's council on substance
abuse;

(k)
$99,000 to the department to continue evaluation of Byrne formula grant
programs;

(l)
$1,496,200 to the office of financial management for the criminal history
records improvement program; and

(m)
$804,400 to the department for required grant administration, monitoring and
reporting on Byrne formula grant programs.

These
amounts represent the maximum Byrne grant expenditure authority for each
program. No program may expend Byrne grant funds in excess of the amounts
provided in this subsection. If moneys in excess of those appropriated in this
subsection become available, whether from prior or current fiscal year Byrne
grant distributions, the department shall hold these moneys in reserve and may
not expend them without specific appropriation. These moneys shall be carried
forward and applied to the pool of moneys available for appropriation for
programs and projects in the succeeding fiscal year. As part of its budget
request for the succeeding year, the department shall estimate and request
authority to spend any funds remaining in reserve as a result of this
subsection.

(5)
$1,000,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $1,000,000 of
the general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation are provided solely to implement
Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1576 (buildable lands) or Senate Bill No.
6094 (growth management). If neither bill is enacted by June 30, 1997, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6)
$4,766,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation, $1,000,000
of the fiscal year 1998 general fund‑-state appropriation, and $1,034,000
of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state appropriation are provided
solely for indigent civil legal representation services contracts and contracts
administration. The amounts provided in this subsection are contingent upon
enactment of section 2 of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2276 (civil legal
services for indigent persons). If section 2 of the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 1997, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7)
$643,000 of the general fund--state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $643,000
of the general fund--state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are provided solely
to increase payment rates for contracted early childhood education assistance
program providers. It is the legislature's intent that these amounts shall be
used primarily to increase compensation for persons employed in direct,
front-line service delivery.

(8)
$75,000 of the general fund--state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $75,000
of the general fund--state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are provided solely
as a grant for the community connections program in Walla Walla county.

(9)
$300,000 of the general fund--state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $300,000
of the general fund--state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are provided solely
to contract with the Washington state association of court-appointed special
advocates/guardians ad litem (CASA/GAL) to establish pilot programs in three
counties to recruit additional community volunteers to represent the interests
of children in dependency proceedings. Of this amount, a maximum of $30,000
shall be used by the department to contract for an evaluation of the
effectiveness of CASA/GAL in improving outcomes for dependent children. The
evaluation shall address the cost-effectiveness of CASA/GAL and to the extent
possible, identify savings in other programs of the state budget where the
savings resulted from the efforts of the CASA/GAL volunteers. The department
shall report to the governor and legislature by October 15, 1998.

(10)
$75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely for state sponsorship of the "BIO 99" international
biotechnology conference and exhibition in the Seattle area in 1999.

(11)
$698,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998,
$697,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999, and
$1,101,000 of the administrative contingency account appropriation are provided
solely for contracting with associate development organizations.

(12)
$50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely to expand the long-term care ombudsman program.

(13)
$60,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$60,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for implementation of the Puget Sound work plan action item
DCTED-01.

(14)
$20,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 is
provided solely for a task force on tourism promotion and development. The
task force shall report to the legislature on its findings and recommendations
by January 31, 1998.

(15)
$61,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$60,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for the pacific northwest economic region (PNWER).

(16)
$123,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $124,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for the community development finance program.

(17)
Within the appropriations provided in this section, the department shall
conduct a study of possible financial incentives to assist in revitalization of
commercial areas and report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by November 15, 1997.

(((19)))
(18) $1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 1999 is provided solely for the development of housing for
low-income temporary or migrant farm workers through grants awarded after the
effective date of this act. The legislature finds that providing housing for
low-income temporary or migrant workers is a public purpose. The department
shall prioritize grants and shall award grants on a competitive basis to local
governments, nonprofit corporations, or other nonprofit entities. Grant moneys
awarded by the department under this subsection may be matched by nonstate
sources on a dollar-for-dollar basis, in cash or in-kind. Of the amount
provided in this subsection, $100,000 is provided solely for restroom and
shower facilities at the Horn Rapids Park in Benton county; no match need be
provided for this project. The amount provided in this subsection is
contingent upon enactment of sections 1 through 8 of Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6168. If any of these sections of the bill are not enacted by June
30, 1998, this subsection is null and void, and the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse. Any amounts provided in this subsection not committed
to grants by June 30, 1999, shall lapse.

(((20)))
(19) $275,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1999 is provided solely for coastal erosion project grants to the city of
Ocean Shores.

(((21)))
(20) $191,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1999 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill
No. 2556 (child abuse prevention and treatment). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((22)))
(21) $965,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1999 is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill
No 6655 (Spokane intercollegiate research and technology institute).

(((23)))
(22) $92,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6560 (electric power customer rights). For any portion of the
appropriation that is expended for contracted services, the department shall:
(a) Form an advisory committee consisting of representatives from public
utility districts and residential, commercial, and industrial customers; and
(b) submit for review and approval by the advisory committee the request for
proposal and selection of the successful bidder or bidders. If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((24)))
(23) $383,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1999 is provided solely for the emergency food assistance program.

(((25)))
(24) $120,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1999 is provided solely for grants to licensed overnight youth shelters
for the purpose of assisting the shelters in meeting the minimum requirements
for receiving a license under chapter 74.15 RCW. The department may provide
grants of up to twenty thousand dollars per year for each shelter. Only
shelters that are currently licensed are eligible to receive the grants. Funds
may be used for the following purposes, including but not limited to:
Additional staff, food, facility maintenance, or beds, provided that these
costs are necessary to meet the licensing and facility standards adopted by the
department of social and health services. For purposes of this subsection,
"overnight youth shelter" means a licensed facility operated by a
nonprofit agency that provides overnight shelter to homeless or runaway youth
because of family problems or dysfunctions.

(((26)))
(25) $27,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1999 is provided solely for the sexual assault program within the office
of crime victims advocacy.

(((27)))
(26) $37,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
1998 and $128,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1999 are provided solely for deposit in the state trade fair fund. If
Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6562 is not enacted by June 30,
1998, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((28)))
(27) $1,100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 1999 is provided solely for the early childhood education and
assistance program.

(28)
$1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
is provided solely for warehouse space and equipment and other purchases
necessary to store food acquired under the emergency food assistance program.

Sec.
116. 1997
c 149 s 143 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE BOARD
OF ACCOUNTANCY

Certified
Public Accountants' Account

Appropriation................................... $ ((978,000))

1,001,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations: $22,000 of the certified public accountants' account appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 3901
(implementing welfare reform). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997,
the amount provided shall lapse.

Sec.
117. 1998
c 346 s 128 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE MILITARY
DEPARTMENT

General
Fund--State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 8,602,000

General
Fund--State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((9,390,000))

17,908,000

General
Fund--Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((34,314,000))

34,304,000

General
Fund--Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 238,000

Flood
Control Assistance Account Appropriation. $ 3,000,000

Enhanced
911 Account Appropriation............. $ ((26,782,000))

29,392,000

Disaster
Response Account‑-State Appropriation. $ ((25,487,000))

29,810,000

Disaster
Response Account‑-Federal Appropriation $ ((110,812,000))

139,285,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((218,625,000))

262,539,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$365,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998,
(($1,145,000)) $8,843,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 1999, $3,000,000 of the flood control assistance
account appropriation, and $6,197,000 of the general fund--federal
appropriation are provided solely for deposit in the disaster response account
to cover costs pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

(2)
(($25,122,000)) $27,996,000 of the disaster response
account--state appropriation is provided ((solely)) for the state share
of response and recovery costs associated with federal emergency management
agency (FEMA) disaster number 1079 (November/December 1995 storms), FEMA
disaster 1100 (February 1996 floods), FEMA disaster 1152 (November 1996 ice
storm), FEMA disaster 1159 (December 1996 holiday storm), FEMA disaster 1172
(March 1997 floods), FEMA disaster 1252 (1998 northeast counties floods),
FEMA disaster 1255 (1998 Kelso landslide), and to assist local governmental
entities with the matching funds necessary to earn FEMA funds for FEMA disaster
1100 (February 1996 floods), or, after approval by the director of financial
management, the state share of response and recovery costs associated with FEMA
declared disasters occurring between February 1, 1999, and June 30, 1999.
(($356,000)) $1,805,000 of the disaster response account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for fire mobilization costs. $9,000 of the
disaster response account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for
costs associated with FEMA disaster 1182 (Pend Oreille county 1997 spring
flood). The military department may, upon approval of the director of the
office of financial management, use portions of the disaster response account‑-state
appropriation to offset costs of new disasters occurring before June 30, 1999.

(3)
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of a conditional scholarship program
pursuant to chapter 28B.103 RCW.

(4)
$35,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$35,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely for the north county emergency medical service.

(5)
$36,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$72,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely for emergency worker claims pursuant to chapter 38.52 RCW.

(6)
$825,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely for reimbursement of costs associated with activation of the
Washington national guard for preserving the peace at the July 1998 Makah days
celebration.

(7) $2,610,000 of the enhanced 911 account appropriation is
provided solely for salary assistance to counties with populations under
seventy-five thousand in conformance with chapter 304, Laws of 1998 (Substitute
House Bill No. 1126). The military department, in consultation with the
enhanced 911 advisory committee, shall develop criteria for providing salary
assistance which shall be based on, but not limited to, the following: (a) The
additional staffing costs incurred by public safety answering points directly
related to providing enhanced 911 services; (b) disproportionate fiscal impact
relative to the county budget for providing enhanced 911 services; and (c) the
most efficient and cost-effective way to provide enhanced 911 service.

(End of part)

PART
II

HUMAN
SERVICES

Sec.
201. 1998
c 346 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES. (1) Appropriations made in
this act to the department of social and health services shall initially be
allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not
include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly
provided in subsection (3) of this section, nor shall allotment modifications
permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for
other than that purpose except as expressly provided in subsection (3) of
this section.

(2)
The department of social and health services shall not initiate any services
that will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly
authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and
spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in
this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state
moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the
department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys
shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation
providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state
general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this
subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative
fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal
moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not
require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula
basis by state funds.

(3)(a)
The appropriations to the department of social and health services in chapters
149 and 454, Laws of 1997, as amended, shall be expended for the programs and
in the amounts specified therein. However, after May 1, 1998, unless
specifically prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fund‑-state
appropriations for fiscal year 1998 among programs after approval by the
director of financial management. ((However, the department shall not
transfer general fund‑-state appropriations from the economic services
program for the 1997-99 fiscal biennium.))

(b)
After May 1, 1999, after approval by the director of financial management
and unless specifically prohibited by this act, the department may transfer
moneys among programs, including federal moneys that are provided solely for a
specified purpose. However, the department shall not transfer state moneys
that are provided solely for a specified purpose except as expressly provided
in subsection (3)(d) of this section.

(c)
To the extent that the transfer of appropriations under subsection (a) of this
section is insufficient to fund actual expenditures in fiscal year 1998 in the
medical assistance program that exceed the expenditures projected in the
November 1997 medical assistance caseload forecast, the department may transfer
general fund appropriations, not to exceed five million dollars, within the
medical assistance program from fiscal year 1999 into fiscal year 1998.

(((c)))
(d) To the extent that transfers under subsection (3)(b) of this section are
insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of fiscal year 1999 caseload
forecasts and utilization assumptions in the medical assistance, long term
care, foster care, adoption support, and child support programs, the department
may transfer state moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose
after approval by the director of financial management.

(e)
The director of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal
committees of the senate and house of representatives in writing prior to
approving any allotment modifications.

Sec.
202. 1998
c 346 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-CHILDREN
AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 201,453,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((213,035,000))

197,003,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((252,300,000))

293,509,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 400,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,332,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((671,520,000))

696,697,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$16,510,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
((and $17,508,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1999 are)) is provided solely for purposes consistent with the
maintenance of effort requirements under the federal temporary assistance for
needy families program established under P.L. 104-193.

(2)
$4,332,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation
and $3,733,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for the operation of the family policy council, the community public
health and safety networks, and delivery of services authorized under the
federal family preservation and support act. Within the funds provided, the
family policy council shall contract for an evaluation of the community
networks with the institute for public policy and shall provide for audits of
ten networks. Within the funds provided, the family policy council may build
and maintain a geographic information system database tied to community network
geography.

(3)
$577,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$577,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely to contract for the operation of one pediatric interim care
facility. The facility shall provide residential care for up to twelve
children through two years of age. Seventy-five percent of the children served
by the facility must be in need of special care as a result of substance abuse
by their mothers. The facility also shall provide on-site training to
biological, adoptive, or foster parents. The facility shall provide at least
three months of consultation and support to parents accepting placement of
children from the facility. The facility may recruit new and current foster
and adoptive parents for infants served by the facility. The department shall
not require case management as a condition of the contract.

(4)
$481,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$481,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely for up to three nonfacility-based programs for the training,
consultation, support, and recruitment of biological, foster, and adoptive
parents of children through age three in need of special care as a result of
substance abuse by their mothers, except that each program may serve up to
three medically fragile nonsubstance-abuse-affected children. In selecting
nonfacility-based programs, preference shall be given to programs whose federal
or private funding sources have expired or that have successfully performed
under the existing pediatric interim care program.

(5)
$640,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $640,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely to fund Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5710
(juvenile care and treatment), including section 2 of the bill. Amounts
provided in this subsection to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5710
must be used to serve families who are screened from the child protective
services risk assessment process. Services shall be provided through contracts
with community-based organizations. If neither bill is enacted by June 30,
1997, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6)
$594,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998,
$556,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999,
and $290,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely to fund the provisions of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No.
2046 (foster parent liaison). The department shall establish a foster parent
liaison in each department of social and health services region of the state
and contract with a private provider to implement a recruitment and retention
program for foster parents and adoptive families. The department shall provide
a minimum of two hundred additional adoptive and foster home placements by June
30, 1998. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amounts in this
subsection shall lapse.

(7)
$433,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund‑-state appropriation,
$395,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state appropriation, and
$894,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely
to increase the rate paid to private child-placing agencies.

(8)
$580,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $580,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for development and expansion of child care training
requirements and optional training programs. The department shall adopt rules
to require annual training in early childhood development of all directors,
supervisors, and lead staff at child care facilities. Directors, supervisors,
and lead staff at child care facilities include persons licensed as family
child care providers, and persons employed at child care centers or school age
child care centers. The department shall establish a program to fund
scholarships and grants to assist persons in meeting these training
requirements. The department shall also develop criteria for approving
training programs and establish a system for tracking who has received the
required level of training. In adopting rules, developing curricula, setting
up systems, and administering scholarship programs, the department shall
consult with the child care coordinating committee and other community
stakeholders.

(9)
The department shall provide a report to the legislature by November 1997 on
the growth in additional rates paid to foster parents beyond the basic monthly
rate. This report shall explain why exceptional, personal, and special rates
are being paid for an increasing number of children and why the amount paid for
these rates per child has risen in recent years. This report must also
recommend methods by which the legislature may improve the current foster
parent compensation system, allow for some method of controlling the growth in
costs per case, and improve the department's and the legislature's ability to
forecast the program's needs in future years.

(10)
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for legal costs associated with the defense of vendors
operating a secure treatment facility, for actions arising from the good faith
performance of treatment services for behavioral difficulties or needs.

(11)
$2,745,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund‑-state appropriation,
$2,745,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state appropriation, and
$1,944,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely
for the category of services titled "intensive family preservation
services."

(12)
$1,642,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund‑-state appropriation and
$1,207,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state appropriation and
$1,551,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely
to continue existing continuum of care and street youth projects.

(13)
$1,456,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998,
$1,474,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
and $1,141,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for the improvement of quality and capacity of the child care system and
related consumer education. The activities funded by this appropriation shall
include, but not be limited to: Expansion of child care resource and referral
network services to serve additional families, to provide technical assistance
to child care providers, and to cover currently unserved areas of the state;
development of and incentives for child care during nonstandard work hours; and
the development of care for infants, toddlers, preschoolers, and school age
youth. These amounts are provided in addition to funding for child care
training and fire inspections of child care facilities. These activities shall
also improve the quality and capacity of the child care system.

(14)(a)
$6,565,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $7,454,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for distribution to county juvenile court
administrators to fund the costs of processing truancy, children in need of
services, and at-risk youth petitions. The department shall not retain any
portion of these funds to cover administrative or any other departmental
costs. The department, in conjunction with the juvenile court administrators,
shall develop an equitable funding distribution formula. The formula shall
neither reward counties with higher than average per petition processing costs
nor shall it penalize counties with lower than average per petition processing
costs.

(b)
Each quarter during the 1997-1999 fiscal biennium, each county shall report the
number of petitions processed and the total costs of processing the petitions
in each of the following categories: Truancy, children in need of services,
and at-risk youth. Counties shall submit the reports to the department no
later than 45 days after the end of the quarter. The department shall forward
this information to the chair and ranking minority member of the house
appropriations committee and the senate ways and means committee no later than
60 days after a quarter ends. These reports are deemed informational in nature
and are not for the purpose of distributing funds.

(15)
$70,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for foster parent intervention support teams.

(16)
$255,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
and $67,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2556 (child abuse
prevention and treatment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(17)
The department and the attorney general shall jointly make recommendations to
the legislature to reduce or limit the state's liability for damages in child
welfare cases, including shelter care and dependency proceedings. The
recommendations shall be submitted to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 1998.

(18)
To the extent funds are available, the department shall pay the expense of
fingerprint criminal history record checks for low-income family day care homes
through the federal bureau of investigation. The department may promulgate
rules to set eligibility levels.

(19)
Sufficient funding is provided in this section to implement Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6238 (dependent children).

Sec.
203. 1998
c 346 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-JUVENILE
REHABILITATION PROGRAM

(1)
COMMUNITY SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 35,894,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((35,522,000))

34,366,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((13,365,000))

8,701,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 378,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 14,080,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((99,239,000))

93,419,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
$527,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation
is provided solely for deposit in the county criminal justice assistance
account solely for costs to the criminal justice system associated with the
implementation of Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 3900 (revising the
juvenile code). If Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 3900 is not
enacted by June 30, 1997, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
The amount provided in this subsection is intended to provide funding for
county adult court costs associated with the implementation of Engrossed Third
Substitute House Bill No. 3900 and shall be distributed in accordance with RCW
82.14.310.

(b)
$2,917,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account is provided
solely for the implementation of Engrossed Third Substitute Senate Bill No.
3900 (revising the juvenile code). The amount provided in this subsection is
intended to provide funding for county impacts associated with the
implementation of Third Substitute Senate Bill No. 3900 and shall be
distributed to counties as prescribed in the current consolidated juvenile
services (CJS) formula. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the
amounts provided shall lapse.

(c)
$2,350,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$2,350,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely for an early intervention program to be administered at the
county level. Moneys shall be awarded on a competitive basis to counties that
have submitted plans for implementation of an early intervention program
consistent with proven methodologies currently in place in the state. The
juvenile rehabilitation administration shall develop criteria for evaluation of
plans submitted and a timeline for awarding funding and shall assist counties
in creating and submitting plans for evaluation.

(d)
$1,221,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement appropriation is
provided solely to implement alcohol and substance abuse treatment for locally
committed offenders. The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall award
these moneys on a competitive basis to counties that have submitted a plan for
the provision of treatment services approved by the division of alcohol and
substance abuse. The juvenile rehabilitation administration shall develop
criteria for evaluation of plans submitted and a timeline for awarding funding
and shall assist counties in creating and submitting plans for evaluation. If
Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 3900 (juvenile code revisions) is not
enacted by June 30, 1997, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(e)
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely for the juvenile rehabilitation administration to contract with
the institute for public policy for the responsibilities assigned in Engrossed
Third Substitute House Bill No. 3900 (juvenile code revisions). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(f)
$400,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation
is provided solely for the development of standards measuring the effectiveness
of chemical dependency treatment and for conducting evaluations of chemical
dependency programs pursuant to Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 3900
(revising the juvenile code). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. The juvenile rehabilitation
administration shall consult with the division of alcohol and substance abuse
and contract with the University of Washington to develop the standards and
conduct the evaluations.

(g)
$150,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$150,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely for a contract to expand the services of the teamchild project
to additional sites. Priority use of these funds shall be to provide teamchild
service to early repeat offenders to help ensure they receive appropriate child
welfare and educational services.

(h)
$2,700,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation
is provided solely to implement community juvenile accountability grants
pursuant to chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile justice). Funds provided in
this subsection may be used solely for community juvenile accountability
grants, administration of the grants, and evaluations of programs funded by the
grants.

(i)
(($2,175,000)) $1,185,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is provided solely for the implementation of
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6445 (child community facility placement).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse. The funds are intended to improve the security of state-operated
and privately contracted group homes. By June 30, 1999, the juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall report to the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the legislature on the specific actions, and the cost of each
action, taken to improve security at both state-operated and contracted group
homes.

(j)
$150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely for the Skagit county delinquency prevention project.

(2)
INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 43,909,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((45,977,000))

42,912,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 727,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 15,281,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((105,894,000))

102,829,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
$3,680,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Third Substitute House
Bill No. 3900 (juvenile code revisions). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 1997, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(b)
$105,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $377,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for costs associated with implementing chapter 386,
Laws of 1997 (juvenile care and treatment).

(c)
$44,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1172 (sex offender registration).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(3)
PROGRAM SUPPORT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 1,930,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ 1,654,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $ 156,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 421,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 4,161,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
$92,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$36,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5759 (risk
classification). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amounts
provided shall lapse.

(b)
$206,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5710 (juvenile care and treatment). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 1997, the amount provided shall lapse.

(c)
$97,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$36,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill
No. 3900 (juvenile code revisions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
1997, the amounts provided shall lapse.

(d)
Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the juvenile rehabilitation
administration (JRA) shall develop by January 1, 1998, a staffing model for
noncustody functions at JRA institutions and work camps. The models should,
whenever possible, reflect the most efficient practices currently being used
within the system.

(e)
$15,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$175,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
are provided solely for the study required in Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
6445 (child community facility placement). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 1998, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration (JRA) shall contract with the institute for
public policy for the studies required by the bill.

Sec.
204. 1998
c 346 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-MENTAL
HEALTH PROGRAM

(1)
COMMUNITY SERVICES/REGIONAL SUPPORT NETWORKS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 170,940,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((173,645,000))

168,663,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((299,651,000))

287,989,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 4,000,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((648,236,000))

631,592,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
Regional support networks shall use portions of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for implementation of working agreements with the vocational
rehabilitation program which will maximize the use of federal funding for
vocational programs.

(b)
From the general fund‑-state appropriations in this subsection, the
secretary of social and health services shall assure that regional support
networks reimburse the aging and adult services program for the general fund‑-state
cost of medicaid personal care services that enrolled regional support network
consumers use because of their psychiatric disability.

(c)
$1,304,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998,
$3,356,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999,
and $5,056,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely
for distribution to those regional support networks whose 1997-99 allocation
would otherwise be less than the regional support network would receive if all
funding appropriated in this subsection (1) of this section for medicaid
outpatient mental health services were distributed among all regional support
networks at the state-wide average per capita rate for each eligibility
category.

(d)
At least thirty days prior to entering contracts that would capitate payments
for voluntary psychiatric hospitalizations, the mental health division shall
report the proposed capitation rates, and the assumptions and calculations by
which they were established, to the budget and forecasting divisions of the
office of financial management, the appropriations committee of the house of
representatives, and the ways and means committee of the senate.

(e)
$533,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
and $587,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for the implementation of the Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6214
(mentally ill commitment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2)
INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 62,368,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((60,698,000))

61,605,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((133,504,000))

136,682,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ ((25,007,000))

26,692,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((281,577,000))

287,347,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
The state mental hospitals may use funds appropriated in this subsection to
purchase goods and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations
when it is cost-effective to do so.

(b)
The mental health program at Western state hospital shall continue to use labor
provided by the Tacoma prerelease program of the department of corrections.

(c)
$246,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$318,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely for funding outside medical costs. The mental health division
shall provide a report on outside medical costs to the fiscal committees of the
legislature by September 30, 1998, and September 30, 1999. The report shall
detail the monthly and per capita expenditures for outside medical costs at
each state hospital.

(d)
$256,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$254,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely for funding pharmacy and new drug costs. The mental health
division shall provide a report on pharmacy and new drug costs to the fiscal
committees of the legislature by September 30, 1998, and September 30, 1999.
The report shall detail monthly and per capita expenditures for pharmacy and
new drug costs for each state hospital. Expenditures for each new generation
atypical antipsychotic medication including clozapine, resperidone, olanzapine,
and any newly introduced medications of this nature shall be specifically
reported.

(e)
$1,700,000 of the general fund‑‑state fiscal year 1998
appropriation is provided solely for replacing lost federal revenues in fiscal
year 1998 due to a changed definition of discharge for medicare reimbursement
purposes. The mental health division must aggressively pursue the prompt
resolution of issues resulting in this loss of revenues with the federal health
care financing administration. In the event any or all of the lost federal
revenues are restored, an equal amount of the general fund‑‑state
fiscal year 1998 appropriation shall lapse.

(f)
Within the funds provided in this section, the mental health division shall
develop by October 1, 1998, a staffing model for direct and indirect functions
for the wards at each of the state hospitals. The model should, whenever
possible, reflect the most efficient practices for providing treatment and
therapeutic services appropriate to the characteristics and needs of the
individual patient.

(g)
$1,508,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999,
$92,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation, and $107,000 of the
general fund private/local appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of the Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6214 (mentally ill
commitment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the amounts provided
in this subsection shall lapse.

(3)
CIVIL COMMITMENT

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 7,174,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((7,779,000))

8,079,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((14,953,000))

15,253,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: (((a))) $2,088,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal
year 1998 appropriation and $2,415,000 of the general fund-‑state fiscal
year 1999 appropriation are provided solely for court-related costs for
residents at the special commitment center.

(4)
SPECIAL PROJECTS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 50,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((450,000))

5,233,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 3,826,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((4,326,000))

9,109,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$450,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
are provided solely for development and operation of the pilot project for
mentally ill offenders described in Substitute Senate Bill No. 6002 (mentally
ill offenders). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amounts
provided shall lapse.

(b)
$4,783,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for payment of back wages and benefits as required by the
judgment in Johanson and the Washington Federation of State Employees v.
State of Washington (Thurston county superior court cause no.
94-2-01459-2).

(5)
PROGRAM SUPPORT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 2,537,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ 2,569,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 3,085,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 8,191,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
$60,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 is
provided solely to increase the department's capacity to carry out legislative
intent set forth in RCW 71.24.400 through 71.24.415. To facilitate this
activity, the secretary shall appoint an oversight committee of project
stakeholders including representatives from: Service providers, mental health
regional support networks, the department's mental health division, the
department's division of alcohol and substance abuse, the department's division
of children and family services, and the department's medical assistance
administration. The oversight group shall continue to seek ways to streamline
service delivery as set forth in RCW 71.24.405 until at least July 1, 1998.

(b)
$96,000 of the general fund-‑state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
6214 (mentally ill commitment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(c)
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely for the evaluation required by Second Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6214 (mentally ill commitment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. The mental health
division shall contract with the institute for public policy for this
evaluation.

Sec.
205. 1998
c 346 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES PROGRAM

Notwithstanding
any other limitations in this section, the secretary shall transfer $1,140,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation, and $1,060,000 of the general
fund‑-federal appropriation, or so much thereof as may be necessary,
among subsections of this section to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6751 (developmental disabilities service options).

(1)
COMMUNITY SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 147,757,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((166,773,000))

168,604,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((226,737,000))

227,012,000

Health
Services Account Appropriation.......... $ ((639,000))

226,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((541,906,000))

543,599,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
The health services account appropriation and (($692,000)) $243,000
of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for the
enrollment in the basic health plan of home care workers with family incomes
below 200 percent of the federal poverty level who are employed through state
contracts. Enrollment in the basic health plan for home care workers with
family incomes at or above 200 percent of poverty shall be covered with general
fund‑-state and matching general fund‑-federal revenues that were
identified by the department to have been previously appropriated for health
benefits coverage, to the extent that these funds had not been contractually
obligated for worker wage increases prior to March 1, 1996.

(b)
$365,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $1,543,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for employment, or other day activities and training
programs, for young people who complete their high school curriculum in 1997 or
1998.

(c)
(($24,399,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1998 and $28,729,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1999 are provided solely to deliver personal care services. Within these
amounts, sufficient funding is provided to restore funding for medicaid
personal care exceptional rates to the fiscal year 1997 level. If the
secretary of social and health services determines that total expenditures are
likely to exceed these appropriated amounts, the secretary shall take action as
required by RCW 74.09.520 to adjust either functional eligibility standards or
service levels or both sufficiently to maintain expenditures within
appropriated levels. Such action may include the adoption of emergency rules
and may not be taken to the extent that projected over-expenditures are offset
by under-expenditures elsewhere within the program's general fund‑-state
appropriation. Prior to making eligibility changes which would terminate all
services to some persons, the secretary should first exercise all opportunities
to manage the average cost per person served, through methods such as promoting
the use of informal care; assuring that local offices are effectively and
consistently authorizing the least expensive level of care which can meet
recipient needs; and reducing on a sliding-scale basis the amount of service
authorized per functional need level, with smaller reductions for greater
levels of need.

(d)))
$144,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998,
$453,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999,
and $654,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely to continue operation of the united cerebral palsy residential center
during the period in which its residents are phasing into new community
residences.

(((e)))
(d) $197,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1998 and $197,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 1999 are provided solely to contract with the Washington initiative
for supported employment for the purpose of continuing the promotion of
supported employment services for persons with disabilities.

(((g)))
(e) $2,151,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1998, $5,782,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1999, and $8,362,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are
provided solely to develop and operate secure residential and day program
placements for persons who seem likely to present a significant risk to the
public safety if their current residential arrangement were to continue.

(((h)
$426,000)) (f) $860,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 1999 and (($469,000)) $927,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely to develop
and operate community services for persons residing at, or at risk of
commitment to, eastern and western state hospitals whose needs are such
that they cannot be served in existing community vacancies.

(((i)))
(g) $200,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1998 and $1,592,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for employment and day program services
for adults who are not currently able to participate in such services because
of funding limitations.

(((j)))
(h) $105,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1998, $933,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1999, and $1,029,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are
provided solely to develop and operate community services for persons moving
from the residential habilitation centers as a result of an agreement with the
federal department of justice or a settlement agreement to a lawsuit.

(2)
INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 65,277,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((64,187,000))

62,843,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((145,897,000))

145,949,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ ((9,729,000))

9,979,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((285,090,000))

284,048,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
With the funds appropriated in this subsection, the secretary of social and
health services shall develop an eight-bed program at Yakima valley school
specifically for the purpose of providing respite services to all eligible
individuals on a state-wide basis, with an emphasis on those residing in
central Washington.

(b)
$112,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998,
$113,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999,
and $75,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for a nursing community outreach project at Yakima valley school.
Registered nursing staff are to provide nursing assessments, consulting
services, training, and quality assurance on behalf of individuals residing in
central Washington.

(c)
$200,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998,
$200,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999,
and $400,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for the development of a sixteen-bed program at Yakima valley school
specifically for the purpose of providing respite services to all eligible
individuals on a state-wide basis, with an emphasis on those residing in
central Washington.

(3)
PROGRAM SUPPORT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 2,530,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ 2,501,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 1,637,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 6,668,000

(4)
SPECIAL PROJECTS

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 12,030,000

Sec. 206. 1998
c 346 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-AGING
AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 409,469,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((425,130,000))

420,905,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((910,685,000))

899,950,000

General
Fund‑-Local Appropriation.............. $ ((1,781,000))

1,757,000

Health
Services Account Appropriation.......... $ ((2,232,000))

1,940,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((1,749,297,000))

1,734,021,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The entire health services account appropriation ((and $2,175,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation are)) is provided solely
for the enrollment in the basic health plan of home care workers with family
incomes below 200 percent of the federal poverty level who are employed through
state contracts. Enrollment in the basic health plan for home care workers
with family incomes at or above 200 percent of poverty shall be covered with
general fund‑-state and matching general fund‑-federal revenues that
were identified by the department to have been previously appropriated for
health benefits coverage, to the extent that these funds had not been
contractually obligated for worker wage increases prior to March 1, 1996.

(2)
$1,277,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $1,277,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for operation of the volunteer chore program.

(3)
(($113,534,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1998, $125,310,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 1999, of which no less than forty-nine percent shall be allotted
for expenditure during the first six months of fiscal year 1999, and $7,374,000
of the general fund‑-federal social services block grant appropriation,
are provided solely to deliver chore, COPES, and medicaid personal care
services. If the secretary of social and health services determines that total
expenditures are likely to exceed these amounts, the secretary shall take
action as required by RCW 74.09.520, 74.39A.120, and 74.09.530 to adjust
functional eligibility standards and/or service levels sufficiently to maintain
expenditures within appropriated levels. Such action may include the adoption
of emergency rules, and shall not be taken to the extent that projected
over-expenditures are offset by under-expenditures resulting from lower than
budgeted nursing home caseloads. Prior to making eligibility changes which
would terminate all services to some persons, the secretary should first
exercise all opportunities to manage the average cost per person served,
through methods such as promoting the use of informal care; assuring that local
offices are effectively and consistently authorizing the least expensive level
of care that can meet recipient needs; using waiting lists for individuals with
lower levels of need in order to limit monthly growth; and reducing on a
sliding-scale basis the amount of service authorized per functional need level,
with smaller reductions for greater levels of need.

(4)
$1,080,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
is provided to maintain service eligibility for persons receiving services
through the chore, COPES, or medicaid personal care programs in the event
eligibility adjustments may be necessary or are made in accordance with
subsection (3) of this section. The department may use seventy-five percent of
amounts not needed for that purpose to implement quality of care enhancements.

(5)))
$26,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998,
$59,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999,
and $85,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely to employ registered nurses rather than social workers to fill six of
the new field positions to be filled in fiscal year 1998 and seven more of the
new positions to be filled in fiscal year 1999. These registered nurses shall
conduct assessments, develop and monitor service plans, and consult with social
work staff to assure that persons with medical needs are placed in and receive
the appropriate level of care.

(((6)))
(4) $425,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1998 and $882,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 1999 are provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5179 (nursing facility reimbursement). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 1997, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((7)))
(5) $242,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1998, $212,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1999, and $498,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are
provided solely for operation of a system for investigating allegations of
staff abuse and neglect in nursing homes, as provided in Second Substitute
House Bill No. 1850 (long-term care standards of care).

(((8)))
(6) For purposes of implementing ((Second Substitute House Bill No.
2935)) chapter 322, Laws of 1998 (nursing ((facility)) home
payment rates), the weighted average nursing facility payment rate for fiscal
year 1999 shall be no more than (($117.36)) $116.60, excluding
nurse's aide training. Each nursing facility's July 1 through September 30,
1998, medicaid payment rate shall be its June 30, 1998, rate increased by 2.0
percent, except for the property and return on investment component rates,
which shall not be increased. Beginning October 1, 1998, component rates
rebased on 1996 costs shall be adjusted for economic trends and conditions by
5.18 percent.

(((9)))
(7) $50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1998 and $50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1999 are provided solely for payments to any nursing facility licensed
under chapter 18.51 RCW which meets all of the following criteria: (a) The
nursing home entered into an arm's length agreement for a facility lease prior
to January 1, 1980; (b) the lessee purchased the leased nursing home after
January 1, 1980; and (c) the lessor defaulted on its loan or mortgage for the
assets of the home after January 1, 1991, and prior to January 1, 1992.
Payments provided pursuant to this subsection shall not be subject to the
settlement, audit, or rate-setting requirements contained in chapter 74.46 RCW.

(((10)))
(8) $506,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1998, $502,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1999, and $1,095,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are
provided solely for an increase in the state payment rates for adult
residential care and enhanced adult residential care.

(((11)
$274,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998,
$1,357,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999,
and the entire general fund‑-local appropriation are provided solely for
boarding home licensure and quality assurance by the department of social and
health services only if Engrossed House Bill No. 2410 (boarding home
administration) is enacted by June 30, 1998. If the bill is not enacted, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall be allocated to the department of
health, which will manage the boarding home licensure and quality assurance
program.))

Sec.
207. 1998
c 346 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-ECONOMIC
SERVICES PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 508,243,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((512,200,000))

509,754,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((951,615,000))

881,335,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((1,972,058,000))

1,899,332,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The legislature finds that, with the passage of the federal personal
responsibility and work opportunity act and Engrossed House Bill No. 3901, the
temporary assistance for needy families is no longer an entitlement. The
legislature declares that the currently appropriated level for the program is
sufficient for the next few budget cycles. ((To the extent, however, that
currently appropriated amounts exceed costs during the 1997-99 biennium, the
department is encouraged to set aside excess federal funds for use in future
years.))

(2)
$485,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation,
$3,186,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation, and
$3,168,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely
to continue to implement the previously competitively procured electronic
benefits transfer system through the western states EBT alliance for
distribution of cash grants and food stamps so as to meet the requirements of
P.L. 104-193.

(3)
$50,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for a study of child care affordability as directed in section
403 of Engrossed House Bill No. 3901 (implementing welfare reform). The study
shall be performed by the Washington institute for public policy. If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(4)
$500,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund‑-state appropriation and
$500,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state appropriation are
provided solely for an evaluation of the WorkFirst program as directed in
section 705 of Engrossed House Bill No. 3901 (implementing welfare reform).
The study shall be performed by the joint legislative audit and review
committee. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

(5)
$73,129,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided ((solely))
for child care assistance for low-income families in the WorkFirst program and
for low-income working families as authorized in Engrossed House Bill No. 3901
(implementing welfare reform). All child care assistance provided shall be
subject to a monthly copay to be paid by the family receiving the assistance.

(6)
$7,624,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund‑-state appropriation, (($18,489,000))
$11,730,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state
appropriation, and $29,781,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation
are provided solely for implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 3901
(implementing welfare reform), including sections 404 and 405. If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse. The level of benefits in the food program for legal immigrants
authorized in the bill shall be equivalent to benefits provided by the federal
food stamp program.

(7)
$56,461,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund‑-state appropriation and
(($59,393,000)) $51,673,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state
appropriation are provided ((solely)) for cash assistance to recipients
in the general assistance‑-unemployable program. The department shall
take any and all actions necessary to maintain expenditures within these
amounts.

(8)
$55,995,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund‑-state appropriation, (($55,995,000))
$44,146,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state
appropriation, and (($184,510,000)) $121,821,000 of the general
fund‑-federal appropriation are provided ((solely)) to administer
a low-income child care program as authorized in Engrossed House Bill No. 3901
(implementing welfare reform). ((The child care program funds shall be
allotted as follows:

(a)
Each six-month period shall have $27,997,500 general fund‑-state and
$46,127,500 general fund‑-federal funds allotted to be spent during that
six-month period for low-income child care assistance.

(b)
The department may spend up to the allotted amount for child care assistance
during each six-month period. Any funds not spent during the six-month period
may be held over and allotted in the next six-month period, subject to the
provisions of subsection (5) of this section.

(c)
Federal funds allotted for child care but not spent in fiscal year 1998 may be
transferred to fiscal year 1999 for allotment but state funds must be spent in
the year appropriated.

(10))) (9)
Within the amounts provided in this section, the department shall implement the
study requirements of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2900 (pro rata
calculation of temporary assistance for needy families grants).

Sec.
208. 1998
c 346 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-ALCOHOL
AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 15,459,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((15,330,000))

16,781,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((81,112,000))

81,132,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 630,000

Public
Safety and Education Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,210,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account

Appropriation.......................... ... $ 74,889,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((190,630,000))

192,101,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$2,062,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation and $7,482,000 of
the violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation are provided
solely for the grant programs for school districts and educational service
districts set forth in RCW 28A.170.080 through 28A.170.100, including state
support activities, as administered through the office of the superintendent of
public instruction.

(2)
$1,902,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation,
$1,902,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation, and
$1,592,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely
for alcohol and substance abuse assessment, treatment, including treatment for
drug affected infants and toddlers, and child care services for clients of the
division of children and family services. Assessment shall be provided by
approved chemical dependency treatment programs as requested by child
protective services personnel in the division of children and family services.
Child care shall be provided as deemed necessary by the division of children
and family services while parents requiring alcohol and substance abuse
treatment are attending treatment programs.

(3)
$760,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund‑-state appropriation and
$760,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state appropriation are
provided solely to fund a program serving mothers of children affected by fetal
alcohol syndrome and related conditions, known as the birth-to-three program.
The program may be operated in two cities in the state.

(4)
$3,210,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for the continuation of treatment alternatives to street crimes (TASC)
programs in Pierce, Snohomish, Clark, King, Spokane, and Yakima counties.

Sec.
209. 1998
c 346 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-MEDICAL
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ ((666,815,000))

671,815,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((681,372,000))

680,857,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((2,086,149,000))

2,115,962,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ ((306,601,000))

307,708,000

Health
Services Account Appropriation.......... $ 254,506,000

Emergency
Medical and Trauma Care Services

Account
Appropriation...................... $ 4,600,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((4,000,043,000))

4,035,448,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The department shall continue to make use of the special eligibility category
created for children through age 18 and in households with incomes below 200
percent of the federal poverty level made eligible for medicaid as of July 1,
1994.

(2)
It is the intent of the legislature that Harborview medical center continue to
be an economically viable component of the health care system and that the
state's financial interest in Harborview medical center be recognized.

(3)
Funding is provided in this section for the adult dental program for Title XIX
categorically eligible and medically needy persons and to provide foot care
services by podiatric physicians and surgeons.

(4)
$1,622,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $1,622,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided for treatment of low-income kidney dialysis patients.

(5)
$80,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998,
$80,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999,
and $160,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for the prenatal triage clearinghouse to provide access and outreach to
reduce infant mortality.

(6)
((The department shall employ the managed care contracting and negotiation
strategies defined in Substitute Senate Bill No. 5125 to assure that the
average per-recipient cost of managed care services for temporary assistance to
needy families and expansion populations increases by no more than two percent
per year in calendar years 1998 and 1999.

(7))) The
department shall seek federal approval to require adult medicaid recipients who
are not elderly or disabled to contribute ten dollars per month toward the cost
of their medical assistance coverage. The department shall report on the
progress of this effort to the house of representatives and senate health care
and fiscal committees by September 1 and November 15, 1997.

(((8)))
(7) $325,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1998 and $325,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 1999 are provided solely to increase rates paid for air ambulance
services.

(((9)
$1,468,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
is to be expended solely to the extent necessary because the federal government
has not approved the department's request to require certain recipients to pay
ten dollars per month toward the cost of their medical assistance.

(10))) (8)
By November 1, 1998, the department shall report to the health care and fiscal
committees of the legislature on the estimated average monthly number of
nongrant medical assistance recipients who do not meet the earned income
eligibility standards that were in effect prior to November 1997.

Sec.
210. 1998
c 346 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-VOCATIONAL
REHABILITATION PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 9,046,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((8,603,000))

8,903,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((79,080,000))

78,577,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 2,904,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((99,633,000))

99,430,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The division of vocational rehabilitation shall negotiate cooperative
interagency agreements with local organizations, including higher education
institutions, mental health regional support networks, and county developmental
disabilities programs to improve and expand employment opportunities for people
with severe disabilities served by those local agencies.

(2)
$363,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998,
$506,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999,
and $3,208,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for vocational rehabilitation services for individuals enrolled for
services with the developmental disabilities program who complete their high
school curriculum in 1997 or 1998.

Sec.
211. 1998
c 346 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-ADMINISTRATION
AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 25,818,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((25,744,000))

25,325,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((43,037,000))

43,087,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 270,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((94,869,000))

94,500,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The department may transfer up to $1,289,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 1998, $1,757,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 1999, and $2,813,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation to the administration and supporting services program from
various other programs to implement administrative reductions.

(2)
The secretary of social and health services and the director of labor and
industries shall report to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature by July 1, 1997, and every six months thereafter on the measurable
changes in employee injury and time-loss rates that have occurred in the state
developmental disabilities, juvenile rehabilitation, and mental health
institutions as a result of the upfront loss-control discount agreement between
the agencies.

(3)
$60,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 is
provided solely for a welfare fraud pilot program as described by House Bill
No. 1822 (welfare fraud investigation).

(4)
$55,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund‑-state appropriation,
$64,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state appropriation, and
$231,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely
for implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 3901 (implementing welfare
reform). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

(((6)))
(5) The department shall report on the allowance for clothing, personal
maintenance, and necessary incidentals provided to persons who receive services
funded by state and federal moneys under Title XIX of the social security act.
The report shall discuss the range of allowances granted for different
populations and programs and compare the allowances to those provided to
similar populations in other western states. The report shall also evaluate
the need for a uniform amount provided to all populations and, if a uniform
allowance is provided, at what level that allowance should be set. In compiling
the report, the department shall consult with affected parties and divisions.
The report shall be submitted by December 1, 1998, to the chairs and the
ranking minority members of the appropriate committees of the legislature.

Sec.
212. 1998
c 346 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-CHILD
SUPPORT PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 21,344,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((20,965,000))

22,909,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((145,321,000))

150,869,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ ((32,673,000))

30,802,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((220,303,000))

225,924,000

The
appropriations provided in this section are subject to the following conditions
and limitations:

(1)
The department shall contract with private collection agencies to pursue
collection of AFDC child support arrearages in cases that might otherwise
consume a disproportionate share of the department's collection efforts. The
department's child support collection staff shall determine which cases are
appropriate for referral to private collection agencies. In determining
appropriate contract provisions, the department shall consult with other states
that have successfully contracted with private collection agencies to the
extent allowed by federal support enforcement regulations.

(2)
The amounts appropriated in this section for child support legal services shall
be expended only by means of contracts with local prosecutor's offices.

(3)
$305,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation,
$494,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation, and
$1,408,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely
to implement Engrossed House Bill No. 3901 (implementing welfare reform). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

Sec.
213. 1998
c 346 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-PAYMENTS
TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 25,292,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((24,792,000))

24,480,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((18,966,000))

20,278,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION.............. ... $ ((69,050,000))

70,050,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$263,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund‑-state appropriation,
$349,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state appropriation, and
$1,186,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely
for implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 3901 (implementing welfare
reform). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

(2)
$113,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state appropriation and
$31,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely
for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2556 (child abuse
prevention and treatment). If this bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec.
214. 1998
c 346 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 6,316,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ 6,317,000

State
Health Care Authority Administration

Account
Appropriation...................... $ ((14,969,000))

14,965,000

Health
Services Account Appropriation.......... $ ((341,800,000))

333,535,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((369,402,000))

361,133,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The general fund‑-state appropriations are provided solely for health
care services provided through local community clinics.

(2)
Within funds appropriated in this section and sections 205 and 206 of chapter
149, Laws of 1997, the health care authority shall continue to provide an
enhanced basic health plan subsidy option for foster parents licensed under
chapter 74.15 RCW and workers in state-funded homecare programs. Under this
enhanced subsidy option, foster parents and homecare workers with family
incomes below 200 percent of the federal poverty level shall be allowed to
enroll in the basic health plan at a cost of ten dollars per covered worker per
month.

(3)(a)
Effective October 1997, the health care authority shall require organizations
and individuals that are paid to deliver basic health plan services to
contribute a minimum of thirty dollars per enrollee per month if the
organization or individual chooses to sponsor an individual's enrollment in the
subsidized basic health plan.

(b)
Effective July 1998, the health care authority shall require organizations and
individuals which are paid to deliver basic health plan services and which
choose to sponsor enrollment in the subsidized basic health plan to pay the
following: (i) A minimum of fifteen dollars per enrollee per month for persons
below 100 percent of the federal poverty level; and (ii) a minimum of twenty
dollars per enrollee per month for persons whose family income is 100 percent
to 200 percent of the federal poverty level.

(4)
(($150,000 of the health services account appropriation is provided solely
to implement health care savings accounts. If legislation requiring a pilot
project of such accounts is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amount provided
in this subsection shall lapse.

(5)))
$270,000 of the health services account appropriation is provided solely to pay
commissions to agents and brokers in accordance with RCW 70.47.015(5) for
application assistance provided to persons on the reservation list as of June
30, 1997, who enroll in the subsidized basic health plan on or after July 1,
1997.

(((6)))
(5) $250,000 of the state health care authority administrative account
appropriation is provided solely to process claims arising from the settlement
in Retired State Employees v. State of Washington (Thurston county
superior court cause no. 92-2-01294-1).

(((7)))
(6) The health care authority administrator is directed to pay claims
resulting from a court-approved stipulated settlement in Retired State
Employees et al. v. State of Washington (Thurston county superior court
cause no. 92-2-01294-1) using funds in the public employees' and retirees'
insurance account. The legislature recognizes that payment of these claims may
reduce premium stabilization reserves below target levels on an interim basis.
It is the legislature's intent that the viability of health care
authority-administered programs be preserved and that the benefit levels for
health care authority-administered programs not be reduced in the event premium
stabilization reserves are used to pay such claims.

(((8)))
(7) $330,000 of the health services account appropriation is provided
solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 3109 (basic health plan enrollee
income verification). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec.
215. 1998
c 346 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 6,805,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((7,069,000))

7,013,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((16,082,000))

15,333,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-

Federal
Appropriation.............. ........ $ ((6,002,000))

5,937,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-

Private/Local
Appropriation................ $ ((2,178,000))

2,987,000

Electrical
License Account Appropriation........ $...................................... ((22,542,000))

22,506,000

Farm
Labor Revolving Account Appropriation..... $ 28,000

Worker
and Community Right-to-Know Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,187,000

Public
Works Administration Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,975,000

Accident
Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ ((151,634,000))

151,867,000

Accident
Account‑-Federal Appropriation ........ $ 9,112,000

Medical
Aid Account‑-State Appropriation........ $...................................... ((154,142,000))

154,502,000

Medical
Aid Account‑-Federal Appropriation..... $ 1,592,000

Plumbing
Certificate Account Appropriation..... $ 947,000

Pressure
Systems Safety Account Appropriation... $........................................... 2,106,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((384,401,000))

384,897,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Expenditures of funds appropriated in this section for the information systems
projects identified in agency budget requests as "claims service
delivery", "electrical permitting and inspection system", and
"credentialing information system" are conditioned upon compliance
with section 902 of this act.

(2)
Pursuant to RCW 7.68.015, the department shall operate the crime victims
compensation program within the public safety and education account funds
appropriated in this section. In the event that cost containment measures are
necessary, the department may (a) institute copayments for services; (b)
develop preferred provider and managed care contracts; (c) coordinate with the
department of social and health services to use the public safety and education
account as matching funds for federal Title XIX reimbursement, to the extent
this maximizes total funds available for services to crime victims.

(3)
$54,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $54,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for an
interagency agreement to reimburse the board of industrial insurance appeals
for crime victims appeals.

(4)
The secretary of social and health services and the director of labor and
industries shall report to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the
legislature by July 1, 1997, and every six months thereafter on the measurable
changes in employee injury and time-loss rates that have occurred in the state
developmental disabilities, juvenile rehabilitation, and mental health
institutions as a result of the upfront loss-control discount agreement between
the agencies.

(5)
The expenditures of the elevator, factory assembled structures, and
contractors' registration and compliance programs may not exceed the revenues
generated by these programs.

(6)
$101,000 of the plumbing certificate account appropriation is provided solely
for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5749 (pipe installer). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amount provided shall lapse.

(7)
$56,000 of the medical aid account appropriation and $52,000 of the accident
account appropriation are provided solely for evaluating agency operational
improvements.

(8)
$593,000 of nonappropriated funds from the medical aid account shall be
provided solely for allocation to the joint legislative audit and review
committee for a performance audit and operations review of the state workers'
compensation system pursuant to Substitute Senate Bill No. 6030.

(9)
$170,000 of the accident account‑-state appropriation and $170,000 of the
medical aid account‑-state appropriation are provided solely for payment
to the office of the attorney general for legal services provided in the
1995-97 biennium.

(10)
$686,000 of the accident account appropriation and $686,000 of the medical aid
account appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely to fund 24
claims manager positions in fiscal year 1999 (12 worker compensation
adjudicator 2 and 12 worker compensation adjudicator 3 positions). With these
new positions, the department is expected to reduce time-loss duration in
claims by 5 percent by June 30, 2000, and an additional 2.5 percent by June 30,
2001. The average caseload for level 2 claims managers should also drop to approximately
190 by June 30, 2000. The director of the department shall report to the
appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature and the office of
financial management by June 30, 1998, and every year thereafter, on the
measurable progress made toward attaining these goals. The 1998 report shall
indicate the baseline figures from July 1, 1997. If substantial progress has
not been achieved by June 30, 2000, the 24 claims manager positions and the
funding associated with these positions shall be discontinued.

Sec.
216. 1998
c 346 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

(1)
HEADQUARTERS

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 1,609,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ 1,404,000

Industrial
Insurance Premium Refund Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 80,000

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account Appropriation......... $ 4,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 3,097,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: $200,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998
is provided solely as the state's contribution to the construction of a
memorial on the state capitol grounds to the men and women who served in the
nation's armed forces during the second world war. The department shall raise
the remaining two-thirds of the memorial's cost from individual and corporate
contributions.

(2)
FIELD SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 2,418,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ 2,420,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $ 26,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 85,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 4,949,000

(3)
INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 6,576,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((5,522,000))

5,336,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((18,950,000))

19,166,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ ((14,561,000))

14,799,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((45,609,000))

45,877,000

Sec.
217. 1998
c 346 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF HEALTH

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 63,189,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((73,170,000))

72,465,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((262,504,000))

262,483,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ ((23,578,000))

24,356,000

Hospital
Commission Account Appropriation...... $ 3,089,000

Health
Professions Account Appropriation........ $...................................... ((36,255,000))

35,522,000

Emergency
Medical and Trauma Care Services Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((21,042,000))

5,857,000

Safe
Drinking Water Account Appropriation...... $ 2,494,000

Death
Investigations Account Appropriation..... $ 650,000

Drinking
Water Assistance Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,385,000

Waterworks
Operator Certification Appropriation $ 588,000

Water
Quality Account Appropriation............. $.................................. 3,065,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement

Account
Appropriation...................... $ 469,000

State
Toxics Control Account Appropriation..... $ 2,854,000

Medical
Test Site Licensure Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,624,000

Youth
Tobacco Prevention Account Appropriation. $ 1,812,000

Health
Services Account Appropriation.......... $ 6,115,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((507,883,000))

492,017,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$2,134,000 of the health professions account appropriation is provided solely
for the development and implementation of a licensing and disciplinary
management system. Expenditures are conditioned upon compliance with section
902 of this act. These funds shall not be expended without appropriate project
approval by the department of information systems.

(2)
Funding provided in this section for the drinking water program data management
system shall not be expended without appropriate project approval by the
department of information systems. Expenditures are conditioned upon
compliance with section 902 of this act.

(3)
The department or any successor agency is authorized to raise existing fees
charged to the nursing professions and midwives; chemical dependency
counselors; by the pharmacy board; and for boarding home; hospital; and home
health, home care, and hospice agency licenses, in excess of the fiscal growth
factor established by Initiative Measure No. 601, if necessary, to meet the
actual costs of conducting business and the appropriation levels in this
section.

(4)
$1,526,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$1,741,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound water work plan and
agency action items, DOH-01, DOH-02, DOH-03, DOH-04, DOH-05, DOH-06, DOH-07,
DOH-08, DOH-09, DOH-10, DOH-11, and DOH-12.

(5)
(($10,000,000)) $6,115,000 of the health services account
appropriation is provided solely for distribution to local health departments
for distribution on a per capita basis. Prior to distributing these funds, the
department shall adopt rules and procedures to ensure that these funds are not
used to replace current local support for public health programs.

(6)
$500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for operation of a youth suicide prevention program at
the state level, including a state-wide public educational campaign to increase
knowledge of suicide risk and ability to respond and provision of twenty-four
hour crisis hotlines, staffed to provide suicidal youth and caregivers a source
of instant help.

(7)
The department of health shall not initiate any services that will require
expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this
act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW
43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long
as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the
program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department
receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides
appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state moneys shall
lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of
financial management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used
in this subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block
grants and other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on
specifically defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(8)
$259,000 of the health professions account appropriation is provided solely to
implement Engrossed House Bill No. 3901 (implementing welfare reform). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

(9)
$150,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$150,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely for community‑based oral health grants that may fund
sealant programs, education, prevention, and other oral health interventions.
The grants may be awarded to state or federally funded community and migrant
health centers, tribal clinics, or public health jurisdictions. Priority shall
be given to communities with established oral health coalitions. Grant
applications for oral health education and prevention grants shall include (a)
an assessment of the community's oral health education and prevention needs;
(b) identification of the population to be served; and (c) a description of the
grant program's predicted outcomes.

(10)
(($21,042,000)) $5,857,000 of the emergency medical and trauma
care services account appropriation is provided solely for implementation of
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5127 (trauma care services). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 1997, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(11)
$500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for family support and provider training services for
children with special health care needs.

(12)
$300,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided solely
for an abstinence education program which complies with P.L. 104-193. $400,000
of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided solely for
abstinence education projects at the office of the superintendent of public
instruction and shall be transferred to the office of the superintendent of
public instruction for the 1998-99 school year. The department shall apply for
abstinence education funds made available by the federal personal
responsibility and work opportunity act of 1996 and implement a program that
complies with the requirements of that act.

(13)
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1191
(mandated health benefit review). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997,
the amounts provided in this section shall lapse.

(14)
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for the volunteer retired provider program. Funds
shall be used to increase children's access to dental care services in rural
and underserved communities by paying malpractice insurance and professional
licensing fees for retired dentists participating in the program.

(15)
$852,000 of the drinking water assistance account‑-federal appropriation
is provided solely for an interagency agreement with the department of
community, trade, and economic development to administer, in cooperation with
the public works board, loans to local governments and public water systems for
projects and activities to protect and improve the state's drinking water
facilities and resources.

(16)
$3,347,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund‑-state appropriation and
(($3,347,000)) $2,600,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state
appropriation are provided solely for the AIDS prescription drug program and
HIV intervention program. The department shall operate the program within
total appropriations. The department shall take such actions as are necessary
to control expenditures, including administrative efficiencies such as
reductions to provider reimbursement rates, modifications to financial
eligibility, modifications to the scope of services, and client cost sharing
mechanisms. The department shall identify program policy changes required to
manage within the amounts provided.

(17)
Funding provided in this section is sufficient to implement section 8 of
Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2264 (eliminating the health care policy
board).

(18)
$2,075,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund‑-state appropriation and
$2,075,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state appropriation are
provided solely for the Washington poison center.

(19)
$650,000 of the death investigations account appropriation is provided solely
for the implementation of state-wide child mortality reviews. Local health
jurisdictions shall coordinate child mortality reviews for children from birth
to eighteen years of age, develop local child mortality review protocols, and
serve as the appointing authority and lead agency for local child death review
teams. The department of health shall develop standard aggregate data
elements, collect and analyze local child mortality review data, provide
technical assistance to local child mortality review teams, and approve local
child death review protocols. If House Bill No. 1269 (death investigations
account) is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(20)
$1,125,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund‑-state appropriation and
$1,125,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state appropriation are
provided solely for deposit in the county public health account.

(21)
$60,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$60,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for attorney general services and such other activities not
covered by fee revenues as are necessary for implementation of Engrossed
Substitute House Bill No. 2264 (health care policy). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 1997, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(22)
$250,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund‑-state appropriation
$250,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state appropriation are
provided solely for operation of a naturopathic health clinic constructed in
1996.

(23)
$60,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
6168 (temporary worker housing). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(24)
$250,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided solely to
conduct monitoring for thyroid diseases for eligible people exposed to
radiation from Hanford between 1945 and 1951, and is contingent upon the
execution of an agreement with the state of Oregon that the state of Washington
will function as a subrecipient for the Hanford medical monitoring program
grant. If such an agreement is not executed by September 30, 1998, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(25)
(($730,000 of the health professions account appropriation is provided
solely for the purposes of the impaired physician program. If Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1618 (impaired physician program) or substantially
similar legislation is enacted by June 30, 1998, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(26)))
$1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
is provided solely for the breast and cervical cancer screening program.

(((27)))
(26) Within existing resources, the department shall maintain funding
support for neurodevelopmental centers and in no case shall that support in
fiscal year 1999 be reduced below the total sum awarded by contract to
neurodevelopmental centers in fiscal year 1998.

(((29)))
(27) $300,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of a hepatitis A emergency vaccination program.
This entire amount shall be passed through to county health districts that have
employed a public education effort and have infection rates in excess of 100
per 100,000 population.

Sec.
218. 1998
c 346 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF CORRECTIONS

The
appropriations to the department of corrections in chapter 454, Laws of 1997,
as amended, shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified
therein. However, after April 1, ((1998)) 1999, unless
specifically prohibited by this act, the department may transfer general fund‑-state
appropriations for fiscal year ((1998)) 1999 between the
institutional services and community corrections programs after approval by the
director of the office of financial management. The director of the
office of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal
committees of the senate and house of representatives in writing prior to
approving any deviations from appropriation levels.

(1)
ADMINISTRATION AND PROGRAM SUPPORT

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 13,926,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ 13,910,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 500,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 28,336,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
$187,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $155,000 of the
general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation are provided solely for implementation
of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5759 (risk classification). If the bill is not
enacted by July 1, 1997, the amounts provided shall lapse.

(b)
$500,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation
is provided solely for a feasibility study regarding the replacement of the
department's offender based tracking system. This appropriation is conditioned
on the department satisfying the requirements of section 902, chapter 149, Laws
of 1997.

(2)
INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 289,665,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((303,830,000))

304,972,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((18,097,000))

16,123,000

Industrial
Insurance Premium Rebate Account

Appropriation.......................... ... $ 673,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,614,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((613,879,000))

613,047,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
The department shall provide funding for the pet partnership program at the
Washington corrections center for women at a level at least equal to that
provided in the 1995-97 biennium.

(b)
$3,978,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$5,381,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely for the criminal justice costs associated with the
implementation of Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 3900 (revising the
juvenile code). If Engrossed Third Substitute House Bill No. 3900 is not
enacted by June 30, 1997, the amounts provided shall lapse.

(c)
The department of corrections shall accomplish personnel reductions with the
least possible impact on correctional custody staff, community custody staff,
and correctional industries. For the purposes of this subsection, correctional
custody staff means employees responsible for the direct supervision of
offenders.

(d)
$296,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $297,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely to increase payment rates for contracted education
providers. It is the legislature's intent that these amounts shall be used
primarily to increase compensation for persons employed in direct, front-line
service delivery.

(e)
The department may expend funds generated by contractual agreements entered
into for mitigation of severe overcrowding in local jails. If any funds are
generated in excess of actual costs, they shall be deposited in the state
general fund. Expenditures shall not exceed revenue generated by such
agreements and shall be treated as recovery of costs.

(f)
$70,000 of the general fund‑‑state fiscal year 1999 appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 6139 (amphetamine
crimes). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

(g)
$36,000 of the general fund‑‑state fiscal year 1999 appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 1172 (sex offender
registration). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(h)
$8,000 of the general fund‑‑state fiscal year 1999 appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 2628 (methamphetamine
manufacture). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the amount provided
in this subsection shall lapse.

(3)
COMMUNITY CORRECTIONS

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 88,830,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((90,670,000))

89,696,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((179,500,000))

178,526,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
$27,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $185,000 of the
general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation are provided solely for the
criminal justice costs associated with the implementation of Engrossed Third Substitute
House Bill No. 3900 (revising the juvenile code). If Engrossed Third
Substitute House Bill No. 3900 is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amounts
provided shall lapse.

(b)
The department of corrections shall accomplish personnel reductions with the
least possible impact on correctional custody staff, community custody staff,
and correctional industries. For the purposes of this subsection, correctional
custody staff means employees responsible for the direct supervision of
offenders.

(c)
$467,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $505,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely to
increase payment rates for contracted education providers and contracted work
release facilities. It is the legislature's intent that these amounts shall be
used primarily to increase compensation for persons employed in direct,
front-line service delivery.

(d)
$45,000 of the general fund‑‑state fiscal year 1999 appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5760
(mentally ill offenders). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(e)
$609,000 of the general fund‑‑state fiscal year 1998 appropriation
and $226,000 of the general fund‑‑state fiscal year 1999
appropriation are provided solely for costs associated with allowing community
corrections officers to carry firearms.

(4)
CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)................ $ 4,055,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)................ $ 4,167,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 8,222,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
$100,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $100,000 of the
general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation are provided solely for transfer to
the jail industries board. The board shall use the amounts provided only for
administrative expenses, equipment purchases, and technical assistance
associated with advising cities and counties in developing, promoting, and
implementing consistent, safe, and efficient offender work programs.

(b)
$50,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $50,000 of the
general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for the
correctional industries board of directors to hire one staff person,
responsible directly to the board, to assist the board in fulfilling its
duties.

(5)
INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 6,851,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((6,538,000))

6,788,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((13,389,000))

13,639,000

Sec.
219. 1998
c 346 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE EMPLOYMENT
SECURITY DEPARTMENT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 1,260,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ 1,261,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((198,628,000))

178,472,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 28,650,000

Unemployment
Compensation Administration Account‑-

Federal
Appropriation...................... $ 182,312,000

Administrative
Contingency Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 13,527,000

Employment
Service Administrative Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 14,500,000

Employment
& Training Trust Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 600,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((440,738,000))

420,582,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Expenditures of funds appropriated in this section for the information systems
projects identified in agency budget requests as "claims and adjudication
call centers", "data/wage quality initiative", and "one
stop information connectivity" are conditioned upon compliance with
section 902 of this act.

(2)
$600,000 of the employment and training trust account appropriation is provided
solely for the account's share of unemployment insurance tax collection costs.

(3)
$1,126,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided solely
for the continuation of job placement centers colocated on community and
technical college campuses.

(4)
The employment security department shall spend no more than $25,049,511 of the
unemployment compensation administration account‑-federal appropriation
for the general unemployment insurance development effort (GUIDE) project,
except that the department may exceed this amount by up to $2,600,000 to offset
the cost associated with any vendor-caused delay. The additional spending
authority is contingent upon the department fully recovering these moneys from
any project vendors failing to perform in full. Authority to spend the amount
provided by this subsection is conditioned on compliance with section 902 of
this act.

(5)
$60,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$61,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely for the King county reemployment support center.

(6)
$1,200,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$1,200,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely for labor market information and employer outreach activities.

(7)
$948,000 of the administrative contingency account appropriation and $838,000
of the employment service administrative account appropriation are provided
solely for the department to evaluate the tax determination system compared to
other systems, improve the disclosure of information on the employer rate
notice, and address deficiencies in the tax information system (TAXIS).

(((10))) (8) $327,000 of the unemployment
compensation administration account‑-federal appropriation and $486,000
of the employment service administrative account appropriation are provided
solely for the department to replace field office computers that are not
compliant with Year 2000 conversion standards.

(End of part)

PART
III

NATURAL
RESOURCES

Sec.
301. 1998
c 346 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation

(FY
1998)............................. $ ((26,013,000))

23,513,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation

(FY
1999)............................. $ ((25,860,000))

23,348,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation........ $.................................. ((46,240,000))

46,229,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation. $ 1,200,000

Special
Grass Seed Burning Research Account

Appropriation........................ $ 71,000

Reclamation
Revolving Account

Appropriation......................... $ 2,441,000

Flood
Control Assistance Account

Appropriation......................... $ 4,850,000

State
Emergency Water Projects Revolving Account

Appropriation......................... $ 319,000

Waste
Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control

Appropriation......................... $ 10,316,000

State
and Local Improvements Revolving Account

(Waste
Facilities) Appropriation...... $ 601,000

State
and Local Improvements Revolving Account

(Water
Supply Facilities)

Appropriation.. ...................... $ 1,366,000

Basic
Data Account Appropriation.......... $ 182,000

Vehicle
Tire Recycling Account

Appropriation......................... $ ((357,000))

401,000

Water
Quality Account Appropriation........ $.................................. 2,892,000

Wood
Stove Education and Enforcement Account

Appropriation......................... $ 848,000

Worker
and Community Right-to-Know Account

Appropriation......................... $ 469,000

State
Toxics Control Account

Appropriation......................... $ ((53,715,000))

53,703,000

Local
Toxics Control Account

Appropriation......................... $ 4,759,000

Water
Quality Permit Account

Appropriation......................... $ 20,378,000

Underground
Storage Tank Account

Appropriation......................... $ 2,638,000

Solid
Waste Management Account

Appropriation......................... $ 971,000

Hazardous
Waste Assistance Account

Appropriation......................... $ 3,615,000

Air
Pollution Control Account

Appropriation......................... $ 16,224,000

Oil
Spill Administration Account

Appropriation......................... $ 6,998,000

Air
Operating Permit Account

Appropriation......................... $ 3,808,000

Freshwater
Aquatic Weeds Account

Appropriation......................... $ 1,829,000

Oil
Spill Response Account

Appropriation......................... $ 7,078,000

Metals
Mining Account Appropriation........ $ 42,000

Water
Pollution Control Revolving Account‑-State

Appropriation......................... $ 349,000

Water
Pollution Control Revolving Account‑-Federal

Appropriation......................... $ 1,726,000

Biosolids
Permit Account Appropriation.... $ 567,000

Environmental
Excellence Account

Appropriation......................... $ 247,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION............. $ ((248,969,000))

243,978,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$3,211,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998,
$3,211,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999,
$394,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation, $2,017,000 of the
oil spill administration account, $819,000 of the state toxics control account
appropriation, and $3,591,000 of the water quality permit fee account are
provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency
action items DOE-01, DOE-02, DOE-03, DOE-04, DOE-05, DOE-06, DOE-07, DOE-08,
and DOE-09.

(2)
$2,000,000 of the state toxics control account appropriation is provided solely
for the following purposes:

(a)
To conduct remedial actions for sites for which there are no potentially liable
persons, for which potentially liable persons cannot be found, or for which
potentially liable persons are unable to pay for remedial actions; and

(b)
To provide funding to assist potentially liable persons under RCW
70.105D.070(2)(d)(xi) to pay for the cost of the remedial actions; and

(c)
To conduct remedial actions for sites for which potentially liable persons have
refused to conduct remedial actions required by the department; and

(d)
To contract for services as necessary to support remedial actions.

(3)
$200,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 is
provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No.
1118 (reopening a water rights claim filing period). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 1997, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4)
$3,600,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $3,600,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for the auto emissions inspection and maintenance program.
Expenditures of the amounts provided in this subsection are contingent upon a
like amount being deposited in the general fund from the auto emission
inspection fees in accordance with RCW 70.120.170(4).

(5)
$170,000 of the oil spill administration account appropriation is provided
solely for implementation of the Puget Sound work plan action item UW-02
through a contract with the University of Washington's Sea Grant program in
order to develop an educational program that targets small spills from commercial
fishing vessels, ferries, cruise ships, ports, and marinas.

(6)
The merger of the office of marine safety into the department of ecology shall
be accomplished in a manner that will maintain a priority focus on oil spill
prevention, as well as maintain a strong oil spill response capability. The
merged program shall be established to provide a high level of visibility and
ensure that there shall not be a diminution of the existing level of effort
from the merged programs.

(7)
The entire environmental excellence account appropriation is provided solely
for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1866
(environmental excellence). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. In implementing the bill, the
department shall organize the needed expertise to process environmental
excellence applications after an application has been received.

(8)
$200,000 of the freshwater aquatic weeds account appropriation is provided
solely to address saltcedar weed problems.

(9)
$4,498,000 of the waste reduction, recycling, and litter control account
appropriation is provided for fiscal year 1998 and $5,818,000 is provided for
fiscal year 1999 to be expended in the following ratios: Fifty percent for a
litter patrol program to employ youth and correctional work crews to remove
litter from places that are most visible to the public; twenty percent for
grants to local governments for litter cleanup under RCW 70.93.250; and thirty
percent for public education and awareness programs and programs to foster
local waste reduction and recycling efforts. From the amounts provided in this
subsection, the department shall provide $352,000 through an interagency
agreement to the department of corrections to hire correctional crews to remove
litter in areas that are not accessible to youth crews.

(10)
The entire biosolids permit account appropriation is provided solely for
implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5590 (biosolids management). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the entire appropriation is null and
void.

(11)
$29,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$99,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1985
(landscape management plans). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(12)
$60,000 of the freshwater aquatic weeds account appropriation is provided
solely for a grant to the department of fish and wildlife to control and
eradicate purple loosestrife using the most cost-effective methods available,
including chemical control where appropriate.

(13)
$250,000 of the flood control assistance account appropriation is provided
solely as a reappropriation to complete the Skokomish valley flood reduction
plan. The amount provided in this subsection shall be reduced by the amount
expended from this account for the Skokomish valley flood reduction plan during
the biennium ending June 30, 1997.

(14)
$600,000 of the flood control assistance account appropriation is provided
solely to complete flood control projects that were awarded funds during the
1995-97 biennium. These funds shall be spent only to complete projects that
could not be completed during the 1995-97 biennium due to delays caused by weather
or delays in the permitting process.

(15)
$113,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$112,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5505
(assistance to water applicants). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(16)
$70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5785
(consolidation of groundwater rights). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
1997, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(17)
$20,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$20,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5276 (water
right applications). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(18)
$500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for the continuation of the southwest Washington
coastal erosion study.

(((21)))
(19) $195,000 of the underground storage tank account appropriation is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6130
(underground storage tanks). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((22)))
(20) $417,000 of the local toxics control account appropriation is
provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 6474 (fertilizer regulation).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(((23)))
(21) Using up to $19,000 of the special grass seed burning research
account appropriation the department shall provide funding to Washington State
University to conduct a grass burning emissions study.

(((24)))
(22) Within the amounts provided in this section, the department shall
conduct a demonstration project on the effectiveness of the state-registered
herbicide "Navigate" for the control of Eurasian water milfoil in
Loon Lake in Stevens county. The department shall provide a grant to the
Stevens county weed board to cover fifty percent of the cost of application of
the herbicide. A local match of fifty percent of the cost of application of
the herbicide is required. Permits and approvals necessary to implement the
demonstration project may be conditioned by the department to protect public
health and the environment, but approval may not be withheld.

(((25)))
(23) Within the amounts provided in this section, the department shall
provide funds to Yakima county superior court for staff and associated costs to
support the Yakima river basin water rights adjudication.

Sec.
302. 1998
c 346 s 304 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 20,489,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((20,595,000))

20,573,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 3,122,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 59,000

Winter
Recreation Program Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((779,000))

759,000

Off
Road Vehicle Account Appropriation......... $ 251,000

Snowmobile
Account Appropriation............... $ ((3,260,000))

3,240,000

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation $ 321,000

Public
Safety and Education Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 48,000

Industrial
Insurance Premium Refund

Appropriation.............................. $ 10,000

Waste
Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control

Appropriation.............................. $ 34,000

Water
Trail Program Account Appropriation...... $ 14,000

Parks
Renewal and Stewardship Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((25,894,000))

25,863,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((74,876,000))

74,783,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$189,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan agency action items
P&RC-01 and P&RC-03.

(2)
$264,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is provided for boater
programs state-wide and for implementation of the Puget Sound work plan.

(3)
$45,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 is
provided solely for a feasibility study of a public/private effort to establish
a reserve for recreation and environmental studies in southwest Kitsap county.

(4)
Within the funds provided in this section, the state parks and recreation
commission shall provide to the legislature a status report on implementation
of the recommendations contained in the 1994 study on the restructuring of
Washington state parks. This status report shall include an evaluation of the
campsite reservation system including the identification of any incremental
changes in revenues associated with implementation of the system and a progress
report on other enterprise activities being undertaken by the commission. The
report may also include recommendations on other revenue generating options.
In preparing the report, the commission is encouraged to work with interested
parties to develop a long-term strategy to support the park system. The
commission shall provide this report by December 1, 1997.

(5)
$48,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$202,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
are provided solely for development of underwater park programs and
facilities. The department shall work with the underwater parks program task
force to develop specific plans for the use of these funds.

(6)
Fees approved by the state parks and recreation commission in 1997 for camping,
snow parks, wood debris collection, and Fort Worden state park are authorized
to exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW 43.135.055.

(((7)
$20,000 of the winter recreation program account appropriation and $20,000 of
the snowmobile account appropriation are provided solely for a grant for the
operation of the Northwest avalanche center.))

Sec.
303. 1997
c 149 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE ENVIRONMENTAL HEARINGS OFFICE

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)................ $ 780,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)................ $ ((773,000))

817,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ ((1,553,000))

1,597,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: $4,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$4,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided
solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5119 (forest practices appeals
board). If this bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, $4,000 of the general
fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $4,000 of the general fund
appropriation for fiscal year 1999 shall lapse.

Sec.
304. 1998
c 346 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 35,857,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((44,998,000))

44,902,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((75,037,000))

74,972,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 26,983,000

Off
Road Vehicle Account Appropriation......... $ 488,000

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,593,000

Public
Safety and Education Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 586,000

Industrial
Insurance Premium Refund

Appropriation.............................. $ 120,000

Recreational
Fisheries Enhancement

Appropriation.......................... ... $ ((2,387,000))

2,787,000

Warm
Water Game Fish Account Appropriation..... $ 2,419,000

Wildlife
Account Appropriation.................. $............................. ((44,122,000))

46,158,000

Game
Special Wildlife Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,911,000

Game
Special Wildlife Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 10,844,000

Game
Special Wildlife Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 350,000

Oil
Spill Administration Account Appropriation. $ 843,000

Environmental
Excellence Account Appropriation. $ 20,000

Eastern
Washington Pheasant Enhancement Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 547,000

Regional
Fisheries Enhancement--Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 750,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((253,855,000))

256,130,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$1,181,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $1,181,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan
agency action items DFW-01, DFW-03, DFW-04, and DFW-8 through DFW-15.

(2)
$188,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $155,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for a maintenance and inspection program for
department-owned dams. The department shall submit a report to the governor
and the appropriate legislative committees by October 1, 1998, on the status of
department-owned dams. This report shall provide a recommendation, including a
cost estimate, on whether each facility should continue to be maintained or
should be decommissioned.

(3)
$832,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $825,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely to implement salmon recovery activities and other
actions required to respond to federal listings of salmon species under the
endangered species act.

(4)
$350,000 of the wildlife account appropriation, $72,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998, and $73,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for control
and eradication of class B designate weeds on department owned and managed
lands. The amounts from the general fund‑-state appropriations are
provided solely for control of spartina.

(5)
$140,000 of the wildlife account appropriation is provided solely for a
cooperative effort with the department of agriculture for research and
eradication of purple loosestrife on state lands.

(6)
In controlling weeds on state-owned lands, the department shall use the most
cost-effective methods available, including chemical control where appropriate,
and the department shall report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by January 1, 1998, on control methods, costs, and acres treated
during the previous year.

(7)
$193,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998,
$194,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999, and
$300,000 of the wildlife account appropriation are provided solely for the
design and development of an automated license system.

(8)
The department is directed to offer for sale its Cessna 421 aircraft by June
30, 1998. Proceeds from the sale shall be deposited in the wildlife account.

(9)
$500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely to continue the department's habitat partnerships
program during the 1997-99 biennium.

(10)
$350,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$350,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for purchase of monitoring equipment necessary to fully
implement mass marking of coho salmon.

(11)
$238,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $219,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No.
1985 (landscape management plans). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
1997, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(12)
$150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for a contract with the United States department of agriculture
to carry out animal damage control projects throughout the state related to
cougars, bears, and coyotes.

(13)
$97,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$98,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely to implement animal damage control programs for Canada geese in
the lower Columbia river basin.

(14)
$170,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998,
$170,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999, and $360,000
of the wildlife account appropriation are provided solely to hire additional
enforcement officers to address problem wildlife throughout the state.

(15)
$133,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$133,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5442 (flood control
permitting). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amounts provided
in this subsection shall lapse.

(16)
$100,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation is provided
solely for grants to the regional fisheries enhancement groups.

(17)
$547,000 of the eastern Washington pheasant enhancement account appropriation
is provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5104
(pheasant enhancement program). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(18)
$150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely to hire Washington conservation corps crews to maintain
department-owned and managed lands.

(19)
The entire environmental excellence account appropriation is provided solely for
implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1866
(environmental excellence). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the
entire appropriation is null and void.

(20)
$156,000 of the recreational fisheries enhancement appropriation is provided
solely for Substitute Senate Bill No. 5102 (fishing license surcharge). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

(21)
$25,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$25,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for staffing and operation of the Tennant Lake interpretive
center.

(22)
It is the intent of the legislature that, within the general fund‑-state
appropriations provided in this section, the department shall prioritize its
resources to provide expedited assistance to businesses seeking permitting and
technical assistance for rural economic development projects.

(23)
$750,000 of the regional fisheries enhancement‑-federal appropriation is
provided solely for the regional fisheries enhancement groups. The amount in
this section may be spent for project identification, design, permitting, and
implementation; volunteer coordination; and administrative costs as approved
under RCW 75.50.100 and 75.50.115(1)(d). All amounts not committed to approved
project, volunteer coordination, or administrative costs by May 31, 1998, shall
be made available to any of the regional fisheries enhancement groups that have
submitted project approval requests that exceed their available funding from
the regional fisheries enhancement group account and the regional fisheries
enhancement salmonid recovery account. Redistribution of the moneys shall be
based on the criteria established in RCW 75.50.115(1)(e), and shall ensure to
the greatest extent possible that the funds are spent during the 1998 in-stream
season.

(24)
$700,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely for grants to habitat restoration lead entities formed in
accordance with sections 7 through 10 of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No.
2496 (salmon recovery planning) for administrative activities and development
of habitat-restoration project lists. If any of these sections of the bill
are not enacted by June 30, 1998, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse. Of this amount, $100,000 is provided as a grant to the regional
committee lead entity for administrative activities in the Snake river
evolutionarily significant unit.

(25)
$50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely for operation of the independent science panel in accordance
with section 6 of Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2496 (salmon recovery
planning). If this section of the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(26)
$450,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely for fish passage technical assistance to local governments,
volunteer groups, and regional fisheries enhancement groups in accordance with
Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2496 (salmon recovery planning). The
department shall also contract with the department of transportation to train
staff at the department of transportation to become proficient in providing
fish passage technical assistance. If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(27)
(($250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely for excessive deer and elk damage claims.

(28)))
$393,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6324 (fish
remote site incubators). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((29)))
(28) $1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
1999, $400,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation, and $225,000 of the
general fund--local appropriation are provided solely to contract for the mass
marking of all appropriate state-wide department chinook salmon hatchery
production in accordance with Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6264 (chinook
salmon mass marking). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((30)))
(29) $3,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 is provided solely for salmon restoration projects funded according to
sections 7 through 10 of Second Substitute House Bill No. 2496 (salmon recovery
planning). Of this amount, $500,000 is provided solely for a block grant to
the conservation districts located in the Snake river evolutionarily
significant unit for habitat restoration projects. If any of these sections of
the bill are not enacted by June 30, 1998, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(((31)))
(30) $1,170,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 and $3,500,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided
solely to implement a license buy-back program for commercial fishing licenses.

(((32)))
(31) $5,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1998 and $40,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1999 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
6114 (nonindigenous aquatic species). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((33)
$1,000,000)) (32) $500,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is provided solely for purchasing computer
equipment to support implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6330
(fish and wildlife licenses). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(33)
$500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided to improve information systems capabilities as identified in the
independent business practices assessment completed in November 1998.

(34)
$39,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely for improvements to business practices within the agency.

Sec.
305. 1998
c 346 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 23,767,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((24,410,000))

32,080,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((1,156,000))

1,244,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 422,000

Forest
Development Account Appropriation........ $...................................... ((49,963,000))

49,895,000

Off
Road Vehicle Account Appropriation......... $ 3,628,000

Surveys
and Maps Account Appropriation......... $ 2,088,000

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,869,000

Resource
Management Cost Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((89,769,000))

89,667,000

Waste
Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control

Appropriation.............................. $ 450,000

Surface
Mining Reclamation Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,420,000

Aquatic
Land Dredged Material Disposal Site Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 751,000

Natural
Resources Conservation Areas Stewardship

Account
Appropriation...................... $ 77,000

Air
Pollution Control Account Appropriation.... $ 890,000

Metals
Mining Account Appropriation............. $ 62,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((204,472,000))

211,310,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$7,017,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and (($6,900,000)) $13,290,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for emergency fire
suppression.

(2)
$18,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998,
$18,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999,
and $957,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan agency
action items DNR-01, DNR-02, and DNR-04.

(3)
$300,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
is provided solely for design and implementation of revisions to the
department's geographic information system hydrography and transportation data
layers.

(4)
$450,000 of the resource management cost account appropriation is provided
solely for the control and eradication of class B designate weeds on state
lands. The department shall use the most cost-effective methods available,
including chemical control where appropriate, and report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by January 1, 1998, on control methods, costs,
and acres treated during the previous year.

(((4)))
(5) $1,332,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1998 and $1,713,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for fire protection activities.

(((5)))
(6) $541,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1998 and $549,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for the stewardship of natural area
preserves, natural resource conservation areas, and the operation of the
natural heritage program.

(((6)))
(7) $2,300,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation is
provided for the department's portion of the Eagle Harbor settlement.

(((7)))
(8) $195,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1998 and $220,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 1985 (landscape management plans). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 1997, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((8)))
(9) $600,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1998 and $600,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for the cooperative monitoring,
evaluation, and research projects related to implementation of the
timber-fish-wildlife agreement.

(((9)))
(10) $6,568,000 of the forest development account appropriation is
provided solely for silviculture activities on forest board lands. To the
extent that forest board counties apply for reconveyance of lands pursuant to
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5325 (county land transfers), the amount provided in
this subsection shall be reduced by an amount equal to the estimated
silvicultural expenditures planned in each county that applies for
reconveyance.

(((12)))
(11) $71,000 of the resource management cost account appropriation is
provided solely for a study of the current method for determining
water-dependent rents in accordance with Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6156
(state aquatic lands leases). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((13)))
(12) $117,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 is provided solely for a geographic information systems inventory of
Washington sand, gravel, and construction rock resources.

(((14)))
(13) $50,000 of the resource management cost account appropriation is
provided solely for a field study of biological control methods for eradication
of spartina.

(((15)))
(14) $50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 1999 is provided solely for a study of potential finfish net-pen
aquaculture sites in the Strait of Juan de Fuca and along the Pacific coast.

(15) $1,100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation
for fiscal year 1999 is appropriated to the natural resources conservation
areas stewardship account and is provided solely to match $500,000 in private
funding for management of natural area preserves and natural resources
conservation areas. If the department has not entered into a memorandum of
understanding with the grantor regarding the use of the $500,000 by June 30,
1999, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(End of part)

PART
IV

TRANSPORTATION

Sec.
401. 1998
c 346 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF LICENSING

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 4,686,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((4,717,000))

4,912,000

Architects'
License Account Appropriation...... $ 829,000

Cemetery
Account Appropriation.................. $ 197,000

Professional
Engineers' Account Appropriation... $........................................... ((2,700,000))

2,699,000

Real
Estate Commission Account Appropriation... $ ((7,062,000))

7,060,000

Master
License Account Appropriation........... $ ((6,963,000))

6,961,000

Uniform
Commercial Code Account Appropriation... $........................................... ((3,521,000))

3,520,000

Real
Estate Education Account Appropriation.... $ 606,000

Funeral
Directors And Embalmers Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 418,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((31,699,000))

31,888,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$21,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $22,000 of the
general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation are provided solely to implement
House Bill No. 1827 or Senate Bill No. 5754 (boxing, martial arts, wrestling).
If neither bill is enacted by June 30, 1997, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(2)
$40,000 of the master license account appropriation is provided solely to
implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5483 (whitewater river outfitters). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(3)
$229,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $195,000 of the
general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of Senate Bill No. 5997 (cosmetology inspections). If the bill
is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(4)
$31,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation, $1,000 of the
general fund fiscal 1999 appropriation, $7,000 of the architects' license
account appropriation, $18,000 of the professional engineers' account
appropriation, $14,000 of the real estate commission account appropriation,
$40,000 of the master license account appropriation, and $3,000 of the funeral
directors and embalmers account appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of Engrossed House Bill No. 3901 (implementing welfare reform).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(5)
$17,000 of the professional engineers' account appropriation is provided solely
to implement Senate Bill No. 5266 (engineers/land surveyors). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(6)
$110,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation is provided solely
to implement Senate Bill No. 5998 (cosmetology advisory board). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 1997, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(7)
$11,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $2,000 of the
general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation are provided solely to implement
Substitute House Bill No. 1748 or Substitute Senate Bill No. 5513 (vessel
registration). If neither bill is enacted by June 30, 1997, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8)(a)
Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, during the 1997-99 fiscal biennium, the department
may increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor in the appraisers and
camp resorts programs; however, such increases shall not exceed an annual
increase of eight percent.

(b)
Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, during the 1997-99 fiscal biennium, the department
may increase fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor in the professional
athletics, employment agencies, and security guards programs to the extent
necessary to defray the costs of the administration of these programs as set
forth in RCW 43.24.086.

(c)
Before raising fees in excess of the fiscal growth factor pursuant to this
subsection, the department shall notify the chairs and ranking minority members
of the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature.

(9)
Within the amounts provided in this section, the department shall provide
information detailing each specific component of the overhead costs allocated
to each program within the business and professions division. The department
shall establish procedures to allow each program within the business and
professions division to review and modify its business processes in order to
reduce administrative costs. The department of licensing shall provide a
report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by October 1, 1998,
detailing the specific procedures established pursuant to the requirements of
this subsection.

(10)
$110,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation is provided solely
for the implementation of the Substitute Senate Bill No. 6507 (cosmetology
advisory board). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(11)
$75,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation is provided solely
for costs associated with fully implementing chapter 178, Laws of 1997
(cosmetology inspections).

(12)
$200,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1999 appropriation is provided solely
for deposit in the impaired driving safety account.

Sec.
402. 1998
c 346 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE
PATROL

General
Fund--State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 8,312,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((21,791,000))

21,855,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 5,784,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 341,000

Public
Safety and Education Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,483,000

County
Criminal Justice Assistance Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,905,000

Municipal
Criminal Justice Assistance Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,573,000

Fire
Service Trust Account Appropriation........ $ 92,000

Fire
Service Training Account Appropriation.... $ 2,295,000

State
Toxics Control Account Appropriation..... $ 439,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 570,000

Fingerprint
Identification Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,220,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((52,805,000))

52,869,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$254,000 of the fingerprint identification account appropriation is provided
solely for an automated system that will facilitate the access of criminal
history records remotely by computer or telephone for preemployment background
checks and other non-law enforcement purposes. The agency shall submit an
implementation status report to the office of financial management and the
legislature by September 1, 1997.

(2)
$264,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided solely
for a feasibility study to develop a criminal investigation computer system.
The study will report on the feasibility of developing a system that uses
incident-based reporting as its foundation, consistent with FBI standards. The
system will have the capability of connecting with local law enforcement
jurisdictions as well as fire protection agencies conducting arson
investigations. The study will report on the system requirements for
incorporating case management, intelligence data, imaging, and geographic
information. The system will also provide links to existing crime information
databases such as WASIS and WACIC. The agency shall submit a copy of the
proposed study workplan to the office of financial management and the
department of information services for approval prior to expenditure. A final
report shall be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature, the
office of financial management, and the department of information services no
later than June 30, 1998.

(3)
Pursuant to chapter 43.135 RCW, during the 1997-99 fiscal biennium, the
Washington state patrol is authorized to raise existing fees charged for
background fingerprint checks on current and potential school district and
educational service district employees by six dollars.

(4)
$166,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$499,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely as state matching funds required to complete changes to the
WACIC and WASIS systems.

(5)
To address year 2000 concerns about the automated fingerprint identification
system (AFIS), the Washington state patrol may contract with an
intergovernmental consortium for the use of a year 2000 compatible AFIS
system. Under this approach, the state patrol would begin paying a monthly
usage fee starting in fiscal year 2000.

(6) $58,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 1999 is provided solely to implement House Bill No. 1172 (sex
offender registration). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(End of part)

PART
V

EDUCATION

Sec.
501. 1998
c 346 s 502 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR STATE
ADMINISTRATION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 20,423,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((58,171,000))

58,323,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 49,439,000

Public
Safety and Education Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,598,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,672,000

Education
Savings Account Appropriation........ $ 39,312,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((173,615,000))

173,767,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
AGENCY OPERATIONS

(a)
$394,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $394,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for the operation and expenses of the state board of education,
including basic education assistance activities.

(b)(i)
$250,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for enhancing computer systems and support in the office of
superintendent of public instruction. These amounts shall be used to: Make a
database of school information available electronically to schools, state
government, and the general public; reduce agency and school district
administrative costs through more effective use of technology; and replace
paper reporting and publication to the extent feasible with electronic media.
The superintendent, in cooperation with the commission on student learning,
shall develop a state student record system including elements reflecting
student achievement. The system shall be made available to the office of
financial management and the legislature with suitable safeguards of student
confidentiality. The superintendent shall report to the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees by December 1 of each year of
the biennium on the progress and plans for the expenditure of these amounts.

(ii)
The superintendent, in cooperation with the commission on student learning,
shall develop a feasibility plan for a state student record system, including
elements reflecting student academic achievement on goals 1 and 2 under RCW
28A.150.210. The feasibility plan shall be made available to the office of
financial management and the fiscal and education committees of the legislature
for approval before a student records database is established, and shall
identify data elements to be collected and suitable safeguards of student
confidentiality and proper use of database records, with particular attention
to eliminating unnecessary and intrusive data about nonacademic related
information.

(c)
$348,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for administration of the traffic safety education program, including
in-service training related to instruction in the risks of driving while under
the influence of alcohol and other drugs.

(d)
$50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5394 (school audit
resolutions).

(e)
The superintendent shall conduct a study and make recommendations to the 1999
legislature regarding a definition of and standards for skills centers. The
standards shall be related to the cost differential of skills centers as
compared to secondary vocational education allocations provided in the
appropriations act and other relevant factors. The study shall also address
proposals for new skills centers known as of August 31, 1998, and compare and
analyze, insofar as possible, the proposals with the recommended standards.
The study shall be submitted to the governor and the appropriate committees of
the legislature by November 25, 1998.

(f)
The superintendent shall prepare a study which compares the state's
administrative and statutory requirements to provide special education with the
requirements of federal law. A preliminary report shall be provided to the
policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by October 15, 1998, and a
final report shall be provided by December 15, 1998.

(2)
STATE-WIDE PROGRAMS

(a)
$2,174,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for
in-service training and educational programs conducted by the Pacific Science
Center.

(b)
$63,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for
operation of the Cispus environmental learning center.

(c)
$2,754,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for
educational centers, including state support activities. $100,000 of this
amount is provided to help stabilize funding through distribution among
existing education centers that are currently funded by the state at an amount
less than $100,000 a biennium.

(d)
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for an
organization in southwest Washington that received funding from the Spokane
educational center in the 1995-97 biennium and provides educational services to
students who have dropped out.

(e)
$2,148,000 of the general fund--state fiscal year 1998 appropriation and
$2,151,000 of the general fund--state fiscal year 1999 appropriation are
provided solely for implementation of reading initiatives to improve reading in
early grades as enacted by the 1997 legislature. Of this amount, $4,300,000 is
provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2042. Funds
shall be used solely for the selection and purchase of the second grade reading
tests in accordance with section 2 of the bill, scoring costs associated with
the administration of the tests in the 1998-99 school year in accordance with
section 5 of the bill, and grants to school districts in accordance with
sections 4 and 7 of the bill.

(f)
$3,672,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation
and $2,250,000 of the public safety education account appropriation are
provided solely for matching grants to enhance security in schools. Not more
than seventy-five percent of a district's total expenditures for school
security in any school year may be paid from a grant under this subsection.
The grants shall be expended solely for the costs of employing or contracting
for building security monitors in schools during school hours and school
events. Of the amount provided in this subsection, at least $2,850,000 shall
be spent for grants to districts that, during the 1988-89 school year, employed
or contracted for security monitors in schools during school hours. However,
these grants may be used only for increases in school district expenditures for
school security over expenditure levels for the 1988-89 school year.

(g)
$200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998,
$200,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999,
and $400,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation transferred from the
department of health are provided solely for a program that provides grants to
school districts for media campaigns promoting sexual abstinence and addressing
the importance of delaying sexual activity, pregnancy, and childbearing until
individuals are ready to nurture and support their children. Grants to the
school districts shall be for projects that are substantially designed and
produced by students. The grants shall require a local private sector match
equal to one-half of the state grant, which may include in-kind contribution of
technical or other assistance from consultants or firms involved in public
relations, advertising broadcasting, and graphics or video production or other
related fields.

(h)
$1,500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
are provided solely for school district petitions to juvenile court for truant
students as provided in RCW 28A.225.030 and 28A.225.035. Allocation of this
money to school districts shall be based on the number of petitions filed.

(i)
$300,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for alcohol
and drug prevention programs pursuant to RCW 66.08.180.

(j)(i)
$19,656,000 of the education savings account appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $19,656,000 of the education savings account appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for matching grants and related state activities to
provide school district consortia with programs utilizing technology to improve
learning. A maximum of $150,000 each fiscal year of this amount is provided
for administrative support and oversight of the K-20 network by the
superintendent of public instruction. The superintendent of public instruction
shall convene a technology grants committee representing private sector
technology, school districts, and educational service districts to recommend to
the superintendent grant proposals that have the best plans for improving
student learning through innovative curriculum using technology as a learning
tool and evaluating the effectiveness of the curriculum innovations. After
considering the technology grants committee recommendations, the superintendent
shall make matching grant awards, including granting at least fifteen percent
of funds on the basis of criteria in (ii)(A) through (C) of this subsection
(2)(j).

(ii)
Priority for award of funds will be to (A) school districts most in need of
assistance due to financial limits, (B) school districts least prepared to take
advantage of technology as a means of improving student learning, and (C)
school districts in economically distressed areas. The superintendent of
public instruction, in consultation with the technology grants committee, shall
propose options to the committee for identifying and prioritizing districts
according to criteria in (i) and (ii) of this subsection (2)(j).

(iii)
Options for review criteria to be considered by the superintendent of public
instruction include, but are not limited to, free and reduced lunches, levy
revenues, ending fund balances, equipment inventories, and surveys of
technology preparedness. An "economically distressed area" is (A) a
county with an unemployment rate that is at least twenty percent above the
state-wide average for the previous three years; (B) a county that has
experienced sudden and severe or long-term and severe loss of employment, or
erosion of its economic base resulting in decline of its dominant industries; or
(C) a district within a county which (I) has at least seventy percent of its
families and unrelated individuals with incomes below eighty percent of the
county's median income for families and unrelated individuals; and (II) has an
unemployment rate which is at least forty percent higher than the county's
unemployment rate.

(k)
$50,000 of the general fund--state appropriations is provided as matching funds
for district contributions to provide analysis of the efficiency of school
district business practices. The superintendent of public instruction shall
establish criteria, make awards, and provide a report to the fiscal committees
of the legislature by December 15, 1997, on the progress and details of
analysis funded under this subsection (2)(k).

(l)
(($19,797,000)) $19,702,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is provided solely for the purchase of
classroom instructional materials and supplies. The superintendent shall
allocate the funds at a maximum rate of $20.82 per full-time equivalent
student, beginning September 1, 1998, and ending June 30, 1999. The
expenditure of the funds shall be determined at each school site by the
individual teacher. School districts shall distribute all funds received to
school buildings without deduction.

(m)
$15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation is provided solely to assist
local districts vocational education programs in applying for low frequency FM
radio licenses with the federal communications commission.

(n)
$35,000 of the general fund--state appropriation is provided solely to the
state board of education to design a program to encourage high school students
and other adults to pursue careers as vocational education teachers in the
subject matter of agriculture.

(o)
$25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for allocation to the primary coordinators of the state
geographic alliance to improve the teaching of geography in schools.

(p)
$1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation is provided for state
administrative costs and start-up grants for alternative programs and services
that improve instruction and learning for at-risk and expelled students
consistent with the objectives of Engrossed House Bill No. 1581 (disruptive
students/offenders). Each grant application shall contain proposed performance
indicators and an evaluation plan to measure the success of the program and its
impact on improved student learning. Applications shall contain the
applicant's plan for maintaining the program and/or services after the grant
period, shall address the needs of students who cannot be accommodated within
the framework of existing school programs or services and shall address how the
applicant will serve any student within the proposed program's target age range
regardless of the reason for truancy, suspension, expulsion, or other
disciplinary action. Up to $50,000 per year may be used by the superintendent
of public instruction for grant administration. The superintendent shall
submit an evaluation of the alternative program start-up grants provided under
this section, and section 501(2)(q), chapter 283, Laws of 1996, to the fiscal
and education committees of the legislature by November 15, 1998. Grants shall
be awarded to applicants showing the greatest potential for improved student
learning for at-risk students including:

(i)
Students who have been suspended, expelled, or are subject to other disciplinary
actions;

(ii)
Students with unexcused absences who need intervention from community truancy
boards or family support programs;

(iii)
Students who have left school; and

(iv)
Students involved with the court system.

The
office of the superintendent of public instruction shall prepare a report
describing student recruitment, program offerings, staffing practices, and
available indicators of program effectiveness of alternative education programs
funded with state and, to the extent information is available, local funds.
The report shall contain a plan for conducting an evaluation of the educational
effectiveness of alternative education programs.

(q)
$1,600,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for
grants for magnet schools to be distributed as recommended by the
superintendent of public instruction pursuant to chapter 232, section 516(13),
Laws of 1992.

(r)
$4,300,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for
complex need grants. Grants shall be provided according to amounts shown in
LEAP Document 30C as developed on April 27, 1997, at 03:00 hours.

(s)
$17,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
is provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
6509 (successful readers act). Of this amount, $9,000,000 is provided solely
for beginning reading instructional programs pursuant to section 2(1) of the
bill and $8,000,000 is provided solely for volunteer tutor and mentor programs
pursuant to section 2(2) of the bill. The superintendent shall notify
districts of the availability of the funds by April 15th, 1998, and shall
include in the notification limitations on rates for stipends and other cost
factors. Stipends authorized under section 2(5) of the bill shall not exceed
five days per program at a rate not to exceed $222 per five-hour day, including
fringe benefits. The superintendent shall establish allocation guidelines for
other cost factors associated with providing the programs. If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 1998, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(t)
$15,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
are provided solely for a study and recommendations related to education of
offenders prosecuted as adults in accordance with Engrossed Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6600 (correctional facilities education program). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(u)
$375,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely for increased costs of providing a norm-referenced test to all
third grade students and retests of certain third grade students and other
costs in accordance with Second Substitute House Bill No. 2849 (student
achievement). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the amount provided
in this subsection shall lapse.

(v)
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is provided
solely for development and operation of a skills center in Port Angeles,
contingent on meeting the standard for qualifying for skills center funding as
developed by the superintendent of public instruction in subsection (1)(e) of
this section.

(w)
$400,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund--state appropriation is provided
solely for matching funds to improve the fiscal and student data capabilities
of the Washington school information processing cooperative. The funds shall
be allocated only if at least 267 school districts remain members of the
cooperative for the 1998-99 school year.

(x)
$120,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely for allocation to the Olympia school district for operation of
the legislative page school. $46,000 of this amount may be expended only if
the Olympia school district is not permitted to report the page school
enrollment for apportionment purposes for the 1997-98 school year. The
remainder of this amount is for operation of the page school in the 1998-99
school year and shall be based on the state average basic education
apportionment amount per student multiplied by the number of full-time
equivalent students.

Sec.
502. 1998
c 346 s 503 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR GENERAL
APPORTIONMENT (BASIC EDUCATION)

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 3,405,645,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((3,473,603,000))

3,449,571,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((6,879,248,000))

6,855,216,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation for fiscal year 1998 includes such funds as are necessary for
the remaining months of the 1996-97 school year.

(2)
Allocations for certificated staff salaries for the 1997-98 and 1998-99 school
years shall be determined using formula‑generated staff units calculated
pursuant to this subsection. Staff allocations for small school enrollments in
(d) through (f) of this subsection shall be reduced for vocational full-time
equivalent enrollments. Staff allocations for small school enrollments in
grades K-6 shall be the greater of that generated under (a) of this subsection,
or under (d) and (e) of this subsection. Certificated staffing allocations
shall be as follows:

(a)
On the basis of each 1,000 average annual full-time equivalent enrollments,
excluding full-time equivalent enrollment otherwise recognized for certificated
staff unit allocations under (c) through (f) of this subsection:

(i)
Four certificated administrative staff units per thousand full-time equivalent
students in grades K-12;

(ii)
49 certificated instructional staff units per thousand full-time equivalent
students in grades K-3;

(iii)
An additional 5.3 certificated instructional staff units for grades K-3. Any
funds allocated for these additional certificated units shall not be considered
as basic education funding;

(A)
Funds provided under this subsection (2)(a)(iii) in excess of the amount required
to maintain the statutory minimum ratio established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b)
shall be allocated only if the district documents an actual ratio equal to or
greater than 54.3 certificated instructional staff per thousand full-time
equivalent students in grades K-3. For any school district documenting a lower
certificated instructional staff ratio, the allocation shall be based on the
district's actual grades K-3 certificated instructional staff ratio achieved in
that school year, or the statutory minimum ratio established under RCW
28A.150.260(2)(b), if greater;

(B)
Districts at or above 51.0 certificated instructional staff per one thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades K-3 may dedicate up to 1.3 of the 54.3
funding ratio to employ additional classified instructional assistants assigned
to basic education classrooms in grades K-3. For purposes of documenting a
district's staff ratio under this section, funds used by the district to employ
additional classified instructional assistants shall be converted to a
certificated staff equivalent and added to the district's actual certificated
instructional staff ratio. Additional classified instructional assistants, for
the purposes of this subsection, shall be determined using the 1989-90 school
year as the base year;

(C)
Any district maintaining a ratio equal to or greater than 54.3 certificated
instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-3
may use allocations generated under this subsection (2)(a)(iii) in excess of
that required to maintain the minimum ratio established under RCW
28A.150.260(2)(b) to employ additional basic education certificated
instructional staff or classified instructional assistants in grades 4-6.
Funds allocated under this subsection (2)(a)(iii) shall only be expended to
reduce class size in grades K-6. No more than 1.3 of the certificated
instructional funding ratio amount may be expended for provision of classified
instructional assistants; and

(iv)
Forty‑six certificated instructional staff units per thousand full-time
equivalent students in grades 4-12;

(b)
For school districts with a minimum enrollment of 250 full-time equivalent
students whose full-time equivalent student enrollment count in a given month
exceeds the first of the month full-time equivalent enrollment count by 5
percent, an additional state allocation of 110 percent of the share that such
increased enrollment would have generated had such additional full-time
equivalent students been included in the normal enrollment count for that
particular month;

(c)
On the basis of full-time equivalent enrollment in:

(i)
Vocational education programs approved by the superintendent of public
instruction, a maximum of 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08
certificated administrative staff units for each 18.3 full-time equivalent
vocational students for the 1997-98 school year and for each 19.5 full-time
equivalent vocational students in the 1998-99 school year. Beginning with the
1998-99 school year, districts documenting staffing ratios of less than 1
certificated staff per 19.5 students shall be allocated the greater of the
total ratio in subsections (2)(a)(i) and (iv) of this section or the actual
documented ratio;

(ii)
Skills center programs approved by the superintendent of public instruction for
skills centers approved prior to September 1, 1997, 0.92 certificated
instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative units for each
16.67 full-time equivalent vocational students;

(iii)
Indirect cost charges, as defined by the superintendent of public instruction,
to vocational-secondary programs shall not exceed 10 percent; and

(iv)
Vocational full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported on the same
monthly basis as the enrollment for students eligible for basic support, and
payments shall be adjusted for reported vocational enrollments on the same
monthly basis as those adjustments for enrollment for students eligible for
basic support.

(d)
For districts enrolling not more than twenty‑five average annual
full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within
any school district which have been judged to be remote and necessary by the
state board of education and enroll not more than twenty‑five average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8:

(i)
For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76 certificated
instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units for
enrollment of not more than five students, plus one‑twentieth of a certificated
instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled; and

(ii)
For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.32 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of
not more than five students, plus one‑tenth of a certificated
instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled;

(e)
For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than twenty‑five
but not more than one hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in
grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district which
enroll more than twenty‑five average annual full-time equivalent students
in grades K-8 and have been judged to be remote and necessary by the state
board of education:

(i)
For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time equivalent students in
grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated
administrative staff units; and

(ii)
For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time equivalent students in
grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08
certificated administrative staff units;

(f)
For districts operating no more than two high schools with enrollments of less
than three hundred average annual full-time equivalent students, for enrollment
in grades 9-12 in each such school, other than alternative schools:

(i)
For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any grades 9-12 but no
more than twenty‑five average annual full-time equivalent students in grades
K-12, four and one‑half certificated instructional staff units and one‑quarter
of a certificated administrative staff unit;

(ii)
For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine certificated
instructional staff units and one‑half of a certificated administrative
staff unit for the first sixty average annual full time equivalent students,
and additional staff units based on a ratio of 0.8732 certificated
instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated administrative staff units
per each additional forty‑three and one‑half average annual full
time equivalent students.

Units
calculated under (f)(ii) of this subsection shall be reduced by certificated
staff units at the rate of forty‑six certificated instructional staff
units and four certificated administrative staff units per thousand vocational
full-time equivalent students.

(g)
For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than seventy
annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty
students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades 1-8 program, an additional
one-half of a certificated instructional staff unit; and

(h)
For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than fifty annual
average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty
students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades 1-6 program, an additional
one‑half of a certificated instructional staff unit.

(3)
Allocations for classified salaries for the 1997‑98 and 1998‑99
school years shall be calculated using formula‑generated classified staff
units determined as follows:

(a)
For enrollments generating certificated staff unit allocations under subsection
(2)(d) through (h) of this section, one classified staff unit for each three
certificated staff units allocated under such subsections;

(b)
For all other enrollment in grades K-12, including vocational full-time
equivalent enrollments, one classified staff unit for each sixty average annual
full-time equivalent students; and

(c)
For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more than fifty annual
average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty
students, an additional one‑half of a classified staff unit.

(4)
Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of 20.22 percent in
the 1997‑98 and 1998-99 school years for certificated salary allocations
provided under subsection (2) of this section, and a rate of 18.65 percent in
the 1997‑98 and 1998-99 school years for classified salary allocations
provided under subsection (3) of this section.

(5)
Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the maintenance rate
specified in section 504(2) of this act, based on the number of benefit units
determined as follows:

(a)
The number of certificated staff units determined in subsection (2) of this
section; and

(b)
The number of classified staff units determined in subsection (3) of this
section multiplied by 1.152. This factor is intended to adjust allocations so
that, for the purposes of distributing insurance benefits, full-time equivalent
classified employees may be calculated on the basis of 1440 hours of work per
year, with no individual employee counted as more than one full-time
equivalent.

(6)(a)
For nonemployee-related costs associated with each certificated staff unit
allocated under subsection (2)(a), (b), and (d) through (h) of this section,
there shall be provided a maximum of $7,950 per certificated staff unit in the
1997‑98 school year and a maximum of $8,053 per certificated staff unit
in the 1998-99 school year.

(b)
For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational certificated
staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i) of this section, there shall be
provided a maximum of $15,147 per certificated staff unit in the 1997‑98
school year and a maximum of $19,775 per certificated staff unit in the 1998-99
school year.

(c)
For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational certificated
staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(ii) of this section, there shall
be provided a maximum of $15,147 per certificated staff unit in the 1997-98
school year and a maximum of $15,344 per certificated staff unit in the 1998-99
school year.

(7)
Allocations for substitute costs for classroom teachers shall be distributed at
a maintenance rate of $354.64 per allocated classroom teachers exclusive of
salary increase amounts provided in section 504 of this act. Solely for the
purposes of this subsection, allocated classroom teachers shall be equal to the
number of certificated instructional staff units allocated under subsection (2)
of this section, multiplied by the ratio between the number of actual basic
education certificated teachers and the number of actual basic education
certificated instructional staff reported state‑wide for the 1996-97
school year.

(8)
Any school district board of directors may petition the superintendent of
public instruction by submission of a resolution adopted in a public meeting to
reduce or delay any portion of its basic education allocation for any school
year. The superintendent of public instruction shall approve such reduction or
delay if it does not impair the district's financial condition. Any delay
shall not be for more than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have
no impact on levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort
assistance pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.

(9)
The superintendent may distribute a maximum of $6,114,000 outside the basic
education formula during fiscal years 1998 and 1999 as follows:

(a)
For fire protection for school districts located in a fire protection district
as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter 52.04 RCW, a maximum of
$447,000 may be expended in fiscal year 1998 and a maximum of $453,000 may be
expended in fiscal year 1999;

(b)
For summer vocational programs at skills centers, a maximum of $1,948,000 may
be expended each fiscal year;

(c)
A maximum of $318,000 may be expended for school district emergencies; and

(d)
A maximum of $500,000 per fiscal year may be expended for programs providing
skills training for secondary students who are enrolled in extended day school-to-work
programs, as approved by the superintendent of public instruction. The funds
shall be allocated at a rate not to exceed $500 per full-time equivalent
student enrolled in those programs.

(10)
For the purposes of RCW 84.52.0531, the increase per full-time equivalent
student in state basic education appropriations provided under this act,
including appropriations for salary and benefits increases, is 2.5 percent from
the 1996‑97 school year to the 1997‑98 school year, and 1.1 percent
from the 1997‑98 school year to the 1998‑99 school year.

(11)
If two or more school districts consolidate and each district was receiving
additional basic education formula staff units pursuant to subsection (2)(b)
through (h) of this section, the following shall apply:

(a)
For three school years following consolidation, the number of basic education
formula staff units shall not be less than the number of basic education
formula staff units received by the districts in the school year prior to the
consolidation; and

(b)
For the fourth through eighth school years following consolidation, the
difference between the basic education formula staff units received by the
districts for the school year prior to consolidation and the basic education
formula staff units after consolidation pursuant to subsection (2)(a) through
(h) of this section shall be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.

Sec.
503. 1998
c 346 s 504 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR SCHOOL
EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 79,412,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((115,187,000))

114,658,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((194,599,000))

194,070,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
(($174,999,000)) $174,538,000 is provided for a cost of living
adjustment of 3.0 percent effective September 1, 1997, for state formula staff
units. The appropriations include associated incremental fringe benefit
allocations at rates of 19.58 percent for certificated staff and 15.15 percent
for classified staff.

(a)
The appropriations in this section include the increased portion of salaries
and incremental fringe benefits for all relevant state-funded school programs
in part V of this act. Salary adjustments for state employees in the office of
superintendent of public instruction and the education reform program are
provided in part VII of this act. Increases for general apportionment (basic
education) are based on the salary allocation schedules and methodology in
section 502 of this act. Increases for special education result from increases
in each district's basic education allocation per student. Increases for
educational service districts and institutional education programs are
determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the methodology
for general apportionment salaries and benefits in section 502 of this act.

(b)
The appropriations in this section provide salary increase and incremental
fringe benefit allocations based on formula adjustments as follows:

(i)
For pupil transportation, an increase of $0.60 per weighted pupil‑mile
for the 1997‑98 school year and maintained for the 1998-99 school year;

(ii)
For education of highly capable students, an increase of $6.81 per formula
student for the 1997‑98 school year and maintained for the 1998-99 school
year; and

(iii)
For transitional bilingual education, an increase of $17.69 per eligible
bilingual student for the 1997‑98 school year and maintained for the
1998-99 school year; and

(iv)
For learning assistance, an increase of $8.74 per entitlement unit for the 1997‑98
school year and maintained for the 1998-99 school year.

(c)
The appropriations in this section include (($903,000)) $901,000
for salary increase adjustments for substitute teachers at a rate of $10.64 per
unit in the 1997-98 school year and maintained in the 1998-99 school year.

(2)
(($19,600,000)) $19,532,000 is provided for adjustments to
insurance benefit allocations. The maintenance rate for insurance benefit
allocations is $314.51 per month for the 1997-98 and 1998-99 school years. The
appropriations in this section provide for a rate increase to $317.34 per month
for the 1997-98 school year and $335.75 per month for the 1998-99 school year
at the following rates:

(a)
For pupil transportation, an increase of $0.03 per weighted pupil‑mile
for the 1997‑98 school year and $0.19 for the 1998-99 school year;

(b)
For education of highly capable students, an increase of $0.20 per formula
student for the 1997‑98 school year and $1.35 for the 1998-99 school
year;

(c)
For transitional bilingual education, an increase of $.46 per eligible
bilingual student for the 1997‑98 school year and $3.44 for the 1998-99
school year; and

(d)
For learning assistance, an increase of $.36 per funded unit for the 1997‑98
school year and $2.70 for the 1998-99 school year.

(3)
The rates specified in this section are subject to revision each year by the
legislature.

(4)
For the 1997-98 school year, the superintendent shall prepare a report showing
the allowable derived base salary for certificated instructional staff in
accordance with RCW 28A.400.200 and LEAP Document 12D, and the actual derived
base salary paid by each school district as shown on the S-275 report and shall
make the report available to the fiscal committees of the legislature no later
than February 15, 1998.

Sec.
504. 1998
c 346 s 505 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR PUPIL
TRANSPORTATION

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 175,168,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((179,439,000))

175,618,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((354,607,000))

350,786,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation for fiscal year 1998 includes such funds as are necessary for
the remaining months of the 1996‑97 school year.

(2)
A maximum of $1,441,000 may be expended for regional transportation
coordinators and related activities. The transportation coordinators shall
ensure that data submitted by school districts for state transportation funding
shall, to the greatest extent practical, reflect the actual transportation
activity of each district.

(3)
$30,000 of the fiscal year 1998 appropriation and $40,000 of the fiscal year
1999 appropriation are provided solely for the transportation of students
enrolled in "choice" programs. Transportation shall be limited to
low-income students who are transferring to "choice" programs solely
for educational reasons.

(4)
Allocations for transportation of students shall be based on reimbursement
rates of $34.47 per weighted mile in the 1997-98 school year and $34.61 per
weighted mile in the 1998-99 school year exclusive of salary and benefit
adjustments provided in section 504 of this act. Allocations for
transportation of students transported more than one radius mile shall be based
on weighted miles as determined by superintendent of public instruction times
the per mile reimbursement rates for the school year pursuant to the formulas
adopted by the superintendent of public instruction. Allocations for
transportation of students living within one radius mile shall be based on the
number of enrolled students in grades kindergarten through five living within
one radius mile of their assigned school times the per mile reimbursement rate
for the school year times 1.29.

Sec.
505. 1998
c 346 s 507 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR SPECIAL
EDUCATION PROGRAMS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 371,687,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((378,405,000))

377,811,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 143,106,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((893,198,000))

892,604,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation for fiscal year 1998 includes such funds as are necessary for
the remaining months of the 1996‑97 school year.

(2)
The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute state funds to school
districts based on two categories, the optional birth through age two program
for special education eligible developmentally delayed infants and toddlers,
and the mandatory special education program for special education eligible
students ages three to twenty-one. A "special education eligible
student" means a student receiving specially designed instruction in
accordance with a properly formulated individualized education program.

(3)
For the 1997-98 and 1998-99 school years, the superintendent shall distribute
state funds to each district based on the sum of:

(a)
A district's annual average headcount enrollment of developmentally delayed
infants and toddlers ages birth through two, times the district's average basic
education allocation per full-time equivalent student, times 1.15; and

(b)
A district's annual average full-time equivalent basic education enrollment
times the funded enrollment percent determined pursuant to subsection (4)(c) of
this section, times the district's average basic education allocation per
full-time equivalent student times 0.9309.

(4)
The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section.

(a)
"Average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student"
for a district shall be based on the staffing ratios required by RCW
28A.150.260 (i.e., 49/1000 certificated instructional staff in grades K-3, and
46/1000 in grades 4-12) and shall not include enhancements for K-3, secondary
vocational education, or small schools.

(b)
"Annual average full-time equivalent basic education enrollment"
means the resident enrollment including students enrolled through choice (RCW
28A.225.225) and students from nonhigh districts (RCW 28A.225.210) and
excluding students residing in another district enrolled as part of an
interdistrict cooperative program (RCW 28A.225.250).

(c)
"Enrollment percent" means the district's resident special education
annual average enrollment including those students counted under the special
education demonstration projects, excluding the birth through age two
enrollment, as a percent of the district's annual average full-time equivalent
basic education enrollment. For the 1997-98 and the 1998-99 school years, each
district's funded enrollment percent shall be:

(i)
For districts whose enrollment percent for 1994-95 was at or below 12.7 percent,
the lesser of the district's actual enrollment percent for the school year for
which the allocation is being determined or 12.7 percent.

(ii)
For districts whose enrollment percent for 1994-95 was above 12.7 percent, the
lesser of:

(A)
The district's actual enrollment percent for the school year for which the
special education allocation is being determined; or

(B)
The district's actual enrollment percent for the school year immediately prior
to the school year for which the special education allocation is being
determined if greater than 12.7 percent; or

(C)
For 1997-98, the 1994-95 enrollment percent reduced by 75 percent of the
difference between the district's 1994-95 enrollment percent and 12.7 percent
and for 1998-99, 12.7 percent.

(5)
At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15 districts in
which all excess cost services for special education students of the districts
are provided by the cooperative, the maximum enrollment percent shall be 12.7,
and shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual district
units. For purposes of this subsection (4) of this section, the average basic
education allocation per full-time equivalent student shall be calculated in
the aggregate rather than individual district units.

(6)
A maximum of $12,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 1998 and a maximum of $12,000,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided as safety net funding for
districts with demonstrated needs for state special education funding beyond
the amounts provided in subsection (3) of this section. Safety net funding
shall be awarded by the state safety net oversight committee.

(a)
The safety net oversight committee shall first consider the needs of districts
adversely affected by the 1995 change in the special education funding
formula. Awards shall be based on the amount required to maintain the 1994-95
state special education excess cost allocation to the school district in
aggregate or on a dollar per funded student basis.

(b)
The committee shall then consider unusual needs of districts due to a special
education population which differs significantly from the assumptions of the
state funding formula. Awards shall be made to districts that convincingly
demonstrate need due to the concentration and/or severity of disabilities in
the district. Differences in program costs attributable to district philosophy
or service delivery style are not a basis for safety net awards.

(7)
Prior to June 1st of each year, the superintendent shall make available to each
school district from available data the district's maximum funded enrollment
percent for the coming school year.

(8)
The superintendent of public instruction may adopt such rules and procedures as
are necessary to administer the special education funding and safety net award
process. Prior to revising any standards, procedures, or rules in place for
the 1996-97 school year, the superintendent shall consult with the office of
financial management and the fiscal committees of the legislature.

(9)
The safety net oversight committee appointed by the superintendent of public
instruction shall consist of:

(a)
Staff of the office of superintendent of public instruction;

(b)
Staff of the office of the state auditor;

(c)
Staff from the office of ((the)) financial management; and

(d)
One or more representatives from school districts or educational service
districts knowledgeable of special education programs and funding.

(10)
A maximum of $4,500,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation shall
be expended for safety net funding to meet the extraordinary needs of one or
more individual special education students.

(11)
A maximum of $678,000 may be expended from the general fund‑-state
appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1 full-time
equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and medical center. This
amount is in lieu of money provided through the home and hospital allocation
and the special education program.

(12)
A maximum of $1,000,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is
provided for projects to provide special education students with appropriate
job and independent living skills, including work experience where possible, to
facilitate their successful transition out of the public school system. The
funds provided by this subsection shall be from federal discretionary grants.

(13)
A school district may carry over up to 10 percent of general fund‑-state
funds allocated under this program; however, carry over funds shall be expended
in the special education program.

(14)
Beginning in the 1997-98 school year, the superintendent shall increase the
percentage of federal flow-through to school districts to at least 84 percent.
In addition to other purposes, school districts may use increased federal funds
for high cost students, for purchasing regional special education services from
educational service districts, and for staff development activities
particularly relating to inclusion issues.

(15)
Up to one percent of the general fund--federal appropriation shall be expended
by the superintendent for projects related to use of inclusion strategies by
school districts for provision of special education services. The superintendent
shall prepare an information database on laws, best practices, examples of
programs, and recommended resources. The information may be disseminated in a
variety of ways, including workshops and other staff development activities.

(16)
Amounts appropriated within this section are sufficient to fund the provisions
of House Bill No. 2682 (school medicaid incentive payments).

Sec.
506. 1998
c 346 s 508 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR TRAFFIC
SAFETY EDUCATION PROGRAMS

Public
Safety and Education Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((16,883,000))

16,186,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation includes such funds as are necessary for the remaining months
of the 1996-97 school year.

(2)
A maximum of $507,000 shall be expended for regional traffic safety education
coordinators.

(3)
The maximum basic state allocation per student completing the program shall be
$137.16 in the 1997-98 and 1998-99 school years.

(4)
Additional allocations to provide tuition assistance for students from low-income
families who complete the program shall be a maximum of $66.81 per eligible
student in the 1997-98 and 1998-99 school years.

Sec.
507. 1998
c 346 s 509 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR LOCAL
EFFORT ASSISTANCE

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 82,079,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((86,272,000))

83,253,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((168,351,000))

165,332,000

Sec.
508. 1998
c 346 s 510 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR INSTITUTIONAL
EDUCATION PROGRAMS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 16,897,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((18,596,000))

18,567,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 8,548,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((44,041,000))

44,012,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 includes such
funds as are necessary for the remaining months of the 1996‑97 school
year.

(2)
State funding provided under this section is based on salaries and other
expenditures for a 220‑day school year. The superintendent of public
instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans for institutional
education programs to ensure that districts plan for a full-time summer
program.

(3)
State funding for each institutional education program shall be based on the
institution's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment. Staffing
ratios for each category of institution shall remain the same as those funded
in the 1995-97 biennium.

(4)
$1,196,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund--state appropriation is
provided to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6600 (correctional
facilities education programs). If Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6600
is enacted, beginning in the 1998-99 school year, the funded staffing ratios
for education programs for juveniles age 18 or less in department of
corrections facilities shall be the same as those provided for education
programs in delinquent institutions under the department of social and health
services. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1998, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

Sec.
509. 1998
c 346 s 511 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR PROGRAMS
FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 5,701,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((6,121,000))

6,096,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((11,822,000))

11,797,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation for fiscal year 1998 includes such funds as are necessary for
the remaining months of the 1996‑97 school year.

(2)
Allocations for school district programs for highly capable students shall be
distributed at a maximum rate of $311.12 per funded student for the 1997-98
school year and $311.35 per funded student for the 1998-99 school year,
exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments pursuant to section 504 of this
act. The number of funded students shall be a maximum of two percent of each
district's full-time equivalent basic education enrollment.

(3)
$350,000 of the appropriation is for the centrum program at Fort Worden state
park.

(4)
$186,000 of the appropriation is for the odyssey of the mind and future
problem-solving programs.

Sec.
510. 1998
c 346 s 512 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-EDUCATION
REFORM PROGRAMS

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 18,605,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((22,017,000))

21,967,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((40,622,000))

40,572,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
(($17,153,000)) $17,103,000 is provided for the operation of the
commission on student learning and the development and implementation of
student assessments. The commission shall cooperate with the superintendent of
public instruction in defining measures of student achievement to be included
in the student record system developed by the superintendent pursuant to
section 501(1)(b) of this act.

(2)
$2,190,000 is provided solely for training of paraprofessional classroom
assistants and certificated staff who work with classroom assistants as
provided in RCW 28A.415.310.

(3)
$2,970,000 is provided for mentor teacher assistance, including state support
activities, under RCW 28A.415.250 and 28A.415.260. Funds for the teacher
assistance program shall be allocated to school districts based on the number
of beginning teachers.

(4)
$4,050,000 is provided for improving technology infrastructure, monitoring and
reporting on school district technology development, promoting standards for
school district technology, promoting statewide coordination and planning for
technology development, and providing regional educational technology support
centers, including state support activities, under chapter 28A.650 RCW.

(5)
$7,200,000 is provided for grants to school districts to provide a continuum of
care for children and families to help children become ready to learn. Grant
proposals from school districts shall contain local plans designed
collaboratively with community service providers. If a continuum of care
program exists in the area in which the school district is located, the local
plan shall provide for coordination with existing programs to the greatest
extent possible. Grant funds shall be allocated pursuant to RCW 70.190.040.

(6)
$5,000,000 is provided solely for the meals for kids program under RCW
28A.235.145 through 28A.235.155.

(7)
$1,260,000 is provided for technical assistance related to education reform
through the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation
with the commission on student learning, as specified in RCW 28A.300.130
(center for the improvement of student learning).

(8)
$799,000 of the fiscal year 1999 appropriation is provided solely for the
leadership internship program for superintendents, principals, and program
administrators. The purpose of the program is to provide funds to school
districts to provide partial release time for district employees in an
internship with an appropriate mentor. The funds shall be distributed by the
superintendent to school districts subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(i)
The superintendent with the assistance of an advisory board that includes
school administrators and higher education representatives shall select
internship participants giving priority to candidates who intend to serve in
school districts where finding qualified applicants has been difficult.

(ii)
Candidates if accepted in the internship program must agree to seek employment
in Washington after receiving certification, participate in education
improvement training activities, and participate in evaluations of the
effectiveness of the internship program.

(iii)
The maximum amount of state funding for each internship shall not exceed the
daily rate of providing a substitute teacher for the equivalent of up to
forty-five days and the funds shall be used to pay for partial release time
while the school district employee is completing the internship.

(iv)
The superintendent may withhold a maximum of seven percent of the funds for
costs of implementing the program.

Sec.
511. 1998
c 346 s 513 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR TRANSITIONAL
BILINGUAL PROGRAMS

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 30,711,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((32,185,000))

32,825,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((62,896,000))

63,536,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation for fiscal year 1998 provides such funds as are necessary for
the remaining months of the 1996-97 school year.

(2)
The superintendent of public instruction shall study the formula components
proposed for the 1998-99 school year and prepare a report to the legislature no
later than January 15, 1998.

(3)
The superintendent shall distribute a maximum of $643.78 per eligible bilingual
student in the 1997-98 and 1998-99 school years, exclusive of salary and
benefit adjustments provided in section 503 of this act.

Sec.
512. 1998
c 346 s 514 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR THE LEARNING
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 60,224,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((61,000,000))

60,408,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((121,224,000))

120,632,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation for fiscal year 1998 provides such funds as are necessary for
the remaining months of the 1996‑97 school year.

(2)
For making the calculation of the percentage of students scoring in the lowest
quartile as compared with national norms, beginning with the 1991-92 school
year, the superintendent shall multiply each school district's 4th and 8th
grade test results by 0.86.

(3)
Funding for school district learning assistance programs shall be allocated at
maximum rates of $378.33 per funded unit for the 1997-98 school year and
$378.88 per funded unit for the 1998-99 school year exclusive of salary and
benefit adjustments provided in section 504 of this act. School districts may
carryover up to 10 percent of funds allocated under this program; however,
carryover funds shall be expended for the learning assistance program.

(a)
A school district's funded units for the 1997-98 and 1998-99 school years shall
be the sum of the following:

(i)
The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in kindergarten through 6th
grade, times the 5-year average 4th grade test result as adjusted pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section, times 0.92; and

(ii)
The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades 7 through 9, times the
5-year average 8th grade test result as adjusted pursuant to subsection (2) of
this section, times 0.92; and

(iii)
If in the prior school year the district's percentage of October headcount
enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free and reduced price lunch exceeded
the state average, subtract the state average percentage of students eligible
for free and reduced price lunch from the district's percentage and multiply
the result by the district's K-12 annual average full-time equivalent
enrollment for the current school year times 22.30 percent.

Sec.
513. 1998
c 346 s 515 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-LOCAL
ENHANCEMENT FUNDS

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 49,493,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((55,659,000))

55,474,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((105,152,000))

104,967,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
A maximum of (($50,418,000)) $50,317,000 is provided for learning
improvement allocations to school districts to enhance the ability of
instructional staff to teach and assess the essential academic learning
requirements for reading, writing, communication, and math in accordance with
the timelines and requirements established under RCW 28A.630.885. However,
special emphasis shall be given to the successful teaching of reading.
Allocations under this section shall be subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
In accordance with the timetable for the implementation of the assessment
system by the commission on student learning, the allocations for the 1997-98
and 1998-99 school years shall be at a maximum annual rate per full-time
equivalent student of $36.69 for students enrolled in grades K-4, $30.00 for
students enrolled in grades 5-7, and $22.95 for students enrolled in grades
8-12. Allocations shall be made on the monthly apportionment schedule provided
in RCW 28A.510.250.

(b)
A district receiving learning improvement allocations shall:

(i)
Develop and keep on file at each building a student learning improvement plan
to achieve the student learning goals and essential academic learning
requirements and to implement the assessment system as it is developed. The
plan shall delineate how the learning improvement allocations will be used to
accomplish the foregoing. The plan shall be made available to the public upon
request;

(ii)
Maintain a policy regarding the involvement of school staff, parents, and
community members in instructional decisions;

(iii)
File a report by October 1, 1998, and October 1, 1999, with the office of the
superintendent of public instruction, in a format developed by the
superintendent that: Enumerates the activities funded by these allocations;
the amount expended for each activity; describes how the activity improved
understanding, teaching, and assessment of the essential academic learning
requirements by instructional staff; and identifies any amounts expended from
this allocation for supplemental contracts; and

(iv)
Provide parents and the local community with specific information on the use of
this allocation by including in the annual performance report required in RCW
28A.320.205, information on how funds allocated under this subsection were
spent and the results achieved.

(c)
The superintendent of public instruction shall compile and analyze the school
district reports and present the results to the office of financial management
and the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than November 15,
1998, and November 15, 1999.

(2)
(($54,734,000)) $54,650,000 is provided for local education
program enhancements to meet educational needs as identified by the school
district, including alternative education programs. This amount includes such
amounts as are necessary for the remainder of the 1996-97 school year.
Allocations for the 1997-98 school year shall be at a maximum annual rate of
$29.86 per full-time equivalent student and $28.81 per full-time equivalent
student for the 1998-99 school year as determined pursuant to subsection (3) of
this section. Allocations shall be made on the monthly apportionment payment
schedule provided in RCW 28A.510.250.

(3)
Allocations provided under this section shall be based on school district
annual average full-time equivalent enrollment in grades kindergarten through
twelve: PROVIDED, That for school districts enrolling not more than one
hundred average annual full-time equivalent students, and for small school
plants within any school district designated as remote and necessary schools,
the allocations shall be as follows:

(a)
Enrollment of not more than 60 average annual full-time equivalent students in
grades kindergarten through six shall generate funding based on sixty full-time
equivalent students;

(b)
Enrollment of not more than 20 average annual full-time equivalent students in
grades seven and eight shall generate funding based on twenty full-time
equivalent students; and

(c)
Enrollment of not more than 60 average annual full-time equivalent students in
grades nine through twelve shall generate funding based on sixty full-time
equivalent students.

(4)
Funding provided pursuant to this section does not fall within the definition
of basic education for purposes of Article IX of the state Constitution and the
state's funding duty thereunder.

(5)
Receipt by a school district of one-fourth of the district's allocation of
funds under this section, shall be conditioned on a finding by the
superintendent that:

(a)
The district is enrolled as a medicaid service provider and is actively
pursuing federal matching funds for medical services provided through special
education programs, pursuant to RCW 74.09.5241 through 74.09.5256 (Title XIX
funding); and

(b)
The district is filing truancy petitions as required under chapter 312, Laws of
1995 and RCW 28A.225.030.

Sec.
514. 1997
c 454 s 509 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION‑-COMMON
SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999) to the

Common
School Construction Account......... $ 53,050,000

Education
Savings Account Appropriation to the

Common
School Construction Account......... $ ((12,621,000))

78,916,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 131,966,000

Sec.
515. 1997
c 235 s 501 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE
BOARD OF EDUCATION

Public
school building construction (98-2-001)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
From the appropriation in this section the state board shall fund one hundred
percent of the cost for a required standard value engineering study on all
projects exceeding 50,000 gross square feet in size. On an annual basis, the
board shall report to the legislative fiscal committees and the office of
financial management the results of these studies including but not limited to
the amounts of each study and the accepted savings achieved due to the studies.

(2)
No more than $138,000,000 of this appropriation, excluding reappropriations,
may be obligated in fiscal year 1998 for school district project design and
construction.

(3)
Total cash disbursed from the common school construction fund may not exceed
the available cash balance.

(4)
The reappropriation from the state building construction account shall serve as
full compensation to the common school trust for the transfer of land to the
Washington State University Lind Dryland Research Unit under Substitute House
Bill No. 1016 or Senate Bill No. 5174.

(5)
No more than $7,110,000 of this appropriation may be allocated by the state
board to provide up to ninety percent of the total project cost for the
renovation of facilities operating as interdistrict cooperative centers
providing vocational skill programs. The remaining portion of the project cost
shall be a match from local sources. As a condition to receiving an allocation
from this appropriation or any other appropriation for a vocational skill
center provided after calendar year 1996, the recipient facility must maintain
a separate capital account, into which the participating districts make
deposits, to pay for all future minor repair and renovation costs for the
vocational skill center. For purposes of this subsection, a future minor
repair and renovation cost is a capital project costing less than forty percent
of the value of the building.

Reappropriation:

St
Bldg Constr Acct‑-State...... $ 18,329,671

Common
School Constr Fund‑-State $ 109,115,719

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.... $ 127,445,390

Appropriation:

Common
School Constr Fund‑-

State...................... $ ((275,798,712))

289,548,712

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).... $ ((302,821,218))

719,815,320

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs) $ 801,600,000

-------------

TOTAL...................... $ ((1,507,665,320))

1,521,415,320

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 516. A
new section is added to 1997 c 149 (uncodified) to read as follows:

K-12 CARRYFORWARD AND PRIOR SCHOOL YEAR ADJUSTMENTS. State
general fund appropriations provided to the superintendent of public
instruction for state entitlement programs in the public schools may be
expended as needed by the superintendent for adjustments to apportionment for
prior fiscal periods. Recoveries of state general fund moneys from school
districts and educational service districts for a prior fiscal period shall be
made as reductions in apportionment payments for the current fiscal period and
shall be shown as prior year adjustments on apportionment reports for the
current period. Such recoveries shall not be treated as revenues to the state,
but as a reduction in the amount expended against the appropriation for the
current fiscal period.

(End of part)

PART
VI

HIGHER
EDUCATION

Sec.
601. 1998
c 346 s 601 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The
appropriations in sections 603 through 609 of this act are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:

(1)
"Institutions" means the institutions of higher education receiving
appropriations under sections 603 through 609 of this act.

(2)(a)
The salary increases provided or referenced in this subsection shall be the only
allowable salary increases provided at institutions of higher education,
excluding increases associated with normally occurring promotions and increases
related to faculty and professional staff retention, and excluding increases
associated with employees under the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW pursuant
to the provisions of RCW 28B.16.015.

(b)
Each institution of higher education shall provide to each classified staff
employee as defined by the office of financial management a salary increase of
3.0 percent on July 1, 1997. Each institution of higher education shall
provide to instructional and research faculty, exempt professional staff,
academic administrators, academic librarians, counselors, teaching and research
assistants as classified by the office of financial management, and all other
nonclassified staff, including those employees under RCW 28B.16.015, an average
salary increase of 3.0 percent on July 1, 1997. For employees under the
jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW pursuant to the provisions of RCW 28B.16.015,
distribution of the salary increases will be in accordance with the applicable
collective bargaining agreement. However, an increase shall not be provided to
any classified employee whose salary is above the approved salary range maximum
for the class to which the employee's position is allocated. To collect consistent
data for use by the legislature, the office of financial management, and other
state agencies for policy and planning purposes, institutions of higher
education shall report personnel data to be used in the department of
personnel's human resource data warehouse in compliance with uniform reporting
procedures established by the department of personnel.

(c)
Each institution of higher education receiving appropriations under sections
604 through 609 of this act may provide to instructional and research faculty,
exempt professional staff, academic administrators, academic librarians,
counselors, teaching and research assistants, as classified by the office of
financial management, and all other nonclassified staff, but not including
employees under RCW 28B.16.015, an additional average salary increase of 1.0
percent on July 1, 1997, and an average salary increase of 2.0 percent on July
1, 1998. Any salary increases authorized under this subsection (2)(c) shall
not be included in an institution's salary base. It is the intent of the
legislature that general fund‑-state support for an institution shall not
increase during the current or any future biennium as a result of any salary
increases authorized under this subsection (2)(c).

(d)
Specific salary increases authorized in sections 603 through 609 of this act
are in addition to any salary increase provided in this subsection.

(3)(a)
Each institution receiving appropriations under sections 604 through 609 of
this act shall submit plans for achieving measurable and specific improvements
in academic years 1997-98 and 1998-99 to the higher education coordinating
board. The plans, to be prepared at the direction of the board, shall be
submitted by August 15, 1997 (for academic year 1997-98) and June 30, 1998 (for
academic year 1998-99). The following measures and goals will be used for the
1997-99 biennium:

Goal

(i)
Undergraduate graduation efficiency index:

For
students beginning as freshmen 95

For
transfer students 90

(ii)
Undergraduate student retention, defined as the percentage of all undergraduate
students who return for the next year at the same

institution,
measured from fall to fall:

Research
universities 95%

Comprehensive
universities and college 90%

(iii)
Graduation rates, defined as the percentage of an entering

freshmen
class at each institution that graduates within five years:

Research
universities 65%

Comprehensive
universities and college 55%

(iv)
A measure of faculty productivity, with goals and targets in accord with the
legislative intent to achieve measurable and specific improvements, to be
determined by the higher education coordinating board, in consultation with the
institutions receiving appropriations under sections 604 through 609 of this
act.

(v)
An additional measure and goal to be selected by the higher education
coordinating board for each institution, in consultation with each institution.

(b)
Academic year 1995-96 shall be the baseline year against which performance in
academic year 1997-98 shall be measured. Academic year 1997-98 shall be the
baseline year against which performance in academic year 1998-99 shall be
measured. The difference between each institution's baseline year and the
state-wide performance goals shall be calculated and shall be the performance
gap for each institution for each measure for each year. The higher education
coordinating board shall set performance targets for closing the performance
gap for each measure for each institution. Performance targets shall be set at
levels that reflect meaningful and substantial progress towards the state-wide
performance goals. Each institution shall report to the higher education
coordinating board on its actual performance achievement for each measure for
academic year 1997-98 by November 1, 1998.

(4)
The state board for community and technical colleges shall develop an
implementation plan for measurable and specific improvements in productivity,
efficiency, and student retention in academic years 1997-98 and 1998-99
consistent with the performance management system developed by the work force
training and education coordinating board and for the following long-term
performance goals:

Goal

(a)
Hourly wages for vocational graduates $12/hour

(b)
Academic students transferring to Washington

higher
education institutions 67%

(c)
Core course completion rates 85%

(d)
Graduation efficiency index 95

(5)
The state's public institutions of higher education increasingly are being
called upon to become more efficient in conducting the business operations
necessary to support the carrying out of their academic missions. The
legislature recognizes that state laws and regulations may have the unintended
effect of acting as barriers to efficient operation in some instances, and
desires to encourage the institutions of higher education to think beyond the
constraints of current law in identifying opportunities for improved
efficiency. Accordingly, the legislature requests that the institutions of
higher education, working together through the council of presidents' office
and the state board for community and technical colleges, identify
opportunities for changes in state law that would form the basis for a new
efficiency compact with the state, for consideration no later than the 1999
legislative session.

(6)
Pursuant to RCW 43.135.055, institutions of higher education receiving
appropriations under sections 603 through 609 of this act are authorized to
increase summer term tuition in excess of the fiscal growth factor during the
1997-99 fiscal biennium. Tuition levels increased pursuant to this subsection
shall not exceed the per credit hour rate calculated from the academic year
tuition levels established by the legislature in RCW 28B.15.067.

Sec.
602. 1998
c 346 s 603 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE
BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 380,445,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((421,647,000))

421,050,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 11,404,000

Employment
and Training Trust Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 29,114,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((842,610,000))

842,013,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$2,718,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $4,079,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 shall be held in reserve by the board. These funds are provided for
improvements in productivity, efficiency, and student retention. The board may
approve the fiscal year 1998 allocation of funds under this subsection upon
completion of an implementation plan. The implementation plan shall be
submitted by the board to the appropriate legislative committees and the office
of financial management in accordance with section 601(4) of this act by
September 1, 1997. The board may approve the fiscal year 1999 allocation of
funds under this subsection based on the board's evaluation of:

(a)
College performance compared to the goals for productivity, efficiency, and
student retention as submitted in the plan required in section 601(4) of this
act; and

(b)
The quality and effectiveness of the strategies the colleges propose to achieve
continued improvement in quality and efficiency during the 1998-99 academic
year.

(2)
$28,546,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
and the entire employment and training trust account appropriation are provided
solely as special funds for training and related support services, including
financial aid, child care, and transportation, as specified in chapter 226, Laws
of 1993 (employment and training for unemployed workers) and Substitute House
Bill No. 2214.

(a)
Funding is provided to support up to 7,200 full-time equivalent students in
each fiscal year.

(b)
The state board for community and technical colleges shall submit a plan for
the allocation of the full-time equivalent students provided in this subsection
to the workforce training and education coordinating board for review and
approval.

(3)
$1,441,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$1,441,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for 500 FTE enrollment slots to implement RCW 28B.50.259
(timber-dependent communities).

(4)
$1,862,500 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$1,862,500 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for assessment of student outcomes at community and technical
colleges.

(5)
$706,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$706,000 of general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided
solely to recruit and retain minority students and faculty.

(6)
Up to $1,035,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and up to $2,102,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 may be used in combination with salary and benefit savings from faculty
turnover to provide faculty salary increments and associated benefits. To the
extent general salary increase funding is used to pay faculty increments, the
general salary increase shall be reduced by the same amount.

(7)
To address part-time faculty salary disparities and to increase the ratio of
full-time to part-time faculty instructors, the board shall provide salary increases
to part-time instructors or hire additional full-time instructional staff under
the following conditions and limitations: (a) The amount used for such
purposes shall not exceed an amount equivalent to an additional salary increase
of 1.0 percent on July 1, 1997, and an additional salary increase of 2.0
percent on July 1, 1998, for instructional faculty as classified by the office
of financial management; and (b) at least $2,934,000 shall be spent for the
purposes of this subsection.

(8)
$83,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$867,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided for personnel and expenses to develop curricula, library resources,
and operations of Cascadia Community College. It is the legislature's intent
to use the opportunity provided by the establishment of the new institution to
conduct a pilot project of budgeting based on instructional standards and
outcomes. The college shall use a portion of the available funds to develop a
set of measurable standards and outcomes as the basis for budget development in
the 1999-01 biennium.

(9)
The technical colleges may increase tuition and fees to conform with the
percentage increase in community college operating fees enacted by the 1997
legislature. The community colleges may charge up to the maximum level
authorized for services and activities fees in RCW 28B.15.069.

(10)
Community and technical colleges with below-average faculty salaries may use
funds identified by the state board in the 1997-98 and 1998-99 operating
allocations to increase faculty salaries no higher than the system-wide
average.

(11)
$1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$1,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for tuition support for students enrolled in work-based
learning programs.

(12)
$700,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely for a technology equipment matching program for community and
technical colleges. Each college district shall match its allocation of this
appropriation with an equal amount of cash donations from private sources.

(13)
(($125,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 is provided solely to pay the increased employer funding rate resulting
from the settlement in Burbage et al. v. State of Washington (Thurston
county superior court cause no. 94-2-02560-8), as referenced in section
707(1)(c) of this act. If the stipulated settlement is not approved by the
court by August 1, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(14)))
$669,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely to pay the increased employer funding rate resulting from the
settlement in Retired State Employees et al. v. State of Washington
(Thurston county superior court cause no. 92-2-01294-1), as referenced in
section 707(1)(d) of this act. If the stipulated settlement is not approved by
the court by August 1, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

Sec.
603. 1998
c 346 s 604 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR UNIVERSITY
OF WASHINGTON

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 283,923,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((293,988,000))

295,988,000

Death
Investigations Account Appropriation..... $ ((2,162,000))

2,342,000

Industrial
Insurance Premium Refund Account

Appropriation................. ............ $ 514,000

Accident
Account Appropriation.................. $............................. 4,969,000

Medical
Aid Account Appropriation.............. $ 4,989,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((590,545,000))

592,725,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$2,019,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and (($3,029,000))
$2,562,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 shall
be placed in reserve. The office of financial management shall approve the allotment
of amounts under this subsection upon notification by the higher education
coordinating board. These amounts are provided for the preparation of plans
and for the achievement of measurable and specific improvements towards
performance and accountability goals as outlined in section 601(3) of this act.

(2)
$800,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $1,896,000
of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely to
support additional upper-division and graduate level enrollments at the Tacoma
branch campus above the 1996-97 budgeted FTE level.

(3)
$593,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $1,547,000
of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely to support
additional upper-division and graduate level enrollments at the Bothell branch
campus above the 1996-97 budgeted FTE level.

(4)
$186,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $186,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for
assessment of student outcomes.

(5)
$324,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $324,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely to
recruit and retain minority students and faculty.

(6)
$130,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $130,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for the
implementation of the Puget Sound work plan agency action item UW-01.

(7)
$1,200,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$1,200,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided
solely for competitively offered faculty recruitment and retention salary
adjustments. The university shall provide a report in their 1999-01 biennial
operating budget request submittal on the effective expenditure of funds for
the purposes of this subsection.

(8)
$47,000 of the fiscal year 1998 general fund appropriation and $47,000 of the
fiscal year 1999 general fund appropriation are provided solely to employ a
fossil preparator/educator in the Burke Museum. The entire amounts provided in
this subsection shall be provided directly to the Burke Museum.

(9)
$75,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $75,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for
enhancements to research capabilities at the Olympic natural resources center.

(10)
$150,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is provided
solely for remodeling and equipment necessary to accommodate enrollment growth
at the Bothell branch campus.

(11)
$560,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is provided
solely for the disabilities, opportunities, internetworking, and technology
program.

(12)
(($3,000,000)) $6,538,000 of the general fund appropriation for
fiscal year 1999 is provided solely to establish a high speed internet-2 hub.

(13)
$150,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is provided
solely to support the physicians assistant program in Spokane.

(14)
$352,000 of the death investigations account appropriation is provided solely
for staff and equipment for the state toxicology laboratory to support
implementation of quality control procedures and laboratory certification, and
for enhanced screening of sexual assault victims, blood alcohol and volatile
intoxicants analysis, and blood tests for marijuana in driving cases.

(15)
(($74,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 is provided solely to pay the increased employer funding rate resulting
from the settlement in Burbage et al. v. State of Washington (Thurston county
superior court cause no. 94-2-02560-8), as referenced in section 707(1)(c) of
this act. If the stipulated settlement is not approved by the court by August
1, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(16)))
$397,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely to pay the increased employer funding rate resulting from the
settlement in Retired State Employees et al. v. State of Washington (Thurston
county superior court cause no. 92-2-01294-1), as referenced in section
707(1)(d) of this act. If the stipulated settlement is not approved by the
court by August 1, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(16)
$180,000 of the death investigations account appropriation is provided for the
forensic pathologist fellowship program.

Sec.
604. 1998
c 346 s 605 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR WASHINGTON
STATE UNIVERSITY

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 169,894,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((171,125,000))

170,180,000

Air
Pollution Control Account Appropriation.... $ 206,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((341,225,000))

340,280,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$1,204,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and (($1,807,000))
$1,200,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 shall
be placed in reserve. The office of financial management shall approve the
allotment of amounts under this subsection upon notification by the higher
education coordinating board. These amounts are provided for the preparation
of plans and for the achievement of measurable and specific improvements
towards performance and accountability goals as outlined in section 601(3) of
this act.

(2)
$1,059,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is provided
solely to support additional upper-division and graduate level enrollments at
the Vancouver branch campus above the 1996-97 budgeted FTE level.

(3)
$263,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $263,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely to support
additional upper-division and graduate level enrollments at the Tri-Cities
branch campus above the 1996-97 budgeted FTE level.

(4)
$971,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is provided
solely to support additional upper-division and graduate level enrollments at
the Spokane branch campus above the 1996-97 budgeted FTE level.

(5)
$186,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $186,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for
assessment of student outcomes.

(6)
$140,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $140,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely to
recruit and retain minority students and faculty.

(7)
$157,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $157,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for the
implementation of the Puget Sound work plan agency action item WSU-01.

(8)
$600,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $600,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for
competitively offered faculty recruitment and retention salary adjustments.
The university shall provide a report in their 1999-01 biennial operating
budget request submittal on the effective expenditure of funds for the purposes
of this subsection.

(9)
$50,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $50,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for
yellow star thistle research.

(10)
$55,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $55,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for the
Goldendale distance learning center.

(11)
$3,250,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 is provided
solely for legal costs and settlement payments associated with construction
claims for the Vancouver branch campus and the veterinary teaching hospital
capital projects.

(12)
$590,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is provided
solely for the management of the Spokane riverpoint campus as provided in
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6655.

(13)
$100,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund appropriation is provided solely
for the aquatic animal health diagnostic center to accommodate an unanticipated
caseload increase.

(14)
(($43,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 is provided solely to pay the increased employer funding rate resulting
from the settlement in Burbage et al. v. State of Washington (Thurston
county superior court cause no. 94-2-02560-8), as referenced in section
707(1)(c) of this act. If the stipulated settlement is not approved by the
court by August 1, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(15)))
$228,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely to pay the increased employer funding rate resulting from the
settlement in Retired State Employees et al. v. State of Washington
(Thurston county superior court cause no. 92-2-01294-1), as referenced in
section 707(1)(d) of this act. If the stipulated settlement is not approved by
the court by August 1, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

Sec.
605. 1998
c 346 s 606 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR EASTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 39,211,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((39,563,000))

39,460,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((78,774,000))

78,671,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$285,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and (($428,000))
$385,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 shall be
placed in reserve. The office of financial management shall approve the
allotment of amounts under this subsection upon notification by the higher
education coordinating board. These amounts are provided for the preparation
of plans and for the achievement of measurable and specific improvements
towards performance and accountability goals as outlined in section 601(3) of
this act.

(2)
$186,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $186,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for
assessment of student outcomes.

(3)
$93,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $93,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely to
recruit and retain minority students and faculty.

(4)
$53,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$54,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for competitively offered faculty recruitment and retention
salary adjustments. The university shall provide a report in their 1999-01
biennial operating budget request submittal on the effective expenditure of
funds for the purposes of this subsection.

(5)
$3,188,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$3,188,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 shall be
placed in reserve pending attainment of budgeted enrollments of 6,942 FTEs.
The office of financial management shall approve the allotment of funds under
this subsection at the annual rate of $4,000 for annual student FTEs in excess
of 6,942 based on tenth day quarterly enrollment and the office of financial
management's quarterly budget driver report. In addition, allotments of
reserve funds in this section shall be approved by the office of financial
management upon approval by the higher education coordinating board for (a)
actions that will result in additional enrollment growth, and (b) contractual
obligations in fiscal year 1998 to the extent such funds are required.

(6)
Pursuant to section 904 of this act and within current appropriation levels,
the waiver limit for Eastern Washington University is increased from 11 percent
to 14 percent during the 1997-99 fiscal biennium. Eastern Washington
University shall report by December 15, 1998, to the appropriate committees of
the legislature, the office of financial management, and the higher education
coordinating board on its implementation of the increased waiver limit.

(7)
(($12,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 is provided solely to pay the increased employer funding rate resulting
from the settlement in Burbage et al. v. State of Washington (Thurston
county superior court cause no. 94-2-02560-8), as referenced in section
707(1)(c) of this act. If the stipulated settlement is not approved by the
court by August 1, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8)))
$62,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely to pay the increased employer funding rate resulting from the
settlement in Retired State Employees et al. v. State of Washington
(Thurston county superior court cause no. 92-2-01294-1), as referenced in
section 707(1)(d) of this act. If the stipulated settlement is not approved by
the court by August 1, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

Sec.
606. 1998
c 346 s 607 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR CENTRAL
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 37,244,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((38,749,000))

38,767,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((75,993,000))

76,011,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$269,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and (($403,000))
$302,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 shall be
placed in reserve. The office of financial management shall approve the
allotment of amounts under this subsection upon notification by the higher
education coordinating board. These amounts are provided for the preparation
of plans and for the achievement of measurable and specific improvements
towards performance and accountability goals as outlined in section 601(3) of
this act.

(2)
$186,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $186,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for
assessment of student outcomes.

(3)
$70,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $70,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely to
recruit and retain minority students and faculty.

(4)
$51,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $51,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for
competitively offered faculty recruitment and retention salary adjustments.
The college shall provide a report in their 1999-01 biennial operating budget
request submittal on the effective expenditure of funds for the purposes of
this subsection.

(5)
(($11,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 is provided solely to pay the increased employer funding rate resulting
from the settlement in Burbage et al. v. State of Washington (Thurston
county superior court cause no. 94-2-02560-8), as referenced in section
707(1)(c) of this act. If the stipulated settlement is not approved by the
court by August 1, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6)))
$62,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely to pay the increased employer funding rate resulting from the
settlement in Retired State Employees et al. v. State of Washington
(Thurston county superior court cause no. 92-2-01294-1), as referenced in
section 707(1)(d) of this act. If the stipulated settlement is not approved by
the court by August 1, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

Sec.
607. 1998
c 346 s 608 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE
EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 20,401,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((20,596,000))

20,496,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((40,997,000))

40,897,000

The
appropriations in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$144,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and (($217,000))
$153,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 shall be
placed in reserve. The office of financial management shall approve the
allotment of amounts under this subsection upon notification by the higher
education coordinating board. These amounts are provided for the preparation
of plans and for the achievement of measurable and specific improvements
towards performance and accountability goals as outlined in section 601(3) of
this act.

(2)
$186,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $186,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for
assessment of student outcomes.

(3)
$47,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $47,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely to
recruit and retain minority students and faculty.

(4)
$29,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $29,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for
competitively offered faculty recruitment and retention salary adjustments.
The college shall provide a report in their 1999-01 biennial operating budget
request submittal on the effective expenditure of funds for the purposes of
this subsection.

(5)
$35,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is provided
solely for the Washington institute for public policy to conduct a study of
college students' employment. The study shall include, but need not be limited
to, matching student enrollment information with unemployment insurance
information. The office of financial management, higher education coordinating
board, state board for community and technical colleges, and the employment
security department shall assist the institute in the performance of the
study. Results of the study are to be reported to the legislature by January
15, 1999.

(6)
$250,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 is provided
solely for equipment and expenses necessary to accommodate enrollment growth.

(7)
(($7,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
is provided solely to pay the increased employer funding rate resulting from
the settlement in Burbage et al. v. State of Washington (Thurston county
superior court cause no. 94-2-02560-8), as referenced in section 707(1)(c) of
this act. If the stipulated settlement is not approved by the court by August
1, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8)))
$36,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely to pay the increased employer funding rate resulting from the
settlement in Retired State Employees et al. v. State of Washington
(Thurston county superior court cause no. 92-2-01294-1), as referenced in
section 707(1)(d) of this act. If the stipulated settlement is not approved by
the court by August 1, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

Sec.
608. 1998
c 346 s 609 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR WESTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 47,822,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((48,951,000))

48,703,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((96,773,000))

96,525,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$342,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and (($514,000))
$331,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 shall be
placed in reserve. The office of financial management shall approve the
allotment of amounts under this subsection upon notification by the higher
education coordinating board. These amounts are provided for the preparation
of plans and for the achievement of measurable and specific improvements
towards performance and accountability goals as outlined in section 601(3) of
this act.

(2)
$186,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $186,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for
assessment of student outcomes.

(3)
$93,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $93,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely to
recruit and retain minority students and faculty.

(4)
$66,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and $67,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are provided solely for
competitively offered faculty recruitment and retention salary adjustments.
The university shall provide a report in their 1999-01 biennial operating
budget request submittal on the effective expenditure of funds for the purposes
of this subsection.

(5)
(($15,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 is provided solely to pay the increased employer funding rate resulting
from the settlement in Burbage et al. v. State of Washington (Thurston
county superior court cause no. 94-2-02560-8), as referenced in section
707(1)(c) of this act. If the stipulated settlement is not approved by the
court by August 1, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6)))
$81,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely to pay the increased employer funding rate resulting from the
settlement in Retired State Employees et al. v. State of Washington
(Thurston county superior court cause no. 92-2-01294-1), as referenced in
section 707(1)(d) of this act. If the stipulated settlement is not approved by
the court by August 1, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

Sec.
609. 1998
c 346 s 610 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD‑-POLICY
COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998)......... $ 2,809,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999)......... $ ((3,604,000))

3,603,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation.................. $ 704,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ ((7,117,000))

7,116,000

The
appropriations in this section are provided to carry out the accountability,
performance measurement, policy coordination, planning, studies and
administrative functions of the board and are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:

(1)
The board shall set performance targets, review, recommend changes if
necessary, and approve plans defined in section 601(3)(a) of this act for
achieving measurable and specific improvements in academic years 1997-98 and
1998-99. By October 1, 1997, the board shall notify the office of financial
management to allot institutions' fiscal year 1998 performance funds held in
reserve, based upon the adequacy of plans prepared by the institutions.

(2)
The board shall develop criteria to assess institutions' performance and shall
use those criteria in determining the allotment of performance and
accountability funds. The board shall evaluate each institution's achievement
of performance targets for the 1997-98 academic year and, by November 15, 1998,
the board shall notify the office of financial management to allot
institutions' fiscal year 1999 performance funds held in reserve, based upon
each institution's performance.

(3)
By January, 1999, the board shall recommend to the office of financial
management and appropriate legislative committees any recommended additions,
deletions, or revisions to the performance and accountability measures in
sections 601(3) of this act as part of the next master plan for higher
education. The recommendations shall be developed in consultation with the
institutions of higher education and may include additional performance
indicators to measure successful student learning and other student outcomes
for possible inclusion in the 1999-01 operating budget. The recommendations
shall include measures of performance demonstrating specific and measurable
improvements related to distance education and education provided primarily
through technology, to be determined by the board, in consultation with the
institutions of higher education.

(4)
$280,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$280,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
are provided solely for enrollment to implement RCW 28B.80.570 through
28B.80.585 (rural natural resources impact areas). The number of students
served shall be 50 full-time equivalent students per fiscal year. The board
shall ensure that enrollments reported under this subsection meet the criteria
outlined in RCW 28B.80.570 through 28B.80.585.

(5)
$70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$70,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided to develop a competency based admissions system for higher education
institutions. The board shall complete the competency based admissions system
and issue a report outlining the competency based admissions system by January
1999.

(6)
$500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for activities related to higher education facilities planning,
project monitoring, and access issues related to capital facilities. Of this
amount, $50,000 is provided for a study of higher education needs of Okanogan
county and surrounding communities with consideration given to alternative
approaches to educational service delivery, facility expansion, relocation or
partnership, and long-term growth and future educational demands of the region.

(7)
$150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 is
provided solely as one-time funding for computer upgrades.

(8)
$75,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$175,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
are provided solely to conduct a higher education and economic assessment of
the Spokane area as described in Substitute Senate Bill No. 6655.

(9)
$810,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely to complete the cooperative library project for the four-year
public higher education institutions. Funds shall be transferred to the
University of Washington for one-time equipment acquisition, ongoing support of
the system, and acquisition of shared electronic journals for use by all the
member institutions.

(10)
(($1,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999
is provided solely to pay the increased employer funding rate resulting from
the settlement in Burbage et al. v. State of Washington (Thurston county
superior court cause no. 94-2-02560-8), as referenced in section 707(1)(c) of
this act. If the stipulated settlement is not approved by the court by August
1, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(11)))
$3,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 is
provided solely to pay the increased employer funding rate resulting from the
settlement in Retired State Employees et al. v. State of Washington
(Thurston county superior court cause no. 92-2-01294-1), as referenced in
section 707(1)(d) of this act. If the stipulated settlement is not approved by
the court by August 1, 1998, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

Sec.
610. 1998
c 346 s 611 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD‑-FINANCIAL
AID AND GRANT PROGRAMS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 89,606,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ 97,232,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 8,278,000

Advanced
College Tuition Payment Program Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((1,198,000))

1,670,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((196,314,000))

196,786,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$527,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$526,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for the displaced homemakers program.

(2)
$216,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$220,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for the western interstate commission for higher education.

(3)
$118,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $118,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for the health personnel resources plan.

(4)
$1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for the scholarships and loans program under chapter
28B.115 RCW, the health professional conditional scholarship program. This
amount shall be deposited to the health professional loan repayment and
scholarship trust fund to carry out the purposes of the program.

(5)
$86,783,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$93,728,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for student financial aid, including all administrative costs.
The amounts in (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection are sufficient to implement
Second Substitute House Bill No. 1851 (higher education financial aid). Of
these amounts:

(a)
$67,266,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $73,968,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for the state need grant program. After April 1 of
each fiscal year, up to one percent of the annual appropriation for the state
need grant program may be transferred to the state work study program.

(b)
$15,350,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $15,350,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for the state work study program. After April 1 of
each fiscal year, up to one percent of the annual appropriation for the state
work study program may be transferred to the state need grant program;

(c)
$2,420,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $2,420,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for educational opportunity grants. For the purpose
of establishing eligibility for the equal opportunity grant program for
placebound students under RCW 28B.101.020, Thurston county lies within the
branch campus service area of the Tacoma branch campus of the University of
Washington;

(d)
A maximum of 2.1 percent of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 1998 and 2.1 percent of the general fund‑-state appropriation
for fiscal year 1999 may be expended for financial aid administration,
excluding the four percent state work study program administrative allowance
provision;

(e)
$230,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $201,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for the educator's excellence awards. Any educator's
excellence moneys not awarded by April 1st of each year may be transferred by
the board to either the Washington scholars program or, in consultation with
the workforce training and education coordinating board, to the Washington
award for vocational excellence;

(f)
$1,011,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $1,265,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely to implement the Washington scholars program. Any
Washington scholars program moneys not awarded by April 1st of each year may be
transferred by the board to either the educator's excellence awards or, in
consultation with the workforce training and education coordinating board, to
the Washington award for vocational excellence;

(g)
$456,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $474,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely to implement Washington award for vocational
excellence program. Any Washington award for vocational program moneys not
awarded by April 1st of each year may be transferred by the board to either the
educator's excellence awards or the Washington scholars program;

(h)
$51,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998 and
$51,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1999 are
provided solely for community scholarship matching grants of $2,000 each. To
be eligible for the matching grant, a nonprofit community organization
organized under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code must demonstrate
that it has raised $2,000 in new moneys for college scholarships after the
effective date of this act. No organization may receive more than one $2,000
matching grant; and

(6)
$412,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $1,198,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for working capital for the advanced tuition payment
program. The funds provided in this subsection may be expended only to the
extent that revenue from application fees and interest earnings deposited in
the advanced college tuition payment program account are insufficient to
support program operation. Prior to the end of fiscal year 1999, expenditures
shall be transferred between funds to the extent that program application fees
and interest earnings are available to minimize the expenditure from the
general fund.

(7)
$187,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 1998
and $188,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
1999 are provided solely for a demonstration project in the 1997-99 biennium to
provide undergraduate fellowships based upon the graduate fellowship program.

(8) Funding is provided in this section for the development of
three models for tuition charges for distance learning programs. Institutions
involved in distance education or extended learning shall provide information
to the board on the usage, cost, and revenue generated by such programs.

(End of part)

PART
VII

SPECIAL
APPROPRIATIONS

Sec.
701. 1998
c 346 s 701 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES:
FOR GENERAL FUND BOND DEBT

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 448,355,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((484,005,000))

478,444,000

General
Fund Bonds Subject to the Limit Bond

Retirement
Account Appropriation........... $ ((932,360,000))

926,799,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((1,864,720,000))

1,853,598,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The general fund appropriation is for deposit into the general
fund bonds subject to the limit bond retirement account.

Sec.
702. 1998
c 346 s 702 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES:
FOR GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 23,186,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((25,642,000))

25,626,000

General
Fund Bonds Excluded from the Limit

Bond
Retirement Account Appropriation...... $ ((48,828,000))

48,812,000

Reimbursable
Bonds Excluded from the Limit Bond

Retirement
Account Appropriation........... $ 104,933,000

Reimbursable
Bonds Subject to the Limit Bond

Retirement
Account Appropriation........... $ 2,264,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((204,853,000))

204,821,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The general fund appropriation is for deposit into the general
fund bonds excluded from the limit bond retirement account.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 703. A
new section is added to 1997 c 149 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-AGRICULTURAL
SCHOOLS TRUST LANDS. The sum of twenty million
dollars is appropriated from the general fund for fiscal year 1999 to the
office of financial management for settlement of claims relating to moneys used
by the department of natural resources for management of the agricultural
schools trust lands. This appropriation is contingent upon release of claims
against the department of natural resources and the state of Washington
pertaining to the Morrill act. The total cost of the settlement shall not
exceed the amount appropriated in this section. If such release is not
executed by June 30, 1999, the appropriation in this section shall lapse.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 704. A
new section is added to 1997 c 149 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE DISASTER
RESPONSE ACCOUNT. The sum of three million
dollars is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 1999, from the
general fund to the disaster response account for the purpose of creating a
contingency pool to fund fire-related costs. Allocations may be provided from
the disaster response account for fire mobilization costs or fire suppression
costs in excess of the amounts appropriated for these purposes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 705. A new
section is added to 1997 c 149 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-FIRE-RELATED
CONTINGENCY COSTS. The sum of three million
dollars is appropriated from the disaster response account for the purpose of
making allocations for fire mobilization costs or fire suppression costs in
excess of the amounts appropriated for these purposes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 706. A
new section is added to 1997 c 149 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES CAPITAL PROJECTS ACCOUNT. The
sum of thirty million dollars is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June
30, 1999, from the general fund to the community and technical colleges capital
projects account for system-wide minor repairs and replacement of portable
buildings.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 707. A
new section is added to 1997 c 149 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE FAIR
FUND. The sum of six million dollars is appropriated for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 1999, from the general fund to the fair fund for
the purposes set forth under RCW 15.76.115. Of this amount, up to two million
dollars shall be allotted from the fair fund for each of the fiscal years
ending June 30, 1999, June 30, 2000, and June 30, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 708. A
new section is added to 1997 c 149 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES ENDOWMENT TRUST FUND. The sum of five million
dollars is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 1999, from the
general fund to the developmental disabilities endowment trust fund, solely for
implementation of sections 4, 5, and 7 of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5693. If
sections 4, 5, and 7 of the bill are not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount
appropriated in this section shall lapse.

Sec.
709. 1998
c 346 s 704 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE OFFICE
OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-YEAR 2000 ALLOCATIONS

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 2,883,000

Liquor
Revolving Account Appropriation......... $ 131,000

Health
Care Authority Administrative Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 631,000

Accident
Account Appropriation.................. $............................. 1,102,000

Medical
Aid Account Appropriation.............. $ 1,102,000

Unemployment
Compensation Administration Account--

Federal
Appropriation...................... $ 1,313,000

Employment
Services Administrative Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 461,000

Forest
Development Account Appropriation........ $ 156,000

Off
Road Vehicle Account Appropriation......... $ 7,000

Surveys
and Maps Account Appropriation......... $ 1,000

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation $ 8,000

Resource
Management Cost Account Appropriation. $ 348,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 8,143,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriations will be allocated by the office of financial management to
agencies to complete Year 2000 date conversion maintenance on their computer
systems. Agencies shall submit their estimated costs of conversion to the
office of financial management by July 1, 1997.

(2)
Up to $10,000,000 of the cash balance of the data processing revolving account
may be expended on agency Year 2000 date conversion costs, embedded chips,
and contingency activities. The $10,000,000 will be taken from the cash
balances of the data processing revolving account's two major users, as
follows: $7,000,000 from the department of information services and $3,000,000
from the office of financial management. The office of financial management in
consultation with the department of information services shall allocate these
funds as needed to complete the date conversion projects.

(3)
Agencies receiving these allocations shall report at a minimum to the
information services board and to the governor every six months on the progress
of Year 2000 maintenance efforts.

Sec.
710. 1998
c 346 s 705 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-YEAR
2000 CONVERSION

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)................ $ 233,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)................ $ 33,000

Hospital
Commission Account Appropriation........... $ 115,000

Architects'
License Account Appropriation........... $ 3,000

Professional
Engineers' Account Appropriation........ $ 9,000

Real
Estate Commission Account Appropriation........ $ 24,000

Health
Professions Account Appropriation............. $ 275,000

Master
License Account Appropriation................ $ 70,000

Safe
Drinking Water Account Appropriation........... $ 50,000

Uniform
Commercial Code Account Appropriation........ $ 11,000

Unemployment
Compensation Administration Account‑-

Federal
Appropriation........................... $ 3,245,000

Department
of Retirement Systems Expense Account

Appropriation................................... $ 890,000

Health
Services Account Appropriation............... $ 254,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 5,212,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriations will be allocated by the office of financial management to
agencies to perform Year 2000 date conversion maintenance on their computer
systems, embedded chips, and contingency activities and are provided
solely for these purposes.

(2)
Agencies receiving these allocations shall report at a minimum to the
information services board and to the governor every six months on the progress
of Year 2000 maintenance efforts.

Sec.
711. 1998
c 346 s 706 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-YEAR
2000 CONTINGENCY POOL

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)................ $ 800,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)................ $ 4,200,000

Year
2000 Contingency Revolving Account

Appropriation................................... $ 5,000,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 10,000,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriations will be allocated by the office of financial management, in
consultation with the department of information systems or the department of
general administration, to agencies to perform Year 2000 maintenance on
their computer systems, embedded chips, and contingency activities and
are provided solely for these purposes.

(2)
To facilitate the transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and accounts, the
state treasurer is directed to transfer sufficient moneys from each dedicated
fund or account to the Year 2000 contingency revolving account, hereby created
in the state treasury, in accordance with schedules provided by the office of
financial management for additional Year 2000 maintenance on their computer
systems.

(3)
All agencies that receive these allocations will report upon request throughout
the biennium to the information services board and to the governor on the
progress of Year 2000 maintenance efforts.

Sec.
712. 1998
c 346 s 707 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE GOVERNOR‑-COMPENSATION‑-INSURANCE
BENEFITS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1998).... $ 823,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 1999).... $ ((8,355,000))

8,025,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((3,152,000))

3,039,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ ((190,000))

183,000

Salary
and Insurance Increase Revolving Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((7,081,000))

6,827,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((19,601,000))

18,897,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)(a)
The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums shall not
exceed $312.35 per eligible employee for fiscal year 1998, and $331.31 for
fiscal year 1999.

(b)
The monthly employer funding rate for the operating costs of the health care
authority shall not exceed $4.99 per eligible employee for fiscal year 1998,
and $4.67 for fiscal year 1999.

(c)
((An additional $1.12 per eligible employee shall be included in the
employer funding rate for fiscal year 1999 to increase life insurance coverage
in accordance with the stipulated settlement in Burbage et al. v. State of
Washington (Thurston county superior court cause no. 94-2-02560-8).
$330,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state appropriation,
$113,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation, $7,000 of the
general fund‑-private/local appropriation, and $254,000 of the salary and
insurance increase revolving account appropriation are provided solely for the
additional $1.12 employer funding rate. If the stipulated settlement is not
approved by August 1, 1998, these amounts shall lapse.

(d))) An
additional $5.77 per eligible employee shall be included in the employer
funding rate for fiscal year 1999 to begin repaying the public employees' and
retirees' insurance account for any claims paid as a result of a court-approved
stipulated settlement in Retired State Employees et al. v. State of
Washington (Thurston county superior court cause no. 92-2-01294-1).
$1,768,000 of the fiscal year 1999 general fund‑-state appropriation,
$608,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation, $37,000 of the
general fund‑-private/local appropriation, and $1,362,000 of the salary
and insurance increase revolving account appropriation are provided solely for
the additional $5.77 employer funding rate. If the stipulated settlement is
not approved by August 1, 1998, these amounts shall lapse.

(((e)))
(d) Surplus moneys accruing to the public employees' and retirees'
insurance account due to lower-than-projected insurance costs may not be
reallocated by the health care authority to increase the actuarial value of
public employee insurance plans. Such funds shall be held in reserve in the
public employees' and retirees' insurance account and may not be expended
without prior legislative authorization.

(((f)))
(e) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health
benefits, the public employees' benefits board may require employee premium
co-payments, increase point-of-service cost sharing, and/or implement managed
competition.

(2)
To facilitate the transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and accounts, the
state treasurer is directed to transfer sufficient moneys from each dedicated
fund or account to the special fund salary and insurance contribution increase
revolving fund in accordance with schedules provided by the office of financial
management.

(3)
The health care authority, subject to the approval of the public employees'
benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health benefit premiums to eligible
retired or disabled public employees and school district employees who are
eligible for parts A and B of medicare, pursuant to RCW 41.05.085. From
January 1, 1998, through December 31, 1998, the subsidy shall be $41.26 per
month. Starting January 1, 1999, the subsidy shall be $43.16 per month.

(4)
Technical colleges, school districts, and educational service districts shall
remit to the health care authority for deposit in the public employees' and
retirees' insurance account established in RCW 41.05.120:

(a)
For each full-time employee, $14.80 per month beginning September 1, 1997;

(b)
For each part-time employee who, at the time of the remittance, is employed in
an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.32.010 or 41.40.010 and is eligible
for employer fringe benefit contributions for basic benefits, $14.80 each month
beginning September 1, 1997, prorated by the proportion of employer fringe
benefit contributions for a full-time employee that the part-time employee
receives.

The
remittance requirements specified in this subsection shall not apply to
employees of a technical college, school district, or educational service district
who purchase insurance benefits through contracts with the health care
authority.

(5)
The salary and insurance increase revolving account appropriation includes
amounts sufficient to fund health benefits for ferry workers at the premium
levels specified in subsection (1) of this section, consistent with the 1997-99
transportation appropriations act.

Sec.
713. 1998
c 346 s 710 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-COMPENSATION
ACTIONS OF PERSONNEL RESOURCES BOARD

General
Fund--State Appropriation (FY 1998)......... $ 5,289,000

General
Fund--State Appropriation (FY 1999)......... $ 10,642,000

General
Fund--Federal Appropriation.................. $.................................. ((2,777,000))

2,803,000

Salary
and Insurance Increase Revolving

Account
Appropriation........................... $ ((6,085,000))

6,059,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 24,793,000

The
appropriations in this section shall be expended solely for the purposes
designated in this section and are subject to the conditions and limitations in
this section.

(1)
Funding is provided to fully implement the recommendations of the Washington
personnel resources board consistent with the provisions of chapter 319, Laws
of 1996.

(2)
Implementation of the salary adjustments for the various clerical classes,
physicians, dental classifications, pharmacists, maintenance custodians,
medical records technicians, fish/wildlife biologists, fish/wildlife
enforcement, habitat technicians, and fiscal technician classifications will be
effective July 1, 1997. Implementation of the salary adjustments for safety
classifications, park rangers, park aides, correctional officers/sergeants,
community corrections specialists, tax information specialists, industrial
relations specialists, electrical classifications at the department of labor
and industries, fingerprint technicians, some labor relations classifications,
health benefits specialists, foresters/land managers, and liquor enforcement
officers will be effective July 1, 1998.

Sec.
714. 1997
c 149 s 713 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS‑-CONTRIBUTIONS
TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The ((appropriations)) state contributions to the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system shall be made on
a monthly basis consistent with chapter 41.45 RCW.

(1)
There is appropriated for state contributions to the law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' retirement system:

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 68,350,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ ((72,750,000))

71,350,000

Of
the appropriations in this subsection, $50,000 of the general fund fiscal year
1998 appropriation and $50,000 of the general fund fiscal year 1999
appropriation are provided solely for House Bill No. 1099 (LEOFF retirement
plan I). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1997, these amounts shall
lapse.

(2)
There is appropriated for contributions to the judicial retirement system:

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 8,500,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ 8,500,000

(3)
There is appropriated for contributions to the judges retirement system:

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1998)........... $ 750,000

General
Fund Appropriation (FY 1999)........... $ 750,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((159,600,000))

158,200,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 715. A
new section is added to 1997 c 149 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
SUNDRY
CLAIMS. The following sums, or so much thereof as may be
necessary, are appropriated from the general fund, unless otherwise indicated,
for relief of various individuals, firms, and corporations for sundry claims.
These appropriations are to be disbursed on vouchers approved by the director
of general administration, except as otherwise provided, as follows:

(1)
Reimbursement of criminal defendants acquitted on the basis of self-defense,
pursuant to RCW 9A.16.110:

(a)
Heather S. Lausten, claim number SCJ 98-02 $ 2,089

(b)
Michael A. McGee, claim number SCJ 98-03 $ 10,364

(c)
Arthur Watkins, claim number SCJ 98-05 $ 2,767

(d)
Lukes Markishtum, claim number SCJ 98-06 $ 3,832

(e)
Francesco Cozza, claim number SCJ 98-07 $ 10,862

(f)
Jason Brown, claim number SCJ 98-08 $ 21,093

(g)
Darius Deshields, claim number SCJ 98-10 $ 4,000

(h)
Justin D. Rogers, claim number SCJ 98-11 $ 52,114

(i)
Justin Anderson, claim number SCJ 98-12 $ 3,769

(j)
R. L. Heaverlo, claim number SCJ 98-13 $ 2,145

(k)
James A. Patten, claim number SCJ 98-14 $ 6,963

(l)
Robert S. Cain, claim number SCJ 98-15 $ 2,169

(m)
Jason Near, claim number SCJ 98-16 $ 4,304

(n)
Michael Fontana, claim number SCJ 98-17 $ 3,201

(o)
Hillel Schwartz, claim number SCJ 98-18 $ 5,758

(p)
Thomas H. Von Muller, claim number SCJ 99-01 $ 17,941

(q)
Dean Montgomery, claim number SCJ 99-03 $ 2,432

(r)
Douglas H. Jones, claim number SCJ 99-05 $ 17,116

(s)
Jack Zimmerman; George A. Bomar; George W. Bomar,

claim
number SCJ 99-06 $ 9,718

(2)
Payment from the state wildlife account for damage to crops by wildlife,
pursuant to RCW 77.36.040:

(a)
Gordon Sylvester, claim number SCG 98-03 $ 6,925

(b)
Northwestern Fruit & Produce Company,

claim
number SCG 99-01 $ 30,040

Sec.
716. 1998
c 346 s 714 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑‑FOR THE MUNICIPAL
CRIMINAL JUSTICE ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT

Impaired
Driving Safety Account Appropriation ...... $ 480,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The amount appropriated in this section shall be distributed ((in accordance
with RCW 82.14.320)) to all cities ratably based on population as last
determined by the office of financial management. The distributions to any
city that substantially decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July
1, 1990, and that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with
criminal cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county
in which the city is located. $240,000 of the appropriation shall be
distributed in January 1999 and the remaining $240,000 of the appropriation
shall be distributed in April 1999. This funding is provided to cities for the
costs of implementing criminal justice legislation including, but not limited
to, Substitute House Bill No. 2885 (drunk driving penalties), Second Substitute
House Bill No. 3070 (DUI penalties), Second Substitute House Bill No. 3089
(deferred prosecution), Engrossed Senate Bill No. 6142 (DUI/license
suspension), Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6165 (ignition interlock
violations), Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6166 (DUI penalties),
Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 6187 (DUI penalties), Engrossed Senate
Bill No. 6257 (intoxication levels lowered), and Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 6293 (DUI penalties).

(2)
To implement the 1999 amendments to this section, the state treasurer shall
determine the amount of the April 1999 distribution to each city in the
following manner:

(a)
The state treasurer shall determine the amount of the total appropriation that
would have been distributed to each city if both the January 1999 and April
1999 distributions were made ratably based on population;

(b)
The state treasurer shall deduct from the amounts calculated under (a) of this
subsection the amount received by each city in the January 1999 distribution;

(c)
The amount to be distributed to each city shall be the amount calculated under
subsection (b) of this section if that amount is greater than zero; and

(d) If the appropriation in this section is inadequate to
distribute the amounts calculated under (c) of this subsection, the amounts
distributed to each city shall be ratably reduced.

(End of part)

PART
VIII

OTHER
TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS

Sec.
801. 1998
c 346 s 801 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-STATE
REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

General
Fund Appropriation for fire insurance

premiums
distribution...................... $ ((6,617,250))

5,645,404

General
Fund Appropriation for public utility

district
excise tax distribution........... $ ((35,183,803))

32,201,185

General
Fund Appropriation for prosecuting attorneys

salaries................................... $ ((2,960,000))

2,879,908

General
Fund Appropriation for motor vehicle excise

tax
distribution........................... $ ((84,721,573))

60,839,289

City
Police and Fire Protection Assistance Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 23,882,284

General
Fund Appropriation for local mass transit

assistance.................... ............ $ ((383,208,166))

284,666,379

General
Fund Appropriation for camper and travel

trailer
excise tax distribution............. $ ((3,904,937))

3,779,292

General
Fund Appropriation for boating

safety/education
and law enforcement

distribution............................... $ ((3,616,000))

3,750,381

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation

for
harbor improvement revenue distribution $ ((142,000))

152,342

Liquor
Excise Tax Account Appropriation for liquor

excise
tax distribution.................... $ ((22,287,746))

24,134,742

Liquor
Revolving Fund Appropriation for liquor

profits
distribution....................... $ ((36,989,000))

50,199,076

Timber
Tax Distribution Account Appropriation

for
distribution to "Timber" counties...... $ ((107,146,000))

85,930,224

Municipal
Sales and Use Tax Equalization Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((66,860,014))

67,308,480

County
Sales and Use Tax Equalization Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((11,843,224))

11,183,832

Death
Investigations Account Appropriation for

distribution
to counties for publicly funded

autopsies.................................. $ ((1,266,000))

1,365,401

County
Criminal Justice Account Appropriation... $........................................... 81,354,471

Municipal
Criminal Justice Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 32,522,450

County
Public Health Account Appropriation..... $ ((44,279,086))

49,012,899

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((924,901,720))

820,808,039

The
total expenditures from the state treasury under the appropriations in this
section shall not exceed the funds available under statutory distributions for
the stated purposes.

Sec.
802. 1998
c 346 s 802 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

WILDLIFE
ACCOUNT LOAN. On June 30, 1998, the state treasurer shall
lend three million five hundred thousand dollars from the state general fund to
the wildlife account. Expenditure of funds is dependent upon the following
conditions:

(1)
By April 17, 1998, the department of fish and wildlife shall submit an
expenditure reduction plan for the 1997-99 biennium for the state wildlife
account to the office of financial management, the senate ways and means
committee, and the house of representatives appropriations committee. The plan
shall specify positions to be eliminated by program. The reductions shall be
limited to activities currently funded by the wildlife account.

(2)
By April 17, 1998, the department of fish and wildlife shall submit a list of
properties proposed for sale, with a site description of each property, to the
office of financial management, the senate ways and means committee, and the
house of representatives appropriations committee.

(3)
Beginning with the fourth quarter of fiscal year 1998, the department of fish
and wildlife shall submit quarterly revenue and expenditure reports for the
wildlife account to the office of financial management, the senate ways and
means committee, and the house of representatives appropriations committee.

(4)
The department of fish and wildlife shall develop, with the office of financial
management and the department of revenue, a model for forecasting revenues to
the state wildlife account. This forecast shall be incorporated into the
quarterly revenue and expenditure reports.

(5)
By ((November 1, 1998)) June 30, 1999, the department of fish and
wildlife shall submit a six-year financial plan for the state wildlife account
for fiscal years 1999-05 to the office of financial management, the senate ways
and means committee, and the house of representatives appropriations
committee. The plan shall include repayment of this loan by June 30, 2001.

Failure
to comply with the terms and conditions of this section shall cause the loan to
be immediately payable.

Sec.
803. 1997
c 149 s 802 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-FEDERAL
REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

Forest
Reserve Fund Appropriation for federal forest

reserve
fund distribution.................. $ ((58,801,910))

56,515,669

General
Fund Appropriation for federal flood control

funds
distribution.. ...................... $ 4,000

General
Fund Appropriation for federal grazing fees

distribution............................... $ ((52,000))

22,102

General
Fund Appropriation for distribution of

federal
funds to counties in conformance with

P.L.
97-99 Federal Aid to Counties......... $ ((885,916))

1,629,491

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((59,743,826))

58,171,262

The
total expenditures from the state treasury under the appropriations in this
section shall not exceed the funds available under statutory distributions for
the stated purposes.

Sec.
804. 1998
c 346 s 803 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-TRANSFERS

General
Fund: For transfer to the Water Quality

Account.................................... $ ((28,595,900))

29,379,600

General
Fund: For transfer to the Flood Control

Assistance
Account......................... $ 4,000,000

State
Convention and Trade Center Account: For

transfer
to the State Convention and Trade

Center
Operations Account.................. $ ((3,877,000))

0

Water
Quality Account: For transfer to the Water

Pollution
Control Account. Transfers shall be

made
at intervals coinciding with deposits of

federal
capitalization grant money into the

account.
The amounts transferred shall not

exceed
the match required for each federal

deposit.................................... $ 21,688,000

State
Treasurer's Service Account: For transfer to

the
general fund on or before June 30, 1999 an

amount
up to $3,600,000 in excess of the cash

requirements
of the State Treasurer's Service

Account........ ........................... $ 3,600,000

Public
Works Assistance Account: For transfer to

the
Drinking Water Assistance Account...... $ 9,949,000

County Sales and Use Tax Equalization Account:

For transfer to the County Public Health

Account.................................... $ ((2,191,498))

2,146,222

(End of part)

PART
IX

MISCELLANEOUS

Sec.
901. 1998
c 347 s 53 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

ACQUISITION
OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS. The
following agencies may enter into financial contracts, paid for from operating
revenues, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts
indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section, agencies shall use the
most economical financial contract option available, including long-term
leases, lease-purchase agreements, lease-development with option to purchase
agreements or financial contracts using certificates of participation. The
director of general administration shall ensure that the clustering of state
facilities and the collocation and consolidation of state agencies take place
where such configurations are economical and consistent with agency space
needs. Agencies shall assist the department of general administration with
facility collocation and consolidation efforts.

State
agencies may enter into agreements with the department of general
administration and the state treasurer's office to develop requests to the
legislature for acquisition of properties and facilities through financial
contracts. The agreements may include charges for services rendered.

(1)
Department of general administration:

(a)
Enter into a financing contract in the amount of $8,804,000 plus financing
expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW, to purchase an
existing office building and associated land in Yakima for use by the
department of social and health services.

(b)
Enter into a financing contract in the amount of $2,874,100 plus financing
expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW, to purchase and
renovate the old federal building and associated land in Olympia for use by the
secretary of state.

(c)
Enter into a financing contract in the amount of $6,990,000 plus financing
expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW, to buy out the
lease and make improvements to the old Thurston county courthouse for use by
the office of attorney general. The department of general administration shall
advise and assist the office of attorney general on space and functional
planning to improve the efficient use of the facility.

(2)
Liquor control board:

Enter
into a long-term lease for a headquarters office in Thurston County for
approximately 46,000 square feet.

(3)
Department of corrections:

(a)
Enter into a long-term ground lease ((for 17 acres in the Tacoma tide flats
property from the Puyallup Nation)) or a long-term lease with a purchase
option for development of the ((400-bed)) Tacoma prerelease facility
for approximately $360,000 per annum. ((Prior to entering into the lease,
the department shall obtain written confirmation from the city of Tacoma and
Pierce county that the prerelease facility planned for the site meets all land
use, environmental protection, and community notification requirements that
would apply to the facility if the land was not owned by the Puyallup nation.))

(b)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of the department of corrections in
the amount of $14,736,900 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a 400-bed Tacoma prerelease
facility. The department of corrections shall comply with all land use,
environmental protection, and community notification statutes, regulations, and
ordinances in the construction and operation of this facility.

(c)
Lease-develop with the option to purchase or lease-purchase approximately 100
work release beds in facilities throughout the state for $5,000,000.

(d)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of the department of corrections in
the amount of $396,369 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a dairy barn at the Monroe farm.

(e)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of the department of corrections in
the amount of $2,100,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase or construct a correctional industries
transportation services warehouse.

(4)
Community and technical colleges:

(a)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Whatcom Community College in the
amount of $800,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to develop a childcare center costing $2,410,000. The
balance of project cost will be a combination of local capital funds and
nonstate funds provided through private gifts or contributions.

(b)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Pierce College in the amount of
$750,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW to develop a new classroom building on the Lakewood campus costing
$1,816,665. The balance of project cost will be provided through a combination
of local capital funds and existing minor works appropriation to replace
relocatable classrooms that are at the end of their useful lives.

(c)
Enter into a financing contract in behalf of Bellingham Technical College in
the amount of $350,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW for construction of a new classroom addition to the
diesel/heavy equipment instructional shop costing $411,309.

(d)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Green River Community College in
the amount of $1,526,150 plus financing expenses and reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for remodel of the Lindbloom student center building.

(e)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Edmonds Community College in the
amount of $2,787,950 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to develop a 10,000 square foot music building on the college
campus.

(f)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Highline Community College in the
amount of $2,070,613 plus financing and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW for the purchase of the Federal Way Center, currently being leased by
the college.

(g)
Enter into a financial contract on behalf of Green River Community College in
the amount of $100,000 plus financing and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW to purchase approximately 1.5 acres of land adjacent to the westside
parking lot.

(h)
Enter into a financial contract on behalf of South Puget Sound Community
College in the amount of $619,210 plus financing and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW to expand and redevelop the main campus parking lot A.

(i)
Enter into a financial contract on behalf of South Puget Sound Community
College in the amount of $5,500,000 plus financing and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to develop a $6,500,000 student union facility.

(j)
Enter into a financial contract on behalf of Wenatchee Valley College in the
amount of $500,000 plus financing and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW to purchase two buildings and property contiguous to the college
campus.

(5)
State parks and recreation:

Enter
into a financing contract on behalf of state parks and recreation in the amount
of $2,012,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW, to construct cabin and lodge facilities at Cama Beach, develop new
campsite electrical hookups, develop new recreational facilities, and expand
campsites at Ocean Beach/Grayland. It is the intent of the legislature that
debt service on all projects financed under this authority be paid from
operating revenues.

(6)
Washington state patrol:

Enter
into a financing contract for $600,000 plus financing expenses and required
reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase the Washington state patrol
Port Angeles detachment office.

Sec.
902. RCW
72.09.050 and 1995 c 189 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
secretary shall manage the department of corrections and shall be responsible
for the administration of adult correctional programs, including but not
limited to the operation of all state correctional institutions or facilities
used for the confinement of convicted felons. In addition, the secretary shall
have broad powers to enter into agreements with any federal agency, or any
other state, or any Washington state agency or local government providing for
the operation of any correctional facility or program for persons convicted of
felonies or misdemeanors or for juvenile offenders. Such agreements for
counties with local law and justice councils shall be required in the local law
and justice plan pursuant to RCW 72.09.300. The agreements may provide for
joint operation or operation by the department of corrections, alone, for by
any of the other governmental entities, alone. Beginning February 1, 1999,
the secretary may expend funds appropriated for the 1997-1999 biennium to enter
into agreements with any local government or private organization in any other
state, providing for the operation of any correctional facility or program for
persons convicted of felonies. The secretary may employ persons to aid in
performing the functions and duties of the department. The secretary may
delegate any of his or her functions or duties to department employees,
including the authority to certify and maintain custody of records and
documents on file with the department. The secretary is authorized to
promulgate standards for the department of corrections within appropriation
levels authorized by the legislature.

Pursuant
to the authority granted in chapter 34.05 RCW, the secretary shall adopt rules
providing for inmate restitution when restitution is determined appropriate as
a result of a disciplinary action.

Sec.
903. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

Sec. 904. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

(End of part)

INDEX PAGE
#

ADMINISTRATOR
FOR THE COURTS.................................... 4

ATTORNEY GENERAL............................................... 11

BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY........................................... 24

CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY................................. 140

CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON
SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS......... 11

COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL
CONDUCT.................................. 4

COURT OF APPEALS................................................ 4

DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY,
TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT....... 16

DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS...................................... 68

DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY.......................................... 74

DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND
WILDLIFE................................ 81

DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION........................... 15

DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH........................................... 62

DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND
INDUSTRIES............................. 59

DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING........................................ 91

DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL
RESOURCES................................ 87

DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT
SYSTEMS

CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT
SYSTEMS........................... 158

OPERATIONS..................................................... 14

DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND
HEALTH SERVICES....................... 27

ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING
SERVICES PROGRAM................. 54

AGING AND ADULT SERVICES
PROGRAM............................... 45

ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE
PROGRAM............................ 51

CHILD SUPPORT PROGRAM.......................................... 56

CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
PROGRAM........................... 28

DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
PROGRAM............................. 42

ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM...................................... 49

JUVENILE REHABILITATION
PROGRAM................................ 33

MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM..................................... 52

MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM.......................................... 37

PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES
PROGRAM............................. 57

VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION
PROGRAM.............................. 54

DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS
AFFAIRS................................. 61

DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
ENDOWMENT TRUST FUND............... 152

DISASTER RESPONSE ACCOUNT..................................... 151

EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY................................. 139

EMPLOYMENT SECURITY
DEPARTMENT................................. 72

ENVIRONMENTAL HEARINGS OFFICE.................................. 81

FAIR FUND..................................................... 152

GOVERNOR

COMPENSATION--INSURANCE
BENEFITS.............................. 155

HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING
BOARD

FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT
PROGRAMS.............................. 146

POLICY COORDINATION AND
ADMINISTRATION........................ 144

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES........................................ 1

MILITARY DEPARTMENT............................................ 24

OFFICE OF FINANCIAL
MANAGEMENT................................. 12

AGRICULTURAL SCHOOLS TRUST
LANDS.............................. 151

COMPENSATION ACTIONS OF
PERSONNEL RESOURCES BOARD............. 157

FIRE-RELATED CONTINGENCY
COSTS................................ 151

YEAR 2000 ALLOCATIONS......................................... 152

YEAR 2000 CONTINGENCY POOL.................................... 154

YEAR 2000 CONVERSION.......................................... 153

OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE........................................ 6

PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION.................................... 7

SECRETARY OF STATE.............................................. 7

SENATE.......................................................... 2

STATE AUDITOR................................................... 9

STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGES.............. 131

STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION...................................... 125

COMMON SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION.................................... 125

STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY.................................... 57

STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION.......................... 79

STATE PATROL................................................... 93

STATE TREASURER

BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST.................................. 150

FEDERAL REVENUES FOR
DISTRIBUTION............................. 164

MUNICIPAL CRIMINAL JUSTICE
ASSISTANCE ACCOUNT................. 160

STATE REVENUES FOR
DISTRIBUTION............................... 162

TRANSFERS..................................................... 165

SUNDRY CLAIMS................................................. 159

SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION

EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS..................................... 119

GENERAL APPORTIONMENT (BASIC
EDUCATION)....................... 103

INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION
PROGRAMS.............................. 118

LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM................................... 122

LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE....................................... 117

LOCAL ENHANCEMENT FUNDS....................................... 123

PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE
STUDENTS.......................... 118

PUPIL TRANSPORTATION.......................................... 112

SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION
ADJUSTMENTS...................... 110

SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS.................................... 113

STATE ADMINISTRATION........................................... 96

TRAFFIC SAFETY EDUCATION
PROGRAMS............................. 117

TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL
PROGRAMS............................... 121

THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE................................... 141

UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON...................................... 134

WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY................................... 136

WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY................................. 143

WILDLIFE ACCOUNT.............................................. 163

--- END ---