BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 74.46 RCW and codified under part F to read as
follows:

To the extent the federal government approves such payments under
the state's plan for medical assistance, and only to the extent that funds are
specifically appropriated for this purpose in the biennial appropriations act,
the department shall make supplemental payments to nursing facilities operated
by public hospital districts. The payments shall be calculated and distributed
in accordance with the terms and conditions specified in the biennial
appropriations act. The payments shall be supplemental to the component rate
allocations calculated in accordance with part E of this chapter, and neither
the provisions of part E of this chapter nor the provisions of part C of this
chapter apply to these supplemental payments.

---
END ---