BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.68.095 and 1994 c 179 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

All
moneys that have accrued or may accrue to the motor vehicle fund from the motor
vehicle fuel tax and special fuel tax imposed by RCW 82.36.025(5) shall be
distributed monthly by the state treasurer in the following proportions:

(1)
Through June 30, 1995, one and one-half cents shall be deposited in the
transportation improvement account and expended in accordance with RCW
47.26.084. After June 30, 1995, eighty-seven percent of one and one-half cents
shall be deposited in the transportation improvement account and expended in
accordance with RCW 47.26.086 and thirteen percent of one and one-half cents
shall be deposited in the small city account and expended in accordance with
RCW 47.26.115.

(2)
From April 1, 1991, seventy-five one-hundredths of one cent shall be deposited
in the special category C account in the motor vehicle fund for special
category C projects. Special category C projects are ((category C))
projects ((as defined in RCW 47.05.030(3))) that, due to high cost only,
will require bond financing to complete construction.

The
following criteria, listed in order of priority, shall be used in determining
which special category C projects have the highest priority:

(a)
Accident experience; and

(b)
Fatal accident experience; and

(c)
Capacity to move people and goods safely and at reasonable speeds without undue
congestion; and

(d)
Continuity of development of the highway transportation network.

Moneys
deposited in the special category C account in the motor vehicle fund may be
used for payment of debt service on bonds the proceeds of which are used to
finance special category C projects under this subsection.

(3)
Twenty-five one-hundredths of one cent shall be deposited in the rural arterial
trust account in the motor vehicle fund.

(4)
Forty-five one-hundredths of one cent shall be deposited in the county arterial
preservation account. These funds shall be distributed by the county road
administration board to counties in proportions corresponding to the number of
paved arterial lane miles in the unincorporated area of each county and shall
be used for improvements to sustain the structural, safety, and operational
integrity of county arterials. The county road administration board shall
adopt reasonable rules and develop policies to implement this program and to
assure that a pavement management system is used.

(5)
One-half of one cent shall be allocated to cities and towns as provided in RCW
46.68.110.

(6)
From April 1, 1990, through March 31, 1991, thirty one-hundredths of one cent
and after March 31, 1991, fifty-five one-hundredths of one cent shall be
allocated to counties as provided in RCW 46.68.120.

(7)
((One cent)) Six cents shall be deposited in the motor vehicle
fund and shall be expended for highway purposes of the state as defined in RCW
46.68.130. Of this amount, five cents shall be expended solely on projects
that reduce traffic congestion.

Sec.
2. RCW
82.36.025 and 1994 c 179 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

The
motor vehicle fuel tax rate shall be computed as the sum of the tax rate
provided in subsection (1) of this section and the additional tax rates
provided in subsections (2) through (5) of this section.

(1)
A motor vehicle fuel tax rate of seventeen cents per gallon shall apply to the
sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel.

(2)
An additional motor vehicle fuel tax rate of one-third cent per gallon shall
apply to the sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel, and the proceeds
from this additional tax rate, reduced by an amount equal to the sum of the
payments under RCW 46.68.090(1) (a), (b), and (c) multiplied by the additional
tax rate prescribed by this subsection divided by the motor vehicle fuel tax
rate provided in this section, shall be deposited in the rural arterial trust
account in the motor vehicle fund for expenditures under RCW 36.79.020.

(3)
An additional motor vehicle fuel tax rate of one-third cent per gallon shall
apply to the sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel, and the proceeds
from this additional tax rate, reduced by an amount equal to the sum of the
payments under RCW 46.68.090(1) (a), (b), and (c) multiplied by the additional
tax rate prescribed by this subsection divided by the motor vehicle fuel tax
rate provided in this section, shall be deposited in the urban arterial trust
account in the motor vehicle fund. After June 30, 1995, ninety-five percent of
this revenue shall be deposited in the urban arterial trust account in the
motor vehicle fund and five percent shall be deposited in the small city
account in the motor vehicle fund.

(4)
An additional motor vehicle fuel tax rate of one-third cent per gallon shall be
applied to the sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel, and the
proceeds from this additional tax rate, reduced by an amount equal to the sum
of the payments under RCW 46.68.090(1) (a), (b), and (c) multiplied by the
additional tax rate prescribed by this subsection divided by the motor vehicle
fuel tax rate provided in this section, shall be deposited in the motor vehicle
fund to be expended for highway purposes of the state as defined in RCW
46.68.130.

(5) An additional motor vehicle fuel tax rate of ((four cents
per gallon from April 1, 1990, through March 31, 1991, and five)) ten
cents per gallon ((from April 1, 1991,)) applies to the sale,
distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel. The proceeds from the additional
tax rate under this subsection, reduced by an amount equal to the sum of the
payments under RCW 46.68.090(1) (a), (b), and (c) multiplied by the additional
tax rate prescribed by this subsection divided by the motor fuel tax rate
provided in this section, shall be deposited in the motor vehicle fund and
shall be distributed by the state treasurer according to RCW 46.68.095.

---
END ---