BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.20.308 and 1998 c 213 s 1, 1998 c 209 s 1, 1998 c 207 s 7, and 1998 c 41 s 4
are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any person who operates a motor vehicle within this state is deemed to have
given consent, subject to the provisions of RCW 46.61.506, to a test or tests
of his or her breath or blood for the purpose of determining the alcohol
concentration or presence of any drug in his or her breath or blood if arrested
for any offense where, at the time of the arrest, the arresting officer has
reasonable grounds to believe the person had been driving or was in actual
physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug or was in violation of RCW 46.61.503.

(2)
The test or tests of breath shall be administered at the direction of a law
enforcement officer having reasonable grounds to believe the person to have
been driving or in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or the person to
have been driving or in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while having
alcohol in a concentration in violation of RCW 46.61.503 in his or her system
and being under the age of twenty-one. However, in those instances where the
person is incapable due to physical injury, physical incapacity, or other
physical limitation, of providing a breath sample or where the person is being
treated in a hospital, clinic, doctor's office, emergency medical vehicle,
ambulance, or other similar facility in which a breath testing instrument is
not present or where the officer has reasonable grounds to believe that the
person is under the influence of a drug, a blood test shall be administered by
a qualified person as provided in RCW 46.61.506(4). The officer shall inform
the person of his or her right to refuse the breath or blood test, and of his
or her right to have additional tests administered by any qualified person of
his or her choosing as provided in RCW 46.61.506. The officer shall warn the
driver that:

(a)
His or her license, permit, or privilege to drive will be revoked or denied if
he or she refuses to submit to the test;

(b)
His or her license, permit, or privilege to drive will be suspended, revoked,
or denied if the test is administered and the test indicates the alcohol
concentration of the person's breath or blood is ((0.08)) 0.05 or
more, in the case of a person age twenty-one or over, or in violation of RCW
46.61.502, 46.61.503, or 46.61.504 in the case of a person under age
twenty-one; and

(c)
His or her refusal to take the test may be used in a criminal trial.

(3)
Except as provided in this section, the test administered shall be of the
breath only. If an individual is unconscious or is under arrest for the crime
of vehicular homicide as provided in RCW 46.61.520 or vehicular assault as
provided in RCW 46.61.522, or if an individual is under arrest for the crime of
driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs as provided
in RCW 46.61.502, which arrest results from an accident in which there has been
serious bodily injury to another person, a breath or blood test may be
administered without the consent of the individual so arrested.

(4)
Any person who is dead, unconscious, or who is otherwise in a condition
rendering him or her incapable of refusal, shall be deemed not to have
withdrawn the consent provided by subsection (1) of this section and the test
or tests may be administered, subject to the provisions of RCW 46.61.506, and
the person shall be deemed to have received the warnings required under
subsection (2) of this section.

(5)
If, following his or her arrest and receipt of warnings under subsection (2) of
this section, the person arrested refuses upon the request of a law enforcement
officer to submit to a test or tests of his or her breath or blood, no test
shall be given except as authorized under subsection (3) or (4) of this
section.

(6)
If, after arrest and after the other applicable conditions and requirements of
this section have been satisfied, a test or tests of the person's blood or
breath is administered and the test results indicate that the alcohol
concentration of the person's breath or blood is ((0.08)) 0.05 or
more if the person is age twenty-one or over, or is in violation of RCW
46.61.502, 46.61.503, or 46.61.504 if the person is under the age of
twenty-one, or the person refuses to submit to a test, the arresting officer or
other law enforcement officer at whose direction any test has been given, or
the department, where applicable, if the arrest results in a test of the
person's blood, shall:

(a)
Serve notice in writing on the person on behalf of the department of its
intention to suspend, revoke, or deny the person's license, permit, or
privilege to drive as required by subsection (7) of this section;

(b)
Serve notice in writing on the person on behalf of the department of his or her
right to a hearing, specifying the steps he or she must take to obtain a
hearing as provided by subsection (8) of this section;

(c)
Mark the person's Washington state driver's license or permit to drive, if any,
in a manner authorized by the department;

(d)
Serve notice in writing that the marked license or permit, if any, is a
temporary license that is valid for sixty days from the date of arrest or from
the date notice has been given in the event notice is given by the department
following a blood test, or until the suspension, revocation, or denial of the
person's license, permit, or privilege to drive is sustained at a hearing
pursuant to subsection (8) of this section, whichever occurs first. No
temporary license is valid to any greater degree than the license or permit
that it replaces; and

(e)
Immediately notify the department of the arrest and transmit to the department
within seventy-two hours, except as delayed as the result of a blood test, a
sworn report or report under a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 that
states:

(i)
That the officer had reasonable grounds to believe the arrested person had been
driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs, or both, or was
under the age of twenty-one years and had been driving or was in actual
physical control of a motor vehicle while having an alcohol concentration in
violation of RCW 46.61.503;

(ii)
That after receipt of the warnings required by subsection (2) of this section
the person refused to submit to a test of his or her blood or breath, or a test
was administered and the results indicated that the alcohol concentration of
the person's breath or blood was ((0.08)) 0.05 or more if the
person is age twenty-one or over, or was in violation of RCW 46.61.502,
46.61.503, or 46.61.504 if the person is under the age of twenty-one; and

(iii)
Any other information that the director may require by rule.

(7)
The department of licensing, upon the receipt of a sworn report or report under
a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 under subsection (6)(e) of this
section, shall suspend, revoke, or deny the person's license, permit, or
privilege to drive or any nonresident operating privilege, as provided in RCW
46.20.3101, such suspension, revocation, or denial to be effective beginning
sixty days from the date of arrest or from the date notice has been given in
the event notice is given by the department following a blood test, or when
sustained at a hearing pursuant to subsection (8) of this section, whichever
occurs first.

(8)
A person receiving notification under subsection (6)(b) of this section may,
within thirty days after the notice has been given, request in writing a formal
hearing before the department. The person shall pay a fee of one hundred
dollars as part of the request. If the request is mailed, it must be
postmarked within thirty days after receipt of the notification. Upon timely
receipt of such a request for a formal hearing, including receipt of the
required one hundred dollar fee, the department shall afford the person an
opportunity for a hearing. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
hearing is subject to and shall be scheduled and conducted in accordance with
RCW 46.20.329 and 46.20.332. The hearing shall be conducted in the county of
the arrest, except that all or part of the hearing may, at the discretion of
the department, be conducted by telephone or other electronic means. The
hearing shall be held within sixty days following the arrest or following the
date notice has been given in the event notice is given by the department
following a blood test, unless otherwise agreed to by the department and the
person, in which case the action by the department shall be stayed, and any
valid temporary license marked under subsection (6)(c) of this section
extended, if the person is otherwise eligible for licensing. For the purposes
of this section, the scope of the hearing shall cover the issues of whether a
law enforcement officer had reasonable grounds to believe the person had been
driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or had been
driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state
while having alcohol in his or her system in a concentration in violation of
RCW 46.61.503 and was under the age of twenty-one, whether the person was
placed under arrest, and (a) whether the person refused to submit to the test
or tests upon request of the officer after having been informed that such
refusal would result in the revocation of the person's license, permit, or
privilege to drive, or (b) if a test or tests were administered, whether the
applicable requirements of this section were satisfied before the
administration of the test or tests, whether the person submitted to the test
or tests, or whether a test was administered without express consent as
permitted under this section, and whether the test or tests indicated that the
alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood was ((0.08)) 0.05
or more if the person was age twenty-one or over at the time of the arrest, or
was in violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.503, or 46.61.504 if the person was
under the age of twenty-one at the time of the arrest. The sworn report or
report under a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 submitted by a law
enforcement officer is prima facie evidence that the officer had reasonable
grounds to believe the person had been driving or was in actual physical
control of a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or drugs, or both, or the person had been driving or was in
actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while having
alcohol in his or her system in a concentration in violation of RCW 46.61.503
and was under the age of twenty-one and that the officer complied with the
requirements of this section.

A
hearing officer shall conduct the hearing, may issue subpoenas for the
attendance of witnesses and the production of documents, and shall administer
oaths to witnesses. The hearing officer shall not issue a subpoena for the
attendance of a witness at the request of the person unless the request is
accompanied by the fee required by RCW 5.56.010 for a witness in district
court. The sworn report or report under a declaration authorized by RCW
9A.72.085 of the law enforcement officer and any other evidence accompanying the
report shall be admissible without further evidentiary foundation and the
certifications authorized by the criminal rules for courts of limited
jurisdiction shall be admissible without further evidentiary foundation. The
person may be represented by counsel, may question witnesses, may present
evidence, and may testify. The department shall order that the suspension,
revocation, or denial either be rescinded or sustained.

(9)
If the suspension, revocation, or denial is sustained after such a hearing, the
person whose license, privilege, or permit is suspended, revoked, or denied has
the right to file a petition in the superior court of the county of arrest to
review the final order of revocation by the department in the same manner as an
appeal from a decision of a court of limited jurisdiction. Notice of appeal
must be filed within thirty days after the date the final order is served or
the right to appeal is waived. Notwithstanding RCW 46.20.334, RALJ 1.1, or
other statutes or rules referencing de novo review, the appeal shall be limited
to a review of the record of the administrative hearing. The appellant must
pay the costs associated with obtaining the record of the hearing before the
hearing officer. The filing of the appeal does not stay the effective date of
the suspension, revocation, or denial. A petition filed under this subsection
must include the petitioner's grounds for requesting review. Upon granting
petitioner's request for review, the court shall review the department's final
order of suspension, revocation, or denial as expeditiously as possible. The
review must be limited to a determination of whether the department has
committed any errors of law. The superior court shall accept those factual
determinations supported by substantial evidence in the record: (a) That were
expressly made by the department; or (b) that may reasonably be inferred from
the final order of the department. The superior court may reverse, affirm, or
modify the decision of the department or remand the case back to the department
for further proceedings. The decision of the superior court must be in writing
and filed in the clerk's office with the other papers in the case. The court
shall state the reasons for the decision. If judicial relief is sought for a
stay or other temporary remedy from the department's action, the court shall
not grant such relief unless the court finds that the appellant is likely to
prevail in the appeal and that without a stay the appellant will suffer
irreparable injury. If the court stays the suspension, revocation, or denial
it may impose conditions on such stay.

(10)
If a person whose driver's license, permit, or privilege to drive has been or
will be suspended, revoked, or denied under subsection (7) of this section,
other than as a result of a breath or blood test refusal, and who has not
committed an offense within the last five years for which he or she was granted
a deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW, petitions a court for a
deferred prosecution on criminal charges arising out of the arrest for which
action has been or will be taken under subsection (7) of this section, the
court may direct the department to stay any actual or proposed suspension,
revocation, or denial for at least forty-five days but not more than ninety
days. If the court stays the suspension, revocation, or denial, it may impose
conditions on such stay. If the person is otherwise eligible for licensing,
the department shall issue a temporary license, or extend any valid temporary
license marked under subsection (6) of this section, for the period of the
stay. If a deferred prosecution treatment plan is not recommended in the
report made under RCW 10.05.050, or if treatment is rejected by the court, or
if the person declines to accept an offered treatment plan, or if the person
violates any condition imposed by the court, then the court shall immediately
direct the department to cancel the stay and any temporary marked license or
extension of a temporary license issued under this subsection.

A
suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this section, other than as a
result of a breath or blood test refusal, shall be stayed if the person is
accepted for deferred prosecution as provided in chapter 10.05 RCW for the
incident upon which the suspension, revocation, or denial is based. If the
deferred prosecution is terminated, the stay shall be lifted and the
suspension, revocation, or denial reinstated. If the deferred prosecution is
completed, the stay shall be lifted and the suspension, revocation, or denial
canceled.

(11)
When it has been finally determined under the procedures of this section that a
nonresident's privilege to operate a motor vehicle in this state has been
suspended, revoked, or denied, the department shall give information in writing
of the action taken to the motor vehicle administrator of the state of the
person's residence and of any state in which he or she has a license.

Sec.
2. RCW
46.20.3101 and 1998 c 213 s 2, 1998 c 209 s 2, and 1998 c 207 s 8 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Pursuant
to RCW 46.20.308, the department shall suspend, revoke, or deny the arrested
person's license, permit, or privilege to drive as follows:

(1)
In the case of a person who has refused a test or tests:

(a)
For a first refusal within seven years, where there has not been a previous
incident within seven years that resulted in administrative action under this
section, revocation or denial for one year;

(b)
For a second or subsequent refusal within seven years, or for a first refusal
where there has been one or more previous incidents within seven years that
have resulted in administrative action under this section, revocation or denial
for two years or until the person reaches age twenty-one, whichever is longer.
A revocation imposed under this subsection (1)(b) shall run consecutively to
the period of any suspension, revocation, or denial imposed pursuant to a
criminal conviction arising out of the same incident.

(2)
In the case of an incident where a person has submitted to or been administered
a test or tests indicating that the alcohol concentration of the person's
breath or blood was ((0.08)) 0.05 or more:

(a)
For a first incident within seven years, where there has not been a previous incident
within seven years that resulted in administrative action under this section,
suspension for ninety days;

(b)
For a second or subsequent incident within seven years, revocation or denial
for two years.

(3)
In the case of an incident where a person under age twenty-one has submitted to
or been administered a test or tests indicating that the alcohol concentration
of the person's breath or blood was in violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.503,
or 46.61.504:

(a)
For a first incident within seven years, suspension or denial for ninety days;

(b)
For a second or subsequent incident within seven years, revocation or denial
for one year or until the person reaches age twenty-one, whichever is longer.

Sec.
3. RCW
46.61.502 and 1998 c 213 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug if the person drives a vehicle within this state:

(a)
And the person has, within two hours after driving, an alcohol concentration of
((0.08)) 0.05 or higher as shown by analysis of the person's
breath or blood made under RCW 46.61.506; or

(b)
While the person is under the influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor
or any drug; or

(c)
While the person is under the combined influence of or affected by intoxicating
liquor and any drug.

(2)
The fact that a person charged with a violation of this section is or has been
entitled to use a drug under the laws of this state shall not constitute a
defense against a charge of violating this section.

(3)
It is an affirmative defense to a violation of subsection (1)(a) of this
section which the defendant must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that
the defendant consumed a sufficient quantity of alcohol after the time of
driving and before the administration of an analysis of the person's breath or
blood to cause the defendant's alcohol concentration to be ((0.08)) 0.05
or more within two hours after driving. The court shall not admit evidence of
this defense unless the defendant notifies the prosecution prior to the omnibus
or pretrial hearing in the case of the defendant's intent to assert the
affirmative defense.

(4)
Analyses of blood or breath samples obtained more than two hours after the
alleged driving may be used as evidence that within two hours of the alleged
driving, a person had an alcohol concentration of ((0.08)) 0.05
or more in violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section, and in any case in
which the analysis shows an alcohol concentration above 0.00 may be used as
evidence that a person was under the influence of or affected by intoxicating
liquor or any drug in violation of subsection (1)(b) or (c) of this section.

(5)
A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec.
4. RCW
46.61.504 and 1998 c 213 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of being in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug if the person has actual
physical control of a vehicle within this state:

(a)
And the person has, within two hours after being in actual physical control of
the vehicle, an alcohol concentration of ((0.08)) 0.05 or higher
as shown by analysis of the person's breath or blood made under RCW 46.61.506;
or

(b)
While the person is under the influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor
or any drug; or

(c)
While the person is under the combined influence of or affected by intoxicating
liquor and any drug.

(2)
The fact that a person charged with a violation of this section is or has been
entitled to use a drug under the laws of this state does not constitute a
defense against any charge of violating this section. No person may be
convicted under this section if, prior to being pursued by a law enforcement
officer, the person has moved the vehicle safely off the roadway.

(3)
It is an affirmative defense to a violation of subsection (1)(a) of this
section which the defendant must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that
the defendant consumed a sufficient quantity of alcohol after the time of being
in actual physical control of the vehicle and before the administration of an
analysis of the person's breath or blood to cause the defendant's alcohol
concentration to be ((0.08)) 0.05 or more within two hours after
being in such control. The court shall not admit evidence of this defense
unless the defendant notifies the prosecution prior to the omnibus or pretrial
hearing in the case of the defendant's intent to assert the affirmative
defense.

(4)
Analyses of blood or breath samples obtained more than two hours after the
alleged being in actual physical control of a vehicle may be used as evidence
that within two hours of the alleged being in such control, a person had an
alcohol concentration of ((0.08)) 0.05 or more in violation of
subsection (1)(a) of this section, and in any case in which the analysis shows
an alcohol concentration above 0.00 may be used as evidence that a person was
under the influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor or any drug in
violation of subsection (1)(b) or (c) of this section.

(5)
A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec.
5. RCW
46.61.5055 and 1998 c 215 s 1, 1998 c 214 s 1, 1998 c 211 s 1, 1998 c 210 s 4,
1998 c 207 s 1, and 1998 c 206 s 1 are each reenacted and amended to read as
follows:

(1)
A person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who
has no prior offense within seven years shall be punished as follows:

(a)
In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for
whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered
pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's
alcohol concentration:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than one day nor more than one year. Twenty-four
consecutive hours of the imprisonment may not be suspended or deferred unless
the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would
impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being.
Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court
shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and
the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based. In lieu of the
mandatory minimum term of imprisonment required under this subsection
(1)(a)(i), the court may order not less than fifteen days of electronic home
monitoring. The offender shall pay the cost of electronic home monitoring.
The county or municipality in which the penalty is being imposed shall
determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic home
monitoring device to include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and the court
may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the
offender is on electronic home monitoring; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than three hundred fifty dollars nor more than five
thousand dollars. Three hundred fifty dollars of the fine may not be suspended
or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii)
By suspension of the offender's license or permit to drive, or suspension of
any nonresident privilege to drive, for a period of ninety days. The period of
license, permit, or privilege suspension may not be suspended. The court shall
notify the department of licensing of the conviction, and upon receiving
notification of the conviction the department shall suspend the offender's
license, permit, or privilege; or

(b)
In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for
whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW
46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol
concentration:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than two days nor more than one year. Two
consecutive days of the imprisonment may not be suspended or deferred unless
the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would
impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being.
Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court
shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and
the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based. In lieu of the mandatory
minimum term of imprisonment required under this subsection (1)(b)(i), the
court may order not less than thirty days of electronic home monitoring. The
offender shall pay the cost of electronic home monitoring. The county or
municipality in which the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost.
The court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device to
include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and the court may restrict the
amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the offender is on
electronic home monitoring; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand
dollars. Five hundred dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii)
By revocation of the offender's license or permit to drive, or suspension of
any nonresident privilege to drive, for a period of one year. The period of
license, permit, or privilege suspension may not be suspended. The court shall
notify the department of licensing of the conviction, and upon receiving
notification of the conviction the department shall suspend the offender's
license, permit, or privilege; and

(iv)
By a court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720.

(2)
A person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who
has one prior offense within seven years shall be punished as follows:

(a)
In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for
whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered
pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's
alcohol concentration:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than thirty days nor more than one year and sixty
days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay for the cost of the
electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is being imposed
shall determine the cost. The court may also require the offender's electronic
home monitoring device include an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and may
restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume during the time the
offender is on electronic home monitoring. Thirty days of imprisonment and
sixty days of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence
would impose a substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental
well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred,
the court shall state in writing the reason for granting the suspension or
deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand
dollars. Five hundred dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii)
By revocation of the offender's license or permit to drive, or suspension of
any nonresident privilege to drive, for a period of two years. The period of
license, permit, or privilege revocation may not be suspended. The court shall
notify the department of licensing of the conviction, and upon receiving
notification of the conviction the department shall revoke the offender's
license, permit, or privilege; and

(iv)
By a court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720; or

(b)
In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for
whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW
46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol
concentration:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than forty-five days nor more than one year and
ninety days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay for the cost
of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty is
being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the
offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection
breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume
during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Forty-five days
of imprisonment and ninety days of electronic home monitoring may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of this
mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's
physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is
suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting
the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral
is based; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than seven hundred fifty dollars nor more than five
thousand dollars. Seven hundred fifty dollars of the fine may not be suspended
or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii)
By revocation of the offender's license or permit to drive, or suspension of
any nonresident privilege to drive, for a period of nine hundred days. The
period of license, permit, or privilege revocation may not be suspended. The
court shall notify the department of licensing of the conviction, and upon
receiving notification of the conviction the department shall revoke the
offender's license, permit, or privilege; and

(iv)
By a court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720.

(3)
A person who is convicted of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 and who
has two or more prior offenses within seven years shall be punished as follows:

(a)
In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was less than 0.15, or for
whom for reasons other than the person's refusal to take a test offered
pursuant to RCW 46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's
alcohol concentration:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than ninety days nor more than one year and one
hundred twenty days of electronic home monitoring. The offender shall pay for
the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or municipality where the penalty
is being imposed shall determine the cost. The court may also require the
offender's electronic home monitoring device include an alcohol detection
breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the offender may consume
during the time the offender is on electronic home monitoring. Ninety days of
imprisonment and one hundred twenty days of electronic home monitoring may not
be suspended or deferred unless the court finds that the imposition of this
mandatory minimum sentence would impose a substantial risk to the offender's
physical or mental well-being. Whenever the mandatory minimum sentence is
suspended or deferred, the court shall state in writing the reason for granting
the suspension or deferral and the facts upon which the suspension or deferral
is based; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than one thousand dollars nor more than five thousand
dollars. One thousand dollars of the fine may not be suspended or deferred
unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii)
By revocation of the offender's license or permit to drive, or suspension of
any nonresident privilege to drive, for a period of three years. The period of
license, permit, or privilege revocation may not be suspended. The court shall
notify the department of licensing of the conviction, and upon receiving
notification of the conviction the department shall revoke the offender's
license, permit, or privilege; and

(iv)
By a court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720; or

(b)
In the case of a person whose alcohol concentration was at least 0.15, or for
whom by reason of the person's refusal to take a test offered pursuant to RCW
46.20.308 there is no test result indicating the person's alcohol
concentration:

(i)
By imprisonment for not less than one hundred twenty days nor more than one
year and one hundred fifty days of electronic home monitoring. The offender
shall pay for the cost of the electronic monitoring. The county or
municipality where the penalty is being imposed shall determine the cost. The
court may also require the offender's electronic home monitoring device include
an alcohol detection breathalyzer, and may restrict the amount of alcohol the
offender may consume during the time the offender is on electronic home
monitoring. One hundred twenty days of imprisonment and one hundred fifty days
of electronic home monitoring may not be suspended or deferred unless the court
finds that the imposition of this mandatory minimum sentence would impose a
substantial risk to the offender's physical or mental well-being. Whenever the
mandatory minimum sentence is suspended or deferred, the court shall state in
writing the reason for granting the suspension or deferral and the facts upon
which the suspension or deferral is based; and

(ii)
By a fine of not less than one thousand five hundred dollars nor more than five
thousand dollars. One thousand five hundred dollars of the fine may not be
suspended or deferred unless the court finds the offender to be indigent; and

(iii)
By revocation of the offender's license or permit to drive, or suspension of
any nonresident privilege to drive, for a period of four years. The period of
license, permit, or privilege revocation may not be suspended. The court shall
notify the department of licensing of the conviction, and upon receiving
notification of the conviction the department shall revoke the offender's
license, permit, or privilege; and

(iv)
By a court-ordered restriction under RCW 46.20.720.

(4)
In exercising its discretion in setting penalties within the limits allowed by
this section, the court shall particularly consider the following:

(a)
Whether the person's driving at the time of the offense was responsible for
injury or damage to another or another's property; and

(b)
Whether the person was driving or in physical control of a vehicle with one or
more passengers at the time of the offense.

(5)
An offender punishable under this section is subject to the alcohol assessment
and treatment provisions of RCW 46.61.5056.

(6)
After expiration of any period of suspension or revocation of the offender's
license, permit, or privilege to drive required by this section, the department
shall place the offender's driving privilege in probationary status pursuant to
RCW 46.20.355.

(7)(a)
In addition to any nonsuspendable and nondeferrable jail sentence required by
this section, whenever the court imposes less than one year in jail, the court
shall also suspend but shall not defer a period of confinement for a period not
exceeding five years. The court shall impose conditions of probation that
include: (i) Not driving a motor vehicle within this state without a valid
license to drive and proof of financial responsibility for the future; (ii) not
driving a motor vehicle within this state while having an alcohol concentration
of ((0.08)) 0.05 or more within two hours after driving; and
(iii) not refusing to submit to a test of his or her breath or blood to
determine alcohol concentration upon request of a law enforcement officer who has
reasonable grounds to believe the person was driving or was in actual physical
control of a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor. The court may impose conditions of probation that include
nonrepetition, installation of an ignition interlock or other biological or
technical device on the probationer's motor vehicle, alcohol or drug treatment,
supervised probation, or other conditions that may be appropriate. The
sentence may be imposed in whole or in part upon violation of a condition of
probation during the suspension period.

(b)
For each violation of mandatory conditions of probation under (a)(i) and (ii)
or (a)(i) and (iii) of this subsection, the court shall order the convicted
person to be confined for thirty days, which shall not be suspended or
deferred.

(c)
For each incident involving a violation of a mandatory condition of probation
imposed under this subsection, the license, permit, or privilege to drive of
the person shall be suspended by the court for thirty days or, if such license,
permit, or privilege to drive already is suspended, revoked, or denied at the
time the finding of probation violation is made, the suspension, revocation, or
denial then in effect shall be extended by thirty days. The court shall notify
the department of any suspension, revocation, or denial or any extension of a
suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this subsection.

(8)
For purposes of this section:

(a)
"Electronic home monitoring" shall not be considered confinement as
defined in RCW 9.94A.030;

(b)
A "prior offense" means any of the following:

(i)
A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or an equivalent local ordinance;

(ii)
A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.504 or an equivalent local ordinance;

(iii)
A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.520 committed while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;

(iv)
A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.522 committed while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug;

(v)
A conviction for a violation of RCW 46.61.5249, 46.61.500, or 9A.36.050 or an
equivalent local ordinance, if the conviction is the result of a charge that
was originally filed as a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an
equivalent local ordinance, or of RCW 46.61.520 or 46.61.522;

(vi)
An out-of-state conviction for a violation that would have been a violation of
(b)(i), (ii), (iii), (iv), or (v) of this subsection if committed in this
state;

(vii)
A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a prosecution for a
violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance; or

(viii)
A deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW granted in a prosecution for a
violation of RCW 46.61.5249, or an equivalent local ordinance, if the charge
under which the deferred prosecution was granted was originally filed as a
violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, or an equivalent local ordinance, or
of RCW 46.61.520 or 46.61.522; and

(c)
"Within seven years" means that the arrest for a prior offense
occurred within seven years of the arrest for the current offense.

Sec.
6. RCW
46.61.506 and 1998 c 213 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Upon the trial of any civil or criminal action or proceeding arising out of
acts alleged to have been committed by any person while driving or in actual
physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or any drug, if the person's alcohol concentration is less than ((0.08))
0.05, it is evidence that may be considered with other competent
evidence in determining whether the person was under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug.

(2)
The breath analysis shall be based upon grams of alcohol per two hundred ten
liters of breath. The foregoing provisions of this section shall not be
construed as limiting the introduction of any other competent evidence bearing
upon the question whether the person was under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug.

(3)
Analysis of the person's blood or breath to be considered valid under the
provisions of this section or RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504 shall have been
performed according to methods approved by the state toxicologist and by an
individual possessing a valid permit issued by the state toxicologist for this
purpose. The state toxicologist is directed to approve satisfactory techniques
or methods, to supervise the examination of individuals to ascertain their
qualifications and competence to conduct such analyses, and to issue permits
which shall be subject to termination or revocation at the discretion of the
state toxicologist.

(4)
When a blood test is administered under the provisions of RCW 46.20.308, the
withdrawal of blood for the purpose of determining its alcoholic or drug content
may be performed only by a physician, a registered nurse, or a qualified
technician. This limitation shall not apply to the taking of breath specimens.

(5)
The person tested may have a physician, or a qualified technician, chemist,
registered nurse, or other qualified person of his or her own choosing
administer one or more tests in addition to any administered at the direction
of a law enforcement officer. The failure or inability to obtain an additional
test by a person shall not preclude the admission of evidence relating to the
test or tests taken at the direction of a law enforcement officer.

(6)
Upon the request of the person who shall submit to a test or tests at the
request of a law enforcement officer, full information concerning the test or
tests shall be made available to him or her or his or her attorney.

Sec.
7. RCW
88.12.025 and 1998 c 213 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
It shall be unlawful for any person to operate a vessel in a reckless manner.

(2)
It shall be a violation for a person to operate a vessel while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug. A person is considered to be
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug if:

(a)
The person has ((0.08)) 0.05 grams or more of alcohol per two
hundred ten liters of breath, as shown by analysis of the person's breath made
under RCW 46.61.506; or

(b)
The person has ((0.08)) 0.05 percent or more by weight of alcohol
in the person's blood, as shown by analysis of the person's blood made under
RCW 46.61.506; or

(c)
The person is under the influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor or any
drug; or

(d)
The person is under the combined influence of or affected by intoxicating
liquor and any drug.

The
fact that any person charged with a violation of this section is or has been
entitled to use such drug under the laws of this state shall not constitute a
defense against any charge of violating this section. A person cited under
this subsection may upon request be given a breath test for breath alcohol or
may request to have a blood sample taken for blood alcohol analysis. An
arresting officer shall administer field sobriety tests when circumstances
permit.

(3)
A violation of this section is a misdemeanor, punishable as provided under RCW
9.92.030. In addition, the court may order the defendant to pay restitution
for any damages or injuries resulting from the offense.

Sec.
8. RCW
90.56.540 and 1991 c 200 s 605 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of operating a vessel while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or drugs if the person operates a covered vessel within
this state while:

(a)
The person has ((0.06)) 0.05 grams or more of alcohol per two
hundred ten liters of breath, as shown by analysis of the person's breath made
under RCW ((88.16.230)) 90.56.550; or

(b)
The person has ((0.06)) 0.05 percent or more by weight of alcohol
in the person's blood as shown by analysis of the person's blood made under RCW
((88.16.230)) 90.56.550; or

(c)
The person is under the influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor or
drugs; or

(d)
The person is under the combined influence of or affected by intoxicating
liquor or drugs.

(2)
The fact that any person charged with a violation of this section is or has
been entitled to use such drug under the laws of this state shall not
constitute a defense against any charge of violating this section.

(3)
Operating a vessel while intoxicated is a class C felony under chapter 9A.20
RCW.

Sec.
9. RCW
90.56.550 and 1991 c 200 s 606 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Upon the trial of any civil or criminal action or proceeding arising out of
acts alleged to have been committed by a person while operating a vessel while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs, if the amount of alcohol
in the person's blood or breath at the time alleged as shown by analysis of his
blood or breath is less than ((0.06)) 0.05 percent by weight of
alcohol in his blood or ((0.06)) 0.05 grams of alcohol per two
hundred ten liters of the person's breath, it is evidence that may be
considered with other competent evidence in determining whether the person was
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs.

(2)
The breath analysis shall be based upon grams of alcohol per two hundred ten
liters of breath. The foregoing provisions of this section shall not be
construed as limiting the introduction of any other competent evidence bearing
upon the question whether the person was under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug.

(3)
Analysis of the person's blood or breath to be considered valid under this
section shall have been performed according to methods approved by the state
toxicologist and by an individual possessing a valid permit issued by the state
toxicologist for this purpose. The state toxicologist shall approve
satisfactory techniques or methods, to supervise the examination of individuals
to ascertain their qualifications and competence to conduct such analyses, and
to issue permits that are subject to termination or revocation at the
discretion of the state toxicologist.

(4)
If a blood test is administered under this section, the withdrawal of blood for
the purpose of determining its alcoholic content may be performed only by a
physician, a registered nurse, or a qualified technician. This limitation
shall not apply to the taking of breath specimens.

(5)
The person tested may have a physician, or a qualified technician, chemist,
registered nurse, or other qualified person of his or her own choosing
administer one or more tests in addition to any administered at the direction
of a law enforcement officer. The failure or inability to obtain an additional
test by a person shall not preclude the admission of evidence relating to the
test or tests taken at the direction of a law enforcement officer.

(6) Upon the request of the person who submits to a test or tests
at the request of a law enforcement officer, full information concerning the
test or tests shall be made available to the person or his or her attorney.

---
END ---