BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislative authority of any town or city located in a county with a
population of less than one million may create a public facilities district.
The legislative authorities of any contiguous group of towns or cities located
in a county with a population of less than one million may enter an agreement
under chapter 39.34 RCW for the creation and joint operation of a public
facilities district.

(2)
A public facilities district shall be coextensive with the boundaries of the
city or town or contiguous group of cities or towns that created the district,
except that the district shall be coextensive with the boundaries of the county
or counties in which the district is located if a majority of the voters of the
county or counties approve the creation of the district in a general election
or a special election that may be called for that purpose.

(3)
A public facilities district created by a single city or town shall be governed
by a board of directors consisting of the members of the legislative body of
the city that created the district. A district created by a contiguous group
of cities or towns shall be governed by a board of directors appointed in
accordance with the terms of the agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW for the
joint operation of the district.

(4)
A public facilities district is a municipal corporation, an independent taxing
"authority" within the meaning of Article VII, section 1 of the state
Constitution, and a "taxing district" within the meaning of Article
VII, section 2 of the state Constitution.

(5)
A public facilities district shall constitute a body corporate and shall
possess all the usual powers of a corporation for public purposes as well as
all other powers that may now or hereafter be specifically conferred by
statute, including, but not limited to, the authority to hire employees, staff,
and services, to enter into contracts, and to sue and be sued.

(6)
A public facilities district may acquire and transfer real and personal
property by lease, sublease, purchase, or sale. No direct or collateral attack
on any metropolitan facilities district purported to be authorized or created
in conformance with this chapter may be commenced more than thirty days after
creation by the city legislative authority.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) A
public facilities district is authorized to acquire, construct, own, remodel,
maintain, equip, reequip, repair, finance, and operate one or more regional
centers. For purposes of this act, "regional center" means a
convention, conference, or special events center, or any combination of
facilities, and related parking facilities, serving a regional population
constructed, improved, or rehabilitated after the effective date of this act at
a cost of at least ten million dollars, including debt service. "Regional
center" also includes an existing convention, conference, or special
events center, and related parking facilities, serving a regional population,
that is improved or rehabilitated after the effective date of this act where
the costs of improvement or rehabilitation are at least ten million dollars,
including debt service. A regional center is conclusively presumed to serve a
regional population if state and local government investment in the
construction, improvement, or rehabilitation of the regional center is equal to
or greater than ten million dollars.

(2)
A public facilities district may impose charges and fees for the use of its
facilities, and may accept and expend or use gifts, grants, and donations for
the purpose of a regional center.

(3)
A public facilities district may impose taxes authorized in sections 5, 11, and
12 of this act, and use revenues derived therefrom for the purpose of paying
principal and interest payments on bonds issued by the public facilities
district to construct a regional center.

(4)
Notwithstanding the establishment of a career, civil, or merit service system,
a public facilities district may contract with a public or private entity for
the operation or management of its public facilities.

(5)
A public facilities district is authorized to use the supplemental alternative
public works contracting procedures set forth in chapter 39.10 RCW in
connection with the design, construction, reconstruction, remodel, or
alteration of any regional center.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) A
public facilities district may apply for deferral of taxes on site preparation,
construction of buildings or other structures, and acquisition of related
machinery and equipment, for a regional center. Application shall be made to
the department of revenue in a form and manner prescribed by the department of
revenue. The application shall contain information regarding the location of
the regional center, estimated or actual costs, time schedules for completion
and operation, and other information required by the department of revenue.
The department of revenue shall approve the application within sixty days if it
meets the requirements of this section.

(2)
The department of revenue shall issue a sales and use tax deferral certificate
for state and local sales and use taxes due under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and
82.14 RCW on the public facility. The use of the certificate shall be governed
by rules established by the department of revenue.

(3)
The public facilities district shall begin paying the deferred taxes in the
fifth year after the date certified by the department of revenue as the date on
which the regional center is operationally complete. The first payment is due
on December 31st of the fifth calendar year after such certified date, with
subsequent annual payments due on December 31st of the following nine years.
Each payment shall equal ten percent of the deferred tax.

(4)
The department of revenue may authorize an accelerated repayment schedule upon
request of the public facilities district.

(5)
Interest shall not be charged on any taxes deferred under this section for the
period of deferral, although all other penalties and interest applicable to
delinquent excise taxes may be assessed and imposed for delinquent payments
under this section. The debt for deferred taxes is not extinguished by
insolvency or other failure of the public facilities district.

(6)
Applications and any other information received by the department of revenue
under this section are not confidential and are subject to disclosure. Chapter
82.32 RCW applies to the administration of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
To carry out the purpose of this chapter, a public facilities district may
issue general obligation bonds, not to exceed an amount, together with any
outstanding nonvoter-approved general obligation indebtedness, equal to
one-half of one percent of the value of the taxable property within the
district, as the term "value of the taxable property" is defined in
RCW 39.36.015. A facilities district additionally may issue general obligation
bonds for capital purposes only, together with any outstanding general
obligation indebtedness, not to exceed an amount equal to one and one-fourth
percent of the value of the taxable property within the district, as the term
"value of the taxable property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015, when
authorized by the voters of the public facilities district pursuant to Article
VIII, section 6 of the state Constitution, and to provide for the retirement
thereof by taxes authorized in this act.

(2)
General obligation bonds may be issued with a maturity of up to thirty years,
and shall be issued and sold in accordance with the provisions of chapter 39.46
RCW.

(3)
The general obligation bonds may be payable from the operating revenues of the
public facilities district in addition to the tax receipts of the district.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
The board of directors of the public facilities district may impose the
following for the purpose of funding a regional center:

(a)
Charges and fees for the use of the regional center and may accept and expend
or use gifts, grants, and donations for the purpose of the regional center;

(b)
Sales and use taxes authorized under sections 11 and 12 of this act.

(2)
The revenue from the taxes imposed under this section shall be used only for
the purposes authorized by this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
board of directors of the public facilities district shall adopt a resolution
that may be amended from time to time that shall establish the basic
requirements governing methods and amounts of reimbursement payable to such
district officials and employees for travel and other business expenses
incurred on behalf of the district. The resolution shall, among other things,
establish procedures for approving such expenses; the form of the travel and
expense voucher; and requirements governing the use of credit cards issued in
the name of the district. The resolution may also establish procedures for
payment of per diem to board members. The state auditor shall, as provided by
general law, cooperate with the public facilities district in establishing adequate
procedures for regulating and auditing the reimbursement of all such expenses.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
board of directors of the public facilities district shall have authority to
authorize the expenditure of funds for the public purposes of preparing and
distributing information to the general public and promoting, advertising,
improving, developing, operating, and maintaining a regional center. Nothing
contained in this section may be construed to authorize preparation and
distribution of information to the general public for the purpose of
influencing the outcome of a district election.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. The
public facilities district may secure services by means of an agreement with a
service provider. The public facilities district shall publish notice,
establish criteria, receive and evaluate proposals, and negotiate with
respondents under requirements set forth by district resolution.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. In
addition to provisions contained in chapter 39.04 RCW, the public facilities
district is authorized to follow procedures contained in RCW 43.19.1906 and
43.19.1911 for all purchases, contracts for purchase, and sales.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. (1) A
public facilities district may issue revenue bonds to fund revenue-generating
facilities, or portions of facilities, which it is authorized to provide or
operate. Whenever revenue bonds are to be issued, the board of directors of
the district shall create or have created a special fund or funds from which,
along with any reserves created pursuant to RCW 39.44.140, the principal and
interest on such revenue bonds shall exclusively be payable. The board may
obligate the district to set aside and pay into the special fund or funds a
fixed proportion or a fixed amount of the revenues from the public
improvements, projects, or facilities, and all related additions, that are
funded by the revenue bonds. This amount or proportion shall be a lien and
charge against these revenues, subject only to operating and maintenance
expenses. The board shall have due regard for the cost of operation and
maintenance of the public improvements, projects, or facilities, or additions,
that are funded by the revenue bonds, and shall not set aside into the special
fund or funds a greater amount or proportion of the revenues that in its
judgment will be available over and above the cost of maintenance and operation
and the amount or proportion, if any, of the revenue so previously pledged.
The board may also provide that revenue bonds payable out of the same source or
sources of revenue may later be issued on a parity with any revenue bonds being
issued and sold.

(2)
Revenue bonds issued under this section shall not be an indebtedness of the
district issuing the bonds, and the interest and principal on the bonds shall
only be payable from the revenues lawfully pledged to meet the principal and
interest requirements and any reserves created under RCW 39.44.140. The owner
or bearer of a revenue bond or any interest coupon issued under this section
shall not have any claim against the district arising from the bond or coupon
except for payment from the revenues lawfully pledged to meet the principal and
interest requirements and any reserves created under RCW 39.44.140. The
substance of the limitations included in this subsection shall be plainly
printed, written, or engraved on each bond issued under this section.

(3)
Revenue bonds with a maturity in excess of thirty years shall not be issued.
The board of directors of the district shall by resolution determine for each
revenue bond issue the amount, date, form, terms, conditions, denominations,
maximum fixed or variable interest rate or rates, maturity or maturities,
redemption rights, registration privileges, manner of execution, manner of
sale, callable provisions, if any, and covenants including the refunding of
existing revenue bonds. Facsimile signatures may be used on the bonds and any
coupons. Refunding revenue bonds may be issued in the same manner as revenue
bonds are issued.

Sec.
11. RCW
82.14.048 and 1995 c 396 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
governing board of a public facilities district under chapter 36.100 RCW or
chapter 35.‑-- RCW (sections 1 through 10 of this act) may submit an
authorizing proposition to the voters of the district, and if the proposition
is approved by a majority of persons voting, fix and impose a sales and use tax
in accordance with the terms of this chapter.

The
tax authorized in this section shall be in addition to any other taxes
authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons who are taxable by
the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable
event within the public facilities district. The rate of tax shall equal
one-tenth of one percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or
value of the article used, in the case of a use tax.

Moneys
received from any tax imposed under this section shall be used for the purpose
of providing funds for the costs associated with the financing, design,
acquisition, construction, equipping, operating, maintaining, remodeling,
repairing, and reequipping of its public facilities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. A
new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The governing body of a public facilities district created under this act that
commences construction of a new regional facility, or improvement or
rehabilitation of a new regional facility, before January 1, 2003, may impose a
sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is in
addition to other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those
persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon
the occurrence of any taxable event within the public facilities district. The
rate of tax shall not exceed 0.033 percent of the selling price in the case of
a sales tax or value of the article used in the case of a use tax.

(2)
The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be deducted from the
amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department
of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department of revenue shall
perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the
public facilities district.

(3)
No tax may be collected under this section or RCW 82.14.048 before August 1,
2000. The tax imposed in this section shall expire when the bonds issued for
the construction of the regional center and related parking facilities are
retired, but not more than twenty-five years after the tax is first collected.

(4)
Moneys collected under this section shall only be used for the purposes set
forth in section 2 of this act.

Sec.
13. RCW
82.14.050 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

The
counties, cities, and transportation authorities under RCW 82.14.045 and public
facilities districts under chapter 36.100 RCW and chapter 35.‑-- RCW
(sections 1 through 10 of this act) shall contract, prior to the effective
date of a resolution or ordinance imposing a sales and use tax, the
administration and collection to the state department of revenue, which shall
deduct a percentage amount, as provided by contract, not to exceed two percent
of the taxes collected for administration and collection expenses incurred by
the department. The remainder of any portion of any tax authorized by this
chapter which is collected by the department of revenue shall be deposited by
the state department of revenue in the local sales and use tax account hereby
created in the state treasury. Moneys in the local sales and use tax account
may be spent only for distribution to counties, cities, transportation
authorities, and public facilities districts imposing a sales and use tax. All
administrative provisions in chapters 82.03, 82.08, 82.12, and 82.32 RCW, as
they now exist or may hereafter be amended, shall, insofar as they are
applicable to state sales and use taxes, be applicable to taxes imposed
pursuant to this chapter. Except as provided in RCW 43.08.190, all earnings of
investments of balances in the local sales and use tax account shall be
credited to the local sales and use tax account and distributed to the
counties, cities, transportation authorities, and public facilities districts
monthly.

Sec.
14. RCW
36.100.060 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 14 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
To carry out the purpose of this chapter, a public facilities district may
issue general obligation bonds, not to exceed an amount, together with any
outstanding nonvoter approved general obligation indebtedness, equal to
one-half of one percent of the value of taxable property within the district,
as the term "value of taxable property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015.
A facilities district additionally may issue general obligation bonds for
capital purposes only, together with any outstanding general obligation
indebtedness, not to exceed an amount equal to one and one-fourth percent of
the value of the taxable property within the district, as the term "value
of taxable property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015, when authorized by the
voters of the public facilities district pursuant to Article VIII, section 6 of
the state Constitution, and to provide for the retirement thereof by excess
property tax levies as provided in this chapter.

(2)
General obligation bonds may be issued with a maturity of up to thirty years,
and shall be issued and sold in accordance with the provisions of chapter 39.46
RCW.

(3)
The general obligation bonds may be payable from the operating revenues of the
public facilities district in addition to the tax receipts of the district.

(4)
The excise tax imposed pursuant to RCW 36.100.040 shall terminate upon final
payment of all bonded indebtedness for its public facilities, except that
the excise tax may be reauthorized by a public vote, in the same manner as
originally authorized, for funding of additional public facilities or a
regional center.

Sec.
15. RCW
36.100.030 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 14 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A public facilities district is authorized to acquire, construct, own, remodel,
maintain, equip, reequip, repair, and operate sports facilities, entertainment
facilities, ((or)) convention facilities, or ((any combination of
such facilities)) regional centers as defined in section 2 of this act,
together with contiguous parking facilities. The taxes that are provided for
in this chapter may only be imposed for these purposes.

(2)
A public facilities district may enter into agreements under chapter 39.34 RCW
for the joint provision and operation of such facilities and may enter into
contracts under chapter 39.34 RCW where any party to the contract provides and
operates such facilities for the other party or parties to the contract.

(3)
Notwithstanding the establishment of a career, civil, or merit service system,
a public facility [facilities] district may contract with a public or private
entity for the operation or management of its public facilities.

(4)
A public facilities district is authorized to use the supplemental alternative
public works contracting procedures set forth in chapter 39.10 RCW in
connection with the design, construction, reconstruction, remodel, or
alteration of any of its public facilities.

(5) A public facilities district may impose charges and fees for
the use of its facilities, and may accept and expend or use gifts, grants, and
donations.

Sec.
16. RCW
82.29A.130 and 1997 c 220 s 202 (Referendum Bill No. 48) are each amended to
read as follows:

The
following leasehold interests shall be exempt from taxes imposed pursuant to
RCW 82.29A.030 and 82.29A.040:

(1)
All leasehold interests constituting a part of the operating properties of any
public utility which is assessed and taxed as a public utility pursuant to
chapter 84.12 RCW.

(2)
All leasehold interests in facilities owned or used by a school, college or
university which leasehold provides housing for students and which is otherwise
exempt from taxation under provisions of RCW 84.36.010 and 84.36.050.

(3)
All leasehold interests of subsidized housing where the fee ownership of such
property is vested in the government of the United States, or the state of
Washington or any political subdivision thereof but only if income
qualification exists for such housing.

(4)
All leasehold interests used for fair purposes of a nonprofit fair association
that sponsors or conducts a fair or fairs which receive support from revenues
collected pursuant to RCW 67.16.100 and allocated by the director of the
department of agriculture where the fee ownership of such property is vested in
the government of the United States, the state of Washington or any of its
political subdivisions: PROVIDED, That this exemption shall not apply to the
leasehold interest of any sublessee of such nonprofit fair association if such
leasehold interest would be taxable if it were the primary lease.

(5)
All leasehold interests in any property of any public entity used as a
residence by an employee of that public entity who is required as a condition
of employment to live in the publicly owned property.

(6)
All leasehold interests held by enrolled Indians of lands owned or held by any
Indian or Indian tribe where the fee ownership of such property is vested in or
held in trust by the United States and which are not subleased to other than to
a lessee which would qualify pursuant to this chapter, RCW 84.36.451 and
84.40.175.

(7)
All leasehold interests in any real property of any Indian or Indian tribe,
band, or community that is held in trust by the United States or is subject to
a restriction against alienation imposed by the United States: PROVIDED, That
this exemption shall apply only where it is determined that contract rent paid
is greater than or equal to ninety percent of fair market rental, to be
determined by the department of revenue using the same criteria used to
establish taxable rent in RCW 82.29A.020(2)(b).

(8)
All leasehold interests for which annual taxable rent is less than two hundred
fifty dollars per year. For purposes of this subsection leasehold interests
held by the same lessee in contiguous properties owned by the same lessor shall
be deemed a single leasehold interest.

(9)
All leasehold interests which give use or possession of the leased property for
a continuous period of less than thirty days: PROVIDED, That for purposes of
this subsection, successive leases or lease renewals giving substantially
continuous use of possession of the same property to the same lessee shall be
deemed a single leasehold interest: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no leasehold
interest shall be deemed to give use or possession for a period of less than
thirty days solely by virtue of the reservation by the public lessor of the
right to use the property or to allow third parties to use the property on an
occasional, temporary basis.

(10)
All leasehold interests under month-to-month leases in residential units rented
for residential purposes of the lessee pending destruction or removal for the
purpose of constructing a public highway or building.

(11)
All leasehold interests in any publicly owned real or personal property to the
extent such leasehold interests arises solely by virtue of a contract for
public improvements or work executed under the public works statutes of this
state or of the United States between the public owner of the property and a
contractor.

(12)
All leasehold interests that give use or possession of state adult correctional
facilities for the purposes of operating correctional industries under RCW
72.09.100.

(13)
All leasehold interests used to provide organized and supervised recreational
activities for disabled persons of all ages in a camp facility and for public
recreational purposes by a nonprofit organization, association, or corporation
that would be exempt from property tax under RCW 84.36.030(1) if it owned the
property. If the publicly owned property is used for any taxable purpose, the
leasehold excise taxes set forth in RCW 82.29A.030 and 82.29A.040 shall be
imposed and shall be apportioned accordingly.

(14)
All leasehold interests in the public or entertainment areas of a baseball
stadium with natural turf and a retractable roof or canopy that is in a county
with a population of over one million, that has a seating capacity of over
forty thousand, and that is constructed on or after January 1, 1995.
"Public or entertainment areas" include ticket sales areas, ramps and
stairs, lobbies and concourses, parking areas, concession areas, restaurants,
hospitality and stadium club areas, kitchens or other work areas primarily
servicing other public or entertainment areas, public rest room areas, press
and media areas, control booths, broadcast and production areas, retail sales
areas, museum and exhibit areas, scoreboards or other public displays, storage
areas, loading, staging, and servicing areas, seating areas and suites, the
playing field, and any other areas to which the public has access or which are
used for the production of the entertainment event or other public usage, and
any other personal property used for these purposes. "Public or
entertainment areas" does not include locker rooms or private offices
exclusively used by the lessee.

(15)
All leasehold interests in the public or entertainment areas of a stadium and
exhibition center, as defined in RCW 36.102.010, that is constructed on or
after January 1, 1998. For the purposes of this subsection, "public or entertainment
areas" has the same meaning as in subsection (14) of this section, and
includes exhibition areas.

(16)
All leasehold interests in public facilities districts, as provided in chapter
36.100 RCW or chapter 35.‑-- RCW (sections 1 through 10 of this act).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17.
Sections 1 through 10 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 35 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 19. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---