BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.150 RCW to read as follows:

Subsequent
to the 1997-1999 biennium, the amount of general fund--state moneys
appropriated per full-time equivalent student for K-12 education shall at a
minimum be the 1997-1999 biennial general fund--state amount appropriated per
full-time equivalent student adjusted by the implicit price deflator.

For
purposes of this section, "implicit price deflator" means the
implicit price deflator for personal consumption adopted in November of each
even-numbered year by the economic and revenue forecast council.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---