BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.55.0101 and 1997 c 3 s 204 (Referendum Bill No. 47) are each amended to read
as follows:

(1)
Upon a finding of substantial need, the legislative authority of a taxing
district other than the state may provide, by ordinance or resolution,
for the use of a limit factor under this chapter of one hundred six percent or
less. The ordinance or resolution shall specify the specific activities,
projects, and programs that will be funded in the following year from the added
revenues and why they cannot be funded from the revenues that would otherwise
have been generated.

(2)
In districts with legislative authorities of four members or less, two-thirds
of the members must approve ((an)) the ordinance or resolution
under this section. In districts with legislative authorities of more
than four members, a majority plus one vote must approve ((an)) the
ordinance or resolution under this section.

(3)
The new limit factor shall be effective for taxes collected in the following
year only.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act applies to taxes levied for collection in 2000 and thereafter.

---
END ---