BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.225.010 and 1998 c 244 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All parents in this state of any child eight years of age and under eighteen
years of age shall cause such child to attend the public school of the district
in which the child resides and such child shall have the responsibility to and
therefore shall attend for the full time when such school may be in session
unless:

(a)
The child is attending an approved private school for the same time or is
enrolled in an extension program as provided in RCW 28A.195.010(4);

(b)
The child is receiving home-based instruction as provided in subsection (4) of
this section;

(c)
The child is attending an education center as provided in chapter 28A.205 RCW;

(d)
The school district superintendent of the district in which the child resides
shall have excused such child from attendance because the child is physically
or mentally unable to attend school, is attending a residential school operated
by the department of social and health services, is incarcerated in an adult
correctional facility, or has been temporarily excused upon the request of his or
her parents for purposes agreed upon by the school authorities and the parent:
PROVIDED, That such excused absences shall not be permitted if deemed to cause
a serious adverse effect upon the student's educational progress: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That students excused for such temporary absences may be claimed as
full time equivalent students to the extent they would otherwise have been so
claimed for the purposes of RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260 and shall not
affect school district compliance with the provisions of RCW 28A.150.220; or

(e)
The child is ((sixteen)) fifteen years of age or older and:

(i)
The child is regularly and lawfully employed and either the parent agrees that
the child should not be required to attend school or the child is emancipated
in accordance with chapter 13.64 RCW;

(ii)
The child has already met graduation requirements in accordance with state
board of education rules and regulations; or

(iii)
The child has received a certificate of educational competence under rules and
regulations established by the state board of education under RCW 28A.305.190.

(2)
A parent for the purpose of this chapter means a parent, guardian, or person
having legal custody of a child.

(3)
An approved private school for the purposes of this chapter and chapter 28A.200
RCW shall be one approved under regulations established by the state board of
education pursuant to RCW 28A.305.130.

(4)
For the purposes of this chapter and chapter 28A.200 RCW, instruction shall be
home-based if it consists of planned and supervised instructional and related
educational activities, including a curriculum and instruction in the basic
skills of occupational education, science, mathematics, language, social
studies, history, health, reading, writing, spelling, and the development of an
appreciation of art and music, provided for a number of hours equivalent to the
total annual program hours per grade level established for approved private
schools under RCW 28A.195.010 and 28A.195.040 and if such activities are:

(a)
Provided by a parent who is instructing his or her child only and are
supervised by a certificated person. A certificated person for purposes of
this chapter and chapter 28A.200 RCW shall be a person certified under chapter
28A.410 RCW. For purposes of this section, "supervised by a certificated
person" means: The planning by the certificated person and the parent of
objectives consistent with this subsection; a minimum each month of an average
of one contact hour per week with the child being supervised by the
certificated person; and evaluation of such child's progress by the
certificated person. The number of children supervised by the certificated
person shall not exceed thirty for purposes of this subsection; or

(b)
Provided by a parent who is instructing his or her child only and who has
either earned forty-five college level quarter credit hours or its equivalent
in semester hours or has completed a course in home-based instruction at a
postsecondary institution or a vocational-technical institute; or

(c)
Provided by a parent who is deemed sufficiently qualified to provide home-based
instruction by the superintendent of the local school district in which the
child resides.

(5)
The legislature recognizes that home-based instruction is less structured and
more experiential than the instruction normally provided in a classroom
setting. Therefore, the provisions of subsection (4) of this section relating
to the nature and quantity of instructional and related educational activities
shall be liberally construed.

Sec.
2. RCW
28A.225.030 and 1996 c 134 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If a child is required to attend school under RCW 28A.225.010 and if the
actions taken by a school district under RCW 28A.225.020 are not successful in
substantially reducing an enrolled student's absences from public school, not
later than the seventh unexcused absence by a child within any month during the
current school year or not later than the tenth unexcused absence during the current
school year the school district shall file a petition and supporting affidavit
for a civil action with the juvenile court alleging a violation of RCW
28A.225.010: (a) By the parent; (b) by the child; or (c) by the parent and the
child. Except as provided in this subsection, no additional documents need be
filed with the petition.

(2)
The district shall not later than the fifth unexcused absence in a month:

(a)
Enter into an agreement with a student and parent that establishes school
attendance requirements;

(b)
Refer a student to a community truancy board as defined in RCW 28A.225.025.
The community truancy board shall enter into an agreement with the student and
parent that establishes school attendance requirements and take other
appropriate actions to reduce the child's absences; or

(c)
File a petition under subsection (1) of this section.

(3)
The petition may be filed by a school district employee who is not an attorney.

(4)
If the school district fails to file a petition under this section, the parent
of a child with five or more unexcused absences in any month during the current
school year or upon the tenth unexcused absence during the current school year
may file a petition with the juvenile court alleging a violation of RCW
28A.225.010.

(5)
Petitions filed under this section may be served by certified mail, return
receipt requested. If such service is unsuccessful, or the return receipt is
not signed by the addressee, personal service is required.

Sec.
3. RCW
28A.225.035 and 1997 c 68 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A petition for a civil action under RCW 28A.225.030 shall consist of a written
notification to the court alleging that:

(a)
The child has unexcused absences during the current school year;

(b)
Actions taken by the school district have not been successful in substantially
reducing the child's absences from school; and

(c)
Court intervention and supervision are necessary to assist the school district
or parent to reduce the child's absences from school.

(2)
The petition shall set forth the name, age, school, and residence of the child
and the names and residence of the child's parents.

(3)
The petition shall set forth facts that support the allegations in this section
and shall generally request relief available under this chapter and provide
information about what the court might order under RCW 28A.225.090.

(4)
When a petition is filed under RCW 28A.225.030, the juvenile court shall
schedule a hearing at which the court shall consider the petition. However, a
hearing shall not be required if other actions by the court would substantially
reduce the child's unexcused absences. When a hearing is held, the court,
not the school district or parent of the child, shall:

(a)
Separately notify the child, the parent of the child, and the school district
of the hearing;

(b)
Notify the parent and the child of their rights to present evidence at the
hearing; and

(c)
Notify the parent and the child of the options and rights available under
chapter 13.32A RCW.

(5)
The court may require the attendance of both the child and the parents at any
hearing on a petition filed under RCW 28A.225.030.

(6)
The court may permit the first hearing to be held without requiring that either
party be represented by legal counsel, and to be held without a guardian ad
litem for the child under RCW 4.08.050. At the request of the school district,
the court may permit a school district representative who is not an attorney to
represent the school district at any future hearings.

(7)
If the allegations in the petition are established by a preponderance of the
evidence, the court shall grant the petition and enter an order assuming
jurisdiction to intervene for the period of time determined by the court, after
considering the facts alleged in the petition and the circumstances of the
juvenile, to most likely cause the juvenile to return to and remain in school
while the juvenile is subject to this chapter. In no case may the order expire
before the end of the school year in which it is entered. The order entered
by the court may consist, entirely or in part, of adoption of an agreement
previously entered into between a community truancy board and the student under
RCW 28A.225.030(2)(b). The court may, if the school district and community
truancy board agree, permit the truancy board to provide continued supervision
over the student and report on compliance with the order.

(8)
If the court assumes jurisdiction, the school district shall regularly report
to the court any additional unexcused absences by the child.

(9) Community truancy boards and the courts shall coordinate, to
the extent possible, proceedings and actions pertaining to children who are
subject to truancy petitions and at-risk youth petitions in RCW 13.32A.191 or
child in need of services petitions in RCW 13.32A.140.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---