BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
47.68.250 and 1998 c 188 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
aircraft shall be registered with the department for each calendar year in
which the aircraft is operated or is based within this state. A fee of ((four))
eight dollars shall be charged for each such registration and each
annual renewal thereof.

Possession
of the appropriate effective federal certificate, permit, rating, or license
relating to ownership and airworthiness of the aircraft, and payment of the
excise tax imposed by Title 82 RCW for the privilege of using the aircraft
within this state during the year for which the registration is sought, and
payment of the registration fee required by this section shall be the only
requisites for registration of an aircraft under this section.

The
registration fee imposed by this section shall be payable to and collected by
the secretary. The fee for any calendar year must be paid during the month of
January, and shall be collected by the secretary at the time of the collection
by him or her of the said excise tax. If the secretary is satisfied that the
requirements for registration of the aircraft have been met, he or she shall
thereupon issue to the owner of the aircraft a certificate of registration
therefor. The secretary shall pay to the state treasurer the registration fees
collected under this section, which registration fees shall be credited to the
aeronautics account in the transportation fund.

It
shall not be necessary for the registrant to provide the secretary with
originals or copies of federal certificates, permits, ratings, or licenses.
The secretary shall issue certificates of registration, or such other evidences
of registration or payment of fees as he or she may deem proper; and in
connection therewith may prescribe requirements for the possession and
exhibition of such certificates or other evidences.

The
provisions of this section shall not apply to:

(1)
An aircraft owned by and used exclusively in the service of any government or
any political subdivision thereof, including the government of the United
States, any state, territory, or possession of the United States, or the
District of Columbia, which is not engaged in carrying persons or property for
commercial purposes;

(2)
An aircraft registered under the laws of a foreign country;

(3)
An aircraft which is owned by a nonresident and registered in another state:
PROVIDED, That if said aircraft shall remain in and/or be based in this state
for a period of ninety days or longer it shall not be exempt under this
section;

(4)
An aircraft engaged principally in commercial flying constituting an act of
interstate or foreign commerce;

(5)
An aircraft owned by the commercial manufacturer thereof while being operated
for test or experimental purposes, or for the purpose of training crews for
purchasers of the aircraft;

(6)
An aircraft being held for sale, exchange, delivery, test, or demonstration
purposes solely as stock in trade of an aircraft dealer licensed under Title 14
RCW;

(7)
An aircraft based within the state that is in an unairworthy condition, is not
operated within the registration period, and has obtained a written exemption
issued by the secretary.

The
secretary shall be notified within one week of any change in ownership of a
registered aircraft. The notification shall contain the N, NC, NR, NL, or NX
number of the aircraft, the full name and address of the former owner, and the
full name and address of the new owner. For failure to so notify the
secretary, the registration of that aircraft may be canceled by the secretary,
subject to reinstatement upon application and payment of a reinstatement fee of
ten dollars by the new owner.

A
municipality or port district that owns, operates, or leases an airport, as
defined in RCW 47.68.020, with the intent to operate, shall require from an
aircraft owner proof of aircraft registration or proof of intent to register an
aircraft as a condition of leasing or selling tiedown or hangar space for an
aircraft. The airport shall inform the lessee or purchaser of the tiedown or
hangar space of the state law requiring registration and direct the person to
comply with the state law if the person has not already done so. The airport
may lease or sell tiedown or hangar space to owners of nonregistered aircraft
after presenting them with the appropriate state registration forms. It is
then the responsibility of the lessee or purchaser to register the aircraft.
The airport shall report to the department's aviation division at the end of
each month, the names, addresses, and "N" numbers of those aircraft
owners not yet registered.

Sec.
2. RCW
82.48.100 and 1965 ex.s. c 173 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

This
chapter shall not apply to:

Aircraft
owned by and used exclusively in the service of any government or any political
subdivision thereof, including the government of the United States, any state,
territory, or possession of the United States, or the District of Columbia,
which are not engaged in carrying persons or property for commercial purposes;

Aircraft
registered under the laws of a foreign country;

Aircraft
which are owned by a nonresident and registered in another state: PROVIDED,
That if any such aircraft shall remain in and/or be based in this state for a
period of ninety days or longer it shall not be exempt under this section;

Aircraft
engaged principally in commercial flying which constitutes interstate or
foreign commerce; and aircraft owned by the manufacturer thereof while being
operated for test or experimental purposes, or for the purpose of training
crews for purchasers of the aircraft;

Aircraft
being held for sale, exchange, delivery, test, or demonstration purposes solely
as stock in trade of an aircraft dealer licensed under Title 14 RCW;

Aircraft owned by a nonresident of this state if the aircraft is
kept at an airport in this state and that airport is jointly owned or operated
by a municipal corporation or other governmental entity of this state and a
municipal corporation or other governmental entity of another state, and the
owner or operator of the aircraft provides the department with proof that the
owner or operator has paid all taxes, license fees, and registration fees
required by the state in which the owner or operator resides.

---
END ---