BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

The
department of revenue shall deposit the moneys received by the department from
the imposition on consumers of the taxes under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW on
the sales or use of aircraft fuel as follows:

(1)
From July 1, 1999, through June 30, 2000, ten percent into the airport
development account, created in section 2 of this act, and ten percent into the
aeronautics account, created by RCW 82.42.090;

(2)
From July 1, 2000, through June 30, 2001, twenty percent into the airport
development account and twenty percent into the aeronautics account; and

(3)
Beginning July 1, 2001, and thereafter, thirty percent into the airport
development account and thirty percent into the aeronautics account.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.42 RCW to read as follows:

The airport development account is created in the transportation
fund. All moneys as directed by law must be deposited into the account.
Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from
the account may be used only for general aviation airport development and
maintenance, including any land adjacent to the airport that is owned by the
port district.

Sec.
3. RCW
43.84.092 and 1997 c 218 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations
shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4)
of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local
leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the
local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan I account, the public employees' retirement
system plan II account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource management
cost account, the site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account,
the state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the teachers'
retirement system plan I account, the teachers' retirement system plan II
account, the transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust
fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of
Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension
principal account, the volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension
administrative account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan I
retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan II retirement account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State
University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund,
and the Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal
school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific
permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to
their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under
this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the airport development account, the central Puget Sound
public transportation account, the city hardship assistance account, the county
arterial preservation account, the department of licensing services account,
the economic development account, the essential rail assistance account, the
essential rail banking account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the gasohol
exemption holding account, the grade crossing protective fund, the high
capacity transportation account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway
construction stabilization account, the highway safety account, the marine
operating fund, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education
account, the pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the
Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust account,
the safety and education account, the small city account, the special category
C account, the state patrol highway account, the transfer relief account, the
transportation capital facilities account, the transportation equipment fund,
the transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation revolving loan account, and the urban arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

Sec.
4. RCW
43.84.092 and 1998 c 341 s 708 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations
shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4)
of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local
leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the
local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan I account, the public employees' retirement
system plan II account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource
management cost account, the site closure account, the special wildlife
account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance
reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension
account, the teachers' retirement system plan I account, the teachers'
retirement system combined plan II and plan III account, the transportation
infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account,
the volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension principal account, the
volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension administrative account, the
Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan I retirement account, the Washington
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan II retirement account,
the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan II and III
account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State
University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement
fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington
University capital projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances
of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the
permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state
university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary
accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall
first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund
pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the airport development account, the central Puget Sound
public transportation account, the city hardship assistance account, the county
arterial preservation account, the department of licensing services account,
the economic development account, the essential rail assistance account, the
essential rail banking account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the gasohol
exemption holding account, the grade crossing protective fund, the high
capacity transportation account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway
construction stabilization account, the highway safety account, the marine
operating fund, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education
account, the pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the
Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust account,
the safety and education account, the small city account, the special category
C account, the state patrol highway account, the transfer relief account, the transportation
capital facilities account, the transportation equipment fund, the
transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the transportation
revolving loan account, and the urban arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
Section 3 of this act expires September 1, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
Section 4 of this act takes effect September 1, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7.
Sections 1 through 3 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and
its existing public institutions, and take effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---