BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
41.56.070 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 296 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

In the event the commission elects to conduct an election to
ascertain the exclusive bargaining representative, and upon the request of a
prospective bargaining representative showing written proof of at least thirty
percent representation of the public employees within the unit, the commission
shall hold an election by secret ballot to determine the issue. The ballot shall
contain the name of such bargaining representative and of any other bargaining
representative showing written proof of at least ten percent representation of
the public employees within the unit, together with a choice for any public
employee to designate that he does not desire to be represented by any
bargaining agent. Where more than one organization is on the ballot and
neither of the three or more choices receives a majority vote of the public
employees within the bargaining unit, a run-off election shall be held. The
run-off ballot shall contain the two choices which received the largest and
second-largest number of votes. No question concerning representation may be
raised within one year of a certification or attempted certification. Where there
is a valid collective bargaining agreement in effect, no question of
representation may be raised except during the period not more than ninety nor
less than sixty days prior to the expiration date of the agreement. Any
agreement which contains a provision for automatic renewal or extension of the
agreement shall not be a valid agreement((; nor shall any agreement be valid
if it provides for a term of existence for more than three years)). However,
an agreement may be for a term of any length as the parties may mutually agree.

---
END ---