BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.41.070 and 1996 c 295 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The chief of police of a municipality or the sheriff of a county shall within
thirty days after the filing of an application of any person, issue a license
to such person to carry a pistol concealed on his or her person within this
state either permanently or for five years from date of issue, as the
person may elect upon application for the license, for the purposes of
protection or while engaged in business, sport, or while traveling. However,
if the applicant does not have a valid permanent Washington driver's license or
Washington state identification card or has not been a resident of the state
for the previous consecutive ninety days, the issuing authority shall have up
to sixty days after the filing of the application to issue a license. The
issuing authority shall not refuse to accept completed applications for
concealed pistol licenses during regular business hours. A permanent
license issued under this section is valid until suspended or revoked or until
the person to whom the license was issued becomes otherwise ineligible to
possess a firearm or to obtain a concealed pistol license. Any person whose
eligibility is restored under this section, RCW 9.41.040, or other law, may
apply for a permanent license under this section. A permanent license issued
under this section entitles a person to carry a pistol concealed on his or her
person in accordance with this section regardless of the date of issuance of
the license, and the license need not be renewed for that purpose. However,
such a license does not entitle a person to take delivery of a pistol under RCW
9.41.090(1)(a) if more than five years have passed since the date of the
issuance or latest renewal of the license, and such a license may be renewed as
authorized by this section for the purpose of taking the delivery.

The
applicant's constitutional right to bear arms shall not be denied, unless:

(a)
He or she is ineligible to possess a firearm under the provisions of RCW
9.41.040 or 9.41.045;

(b)
The applicant's concealed pistol license is in a revoked status;

(c)
He or she is under twenty‑one years of age;

(d)
He or she is subject to a court order or injunction regarding firearms pursuant
to RCW 9A.46.080, 10.14.080, 10.99.040, 10.99.045, 26.09.050, 26.09.060,
26.10.040, 26.10.115, 26.26.130, 26.26.137, 26.50.060, or 26.50.070;

(e)
He or she is free on bond or personal recognizance pending trial, appeal, or
sentencing for a felony offense;

(f)
He or she has an outstanding warrant for his or her arrest from any court of
competent jurisdiction for a felony or misdemeanor; or

(g)
He or she has been ordered to forfeit a firearm under RCW 9.41.098(1)(e) within
one year before filing an application to carry a pistol concealed on his or her
person.

No
person convicted of a felony may have his or her right to possess firearms
restored or his or her privilege to carry a concealed pistol restored, unless
the person has been granted relief from disabilities by the secretary of the
treasury under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 925(c), or RCW 9.41.040 (3) or (4) applies.

(2)
The issuing authority shall check with the national crime information center,
the Washington state patrol electronic data base, the department of social and
health services electronic data base, and with other agencies or resources as
appropriate, to determine whether the applicant is ineligible under RCW
9.41.040 or 9.41.045 to possess a firearm and therefore ineligible for a
concealed pistol license. This subsection applies whether the applicant is
applying for a ((new)) permanent concealed pistol license or to
renew a concealed pistol license.

(3)
Any person whose firearms rights have been restricted and who has been granted
relief from disabilities by the secretary of the treasury under 18 U.S.C. Sec.
925(c) or who is exempt under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 921(a)(20)(A) shall have his or
her right to acquire, receive, transfer, ship, transport, carry, and possess
firearms in accordance with Washington state law restored except as otherwise
prohibited by this chapter.

(4)
The license application shall bear the full name, residential address,
telephone number at the option of the applicant, date and place of birth, race,
gender, description, not more than two complete sets of fingerprints, and
signature of the licensee, and the licensee's driver's license number or state
identification card number if used for identification in applying for the
license. A signed application for a concealed pistol license shall constitute
a waiver of confidentiality and written request that the department of social
and health services, mental health institutions, and other health care
facilities release information relevant to the applicant's eligibility for a
concealed pistol license to an inquiring court or law enforcement agency.

The
application for ((an original)) either a permanent or five-year
license shall include two complete sets of fingerprints to be forwarded to the
Washington state patrol.

The
license and application shall contain a warning substantially as follows:

CAUTION: Although state and local laws do not differ,
federal law and state law on the possession of firearms differ. If you are
prohibited by federal law from possessing a firearm, you may be prosecuted in
federal court. A state license is not a defense to a federal prosecution.

The
license shall contain a description of the major differences between state and
federal law and an explanation of the fact that local laws and ordinances on
firearms are preempted by state law and must be consistent with state law. The
application shall contain questions about the applicant's eligibility under RCW
9.41.040 to possess a pistol, the applicant's place of birth, and whether the
applicant is a United States citizen. The applicant shall not be required to
produce a birth certificate or other evidence of citizenship. A person who is
not a citizen of the United States shall meet the additional requirements of
RCW 9.41.170 and produce proof of compliance with RCW 9.41.170 upon
application. The license shall be in triplicate and in a form to be prescribed
by the department of licensing.

The
original thereof shall be delivered to the licensee, the duplicate shall within
seven days be sent to the director of licensing and the triplicate shall be
preserved for six years, by the authority issuing the license.

The
department of licensing shall make available to law enforcement and corrections
agencies, in an on-line format, all information received under this subsection.

(5)(a)
The nonrefundable fee, paid upon application, for the ((original five-year))
license ((shall be)) is thirty-six dollars for the five-year
license and one hundred dollars for the permanent license plus additional
charges imposed by the Federal Bureau of Investigation that are passed on to
the applicant for either license. No other state or local branch or
unit of government may impose any additional charges on the applicant for the
issuance of ((the)) either license.

(b)
The fee for the five-year license shall be distributed as follows:

(((a)))
(i) Fifteen dollars ((shall be paid)) to the state general fund;

(((b)))
(ii) Four dollars ((shall be paid)) to the agency taking the
fingerprints of the person licensed;

(((c)))
(iii) Fourteen dollars ((shall be paid)) to the issuing authority
for the purpose of enforcing this chapter; and

(((d)))
(iv) Three dollars to the firearms range account in the general fund.

(c)
The fee for the permanent license shall be distributed as follows:

(i)
Forty-seven dollars to the state general fund;

(ii)
Four dollars to the agency taking the fingerprints of the person licensed;

(iii)
Fourteen dollars to the issuing authority for the purpose of enforcing this
chapter; and

(iv)
Thirty-five dollars to the firearms range account in the general fund.

(6)
A person with a five-year license may renew the license for the purpose of
being eligible to take delivery of a pistol under RCW 9.41.090(1)(a). A
renewal is valid for that purpose for five years from the date of its issuance.
The nonrefundable fee for the renewal of ((such)) a five-year
license ((shall be)) is thirty-two dollars. No other branch or
unit of government may impose any additional charges on the applicant for the
renewal of the license.

The
renewal fee shall be distributed as follows:

(a)
Fifteen dollars shall be paid to the state general fund;

(b)
Fourteen dollars shall be paid to the issuing authority for the purpose of
enforcing this chapter; and

(c)
Three dollars to the firearms range account in the general fund.

(7)
The nonrefundable fee for replacement of lost or damaged licenses is ten
dollars to be paid to the issuing authority.

(8)
Payment shall be by cash, check, or money order at the option of the
applicant. Additional methods of payment may be allowed at the option of the
issuing authority.

(9)
A licensee may renew a five-year license if the licensee applies for
renewal within ninety days before or after the expiration date of the license.
A license so renewed shall take effect on the expiration date of the prior
license. A licensee renewing after the expiration date of the license must pay
a late renewal penalty of ten dollars in addition to the renewal fee specified
in subsection (6) of this section. The fee shall be distributed as follows:

(a)
Three dollars shall be deposited in the state wildlife fund and used
exclusively for the printing and distribution of a pamphlet on the legal limits
of the use of firearms, firearms safety, and the preemptive nature of state
law. The pamphlet shall be given to each applicant for a license; and

(b)
Seven dollars shall be paid to the issuing authority for the purpose of
enforcing this chapter.

(10)
Notwithstanding the requirements of subsections (1) through (9) of this
section, the chief of police of the municipality or the sheriff of the county
of the applicant's residence may issue a temporary emergency license for good
cause pending review under subsection (1) of this section. However, a
temporary emergency license issued under this subsection shall not exempt the
holder of the license from any records check requirement. Temporary emergency
licenses shall be easily distinguishable from regular licenses.

(11)
A political subdivision of the state shall not modify the requirements of this
section or chapter, nor may a political subdivision ask the applicant to
voluntarily submit any information not required by this section.

(12)
A person who knowingly makes a false statement regarding citizenship or
identity on an application for a concealed pistol license is guilty of false
swearing under RCW 9A.72.040. In addition to any other penalty provided for by
law, the concealed pistol license of a person who knowingly makes a false
statement shall be revoked, and the person shall be permanently ineligible for
a concealed pistol license.

(13)
A person may apply for a concealed pistol license:

(a)
To the municipality or to the county in which the applicant resides if the
applicant resides in a municipality;

(b)
To the county in which the applicant resides if the applicant resides in an
unincorporated area; or

(c)
Anywhere in the state if the applicant is a nonresident.

Sec.
2. RCW
9.41.090 and 1996 c 295 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In addition to the other requirements of this chapter, no dealer may deliver a
pistol to the purchaser thereof until:

(a)
The purchaser produces a valid concealed pistol license and the dealer has
recorded the purchaser's name, license number, and issuing agency, such record
to be made in triplicate and processed as provided in subsection (5) of this
section. For purposes of this subsection (1)(a), a "valid concealed pistol
license" does not include a temporary emergency license, and does not
include any license issued before July 1, 1996, unless the issuing agency
conducted a records search for disqualifying crimes under RCW 9.41.070 at the
time of issuance, and does not include any license more than five years
after the date of its issuance or latest renewal;

(b)
The dealer is notified in writing by the chief of police or the sheriff of the
jurisdiction in which the purchaser resides that the purchaser is eligible to
possess a pistol under RCW 9.41.040 and that the application to purchase is
approved by the chief of police or sheriff; or

(c)
Five business days, meaning days on which state offices are open, have elapsed
from the time of receipt of the application for the purchase thereof as
provided herein by the chief of police or sheriff designated in subsection (5)
of this section, and, when delivered, the pistol shall be securely wrapped and
shall be unloaded. However, if the purchaser does not have a valid permanent
Washington driver's license or state identification card or has not been a
resident of the state for the previous consecutive ninety days, the waiting
period under this subsection (1)(c) shall be up to sixty days.

(2)(a)
Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, in determining whether the
purchaser meets the requirements of RCW 9.41.040, the chief of police or
sheriff, or the designee of either, shall check with the national crime
information center, the Washington state patrol electronic data base, the
department of social and health services electronic data base, and with other
agencies or resources as appropriate, to determine whether the applicant is
ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a firearm.

(b)
Once the system is established, a dealer shall use the state system and
national instant criminal background check system, provided for by the Brady
Handgun Violence Prevention Act (18 U.S.C. Sec. 921 et seq.), to make criminal
background checks of applicants to purchase firearms. However, a chief of
police or sheriff, or a designee of either, shall continue to check the
department of social and health services' electronic data base and with other
agencies or resources as appropriate, to determine whether applicants are
ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a firearm.

(3)
In any case under subsection (1)(c) of this section where the applicant has an
outstanding warrant for his or her arrest from any court of competent
jurisdiction for a felony or misdemeanor, the dealer shall hold the delivery of
the pistol until the warrant for arrest is served and satisfied by appropriate
court appearance. The local jurisdiction for purposes of the sale shall
confirm the existence of outstanding warrants within seventy-two hours after
notification of the application to purchase a pistol is received. The local
jurisdiction shall also immediately confirm the satisfaction of the warrant on
request of the dealer so that the hold may be released if the warrant was for
an offense other than an offense making a person ineligible under RCW 9.41.040
to possess a pistol.

(4)
In any case where the chief or sheriff of the local jurisdiction has reasonable
grounds based on the following circumstances: (a) Open criminal charges, (b)
pending criminal proceedings, (c) pending commitment proceedings, (d) an
outstanding warrant for an offense making a person ineligible under RCW
9.41.040 to possess a pistol, or (e) an arrest for an offense making a person
ineligible under RCW 9.41.040 to possess a pistol, if the records of
disposition have not yet been reported or entered sufficiently to determine
eligibility to purchase a pistol, the local jurisdiction may hold the sale and
delivery of the pistol beyond five days up to thirty days in order to confirm
existing records in this state or elsewhere. After thirty days, the hold will
be lifted unless an extension of the thirty days is approved by a local
district court or municipal court for good cause shown. A dealer shall be
notified of each hold placed on the sale by local law enforcement and of any
application to the court for additional hold period to confirm records or
confirm the identity of the applicant.

(5)
At the time of applying for the purchase of a pistol, the purchaser shall sign
in triplicate and deliver to the dealer an application containing his or her
full name, residential address, date and place of birth, race, and gender; the
date and hour of the application; the applicant's driver's license number or
state identification card number; a description of the pistol including the
make, model, caliber and manufacturer's number if available at the time of applying
for the purchase of a pistol. If the manufacturer's number is not available,
the application may be processed, but delivery of the pistol to the purchaser
may not occur unless the manufacturer's number is recorded on the application
by the dealer and transmitted to the chief of police of the municipality or the
sheriff of the county in which the purchaser resides; and a statement that the
purchaser is eligible to possess a pistol under RCW 9.41.040.

The
application shall contain a warning substantially as follows:

CAUTION: Although state and local laws do not differ,
federal law and state law on the possession of firearms differ. If you are
prohibited by federal law from possessing a firearm, you may be prosecuted in
federal court. State permission to purchase a firearm is not a defense to a
federal prosecution.

The
purchaser shall be given a copy of the department of fish and wildlife pamphlet
on the legal limits of the use of firearms, firearms safety, and the fact that
local laws and ordinances on firearms are preempted by state law and must be
consistent with state law.

The
dealer shall, by the end of the business day, sign and attach his or her
address and deliver a copy of the application and such other documentation as
required under subsection (1) of this section to the chief of police of the
municipality or the sheriff of the county of which the purchaser is a
resident. The triplicate shall be retained by the dealer for six years. The
dealer shall deliver the pistol to the purchaser following the period of time
specified in this section unless the dealer is notified of an investigative
hold under subsection (4) of this section in writing by the chief of police of
the municipality or the sheriff of the county, whichever is applicable, denying
the purchaser's application to purchase and the grounds thereof. The
application shall not be denied unless the purchaser is not eligible to possess
a pistol under RCW 9.41.040 or 9.41.045, or federal law.

The
chief of police of the municipality or the sheriff of the county shall retain
or destroy applications to purchase a pistol in accordance with the requirements
of 18 U.S.C. Sec. 922.

(6)
A person who knowingly makes a false statement regarding identity or
eligibility requirements on the application to purchase a pistol is guilty of
false swearing under RCW 9A.72.040.

(7) This section does not apply to sales to licensed dealers for
resale or to the sale of antique firearms.

---
END ---