BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
42.30.030 and 1971 ex.s. c 250 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

All
meetings of the governing body of a public agency shall be open and public and
all persons shall be permitted to attend any meeting of the governing body of a
public agency, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

An
agenda shall be posted at least seventy-two hours before each regular meeting
and twenty-four hours before each special meeting. Each agenda item must be
described with enough specificity to indicate the subject matter or action to
be considered, but need not exceed twenty words per agenda item.

At
least fifteen minutes shall be allotted for public comment for each agenda
item. Each person desiring to speak shall be allotted at least three minutes,
except that the time allotted may be reduced proportionately if more than five
people desire to speak on the agenda item. The governing body shall accept
written comments in addition to spoken comments.

Sec.
2. RCW
42.30.040 and 1971 ex.s. c 250 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

A
member of the public shall not be required, as a condition to attendance at a
meeting of a governing body, to register his or her name and other
information, to complete a questionnaire, or otherwise to fulfill any condition
precedent to his or her attendance.

The
governing body may require persons desiring to speak or present written
comments to identify himself or herself.

Sec.
3. RCW
42.30.060 and 1989 c 42 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
((No)) A governing body of a public agency ((shall)) may
only adopt ((any)) an ordinance, resolution, rule,
regulation, order, or directive((, except in)) when:

(a)
Such action is taken at a meeting (i) open to the public ((and
then only at a meeting,)) and (ii) for which the date ((of which))
is fixed by law or rule((,)) or ((at a meeting of which)) notice
has been given according to the provisions of this chapter; and

(b)
The agenda for the meeting clearly indicates that the governing body may take
final action on the matter.

Any
action taken at meetings failing to comply with the provisions of this
subsection shall be null and void.

(2)
No governing body of a public agency at any meeting required to be open to the
public shall vote by secret ballot. Any vote taken in violation of this
subsection shall be null and void, and shall be considered an
"action" under this chapter.

Sec.
4. RCW
42.30.070 and 1983 c 155 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The governing body of a public agency shall provide the time for
holding regular meetings by ordinance, resolution, bylaws, or by whatever other
rule is required for the conduct of business by that body. ((Unless
otherwise provided for in the act under which the public agency was formed,))
Meetings of ((the)) a governing body ((need not)) of
a public agency defined under RCW 42.30.020(1)(a) shall be held within the
state. Meetings of a governing body of a public agency defined under RCW
42.30.020(1)(b) shall be held within the boundaries of the territory over
which the public agency exercises jurisdiction. Meetings of a governing
body of a public agency defined under RCW 42.30.020(1) (c) or (d) shall be held
within the boundaries of the territory of a public agency served by the
subagency or policy group. If at any time any regular meeting falls on a
holiday, such regular meeting shall be held on the next business day. If, by
reason of fire, flood, earthquake, or other emergency, there is a need for
expedited action by a governing body to meet the emergency, the presiding
officer of the governing body may provide for a meeting site other than the
regular meeting site and the notice and agenda requirements of this
chapter shall be suspended during such emergency. It shall not be a violation
of the requirements of this chapter for a majority of the members of a
governing body to travel together or gather for purposes other than a regular
meeting or a special meeting as these terms are used in this chapter:
PROVIDED, That they take no action as defined in this chapter.

---
END ---