BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
41.40.630 and 1991 c 343 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member with at least five service credit years who has
attained at least age sixty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a
retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.40.620.

(2)
EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least twenty service credit
years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to
receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW
41.40.620, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have
the retirement allowance ((actuarially)) reduced by three percent per
year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at
retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

Sec.
2. RCW
41.40.670 and 1995 c 144 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A member of the retirement system who becomes totally incapacitated for
continued employment by an employer as determined by the department upon
recommendation of the department shall be eligible to receive an allowance
under the provisions of RCW 41.40.610 through 41.40.740. The member shall
receive a monthly disability allowance computed as provided for in RCW
41.40.620 and shall have this allowance ((actuarially)) reduced by three
percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of years between
age at disability and the attainment of age sixty-five.

Any
member who receives an allowance under the provisions of this section shall be
subject to comprehensive medical examinations as required by the department.
If these medical examinations reveal that a member has recovered from the
incapacitating disability and the member is offered reemployment by an employer
at a comparable compensation, the member shall cease to be eligible for the
allowance.

(2)
The retirement for disability of a judge, who is a member of the retirement
system, by the supreme court under Article IV, section 31 of the Constitution
of the state of Washington (Amendment 71), with the concurrence of the department,
shall be considered a retirement under subsection (1) of this section.

(3)(a)
If the recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section dies
before the total of the retirement allowance paid to the recipient equals the
amount of the accumulated contributions at the date of retirement, then the
balance shall be paid to the member's estate, or the person or persons, trust,
or organization as the recipient has nominated by written designation duly
executed and filed with the director, or, if there is no designated person or
persons still living at the time of the recipient's death, then to the
surviving spouse, or, if there is no designated person or persons still living
at the time of his or her death nor a surviving spouse, then to his or her
legal representative.

(b)
If a recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section died before
April 27, 1989, and before the total of the retirement allowance paid to the
recipient equaled the amount of his or her accumulated contributions at the
date of retirement, then the department shall pay the balance of the
accumulated contributions to the member's surviving spouse or, if there is no
surviving spouse, then in equal shares to the member's children. If there is
no surviving spouse or children, the department shall retain the contributions.

Sec.
3. RCW
41.32.765 and 1991 c 343 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member with at least five service credit years of
service who has attained at least age sixty-five shall be eligible to retire
and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of
RCW 41.32.760.

(2)
EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least twenty service credit
years of service who has attained at least age fifty-five shall be eligible to
retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the
provisions of RCW 41.32.760, except that a member retiring pursuant to this
subsection shall have the retirement allowance ((actuarially)) reduced by
three percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of years
between age at retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

Sec.
4. RCW
41.32.790 and 1995 c 144 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A member of the retirement system who becomes totally incapacitated for
continued employment by an employer as determined by the department upon
recommendation of the department shall be eligible to receive an allowance
under the provisions of RCW 41.32.755 through 41.32.825. The member shall
receive a monthly disability allowance computed as provided for in RCW
41.32.760 and shall have the allowance ((actuarially)) reduced by
three percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of years
between age at disability and the attainment of age sixty-five.

Any
member who receives an allowance under the provisions of this section shall be
subject to comprehensive medical examinations as required by the department.
If medical examinations reveal that a member has recovered from the
incapacitating disability and the member is offered reemployment by an employer
at a comparable compensation, the member shall cease to be eligible for the
allowance.

(2)(a)
If the recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section dies
before the total of the retirement allowance paid to the recipient equals the
amount of the accumulated contributions at the date of retirement, then the
balance shall be paid to the member's estate, or the person or persons, trust,
or organization as the recipient has nominated by written designation duly
executed and filed with the director, or, if there is no designated person or
persons still living at the time of the recipient's death, then to the surviving
spouse, or, if there is neither a designated person or persons still living at
the time of his or her death nor a surviving spouse, then to his or her legal
representative.

(b)
If a recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section died before
April 27, 1989, and before the total of the retirement allowance paid to the
recipient equaled the amount of his or her accumulated contributions at the
date of retirement, then the department shall pay the balance of the
accumulated contributions to the member's surviving spouse or, if there is no
surviving spouse, then in equal shares to the member's children. If there is
no surviving spouse or children, the department shall retain the contributions.

Sec.
5. RCW
41.32.875 and 1996 c 39 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member who is at least age sixty-five and who has:

(a)
Completed ten service credit years; or

(b)
Completed five service credit years, including twelve service credit months
after attaining age fifty-four; or

(c)
Completed five service credit years by July 1, 1996, under plan 2 and who
transferred to plan 3 under RCW 41.32.817;

shall
be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according
to the provisions of RCW 41.32.840.

(2)
EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has attained at least age fifty-five and has
completed at least ten years of service shall be eligible to retire and to
receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW
41.32.840, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have
the retirement allowance ((actuarially)) reduced by three percent per
year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at
retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

Sec.
6. RCW
41.32.880 and 1995 c 239 s 114 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A member of the retirement system who becomes totally incapacitated for
continued employment by an employer as determined by the department shall be
eligible to receive an allowance under the provisions of plan 3. The member
shall receive a monthly disability allowance computed as provided for in RCW
41.32.840 and shall have this allowance ((actuarially)) reduced by
three percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of years
between age at disability and the attainment of age sixty-five.

Any
member who receives an allowance under the provisions of this section shall be
subject to comprehensive medical examinations as required by the department.
If these medical examinations reveal that a member has recovered from the
incapacitating disability and the member is offered reemployment by an employer
at a comparable compensation, the member shall cease to be eligible for the
allowance.

(2)
If the recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section dies, any
further benefit payments shall be conditioned by the payment option selected by
the retiree as provided in RCW 41.32.851.

Sec.
7. RCW
41.26.430 and 1993 c 517 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member with at least five service credit years of
service who has attained at least age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire
and to receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of
RCW 41.26.420.

(2)
EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least twenty service credit
years of service and has attained age fifty shall be eligible to retire and to
receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW
41.26.420, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have
the retirement allowance ((actuarially)) reduced by three percent per
year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at
retirement and the attainment of age fifty-five.

Sec.
8. RCW
41.26.470 and 1995 c 144 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A member of the retirement system who becomes totally incapacitated for
continued employment by an employer as determined by the director shall be
eligible to receive an allowance under the provisions of RCW 41.26.410 through
41.26.550. Such member shall receive a monthly disability allowance computed
as provided for in RCW 41.26.420 and shall have such allowance ((actuarially))
reduced by three percent per year to reflect the difference in the
number of years between age at disability and the attainment of age fifty-five.

(2)
Any member who receives an allowance under the provisions of this section shall
be subject to such comprehensive medical examinations as required by the
department. If such medical examinations reveal that such a member has
recovered from the incapacitating disability and the member is no longer
entitled to benefits under Title 51 RCW, the retirement allowance shall be
canceled and the member shall be restored to duty in the same civil service
rank, if any, held by the member at the time of retirement or, if unable to
perform the duties of the rank, then, at the member's request, in such other
like or lesser rank as may be or become open and available, the duties of which
the member is then able to perform. In no event shall a member previously
drawing a disability allowance be returned or be restored to duty at a salary
or rate of pay less than the current salary attached to the rank or position
held by the member at the date of the retirement for disability. If the
department determines that the member is able to return to service, the member
is entitled to notice and a hearing. Both the notice and the hearing shall
comply with the requirements of chapter 34.05 RCW, the Administrative Procedure
Act.

(3)
Those members subject to this chapter who became disabled in the line of duty
on or after July 23, 1989, and who receive benefits under RCW 41.04.500 through
41.04.530 or similar benefits under RCW 41.04.535 shall receive or continue to
receive service credit subject to the following:

(a)
No member may receive more than one month's service credit in a calendar month.

(b)
No service credit under this section may be allowed after a member separates or
is separated without leave of absence.

(c)
Employer contributions shall be paid by the employer at the rate in effect for
the period of the service credited.

(d)
Employee contributions shall be collected by the employer and paid to the
department at the rate in effect for the period of service credited.

(e)
State contributions shall be as provided in RCW 41.26.450.

(f)
Contributions shall be based on the regular compensation which the member would
have received had the disability not occurred.

(g)
The service and compensation credit under this section shall be granted for a
period not to exceed six consecutive months.

(h)
Should the legislature revoke the service credit authorized under this section
or repeal this section, no affected employee is entitled to receive the credit
as a matter of contractual right.

(4)(a)
If the recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section dies
before the total of the retirement allowance paid to the recipient equals the
amount of the accumulated contributions at the date of retirement, then the
balance shall be paid to the member's estate, or such person or persons, trust,
or organization as the recipient has nominated by written designation duly
executed and filed with the director, or, if there is no such designated person
or persons still living at the time of the recipient's death, then to the
surviving spouse, or, if there is neither such designated person or persons
still living at the time of his or her death nor a surviving spouse, then to
his or her legal representative.

(b)
If a recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section died before
April 27, 1989, and before the total of the retirement allowance paid to the
recipient equaled the amount of his or her accumulated contributions at the
date of retirement, then the department shall pay the balance of the
accumulated contributions to the member's surviving spouse or, if there is no
surviving spouse, then in equal shares to the member's children. If there is
no surviving spouse or children, the department shall retain the contributions.

Sec.
9. RCW
41.35.420 and 1998 c 341 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member with at least five service credit years who has
attained at least age sixty-five shall be eligible to retire and to receive a
retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW 41.35.400.

(2)
EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has completed at least twenty service credit
years and has attained age fifty-five shall be eligible to retire and to
receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW
41.35.400, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have
the retirement allowance ((actuarially)) reduced by three percent per
year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at
retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

Sec.
10. RCW
41.35.440 and 1998 c 341 s 105 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A member of the retirement system who becomes totally incapacitated for
continued employment by an employer as determined by the department upon
recommendation of the department shall be eligible to receive an allowance
under the provisions of RCW 41.35.400 through 41.35.599. The member shall
receive a monthly disability allowance computed as provided for in RCW
41.35.400 and shall have this allowance ((actuarially)) reduced by
three percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of years
between age at disability and the attainment of age sixty-five.

Any
member who receives an allowance under the provisions of this section shall be
subject to comprehensive medical examinations as required by the department.
If these medical examinations reveal that a member has recovered from the
incapacitating disability and the member is offered reemployment by an employer
at a comparable compensation, the member shall cease to be eligible for the
allowance.

(2)
If the recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section dies
before the total of the retirement allowance paid to the recipient equals the
amount of the accumulated contributions at the date of retirement, then the
balance shall be paid to the member's estate, or the person or persons, trust,
or organization as the recipient has nominated by written designation duly
executed and filed with the director, or, if there is no designated person or
persons still living at the time of the recipient's death, then to the
surviving spouse, or, if there is no designated person or persons still living
at the time of his or her death nor a surviving spouse, then to his or her
legal representative.

Sec.
11. RCW
41.35.680 and 1998 c 341 s 209 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
NORMAL RETIREMENT. Any member who is at least age sixty-five and who has:

(a)
Completed ten service credit years; or

(b)
Completed five service credit years, including twelve service credit months
after attaining age fifty-four; or

(c)
Completed five service credit years by September 1, 2000, under the public
employees' retirement system plan 2 and who transferred to plan 3 under RCW
41.35.510;

shall
be eligible to retire and to receive a retirement allowance computed according
to the provisions of RCW 41.35.620.

(2)
EARLY RETIREMENT. Any member who has attained at least age fifty-five and has
completed at least ten years of service shall be eligible to retire and to
receive a retirement allowance computed according to the provisions of RCW
41.35.620, except that a member retiring pursuant to this subsection shall have
the retirement allowance ((actuarially)) reduced by three percent per
year to reflect the difference in the number of years between age at
retirement and the attainment of age sixty-five.

Sec.
12. RCW
41.35.690 and 1998 c 341 s 210 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A member of the retirement system who becomes totally incapacitated for
continued employment by an employer as determined by the department shall be
eligible to receive an allowance under the provisions of plan 3. The member
shall receive a monthly disability allowance computed as provided for in RCW
41.35.620 and shall have this allowance ((actuarially)) reduced by
three percent per year to reflect the difference in the number of years
between age at disability and the attainment of age sixty-five.

Any
member who receives an allowance under the provisions of this section shall be
subject to comprehensive medical examinations as required by the department.
If these medical examinations reveal that a member has recovered from the
incapacitating disability and the member is offered reemployment by an employer
at a comparable compensation, the member shall cease to be eligible for the
allowance.

(2)
If the recipient of a monthly retirement allowance under this section dies, any
further benefit payments shall be conditioned by the payment option selected by
the retiree as provided in RCW 41.35.220.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
requires otherwise.

(1)
"Actuary" means the state actuary or the office of the state actuary.

(2)
"Department" means the department of retirement systems.

(3)
"Member" means any employee included in the membership of a
retirement system as provided for in chapter 41.26 RCW of plan 2, chapter 41.32
RCW of plan 2, chapter 41.35 RCW of plan 2, or chapter 41.40 RCW of plan 2.

(4)
"Member account" or "member's account" means the sum of any
contributions as provided for in this chapter and the earnings on behalf of the
member.

(5)
"Board" means the employee retirement benefits board authorized in
chapter 41.50 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. (1)
On January 1, 2002, and on January 1st of even-numbered years thereafter, the
member account of a person meeting the requirements of this section shall be
credited by the extraordinary investment gain amount.

(2)
The following persons shall be eligible for the benefit provided in subsection
(1) of this section:

(a)
Any member who earned service credit during the twelve-month period from
September 1st to August 31st immediately preceding the distribution;

(b)
Any person in receipt of a benefit pursuant to RCW 41.26.430, 41.32.765,
41.35.420, or 41.40.630; or

(c)
Any person who had a combined balance of at least one thousand dollars in
contributions and interest credited to their member account or their member's
individual account pursuant to chapter 41.26, 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW on
August 31st of the year immediately preceding the distribution and who completed
five service credit years.

(3)
The extraordinary investment gain amount shall be calculated as follows:

(a)
One-half of the sum of the value of the net assets held in trust for pension
benefits at the close of the previous state fiscal year in the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' plan 2 fund, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and 3 fund, the Washington school employees' retirement system
combined plan 2 and 3 fund, and the public employees' retirement system plan 2
fund; not including the amount attributable to member accounts;

(b)
Multiplied by the amount which the compound average of investment returns on
those assets over the previous four state fiscal years exceeds ten percent;

(c)
Multiplied by the proportion of:

(i)
The sum of the service credit on August 31st of the previous year of all
persons eligible for the benefit provided in subsection (1) of this section; to

(ii)
The sum of the service credit on August 31st of the previous year of:

(A)
All persons eligible for the benefit provided in subsection (1) of this
section;

(B)
Any person who earned service credit in the teachers' retirement system plan 3
or the Washington school employees' retirement system plan 3 during the
twelve-month period from September 1st to August 31st immediately preceding the
distribution;

(C)
Any person in receipt of a benefit pursuant to RCW 41.32.875 or 41.35.680; and

(D)
Any person with five or more years of service in the teachers' retirement
system plan 3 or the Washington school employees' retirement system plan 3;

(d)
Divided proportionally among persons eligible for the benefit provided in
subsection (1) of this section on the basis of their service credit total on
August 31st of the previous year.

(4)
The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this section in the
future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual right to receive this
distribution not granted prior to that time.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. (1)
On January 1, 2002, the member account of a person meeting the requirements of
this section shall be credited by the 1998 and 2000 retroactive extraordinary
investment gain amounts.

(2)
The following persons shall be eligible for the benefits provided in subsection
(1) of this section:

(a)
Any member who earned service credit during the twelve-month period from
September 1st to August 31st immediately preceding the distribution;

(b)
Any person in receipt of a benefit pursuant to RCW 41.26.430, 41.32.765,
41.35.420, or 41.40.630; or

(c)
Any person who had a combined balance of at least one thousand dollars in
contributions and interest credited to their member account or their member's
individual account pursuant to chapter 41.26, 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW on
August 31st of the year immediately preceding the distribution and who
completed five service credit years by September 1, 2001.

(3)
The 1998 retroactive extraordinary investment gain amount shall be calculated
as follows:

(a)
An amount equal to the average benefit per year of service paid to members of
the teachers' retirement system plan 3 pursuant to section 309, chapter 341,
Laws of 1998 in 1998;

(b)
Distributed to persons eligible for the benefit provided in subsection (1) of
this section on the basis of their service credit total on August 31, 1997.

(4)
The 2000 retroactive extraordinary investment gain amount shall be calculated
as follows:

(a)
An amount equal to the average benefit per year of service paid to members of
the teachers' retirement system plan 3 pursuant to section 309, chapter 341,
Laws of 1998 in 2000;

(b)
Distributed to persons eligible for the benefit provided in subsection (1) of
this section on the basis of their service credit total on August 31, 1999.

(5)
The legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal this section in the
future and no member or beneficiary has a contractual right to receive this
distribution not granted prior to that time.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. (1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the member's account
shall be invested by the state investment board. In order to reduce
transaction costs and address liquidity issues, based upon recommendations of
the state investment board, the department may require members to provide up to
ninety days' notice prior to moving funds from the state investment board
portfolio to self-directed investment options provided under subsection (2) of
this section.

(a)
For members of the retirement system as provided for in chapter 41.26 RCW of
plan 2, investment shall be in the same portfolio as that of the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 fund under
RCW 41.50.075(1).

(b)
For members of the retirement system as provided for in chapter 41.32 RCW of
plan 2, investment shall be in the same portfolio as that of the teachers'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund under RCW 41.50.075(2).

(c)
For members of the retirement system as provided for in chapter 41.35 RCW of
plan 2, investment shall be in the same portfolio as that of the school
employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund under RCW 41.50.075(4).

(d)
For members of the retirement system as provided for in chapter 41.40 RCW of
plan 2, investment shall be in the same portfolio as that of the public
employees' retirement system plan 2 fund under RCW 41.50.075(3).

(2)
Members may elect to self-direct their investments as set forth in RCW
41.34.130 and 43.33A.190.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17. (1)
If the member retires, becomes disabled, or otherwise terminates employment,
the balance in the member's account may be distributed in accordance with an
option selected by the member either as a lump sum or pursuant to other options
authorized by the board.

(2)
If the member dies while in service, the balance of the member's account may be
distributed in accordance with an option selected by the member either as a
lump sum or pursuant to other options authorized by the board. The
distribution shall be made to such person or persons as the member shall have
nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the department.
If there be no such designated person or persons still living at the time of
the member's death, the balance of the member's account in the retirement system,
less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal of such
account balance pursuant to a court order filed under RCW 41.50.670, shall be
paid to the member's surviving spouse as if in fact such spouse had been
nominated by written designation, or if there is no surviving spouse, then to
such person or persons, trust, or organization as the member shall have
nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the department.

(3)
If a member has a terminal illness and terminates from employment, the member
may choose to have the balance in the member's account distributed as a lump
sum payment based on the most recent valuation in order to expedite the
distribution. The department shall make this payment within ten working days
after receipt of notice of termination of employment, documentation verifying
the terminal illness, and an application for payment.

(4)
The distribution under subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section shall be
less any amount identified as owing to an obligee upon withdrawal pursuant to a
court order filed under RCW 41.50.670.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. (1)
Subject to subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the right of a person to a
pension, an annuity, a retirement allowance, any optional benefit, any other
right accrued or accruing to any person under the provisions of this chapter,
and the various funds created by this chapter and all moneys and investments
and income thereof, is hereby exempt from any state, county, municipal, or
other local tax, and shall not be subject to execution, garnishment,
attachment, the operation of bankruptcy or insolvency laws, or other process of
law whatsoever, and shall be unassignable.

(2)
This section does not prohibit a beneficiary of a retirement allowance from
authorizing deductions therefrom for payment of premiums due on any group
insurance policy or plan issued for the benefit of a group comprised of public
employees of the state of Washington or its political subdivisions and that has
been approved for deduction in accordance with rules that may be adopted by the
state health care authority, the department, or both. This section does not
prohibit a beneficiary of a retirement allowance from authorizing deductions
therefrom for payment of dues and other membership fees to any retirement
association or organization the membership of which is composed of retired
public employees, if a total of three hundred or more of such retired employees
have authorized such deduction for payment to the same retirement association
or organization.

(3)
Subsection (1) of this section does not prohibit the department from complying
with (a) a wage assignment order for child support issued pursuant to chapter
26.18 RCW, (b) an order to withhold and deliver issued pursuant to chapter
74.20A RCW, (c) a notice of payroll deduction issued pursuant to RCW 26.23.060,
(d) a mandatory benefits assignment order issued by the department, (e) a court
order directing the department to pay benefits directly to an obligee under a
dissolution order as defined in RCW 41.50.500(3) which fully complies with RCW
41.50.670 and 41.50.700, or (f) any administrative or court order expressly
authorized by federal law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19. (1)
The member accounts created by this chapter shall be administered so as to
comply with the federal Internal Revenue Code, Title 26 U.S.C., and
specifically with plan qualification requirements imposed on governmental plans
by section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2)
Any section or provision of this chapter which may be susceptible to more than
one construction shall be interpreted in favor of the construction most likely
to satisfy requirements imposed by section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(3)
If any section or provision of this chapter is found to be in conflict with the
plan qualification requirements for governmental plans in section 401(a) of the
Internal Revenue Code, the conflicting part of this chapter is hereby
inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict, and such finding shall not
affect the operation of the remainder of this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 20.
Sections 13 through 19 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 41 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 21.
Sections 9 through 12 of this act take effect September 1, 2000.

---
END ---