BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.29A.130 and 1997 c 220 s 202 (Referendum Bill No. 48) are each amended to
read as follows:

The
following leasehold interests shall be exempt from taxes imposed pursuant to
RCW 82.29A.030 and 82.29A.040:

(1)
All leasehold interests constituting a part of the operating properties of any
public utility which is assessed and taxed as a public utility pursuant to
chapter 84.12 RCW.

(2)
All leasehold interests in facilities owned or used by a school, college or
university which leasehold provides housing for students and which is otherwise
exempt from taxation under provisions of RCW 84.36.010 and 84.36.050.

(3)
All leasehold interests of subsidized housing where the fee ownership of such
property is vested in the government of the United States, or the state of
Washington or any political subdivision thereof but only if income
qualification exists for such housing.

(4)
All leasehold interests used for fair purposes of a nonprofit fair association
that sponsors or conducts a fair or fairs which receive support from revenues
collected pursuant to RCW 67.16.100 and allocated by the director of the
department of agriculture where the fee ownership of such property is vested in
the government of the United States, the state of Washington or any of its
political subdivisions: PROVIDED, That this exemption shall not apply to the
leasehold interest of any sublessee of such nonprofit fair association if such
leasehold interest would be taxable if it were the primary lease.

(5)
All leasehold interests in any property of any public entity used as a
residence by an employee of that public entity who is required as a condition
of employment to live in the publicly owned property.

(6)
All leasehold interests held by enrolled Indians of lands owned or held by any
Indian or Indian tribe where the fee ownership of such property is vested in or
held in trust by the United States and which are not subleased to other than to
a lessee which would qualify pursuant to this chapter, RCW 84.36.451 and
84.40.175.

(7)
All leasehold interests in any real property of any Indian or Indian tribe,
band, or community that is held in trust by the United States or is subject to
a restriction against alienation imposed by the United States: PROVIDED, That
this exemption shall apply only where it is determined that contract rent paid
is greater than or equal to ninety percent of fair market rental, to be
determined by the department of revenue using the same criteria used to
establish taxable rent in RCW 82.29A.020(2)(b).

(8)
All leasehold interests for which annual taxable rent is less than two hundred
fifty dollars per year. For purposes of this subsection leasehold interests
held by the same lessee in contiguous properties owned by the same lessor shall
be deemed a single leasehold interest.

(9)
All leasehold interests which give use or possession of the leased property for
a continuous period of less than thirty days: PROVIDED, That for purposes of
this subsection, successive leases or lease renewals giving substantially continuous
use of possession of the same property to the same lessee shall be deemed a
single leasehold interest: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no leasehold interest shall
be deemed to give use or possession for a period of less than thirty days
solely by virtue of the reservation by the public lessor of the right to use
the property or to allow third parties to use the property on an occasional,
temporary basis.

(10)
All leasehold interests under month-to-month leases in residential units rented
for residential purposes of the lessee pending destruction or removal for the
purpose of constructing a public highway or building.

(11)
All leasehold interests in any publicly owned real or personal property to the
extent such leasehold interests arises solely by virtue of a contract for
public improvements or work executed under the public works statutes of this
state or of the United States between the public owner of the property and a
contractor.

(12)
All leasehold interests that give use or possession of state adult correctional
facilities for the purposes of operating correctional industries under RCW
72.09.100.

(13)
All leasehold interests used to provide organized and supervised recreational
activities for disabled persons of all ages in a camp facility and for public
recreational purposes by a nonprofit organization, association, or corporation
that would be exempt from property tax under RCW 84.36.030(1) if it owned the
property. If the publicly owned property is used for any taxable purpose, the
leasehold excise taxes set forth in RCW 82.29A.030 and 82.29A.040 shall be
imposed and shall be apportioned accordingly.

(14)
All leasehold interests in the public or entertainment areas of a baseball
stadium with natural turf and a retractable roof or canopy that is in a county
with a population of over one million, that has a seating capacity of over
forty thousand, and that is constructed on or after January 1, 1995.
"Public or entertainment areas" include ticket sales areas, ramps and
stairs, lobbies and concourses, parking areas, concession areas, restaurants,
hospitality and stadium club areas, kitchens or other work areas primarily
servicing other public or entertainment areas, public rest room areas, press
and media areas, control booths, broadcast and production areas, retail sales
areas, museum and exhibit areas, scoreboards or other public displays, storage
areas, loading, staging, and servicing areas, seating areas and suites, the
playing field, and any other areas to which the public has access or which are used
for the production of the entertainment event or other public usage, and any
other personal property used for these purposes. "Public or entertainment
areas" does not include locker rooms or private offices exclusively used
by the lessee.

(15)
All leasehold interests in the public or entertainment areas of a stadium and
exhibition center, as defined in RCW 36.102.010, that is constructed on or
after January 1, 1998. For the purposes of this subsection, "public or
entertainment areas" has the same meaning as in subsection (14) of this
section, and includes exhibition areas.

(16) All leasehold interests granting use or possession of
federal lands administered by the United States forest service for the purposes
of building and/or occupying an improvement owned by the lessee for private,
noncommercial use as a recreational residence, and for which an annual permit
fee is paid to the United States department of agriculture or the United States
forest service. To claim this exemption, the leasehold interest must be
renewed at least annually and preclude permanent occupancy. The lessee must
also comply with all forest service regulations. This exemption does not apply
to commercial and multiunit housing.

---
END ---