BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 70.44 RCW to read as follows:

A
hospital district may not sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of a
district hospital or all or substantially all of its property, as authorized
under RCW 70.44.240 and 70.44.300 through 70.44.320, unless the proposed sale,
lease, exchange, or other disposition is first submitted to the voters of the
hospital district for approval in an election conducted in accordance with the
general election laws. The proposition expressed on the ballot at such an
election shall be substantially as follows:

Shall the proposed (sale) (lease) (exchange) (other disposition)
(use bracketed material as applicable) of the property of the Hospital District
approved by its Board of Commissioners on (insert date), be approved and
carried out?

Yes No

---
END ---