BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.06A.030 and 1996 c 131 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
ombudsman shall perform the following duties:

(1)
Provide information as appropriate on the rights and responsibilities of
individuals receiving family and children's services, and on the procedures for
providing these services;

(2)
Investigate, upon his or her own initiative or upon receipt of a complaint, an
administrative act alleged to be contrary to law, rule, or policy, imposed
without an adequate statement of reason, or based on irrelevant, immaterial, or
erroneous grounds; however, the ombudsman may decline to investigate any
complaint as provided by rules adopted under this chapter;

(3)
Monitor the procedures as established, implemented, and practiced by the
department to carry out its responsibilities in delivering family and
children's services with a view toward appropriate preservation of families and
ensuring children's health and safety;

(4)
((Review periodically the facilities and procedures of state institutions
serving children, and state-licensed facilities or residences;

(5)))
Recommend changes in the procedures for addressing the needs of families and
children;

(((6)))
(5) Submit annually to the committee and to the governor by November 1 a
report analyzing the work of the office including recommendations;

(((7)))
(6) Grant the committee access to all relevant records in the possession
of the ombudsman unless prohibited by law; and

(((8)))
(7) Adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter.

Sec.
2. RCW
13.34.105 and 1993 c 241 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Unless otherwise directed by the court, the duties of the guardian ad litem
include but are not limited to the following:

(a)
To represent and be an advocate for the best interests of the child;

(b)
To collect relevant information about the child's situation;

(c)
To monitor all court orders for compliance and to bring to the court's
attention any change in circumstances that may require a modification of the
court's order; and

(d)
To report to the court information on the legal status of a child's membership
in any Indian tribe or band.

(2)
The guardian ad litem shall be deemed an officer of the court for the purpose
of immunity from civil liability.

(3)
Except for information or records specified in RCW 13.50.100(((4))) (5),
the guardian ad litem shall have access to all information available to the
state or agency on the case. Upon presentation of the order of appointment by
the guardian ad litem, any agency, hospital, school organization, division or
department of the state, doctor, nurse, or other health care provider,
psychologist, psychiatrist, police department, or mental health clinic shall
permit the guardian ad litem to inspect and copy any records relating to the
child or children involved in the case, without the consent of the parent or
guardian of the child, or of the child if the child is under the age of
thirteen years, unless such access is otherwise specifically prohibited by law.

(4)
A guardian ad litem may release confidential information, records, and
reports to the office of the family and children's ombudsman for the purposes
of carrying out its duties under chapter 43.06A RCW.

(5)
The guardian ad litem shall release case information in accordance with the
provisions of RCW 13.50.100.

Sec.
3. RCW
13.50.100 and 1997 c 386 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
This section governs records not covered by RCW 13.50.050.

(2)
Records covered by this section shall be confidential and shall be released
only pursuant to this section and RCW 13.50.010.

(3)
Records retained or produced by any juvenile justice or care agency may be
released to other participants in the juvenile justice or care system only when
an investigation or case involving the juvenile in question is being pursued by
the other participant or when that other participant is assigned the
responsibility of supervising the juvenile. Records covered under this section
and maintained by the juvenile courts which relate to the official actions of
the agency may be entered in the state-wide juvenile court information system.

(4)
A contracting agency or service provider of the department of social and
health services that provides counseling, psychological, psychiatric, or
medical services may release to the office of the family and children's ombudsman
information or records relating to services provided to a juvenile who is
dependent under chapter 13.34 RCW without the consent of the parent or guardian
of the juvenile, or of the juvenile if the juvenile is under the age of
thirteen years, unless such release is otherwise specifically prohibited by
law.

(5)
A juvenile, his or her parents, the juvenile's attorney and the juvenile's
parent's attorney, shall, upon request, be given access to all records and
information collected or retained by a juvenile justice or care agency which
pertain to the juvenile except:

(a)
If it is determined by the agency that release of this information is likely to
cause severe psychological or physical harm to the juvenile or his or her
parents the agency may withhold the information subject to other order of the
court: PROVIDED, That if the court determines that limited release of the
information is appropriate, the court may specify terms and conditions for the
release of the information; or

(b)
If the information or record has been obtained by a juvenile justice or care
agency in connection with the provision of counseling, psychological,
psychiatric, or medical services to the juvenile, when the services have been
sought voluntarily by the juvenile, and the juvenile has a legal right to
receive those services without the consent of any person or agency, then the
information or record may not be disclosed to the juvenile's parents without
the informed consent of the juvenile unless otherwise authorized by law; or

(c)
That the department of social and health services may delete the name and
identifying information regarding persons or organizations who have reported
alleged child abuse or neglect.

(((5)))
(6) A juvenile or his or her parent denied access to any records
following an agency determination under subsection (((4))) (5) of
this section may file a motion in juvenile court requesting access to the
records. The court shall grant the motion unless it finds access may not be
permitted according to the standards found in subsections (((4))) (5)(a)
and (b) of this section.

(((6)))
(7) The person making a motion under subsection (((5))) (6)
of this section shall give reasonable notice of the motion to all parties to
the original action and to any agency whose records will be affected by the
motion.

(((7)))
(8) Subject to the rules of discovery in civil cases, any party to a
proceeding seeking a declaration of dependency or a termination of the
parent-child relationship and any party's counsel and the guardian ad litem of
any party, shall have access to the records of any natural or adoptive child of
the parent, subject to the limitations in subsection (((4))) (5)
of this section. A party denied access to records may request judicial review
of the denial. If the party prevails, he or she shall be awarded attorneys'
fees, costs, and an amount not less than five dollars and not more than one hundred
dollars for each day the records were wrongfully denied.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 26.12 RCW to read as follows:

A
guardian ad litem appointed under this chapter may release confidential information,
records, and reports to the office of the family and children's ombudsman for
the purposes of carrying out its duties under chapter 43.06A RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 43.06A RCW to read as follows:

The
department of social and health services shall:

(1)
Allow the ombudsman or the ombudsman's designee to communicate privately with
any child in the custody of the department for the purposes of carrying out its
duties under this chapter;

(2)
Permit the ombudsman or the ombudsman's designee physical access to state
institutions serving children, and state licensed facilities or residences for
the purpose of carrying out its duties under this chapter;

(3)
Upon the ombudsman's request, grant the ombudsman or the ombudsman's designee
the right to access, inspect, and copy all relevant information, records, or
documents in the possession or control of the department that the ombudsman
considers necessary in an investigation; and

(4)
Grant the office of the family and children's ombudsman unrestricted on-line
access to the case and management information system (CAMIS) for the purpose of
carrying out its duties under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 43.06A RCW to read as follows:

With
the approval of the legislative oversight committee, the office of the family
and children's ombudsman shall have the right to apply for and accept grants.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 43.06A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
An employee of the office of the family and children's ombudsman is not liable
for good faith performance of responsibilities under this chapter.

(2)
No discriminatory, disciplinary, or retaliatory action may be taken against an
employee of the department, an employee of a contracting agency of the
department, a foster parent, or a recipient of family and children's services
for any communication made, or information given or disclosed, to aid the
office of the family and children's ombudsman in carrying out its
responsibilities, unless the communication or information is made, given, or
disclosed maliciously or without good faith. This subsection is not intended
to infringe on the rights of the employer to supervise, discipline, or
terminate an employee for other reasons.

(3)
All communications by an ombudsman, if reasonably related to the requirements
of that individual's responsibilities under this chapter and done in good
faith, are privileged under RCW 9.58.070 and that privilege shall serve as a
defense in any action in libel or slander.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
new section is added to chapter 13.50 RCW to read as follows:

Any communication or advice privileged under RCW 5.60.060 that is
disclosed by the office of the attorney general or the department of social and
health services to the office of the family and children's ombudsman may not be
deemed to be a waiver of the privilege as to others.

---
END ---