BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW 66.04.010
and 1997 c 321 s 37 are each amended to read as follows:

In
this title, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1)
"Alcohol" is that substance known as ethyl alcohol, hydrated oxide of
ethyl, or spirit of wine, which is commonly produced by the fermentation or
distillation of grain, starch, molasses, or sugar, or other substances
including all dilutions and mixtures of this substance. The term
"alcohol" does not include alcohol in the possession of a
manufacturer or distiller of alcohol fuel, as described in RCW 66.12.130, which
is intended to be denatured and used as a fuel for use in motor vehicles, farm
implements, and machines or implements of husbandry.

(2)
"Beer" means any malt beverage or malt liquor as these terms are
defined in this chapter.

(3)
"Beer distributor" means a person who buys beer from a brewer or
brewery located either within or beyond the boundaries of the state, beer
importers, or foreign produced beer from a source outside the state of
Washington, for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to this title, or who
represents such brewer or brewery as agent.

(4)
"Beer importer" means a person or business within Washington who
purchases beer from a United States brewery holding a certificate of approval
(B5) or foreign produced beer from a source outside the state of Washington for
the purpose of selling the same pursuant to this title.

(5)
"Brewer" means any person engaged in the business of manufacturing
beer and malt liquor.

(6)
"Board" means the liquor control board, constituted under this title.

(7)
"Club" means an organization of persons, incorporated or
unincorporated, operated solely for fraternal, benevolent, educational,
athletic or social purposes, and not for pecuniary gain.

(8)
"Consume" includes the putting of liquor to any use, whether by
drinking or otherwise.

(9)
"Dentist" means a practitioner of dentistry duly and regularly
licensed and engaged in the practice of his or her profession within the
state pursuant to chapter 18.32 RCW.

(10)
"Department" means the department of liquor control created in
section 2 of this act.

(11)
"Director" means the director of the department.

(12)
"Distiller" means a person engaged in the business of distilling
spirits.

(((11)))
(13) "Domestic winery" means a place where wines are
manufactured or produced within the state of Washington.

(((12)))
(14) "Druggist" means any person who holds a valid certificate
and is a registered pharmacist and is duly and regularly engaged in carrying on
the business of pharmaceutical chemistry pursuant to chapter 18.64 RCW.

(((13)))
(15) "Drug store" means a place whose principal business is,
the sale of drugs, medicines and pharmaceutical preparations and maintains a
regular prescription department and employs a registered pharmacist during all
hours the drug store is open.

(((14)))
(16) "Employee" means any person employed by the ((board))
director, including a vendor, as ((hereinafter)) defined
in this section ((defined)).

(((15)))
(17) "Fund" means ((')) the liquor revolving
fund.(('

(16))) (18)
"Hotel" means every building or other structure kept, used,
maintained, advertised or held out to the public to be a place where food is
served and sleeping accommodations are offered for pay to transient guests, in
which twenty or more rooms are used for the sleeping accommodation of such transient
guests and having one or more dining rooms where meals are served to such
transient guests, such sleeping accommodations and dining rooms being conducted
in the same building and buildings, in connection therewith, and such structure
or structures being provided, in the judgment of the ((board)) director,
with adequate and sanitary kitchen and dining room equipment and capacity, for
preparing, cooking and serving suitable food for its guests: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That in cities and towns of less than five thousand population, the ((board))
director shall have authority to waive the provisions requiring twenty
or more rooms.

(((17)))
(19) "Importer" means a person who buys distilled spirits from
a distillery outside the state of Washington and imports such spirituous liquor
into the state for sale to the board or for export.

(((18)))
(20) "Imprisonment" means confinement in the county jail.

(((19)))
(21) "Liquor" includes the four varieties of liquor herein
defined (alcohol, spirits, wine and beer), and all fermented, spirituous,
vinous, or malt liquor, or combinations thereof, and mixed liquor, a part of
which is fermented, spirituous, vinous or malt liquor, or otherwise
intoxicating; and every liquid or solid or semisolid or other substance, patented
or not, containing alcohol, spirits, wine or beer, and all drinks or drinkable
liquids and all preparations or mixtures capable of human consumption, and any
liquid, semisolid, solid, or other substance, which contains more than one
percent of alcohol by weight shall be conclusively deemed to be intoxicating.
Liquor does not include confections or food products that contain one percent
or less of alcohol by weight.

(((20)))
(22) "Manufacturer" means a person engaged in the preparation
of liquor for sale, in any form whatsoever.

(((21)))
(23) "Malt beverage" or "malt liquor" means any
beverage such as beer, ale, lager beer, stout, and porter obtained by the
alcoholic fermentation of an infusion or decoction of pure hops, or pure
extract of hops and pure barley malt or other wholesome grain or cereal in pure
water containing not more than eight percent of alcohol by weight, and not less
than one-half of one percent of alcohol by volume. For the purposes of this
title, any such beverage containing more than eight percent of alcohol by
weight shall be referred to as "strong beer."

(((22)))
(24) "Package" means any container or receptacle used for
holding liquor.

(((23)))
(25) "Permit" means a permit for the purchase of liquor under
this title.

(((24)))
(26) "Person" means an individual, copartnership, association,
or corporation.

(((25)))
(27) "Physician" means a medical practitioner duly and
regularly licensed and engaged in the practice of his or her profession
within the state pursuant to chapter 18.71 RCW.

(((26)))
(28) "Prescription" means a memorandum signed by a physician
and given by ((him)) the physician to a patient for the obtaining
of liquor pursuant to this title for medicinal purposes.

(((27)))
(29) "Public place" includes streets and alleys of
incorporated cities and towns; state or county or township highways or roads;
buildings and grounds used for school purposes; public dance halls and grounds
adjacent thereto; those parts of establishments where beer may be sold under
this title, soft drink establishments, public buildings, public meeting halls,
lobbies, halls and dining rooms of hotels, restaurants, theatres, stores,
garages and filling stations which are open to and are generally used by the public
and to which the public is permitted to have unrestricted access; railroad
trains, stages, and other public conveyances of all kinds and character, and
the depots and waiting rooms used in conjunction therewith which are open to
unrestricted use and access by the public; publicly owned bathing beaches,
parks, and/or playgrounds; and all other places of like or similar nature to
which the general public has unrestricted right of access, and which are
generally used by the public.

(((28)
"Regulations" means regulations made by the board under the powers
conferred by this title.

(29))) (30)
"Restaurant" means any establishment provided with special space and
accommodations where, in consideration of payment, food, without lodgings, is
habitually furnished to the public, not including drug stores and soda
fountains.

(((30)))
(31) "Rules" means rules adopted in accordance with chapter 34.05
RCW by the board under the powers conferred by this title.

(32)
"Sale" and "sell" include exchange, barter, and traffic;
and also include the selling or supplying or distributing, by any means
whatsoever, of liquor, or of any liquid known or described as beer or by any
name whatever commonly used to describe malt or brewed liquor or of wine, by
any person to any person; and also include a sale or selling within the state
to a foreign consignee or his or her agent in the state.
"Sale" and "sell" shall not include the giving, at no
charge, of a reasonable amount of liquor by a person not licensed by the ((board))
department to a person not licensed by the ((board)) department,
for personal use only. "Sale" and "sell" also does not
include a raffle authorized under RCW 9.46.0315: PROVIDED, That the nonprofit
organization conducting the raffle has obtained the appropriate permit from the
((board)) department.

(((31)))
(33) "Soda fountain" means a place especially equipped with
apparatus for the purpose of dispensing soft drinks, whether mixed or
otherwise.

(((32)))
(34) "Spirits" means any beverage which contains alcohol
obtained by distillation, including wines exceeding twenty-four percent of
alcohol by volume.

(((33)))
(35) "Store" means a state liquor store established under this
title.

(((34)))
(36) "Tavern" means any establishment with special space and
accommodation for sale by the glass and for consumption on the premises, of
beer, as herein defined.

(((35)))
(37) "Vendor" means a person employed by the ((board)) department
as a store manager under this title.

(((36)))
(38) "Winery" means a business conducted by any person for the
manufacture of wine for sale, other than a domestic winery.

(((37)))
(39) "Wine" means any alcoholic beverage obtained by
fermentation of fruits (grapes, berries, apples, et cetera) or other
agricultural product containing sugar, to which any saccharine substances may
have been added before, during or after fermentation, and containing not more
than twenty-four percent of alcohol by volume, including sweet wines fortified
with wine spirits, such as port, sherry, muscatel and angelica, not exceeding
twenty-four percent of alcohol by volume and not less than one-half of one
percent of alcohol by volume. For purposes of this title, any beverage
containing no more than fourteen percent of alcohol by volume when bottled or
packaged by the manufacturer shall be referred to as "table wine,"
and any beverage containing alcohol in an amount more than fourteen percent by
volume when bottled or packaged by the manufacturer shall be referred to as
"fortified wine." However, "fortified wine" shall not
include: (a) Wines that are both sealed or capped by cork closure and aged two
years or more; and (b) wines that contain more than fourteen percent alcohol by
volume solely as a result of the natural fermentation process and that have not
been produced with the addition of wine spirits, brandy, or alcohol.

This
subsection shall not be interpreted to require that any wine be labeled with
the designation "table wine" or "fortified wine."

(((38)))
(40) "Wine distributor" means a person who buys wine from a
vintner or winery located either within or beyond the boundaries of the state
for the purpose of selling the same not in violation of this title, or who
represents such vintner or winery as agent.

(((39)))
(41) "Wine importer" means a person or business within
Washington who purchases wine from a United States winery holding a certificate
of approval (W7) or foreign produced wine from a source outside the state of
Washington for the purpose of selling the same pursuant to this title.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 66.08 RCW to read as follows:

There
is created an agency of state government known as the Washington state
department of liquor control.

The
executive head of the department is the director. The director shall be
appointed by, and serve at the pleasure of, the governor. The appointment of
the director is subject to confirmation by the senate. The director shall be
paid a salary to be fixed by the governor in accordance with RCW 43.03.040. The
director shall have management experience in a public agency and an
understanding of the distribution and retail sales operations of Washington's
controlled sales environment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. All
powers, duties, and functions vested by law in the liquor control board are
transferred to the director of the department, except those powers, duties, and
functions that are expressly directed to remain with the board. This transfer
shall take place on the effective date of this section. This act does not
create a new agency, but provides for a new administrative structure within the
renamed agency.

Sec.
4. RCW
66.08.012 and 1961 c 307 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

There shall be a board, known as the "Washington state liquor
control board," consisting of ((three)) five members, to be
appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, who shall each be ((paid
an annual salary to be fixed by the governor in accordance with the provisions
of RCW 43.03.040)) compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250 and
shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060. The governor may, in his or her discretion, appoint one
of the members as ((chairman)) chair of the board, and a majority
of the members shall constitute a quorum of the board. The board shall meet
once a month or at such times as the chair may designate.

Sec.
5. RCW
66.08.014 and 1986 c 105 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The members of the board to be appointed after December 2, 1948, shall
be appointed for terms beginning January 15, 1949, and expiring as follows:
One member of the board for a term of three years from January 15, 1949; one
member of the board for a term of six years from January 15, 1949; and one
member of the board for a term of nine years from January 15, 1949. Each of
the members of the board appointed hereunder shall hold office until his or
her successor is appointed and qualified. After June 11, 1986, the term
that began on January 15, 1985, will end on January 15, 1989, the term
beginning on January 15, 1988, will end on January 15, 1993, and the term
beginning on January 15, 1991, will end on January 15, 1997. Thereafter, upon
the expiration of the term of any member appointed after June 11, 1986, each
succeeding member of the board shall be appointed and hold office for the term
of six years. The unexpired terms of board members serving on the effective
date of this section shall be completed by the members appointed to serve part
time after the effective date of this section. The governor shall stagger the
terms of members appointed to positions created July 1, 2001. In case of a
vacancy, it shall be filled by appointment by the governor for the unexpired
portion of the term in which said vacancy occurs. No vacancy in the membership
of the board shall impair the right of the remaining member or members to act,
except as herein otherwise provided.

(2)
The principal office of the ((board)) department shall be at the
state ((capitol)) capital, and it may establish such other
offices as it may deem necessary.

(3)
Any member of the board may be removed for inefficiency, malfeasance or
misfeasance in office, upon specific written charges filed by the governor, who
shall transmit such written charges to the member accused and to the chief
justice of the supreme court. The chief justice shall thereupon designate a
tribunal composed of three judges of the superior court to hear and adjudicate
the charges. Such tribunal shall fix the time of the hearing, which shall be
public, and the procedure for the hearing, and the decision of such tribunal
shall be final and not subject to review by the supreme court. Removal of any
member of the board by the tribunal shall disqualify such member for
reappointment.

(4) Each member of the board shall ((devote his entire time to
the duties of his office)) serve part time and no member of the
board shall hold any other public office. Before entering upon the duties of
his or her office, each of ((said)) the members of the
board shall enter into a surety bond executed by a surety company authorized to
do business in this state, payable to the state of Washington, to be approved
by the governor in the penal sum of fifty thousand dollars conditioned upon the
faithful performance of his or her duties, and shall take and subscribe
to the oath of office prescribed for elective state officers, which oath and
bond shall be filed with the secretary of state. The premium for ((said))
the bond shall be paid by the ((board)) department.

Sec.
6. RCW
66.08.016 and 1961 c 1 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

The
((board)) chair may employ such number of employees as in its
judgment are required from time to time.

Sec.
7. RCW
66.08.020 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The administration of this title, including the general control, management,
and supervision of all liquor stores, shall be vested in the ((liquor
control board, constituted under this title)) chair.

(2)
Until July 1, 2001, duties in RCW 66.08.030, 66.08.050, and 66.08.150 shall
remain with the board.

Sec.
8. RCW
66.08.020 and 1999 c . . . s 7 (section 7 of this act) are each
amended to read as follows:

(((1)))
The administration of this title, including the general control, management,
and supervision of all liquor stores, shall be vested in the ((chair)) director,
who shall carry out this administrative function in accordance with the rules
adopted by the board.

In
addition to any other powers granted or transferred to the director, the
director shall have the following powers and duties as may be necessary to
carry out the purposes of this title:

(1)
Supervise and administer the operations of the department in accordance with
the provisions of this title;

(2)
Employ personnel in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW and prescribe their
duties;

(3)
Appoint such assistant directors and special assistants as may be necessary to
administer the department, who shall be exempt from chapter 41.06 RCW;

(4)
Enter into contracts on behalf of the department;

(5)
Accept and expend donations, grants, or other funds;

(6)
Delegate powers, duties, and functions of the department to employees of the
department as the director deems necessary to ensure efficient administration;

(7)
Appoint advisory committees and undertake studies, research, and analysis
necessary to support activities of the department; and

(8)
Perform such other duties as are consistent with this title.

(((2)
Until July 1, 2001, duties in RCW 66.08.030, 66.08.050, and 66.08.150 shall
remain with the board.))

Sec.
9. RCW
66.08.022 and 1961 ex.s. c 6 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
attorney general shall be the general counsel of the ((liquor control board))
department and he or she shall institute and prosecute all
actions and proceedings which may be necessary in the enforcement and carrying
out of the provisions of this chapter and Title 66 RCW.

He or
she shall assign such assistants as may be necessary to the exclusive duty
of assisting the liquor control board in the enforcement of Title 66 RCW.

Sec.
10. RCW
66.08.024 and 1987 c 74 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
state auditor shall audit the books, records, and affairs of the ((board))
department annually. The ((board)) department may provide
for additional audits by certified public accountants. All such audits shall
be public records of the state. The payment of the audits provided for in this
section shall be paid as provided in RCW 66.08.026 for other administrative
expenses.

Sec.
11. RCW
66.08.026 and 1998 c 265 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

All
administrative expenses of the ((board)) department incurred on
and after April 1, 1963 shall be appropriated and paid from the liquor
revolving fund. These administrative expenses shall include, but not be
limited to: The salaries and expenses of the ((board)) department
and its employees, the cost of establishing, leasing, maintaining, and
operating state liquor stores and warehouses, legal services, pilot projects,
annual or other audits, and other general costs of conducting the business of
the ((board)) department, and the costs of supplying, installing,
and maintaining equipment used in state liquor stores and agency liquor vendor
stores for the purchase of liquor by nonlicensees using debit or credit cards.
The administrative expenses shall not, however, be deemed to include costs of
liquor and lottery tickets purchased, the cost of transportation and delivery
to the point of distribution, other costs pertaining to the acquisition and
receipt of liquor and lottery tickets, packaging and repackaging of liquor,
transaction fees associated with credit or debit card purchases for liquor in
state liquor stores and in the stores of agency liquor vendors pursuant to RCW
66.16.040 and 66.16.041, sales tax, and those amounts distributed pursuant to
RCW 66.08.180, 66.08.190, 66.08.200, 66.08.210 and 66.08.220.

Sec.
12. RCW
66.08.030 and 1977 ex.s. c 115 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
For the purpose of carrying into effect the provisions of this title according
to their true intent or of supplying any deficiency therein, the board may ((make))
adopt such ((regulations)) rules in accordance with chapter
34.05 RCW not inconsistent with the spirit of this title as are deemed
necessary or advisable. All ((regulations)) rules so made shall
be a public record and shall be filed in the office of the code reviser, and
thereupon shall have the same force and effect as if incorporated in this
title. Such ((regulations)) rules, together with a copy of this
title, shall be published in pamphlets and shall be distributed as directed by
the board.

(2)
Without thereby limiting the generality of the provisions ((contained))
in subsection (1) of this section, it is declared that the power of the
board to make ((regulations)) rules in the manner set out in that
subsection shall extend to:

(a)
((regulating the equipment and management of stores and warehouses in which
state liquor is sold or kept, and prescribing the books and records to be kept
therein and the reports to be made thereon to the board;

(b)
prescribing the duties of the employees of the board, and regulating their
conduct in the discharge of their duties;

(c))) Governing
the purchase of liquor by the state and the furnishing of liquor to stores
established under this title;

(((d)
determining the classes, varieties, and brands of liquor to be kept for sale at
any store;

(e))) (b)
Prescribing, subject to RCW 66.16.080, the hours during which the state
liquor stores shall be kept open for the sale of liquor;

(((f)))
(c) Providing for the issuing and distributing of price lists showing
the price to be paid by purchasers for each variety of liquor kept for sale
under this title;

(((g)))
(d) Prescribing an official seal and official labels and stamps and
determining the manner in which they shall be attached to every package of
liquor sold or sealed under this title, including the prescribing of different
official seals or different official labels for different classes of liquor;

(((h)))
(e) Providing for the payment by the ((board)) department
in whole or in part of the carrying charges on liquor shipped by freight or
express;

(((i)))
(f) Prescribing ((forms to be used for purposes of this title or the
regulations, and)) the terms and conditions to be contained in permits and
licenses issued under this title;

(((j)))
(g) Prescribing the fees payable in respect of permits and licenses
issued under this title for which no fees are prescribed in this title, and
prescribing the fees for anything done or permitted to be done under the ((regulations))
rules;

(((k)))
(h) Prescribing the kinds and quantities of liquor which may be kept on
hand by the holder of a special permit for the purposes named in the permit,
regulating the manner in which the same shall be kept and disposed of, and
providing for the inspection of the same at any time at the instance of the ((board))
department;

(((l)))
(i) Regulating the sale of liquor kept by the holders of licenses which
entitle the holder to purchase and keep liquor for sale;

(((m)))
(j) Prescribing the records of purchases or sales of liquor kept by the
holders of licenses, and the reports to be made thereon to the ((board))
department, and providing for inspection of the records so kept;

(((n)))
(k) Prescribing the kinds and quantities of liquor for which a
prescription may be given, and the number of prescriptions which may be given
to the same patient within a stated period;

(((o)))
(l) Prescribing the manner of giving and serving notices required by
this title or the ((regulations)) rules, where not otherwise
provided for in this title;

(((p)))
(m) Regulating premises in which liquor is kept for export from the
state, or from which liquor is exported, prescribing the books and records to
be kept therein and the reports to be made thereon to the ((board)) department,
and providing for the inspection of the premises and the books, records and the
liquor so kept;

(((q)))
(n) Prescribing the conditions and qualifications requisite for the
obtaining of club licenses and the books and records to be kept and the returns
to be made by clubs, prescribing the manner of licensing clubs in any
municipality or other locality, and providing for the inspection of clubs;

(((r)))
(o) Prescribing the conditions, accommodations, and qualifications
requisite for the obtaining of licenses to sell beer and wines, and regulating
the sale of beer and wines thereunder;

(((s)))
(p) Specifying and regulating the time and periods when, and the manner,
methods, and means by which manufacturers shall deliver liquor within
the state; and the time and periods when, and the manner, methods, and
means by which liquor may lawfully be conveyed or carried within the state;

(((t)))
(q) Providing for the making of returns by brewers of their sales of
beer shipped within the state, or from the state, showing the gross amount of
such sales and providing for the inspection of brewers' books and records, and
for the checking of the accuracy of any such returns;

(((u)))
(r) Providing for the making of returns by the wholesalers of beer whose
breweries are located beyond the boundaries of the state;

(((v)))
(s) Providing for the making of returns by any other liquor
manufacturers, showing the gross amount of liquor produced or purchased, the
amount sold within and exported from the state, and to whom so sold or
exported, and providing for the inspection of the premises of any such liquor
manufacturers, their books and records, and for the checking of any such
return;

(((w)))
(t) Providing for the giving of fidelity bonds by any or all of the
employees of the ((board)) department: PROVIDED, That the
premiums therefor shall be paid by the ((board)) department;

(((x)))
(u) Providing for the shipment by mail or common carrier of liquor to
any person holding a permit and residing in any unit which has, by election
pursuant to this title, prohibited the sale of liquor therein;

(((y)))
(v) Prescribing methods of manufacture, conditions of sanitation,
standards of ingredients, quality, and identity of alcoholic beverages
manufactured, sold, bottled, or handled by licensees and the ((board)) department;
and conducting from time to time, in the interest of the public health and
general welfare, scientific studies and research relating to alcoholic
beverages and the use and effect thereof; and

(((z)))
(w) Seizing, confiscating, and destroying all alcoholic beverages
manufactured, sold, or offered for sale within this state which do not
conform in all respects to the standards prescribed by this title or the ((regulations))
rules of the board: PROVIDED, Nothing ((herein contained)) in
this section shall be construed as authorizing the ((liquor)) board
to prescribe, alter, limit, or in any way change the present law as to
the quantity or percentage of alcohol used in the manufacturing of wine or
other alcoholic beverages.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. A
new section is added to chapter 66.08 RCW to read as follows:

The
director, subject to the provisions of this title and the rules adopted under
this title, shall:

(1)
Establish and operate all necessary warehouses for the storing and bottling,
diluting, and rectifying of stocks of liquors for the purposes of this title;

(2)
Provide for the leasing for periods not to exceed ten years of all premises
required for the conduct of the business; and for remodeling the same, and the
procuring of their furnishings, fixtures, and supplies; and for obtaining
options of renewal of such leases by the lessee. The terms of such leases in
all other respects shall be subject to the direction of the director;

(3)
Execute or cause to be executed, all contracts, papers, and documents in the
name of the department, under such rules as the board may adopt;

(4)
Pay all customs, duties, excises, charges, and obligations whatsoever relating
to the business of the department;

(5)
Require bonds from all employees in the discretion of the director, and to
determine the amount of fidelity bond of each such employee;

(6)
Perform services for the state lottery commission to such extent, and for such
compensation, as may be mutually agreed upon between the director and the
commission;

(7)
Perform all other matters and things, whether similar to the foregoing or not,
to carry out the provisions of this title, and have full power to do each and
every act necessary to the conduct of its business, including all buying,
selling, preparation and approval of forms, and every other function of the
business whatsoever, subject only to audit by the state auditor: PROVIDED,
That the director has no authority to regulate the content of spoken language
on licensed premises where wine and other liquors are served and where there is
not a clear and present danger of disorderly conduct being provoked by such
language;

(8)
Determine the localities within which state liquor stores shall be established
throughout the state, and the number and situation of the stores within each
locality;

(9)
Appoint in cities and towns and other communities, in which no state liquor
store is located, liquor vendors. Such liquor vendors shall be agents of the
liquor control agency and be authorized to sell liquor to such persons, firms,
or corporations as provided for the sale of liquor from a state liquor store,
and such vendors shall be subject to such additional rules consistent with this
title; and

(10)
Determine the nature, form, and capacity of all packages to be used for
containing liquor kept for sale under this title.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. A
new section is added to chapter 66.08 RCW to read as follows:

The
director shall cause the preparation, update, and execution of an integrated
liquor plan that includes, but is not limited to, the following elements:

(1)
A program to achieve efficiencies, implement quality service improvements, and
ensure operational integration of regulatory, merchandising, and administrative
services;

(2)
A program of public and consumer information and coordination with other public
agencies and private organizations that emphasizes alcohol abuse prevention and
responsible consumption; and

(3)
A strategy for implementation of the plan.

Sec.
15. RCW
66.08.055 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 80 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
member of the board, and every employee authorized by the ((board)) department
to issue permits under this title, may administer any oath and take and
receive any affidavit or declaration required under this title or the ((regulations))
rules.

Sec.
16. RCW
66.08.060 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 43 are each amended to read as follows:

The
((board)) department shall not advertise liquor in any form or
through any medium whatsoever. The board shall have power to adopt any and all
reasonable ((regulations)) rules as to the kind, character,
and location of advertising of liquor.

Sec.
17. RCW
66.08.070 and 1985 c 226 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Every order for the purchase of liquor shall be authorized by the ((board))
director, and no order for liquor shall be valid or binding unless it is
so authorized and signed by the ((board)) director or ((its))
the director's authorized designee.

(2)
A duplicate of every such order shall be kept on file in the office of the ((board))
director.

(3)
All cancellations of such orders made by the ((board)) director
shall be signed in the same manner and duplicates thereof kept on file in the
office of the ((board)) director. Nothing in this title shall be
construed as preventing the ((board)) department from accepting
liquor on consignment.

(4)
In the purchase of wine or malt beverages the ((board)) department
shall not require, as a term or condition of purchase, any warranty or
affirmation with respect to the relationship of the price charged the ((board))
department to any price charged any other buyer.

Sec.
18. RCW
66.08.075 and 1937 c 217 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

No
official or employee of the ((liquor control board of the state of
Washington)) department shall, during his or her term of
office or employment, or for a period of two years immediately following the
termination thereof, represent directly or indirectly any manufacturer or
wholesaler of liquor in the sale of liquor to the ((board)) department.

Sec.
19. RCW
66.08.080 and 1994 c 154 s 313 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as provided by chapter 42.52 RCW, no member of the board and no employee of the
((board)) department shall have any interest, directly or
indirectly, in the manufacture of liquor or in any liquor sold under this
title, or derive any profit or remuneration from the sale of liquor, other than
the salary or wages payable to him or her in respect of his or her
office or position, and shall receive no gratuity from any person in connection
with such business.

Sec.
20. RCW
66.08.090 and 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

No
employee shall sell liquor in any other place, nor at any other time, nor
otherwise than as authorized by the ((board)) director under this
title and the ((regulations)) rules.

Sec.
21. RCW
66.08.095 and 1993 c 26 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
((liquor control board)) department may provide liquor at no
charge, including liquor forfeited under chapter 66.32 RCW, to recognized law
enforcement agencies within the state when the law enforcement agency will be
using the liquor for bona fide law enforcement training or investigation
purposes.

Sec.
22. RCW
66.08.100 and 1935 c 174 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

No
court of the state of Washington other than the superior court of Thurston
county shall have jurisdiction over any action or proceeding against the board or
department or any member thereof for anything done or omitted to be done in
or arising out of the performance of ((his or their)) the member's
duties under this title. Neither the board, the director, the department,
nor any member or members ((thereof)) of the board or department
shall be personally liable in any action at law for damages sustained by any
person because of any acts performed or done or omitted to be done by the board,
the director, or the department or any employee of the board, the
director, or the department in the performance of his or her duties
and in the administration of this title.

Sec.
23. RCW
66.08.130 and 1981 1st ex.s. c 5 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

For
the purpose of obtaining information concerning any matter relating to the
administration or enforcement of this title, the board, the director, or
any person appointed by ((it)) the director in writing for the
purpose, may inspect the books and records of:

(1)
Any manufacturer;

(2)
Any license holder;

(3)
Any drug store holding a permit to sell on prescriptions;

(4)
The freight and express books and records and all waybills, bills of
lading, receipts, and documents in the possession of any common carrier
doing business within the state, containing any information or record relating
to any goods shipped or carried, or consigned or received for shipment or
carriage within the state. Every manufacturer, license holder, drug store
holding a permit to sell on prescriptions, and common carrier, and every owner
or officer or employee of the foregoing, who neglects or refuses to produce and
submit for inspection any book, record, or document referred to in this
section when requested to do so by the board, the director, or by a
person so appointed by ((it)) the director shall be guilty of a
violation of this title.

Sec.
24. RCW
66.08.140 and 1945 c 48 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

For
the purpose of obtaining information concerning any matter relating to the
administration or enforcement of this title, the board, the director, or
any person appointed by it in writing for the purpose, may inspect the books,
documents, and records of any person lending money to or in any manner
financing any license, holder, or applicant for license insofar as such
books, documents, and/or records pertain to the financial transaction
involved. Every person who neglects or refuses to produce and submit for
inspection any book, record, or document as required by this section
when requested to do so by the board or by a person duly appointed by it shall
be guilty of a violation of this title.

Sec.
25. RCW
66.08.150 and 1989 c 175 s 122 are each amended to read as follows:

The
action, order, or decision of the ((board)) director as to any
denial of an application for the reissuance of a permit or license or as to any
revocation, suspension, or modification of any permit or license shall be an
adjudicative proceeding and subject to the applicable provisions of chapter
34.05 RCW. The final decision in any adjudicative proceeding commenced
under this section or chapter 34.05 RCW shall be made by the board.

(1)
An opportunity for a hearing may be provided an applicant for the reissuance of
a permit or license prior to the disposition of the application, and if no such
opportunity for a prior hearing is provided then an opportunity for a hearing
to reconsider the application must be provided the applicant.

(2)
An opportunity for a hearing must be provided a permittee or licensee prior to
a revocation or modification of any permit or license and, except as provided
in subsection (4) of this section, prior to the suspension of any permit or
license.

(3)
No hearing shall be required until demanded by the applicant, permittee, or
licensee.

(4) The ((board)) director may summarily suspend a
license or permit for a period of up to thirty days without a prior hearing if
it finds that public health, safety, or welfare imperatively require emergency
action, and incorporates a finding to that effect in its order; and proceedings
for revocation or other action must be promptly instituted and determined.

Sec.
26. RCW
66.08.170 and 1961 ex.s. c 6 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

There
shall be a fund, known as the "liquor revolving fund", which shall
consist of all license fees, permit fees, penalties, forfeitures, and all other
moneys, income, or revenue received by the ((board)) department.
The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. All moneys received by the
((board)) department or any employee thereof, except for change
funds and an amount of petty cash as fixed by the ((board)) department
within the authority of law shall be deposited each day in a depository
approved by the state treasurer and transferred to the state treasurer to be
credited to the liquor revolving fund. Disbursements from the revolving fund
shall be on authorization of the ((board)) director or a duly
authorized representative thereof. In order to maintain an effective
expenditure and revenue control the liquor revolving fund shall be subject in
all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW but no appropriation shall be required to
permit expenditures and payment of obligations from such fund.

Sec.
27. RCW
66.08.180 and 1997 c 451 s 3 and 1997 c 321 s 57 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

Except
as provided in RCW 66.24.290(1), moneys in the liquor revolving fund shall be
distributed by the ((board)) director at least once every three months
in accordance with RCW 66.08.190, 66.08.200 and 66.08.210: PROVIDED, That the
((board)) director shall reserve from distribution such amount
not exceeding five hundred thousand dollars as may be necessary for the proper
administration of this title.

(1)
All license fees, penalties and forfeitures derived under this act from ((class
H)) spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licenses or ((class H))
spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licensees shall every three months be
disbursed by the ((board)) director as follows:

(a)
Three hundred thousand dollars per biennium, to the University of Washington
for the forensic investigations council to conduct the state toxicological
laboratory pursuant to RCW 68.50.107; and

(b)
Of the remaining funds:

(i)
6.06 percent to the University of Washington and 4.04 percent to Washington
State University for alcoholism and drug abuse research and for the
dissemination of such research; and

(ii)
89.9 percent to the general fund to be used by the department of social and
health services solely to carry out the purposes of RCW 70.96A.050;

(2)
The first fifty-five dollars per license fee provided in RCW 66.24.320 and
66.24.330 up to a maximum of one hundred fifty thousand dollars annually shall
be disbursed every three months by the ((board)) director to the
general fund to be used for juvenile alcohol and drug prevention programs for
kindergarten through third grade to be administered by the superintendent of
public instruction;

(3)
Twenty percent of the remaining total amount derived from license fees pursuant
to RCW 66.24.320, 66.24.330, 66.24.350, and 66.24.360, shall be transferred to
the general fund to be used by the department of social and health services
solely to carry out the purposes of RCW 70.96A.050; and

(4)
One-fourth cent per liter of the tax imposed by RCW 66.24.210 shall every three
months be disbursed by the ((board)) director to Washington State
University solely for wine and wine grape research, extension programs related
to wine and wine grape research, and resident instruction in both wine grape
production and the processing aspects of the wine industry in accordance with
RCW 28B.30.068. The director of financial management shall prescribe suitable
accounting procedures to ensure that the funds transferred to the general fund
to be used by the department of social and health services and appropriated are
separately accounted for.

Sec.
28. RCW
66.08.220 and 1949 c 5 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The
((board)) director shall set aside in a separate account in the
liquor revolving fund an amount equal to ten percent of its gross sales of
liquor to ((class H)) spirits, beer, and wine restaurant
licensees; and the moneys in said separate account shall be distributed in
accordance with the provisions of RCW 66.08.190, 66.08.200 and 66.08.210:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That no election unit in which the sale of liquor under ((class
H)) spirits, beer, and wine restaurant licenses is unlawful shall be
entitled to share in the distribution of moneys from such separate account.

Sec.
29. RCW
66.08.235 and 1997 c 75 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
liquor control ((board)) construction and maintenance account is created
within the state treasury. The ((liquor control board)) director
shall deposit into this account a portion of the ((board's)) department's
markup, as authorized by chapter 66.16 RCW, placed upon liquor as determined by
the board. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. The
((liquor control board)) department shall use deposits to this
account to fund construction and maintenance of a centralized distribution
center for liquor products intended for sale through the ((board's)) department's
liquor store and vendor system.

Sec.
30. RCW
10.93.020 and 1994 c 264 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless
the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"General authority Washington law enforcement agency" means any
agency, department, or division of a municipal corporation, political
subdivision, or other unit of local government of this state, and any agency,
department, or division of state government, having as its primary function the
detection and apprehension of persons committing infractions or violating the
traffic or criminal laws in general, as distinguished from a limited authority
Washington law enforcement agency, and any other unit of government expressly
designated by statute as a general authority Washington law enforcement
agency. The Washington state patrol is a general authority Washington law
enforcement agency.

(2)
"Limited authority Washington law enforcement agency" means any agency,
political subdivision, or unit of local government of this state, and any
agency, department, or division of state government, having as one of its
functions the apprehension or detection of persons committing infractions or
violating the traffic or criminal laws relating to limited subject areas,
including but not limited to, the state departments of natural resources, fish
and wildlife, and social and health services, the state gambling commission,
the state lottery commission, the state parks and recreation commission, the
state utilities and transportation commission, the ((state)) department
of liquor control ((board)), and the state department of
corrections.

(3)
"General authority Washington peace officer" means any full-time,
fully compensated and elected, appointed, or employed officer of a general
authority Washington law enforcement agency who is commissioned to enforce the
criminal laws of the state of Washington generally.

(4)
"Limited authority Washington peace officer" means any full-time,
fully compensated officer of a limited authority Washington law enforcement
agency empowered by that agency to detect or apprehend violators of the laws in
some or all of the limited subject areas for which that agency is responsible.
A limited authority Washington peace officer may be a specially commissioned
Washington peace officer if otherwise qualified for such status under this
chapter.

(5)
"Specially commissioned Washington peace officer", for the purposes
of this chapter, means any officer, whether part-time or full-time, compensated
or not, commissioned by a general authority Washington law enforcement agency
to enforce some or all of the criminal laws of the state of Washington, who
does not qualify under this chapter as a general authority Washington peace
officer for that commissioning agency, specifically including reserve peace
officers, and specially commissioned full-time, fully compensated peace
officers duly commissioned by the states of Oregon or Idaho or any such peace
officer commissioned by a unit of local government of Oregon or Idaho. A
reserve peace officer is an individual who is an officer of a Washington law
enforcement agency who does not serve such agency on a full-time basis but who,
when called by the agency into active service, is fully commissioned on the
same basis as full-time peace officers to enforce the criminal laws of the
state.

(6)
"Federal peace officer" means any employee or agent of the United
States government who has the authority to carry firearms and make warrantless
arrests and whose duties involve the enforcement of criminal laws of the United
States.

(7)
"Agency with primary territorial jurisdiction" means a city or town
police agency which has responsibility for police activity within its
boundaries; or a county police or sheriff's department which has responsibility
with regard to police activity in the unincorporated areas within the county
boundaries; or a statutorily authorized port district police agency or
four-year state college or university police agency which has responsibility
for police activity within the statutorily authorized enforcement boundaries of
the port district, state college, or university.

(8)
"Primary commissioning agency" means (a) the employing agency in the
case of a general authority Washington peace officer, a limited authority
Washington peace officer, an Indian tribal peace officer, or a federal peace
officer, and (b) the commissioning agency in the case of a specially
commissioned Washington peace officer (i) who is performing functions within
the course and scope of the special commission and (ii) who is not also a
general authority Washington peace officer, a limited authority Washington
peace officer, an Indian tribal peace officer, or a federal peace officer.

(9)
"Primary function of an agency" means that function to which greater
than fifty percent of the agency's resources are allocated.

(10)
"Mutual law enforcement assistance" includes, but is not limited to,
one or more law enforcement agencies aiding or assisting one or more other such
agencies through loans or exchanges of personnel or of material resources, for
law enforcement purposes.

Sec.
31. RCW
19.02.050 and 1997 c 391 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature hereby directs the full participation by the following agencies in
the implementation of this chapter:

(1)
Department of agriculture;

(2)
Secretary of state;

(3)
Department of social and health services;

(4)
Department of revenue;

(5)
Department of fish and wildlife;

(6)
Department of employment security;

(7)
Department of labor and industries;

(8)
Department of community, trade, and economic development;

(9)
Department of liquor control ((board));

(10)
Department of health;

(11)
Department of licensing;

(12)
Parks and recreation commission;

(13)
Utilities and transportation commission; and

(14)
Other agencies as determined by the governor.

Sec.
32. RCW
42.17.2401 and 1996 c 186 s 504 are each amended to read as follows:

For
the purposes of RCW 42.17.240, the term "executive state officer"
includes:

(1)
The chief administrative law judge, the director of agriculture, the
administrator of the office of marine safety, the administrator of the
Washington basic health plan, the director of the department of services for
the blind, the director of the state system of community and technical
colleges, the director of community, trade, and economic development, the
secretary of corrections, the director of ecology, the commissioner of
employment security, the chairman of the energy facility site evaluation council,
the secretary of the state finance committee, the director of financial
management, the director of fish and wildlife, the executive secretary of the
forest practices appeals board, the director of the gambling commission, the
director of general administration, the secretary of health, the administrator
of the Washington state health care authority, the executive secretary of the
health care facilities authority, the executive secretary of the higher
education facilities authority, the executive secretary of the horse racing
commission, the executive secretary of the human rights commission, the
executive secretary of the indeterminate sentence review board, the director of
the department of information services, the director of the interagency committee
for outdoor recreation, the executive director of the state investment board,
the director of labor and industries, the director of licensing, the
director of the department of liquor control, the director of the lottery
commission, the director of the office of minority and women's business
enterprises, the director of parks and recreation, the director of personnel,
the executive director of the public disclosure commission, the director of retirement
systems, the director of revenue, the secretary of social and health services,
the chief of the Washington state patrol, the executive secretary of the board
of tax appeals, the secretary of transportation, the secretary of the utilities
and transportation commission, the director of veterans affairs, the president
of each of the regional and state universities and the president of The
Evergreen State College, each district and each campus president of each state
community college;

(2)
Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;

(3)
Each professional staff member of the legislature; and

(4)
Central Washington University board of trustees, board of trustees of each
community college, each member of the state board for community and technical
colleges, state convention and trade center board of directors, committee for
deferred compensation, Eastern Washington University board of trustees,
Washington economic development finance authority, The Evergreen State College
board of trustees, executive ethics board, forest practices appeals board,
forest practices board, gambling commission, Washington health care facilities
authority, each member of the Washington health services commission, higher
education coordinating board, higher education facilities authority, horse
racing commission, state housing finance commission, human rights commission,
indeterminate sentence review board, board of industrial insurance appeals,
information services board, interagency committee for outdoor recreation, state
investment board, commission on judicial conduct, legislative ethics board,
liquor control board, lottery commission, marine oversight board, Pacific
Northwest electric power and conservation planning council, parks and
recreation commission, personnel appeals board, board of pilotage
commissioners, pollution control hearings board, public disclosure commission,
public pension commission, shorelines hearing board, public employees' benefits
board, board of tax appeals, transportation commission, University of
Washington board of regents, utilities and transportation commission,
Washington state maritime commission, Washington personnel resources board,
Washington public power supply system executive board, Washington State
University board of regents, Western Washington University board of trustees,
and fish and wildlife commission.

Sec.
33. RCW
43.17.010 and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 16, 1993 c 472 s 17, and 1993 c 280 s 18 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

There
shall be departments of the state government which shall be known as (1) the
department of social and health services, (2) the department of ecology, (3)
the department of labor and industries, (4) the department of agriculture, (5)
the department of fish and wildlife, (6) the department of transportation, (7)
the department of licensing, (8) the department of general administration, (9)
the department of community, trade, and economic development, (10) the
department of veterans affairs, (11) the department of revenue, (12) the
department of retirement systems, (13) the department of corrections, ((and))
(14) the department of health, ((and)) (15) the department of financial
institutions, and (16) the department of liquor control, which shall be
charged with the execution, enforcement, and administration of such laws, and
invested with such powers and required to perform such duties, as the
legislature may provide.

Sec.
34. RCW
43.17.020 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

There
shall be a chief executive officer of each department to be known as: (1) The
secretary of social and health services, (2) the director of ecology, (3) the
director of labor and industries, (4) the director of agriculture, (5) the
director of fish and wildlife, (6) the secretary of transportation, (7) the
director of licensing, (8) the director of general administration, (9) the
director of community, trade, and economic development, (10) the director of
veterans affairs, (11) the director of revenue, (12) the director of retirement
systems, (13) the secretary of corrections, ((and)) (14) the secretary
of health, ((and)) (15) the director of financial institutions, and
(16) the director of liquor control.

Such
officers, except the secretary of transportation and the director of fish and
wildlife, shall be appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate,
and hold office at the pleasure of the governor. The secretary of
transportation shall be appointed by the transportation commission as
prescribed by RCW 47.01.041. The director of fish and wildlife shall be
appointed by the fish and wildlife commission as prescribed by RCW 77.04.055.

Sec.
35. RCW
43.82.010 and 1997 c 117 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The director of general administration, on behalf of the agency involved, shall
purchase, lease, lease purchase, rent, or otherwise acquire all real estate,
improved or unimproved, as may be required by elected state officials,
institutions, departments, commissions, boards, and other state agencies, or
federal agencies where joint state and federal activities are undertaken and
may grant easements and transfer, exchange, sell, lease, or sublease all or
part of any surplus real estate for those state agencies which do not otherwise
have the specific authority to dispose of real estate. This section does not
transfer financial liability for the acquired property to the department of
general administration.

(2)
Except for real estate occupied by federal agencies, the director shall
determine the location, size, and design of any real estate or improvements
thereon acquired or held pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
Facilities acquired or held pursuant to this chapter, and any improvements
thereon, shall conform to standards adopted by the director and approved by the
office of financial management governing facility efficiency unless a specific
exemption from such standards is provided by the director of general administration.
The director of general administration shall report to the office of financial
management annually on any exemptions granted pursuant to this subsection.

(3)
The director of general administration may fix the terms and conditions of each
lease entered into under this chapter, except that no lease shall extend
greater than twenty years in duration. The director of general administration
may enter into a long-term lease greater than ten years in duration upon a
determination by the director of the office of financial management that the
long-term lease provides a more favorable rate than would otherwise be
available, it appears to a substantial certainty that the facility is necessary
for use by the state for the full length of the lease term, and the facility
meets the standards adopted pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. The
director of general administration may enter into a long-term lease greater
than ten years in duration if an analysis shows that the life-cycle cost of
leasing the facility is less than the life-cycle cost of purchasing or
constructing a facility in lieu of leasing the facility.

(4)
Except as permitted under chapter 39.94 RCW, no lease for or on behalf of any
state agency may be used or referred to as collateral or security for the
payment of securities offered for sale through a public offering. Except as
permitted under chapter 39.94 RCW, no lease for or on behalf of any state
agency may be used or referred to as collateral or security for the payment of
securities offered for sale through a private placement without the prior
written approval of the state treasurer. However, this limitation shall not
prevent a lessor from assigning or encumbering its interest in a lease as
security for the repayment of a promissory note provided that the transaction
would otherwise be an exempt transaction under RCW 21.20.320. The state
treasurer shall adopt rules that establish the criteria under which any such
approval may be granted. In establishing such criteria the state treasurer
shall give primary consideration to the protection of the state's credit rating
and the integrity of the state's debt management program. If it appears to the
state treasurer that any lease has been used or referred to in violation of
this subsection or rules adopted under this subsection, then he or she may
recommend that the governor cause such lease to be terminated. The department
of general administration shall promptly notify the state treasurer whenever it
may appear to the department that any lease has been used or referred to in
violation of this subsection or rules adopted under this subsection.

(5)
It is the policy of the state to encourage the colocation and consolidation of
state services into single or adjacent facilities, whenever appropriate, to
improve public service delivery, minimize duplication of facilities, increase
efficiency of operations, and promote sound growth management planning.

(6)
The director of general administration shall provide coordinated long-range
planning services to identify and evaluate opportunities for colocating and
consolidating state facilities. Upon the renewal of any lease, the inception
of a new lease, or the purchase of a facility, the director of general
administration shall determine whether an opportunity exists for colocating the
agency or agencies in a single facility with other agencies located in the same
geographic area. If a colocation opportunity exists, the director of general
administration shall consult with the affected state agencies and the office of
financial management to evaluate the impact colocation would have on the cost
and delivery of agency programs, including whether program delivery would be
enhanced due to the centralization of services. The director of general administration,
in consultation with the office of financial management, shall develop
procedures for implementing colocation and consolidation of state facilities.

(7)
The director of general administration is authorized to purchase, lease, rent,
or otherwise acquire improved or unimproved real estate as owner or lessee and
to lease or sublet all or a part of such real estate to state or federal
agencies. The director of general administration shall charge each using
agency its proportionate rental which shall include an amount sufficient to pay
all costs, including, but not limited to, those for utilities, janitorial and
accounting services, and sufficient to provide for contingencies; which shall
not exceed five percent of the average annual rental, to meet unforeseen
expenses incident to management of the real estate.

(8)
If the director of general administration determines that it is necessary or
advisable to undertake any work, construction, alteration, repair, or
improvement on any real estate acquired pursuant to subsection (1) or (7) of
this section, the director shall cause plans and specifications thereof and an
estimate of the cost of such work to be made and filed in his or her office and
the state agency benefiting thereby is hereby authorized to pay for such work
out of any available funds: PROVIDED, That the cost of executing such work
shall not exceed the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars. Work, construction,
alteration, repair, or improvement in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars, other
than that done by the owner of the property if other than the state, shall be
performed in accordance with the public works law of this state.

(9)
In order to obtain maximum utilization of space, the director of general
administration shall make space utilization studies, and shall establish
standards for use of space by state agencies. Such studies shall include the
identification of opportunities for colocation and consolidation of state
agency office and support facilities.

(10)
The director of general administration may construct new buildings on, or
improve existing facilities, and furnish and equip, all real estate under his
or her management. Prior to the construction of new buildings or major
improvements to existing facilities or acquisition of facilities using a lease
purchase contract, the director of general administration shall conduct an
evaluation of the facility design and budget using life-cycle cost analysis,
value-engineering, and other techniques to maximize the long-term effectiveness
and efficiency of the facility or improvement.

(11)
All conveyances and contracts to purchase, lease, rent, transfer, exchange, or
sell real estate and to grant and accept easements shall be approved as to form
by the attorney general, signed by the director of general administration or
the director's designee, and recorded with the county auditor of the county in
which the property is located.

(12)
The director of general administration may delegate any or all of the functions
specified in this section to any agency upon such terms and conditions as the
director deems advisable.

(13)
This section does not apply to the acquisition of real estate by:

(a)
The state college and universities for research or experimental purposes;

(b)
The ((state)) department of liquor control ((board)) for
liquor stores and warehouses; and

(c)
The department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife, the
department of transportation, and the state parks and recreation commission for
purposes other than the leasing of offices, warehouses, and real estate for
similar purposes.

(14)
Notwithstanding any provision in this chapter to the contrary, the department
of general administration may negotiate ground leases for public lands on which
property is to be acquired under a financing contract pursuant to chapter 39.94
RCW under terms approved by the state finance committee.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 36. The
following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each
repealed, effective July 1, 2001:

(1) RCW
66.08.016 (Employees of the board) and 1999 c . . . s 6
(section 6 of this act), 1961 c 1 s 30, 1947 c 113 s 2, & 1933 ex.s. c 62 s
65; and

(2) RCW 66.08.050
(Powers of board in general) and 1997 c 228 s 1, 1993 c 25 s 1, 1986 c 214 s 2,
1983 c 160 s 1, 1975 1st ex.s. c 173 s 1, 1969 ex.s. c 178 s 1, 1963 c 239 s 3,
1935 c 174 s 10, & 1933 ex.s. c 62 s 69.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 37.
Nothing in this act requires the liquor control agency to discard stationery or
signs, rename its facilities or stores, or incur similar expenses attributable
to the renaming of the agency.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 38. The
code reviser shall prepare and present to the 2000 legislature a bill that
corrects references to the liquor control board that are rendered inaccurate by
this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 39.
Sections 1 through 5 and 8 through 37 of this act take effect July 1, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 40. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---