BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.400.010 and 1990 c 33 s 376 are each amended to read as follows:

In
all districts the board of directors shall elect a superintendent who shall
have such qualification as the local school board alone shall determine. The
superintendent shall have supervision over the several departments of the
schools thereof and carry out such other powers and duties as prescribed by
law. ((Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 28A.400.300(1),)) The
board may contract with such superintendent for a term not to exceed three
years when deemed in the best interest of the district. The right to renew a
contract of employment with any school superintendent shall rest solely with
the discretion of the school board employing such school superintendent.
Regarding such renewal of contracts of school superintendents the provisions of
RCW 28A.405.210, 28A.405.240, and 28A.645.010 shall be inapplicable.

Sec.
2. RCW
28A.400.300 and 1997 c 13 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
board of directors, unless otherwise specially provided by law, shall:

(1)(a)
Employ for not more than ((one)) three years, and for
sufficient cause discharge all certificated ((and classified)) employees,
except provisional certificated employees as defined in RCW 28A.405.220;

(b)
Employ for not more than one year, and for sufficient cause discharge all
provisional employees as defined in RCW 28A.405.220; and

(c)
Employ for not more than one year, and for sufficient cause discharge all
noncertificated employees;

(2)
Adopt written policies granting leaves to persons under contracts of employment
with the school district(s) in positions requiring either certification or
classified qualifications, including but not limited to leaves for attendance
at official or private institutes and conferences and sabbatical leaves for
employees in positions requiring certification qualification, and leaves for
illness, injury, bereavement and, emergencies for both certificated and
classified employees, and with such compensation as the board of directors
prescribe: PROVIDED, That the board of directors shall adopt written policies
granting to such persons annual leave with compensation for illness, injury and
emergencies as follows:

(a)
For such persons under contract with the school district for a full year, at
least ten days;

(b)
For such persons under contract with the school district as part time
employees, at least that portion of ten days as the total number of days
contracted for bears to one hundred eighty days;

(c)
For certificated and classified employees, annual leave with compensation for
illness, injury, and emergencies shall be granted and accrue at a rate not to
exceed twelve days per year; ((provisions of any contract in force on June
12, 1980, which conflict with requirements of this subsection shall continue in
effect until contract expiration; after expiration, any new contract executed
between the parties shall be consistent with this subsection;))

(d)
Compensation for leave for illness or injury actually taken shall be the same
as the compensation such person would have received had such person not taken
the leave provided in this proviso;

(e)
Leave provided in this proviso not taken shall accumulate from year to year up
to a maximum of one hundred eighty days for the purposes of RCW 28A.400.210 and
28A.400.220, and for leave purposes up to a maximum of the number of contract
days agreed to in a given contract, but not greater than one year. Such
accumulated time may be taken at any time during the school year or up to
twelve days per year may be used for the purpose of payments for unused sick
leave.

(f)
Sick leave heretofore accumulated under section 1, chapter 195, Laws of 1959
(former RCW 28.58.430) and sick leave accumulated under administrative practice
of school districts prior to the effective date of section 1, chapter 195, Laws
of 1959 (former RCW 28.58.430) is hereby declared valid, and shall be added to
leave for illness or injury accumulated under this proviso;

(g)
Any leave for injury or illness accumulated up to a maximum of forty-five days
shall be creditable as service rendered for the purpose of determining the time
at which an employee is eligible to retire, if such leave is taken it may not
be compensated under the provisions of RCW 28A.400.210 and 28A.310.490;

(h)
Accumulated leave under this proviso shall be transferred to and from one
district to another, the office of superintendent of public instruction and
offices of educational service district superintendents and boards, to and from
such districts and such offices;

(i)
Leave accumulated by a person in a district prior to leaving said district may,
under rules and regulations of the board, be granted to such person when the
person returns to the employment of the district.

When
any certificated or classified employee leaves one school district within the
state and commences employment with another school district within the state,
the employee shall retain the same seniority, leave benefits and other benefits
that the employee had in his or her previous position: PROVIDED, That
classified employees who transfer between districts after July 28, 1985, shall
not retain any seniority rights other than longevity when leaving one school
district and beginning employment with another. If the school district to
which the person transfers has a different system for computing seniority,
leave benefits, and other benefits, then the employee shall be granted the same
seniority, leave benefits and other benefits as a person in that district who
has similar occupational status and total years of service.

Sec.
3. RCW
28A.405.100 and 1997 c 278 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The superintendent of public instruction shall establish and may amend from
time to time minimum criteria for the evaluation of the professional performance
capabilities and development of certificated classroom teachers and
certificated support personnel. For classroom teachers the criteria shall be
developed in the following categories: Instructional skill; classroom
management, professional preparation and scholarship; effort toward improvement
when needed; the handling of student discipline and attendant problems; and
interest in teaching pupils and knowledge of subject matter.

Every
board of directors shall, in accordance with procedure provided in RCW
41.59.010 through 41.59.170, 41.59.910 and 41.59.920, establish evaluative
criteria and procedures for all certificated classroom teachers and
certificated support personnel. The evaluative criteria must contain as a
minimum the criteria established by the superintendent of public instruction
pursuant to this section and must be prepared within six months following
adoption of the superintendent of public instruction's minimum criteria. The
district must certify to the superintendent of public instruction that
evaluative criteria have been so prepared by the district.

Except
as provided in subsection (5) of this section, it shall be the responsibility
of a principal or his or her designee to evaluate all certificated personnel in
his or her school. During each school year all classroom teachers and
certificated support personnel, hereinafter referred to as
"employees" in this section, shall be observed for the purposes of
evaluation at least twice in the performance of their assigned duties. Total
observation time for each employee for each school year shall be not less than
sixty minutes. Following each observation, or series of observations, the
principal or other evaluator shall promptly document the results of the
observation in writing, and shall provide the employee with a copy thereof
within three days after such report is prepared. New employees shall be
observed at least once for a total observation time of thirty minutes during
the first ninety calendar days of their employment period.

At
any time after October 15th, an employee whose work is judged unsatisfactory
based on district evaluation criteria shall be notified in writing of the
specific areas of deficiencies along with a reasonable program for
improvement. During the period of probation, the employee may not be
transferred from the supervision of the original evaluator. Improvement of
performance or probable cause for ((nonrenewal)) discharge must
occur and be documented by the original evaluator before any consideration of a
request for transfer or reassignment as contemplated by either the individual
or the school district. A probationary period of sixty school days shall be
established. The establishment of a probationary period does not adversely
affect the contract status of an employee within the meaning of RCW
28A.405.300. The purpose of the probationary period is to give the employee
opportunity to demonstrate improvements in his or her areas of deficiency. The
establishment of the probationary period and the giving of the notice to the
employee of deficiency shall be by the school district superintendent and need
not be submitted to the board of directors for approval. During the
probationary period the evaluator shall meet with the employee at least twice
monthly to supervise and make a written evaluation of the progress, if any,
made by the employee. The evaluator may authorize one additional certificated
employee to evaluate the probationer and to aid the employee in improving his
or her areas of deficiency; such additional certificated employee shall be
immune from any civil liability that might otherwise be incurred or imposed
with regard to the good faith performance of such evaluation. The probationer
may be removed from probation if he or she has demonstrated improvement to the
satisfaction of the principal in those areas specifically detailed in his or
her initial notice of deficiency and subsequently detailed in his or her
improvement program. Lack of necessary improvement during the established
probationary period, as specifically documented in writing with notification to
the probationer and shall constitute grounds for a finding of probable cause
under RCW 28A.405.300 ((or 28A.405.210)).

Immediately
following the completion of a probationary period that does not produce
performance changes detailed in the initial notice of deficiencies and
improvement program, the employee may be ((removed from his or her
assignment and placed into an alternative assignment for the remainder of the
school year. This reassignment may not displace another employee nor may it
adversely affect the probationary employee's compensation or benefits for the
remainder of the employee's contract year. If such reassignment is not
possible, the district may, at its option, place the employee on paid leave for
the balance of the contract term)) discharged.

(2)
Every board of directors shall establish evaluative criteria and procedures for
all superintendents, principals, and other administrators. It shall be the
responsibility of the district superintendent or his or her designee to
evaluate all administrators. Such evaluation shall be based on the
administrative position job description. Such criteria, when applicable, shall
include at least the following categories: Knowledge of, experience in, and
training in recognizing good professional performance, capabilities and
development; school administration and management; school finance; professional
preparation and scholarship; effort toward improvement when needed; interest in
pupils, employees, patrons and subjects taught in school; leadership; and
ability and performance of evaluation of school personnel.

(3)
Each certificated employee shall have the opportunity for confidential
conferences with his or her immediate supervisor on no less than two occasions
in each school year. Such confidential conference shall have as its sole
purpose the aiding of the administrator in his or her assessment of the
employee's professional performance.

(4)
The failure of any evaluator to evaluate or supervise or cause the evaluation
or supervision of certificated employees or administrators in accordance with
this section, as now or hereafter amended, when it is his or her specific
assigned or delegated responsibility to do so, shall be sufficient cause for ((the
nonrenewal of any such evaluator's contract under RCW 28A.405.210, or)) the
discharge of such evaluator under RCW 28A.405.300.

(5)
After an employee has four years of satisfactory evaluations under subsection
(1) of this section, a school district may use a short form of evaluation, a
locally bargained evaluation emphasizing professional growth, an evaluation
under subsection (1) of this section, or any combination thereof. The short
form of evaluation shall include either a thirty minute observation during the
school year with a written summary or a final annual written evaluation based
on the criteria in subsection (1) of this section and based on at least two
observation periods during the school year totaling at least sixty minutes without
a written summary of such observations being prepared. However, the evaluation
process set forth in subsection (1) of this section shall be followed at least
once every three years unless this time is extended by a local school district
under the bargaining process set forth in chapter 41.59 RCW. The employee or
evaluator may require that the evaluation process set forth in subsection (1)
of this section be conducted in any given school year. No evaluation other
than the evaluation authorized under subsection (1) of this section may be used
as a basis for determining that an employee's work is unsatisfactory under
subsection (1) of this section or as probable cause ((for the nonrenewal of
an employee's contract under RCW 28A.405.210)) to discharge an employee
under RCW 28A.405.300 unless an evaluation process developed under chapter
41.59 RCW determines otherwise.

Sec.
4. RCW
28A.405.210 and 1996 c 201 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

No
teacher, principal, supervisor, superintendent, or other certificated employee,
holding a position as such with a school district, hereinafter referred to as
"employee", shall be employed except by written order of a majority
of the directors of the district at a regular or special meeting thereof, nor
unless he or she is the holder of an effective teacher's certificate or other
certificate required by law or the state board of education for the position
for which the employee is employed.

The
board shall make with each employee employed by it a written contract, which
shall be in conformity with the laws of this state, and except as otherwise
provided by law, limited to a term ((of not more than one year)) as
prescribed in RCW 28A.400.300. For those employees with three-year maximum
contract terms, the board may annually extend the term of each employee's
contract for the maximum term permitted by law. Every such contract shall
be made in duplicate, one copy to be retained by the school district
superintendent or secretary and one copy to be delivered to the employee. No
contract shall be offered by any board for the employment of any employee who
has previously signed an employment contract for that same term in another
school district of the state of Washington unless such employee shall have been
released from his or her obligations under such previous contract by the board
of directors of the school district to which he or she was obligated. Any
contract signed in violation of this provision shall be void.

The
right to renew a contract of employment with any employee rests solely with the
discretion of the school board employing the employee. Regarding such renewal
of contracts of employees, RCW 28A.405.240 and 28A.645.010 are inapplicable.
In the event it is determined that ((there is probable cause or causes that))
the employment contract of an employee ((should)) will not be
renewed by the district for the next ensuing term such employee shall be
notified in writing on or before ((May 15th)) June 30th preceding
the commencement of such term of that determination((, or if the omnibus
appropriations act has not passed the legislature by May 15th, then
notification shall be no later than June 1st, which notification shall specify
the cause or causes for nonrenewal of contract)). Such determination of ((probable
cause)) nonrenewal for certificated employees, other than the
superintendent, shall be made by the superintendent. Such notice shall be
served upon the employee personally, or by certified or registered mail, or by
leaving a copy of the notice at the house of his or her usual abode with some
person of suitable age and discretion then resident therein. Every such
employee so notified, at his or her request made in writing and filed with the
((president, chair or secretary of the board of directors)) superintendent
of the district within ten days after receiving such notice, shall be granted
opportunity for ((hearing pursuant to RCW 28A.405.310 to determine whether
there is sufficient cause or causes for nonrenewal of contract: PROVIDED, That
any employee receiving notice of nonrenewal of contract due to an enrollment
decline or loss of revenue may, in his or her request for a hearing, stipulate
that initiation of the arrangements for a hearing officer as provided for by RCW
28A.405.310(4) shall occur within ten days following July 15 rather than the
day that the employee submits the request for a hearing. If any such
notification or opportunity for hearing is not timely given, the employee
entitled thereto shall be conclusively presumed to have been reemployed by the
district for the next ensuing term upon contractual terms identical with those
which would have prevailed if his or her employment had actually been renewed
by the board of directors for such ensuing term)) an informal meeting
with the superintendent for the purpose of requesting that the superintendent
reconsider his or her decision. The meeting shall be held no later than ten
days following receipt of such request, and the employee shall be given written
notice of the date, time, and place of the meeting at least three days before
the meeting. At the meeting the employee shall be given the opportunity to
refute any facts on which the superintendent's determination was based and to
make any argument in support of his or her request for reconsideration.

((This
section shall not be applicable to "provisional employees" as so
designated in RCW 28A.405.220;)) Within ten days following the meeting
with the employee, the superintendent shall either reinstate the employee or
submit to the school district board of directors for consideration at its next
regular meeting a written report recommending that the employment contract of
the employee be nonrenewed. A copy of the report shall be delivered to the
employee at least three days before the scheduled meeting of the board of
directors. In taking action on the recommendation of the superintendent, the
board of directors shall consider any written communication that the employee
may file with the superintendent at any time before that meeting. The board of
directors shall notify the employee of its final decision within ten days
following the meeting at which the superintendent's recommendation was
considered. The decision of the board of directors to nonrenew the contract of
an employee is final and not subject to appeal. This section provides the
exclusive means for nonrenewing the employment contract of an employee and no
other provision of law shall be applicable thereto, including without
limitation, RCW 28A.645.010.

Transfer
to a subordinate certificated position as that procedure is set forth in RCW
28A.405.230 shall not be construed as a nonrenewal of contract for the purposes
of this section.

Sec.
5. RCW
28A.405.220 and 1996 c 201 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

((Notwithstanding
the provisions of RCW 28A.405.210,)) Every person employed by a
school district in a teaching or other nonsupervisory certificated position
shall be subject to nonrenewal of employment contract on or before June 30th
of each school year as provided in ((this section)) RCW
28A.405.210 during the first two years of employment by such district,
unless the employee has previously completed at least two years of certificated
employment in another school district in the state of Washington, in which case
the employee shall be subject to nonrenewal of employment contract pursuant to
this section during the first year of employment with the new district.
Employees as defined in this section shall hereinafter be referred to as
"provisional employees".

((In
the event the superintendent of the school district determines that the
employment contract of any provisional employee should not be renewed by the
district for the next ensuing term such provisional employee shall be notified
thereof in writing on or before May 15th preceding the commencement of such
school term, or if the omnibus appropriations act has not passed the
legislature by May 15th, then notification shall be no later than June 1st,
which notification shall state the reason or reasons for such determination.
Such notice shall be served upon the provisional employee personally, or by
certified or registered mail, or by leaving a copy of the notice at the place
of his or her usual abode with some person of suitable age and discretion then
resident therein. The determination of the superintendent shall be subject to
the evaluation requirements of RCW 28A.405.100.

Every
such provisional employee so notified, at his or her request made in writing
and filed with the superintendent of the district within ten days after
receiving such notice, shall be given the opportunity to meet informally with
the superintendent for the purpose of requesting the superintendent to
reconsider his or her decision. Such meeting shall be held no later than ten
days following the receipt of such request, and the provisional employee shall
be given written notice of the date, time and place of meeting at least three
days prior thereto. At such meeting the provisional employee shall be given
the opportunity to refute any facts upon which the superintendent's
determination was based and to make any argument in support of his or her
request for reconsideration.

Within
ten days following the meeting with the provisional employee, the
superintendent shall either reinstate the provisional employee or shall submit
to the school district board of directors for consideration at its next regular
meeting a written report recommending that the employment contract of the
provisional employee be nonrenewed and stating the reason or reasons therefor.
A copy of such report shall be delivered to the provisional employee at least
three days prior to the scheduled meeting of the board of directors. In taking
action upon the recommendation of the superintendent, the board of directors
shall consider any written communication which the provisional employee may
file with the secretary of the board at any time prior to that meeting.

The
board of directors shall notify the provisional employee in writing of its
final decision within ten days following the meeting at which the
superintendent's recommendation was considered. The decision of the board of
directors to nonrenew the contract of a provisional employee shall be final and
not subject to appeal.

This
section applies to any person employed by a school district in a teaching or
other nonsupervisory certificated position after June 25, 1976. This section
provides the exclusive means for nonrenewing the employment contract of a
provisional employee and no other provision of law shall be applicable thereto,
including, without limitation, RCW 28A.405.210 and chapter 28A.645 RCW.))

Sec.
6. RCW
28A.405.230 and 1996 c 201 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
certificated employee of a school district employed as an assistant
superintendent, director, principal, assistant principal, coordinator, or in
any other supervisory or administrative position, hereinafter in this section
referred to as "administrator", shall be subject to transfer, ((at
the expiration of the term of his or her employment contract)) for the
next school term, to any subordinate certificated position within the
school district. "Subordinate certificated position" as used in this
section, shall mean any administrative or nonadministrative certificated
position for which the annual compensation is less than the position currently
held by the administrator.

Every
superintendent determining that the best interests of the school district would
be served by transferring any administrator to a subordinate certificated
position shall notify that administrator in writing on or before ((May 15th))
June 30th preceding the commencement of such school term of that
determination, ((or if the omnibus appropriations act has not passed the
legislature by May 15th, then notification shall be no later than June 1st,))
which notification shall state the reason or reasons for the transfer, and
shall identify the subordinate certificated position to which the administrator
will be transferred. Such notice shall be served upon the administrator
personally, or by certified or registered mail, or by leaving a copy of the
notice at the place of his or her usual abode with some person of suitable age
and discretion then resident therein.

Every
such administrator so notified, at his or her request made in writing and filed
with the president or chair, or secretary of the board of directors of the
district within ten days after receiving such notice, shall be given the
opportunity to meet informally with the board of directors in an executive
session thereof for the purpose of requesting the board to reconsider the
decision of the superintendent. Such board, upon receipt of such request,
shall schedule the meeting for no later than the next regularly scheduled
meeting of the board, and shall notify the administrator in writing of the
date, time and place of the meeting at least three days prior thereto. At such
meeting the administrator shall be given the opportunity to refute any facts
upon which the determination was based and to make any argument in support of
his or her request for reconsideration. The administrator and the board may
invite their respective legal counsel to be present and to participate at the
meeting. The board shall notify the administrator in writing of its final
decision within ten days following its meeting with the administrator. No
appeal to the courts shall lie from the final decision of the board of
directors to transfer an administrator to a subordinate certificated position:
PROVIDED, That in the case of principals such transfer shall be made at the
expiration of the contract year and only during the first three consecutive school
years of employment as a principal by a school district; except that if any
such principal has been previously employed as a principal by another school
district in the state of Washington for three or more consecutive school years
the provisions of this section shall apply only to the first full school year
of such employment.

This
section applies to any person employed as an administrator by a school district
on June 25, 1976 and to all persons so employed at any time thereafter. This
section provides the exclusive means for transferring an administrator to a
subordinate certificated position ((at the expiration of the term of his or
her employment contract)) for the next school term.

Sec.
7. RCW
28A.405.240 and 1990 c 33 s 393 are each amended to read as follows:

No
certificated employee shall be required to perform duties not described in the
contract unless a new or supplemental contract is made for a term not to
exceed one year, except that in an unexpected emergency the board of
directors or school district administration may require the employee to perform
other reasonable duties on a temporary basis.

No
supplemental contract shall be subject to the continuing contract provisions of
this title.

Sec.
8. RCW
28A.405.300 and 1990 c 33 s 395 are each amended to read as follows:

In
the event it is determined that there is probable cause or causes for a
teacher, principal, supervisor, superintendent, or other certificated employee,
holding a position as such with the school district, hereinafter referred to as
"employee", to be discharged or otherwise adversely affected in his
or her contract status, such employee shall be notified in writing of that
decision, which notification shall specify the probable cause or causes for
such action. Such determinations of probable cause for certificated employees,
other than the superintendent, shall be made by the superintendent. Such
notices shall be served upon that employee personally, or by certified or
registered mail, or by leaving a copy of the notice at the house of his or her
usual abode with some person of suitable age and discretion then resident
therein. Every such employee so notified, at his or her request made in
writing and filed with the president, chair of the board or secretary of the
board of directors of the district within ten days after receiving such notice,
shall be granted opportunity for a hearing pursuant to RCW 28A.405.310 to
determine whether or not there is sufficient cause or causes for his or her
discharge or other adverse action against his or her contract status.

In
the event any such notice or opportunity for hearing is not timely given, or in
the event cause for discharge or other adverse action is not established by a
preponderance of the evidence at the hearing, such employee shall not be
discharged or otherwise adversely affected in his or her contract status for
the causes stated in the original notice for the duration of his or her
contract.

If
such employee does not request a hearing as provided herein, such employee may
be discharged or otherwise adversely affected as provided in the notice served
upon the employee.

Transfer
to a subordinate certificated position as that procedure is set forth in RCW
28A.405.230 shall not be construed as a discharge or other adverse action
against contract status for the purposes of this section. Nonrenewal of a
contract as that procedure is set forth in RCW 28A.405.210 shall not be
construed as a discharge or other adverse action against contract status for
the purposes of this section.

Sec.
9. RCW
28A.405.310 and 1990 c 33 s 396 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any employee receiving a notice of probable cause for discharge or adverse
effect in contract status pursuant to RCW 28A.405.300((, or any employee,
with the exception of provisional employees as defined in RCW 28A.405.220,
receiving a notice of probable cause for nonrenewal of contract pursuant to RCW
28A.405.210,)) shall be granted the opportunity for a hearing pursuant to
this section.

(2)
In any request for a hearing pursuant to RCW 28A.405.300 ((or 28A.405.210)),
the employee may request either an open or closed hearing. The hearing shall
be open or closed as requested by the employee, but if the employee fails to
make such a request, the hearing officer may determine whether the hearing
shall be open or closed.

(3)
The employee may engage counsel who shall be entitled to represent the employee
at the prehearing conference held pursuant to subsection (5) of this section
and at all subsequent proceedings pursuant to this section. At the hearing
provided for by this section, the employee may produce such witnesses as he or
she may desire.

(4)
In the event that an employee requests a hearing pursuant to RCW 28A.405.300 ((or
28A.405.210)), a hearing officer shall be appointed in the following
manner: Within fifteen days following the receipt of any such request the
board of directors of the district or its designee and the employee or
employee's designee shall each appoint one nominee. The two nominees shall
jointly appoint a hearing officer who shall be a member in good standing of the
Washington state bar association or a person adhering to the arbitration
standards established by the public employment relations commission and listed
on its current roster of arbitrators. Should said nominees fail to agree as to
who should be appointed as the hearing officer, either the board of directors
or the employee, upon appropriate notice to the other party, may apply to the
presiding judge of the superior court for the county in which the district is
located for the appointment of such hearing officer, whereupon such presiding
judge shall have the duty to appoint a hearing officer who shall, in the
judgment of such presiding judge, be qualified to fairly and impartially
discharge his or her duties. Nothing herein shall preclude the board of
directors and the employee from stipulating as to the identity of the hearing
officer in which event the foregoing procedures for the selection of the
hearing officer shall be inapplicable. The district shall pay all fees and
expenses of any hearing officer selected pursuant to this subsection.

(5)
Within five days following the selection of a hearing officer pursuant to
subsection (4) of this section, the hearing officer shall schedule a prehearing
conference to be held within such five day period, unless the board of
directors and employee agree on another date convenient with the hearing
officer. The employee shall be given written notice of the date, time, and
place of such prehearing conference at least three days prior to the date established
for such conference.

(6)
The hearing officer shall preside at any prehearing conference scheduled
pursuant to subsection (5) of this section and in connection therewith shall:

(a)
Issue such subpoenas or subpoenas duces tecum as either party may request at
that time or thereafter; and

(b)
Authorize the taking of prehearing depositions at the request of either party
at that time or thereafter; and

(c)
Provide for such additional methods of discovery as may be authorized by the
civil rules applicable in the superior courts of the state of Washington; and

(d)
Establish the date for the commencement of the hearing, to be within ten days
following the date of the prehearing conference, unless the employee requests a
continuance, in which event the hearing officer shall give due consideration to
such request.

(7)
The hearing officer shall preside at any hearing and in connection therewith
shall:

(a)
Make rulings as to the admissibility of evidence pursuant to the rules of
evidence applicable in the superior court of the state of Washington.

(b)
Make other appropriate rulings of law and procedure.

(c)
Within ten days following the conclusion of the hearing transmit in writing to
the board and to the employee, findings of fact and conclusions of law and
final decision. If the final decision is in favor of the employee, the
employee shall be restored to his or her employment position and shall be
awarded reasonable attorneys' fees.

(8)
Any final decision by the hearing officer to ((nonrenew the employment
contract of the employee, or to)) discharge the employee, or to take other
action adverse to the employee's contract status, as the case may be, shall be
based solely upon the cause or causes specified in the notice of probable cause
to the employee and shall be established by a preponderance of the evidence at
the hearing to be sufficient cause or causes for such action.

(9)
All subpoenas and prehearing discovery orders shall be enforceable by and
subject to the contempt and other equity powers of the superior court of the
county in which the school district is located upon petition of any aggrieved
party.

(10)
A complete record shall be made of the hearing and all orders and rulings of
the hearing officer and school board.

Sec.
10. RCW
28A.405.320 and 1990 c 33 s 397 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
teacher, principal, supervisor, superintendent, or other certificated employee,
desiring to appeal from any action or failure to act upon the part of a school
board relating to the discharge or other action adversely affecting his or her
contract status((, or failure to renew that employee's contract for the next
ensuing term,)) within thirty days after his or her receipt of such
decision or order, may serve upon the chair of the school board and file with
the clerk of the superior court in the county in which the school district is
located a notice of appeal which shall set forth also in a clear and concise
manner the errors complained of.

Sec.
11. RCW
28A.405.350 and 1990 c 33 s 399 are each amended to read as follows:

If
the court enters judgment for the employee, and if the court finds that the
probable cause determination was made in bad faith or upon insufficient legal
grounds, the court in its discretion may award to the employee a reasonable
attorneys' fee for the preparation and trial of his or her appeal, together
with his or her taxable costs in the superior court. If the court enters
judgment for the employee, in addition to ordering the school board to
reinstate ((or issue a new contract to)) the employee, the court may
award damages for loss of compensation incurred by the employee by reason of
the action of the school district.

Sec.
12. RCW
28A.405.380 and 1990 c 33 s 401 are each amended to read as follows:

In the event that an employee, with the exception of a provisional
employee as defined in RCW 28A.405.220, receives a notice of probable cause
pursuant to RCW 28A.405.300 ((or 28A.405.210)) stating that by reason of
a lack of sufficient funds or loss of levy election the employment contract of
such employee should ((not)) be ((renewed)) terminated for
the next ensuing school term or that the same should be adversely affected, the
employee may appeal any said probable cause determination directly to the
superior court of the county in which the school district is located. Such
appeal shall be perfected by serving upon the secretary of the school board and
filing with the clerk of the superior court a notice of appeal within ten days
after receiving the probable cause notice. The notice of appeal shall set
forth in a clear and concise manner the action appealed from. The superior
court shall determine whether or not there was sufficient cause for the action
as specified in the probable cause notice, which cause must be proven by a
preponderance of the evidence, and shall base its determination solely upon the
cause or causes stated in the notice of the employee. The appeal provided in
this section shall be tried as an ordinary civil action: PROVIDED, That the
board of directors' determination of priorities for the expenditure of funds
shall be subject to superior court review pursuant to the standards set forth
in RCW 28A.405.340: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the provisions of RCW 28A.405.350
and 28A.405.360 shall be applicable thereto.

---
END ---