BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.405.900 and 1990 c 33 s 404 are each amended to read as follows:

Certificated
employees subject to the provisions of RCW ((28A.405.010)) 28A.405.030
through 28A.405.240, 28A.405.400 through 28A.405.410, and 28A.415.250((,
and 28A.405.900)) shall not include those certificated employees hired to
replace certificated employees who have been granted sabbatical, regular, or
other leave by school districts, or who have been hired for less than a full
year due to predictions that district enrollment will decline following the
term of the partial year contract.

It is not the intention of the legislature that this section apply
to any regularly hired certificated employee or that the legal or
constitutional rights of such employee be limited, abridged, or abrogated.

---
END ---