BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

The
superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee shall, in
cooperation with appropriate legislative committees and legislative staff,
establish a mechanism for the determination of the fiscal impact of proposed
legislation, which if enacted into law, would directly or indirectly increase
or decrease revenues received or expenditures incurred by school districts.
The superintendent of public instruction shall report in writing as to the
fiscal impact and the report shall be known as a fiscal note.

Such
fiscal notes shall indicate by fiscal year the total impact on the school
districts involved for the first two years the legislation would be in effect
and also a cumulative six-year forecast of the fiscal impact. Where feasible
and applicable, the fiscal note also shall indicate the fiscal impact on each individual
school district.

A
fiscal note as defined in this section shall be provided for all legislation,
which if enacted into law, would directly or indirectly increase or decrease
revenues received or expenditures incurred by school districts. A legislator
may request that such a fiscal note be revised to reflect the impact of
proposed amendments or substitute bills. Fiscal notes shall be completed
within seventy-two hours of referral of the legislation to the superintendent
of public instruction. In the event a fiscal note has not been completed
within seventy-two hours of a referral, a daily report shall be prepared by the
superintendent of public instruction that summarizes the progress in preparing
the fiscal note.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

When
a fiscal note as provided in section 1 of this act is prepared and approved as
to form and completeness by the superintendent of public instruction, the superintendent
shall transmit copies immediately to:

(1)
With respect to proposed legislation held by the senate, the chair of the
committee that holds or has acted upon the proposed legislation, the chair of
the ways and means committee, and the secretary of the senate; and

(2)
With respect to proposed legislation held by the house of representatives, the
chair of the committee that holds or has acted upon the proposed legislation,
the chair of the revenue and taxation and appropriations committees, and the
chief clerk of the house of representatives.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

The
office of the superintendent of public instruction may make additional copies
of the fiscal note as provided in section 1 of this act available to members of
the legislature and others on request.

At
the request of any member of the senate or house of representatives, whichever
is considering the proposed legislation, and unless it is prohibited by the
rules of the body, copies of the fiscal note or a synopsis thereof shall be
placed on the members' desks at the time the proposed legislation takes its
place on the second reading calendar.

Whenever
proposed legislation accompanied by such a fiscal note is passed by either the
senate or the house of representatives, the fiscal note shall be transmitted
with the bill to the other house.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

When
the fiscal note as provided in section 1 of this act indicates that a bill or
resolution would require expenditures of funds by a school district, the
legislature shall determine the state's fiscal responsibility and shall
appropriate the funds or provide the revenue generating authority necessary to
implement the legislation during the ensuing biennium.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

This
chapter does not prevent either house of the legislature from acting on any
bill or resolution before it as otherwise provided by the state Constitution,
by law, and by the rules of the senate and house of representatives, nor does
the lack of any fiscal note as provided in section 1 of this act or any error
in the accuracy thereof affect the validity of any measure otherwise duly
passed by the legislature.

Sec.
6. RCW
28A.150.290 and 1990 c 33 s 111 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The superintendent of public instruction shall have the power and duty to make
such rules ((and regulations)) as are necessary for the proper
administration of this chapter and RCW 28A.160.150 through ((28A.160.220))
28A.160.210, 28A.300.170, and 28A.500.010 not inconsistent with the
provisions thereof, and in addition to require such reports as may be necessary
to carry out his or her duties under this chapter and RCW 28A.160.150 through
((28A.160.220)) 28A.160.210, 28A.300.170, and 28A.500.010.

(2)
The superintendent of public instruction shall have the authority to make rules
((and regulations)) which establish the terms and conditions for
allowing school districts to receive state basic education moneys as provided
in RCW 28A.150.250 when said districts are unable to fulfill for one or more
schools as officially scheduled the requirement of a full school year of one
hundred eighty days or the total program hour offering, teacher contact hour,
or course mix and percentage requirements imposed by RCW 28A.150.220 and
28A.150.260 due to one or more of the following conditions:

(a)
An unforeseen natural event, including, but not necessarily limited to, a fire,
flood, explosion, storm, earthquake, epidemic, or volcanic eruption that has
the direct or indirect effect of rendering one or more school district
facilities unsafe, unhealthy, inaccessible, or inoperable; and

(b)
An unforeseen mechanical failure or an unforeseen action or inaction by one or
more persons, including negligence and threats, that (i) is beyond the control
of both a school district board of directors and its employees and (ii) has the
direct or indirect effect of rendering one or more school district facilities
unsafe, unhealthy, inaccessible, or inoperable. Such actions, inactions or mechanical
failures may include, but are not necessarily limited to, arson, vandalism,
riots, insurrections, bomb threats, bombings, delays in the scheduled
completion of construction projects, and the discontinuance or disruption of
utilities such as heating, lighting and water: PROVIDED, That an unforeseen
action or inaction shall not include any labor dispute between a school
district board of directors and any employee of the school district.

A
condition is foreseeable for the purposes of this subsection to the extent a
reasonably prudent person would have anticipated prior to August first of the
preceding school year that the condition probably would occur during the
ensuing school year because of the occurrence of an event or a circumstance
which existed during such preceding school year or a prior school year. A
board of directors of a school district is deemed for the purposes of this
subsection to have knowledge of events and circumstances which are a matter of
common knowledge within the school district and of those events and
circumstances which can be discovered upon prudent inquiry or inspection.

(3)
The superintendent of public instruction shall make every effort to reduce the
amount of paperwork required in administration of this chapter and RCW
28A.160.150 through ((28A.160.220)) 28A.160.210, 28A.300.170, and
28A.500.010; to simplify the application, monitoring and evaluation processes
used; to eliminate all duplicative requests for information from local school
districts; and to make every effort to integrate and standardize information requests
for other state education acts and federal aid to education acts administered
by the superintendent of public instruction so as to reduce paperwork
requirements and duplicative information requests.

(4)(a)
The superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee shall
establish a mechanism for the determination of the fiscal impact of rules
proposed under this section or chapter 28A.155 RCW, which if enacted would
directly or indirectly increase or decrease revenues received or expenditures
incurred by school districts. The superintendent of public instruction shall
report in writing as to the fiscal impact and the report shall be known as a
fiscal note.

(b)
Fiscal notes shall indicate by fiscal year the total impact on the school
districts involved for the first two years the rule would be in effect and also
a cumulative six-year forecast of the fiscal impact. Where feasible and
applicable, the fiscal note also shall indicate the fiscal impact on each
individual school district.

(c)
A fiscal note shall be provided for all rules, which if enacted would directly
or indirectly increase or decrease revenues received or expenditures incurred
by school districts. Fiscal notes shall be completed before submission of the
proposed rules to public hearing.

Sec.
7. RCW
28A.150.290 and 1992 c 141 s 504 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The superintendent of public instruction shall have the power and duty to make
such rules ((and regulations)) as are necessary for the proper
administration of this chapter and RCW 28A.160.150 through ((28A.160.220))
28A.160.210, 28A.300.170, and 28A.500.010 not inconsistent with the
provisions thereof, and in addition to require such reports as may be necessary
to carry out his or her duties under this chapter and RCW 28A.160.150 through
((28A.160.220)) 28A.160.210, 28A.300.170, and 28A.500.010.

(2)
The superintendent of public instruction shall have the authority to make rules
((and regulations)) which establish the terms and conditions for
allowing school districts to receive state basic education moneys as provided
in RCW 28A.150.250 when said districts are unable to fulfill for one or more
schools as officially scheduled the requirement of a full school year of one
hundred eighty days or the annual average total instructional hour offering
imposed by RCW 28A.150.220 and 28A.150.260 due to one or more of the following
conditions:

(a)
An unforeseen natural event, including, but not necessarily limited to, a fire,
flood, explosion, storm, earthquake, epidemic, or volcanic eruption that has
the direct or indirect effect of rendering one or more school district
facilities unsafe, unhealthy, inaccessible, or inoperable; and

(b)
An unforeseen mechanical failure or an unforeseen action or inaction by one or
more persons, including negligence and threats, that (i) is beyond the control
of both a school district board of directors and its employees and (ii) has the
direct or indirect effect of rendering one or more school district facilities
unsafe, unhealthy, inaccessible, or inoperable. Such actions, inactions or
mechanical failures may include, but are not necessarily limited to, arson,
vandalism, riots, insurrections, bomb threats, bombings, delays in the
scheduled completion of construction projects, and the discontinuance or
disruption of utilities such as heating, lighting and water: PROVIDED, That an
unforeseen action or inaction shall not include any labor dispute between a
school district board of directors and any employee of the school district.

A
condition is foreseeable for the purposes of this subsection to the extent a
reasonably prudent person would have anticipated prior to August first of the
preceding school year that the condition probably would occur during the
ensuing school year because of the occurrence of an event or a circumstance
which existed during such preceding school year or a prior school year. A
board of directors of a school district is deemed for the purposes of this
subsection to have knowledge of events and circumstances which are a matter of
common knowledge within the school district and of those events and
circumstances which can be discovered upon prudent inquiry or inspection.

(3)
The superintendent of public instruction shall make every effort to reduce the
amount of paperwork required in administration of this chapter and RCW
28A.160.150 through ((28A.160.220)) 28A.160.210, 28A.300.170, and
28A.500.010; to simplify the application, monitoring and evaluation processes
used; to eliminate all duplicative requests for information from local school
districts; and to make every effort to integrate and standardize information
requests for other state education acts and federal aid to education acts
administered by the superintendent of public instruction so as to reduce
paperwork requirements and duplicative information requests.

(4)(a)
The superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee shall
establish a mechanism for the determination of the fiscal impact of rules
proposed under this section or chapter 28A.155 RCW, which if enacted would
directly or indirectly increase or decrease revenues received or expenditures
incurred by school districts. The superintendent of public instruction shall
report in writing as to the fiscal impact and the report shall be known as a
fiscal note.

(b)
Fiscal notes shall indicate by fiscal year the total impact on the school
districts involved for the first two years the rule would be in effect and also
a cumulative six-year forecast of the fiscal impact. Where feasible and
applicable, the fiscal note also shall indicate the fiscal impact on each
individual school district.

(c)
A fiscal note shall be provided for all rules, which if enacted would directly
or indirectly increase or decrease revenues received or expenditures incurred
by school districts. Fiscal notes shall be completed before submission of the
proposed rules to public hearing.

Sec.
8. RCW
28A.305.130 and 1997 c 13 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to any other powers and duties as provided by law, the state board of
education shall:

(1)
Approve or disapprove the program of courses leading to teacher, school
administrator, and school specialized personnel certification offered by all
institutions of higher education within the state which may be accredited and
whose graduates may become entitled to receive such certification.

(2)
Conduct every five years a review of the program approval standards, including
the minimum standards for teachers, administrators, and educational staff
associates, to reflect research findings and assure continued improvement of
preparation programs for teachers, administrators, and educational staff
associates.

(3)
Investigate the character of the work required to be performed as a condition
of entrance to and graduation from any institution of higher education in this
state relative to such certification as provided for in subsection (1) above,
and prepare a list of accredited institutions of higher education of this and
other states whose graduates may be awarded such certificates.

(4)(a)
The state board of education shall adopt rules to allow a teacher certification
candidate to fulfill, in part, teacher preparation program requirements through
work experience as a classified teacher's aide in a public school or private
school meeting the requirements of RCW 28A.195.010. The rules shall include,
but are not limited to, limitations based upon the recency of the teacher
preparation candidate's teacher aide work experience, and limitations based on
the amount of work experience that may apply toward teacher preparation program
requirements under this chapter.

(b)
The state board of education shall require that at the time of the individual's
enrollment in a teacher preparation program, the supervising teacher and the
building principal shall jointly provide to the teacher preparation program of
the higher education institution at which the teacher candidate is enrolled, a
written assessment of the performance of the teacher candidate. The assessment
shall contain such information as determined by the state board of education
and shall include: Evidence that at least fifty percent of the candidate's
work as a classified teacher's aide was involved in instructional activities
with children under the supervision of a certificated teacher and that the
candidate worked a minimum of six hundred thirty hours for one school year; the
type of work performed by the candidate; and a recommendation of whether the
candidate's work experience as a classified teacher's aide should be
substituted for teacher preparation program requirements. In compliance with
such rules as may be established by the state board of education under this
section, the teacher preparation programs of the higher education institution
where the candidate is enrolled shall make the final determination as to what
teacher preparation program requirements may be fulfilled by teacher aide work
experience.

(5)
Supervise the issuance of such certificates as provided for in subsection (1)
above and specify the types and kinds of certificates necessary for the several
departments of the common schools by rule ((or regulation)) in
accordance with RCW 28A.410.010.

(6)
Accredit, subject to such accreditation standards and procedures as may be
established by the state board of education, all schools that apply for
accreditation, and approve, subject to the provisions of RCW 28A.195.010,
private schools carrying out a program for any or all of the grades
kindergarten through twelve: PROVIDED, That no private school may be approved
that operates a kindergarten program only: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no public or
private schools shall be placed upon the list of accredited schools so long as
secret societies are knowingly allowed to exist among its students by school
officials: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the state board may elect to require all or
certain classifications of the public schools to conduct and participate in
such preaccreditation examination and evaluation processes as may now or
hereafter be established by the board.

(7)
Make rules ((and regulations)) governing the establishment in any
existing nonhigh school district of any secondary program or any new grades in
grades nine through twelve. Before any such program or any new grades are
established the district must obtain prior approval of the state board.

(8)
Prepare such outline of study for the common schools as the board shall deem
necessary, and prescribe such rules for the general government of the common
schools, as shall seek to secure regularity of attendance, prevent truancy,
secure efficiency, and promote the true interest of the common schools.

(9)
Continuously reevaluate courses and adopt and enforce ((regulations)) rules
within the common schools so as to meet the educational needs of students and
articulate with the institutions of higher education and unify the work of the
public school system.

(10)
Carry out board powers and duties relating to the organization and
reorganization of school districts under RCW 28A.315.010 through 28A.315.680
and 28A.315.900.

(11)
By rule ((or regulation promulgated)) adopted upon the advice of
the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire
protection, provide for instruction of pupils in the public and private schools
carrying out a K through 12 program, or any part thereof, so that in case of
sudden emergency they shall be able to leave their particular school building
in the shortest possible time or take such other steps as the particular
emergency demands, and without confusion or panic; such rules ((and
regulations)) shall be published and distributed to certificated personnel
throughout the state whose duties shall include a familiarization therewith as
well as the means of implementation thereof at their particular school.

(12)
Hear and decide appeals as otherwise provided by law.

(13)(a)
Consider in the process of adopting any rules under this section relevant
fiscal notes created as follows: The superintendent of public instruction or
the superintendent's designee shall, in cooperation with the state board of
education, establish a mechanism for the determination of the fiscal impact of
rules proposed under this section, which if enacted would directly or
indirectly increase or decrease revenues received or expenditures incurred by
school districts. The superintendent of public instruction shall report in
writing to the state board of education as to the fiscal impact and the report
shall be known as a fiscal note.

(b)
Fiscal notes shall indicate by fiscal year the total impact on the school
districts involved for the first two years the rule would be in effect and also
a cumulative six-year forecast of the fiscal impact. Where feasible and
applicable, the fiscal note also shall indicate the fiscal impact on each
individual school district.

(c)
A fiscal note shall be provided for all rules, which if enacted would directly
or indirectly increase or decrease revenues received or expenditures incurred
by school districts. Fiscal notes shall be completed before submission of the
proposed rules to public hearing.

The
state board of education is given the authority to promulgate information and
rules dealing with the prevention of child abuse for purposes of curriculum use
in the common schools.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9.
Section 2 of this act takes effect September 1, 2000. However, section 2 of
this act shall not take effect if, by September 1, 2000, a law is enacted
stating that a school accountability and academic assessment system is not in
place.

---
END ---