BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.15 RCW to read as follows:

In
addition to waivers granted under the authority of RCW 28B.15.910, the
governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The
Evergreen State College, and the community colleges may waive all or a portion
of the operating fees for any student. There shall be no state general fund
support for waivers granted under this section.

Sec.
2. RCW
28B.15.066 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 9 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

It
is the intent of the legislature that:

In
making appropriations from the state's general fund to institutions of higher
education, each appropriation shall conform to the following:

(1)
The appropriation shall not be reduced by the amount of operating fees revenue
estimated to be collected from students enrolled at the state-funded enrollment
level specified in the omnibus biennial operating appropriations act;

(2)
The appropriation shall not be reduced by the amount of operating fees revenue
collected from students enrolled above the state-funded level, but within the
over-enrollment limitations, specified in the omnibus biennial operating
appropriations act; and

(3)
The general fund state appropriation shall not be reduced by the amount of
operating fees revenue collected as a result of waiving less operating fees
revenue than the amounts authorized under RCW 28B.15.910. State general
fund appropriations shall not be provided for revenue foregone as a result of
or for waivers granted under section 1 of this act.

Sec.
3. RCW
28B.15.910 and 1998 c 346 s 904 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
For the purpose of providing state general fund support to public institutions
of higher education, except for revenue waived under programs listed in
subsection (3) of this section, and unless otherwise expressly provided in the
omnibus state appropriations act, the total amount of operating fees revenue
waived, exempted, or reduced by a state university, a regional university, The
Evergreen State College, or the community colleges as a whole, shall not exceed
the percentage of total gross authorized operating fees revenue set forth
below. As used in this section, "gross authorized operating fees
revenue" means the estimated gross operating fees revenue as estimated
under RCW 82.33.020 or as revised by the office of financial management, before
granting any waivers. This limitation applies to all tuition waiver programs established
before or after July 1, 1992.

(a)
University of Washington 21 percent

(b)
Washington State University 20 percent

(c)
Eastern Washington University 11 percent

(d)
Central Washington University 8 percent

(e)
Western Washington University 10 percent

(f)
The Evergreen State College 6 percent

(g)
Community colleges as a whole 35 percent

(2)
The limitations in subsection (1) of this section apply to waivers, exemptions,
or reductions in operating fees contained in the following:

(a)
RCW 28B.10.265;

(b)
RCW 28B.15.014;

(c)
RCW 28B.15.100;

(d)
RCW 28B.15.225;

(e)
RCW 28B.15.380;

(f)
RCW 28B.15.520;

(g)
RCW 28B.15.526;

(h)
RCW 28B.15.527;

(i)
RCW 28B.15.543;

(j)
RCW 28B.15.545;

(k)
RCW 28B.15.555;

(l)
RCW 28B.15.556;

(m)
RCW 28B.15.615;

(n)
RCW 28B.15.620;

(o)
RCW 28B.15.628;

(p)
RCW 28B.15.730;

(q)
RCW 28B.15.740;

(r)
RCW 28B.15.750;

(s)
RCW 28B.15.756;

(t)
RCW 28B.50.259;

(u)
RCW 28B.70.050;

(v)
RCW 28B.80.580; and

(w)
During the 1997-99 fiscal biennium, the western interstate commission for
higher education undergraduate exchange program for students attending Eastern
Washington University.

(3)
The limitations in subsection (1) of this section do not apply to waivers,
exemptions, or reductions in services and activities fees contained in the
following:

(a)
RCW 28B.15.522;

(b)
RCW 28B.15.540; and

(c) RCW 28B.15.558.

---
END ---