BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.05 RCW to read as follows:

Technical
assistance documents developed by regulatory agencies must contain a statement
on the first page in at least ten-point type that is substantially in the
following form:

NOTICE

This document provides
technical assistance information. It does not impose any new mandatory
obligations and will not be used as the basis for a citation.

---
END ---