BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

The secretary may accept such grants, services, and property from
the federal government, foundations, organizations, medical schools, and other
entities as are available for the purpose of designing and implementing
programs that address the health-related needs of the people of the state of
Washington.

---
END ---