BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 9A.42 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Any person who commits domestic violence, as defined in RCW 10.99.020, within
sight or sound of the victim's or offender's minor children under the age of
eighteen years is guilty of criminal mistreatment in the fourth degree.

(2)
Criminal mistreatment in the fourth degree is a misdemeanor.

(3)
As part of any sentence for criminal mistreatment in the fourth degree, the
court shall impose and enforce an order with the following conditions:

(a)
Restricted or no contact with the victim, as defined in RCW 10.99.020, or with
the child or children of the victim or offender, within whose sight or sound
the offense was committed, for a period not to exceed the maximum sentence for
the crime, regardless of the expiration of the offender's term of community
supervision;

(b)
No further acts of violence or threats against the victim, as defined in RCW
10.99.020;

(c)
If the offense was committed while the defendant was under the influence of
drugs or alcohol, comprehensive substance abuse assessment and treatment
services appropriate for the offender and submission to urinalysis or other
testing to monitor drug and alcohol use during any periods of community
supervision;

(d)
Completion of a domestic violence perpetrator program approved under chapter
26.50 RCW; and

(e)
The defendant shall pay the cost of evaluation, treatment, and monitoring.

(4) The court may waive any of the minimum sentencing conditions in
subsection (3) of this section upon finding that the conditions would not be in
the best interests of justice. The court shall state on the record its reasons
for any waiver.

---
END ---