BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.16.015 and 1998 c 342 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Neither the department of licensing nor its agents may issue or renew a motor
vehicle license for any vehicle or change the registered owner of a licensed
vehicle, for any vehicle that is required to be inspected under chapter 70.120
RCW, unless the application for issuance or renewal is: (a) Accompanied by a
valid certificate of compliance or a valid certificate of acceptance issued
pursuant to chapter 70.120 RCW; or (b) exempted from this requirement pursuant
to subsection (2) of this section. The certificates must have a date of
validation which is within ((six)) fourteen months of the date of
application for the vehicle license or license renewal. ((Certificates for
fleet or owner tested diesel vehicles may have a date of validation which is
within twelve months of the assigned license renewal date.))

(2)
Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to the following vehicles:

(a)
New motor vehicles whose equitable or legal title has never been transferred to
a person who in good faith purchases the vehicle for purposes other than
resale;

(b)
Motor vehicles with a model year of 1967 or earlier;

(c)
Motor vehicles that use propulsion units powered exclusively by electricity;

(d)
Motor vehicles fueled by propane, compressed natural gas, or liquid petroleum
gas, unless it is determined that federal sanctions will be imposed as a result
of this exemption;

(e)
Motorcycles as defined in RCW 46.04.330 and motor-driven cycles as defined in
RCW 46.04.332;

(f)
Farm vehicles as defined in RCW 46.04.181;

(g)
Beginning January 1, 2000, used vehicles ((which are offered for sale))
sold by a motor vehicle dealer licensed under chapter 46.70 RCW located
outside a county where emission inspections are required;

(h)
Beginning January 1, 2000, used vehicles sold by a motor vehicle dealer
licensed under chapter 46.70 RCW located in a county where emission inspections
are required if the vehicle was most recently registered to an address where
Washington emission inspections are required;

(i)
Beginning January 1, 2000, used vehicles sold by a motor vehicle dealer
licensed under chapter 46.70 RCW located in a county where emission inspections
are required if the vehicle will be required to be emission inspected at the
next license renewal;

(j)
Classes of motor vehicles exempted by the director of the department of
ecology;

(((i)))
(k) Collector cars as identified by the department of licensing under
RCW 46.16.305(1); or

(((j)))
(l) Beginning January 1, 2000, vehicles that are less than five years
old or more than twenty-five years old.

The
provisions of (a) of this subsection may not be construed as exempting from the
provisions of subsection (1) of this section applications for the renewal of
licenses for motor vehicles that are or have been leased.

(3) The department of ecology shall provide information to motor
vehicle owners regarding the boundaries of emission contributing areas and
restrictions established under this section that apply to vehicles registered
in such areas. In addition the department of ecology shall provide information
to motor vehicle owners on the relationship between motor vehicles and air
pollution and steps motor vehicle owners should take to reduce motor vehicle
related air pollution. The department of licensing shall send to all
registered motor vehicle owners affected by the emission testing program notice
that they must have an emission test to renew their registration.

---
END ---