BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
31.16.020 and 1921 c 121 s 2;

(2) RCW
31.16.025 and 1988 c 25 s 6 & 1921 c 121 s 3;

(3) RCW
31.16.028 and 1921 c 121 s 4;

(4) RCW
31.16.030 and 1988 c 25 s 7 & 1921 c 121 s 5;

(5) RCW
31.16.040 and 1981 c 302 s 24 & 1921 c 121 s 6;

(6) RCW
31.16.050 and 1921 c 121 s 7;

(7) RCW
31.16.060 and 1921 c 121 s 8;

(8) RCW
31.16.070 and 1981 c 302 s 25 & 1921 c 121 s 9;

(9) RCW
31.16.080 and 1921 c 121 s 10;

(10) RCW
31.16.090 and 1921 c 121 s 11;

(11) RCW
31.16.100 and 1921 c 121 s 12;

(12) RCW
31.16.110 and 1921 c 121 s 13;

(13) RCW
31.16.120 and 1921 c 121 s 14;

(14) RCW
31.16.130 and 1921 c 121 s 15;

(15) RCW
31.16.150 and 1921 c 121 s 16;

(16) RCW
31.16.160 and 1921 c 121 s 17;

(17) RCW
31.16.170 and 1921 c 121 s 18;

(18) RCW
31.16.180 and 1921 c 121 s 19;

(19) RCW
31.16.190 and 1921 c 121 s 20;

(20) RCW
31.16.200 and 1921 c 121 s 21;

(21) RCW
31.16.210 and 1921 c 121 s 22;

(22) RCW
31.16.220 and 1921 c 121 s 23;

(23) RCW
31.16.230 and 1988 c 25 s 8 & 1921 c 121 s 24;

(24) RCW
31.16.240 and 1921 c 121 s 25;

(25) RCW
31.16.250 and 1921 c 121 s 26;

(26) RCW
31.16.255 and 1921 c 121 s 27;

(27) RCW
31.16.260 and 1921 c 121 s 28;

(28) RCW
31.16.270 and 1921 c 121 s 29;

(29) RCW
31.16.280 and 1921 c 121 s 30;

(30) RCW
31.16.290 and 1921 c 121 s 31;

(31) RCW
31.16.300 and 1921 c 121 s 32;

(32) RCW
31.16.310 and 1988 c 25 s 9 & 1921 c 121 s 33;

(33) RCW
31.16.320 and 1921 c 121 s 34;

(34) RCW
31.16.900 and 1921 c 121 s 1; and

(35) RCW
31.16.910 and 1921 c 121 s 35.

---
END ---