BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature declares that enhancing the effectiveness of child support
enforcement is an essential public policy goal, but that the use of social
security numbers on licenses is an inappropriate, intrusive, and offensive
method of improving enforceability. The legislature also finds that, in 1997,
the federal government threatened sanction by withholding of funds for programs
for poor families if states did not comply with a federal requirement to use
social security numbers on licenses, thus causing the legislature to enact such
provisions under protest. Since that time, the federal government has delayed
implementation of the noncommercial driver's license requirement until October
1, 2000.

The
legislature will require compliance with federal law in this matter only at
such time and in the event that the federal government actually implements the
requirement of using social security numbers on noncommercial driver's license
applications. Therefore, the legislature intends to delay the implementation
of provisions enacted in 1998 requiring social security numbers be recorded on
all applications for noncommercial driver's licenses.

Sec.
1. RCW
26.23.150 and 1998 c 160 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

In order to assist in child support enforcement as required by
federal law, all applicants for an original, replacement, or renewal of a
professional license, commercial driver's license, occupational license,
or recreational license must furnish the licensing agency with the applicant's
social security number, which shall be recorded on the application. No
applicant for an original, replacement, or renewal noncommercial driver's
license is required to furnish the licensing agency with the applicant's social
security number for purposes of assisting in child support enforcement prior to
the time necessary to comply with the federal deadline. The licensing
agencies collecting social security numbers shall not display the social
security number on the license document. Social security numbers collected by
licensing agencies shall not be disclosed except as required by state or
federal law or under RCW 26.23.120.

---
END ---