BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
74.09.010 and 1990 c 296 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"Children's health program" means the health care services program
provided to children under eighteen years of age and in households with incomes
at or below the federal poverty level as annually defined by the federal
department of health and human services as adjusted for family size, and who
are not otherwise eligible for medical assistance or the limited casualty
program for the medically needy.

(2)
"Committee" means the children's health services committee created in
section 3 of this act.

(3)
"County" means the board of county commissioners, county council,
county executive, or tribal jurisdiction, or its designee. A combination of
two or more county authorities or tribal jurisdictions may enter into joint
agreements to fulfill the requirements of RCW 74.09.415 through 74.09.435.

(4)
"Department" means the department of social and health services.

(5)
"Department of health" means the Washington state department of
health created pursuant to RCW 43.70.020.

(6)
"Internal management" means the administration of medical assistance,
medical care services, the children's health program, and the limited casualty
program.

(7)
"Limited casualty program" means the medical care program provided to
medically needy persons as defined under Title XIX of the federal social
security act, and to medically indigent persons who are without income or
resources sufficient to secure necessary medical services.

(8)
"Medical assistance" means the federal aid medical care program
provided to categorically needy persons as defined under Title XIX of the
federal social security act.

(9)
"Medical care services" means the limited scope of care financed by
state funds and provided to general assistance recipients, and recipients of
alcohol and drug addiction services provided under chapter 74.50 RCW.

(10)
"Nursing home" means nursing home as defined in RCW 18.51.010.

(11)
"Poverty" means the federal poverty level determined annually by the
United States department of health and human services, or successor agency.

(12)
"Secretary" means the secretary of social and health services.

(13)
"Trial prescription program" means the program established by the
department directing pharmacists to dispense a limited number of doses of an
initial prescription drug as set forth under RCW 74.09.520.

Sec.
2. RCW
74.09.520 and 1998 c 245 s 145 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The term "medical assistance" may include the following care and
services: (a) Inpatient hospital services; (b) outpatient hospital services;
(c) other laboratory and x-ray services; (d) nursing facility services; (e)
physicians' services, which shall include prescribed medication and instruction
on birth control devices; (f) medical care, or any other type of remedial care
as may be established by the secretary; (g) home health care services; (h)
private duty nursing services; (i) dental services; (j) physical and
occupational therapy and related services; (k) prescribed drugs, dentures, and
prosthetic devices; and eyeglasses prescribed by a physician skilled in
diseases of the eye or by an optometrist, whichever the individual may select;
(l) personal care services, as provided in this section; (m) hospice services;
(n) other diagnostic, screening, preventive, and rehabilitative services; and
(o) like services when furnished to a child by a school district in a manner
consistent with the requirements of this chapter. For the purposes of this
section, the department may not cut off any prescription medications, oxygen
supplies, respiratory services, or other life-sustaining medical services or
supplies.

"Medical
assistance," notwithstanding any other provision of law, shall not include
routine foot care, or dental services delivered by any health care provider,
that are not mandated by Title XIX of the social security act unless there is a
specific appropriation for these services.

(2)
The department shall amend the state plan for medical assistance under Title
XIX of the federal social security act to include personal care services, as
defined in 42 C.F.R. 440.170(f), in the categorically needy program.

(3)
The department shall adopt, amend, or rescind such administrative rules as are
necessary to ensure that Title XIX personal care services are provided to
eligible persons in conformance with federal regulations.

(a)
These administrative rules shall include financial eligibility indexed
according to the requirements of the social security act providing for medicaid
eligibility.

(b)
The rules shall require clients be assessed as having a medical condition
requiring assistance with personal care tasks. Plans of care must be reviewed
by a nurse.

(4)
The department shall design and implement a means to assess the level of
functional disability of persons eligible for personal care services under this
section. The personal care services benefit shall be provided to the extent
funding is available according to the assessed level of functional disability.
Any reductions in services made necessary for funding reasons should be
accomplished in a manner that assures that priority for maintaining services is
given to persons with the greatest need as determined by the assessment of
functional disability.

(5)
Effective July 1, 1989, the department shall offer hospice services in
accordance with available funds.

(6)
For Title XIX personal care services administered by aging and adult services
administration of the department, the department shall contract with area
agencies on aging:

(a)
To provide case management services to individuals receiving Title XIX personal
care services in their own home; and

(b)
To reassess and reauthorize Title XIX personal care services or other home and
community services ((as defined in RCW 74.39A.008)) in home or in other
settings for individuals consistent with the intent of this section:

(i)
Who have been initially authorized by the department to receive Title XIX
personal care services or other home and community services ((as defined in
RCW 74.39A.008)); and

(ii)
Who, at the time of reassessment and reauthorization, are receiving such services
in their own home.

(7)
In the event that an area agency on aging is unwilling to enter into or
satisfactorily fulfill a contract to provide these services, the department is
authorized to:

(a)
Obtain the services through competitive bid; and

(b)
Provide the services directly until a qualified contractor can be found.

(8)(a)
The department shall establish a trial prescription program to increase
compliance and reduce costs. The program shall provide for informing
prescribing practitioners and pharmacists of the parameters of the trial
prescription program and direct that prescribing practitioners and pharmacists
collaborate in implementing the program. The program shall include an
exception provision in the event that returning for the balance of the
prescription would impose an undue hardship on a patient.

(b) The department in consultation with the department's drug
utilization review committee shall determine the drugs to be included in the
program.

---
END ---