BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.105.020 and 1993 c 280 s 78 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise, the following
definitions shall apply:

(1)
"Department" means the department of information services;

(2)
"Board" means the information services board;

(3)
"Local governments" includes all municipal and quasi municipal
corporations and political subdivisions, and all agencies of such corporations
and subdivisions authorized to contract separately;

(4)
"Director" means the director of the department;

(5)
"Purchased services" means services provided by a vendor to
accomplish routine, continuing, and necessary functions. This term includes,
but is not limited to, services acquired for equipment maintenance and repair,
operation of a physical plant, security, computer hardware and software
installation and maintenance, data entry, keypunch services, programming
services, and computer time-sharing;

(6)
"Backbone network" means the shared high-density portions of the state's
telecommunications transmission facilities. It includes specially conditioned
high-speed communications carrier lines, multiplexors, switches associated with
such communications lines, and any equipment and software components necessary
for management and control of the backbone network;

(7)
"Telecommunications" means the transmission of information by wire,
radio, optical cable, electromagnetic, or other means;

(8)
"Information processing" means the electronic capture, collection,
storage, manipulation, transmission, retrieval, and presentation of information
in the form of data, text, voice, or image and includes telecommunications and
office automation functions;

(9)
"Information services" means data processing, telecommunications, and
office automation;

(10)
"Equipment" means the machines, devices, and transmission facilities
used in information processing, such as computers, word processors, terminals,
telephones, and cables;

(11)
"Proprietary software" means that software offered for sale or license;

(12)
"Video telecommunications" means the electronic interconnection of
two or more sites for the purpose of transmitting and/or receiving visual and
associated audio information. Video telecommunications shall not include
existing public television broadcast stations as currently designated by the
department of community, trade, and economic development under chapter 43.330
RCW;

(13)
"Personally identifiable information" means information that can be
associated with a particular individual through one or more identifiers or
other information or circumstances.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.105.052 and 1993 c 281 s 53 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department shall:

(1)
Perform all duties and responsibilities the board delegates to the department,
including but not limited to:

(a)
The review of agency acquisition plans and requests; and

(b)
Implementation of state-wide and interagency policies, standards, and guidelines;

(2)
Make available information services to state agencies and local governments on
a full cost-recovery basis. These services may include, but are not limited
to:

(a)
Telecommunications services for voice, data, and video;

(b)
Mainframe computing services;

(c)
Support for departmental and microcomputer evaluation, installation, and use;

(d)
Equipment acquisition assistance, including leasing, brokering, and
establishing master contracts;

(e)
Facilities management services for information technology equipment, equipment
repair, and maintenance service;

(f)
Negotiation with local cable companies and local governments to provide for
connection to local cable services to allow for access to these public and
educational channels in the state;

(g)
Office automation services;

(h)
System development services; and

(i)
Training.

These
services are for discretionary use by customers and customers may elect other
alternatives for service if those alternatives are more cost-effective or
provide better service. Agencies may be required to use the backbone network
portions of the telecommunications services during an initial start-up period
not to exceed three years;

(3)
Establish rates and fees for services provided by the department to assure that
the services component of the department is self-supporting. A billing rate
plan shall be developed for a two-year period to coincide with the budgeting
process. The rate plan shall be subject to review at least annually by the
customer oversight committees. The rate plan shall show the proposed rates by
each cost center and will show the components of the rate structure as mutually
determined by the department and the customer oversight committees. The same
rate structure will apply to all user agencies of each cost center. The rate
plan and any adjustments to rates shall be approved by the office of financial
management. The services component shall not subsidize the operations of the
planning component;

(4)
With the advice of the information services board and agencies, develop a state
strategic information technology plan and performance reports as required under
RCW 43.105.160;

(5)
Develop plans for the department's achievement of state-wide goals and
objectives set forth in the state strategic information technology plan
required under RCW 43.105.160. These plans shall address such services as
telecommunications, central and distributed computing, local area networks,
office automation, and end user computing. The department shall seek the
advice of customer oversight committees and the board in the development of
these plans;

(6)
Under direction of the information services board and in collaboration with the
department of personnel, and other agencies as may be appropriate, develop
training plans and coordinate training programs that are responsive to the
needs of agencies;

(7)
Identify opportunities for the effective use of information services and
coordinate appropriate responses to those opportunities;

(8)
Assess agencies' projects, acquisitions, plans, or overall information
processing performance as requested by the board, agencies, the director of
financial management, or the legislature. Agencies may be required to
reimburse the department for agency-requested reviews;

(9)
Develop planning, budgeting, and expenditure reporting requirements, in
conjunction with the office of financial management, for agencies to follow;

(10)
Assist the office of financial management with budgetary and policy review of
agency plans for information services;

(11)
Provide staff support from the planning component to the board for:

(a)
Meeting preparation, notices, and minutes;

(b)
Promulgation of policies, standards, and guidelines adopted by the board;

(c)
Supervision of studies and reports requested by the board;

(d)
Conducting reviews and assessments as directed by the board;

(12)
Be the lead agency in coordinating video telecommunications services for all
state agencies and develop, pursuant to board policies, standards and common
specifications for leased and purchased telecommunications equipment. The
department shall not evaluate the merits of school curriculum, higher education
course offerings, or other education and training programs proposed for
transmission and/or reception using video telecommunications resources.
Nothing in this section shall abrogate or abridge the legal responsibilities of
licensees of telecommunications facilities as licensed by the federal
communication commission on March 27, 1990; ((and))

(13)
Create and maintain a registry describing the information systems or data
bases maintained by state agencies that contain personally identifiable
information. The registry need not include systems or data bases that contain
personally identifiable information pertaining solely to public officials
acting in their official capacity. The department may require state agencies
to provide information necessary to create and maintain the registry. The
registry shall contain at least the following information for each system or
data base:

(a)
A description of the purpose;

(b)
A description of the type of information included;

(c)
The number of records involved;

(d)
The statutory authorization;

(e)
The methods by which information is collected or updated;

(f)
The retention schedule; and

(g)
A list of any other data bases that are merged or matched with this one; and

(14) Perform all other matters and things necessary to carry
out the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

---
END ---