BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that:

(1)
Washington possesses an abundance of natural wealth in the form of forests,
mountains, wildlife, waters, and other natural resources, all of which help to
provide a unique natural environment and a quality of life unmatched in this
nation;

(2)
As the state's population grows, the demand on these resources is growing too,
resulting in a significant loss of salmon habitat and lands open to public use
and enjoyment;

(3)
Public acquisition and development programs have not kept pace with the state's
expanding population or with the increased demand for recreation and public use
areas;

(4)
Public acquisition programs have not specifically targeted salmon or riparian
habitat;

(5)
If current trends continue, some fisheries species and opportunities for parks
and open space will be lost in the state forever;

(6)
There is a need for the people of the state to reserve certain areas of the
state, in rural as well as urban settings, for the benefit of present and
future generations.

Therefore,
it is the policy of the state to expeditiously acquire the most significant
lands for salmon conservation and for public use and recreation to meet the
needs of present and future generations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout sections 3 through 16 of this act
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Acquisition" means the purchase from a willing seller of an interest
in real property, including, but not limited to, fee simple, conservation
easement, development rights, options to purchase, and rights of first refusal.

(2)
"Critical salmon habitat" means lands and waters important for the
survival, protection, management, or recovery of salmonids, including, but not
limited to, riparian corridors, wetlands, estuaries, refugia, tidelands, and
shorelines.

(3)
"Committee" means the interagency committee for outdoor recreation.

(4)
"Local agencies" means a city, county, town, tribe, special purpose
district, port district, or other political subdivision of the state providing
services to less than the entire state.

(5)
"Public use" includes low-impact public recreation and educational
uses and improvements that do not adversely affect a site's conservation value,
are appropriate to the maintenance of the site in a substantially unmodified
natural setting, and do not detract from long‑term ecological processes.

(6)
"Recreation areas" means lands to be acquired for recreation or
low-impact public use outside of urban growth areas, but within thirty miles of
rapidly urbanizing areas for the development of state or regional parks.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The legacy acquisition account is established in the state treasury. The
committee shall administer the account in accordance with RCW 43.99.110 through
43.99.130 and chapter . . ., Laws of 1999 (this act), and shall hold
it separate and apart from all other money, funds, and accounts of the
committee.

(2)
Moneys deposited in the legacy acquisition account shall be invested as
authorized for other state funds, and any earnings on them shall be credited to
the account.

(3)
All moneys deposited in the legacy acquisition account from bonds authorized by
section 11 of this act, or other sources, shall be allocated under sections 4
through 10 of this act as grants to state or local agencies for acquisition of
critical salmon habitat or recreation areas within the jurisdiction of those
agencies, subject to legislative appropriation. The committee may use or
permit the use of any funds in this account as matching funds where federal,
local, or other funds are made available for projects within the purposes of
chapter . . ., Laws of 1999 (this act).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
The committee may adopt rules establishing policies and priorities for
distributions from the legacy acquisition account created in section 3 of this
act.

(2)
Moneys from bonds sold under section 11 of this act may be used for salmon
habitat and recreation land acquisition, including costs incidental to
acquisition, including, but not limited to, title search, surveying expenses,
fencing, and signing. Moneys may not be used for the operation or maintenance
of land acquired.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
In determining funding priorities with respect to the legacy acquisition
account created in section 3 of this act, the committee shall give highest
priority to the acquisition of critical salmon habitat and recreation areas
that best:

(a)
Protect critical salmon habitat that is currently in good condition;

(b)
Protect critical salmon habitat most at risk of development or conversion to a
use incompatible with recovering salmon populations; and

(c)
Provide land suitable for low-impact recreation or public use for state or
regional parks in areas experiencing rapid population growth.

(2)
In addition, when determining funding priorities with respect to the legacy
acquisition account, the committee shall consider, at a minimum:

(a)
Watersheds with federally listed salmonids;

(b)
Watersheds in the salmon and steelhead stock inventory report; and

(c)
Long-term viability of the site.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
Moneys made available under this chapter for land acquisition shall not be used
to acquire land through condemnation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
Before October 1st of each year, the committee shall recommend to the governor
a prioritized list of all projects to be granted funds under sections 4 through
10 of this act. The governor may remove projects from the list and shall
submit this amended list in the capital budget request to the legislature. The
list shall include, but not be limited to, a description of each project and
any particular match requirement. The legislature shall appropriate funds
requested by the governor in the budget from the legacy acquisition account to
the interagency committee for outdoor recreation for allocation and
disbursement.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. The
committee shall not sign contracts or otherwise financially obligate funds from
the legacy acquisition account created in section 3 of this act before the
legislature has appropriated funds for a specific list of projects. The
legislature may remove projects from the list recommended by the governor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. On or
before November 1st of each odd‑numbered year, the committee shall submit
to the governor and the standing committees of the legislature dealing with
fiscal affairs, fish and wildlife, and natural resources a report detailing the
acquisitions and development projects granted funds under chapter
. . ., Laws of 1999 (this act) during the immediately preceding
biennium.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10.
Grants, gifts, other financial assistance, proceeds received from public bodies
as administrative cost contributions, and moneys made available to the state of
Washington by the federal government for conservation purposes, may be
deposited into the legacy acquisition account created in section 3 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. In
order to provide funds necessary for the acquisition of critical salmon habitat
and recreation areas, there shall be issued and sold upon the request of the
committee a maximum of one billion dollars of general obligation bonds of the
state of Washington. The acquisition of critical salmon habitat and recreation
areas in accordance with chapter . . ., Laws of 1999 (this act) shall
be a "single work or object" for the purposes of Article VIII,
section 3 of the state Constitution.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. (1)
Upon the request of the committee, the state finance committee shall supervise
and provide for the issuance, sale, and retirement of the bonds authorized by
section 11 of this act in accordance with chapter 39.42 RCW. These bonds shall
be sold in such manner, at such time or times, in such amounts, and at such
price as the state finance committee shall determine. These bonds shall be
paid and discharged within thirty years of the date of issuance. No such bonds
may be offered for sale without prior legislative appropriation of the net
proceeds of the sale of the bonds.

(2)
The state finance committee shall consider the issuance of short-term
obligations in lieu of long-term obligations for the purposes of more favorable
interest rates, lower total interest costs, and increased marketability, and
for the purpose of retiring the bonds during the life of the project for which
they were issued.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. The
proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by section 11 of this act shall be
deposited in the legacy acquisition account created in section 3 of this act.
The proceeds shall be available only for the purposes provided for in chapter
. . ., Laws of 1999 (this act), for the payment of bond anticipation
notes, if any, and for the payment of bond issuance costs, including the costs
of underwriting.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. Bonds
issued under the authority of section 11 of this act shall state that they are
a general obligation of the state of Washington, shall pledge the full faith
and credit of the state to the payment of the principal thereof and the
interest thereon, and shall contain an unconditional promise to pay such
principal and interest as it becomes due.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. Both
principal and interest on the bonds issued under the authority of section 11 of
this act shall be payable from a special account to be created by the state
finance committee. The state finance committee shall, on or before June 30th
of each year, certify to the state treasurer the amount required for principal
and interest on the bonds in accordance with the bond proceedings. The state
treasurer shall withdraw revenues from the general fund and deposit in the
special account created by the state finance committee such amounts and at such
times as are required by the bond proceedings.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. Bonds
issued under authority of section 11 of this act shall not be considered an
indebtedness for the purposes of RCW 39.42.060 or for calculating any other
statutory debt limit.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17. A
new section is added to chapter 43.135 RCW to read as follows:

RCW
43.135.035(4) does not apply to section 15 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19. The
secretary of state shall submit this act to the people for their adoption and
ratification, or rejection, at the next general election to be held in this
state, in accordance with Article VIII, section 3 of the state Constitution and
the laws adopted to facilitate its operation.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 20.
Sections 2 through 16 of this act are each added to chapter 43.98A RCW.

---
END ---