BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.108.010 and 1997 c 297 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

In
this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the following meanings
shall apply:

(1)
"Board" means the Washington state board of massage.

(2)
"Certified reflexologist" means a person who provides reflexology
services in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

(3)
"Massage" and "massage therapy" mean a health care service
involving the external manipulation or pressure of soft tissue for therapeutic
purposes. Massage therapy includes techniques such as tapping, compressions,
friction, Swedish gymnastics or movements, gliding, kneading, shaking, and
facial or connective tissue stretching, with or without the aids of superficial
heat, cold, water, lubricants, or salts. Massage therapy does not include
diagnosis or attempts to adjust or manipulate any articulations of the body or
spine or mobilization of these articulations by the use of a thrusting force,
nor does it include genital manipulation.

(((3)))
(4) "Massage business" means the operation of a business where
massages are given.

(5)
"Massage practitioner" means an individual licensed under this
chapter.

(((4)))
(6) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the
secretary's designee.

(((5)
Massage business means the operation of a business where massages are given.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 18.108 RCW to read as follows:

Certified
reflexologists shall meet educational requirements as set by the board subject
to the approval of the secretary by rule. The educational requirements shall
meet a minimum standard of educational hours of coursework specific to the
practice of reflexology as determined by rule.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 18.108 RCW to read as follows:

No
person may practice reflexology without receiving a certificate to practice
reflexology from the board.

Sec.
4. RCW
18.108.030 and 1995 c 198 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No person may practice or represent himself or herself as a massage
practitioner without first applying for and receiving from the department a
license to practice.

(2) A person represents himself or herself as a massage
practitioner when the person adopts or uses any title or any description of
services that incorporates one or more of the following terms or designations:
Massage, massage practitioner, massage therapist, massage therapy, therapeutic
massage, massage technician, massage technology, massagist, masseur, masseuse,
myotherapist or myotherapy, touch therapist, reflexologist, unless certified
under this chapter, acupressurist, body therapy or body therapist, or any
derivation of those terms that implies a massage technique or method.

---
END ---