BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
47.22.020 and 1970 ex.s. c 51 s 176 are each amended to read as follows:

There is established the Lewis and Clark Highway, which
shall be composed of the following existing routes: State route 193 from
the junction of state route 12 at Clarkston to Wawawai River Road; state
route ((number)) 12 from Clarkston to Waitsburg; state route ((number))
124 from Waitsburg to Pasco (west); state route ((number)) 12 from Pasco
to Waitsburg via Wallula and Walla Walla (east); state routes 395 and 82
from state route 12, through the Tri-Cities region, to the junction at state
route 14; state route ((number)) 14 from ((Pasco)) the
junction of state routes 395 and 82 to Maryhill; state routes ((numbers))
14((,)) and 5 ((and 4)) from Maryhill to ((Naselle
junction)) state route 432 through Longview to state route 4; state
route 4 from Longview to the junction with state route 101 near the vicinity of
Johnson's landing; state route ((number)) 401 from Naselle junction
to Megler; ((and)) state route ((number)) 101 from Megler ((to))
through Ilwaco and Seaview to the junction with state route 4; state
route spur/alternate state route 101; state route loop 100; state route spur
100; and state route 103.

---
END ---