BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that growth in the state's largest urban counties continues
to place significant strain on the transportation system. The expansion of
traffic resulting from population and growth has increased commuting travel
time, diminished reliable transit service, and created delays in freight
shipments. Traffic congestion does not recognize community boundaries. In
addition, the multiple jurisdictions that comprise urban transportation
networks often have inconsistent investment strategies that reduce the
effectiveness of a regional transportation system. A consistent regional
corridor systems approach is necessary to ensure reliable travel across
jurisdictions.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) A
multiagency corridor committee is established to develop strategies to identify
and achieve regional transportation corridor networks. The committee shall
develop regional corridor network criteria and make recommendations to the
legislature on (a) achieving a consistent corridor planning approach that can
be implemented across jurisdictions; (b) corridor investment strategies that
address the rehabilitation of existing corridors and provide for congestion
relief; and (c) changes to state transportation policy and funding programs
needed to implement the corridor planning, investment, and operations
approach. The regional corridor network criteria must support freight
mobility, transit, and interjurisdictional trips.

(2)
The committee shall consider at least the following when developing regional
corridor network criteria: (a) The financial benefits and costs of a regional
network, including improved travel time and mobility for the public; (b) the
implementation of land use patterns that are consistent with the Growth
Management Act and support regional transit service, pedestrian environments,
and increased regional mobility options; and (c) legislative and local
government actions that can achieve consistent investments in regional
transportation corridors. These actions may include, but are not limited to, new
and existing financing options, interlocal agreements, corridor operations and
maintenance, and transportation system ownership.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
transportation commission, in consultation with the house and senate transportation
committees, shall appoint members to the multiagency corridor committee. The
committee will consist of up to fifteen members, including state legislators,
the governor's office, and representatives from cities within urban counties,
urban counties, metropolitan planning organizations, transit systems within
urban counties, the department of community, trade, and economic development,
the transportation improvement board, the transportation commission, and the
department of transportation. The secretary of transportation, or a designee,
shall serve as the nonvoting chair of the committee. The department of
transportation shall provide staff to the committee. The transportation
commission shall report the committee's findings to the house and senate
transportation committees by December 1, 1999.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---