BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The department of revenue shall form an advisory committee consisting of
representatives of local government and taxpayers to assist in the study of the
effects of allowing persons otherwise doing business in this state to pay sales
and use taxes under chapters 82.08, 82.12, and 82.14 RCW directly to the
department rather than to the vendor. The department, in consultation with the
advisory committee, shall examine whether a direct payment program will:

(a)
Reduce the administrative burden of determining taxability and of collecting,
verifying, calculating, and remitting sales and use taxes;

(b)
Provide increased compliance with sales and use tax laws;

(c)
Provide for more accurate compliance in circumstances where determination of
taxability of an item is difficult or impractical at the time of purchase;

(d)
Provide for more accurate calculation of taxes where new or electronic business
processes such as electronic data interchange, evaluated receipts settlement,
geographic information systems, or computer-assisted audits are utilized; and

(e)
Provide for more accurate determination and calculation of taxes for taxpayers
with significant automation or centralization of purchasing or accounting
processes that must comply with many different local sales and use tax rates.

(2)
The department may use the experience of other states that use direct payment
programs in making its determinations under subsection (1) of this section.

(3)
The department shall report its findings to the legislature by December 31,
1999. The report may include recommendations for potential legislation. If
legislation is recommended, the proposals shall include criteria for granting
and denying applications for permits. In addition, any proposal shall be
designed to assure that a direct pay program does not affect local government
revenues, burden vendors, or complicate department of revenue tax
administration.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---