BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW to read as follows:

Every
residential lease or rental agreement shall include the following notice:

"It is the right and responsibility of the tenant
to contact the appropriate local law enforcement agency to obtain a current
list of sex offenders who are required to register with local law enforcement
under RCW 9A.44.130 and who reside in the jurisdiction."

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 64.06 RCW to read as follows:

Every
disclosure statement in connection with the purchase and sale of residential
real estate shall include the following notice to the purchaser:

"It is the right and
responsibility of the buyer to contact the appropriate local law enforcement
agency to obtain a current list of sex offenders who are required to register
with local law enforcement under RCW 9A.44.130 and who reside in the
jurisdiction."

---
END ---