BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that:

(a)
Society is heavily reliant upon computers, technology, and the rapid electronic
transfer and exchange of accurate information and data.

(b)
Society relies heavily upon computer technology for most aspects of daily
living and business, including, but not limited to, financial transactions.

(c)
The rapid growth of technology has often outpaced the capabilities of the
electronic equipment, software, and hardware that our society utilizes for the
exchange and transfer of data and other information.

(d)
Recently developed computer technology is the operational basis for much of our
current hardware and software, and this technology may not recognize the year
2000 date change.

(e)
If computer technology fails to recognize the year 2000 date change, many
computer-based systems may fail or cause incorrect data or other information to
be processed. This potentially world-wide deficiency in computers is often
referred to as the "Y2K bug" and may cause significant problems in
the transfer and exchange of data and information in the year 2000 and beyond.

(2)
The legislature determines that in order to protect the citizens of the state
of Washington, it is appropriate to limit their liability against adverse
financial ramifications resulting from year 2000 failures associated with
electronic computing devices.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW to read as follows:

The
definitions in this section apply throughout sections 3 through 7 of this act
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Electronic computing device" means any computer hardware or
software, computer chip, embedded chip, process control equipment, or other
information system that:

(a)
Is used to capture, store, manipulate, or process data; or

(b)
Controls, monitors, or assists in the operation of physical apparatus that is
not primarily used as a computer but that relies on automation or digital
technology to function, including, but not limited to, vehicles, vessels,
buildings, structures, facilities, elevators, medical equipment, traffic
signals, and factory machinery.

(2)
"Person" means a natural person.

(3)
"Year 2000 failure" means:

(a)
With respect to an electronic computing device, a failure, including an
electrical or telecommunications failure, that prevents such electronic
computing device from accurately interpreting, producing, computing,
generating, accounting for, processing, calculating, comparing, or sequencing
date or time data from, into, or between the years 1999 and 2000, or with
regard to leap year calculations; or

(b)
An inability of a business to perform an intended or requested function because
of the system failure of another party, including, but not limited to, the
failure of a governmental body to provide data, transportation delays, energy
failures, or communication failures.

(4)
This section expires December 31, 2006.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A person has an affirmative defense to any claim or action, based on a
contract, brought against the person if he or she establishes that:

(a)
The default, failure to pay, breach, omission, or other violation that is the
basis of the claim against him or her was caused, in whole or in part, by a
year 2000 failure associated with an electronic computing device;

(b)
The year 2000 failure being asserted was not proximately caused by a failure of
the person to update an electronic computing device, that is under his or her
dominion or control, to be year 2000 compliant; and

(c)
If it were not for the year 2000 failure, the person would have been able to
satisfy the contractual obligation that was the basis of the claim.

(2)
If an affirmative defense as set forth in subsection (1) of this section is
established, then the person or entity making the claim may not reassert the
claim against which the affirmative defense was asserted for a period of thirty
days from the date on which the court dismissed the case as a result of the
affirmative defense. Any statute of limitations applicable to the claim shall
be tolled for forty-five days upon the dismissal of the case under this section.

(3)
The dismissal of an action as the result of the affirmative defense under this
section does not impair, extinguish, discharge, satisfy, or otherwise affect
the underlying obligation that is the basis of the claim against which the
affirmative defense was asserted. However, the inability of a party to bring
the claim based upon the obligation is delayed as set forth in subsection (2)
of this section.

(4)
A person who has established an affirmative defense as set forth in subsection
(1) of this section may dispute directly with a credit reporting agency
operating in this state any item of information in the person's consumer file
relating to the subject of the affirmative defense. The dispute shall be filed
in accordance with RCW 19.182.090(6). If requested by the person under this
subsection (4), the credit reporting agency shall furnish a statement, made in
accordance with RCW 19.182.090(7), to the person and include the statement in
the person's consumer file. The credit reporting agency may not charge the
person a fee for the inclusion of this statement in the person's consumer file.

(5)
This section does not affect those transactions upon which a default has
occurred before any disruption of financial or data transfer operations
attributable to the year 2000 date change.

(6)
This section does not apply to or affect any contract that specifically
provides for the year 2000 failure.

(7)
This section does not apply to causes of action that arise on or after December
31, 2003.

(8)
This section expires December 31, 2006.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 48.18 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Any person who has an insurance policy with an insurer doing business in this
state and subject to regulation by the commissioner and who has his or her
insurance policy canceled, not renewed, or coverage modified in any way for
failure to pay a premium on such policy shall have the policy reinstated with
full coverage back to the date the policy was canceled, with no penalties or
interest, if the person establishes that:

(a)
The failure to pay was caused, in whole or in part, by a year 2000 failure
associated with an electronic computing device;

(b)
The year 2000 failure being asserted was not proximately caused by a failure of
the person to update an electronic computing device, that is under his or her
dominion or control, to be year 2000 compliant; and

(c)
If it were not for the year 2000 failure, the person would have been able to
satisfy the payment of premiums in a timely manner.

Payment
of such premiums shall be made within thirty days after the year 2000 failure
has been corrected.

(2)
The definitions in section 2 of this act apply to this section unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.

(3)
This section does not affect those transactions upon which a default has
occurred before any disruption of financial or data transfer operations
attributable to the year 2000 date change.

(4)
This section does not apply to causes of action that arise on or after December
31, 2003.

(5)
This section expires December 31, 2006.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 51.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
No interest or penalties shall be imposed on any employer because of the
failure to pay any premium required by this title to be made to the state
treasury for the accident fund, the medical aid fund, the supplemental pension
fund, or any other fund created under this title if the employer establishes
that:

(a)
The failure to pay was caused, in whole or in part, by a year 2000 failure
associated with an electronic computing device;

(b)
The year 2000 failure being asserted was not proximately caused by a failure of
the person to update an electronic computing device, that is under his or her
dominion or control, to be year 2000 compliant; and

(c)
If it were not for the year 2000 failure, the employer would have been able to
satisfy the payment of premiums in a timely manner.

Payment
of such premiums shall be made within thirty days after the year 2000 failure
has been corrected.

(2)
The definitions in section 2 of this act apply to this section unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.

(3)
This section does not affect those transactions upon which a default has
occurred before any disruption of financial or data transfer operations
attributable to the year 2000 date change.

(4)
This section does not apply to causes of action that arise on or after December
31, 2003.

(5)
This section expires December 31, 2006.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter, no interest or penalties
may be imposed on any person because of the failure to pay excise taxes on or
before the date due for payment if the person establishes that:

(a)
The failure to pay was caused, in whole or in part, by a year 2000 failure
associated with an electronic computing device;

(b)
The year 2000 failure being asserted was not proximately caused by a failure of
the person to update an electronic computing device, that is under his or her
dominion or control, to be year 2000 compliant; and

(c)
If it were not for the year 2000 failure, the person would have been able to
satisfy the payment of taxes in a timely manner.

Payment
of such taxes shall be made within thirty days after the year 2000 failure has
been corrected.

(2)
The definitions in section 2 of this act apply to this section unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.

(3)
This section does not affect those transactions upon which a default has
occurred before any disruption of financial or data transfer operations
attributable to the year 2000 date change.

(4)
This section does not apply to causes of action that arise on or after December
31, 2003.

(5)
This section expires December 31, 2006.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 84.56 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter, no interest or penalties
may be imposed on any person because of the failure to pay real or personal
property taxes on or before the date due for payment if the person establishes
that:

(a)
The failure to pay was caused, in whole or in part, by a year 2000 failure
associated with an electronic computing device;

(b)
The year 2000 failure being asserted was not proximately caused by a failure of
the person to update an electronic computing device, that is under his or her
dominion or control, to be year 2000 compliant; and

(c)
If it were not for the year 2000 failure, the person would have been able to
satisfy the payment of taxes in a timely manner.

Payment
of such taxes shall be made within thirty days after the year 2000 failure has
been corrected.

(2)
The definitions in section 2 of this act apply to this section unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.

(3)
This section does not affect those transactions upon which a default has
occurred before any disruption of financial or data transfer operations
attributable to the year 2000 date change.

(4)
This section does not apply to causes of action that arise on or after December
31, 2003.

(5)
This section expires December 31, 2006.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. This
act shall be known and cited as the year 2000 citizens' protection act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---