BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.36.383 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 8 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389, except where the context clearly
indicates a different meaning:

(1)
The term "residence" shall mean a single family dwelling unit whether
such unit be separate or part of a multiunit dwelling, including the land on
which such dwelling stands not to exceed one acre. The term shall also include
a share ownership in a cooperative housing association, corporation, or
partnership if the person claiming exemption can establish that his or her
share represents the specific unit or portion of such structure in which he or
she resides. The term shall also include a single family dwelling situated
upon lands the fee of which is vested in the United States or any
instrumentality thereof including an Indian tribe or in the state of
Washington, and notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 84.04.080 and 84.04.090,
such a residence shall be deemed real property.

(2)
The term "real property" shall also include a mobile home which has
substantially lost its identity as a mobile unit by virtue of its being fixed
in location upon land owned or leased by the owner of the mobile home and
placed on a foundation (posts or blocks) with fixed pipe, connections with
sewer, water, or other utilities: PROVIDED, That a mobile home located on land
leased by the owner of the mobile home shall be subject, for tax billing,
payment, and collection purposes, only to the personal property provisions of
chapter 84.56 RCW and RCW 84.60.040.

(3)
"Department" shall mean the state department of revenue.

(4)
"Combined disposable income" means the disposable income of the
person claiming the exemption, plus the disposable income of his or her spouse,
and the disposable income of each cotenant occupying the residence for the
assessment year, less amounts paid by the person claiming the exemption or his
or her spouse during the assessment year for:

(a)
Drugs supplied by prescription of a medical practitioner authorized by the laws
of this state or another jurisdiction to issue prescriptions; ((and))

(b)
The treatment or care of either person received in the home or in a nursing
home; and

(c)
Medical treatment or care incurred by either person.

(5)
"Disposable income" means adjusted gross income as defined in the
federal internal revenue code, as amended prior to January 1, 1989, or such
subsequent date as the director may provide by rule consistent with the purpose
of this section, plus all of the following items to the extent they are not
included in or have been deducted from adjusted gross income:

(a)
Capital gains, other than nonrecognized gain on the sale of a principal
residence under section 1034 of the federal internal revenue code, or gain
excluded from income under section 121 of the federal internal revenue code to
the extent it is reinvested in a new principal residence;

(b)
Amounts deducted for loss;

(c)
Amounts deducted for depreciation;

(d)
Pension and annuity receipts;

(e)
Military pay and benefits other than attendant-care and medical-aid payments;

(f)
Veterans benefits other than attendant-care and medical-aid payments;

(g)
Federal social security act and railroad retirement benefits;

(h)
Dividend receipts; and

(i)
Interest received on state and municipal bonds.

(6)
"Cotenant" means a person who resides with the person claiming the
exemption and who has an ownership interest in the residence.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act applies to taxes levied for collection in 2000 and thereafter.

---
END ---