BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.14.370 and 1998 c 55 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislative authority of a distressed county may impose a sales and use tax
in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is in addition to other
taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons who are
taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of
any taxable event within the county. The rate of tax shall not exceed 0.04
percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of the article
used in the case of a use tax.

(2)
The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be deducted from the
amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department
of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department of revenue shall
perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the
county.

(3)
Moneys collected under this section shall only be used for the purpose of
financing public facilities in rural counties.

(4)
No tax may be collected under this section before July 1, 1998. No tax may be
collected under this section by a county more than twenty-five years after the
date that a tax is first imposed under this section.

(5)
For purposes of this section, "distressed county" means:

(a)
A county in which the average level of unemployment for the three years
before the year in which a tax is first imposed under this section exceeds the
average state unemployment for those years by twenty percent; or

(b) A county where federal employment is more than three
thousand five hundred persons fewer than in the previous calendar year as
verified by the Washington state employment security department. A county
qualifying under this subsection may levy the sales and use tax for a period of
five years.

---
END ---