BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
47.46.010 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds and declares:

It
is essential for the economic, social, and environmental well-being of the
state and the maintenance of a high quality of life that the people of the
state have an efficient transportation system.

The
ability of the state to provide an efficient transportation system will be
enhanced by a public-private sector program providing for private entities to
undertake all or a portion of the study, planning, design, development,
financing, acquisition, installation, construction or improvement, operation,
and maintenance of transportation systems and facility projects.

A
public-private initiatives program will provide benefits to both the public and
private sectors. Public-private initiatives provide a sound economic
investment opportunity for the private sector. Such initiatives will provide
the state with increased access to property development and project opportunities,
financial and development expertise, and will supplement state transportation
revenues, allowing the state to use its limited resources for other needed
projects.

The
public-private initiatives program, to the fullest extent possible, should encourage
and promote business and employment opportunities for Washington state
citizens.

The
public-private initiatives program shall be implemented in cooperation,
consultation, and with the support of the affected communities and local
jurisdictions.

The
secretary of transportation should be permitted and encouraged to test the
feasibility of building privately funded transportation systems and facilities
or segments thereof through the use of innovative agreements with the private
sector. The secretary of transportation should be vested with the authority to
solicit, evaluate, negotiate, and administer public-private agreements with the
private sector relating to the planning, construction, upgrading, or
reconstruction of transportation systems and facilities.

Agreements
negotiated under a public-private initiatives program will not bestow on
private entities an immediate right to construct and operate the proposed
transportation facilities. Rather, agreements will grant to private entities
the opportunity to design the proposed facilities, demonstrate public support
for proposed facilities, and complete the planning processes required in order
to obtain a future decision by the department of transportation and other state
and local lead agencies on whether the facilities should be permitted and
built.

Agreements
negotiated under the public-private initiatives program should establish the
conditions under which the private developer may secure the approval necessary
to develop and operate the proposed transportation facilities; create a
framework to attract the private capital necessary to finance their
development; ensure that the transportation facilities will be designed,
constructed, and operated in accordance with applicable local, regional, state,
and federal laws and the applicable standards and policies of the department of
transportation; and require a demonstration that the proposed transportation
facility has the support of the affected communities and local jurisdictions.

Agreements
negotiated under a public-private initiatives program must not limit or
encumber, in any way, the public's current use of existing state transportation
systems and facilities by such means as, but not limited to, imposing or
increasing tolls or user fees on existing bridges, highways, or facilities; by
including existing bridges, highways, or facilities as any part of a
public-private initiatives project; or leasing to a private entity all or any
portion of an existing bridge, highway, or facility as part of a public-private
initiatives project.

The
legislature finds that the Puget Sound congestion pricing project, selected
under this chapter, raises major transportation policy, economic, and equity
concerns. These relate to the integrity of the state's high-occupancy vehicle
program; the cost-effective movement of freight and goods; the diversion of
traffic to local streets and arterials; and possible financial hardship to
commuters. The legislature further finds that these potential economic and
social impacts require comprehensive legislative review prior to advancement of
the project and directs that the secretary not proceed with the implementation
of the project without prior approval of the legislature.

The department of transportation should be encouraged to take
advantage of new opportunities provided by federal legislation under section
1012 of the Intermodal Surface Transportation Efficiency Act of 1991 (ISTEA).
That section establishes a new program authorizing federal participation in
construction or improvement or improvement of publicly or privately owned toll
roads, bridges, and tunnels, and allows states to leverage available federal
funds as a means for attracting private sector capital.

---
END ---