BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 74.15 RCW to read as follows:

The department of health shall employ sufficient licensing
inspectors to meet its statutory and regulatory requirements regarding
inspections of child day-care centers and family day-care providers under RCW
74.15.060 by September 1, 1999.

---
END ---