BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the retrospective rating plan provided for in RCW
51.16.035 has proven to be highly effective both in terms of improved workplace
safety and injured worker outcomes. As a result, the number of industrial
insurance claims of many employers participating in the retrospective rating
plan have been reduced through sound risk management strategies and enhanced
cooperation with department claims management activities.

The
legislature further finds that entrance criteria for the retrospective rating
plan under RCW 51.16.035 should be clear and understandable to both the
department and potential retrospective rating plan participants.

The
legislature therefore declares that a new retrospective rating plan is needed
in order to protect and preserve the integrity and welfare of the retrospective
rating system.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The department shall offer a retrospective rating plan to insure the workers'
compensation obligations of employers and groups of employers. The plan is to
be made available to any employer or group of employers who:

(a)
Voluntarily elects to participate in the plan; and

(b)
Meets the requirements of this chapter and rules adopted by the department
under subsection (2) of this section.

(2)
The retrospective rating plan shall be consistent with recognized insurance
principles and shall be administered according to rules adopted by the
department. Rules adopted under this section shall encourage broad
participation by qualified employers and sponsors of retrospective rating
groups.

(3)
Each retrospective rating group approved by the department under this chapter
shall select a coverage period and may be renewed at the end of each coverage
period. For the purposes of this section, "coverage period" means a
twelve-month period provided by the department by rule.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. Prior
to allowing initial entrance into the state's retrospective rating plan, the
department shall review each proposed retrospective rating group to ensure that
the following criteria are met:

(1)
The entity sponsoring the retrospective rating group must have been in
existence for at least four years;

(2)
The entity sponsoring the retrospective rating group must exist primarily for a
purpose other than that of obtaining or offering insurance coverage or
insurance related services;

(3)
The entity sponsoring the retrospective rating group must have a written
workplace safety and accident prevention plan in place for the proposed
retrospective rating group and must propose methods by which the retrospective
rating group will cooperate with department claims management activities;

(4)
All employers in the retrospective rating group must be members of the
sponsoring entity;

(5)
All employers in the retrospective rating group must have an industrial
insurance account in good standing with the department;

(6)
Fifty percent of the original employers in the retrospective rating group must
have been members of the sponsoring entity for one year prior to the group's
entrance into the retrospective rating plan;

(7)
The retrospective rating group must be composed of employers who are
substantially similar considering the services or activities performed by the
employees of those employers;

(8)
The initial premium level for the retrospective rating group must be at least
one million five hundred thousand dollars and shall be based on the standard
premium of the proposed group members' most current previous coverage period;
and

(9)
The formation and operation of the retrospective rating group must seek to
substantially improve workplace safety and accident prevention for the
employers in the group.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
Entities which sponsored retrospective rating groups prior to the effective
date of this act, may not sponsor additional retrospective rating groups in a
new business or industry category until the coverage period beginning January
1, 2003.

(2)
For retrospective rating groups approved by the department on or after the
effective date of this act, the sponsoring entity may not propose another
retrospective rating group in a new business or industry category until the
minimum mandatory adjustment periods required by the department for the first
two coverage periods of the last formed retrospective rating group are
completed.

(3)
Subsections (1) and (2) of this section do not prohibit a sponsoring entity
from proposing to:

(a)
Divide an existing retrospective rating group into two or more groups provided
that the proposed new groups fall within the same business or industry category
as the group that is proposed to be divided; or

(b)
Merge existing retrospective rating groups into one business or industry
category provided that the proposed merged groups fall within the same business
or industry category as the groups that are proposed to be merged.

(4)
Under no circumstances may a sponsoring entity propose retrospective rating
groups in multiple business or industry categories in the same application to
the department.

(5)
An insurer, insurance broker, agent, or solicitor may not:

(a)
Participate in the formation of a retrospective rating group; or

(b)
Sponsor a retrospective rating group.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
In order to ensure that all retrospective rating groups are made up of
employers who are substantially similar, considering the services or activities
performed by the employees of those employers, the sponsoring entity of a
retrospective rating group shall select a single, broad industry or business
category for each retrospective rating group. Once an industry or business
category is selected, the department shall allow all risk classifications
reasonably related to that business or industry category into that
retrospective rating group.

(2)
The following broad industry and business categories shall be used by the
sponsoring entity and the department in establishing retrospective rating
groups:

(a)
Agriculture and related services;

(b)
Automotive, truck and boat manufacturing, sales, repair, and related services;

(c)
Construction and related services;

(d)
Distillation, chemical production, food, and related services;

(e)
Facilities or property management, maintenance, and related services;

(f)
Government, utilities, schools, health care, and related services;

(g)
Health care, pharmaceutical, laboratories, and related services;

(h)
Logging, wood products manufacturing, and related services;

(i)
Manufacturing, processing, mining, quarrying, and related services;

(j)
Retail stores, wholesale stores, professional services, and related services;

(k)
Temporary help and related services; and

(l)
Transportation, recycling, warehousing, facility maintenance, and related
services.

(3)
The industry and business categories in subsection (2) of this section are not
exclusive. In response to significant changes in marketplace demographics or
the discovery of unique business or industry categories, the department may, by
rule, include additional broad industry or business category selections. The
department may, by rule, remove an industry covered within an industry or
business category in the event that the business or industry is no longer found
within this state.

(4)
Given the broad nature of the industry and business categories in subsection
(2) of this section, the risk classification or classifications assigned to an
individual employer may appropriately fall into multiple business or industry
categories.

(5)
In order to simplify administration and keep the administrative costs
associated with devising a different classification system for a retrospective
rating plan to a minimum, the state's retrospective rating plan shall follow
the same classification procedure established by the department to assign
workers' compensation insurance classifications to an employer.

(6)
Employers who have been a member of an existing, approved retrospective rating
group prior to the effective date of this act, may continue in that group even
if they are not substantially similar to the industry or business category
selected pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. However, new employers
proposed for addition to a retrospective rating group on or after the effective
date of this act must fall within the selected industry or business category.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. (1)
Any retrospective rating group required to pay additional net premium
assessments in two consecutive coverage periods shall be immediately placed on
probationary status. Once a group is placed on probationary status, the
department shall review the group's workplace safety and accident prevention
plan and its methods for cooperation with department claims management
activities. Following the review, the department shall make recommendations
for corrective steps that may be taken to improve the group's performance.

(2)
If the same retrospective rating group is required to pay an additional net
premium assessment in the third consecutive coverage period, that group shall
be denied future enrollment in the state's retrospective rating plan. In
addition, the sponsoring entity of the failed group may not sponsor another
group in the same business or industry category for five coverage periods from the
ending date of the failed group's last coverage period.

(3)
This section applies prospectively only and not retroactively. It applies only
to net assessments received by a retrospective rating group for plan years
beginning after the effective date of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. All
retrospective rating groups approved by the department prior to the effective
date of this act, under RCW 51.16.035 as it existed prior to the effective date
of this act, remain approved and, with the exception of section 3 of this act,
are subject to the provisions of this chapter.

Sec.
8. RCW
51.16.035 and 1989 c 49 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall classify all occupations or industries in accordance with
their degree of hazard and fix therefor basic rates of premium which shall be
the lowest necessary to maintain actuarial solvency of the accident and medical
aid funds in accordance with recognized insurance principles. The department
shall formulate and adopt rules and regulations governing the method of premium
calculation and collection and providing for a rating system consistent with
recognized principles of workers' compensation insurance which shall be
designed to stimulate and encourage accident prevention and to facilitate
collection. The department may annually, or at such other times as it deems
necessary to maintain solvency of the funds, readjust rates in accordance with
the rating system to become effective on such dates as the department may
designate.

((The
department may insure the workers' compensation obligations of employers as a
group if the following conditions are met:

(1)
All the employers in the group are members of an organization that has been in
existence for at least two years;

(2)
The organization was formed for a purpose other than that of obtaining workers'
compensation coverage;

(3)
The occupations or industries of the employers in the organization are
substantially similar, taking into consideration the nature of the services
being performed by workers of such employers; and

(4)
The formation and operation of the group program in the organization will
substantially improve accident prevention and claim management for the
employers in the group.))

(2)
In providing ((an employer group)) a retrospective rating plan
under ((this)) section 2 of this act, the department may consider
((an employer)) each individual retrospective rating group as a
single employing entity for purposes of dividends or premium discounts.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9.
Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 51 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---