BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.46.0205 and 1987 c 4 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

"Bingo," as used in this chapter, means a game conducted
only in the county within which one of the organizations is
principally located in which prizes are awarded on the basis of designated
numbers or symbols on a card conforming to numbers or symbols selected at
random and in which no cards are sold except at the time and place of said
game, when said game is conducted by ((a)) one bona fide
charitable or nonprofit organization, or more, which does not conduct or
allow its premises to be used for conducting bingo on more than three occasions
per week and which does not conduct bingo in any location which is used for
conducting bingo on more than three occasions per week, or if an agricultural
fair authorized under chapters 15.76 and 36.37 RCW, which does not conduct
bingo on more than twelve consecutive days in any calendar year, and except in
the case of any agricultural fair as authorized under chapters 15.76 and 36.37
RCW, no person other than a bona fide member or an employee of said
organization or organizations takes any part in the management or
operation of said game, and no person who takes any part in the management or
operation of said game takes any part in the management or operation of any
game conducted by any other organization or any other branch of the same
organization, except when two approved organizations share one game location,
unless approved by the commission, and no part of the proceeds thereof inure to
the benefit of any person other than the organization conducting said game.
For the purposes of this section, the organization shall be deemed to be
principally located in the county within which it has its primary business
office. If the organization has no business office, the organization shall be
deemed to be located in the county of principal residence of its chief
executive officer: PROVIDED, That any organization which is conducting any
licensed and established bingo game in any locale as of January 1, 1981, shall
be exempt from the requirement that such game be conducted in the county in
which the organization is principally located.

---
END ---