BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds the doctrines of adverse possession and prescriptive use
rights have the effect of rewarding wrongdoers with title to land or use of
land they have not paid for and for which they have not paid taxes. The
legislature intends to modernize these doctrines to provide increased clarity
and certainty in the establishment of real property interests. The legislature
also intends to prevent unjust depravation of title or use of land and to encourage
landowners and land users to ascertain and to build within their boundary
lines.

Sec.
2. RCW
4.16.020 and 1994 c 189 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
period prescribed for the commencement of actions shall be as follows:

(1)
Within ten years:

(((1)))
(a) Except when subsection (2) of this section applies, for actions for
the recovery of real property, or for the recovery of the possession thereof;
and no action shall be maintained for such recovery unless it appears that the
plaintiff, his or her ancestor, predecessor or grantor was seized or possessed
of the premises in question within ten years before the commencement of the
action.

(((2)))
(b) For an action upon a judgment or decree of any court of the United
States, or of any state or territory within the United States, or of any
territory or possession of the United States outside the boundaries thereof, or
of any extraterritorial court of the United States, unless the ten-year period
is extended in accordance with RCW 6.17.020(3).

(((3)))
(c) Of the eighteenth birthday of the youngest child named in the order
for whom support is ordered for an action to collect past due child support
that has accrued under an order entered after July 23, 1989, by any of the
above-named courts or that has accrued under an administrative order as defined
in RCW 74.20A.020(6), which is issued after July 23, 1989.

(2)
Actions for the recovery of land against a person who is or may be in adverse
possession, or who is or may be making prescriptive use thereof, shall be
brought within fifteen years after commencement of such possession or use where
entry onto the land begins on or after August 1, 1999; and no person shall gain
title to or rights in another's land by adverse possession or prescription
until such possession or use shall have been proven to have continued for fifteen
years.

Sec.
3. RCW
7.28.010 and 1911 c 83 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except when subsection (2) of this section applies, any person having a
valid subsisting interest in real property, and a right to the possession
thereof, may recover the same by action in the superior court of the proper
county, to be brought against the tenant in possession; if there is no such
tenant, then against the person claiming the title or some interest therein,
and may have judgment in such action quieting or removing a cloud from
plaintiff's title; an action to quiet title may be brought by the known heirs
of any deceased person, or of any person presumed in law to be deceased, or by
the successors in interest of such known heirs against the unknown heirs of
such deceased person or against such person presumed to be deceased and his or
her unknown heirs, and if it shall be made to appear in such action that
the plaintiffs are heirs of the deceased person, or the person presumed in law
to be deceased, or the successors in interest of such heirs, and have been in
possession of the real property involved in such action for ten years preceding
the time of the commencement of such action, and that during said time no
person other than the plaintiff in the action or his or her grantors has
claimed or asserted any right or title or interest in said property, the court
may adjudge and decree the plaintiff or plaintiffs in such action to be the
owners of such real property, free from all claims of any unknown heirs of such
deceased person, or person presumed in law to be deceased; and an action to
quiet title may be maintained by any person in the actual possession of real
property against the unknown heirs of a person known to be dead, or against any
person where it is not known whether such person is dead or not, and against
the unknown heirs of such person, and if it shall thereafter transpire that
such person was at the time of commencing such action dead the judgment or
decree in such action shall be as binding and conclusive on the heirs of such
person as though they had been known and named; and in all actions, under this
section, to quiet or remove a cloud from the title to real property, if the
defendant be absent or a nonresident of this state, or cannot, after due
diligence, be found within the state, or conceals himself or herself to
avoid the service of summons, service may be made upon such defendant by
publication of summons as provided by law; and the court may appoint a trustee
for such absent or nonresident defendant, to make or cancel any deed or
conveyance of whatsoever nature, or do any other act to carry into effect the
judgment or the decree of the court.

(2)
Actions to quiet title that are based upon an allegation of adverse possession
or prescriptive use may not be brought sooner than fifteen years after
commencement of such possession or use where entry onto the land begins on or
after August 1, 1999; and no person shall gain title to or rights in another's
land by adverse possession or prescription until such possession or use shall
have been proven to have continued for fifteen years.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 7.28 RCW to read as follows:

The
landowner shall be entitled to the following protection:

It
shall be an affirmative defense to any claim of adverse possession or
prescriptive easement that the landowner gave permission to use the land at any
time during the applicable time period specified in RCW 4.16.020 or 7.28.010 to
the person claiming title by adverse possession or a prescriptive easement. A
certified letter, return receipt requested, delivered at any time during the
applicable time period specified in RCW 4.16.020 or 7.28.010 by the landowner to
the person claiming title by adverse possession or a prescriptive easement
granting permission to use the land is conclusive evidence that subsequent use
is permissive.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
title of this act shall be "Adverse Possession beginning after August 1,
1999."

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This
act takes effect August 1, 1999.

---
END ---