BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW to read as follows:

If
a person under eighteen years of age is convicted of or is found to have
committed two or more moving violations within the first year of holding a
Washington state driver's license, the department shall restrict his or her
driving privilege by prohibiting the person from transporting any passengers
under the age of eighteen years, other than members of the driver's immediate
family, during the time from 8:00 p.m. to 5:00 a.m. unless the driver's parent
or guardian is in the vehicle. This prohibition will be in effect for one
year.

If
a person violates this restriction, the department shall revoke his or her
driver's license for one year.

---
END ---