BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.135 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The state investment board has the full power to invest, reinvest, manage,
contract, sell, or exchange investment moneys in the emergency reserve fund.
All investment and operating costs associated with the investment of money
shall be paid pursuant to RCW 43.33A.160 and 43.84.160. With the exception of
these expenses, the earnings from the investment of the money shall be retained
by the fund.

(2)
All investments made by the state investment board shall be made with the
exercise of that degree of judgment and care pursuant to RCW 43.33A.140 and the
investment policies established by the state investment board.

(3)
As deemed appropriate by the state investment board, moneys in the fund may be
commingled for investment with other funds subject to investment by the board.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.33A RCW to read as follows:

Pursuant
to section 1 of this act, the state investment board shall invest moneys in the
emergency reserve fund established in chapter 43.135 RCW with full power to
establish investment policies for the fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---