BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
35.21.755 and 1995 c 399 s 38 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A public corporation, commission, or authority created pursuant to RCW
35.21.730 or 35.21.660 shall receive the same immunity or exemption from
taxation as that of the city, town, or county creating the same: PROVIDED,
That, except for (a) any property within a special review district established
by ordinance prior to January 1, 1976, or listed on or which is within a
district listed on any federal or state register of historical sites or (b) any
property owned, operated, or controlled by a public corporation that is used
primarily for low-income housing, or that is used as a convention center,
performing arts center, public assembly hall, ((or)) public meeting
place, public esplanade, street, public way, public open space, park, public
utility corridor, or view corridor for the general public or (c) any property
owned, operated, or controlled by a public corporation that was acquired by the
public corporation to implement an agreement or plan approved by the city,
town, or county in which the property is located for the purpose of
facilitating the remediation and redevelopment of blighted property in
accordance with the approved agreement or plan, any such public
corporation, commission, or authority shall pay to the county treasurer an
annual excise tax equal to the amounts which would be paid upon real property
and personal property devoted to the purposes of such public corporation,
commission, or authority were it in private ownership, and such real property
and personal property is acquired and/or operated under RCW 35.21.730 through
35.21.755, and the proceeds of such excise tax shall be allocated by the county
treasurer to the various taxing authorities in which such property is situated,
in the same manner as though the property were in private ownership: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That the provisions of chapter 82.29A RCW shall not apply to property
within a special review district established by ordinance prior to January 1,
1976, or listed on or which is within a district listed on any federal or state
register of historical sites and which is controlled by a public corporation,
commission, or authority created pursuant to RCW 35.21.730 or 35.21.660, which
was in existence prior to January 1, 1987: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That property
within a special review district established by ordinance prior to January 1,
1976, or property which is listed on any federal or state register of
historical sites and controlled by a public corporation, commission, or
authority created pursuant to RCW 35.21.730 or 35.21.660, which was in
existence prior to January 1, 1976, shall receive the same immunity or
exemption from taxation as if such property had been within a district listed
on any such federal or state register of historical sites as of January 1,
1976, and controlled by a public corporation, commission, or authority created
pursuant to RCW 35.21.730 or 35.21.660 which was in existence prior to January
1, 1976.

(2)
As used in this section:

(a)
"Low-income" means a total annual income, adjusted for family size,
not exceeding fifty percent of the area median income.

(b)
"Area median income" means:

(i)
For an area within a standard metropolitan statistical area, the area median
income reported by the United States department of housing and urban
development for that standard metropolitan statistical area; or

(ii)
For an area not within a standard metropolitan statistical area, the county
median income reported by the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(c) "Blighted property" means property that is
contaminated with hazardous substances as defined under RCW 70.105D.020(7), and
property adjacent thereto which is identified in an agreement or plan approved
by the city, town, or county in which the property is located as being
necessary for inclusion in order to implement the agreement or plan approved.

---
END ---