BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
47.46.010 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds and declares:

It
is essential for the economic, social, and environmental well-being of the
state and the maintenance of a high quality of life that the people of the
state have an efficient transportation system.

The
ability of the state to provide an efficient transportation system will be
enhanced by a public-private sector program providing for private entities to
undertake all or a portion of the study, planning, design, development,
financing, acquisition, installation, construction or improvement, operation,
and maintenance of transportation systems and facility projects.

A
public-private initiatives program will provide benefits to both the public and
private sectors. Public-private initiatives provide a sound economic
investment opportunity for the private sector. Such initiatives will provide
the state with increased access to property development and project
opportunities, financial and development expertise, and will supplement state
transportation revenues, allowing the state to use its limited resources for
other needed projects.

The
public-private initiatives program, to the fullest extent possible, should
encourage and promote business and employment opportunities for Washington
state citizens.

The
public-private initiatives program shall be implemented in cooperation,
consultation, and with the support of the affected communities and local
jurisdictions.

The
secretary of transportation should be permitted and encouraged to test the
feasibility of building privately funded transportation systems and facilities
or segments thereof through the use of innovative agreements with the private
sector. The secretary of transportation should be vested with the authority to
solicit, evaluate, negotiate, and administer public-private agreements with the
private sector relating to the planning, construction, upgrading, or
reconstruction of transportation systems and facilities.

Agreements
negotiated under a public-private initiatives program will not bestow on
private entities an immediate right to construct and operate the proposed
transportation facilities. Rather, agreements will grant to private entities
the opportunity to design the proposed facilities, demonstrate public support
for proposed facilities, and complete the planning processes required in order
to obtain a future decision by the department of transportation and other state
and local lead agencies on whether the facilities should be permitted and
built.

Agreements
negotiated under the public-private initiatives program should establish the
conditions under which the private developer may secure the approval necessary
to develop and operate the proposed transportation facilities; create a
framework to attract the private capital necessary to finance their
development; ensure that the transportation facilities will be designed,
constructed, and operated in accordance with applicable local, regional, state,
and federal laws and the applicable standards and policies of the department of
transportation; and require a demonstration that the proposed transportation
facility has the support of the affected communities and local jurisdictions.

The
legislature finds that the Puget Sound congestion pricing project, selected
under this chapter, raises major transportation policy, economic, and equity
concerns. These relate to the integrity of the state's high-occupancy vehicle
program; the cost-effective movement of freight and goods; the diversion of
traffic to local streets and arterials; and possible financial hardship to
commuters. The legislature further finds that these potential economic and
social impacts require comprehensive legislative review prior to advancement of
the project and directs that the secretary not proceed with the implementation
of the project without prior approval of the legislature.

((The
department of transportation should be encouraged to take advantage of new
opportunities provided by federal legislation under section 1012 of the
Intermodal Surface Transportation Efficiency Act of 1991 (ISTEA). That section
establishes a new program authorizing federal participation in construction or
improvement or improvement of publicly or privately owned toll roads, bridges, and
tunnels, and allows states to leverage available federal funds as a means for
attracting private sector capital.))

Agreements
negotiated under a public-private initiatives program must not limit or
encumber the public's current use of existing state transportation systems and
facilities by such means as, but not limited to, imposing or increasing tolls
or user fees on existing bridges, highways, or facilities or including existing
bridges, highways, or facilities as any part of a public-private initiatives
project.

Sec.
2. RCW
47.46.030 and 1996 c 280 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The secretary or a designee shall solicit proposals from, and negotiate and
enter into agreements with, private entities to undertake as appropriate,
together with the department and other public entities, all or a portion of the
study, planning, design, construction, operation, and maintenance of
transportation systems and facilities, using in whole or in part private
sources of financing.

The
public-private initiatives program may develop up to six demonstration
projects. Each proposal shall be weighed on its own merits, and each of the
six agreements shall be negotiated individually, and as a stand-alone project.

(2)
If project proposals selected prior to September 1, 1994, are terminated by the
public or private sectors, the department shall not select any new projects,
including project proposals submitted to the department prior to September 1,
1994, and designated by the transportation commission as placeholder projects,
after June 16, 1995, until June 30, 1997.

The
department, in consultation with the legislative transportation committee,
shall conduct a program and fiscal audit of the public-private initiatives
program for the biennium ending June 30, 1997. The department shall submit a
progress report to the legislative transportation committee on the program and
fiscal audit by June 30, 1996, with preliminary and final audit reports due
December 1, 1996, and June 30, 1997, respectively.

The
department shall develop and submit a proposed public involvement plan to the
1997 legislature to identify the process for selecting new potential projects
and the associated costs of implementing the plan. The legislature must adopt
the public involvement plan before the department may proceed with any activity
related to project identification and selection. Following legislative
adoption of the public involvement plan, the department is authorized to
implement the plan and to identify potential new projects.

The
public involvement plan for projects selected after June 30, 1997, shall, at a
minimum, identify projects that: (a) Have the potential of achieving overall
public support among users of the projects, residents of communities in the
vicinity of the projects, and residents of communities impacted by the
projects; (b) meet a state transportation need; (c) provide a significant state
benefit; and (d) provide competition among proposers and maximum cost benefits
to users. Prospective projects may include projects identified by the
department or submitted by the private sector.

Projects
that meet the minimum criteria established under this section and the
requirements of the public involvement plan developed by the department and
approved by the legislature shall be submitted to the Washington state
transportation commission for its review. The commission, in turn, shall
submit a list of eligible projects to the legislative transportation committee
for its consideration. Forty-five days after the submission to the legislative
transportation committee of the list of eligible projects, the secretary is
authorized to solicit proposals for the eligible project.

(3)
Prior to entering into agreements with private entities under the requirements
of RCW 47.46.040 for any project proposal selected before September 1, 1994, or
after June 30, 1997, except as provided for in subsections (11) and (12) of
this section, the department shall require an advisory vote as provided under
subsections (5) through (((10))) (9) of this section.

(4)
The advisory vote shall apply to project proposals selected prior to September
1, 1994, or after June 30, 1997, that receive public opposition as demonstrated
by the submission to the department of original petitions bearing at least five
thousand signatures of individuals opposing the project collected and submitted
in accordance with the dates established in subsections (11) and (12) ((and
(13))) of this section. The advisory vote shall be on the ((preferred
alternative identified under the requirements of chapter 43.21C RCW and, if
applicable, the national environmental policy act, 42 U.S.C. 4321 et seq. The
execution by the department of the advisory vote process established in this
section is subject to the prior appropriation of funds by the legislature for
the purpose of conducting environmental impact studies, a public involvement
program, local involvement committee activities, traffic and economic impact
analyses, engineering and technical studies, and the advisory vote)) specific
project proposed by the private entity and accepted by resolution of the
transportation commission.

(5)(a)
In preparing for the advisory vote, the department shall conduct a
comprehensive analysis of traffic patterns and economic impact to define the
geographical boundary of the project area that is affected by the imposition of
tolls or user fees authorized under this chapter. The area so defined is referred
to in this section as the affected project area. In defining the affected
project area, the department shall, at a minimum, undertake: (((a) A
comparison of the estimated percentage of residents of communities in the
vicinity of the project and in other communities impacted by the project who
could be subject to tolls or user fees and the estimated percentage of other
users and transient traffic that could be subject to tolls or user fees; (b)))
(i) To identify the total number of anticipated users of the proposed
project, assign those identified users to their census tracts of residence,
rank those census tracts in order of most frequent usage, and include under
this criteria, only those voters from within the top two-thirds of the
rank-ordered census tracts; (ii) an analysis of the anticipated traffic
diversion patterns; (((c))) (iii) an analysis of the potential
economic impact resulting from proposed toll rates or user fee rates imposed on
residents, commercial traffic, and commercial entities in communities in the
vicinity of and impacted by the project; (((d))) (iv) an analysis
of the economic impact of tolls or user fees on the price of goods and services
generally; and (((e))) (v) an analysis of the relationship of the
project to state transportation needs and benefits.

(b)
In defining the economic impact of the proposed project, the department shall
prepare an estimated initial detailed cost analysis of the proposed project to
include all known and anticipated costs. Based on this cost analysis, the
department shall prepare a projected toll or user fee rate analysis that
provides for a sufficient payback of all hard and soft costs associated with
the proposed project. If any revenue or funds other than tolls or user fees
are identified within this initial cost analysis, the source of those funds
together with nonrevocable authorization must also be identified.

(6)(((a)
After determining the definition of the affected project area, the department
shall establish a committee comprised of individuals who represent cities and
counties in the affected project area; organizations formed to support or
oppose the project; and users of the project. The committee shall be named the
public-private local involvement committee, and be known as the local involvement
committee.

(b)
The members of the local involvement committee shall be: (i) An elected
official from each city within the affected project area; (ii) an elected
official from each county within the affected project area; (iii) two persons
from each county within the affected project area who represent an organization
formed in support of the project, if the organization exists; (iv) two persons
from each county within the affected project area who represent an organization
formed to oppose the project, if the organization exists; and (v) four public
members active in a state-wide transportation organization. If the committee
makeup results in an even number of committee members, there shall be an
additional appointment of an elected official from the county in which all, or
the greatest portion of the project is located.

(c)
City and county elected officials shall be appointed by a majority of the
members of the city or county legislative authorities of each city or county
within the affected project area, respectively. The county legislative
authority of each county within the affected project area shall identify and
validate organizations officially formed in support of or in opposition to the
project and shall make the appointments required under this section from a list
submitted by the chair of the organizations. Public members shall be appointed
by the governor. All appointments to the local involvement committee shall be
made and submitted to the department of transportation no later than January 1,
1996, for projects selected prior to September 1, 1994, and no later than
thirty days after the affected project area is defined for projects selected
after June 30, 1997. Vacancies in the membership of the local involvement
committee shall be filled by the appointing authority under (b)(i) through (v)
of this subsection for each position on the committee.

(d)
The local involvement committee shall serve in an advisory capacity to the
department on all matters related to the execution of the advisory vote.

(e)
Members of the local involvement committee serve without compensation and may
not receive subsistence, lodging expenses, or travel expenses.

(7))) The
department shall conduct a minimum thirty-day public comment period on the
definition of the geographical boundary of the project area. The department((,
in consultation with the local involvement committee,)) shall make
adjustments, if required, to the definition of the geographical boundary of the
affected project area, based on comments received from the public. Within
fourteen calendar days after the public comment period, the department shall
set the boundaries of the affected project area in units no smaller than a
precinct as defined in RCW 29.01.120.

(((8)
The department, in consultation with the local involvement committee, shall
develop a description for selected project proposals. After developing the
description of the project proposal,)) (7) The department shall
publish the project proposal description as contained in the resolution of
approval by the commission, in newspapers of general circulation for seven
calendar days in the affected project area. Within fourteen calendar days
after the last day of the publication of the project proposal description, the
department shall transmit a copy of the map depicting the affected project area
and the description of the project proposal to the county auditor of the county
in which any portion of the affected project area is located.

(((9)))
(8) The department shall provide the legislative transportation
committee with progress reports on the status of the definition of the affected
project area and the description of the project proposal.

(((10)))
(9) Upon receipt of the map and the description of the project proposal,
the county auditor shall, within thirty days, verify the precincts that are
located within the affected project area. The ((county auditor)) department
shall prepare the text identifying and describing the affected project area and
the project proposal using the definition of the geographical boundary of the
affected project area and the project description ((submitted by the
department)) and shall set an election date for the submission of a ballot
proposition authorizing the imposition of tolls or user fees to implement the
proposed project within the affected project area, which date may be the next
succeeding general election to be held in the state, or at a special election,
if requested by the department. The text of the project proposal description,
approved by the commission and as contained within their resolution of
approval, must appear in a voter's pamphlet for the affected project area,
together with the toll rate or user fee rate established in the cost analysis
detailed in subsection (5)(b) of this section. The department shall pay
the costs of publication and distribution. The special election date must be
the next date for a special election provided under RCW 29.13.020 that is at
least sixty days but, if authorized under RCW 29.13.020, no more than ninety
days after the receipt of the final map and project description by the
auditor. The department shall pay the cost of an election held under this
section.

(((11)))
(10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department may
contract with a private developer of a selected project proposal to conduct
environmental impact studies, a public involvement program, and engineering and
technical studies funded by the legislature. For projects subject to this
subsection, the department shall not enter into an agreement under RCW
47.46.040 prior to the advisory vote on the ((preferred alternative)) proposed
project description.

(((12)))
(11) Subsections (5) through (((10))) (9) of this section
shall not apply to project proposals selected prior to September 1, 1994, that
have no organized public opposition as demonstrated by the submission to the
department of original petitions bearing at least five thousand signatures of
individuals opposing the project, collected and submitted after September 1,
1994, and by thirty calendar days after June 16, 1995.

(((13)))
(12) Subsections (5) through (((10))) (9) of this section
shall not apply to project proposals selected after June 30, 1997, that have no
organized public opposition as demonstrated by the submission to the department
of original petitions bearing at least five thousand signatures of individuals
opposing the project, collected and submitted by ninety calendar days after
project selection.

(13)
A project selected under this chapter in which subsections (5) through (9) of
this section apply must complete the advisory vote process within five years of
the date of the commission resolution approving the project or the project is
automatically terminated without need for further action.

(14)
A project proceeding through the advisory vote process must receive approval
from the voters before the secretary may complete contract or franchise
negotiations with the private entity under RCW 47.46.040. The contract or
franchise agreement must have final approval by the commission, which approval
may not occur before a thirty-day public comment period and hearing on the
terms and conditions of the final agreement and legislative appropriation of
any identified funds necessary to complete the proposed project, other than
tolls or user fees approved by the voters.

Sec.
3. RCW
47.46.040 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All projects designed, constructed, and operated under this authority must
comply with all applicable rules and statutes in existence at the time the
agreement is executed, including but not limited to the following provisions:
Chapter 39.12 RCW, this title, RCW 41.06.380, chapter 47.64 RCW, RCW 49.60.180,
and 49 C.F.R. Part 21.

(2)
The secretary or a designee shall consult with legal, financial, and other
experts within and outside state government in the negotiation and development
of the agreements.

(3)
Agreements shall provide for private ownership of the projects during the
construction period. After completion and final acceptance of each project or
discrete segment thereof, the agreement shall provide for state ownership of
the transportation systems and facilities and lease to the private entity
unless the state elects to provide for ownership of the facility by the private
entity during the term of the agreement.

The
state shall lease each of the demonstration projects, or applicable project
segments, to the private entities for operating purposes for up to fifty years.

(4)
The department may exercise any power possessed by it to facilitate the
development, construction, financing operation, and maintenance of
transportation projects under this chapter. Agreements for maintenance
services entered into under this section shall provide for full reimbursement
for services rendered by the department or other state agencies. Agreements
for police services for projects, involving state highway routes, developed
under agreements shall be entered into with the Washington state patrol. The
agreement for police services shall provide that the state patrol will be
reimbursed for costs on a comparable basis with the costs incurred for
comparable service on other state highway routes. The department may provide
services for which it is reimbursed, including but not limited to preliminary
planning, environmental certification, and preliminary design of the demonstration
projects.

(5)
The plans and specifications for each project constructed under this section
shall comply with the department's standards for state projects. A facility
constructed by and leased to a private entity is deemed to be a part of the
state highway system for purposes of identification, maintenance, and
enforcement of traffic laws and for the purposes of applicable sections of this
title. Upon reversion of the facility to the state, the project must meet all
applicable state standards. Agreements shall address responsibility for
reconstruction or renovations that are required in order for a facility to meet
all applicable state standards upon reversion of the facility to the state.

(6)
For the purpose of facilitating these projects and to assist the private entity
in the financing, development, construction, and operation of the
transportation systems and facilities, the agreements may include provisions
for the department to exercise its authority, including the lease of
facilities, rights of way, and airspace, exercise of the power of eminent
domain, granting of development rights and opportunities, granting of necessary
easements and rights of access, issuance of permits and other authorizations,
protection from competition, remedies in the event of default of either of the
parties, granting of contractual and real property rights, liability during
construction and the term of the lease, authority to negotiate acquisition of
rights of way in excess of appraised value, and any other provision deemed
necessary by the secretary.

(7)
The agreements entered into under this section may include provisions
authorizing the state to grant necessary easements and lease to a private
entity existing rights of way or rights of way subsequently acquired with
public or private financing. The agreements may also include provisions to
lease to the entity airspace above or below the right of way associated or to
be associated with the private entity's transportation facility. In
consideration for the reversion rights in these privately constructed
facilities, the department may negotiate a charge for the lease of airspace
rights during the term of the agreement for a period not to exceed fifty
years. If, after the expiration of this period, the department continues to
lease these airspace rights to the private entity, it shall do so only at fair
market value. The agreement may also provide the private entity the right of
first refusal to undertake projects utilizing airspace owned by the state in
the vicinity of the public-private project.

(8)
Agreements under this section may include any contractual provision that is
necessary to protect the project revenues required to repay the costs incurred
to study, plan, design, finance, acquire, build, install, operate, enforce
laws, and maintain toll highways, bridges, and tunnels and which will not unreasonably
inhibit or prohibit the development of additional public transportation systems
and facilities. Agreements under this section must secure and maintain
liability insurance coverage in amounts appropriate to protect the project's
viability and may address state indemnification of the private entity for
design and construction liability where the state has approved relevant design
and construction plans.

(9)
Agreements shall include a process that provides for public involvement in
decision making with respect to the development of the projects.

(10)(a)
In carrying out the public involvement process required in subsection (9) of
this section, the private entity shall proactively seek public participation
through a process appropriate to the characteristics of the project that
assesses and demonstrates public support among: Users of the project,
residents of communities in the vicinity of the project, and residents of
communities impacted by the project.

(b)
The private entity shall conduct a comprehensive public involvement process
that provides, periodically throughout the development and implementation of
the project, users and residents of communities in the affected project area an
opportunity to comment upon key issues regarding the project including, but not
limited to: (i) Alternative sizes and scopes; (ii) design; (iii) environmental
assessment; (iv) right of way and access plans; (v) traffic impacts; (vi)
tolling or user fee strategies and tolling or user fee ranges; (vii) project
cost; (viii) construction impacts; (ix) facility operation; and (x) any other
salient characteristics.

(c)
If the affected project area has not been defined, the private entity shall
define the affected project area by ((conducting)) undertaking,
at a minimum: (i) ((A comparison of the estimated percentage of residents
of communities in the vicinity of the project and in other communities impacted
by the project who could be subject to tolls or user fees and the estimated
percentage of other users and transient traffic that could be subject to tolls
or user fees)) To identify the total number of anticipated users of the
proposed project, assign those identified users to their census tracts of
residence, rank those census tracts in order of most frequent usage, and
include under this criteria, only those voters from within the top two-thirds
of the rank-ordered census tracts; (ii) an analysis of the anticipated
traffic diversion patterns; (iii) an analysis of the potential economic impact
resulting from proposed toll rates or user fee rates imposed on residents,
commercial traffic, and commercial entities in communities in the vicinity of
and impacted by the project; (iv) an analysis of the economic impact of tolls
or user fees on the price of goods and services generally; and (v) an analysis
of the relationship of the project to state transportation needs and benefits.

The
agreement may require an advisory vote by users of and residents in the
affected project area.

(d)
In seeking public participation, the private entity shall establish a local
involvement committee or committees comprised of residents of the affected
project area, individuals who represent cities and counties in the affected
project area, organizations formed to support or oppose the project, if such
organizations exist, and users of the project. The private entity shall, at a
minimum, establish a committee as required under the specifications of ((RCW
47.46.030(5)(b) (ii) and (iii))) (g) of this subsection, and
appointments to such committee shall be made, and the committee shall hold
its first meeting, no later than ((thirty)) ninety days after
((the project area is defined)) final approval of the proposed
project by the transportation commission.

(e)
Local involvement committees shall act in an advisory capacity to the
department and the private entity on all issues related to the development and
implementation of the public involvement process established under this
section.

(f)
The department and the private entity shall provide the legislative
transportation committee and local involvement committees with progress reports
on the status of the public involvement process including the results of an
advisory vote, if any occurs.

(g)
The members of the local involvement committee must be: (i) An elected
official from each city within the affected project area; (ii) an elected
official from each county within the affected project area; (iii) two persons
from each county within the affected project area who represent an organization
formed in support of the project, if the organization exists; (iv) two persons
from each county within the affected project area who represent an organization
formed to oppose the project, if the organization exists; and (v) four public
members active in a state-wide transportation organization. If the committee
makeup results in an even number of committee members, an additional
appointment of an elected official from the county in which the greatest
portion of the project is located must be made.

(h)
City and county elected officials must be appointed by a majority of the
members of the city or county legislative authorities of each city or county
within the affected project area, respectively. The county legislative
authority of each county within the affected project area shall identify and
validate organizations officially formed in support of or in opposition to the
project and shall make the appointments required under this section from a list
submitted by the chair of the organizations. The governor shall appoint the
public members. All appointments to the local involvement committee must be
made and submitted to the department of transportation no later than thirty
days after the affected project area is defined for projects selected after
June 30, 1997. Vacancies in the membership of the local involvement committee
must be filled by the appointing authority under (g)(i) through (v) of this
subsection for each position on the committee.

(11)
Nothing in this chapter limits the right of the secretary and his or her agents
to render such advice and to make such recommendations as they deem to be in
the best interests of the state and the public.

Sec.
4. RCW
47.46.050 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 19 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department may enter into agreements using federal, state, and local
financing in connection with the projects, including without limitation,
grants, loans, and other measures authorized by section 1012 of ISTEA, and to
do such things as necessary and desirable to maximize the funding and
financing, including the formation of a revolving loan fund to implement this
section.

(2)
Agreements entered into under this section shall authorize the private entity
to lease the facilities within a designated area or areas from the state and to
impose user fees or tolls within the designated area to allow a reasonable rate
of return on investment, as established through a negotiated agreement between
the state and the private entity. The negotiated agreement shall determine a
maximum rate of return on investment, based on project characteristics. If the
negotiated rate of return on investment is not affected, the private entity may
establish and modify toll rates and user fees. However, a modification that
would result in a toll rate or user fee rate in excess of the rate established
in the advisory vote will automatically place that individual public-private
initiatives project, from that date forward, under the control and governance
of the Washington state utilities and transportation commission as if the
private entity under contract with the state were a "service company"
required to comply with all laws, rules, and regulations established by the
utilities and transportation commission.

(3)
Agreements may establish "incentive" rates of return beyond the
negotiated maximum rate of return on investment. The incentive rates of return
shall be designed to provide financial benefits to the affected public
jurisdictions and the private entity, given the attainment of various safety,
performance, or transportation demand management goals. The incentive rates of
return shall be negotiated in the agreement.

(4) Agreements shall require that over the term of the ownership or
lease the user fees or toll revenues be applied only to payment of the private
entity's capital outlay costs for the project, including project development
costs, interest expense, the costs associated with design, construction,
operations, toll collection, maintenance and administration of the project,
reimbursement to the state for all costs associated with an election as
required under RCW 47.46.030, the costs of project review and oversight,
technical and law enforcement services, establishment of a fund to assure the
adequacy of maintenance expenditures, and a reasonable return on investment to
the private entity. A negotiated agreement shall not extend the term of the
ownership or lease beyond the period of time required for payment of the
private entity's capital outlay costs for the project under this subsection.

---
END ---