BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.20.161 and 1998 c 41 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department, upon receipt of a fee of ((fourteen)) twenty dollars,
which includes the fee for the required photograph, shall issue to every
applicant qualifying therefor a driver's license, which license shall bear
thereon a distinguishing number assigned to the licensee, the name of record,
date of birth, Washington residence address, photograph, and a brief
description of the licensee, and either a facsimile of the signature of the
licensee or a space upon which the licensee shall write his usual signature
with pen and ink immediately upon receipt of the license. No license is valid
until it has been so signed by the licensee.

Sec.
2. RCW
46.20.181 and 1990 c 250 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

Every driver's license expires on the fourth anniversary of the
licensee's birthdate following the issuance of the license. Every such license
is renewable on or before its expiration upon application prescribed by the
department and the payment of ((a)) the fee ((of fourteen
dollars)) prescribed by RCW 46.20.161. This fee includes the fee
for the required photograph.

---
END ---