BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
48.41.100 and 1995 c 34 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any individual person who is a resident of this state is eligible for coverage
((upon providing evidence of rejection for medical reasons, a requirement of
restrictive riders, an up-rated premium, or a preexisting conditions limitation
on health insurance, the effect of which is to substantially reduce coverage
from that received by a person considered a standard risk, by at least one
member within six months of the date of application. Evidence of rejection may
be waived in accordance with rules adopted by the board)) if they are
unable to obtain a substantially equivalent health plan at a rate less than or
equal to that rate charged by the pool under RCW 48.21.200.

(2)
The following persons are not eligible for coverage by the pool:

(a)
Any person having terminated coverage in the pool unless (i) twelve months have
lapsed since termination, or (ii) that person can show continuous other
coverage which has been involuntarily terminated for any reason other than
nonpayment of premiums;

(b)
Any person on whose behalf the pool has paid out five hundred thousand dollars
in benefits;

(c)
Inmates of public institutions and persons whose benefits are duplicated under
public programs.

(3) Any person whose health insurance coverage is involuntarily
terminated for any reason other than nonpayment of premium may apply for
coverage under the plan.

---
END ---