BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that there is increasing evidence of climate disruption. The
potential effects of this change could include extraordinary heat waves,
persistent drought-driven forest fires, increases in the frequency and severity
of storms and storm damage, and warming of the earth's surface. There is a
growing consensus among scientists that human activities are influencing
climate. While the probable causes of climate change are occurring on a global
scale, it is likely there will be effects specific to the Pacific Northwest
region. The potential effects have social, economic, and ecological dimensions
and include effects on energy supply and demand, resource economies and
industries such as forestry, fishing and agriculture, hydrology and water
resources, community infrastructure, emergency services, aquatic ecosystems,
human health, recreation opportunities, insurance, transportation, coastal
activities, and urban settlements. It is the intent of the legislature to
further encourage the development of science that can lead to a more
comprehensive understanding of whether climate change is occurring and the
potential effects of it. This will allow citizens and public officials to be
better prepared to evaluate measures to mitigate the effects of climate change
and develop appropriate responses.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The institute for public policy shall conduct a study on the potential effects
of global climate change on the Pacific Northwest region and Washington. The
study shall include: (a) A review of the scientific information on climate
disruption and potential climate change; (b) a review of research findings by
the national assessment of the consequences of climate variability and change,
Pacific Northwest region; (c) an evaluation of the potential effects on the
Pacific Northwest region and Washington of potential climate change scenarios;
(d) development and evaluation of potential policy responses to the effects of
climate change; and (e) recommendations for action.

(2)
A committee is established to advise the institute for public policy in the
conduct of the study described in subsection (1) of this section. The
committee shall consist of: (a) Four members of the house of representatives,
two from each major caucus, appointed by the co-speakers of the house of
representatives; (b) four members of the senate, two from each major caucus
appointed by the president of the senate; (c) four members of the public
appointed by the governor; and (d) a representative of the joint institute for
the study of the atmosphere and ocean, climate impacts group at the University
of Washington.

(3)
In conducting the study, the institute for public policy shall cooperate with
education and government entities in the state that have expertise and
understanding related to the effects of climate change on the region and the
state. These entities include, but are not limited to, public and private
universities, the department of ecology, the department of community, trade,
and economic development, the department of agriculture, and the department of
natural resources.

(4)
The institute for public policy shall provide an interim report to the
legislature by January 31, 2000, and a final report to the legislature by
January 1, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The
sum of one hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2001, from the general fund to
the institute for public policy to conduct the study directed in section 2 of
this act.

---
END ---