BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.52.020 and 1990 c 210 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A driver of any vehicle involved in an accident resulting in the injury to or
death of any person shall immediately stop such vehicle at the scene of such
accident or as close thereto as possible but shall then forthwith return to,
and in every event remain at, the scene of such accident until he or she
has fulfilled the requirements of subsection (3) of this section; every such
stop shall be made without obstructing traffic more than is necessary.

(2)
The driver of any vehicle involved in an accident resulting only in damage to a
vehicle which is driven or attended by any person or damage to other property
shall immediately stop such vehicle at the scene of such accident or as close
thereto as possible and shall forthwith return to, and in any event shall
remain at, the scene of such accident until he or she has fulfilled the
requirements of subsection (3) of this section; every such stop shall be made
without obstructing traffic more than is necessary.

(3)
Unless otherwise provided in subsection (7) of this section the driver of any
vehicle involved in an accident resulting in injury to or death of any person
or damage to any vehicle which is driven or attended by any person or damage to
other property shall give his or her name, address, insurance company,
insurance policy number, and vehicle license number and shall exhibit his or
her vehicle driver's license to any person struck or injured or the driver or
any occupant of, or any person attending, any such vehicle collided with and
shall render to any person injured in such accident reasonable assistance,
including the carrying or the making of arrangements for the carrying of such
person to a physician or hospital for medical treatment if it is apparent that
such treatment is necessary or if such carrying is requested by the injured
person or on his or her behalf. Under no circumstances shall the
rendering of assistance or other compliance with the provisions of this
subsection be evidence of the liability of any driver for such accident.

(4)(a)
Any driver covered by the provisions of subsection (1) of this section failing
to stop or comply with any of the requirements of subsection (3) of this
section ((under said circumstances shall be)) in the case of an
accident resulting in death is guilty of a class B felony and, upon conviction,
is punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(b)
Any driver covered by the provisions of subsection (1) of this section failing
to stop or comply with any of the requirements of subsection (3) of this
section in the case of an accident resulting in injury is guilty of a class
C felony and, upon conviction, ((be punished pursuant to RCW 9A.20.020:
PROVIDED, That)) is punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(c)
This ((provision)) subsection shall not apply to any person
injured or incapacitated by such accident to the extent of being physically
incapable of complying ((herewith)) with this section.

(5)
Any driver covered by the provisions of subsection (2) of this section failing
to stop or to comply with any of the requirements of subsection (3) of this
section under said circumstances shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor:
PROVIDED, That this provision shall not apply to any person injured or
incapacitated by such accident to the extent of being physically incapable of
complying herewith.

(6)
The license or permit to drive or any nonresident privilege to drive of any
person convicted under this section or any local ordinance consisting of
substantially the same language as this section of failure to stop and give
information or render aid following an accident with any vehicle driven or
attended by any person shall be revoked by the department.

(7)
If none of the persons specified are in condition to receive the information to
which they otherwise would be entitled under subsection (3) of this section,
and no police officer is present, the driver of any vehicle involved in such
accident after fulfilling all other requirements of subsections (1) and (3) of
this section insofar as possible on his or her part to be performed,
shall forthwith report such accident to the nearest office of the duly
authorized police authority and submit thereto the information specified in
subsection (3) of this section.

Sec.
2. RCW
9.94A.320 and 1999 c 352 s 3, 1999 c 322 s 5, and 1999 c 45 s 4 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVIAggravated Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XVHomicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIVMurder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

XIIIMalicious explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1 (RCW
70.74.270(1))

XIIAssault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW
70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

XIManslaughter 1 (RCW
9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

XChild Molestation 1 (RCW
9A.44.083)

Indecent Liberties (with
forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Manufacture of methamphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Over 18 and deliver heroin, methamphetamine, a
narcotic from Schedule I or II, or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone
under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)

IXAssault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Controlled Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Hit and Run‑-Death (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a))

Homicide by Watercraft, by being under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW ((88.12.029)) 79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2 (RCW
70.74.270(2))

Over 18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV,
or V or a nonnarcotic, except flunitrazepam or methamphetamine, from Schedule
I-V to someone under 18 and 3 years junior (RCW 69.50.406)

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW
9.68A.040)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)

VIIIArson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Deliver or possess with intent to deliver
methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Homicide by Watercraft, by the operation of any
vessel in a reckless manner (RCW ((88.12.029)) 79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver amphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver heroin or cocaine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Possession of ephedrine or pseudoephedrine with
intent to manufacture methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)

Selling for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any
controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle
in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VIIBurglary 1 (RCW
9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Dealing in depictions of minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard for the safety
of others (RCW ((88.12.029)) 79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible compulsion)
(RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Involving a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.401(f))

Malicious placement of an explosive 3 (RCW
70.74.270(3))

Sending, bringing into state depictions of minor
engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.060)

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in the first degree
(RCW 9.41.040(1)(a))

Use of a Machine Gun in Commission of a Felony (RCW
9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for the safety of
others (RCW 46.61.520)

VIBail Jumping with Murder 1
(RCW 9A.76.170(2)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW
9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110,
9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW
70.74.272(1)(b))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II (except heroin or cocaine) or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

VAbandonment of dependent person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing money or property for extortionate
extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail Jumping with class A Felony (RCW
9A.76.170(2)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW 9A.42.020)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW 9A.44.160)

Delivery of imitation controlled substance by person
eighteen or over to person under eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect Extensions of Credit
(RCW 9A.82.040)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

On and after July 1, 2000: No-Contact Order
Violation: Domestic Violence Pretrial Condition (RCW 10.99.040(4) (b) and (c))

On and after July 1, 2000: No-Contact Order
Violation: Domestic Violence Sentence Condition (RCW 10.99.050(2))

On and after July 1, 2000: Protection Order
Violation: Domestic Violence Civil Action (RCW 26.50.110 (4) and (5))

On and after July 1, 2000: Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

IVArson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault by Watercraft (RCW ((88.12.032)) 79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW
9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Commercial Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit and Run‑-Injury ((Accident)) (RCW
46.52.020(4)(b))

Hit and Run with Vessel‑-Injury Accident (RCW
((88.12.155)) 79A.60.200(3))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under Age Fourteen
(subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW
9A.82.070)

Knowingly Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW
9A.82.050(2))

Malicious Harassment (RCW
9A.36.080)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V
(except marijuana, amphetamine, methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))

Residential Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Use of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW
9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Vehicular Assault (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW
72.66.060)

IIIAbandonment of dependent person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault 3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW
9A.76.170(2)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Delivery of a material in lieu of a controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.401(c))

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Maintaining a Dwelling or Place for Controlled
Substances (RCW 69.50.402(a)(6))

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Manufacture, distribute, or possess with intent to
distribute an imitation controlled substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

Patronizing a Juvenile
Prostitute (RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun
or Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2
(RCW 9A.88.080)

Recklessly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(1))

Securities Act violation
(RCW 21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness
(RCW 9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent conviction or
threat of death) (RCW 9.61.230)

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the second degree
(RCW 9.41.040(1)(b))

Unlawful Use of Building for Drug Purposes (RCW
69.53.010)

Willful Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW
72.65.070)

IIComputer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(3))

Create, deliver, or
possess a counterfeit controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(b))

Escape from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

Health Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Possession of controlled substance that is either
heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV
(RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession of phencyclidine (PCP) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property
(valued at one thousand five hundred dollars or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW
18.130.190(7))

IAttempting to Elude a
Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False Verification for
Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forged Prescription (RCW
69.41.020)

Forged Prescription for a
Controlled Substance (RCW 69.50.403)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Possess Controlled Substance that is a Narcotic from
Schedule III, IV, or V or Non-narcotic from Schedule I-V (except phencyclidine
or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission (RCW
9A.56.070)

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property
(valued at two hundred fifty dollars or more but less than one thousand five
hundred dollars) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW
9A.56.060)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.140 (2) and
(3))

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)

Sec.
3. RCW
13.40.0357 and 1998 c 290 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

DESCRIPTION AND OFFENSE CATEGORY

juvenile juvenile
disposition

disposition category
for attempt,

offense bailjump,
conspiracy,

category description (rcw citation) or
solicitation

........................................

Arson and Malicious Mischief

A Arson 1 (9A.48.020) B+

B Arson 2 (9A.48.030) C

C Reckless Burning 1 (9A.48.040) D

D Reckless Burning 2 (9A.48.050) E

B Malicious Mischief 1 (9A.48.070) C

C Malicious Mischief 2 (9A.48.080) D

D Malicious
Mischief 3 (<$50 is

E class) (9A.48.090) E

E Tampering with
Fire Alarm

Apparatus (9.40.100) E

A Possession of
Incendiary Device

(9.40.120) B+

Assault and
Other Crimes

Involving
Physical Harm

A Assault 1 (9A.36.011) B+

B+ Assault 2 (9A.36.021) C+

C+ Assault 3 (9A.36.031) D+

D+ Assault 4 (9A.36.041) E

B+ Drive-By
Shooting

(9A.36.045) C+

D+ Reckless
Endangerment

(9A.36.050) E

C+ Promoting
Suicide Attempt

(9A.36.060) D+

D+ Coercion (9A.36.070) E

C+ Custodial Assault (9A.36.100) D+

Burglary and Trespass

B+ Burglary 1 (9A.52.020) C+

B Residential
Burglary

(9A.52.025) C

B Burglary 2 (9A.52.030) C

D Burglary Tools
(Possession of)

(9A.52.060) E

D Criminal Trespass 1 (9A.52.070) E

E Criminal
Trespass 2 (9A.52.080) E

C Vehicle
Prowling 1 (9A.52.095) D

D Vehicle Prowling 2 (9A.52.100) E

Drugs

E Possession/Consumption
of Alcohol

(66.44.270) E

C Illegally
Obtaining Legend Drug

(69.41.020) D

C+ Sale, Delivery,
Possession of Legend

Drug with
Intent to Sell

(69.41.030) D+

E Possession of
Legend Drug

(69.41.030) E

B+ Violation of
Uniform Controlled

Substances Act
- Narcotic,

Methamphetamine,
or Flunitrazepam

Sale (69.50.401(a)(1) (i) or (ii)) B+

C Violation of
Uniform Controlled

Substances Act
- Nonnarcotic Sale

(69.50.401(a)(1)(iii)) C

E Possession of
Marihuana <40 grams

(69.50.401(e)) E

C Fraudulently
Obtaining Controlled

Substance (69.50.403) C

C+ Sale of
Controlled Substance

for Profit (69.50.410) C+

E Unlawful Inhalation (9.47A.020) E

B Violation of
Uniform Controlled

Substances Act
- Narcotic,

Methamphetamine, or Flunitrazepam

Counterfeit
Substances

(69.50.401(b)(1) (i) or (ii)) B

C Violation of
Uniform Controlled

Substances Act - Nonnarcotic

Counterfeit
Substances

(69.50.401(b)(1) (iii), (iv), (v)) C

C Violation of
Uniform Controlled

Substances Act - Possession of a

Controlled
Substance

(69.50.401(d)) C

C Violation of
Uniform Controlled

Substances Act - Possession of a

Controlled
Substance

(69.50.401(c)) C

Firearms and Weapons

B Theft of Firearm (9A.56.300) C

B Possession of
Stolen Firearm

(9A.56.310) C

E Carrying Loaded
Pistol Without

Permit (9.41.050) E

C Possession of
Firearms by Minor (<18)

(9.41.040(1)(b)(iii)) C

D+ Possession of
Dangerous Weapon

(9.41.250) E

D Intimidating
Another Person by use

of Weapon (9.41.270) E

Homicide

A+ Murder 1 (9A.32.030) A

A+ Murder 2 (9A.32.050) B+

B+ Manslaughter 1 (9A.32.060) C+

C+ Manslaughter 2 (9A.32.070) D+

B+ Vehicular Homicide (46.61.520) C+

Kidnapping

A Kidnap 1 (9A.40.020) B+

B+ Kidnap 2 (9A.40.030) C+

C+ Unlawful
Imprisonment

(9A.40.040) D+

Obstructing
Governmental Operation

D Obstructing a
Law Enforcement

Officer (9A.76.020) E

E Resisting Arrest (9A.76.040) E

B Introducing
Contraband 1

(9A.76.140) C

C Introducing
Contraband 2

(9A.76.150) D

E Introducing
Contraband 3

(9A.76.160) E

B+ Intimidating a
Public Servant

(9A.76.180) C+

B+ Intimidating a
Witness

(9A.72.110) C+

Public
Disturbance

C+ Riot with Weapon (9A.84.010) D+

D+ Riot Without
Weapon

(9A.84.010) E

E Failure to
Disperse (9A.84.020) E

E Disorderly Conduct (9A.84.030) E

Sex Crimes

A Rape 1 (9A.44.040) B+

A- Rape 2 (9A.44.050) B+

C+ Rape 3 (9A.44.060) D+

A- Rape of a Child 1 (9A.44.073) B+

B+ Rape of a Child 2 (9A.44.076) C+

B Incest 1 (9A.64.020(1)) C

C Incest 2 (9A.64.020(2)) D

D+ Indecent
Exposure

(Victim <14) (9A.88.010) E

E Indecent Exposure

(Victim 14 or over) (9A.88.010) E

B+ Promoting Prostitution 1

(9A.88.070) C+

C+ Promoting
Prostitution 2

(9A.88.080) D+

E O & A (Prostitution) (9A.88.030) E

B+ Indecent Liberties (9A.44.100) C+

A- Child Molestation 1 (9A.44.083) B+

B Child Molestation 2 (9A.44.086) C+

Theft, Robbery,
Extortion, and Forgery

B Theft 1 (9A.56.030) C

C Theft 2 (9A.56.040) D

D Theft 3 (9A.56.050) E

B Theft of Livestock (9A.56.080) C

C Forgery (9A.60.020) D

A Robbery 1 (9A.56.200) B+

B+ Robbery 2 (9A.56.210) C+

B+ Extortion 1 (9A.56.120) C+

C+ Extortion 2 (9A.56.130) D+

B Possession of
Stolen Property 1

(9A.56.150) C

C Possession of
Stolen Property 2

(9A.56.160) D

D Possession of
Stolen Property 3

(9A.56.170) E

C Taking Motor
Vehicle Without

Owner's Permission (9A.56.070) D

Motor Vehicle
Related Crimes

E Driving Without
a License

(46.20.005) E

B+ Hit and Run - Death

(46.52.020(4)(a)) C+

C Hit and Run -
Injury

(46.52.020(4)(b)) D

D Hit and
Run-Attended

(46.52.020(5)) E

E Hit and
Run-Unattended

(46.52.010) E

C Vehicular Assault (46.61.522) D

C Attempting to
Elude Pursuing

Police Vehicle (46.61.024) D

E Reckless Driving (46.61.500) E

D Driving While
Under the Influence

(46.61.502 and 46.61.504) E

Other

B Bomb Threat (9.61.160) C

C Escape 11 (9A.76.110) C

C Escape
21 (9A.76.120) C

D Escape
3 (9A.76.130) E

E Obscene, Harassing, Etc.,

Phone
Calls (9.61.230) E

A Other Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Class A Felony B+

B Other Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Class B Felony C

C Other Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Class C Felony D

D Other Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Gross Misdemeanor E

E Other Offense Equivalent to an

Adult
Misdemeanor E

V Violation of Order of Restitution,

Community Supervision, or

Confinement
(13.40.200)2 V

1Escape 1 and 2 and Attempted
Escape 1 and 2 are classed as C offenses and the standard range is established
as follows:

1st
escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 4 weeks confinement

2nd
escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 8 weeks confinement

3rd
and subsequent escape or attempted escape during 12-month period - 12 weeks
confinement

2If the court finds that a respondent has violated terms
of an order, it may impose a penalty of up to 30 days of confinement.

JUVENILE SENTENCING STANDARDS

This schedule must be used for juvenile offenders.
The court may select sentencing option A, B, or C.

OPTION A

JUVENILE OFFENDER SENTENCING GRID

STANDARD RANGE

A+ 180 WEEKS TO AGE 21 YEARS

A 103 WEEKS TO 129 WEEKS

A- 15-36 |52-65 |80-100 |103-129

WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS|WEEKS

EXCEPT | | |

30-40 | | |

WEEKS FOR | | |

15-17 | | |

YEAR OLDS | | |

Current B+ 15-36 |52-65 |80-100 |103-129

Offense WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS |WEEKS

Category

B LOCAL | |52-65

SANCTIONS (LS) |15-36 WEEKS |WEEKS

C+ LS |

|15-36 WEEKS

C LS |15-36 WEEKS

Local Sanctions: |

0 to 30 Days

D+ LS 0 to 12 Months Community Supervision

0 to 150 Hours Community Service

D LS $0 to $500 Fine

E LS

0 1 2 3 4 or more

PRIOR ADJUDICATIONS

NOTE:
References in the grid to days or weeks mean periods of confinement.

(1)
The vertical axis of the grid is the current offense category. The current
offense category is determined by the offense of adjudication.

(2)
The horizontal axis of the grid is the number of prior adjudications included
in the juvenile's criminal history. Each prior felony adjudication shall count
as one point. Each prior violation, misdemeanor, and gross misdemeanor
adjudication shall count as 1/4 point. Fractional points shall be rounded
down.

(3)
The standard range disposition for each offense is determined by the
intersection of the column defined by the prior adjudications and the row
defined by the current offense category.

(4)
RCW 13.40.180 applies if the offender is being sentenced for more than one
offense.

(5)
A current offense that is a violation is equivalent to an offense category of
E. However, a disposition for a violation shall not include confinement.

OR

OPTION
B

CHEMICAL
DEPENDENCY DISPOSITION ALTERNATIVE

If
the juvenile offender is subject to a standard range disposition of local
sanctions or 15 to 36 weeks of confinement and has not committed an A- or B+
offense, the court may impose a disposition under RCW 13.40.160(((5))) (4)
and 13.40.165.

OR

OPTION
C

MANIFEST
INJUSTICE

If the court determines that
a disposition under option A or B would effectuate a manifest injustice, the
court shall impose a disposition outside the standard range under RCW
13.40.160(2).

--- END ---