BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.34.230 and 1995 c 318 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

For
the purpose of acquiring conservation futures ((as well as)) and
other rights and interests in real property pursuant to RCW 84.34.210 and
84.34.220, and for the development, maintenance, and operation of passive
recreational and interpretive facilities which enhance the conservation values
of the acquired properties, a county may levy an amount not to exceed six
and one-quarter cents per thousand dollars of assessed valuation against the
assessed valuation of all taxable property within the county. No more than
twenty-five percent of this levy may be used for development, maintenance, and
operation of allowable wages of the acquired properties. The limitations
in RCW 84.52.043 shall not apply to the tax levy authorized in this section.

Sec.
2. RCW
84.34.240 and 1971 ex.s. c 243 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Any board of county commissioners may establish by resolution a
special fund which may be termed a conservation futures fund to which it may
credit all taxes levied pursuant to RCW 84.34.230. Amounts placed in this fund
may be used ((solely)) for the purpose of acquiring rights and interests
in real property pursuant to the terms of RCW 84.34.210 and 84.34.220, and
for the development, maintenance, and operation of the real property.
Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting in any manner methods
and funds otherwise available to a county for financing the acquisition of such
rights and interests in real property.

---
END ---