BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 41.50 RCW to read as follows:

Each fiscal biennium, the department, in conjunction with the
office of financial management, shall produce and disseminate information on
the various options available to state employees for tax-deferred retirement
savings. This information shall be made available to every state employee and
shall include information regarding other available sources of information.

---
END ---