BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
41.40.088 and 1991 c 343 s 9 and 1991 c 35 s 96 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
A plan 1 member who is employed by a school district or districts, an
educational service district, the state school for the deaf, the state school
for the blind, institutions of higher education, or community colleges:

(a)
Shall receive a service credit month for each month of the period from
September through August of the following year if he or she is employed in an
eligible position, earns compensation earnable for six hundred thirty hours or
more during that period, and is employed during nine months of that period,
except that a member may not receive credit for any period prior to the
member's employment in an eligible position;

(b)
If a member in an eligible position does not meet the requirements of (a) of
this subsection, the member is entitled to a service credit month for each
month of the period he or she earns earnable compensation for seventy or more
hours; and the member is entitled to a one-quarter service credit month for
those calendar months during which he or she earned compensation for less than
seventy hours.

(2)
Except for any period prior to the member's employment in an eligible position,
a plan 2 member who is employed by a school district or districts, an
educational service district, the state school for the blind, the state school
for the deaf, institutions of higher education, or community colleges:

(a)
Shall receive a service credit month for each month of the period from
September through August of the following year if he or she is employed in an
eligible position, earns compensation earnable for eight hundred ten hours or
more during that period, and is employed during nine months of that period;

(b)
If a member in an eligible position for each month of the period from September
through August of the following year does not meet the hours requirements of
(a) of this subsection, the member is entitled to one-half service credit month
for each month of the period if he or she earns earnable compensation for at
least six hundred thirty hours but less than eight hundred ten hours during
that period, and is employed nine months of that period.

(c)
In all other instances, a member in an eligible position is entitled to service
credit months as follows:

(i)
One service credit month for each month in which compensation is earned for
ninety or more hours;

(ii)
One-half service credit month for each month in which compensation is earned
for at least seventy hours but less than ninety hours; and

(iii)
One-quarter service credit month for each month in which compensation is earned
for less than seventy hours.

(d)
The provisions of this subsection (2) are applicable to plan 2 members
prospectively from October 1, 1977.

(3)
The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2.
Section 1 of this act expires September 1, 2000.

---
END ---