BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.46.010 and 1994 c 272 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislative authority of any county or city shall identify in the adopted
budget the capital projects funded in whole or in part from the proceeds of the
tax authorized in this section, and shall indicate that such tax is intended to
be in addition to other funds that may be reasonably available for such capital
projects.

(2)
The legislative authority of any county or any city may impose an excise tax on
each sale of real property in the unincorporated areas of the county for the
county tax and in the corporate limits of the city for the city tax at a rate
not exceeding one-quarter of one percent of the selling price. The revenues
from this tax shall be used by any city or county with a population of five
thousand or less and any city or county that does not plan under RCW 36.70A.040
for any capital purpose identified in a capital improvements plan and local
capital improvements, including those listed in RCW 35.43.040.

After
April 30, 1992, revenues generated from the tax imposed under this subsection
in counties over five thousand population and cities over five thousand
population that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, except
for counties located west of the crest of the Cascade mountains with no marine
shoreline, shall be used solely for financing capital projects specified in
a capital facilities plan element of a comprehensive plan and housing
relocation assistance under RCW 59.18.440 and 59.18.450. However, revenues (a)
pledged by such counties and cities to debt retirement prior to April 30, 1992,
may continue to be used for that purpose until the original debt for which the
revenues were pledged is retired, or (b) committed prior to April 30, 1992, by
such counties or cities to a project may continue to be used for that purpose
until the project is completed.

(3)
In lieu of imposing the tax authorized in RCW 82.14.030(2), the legislative
authority of any county or any city may impose an additional excise tax on each
sale of real property in the unincorporated areas of the county for the county
tax and in the corporate limits of the city for the city tax at a rate not
exceeding one-half of one percent of the selling price.

(4)
Taxes imposed under this section shall be collected from persons who are taxable
by the state under chapter 82.45 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event
within the unincorporated areas of the county or within the corporate limits of
the city, as the case may be.

(5)
Taxes imposed under this section shall comply with all applicable rules,
regulations, laws, and court decisions regarding real estate excise taxes as
imposed by the state under chapter 82.45 RCW.

(6)
As used in this section, "city" means any city or town and
"capital project" means those public works projects of a local
government for planning, acquisition, construction, reconstruction, repair,
replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of streets; roads; highways;
sidewalks; street and road lighting systems; traffic signals; bridges; domestic
water systems; storm and sanitary sewer systems; parks; recreational
facilities; law enforcement facilities; fire protection facilities; trails;
libraries; administrative and/or judicial facilities; river and/or waterway
flood control projects by those jurisdictions that, prior to June 11, 1992,
have expended funds derived from the tax authorized by this section for such
purposes; and, until December 31, 1995, housing projects for those
jurisdictions that, prior to June 11, 1992, have expended or committed to
expend funds derived from the tax authorized by this section or the tax
authorized by RCW 82.46.035 for such purposes.

Sec.
2. RCW
82.46.035 and 1992 c 221 s 3 and 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 33 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislative authority of any county or city shall identify in the adopted
budget the capital projects funded in whole or in part from the proceeds of the
tax authorized in this section, and shall indicate that such tax is intended to
be in addition to other funds that may be reasonably available for such capital
projects.

(2)
The legislative authority of any county or any city that plans under RCW
36.70A.040(1) may impose an additional excise tax on each sale of real property
in the unincorporated areas of the county for the county tax and in the
corporate limits of the city for the city tax at a rate not exceeding
one-quarter of one percent of the selling price. Any county choosing to plan
under RCW 36.70A.040(2) and any city within such a county may only adopt an
ordinance imposing the excise tax authorized by this section if the ordinance
is first authorized by a proposition approved by a majority of the voters of
the taxing district voting on the proposition at a general election held within
the district or at a special election within the taxing district called by the
district for the purpose of submitting such proposition to the voters.

(3)
Revenues generated from the tax imposed under subsection (2) of this section
shall be used by such counties and cities, except for counties located west
of the crest of the Cascade mountains with no marine shoreline, solely for
financing capital projects specified in a capital facilities plan element of a
comprehensive plan. However, revenues (a) pledged by such counties and cities
to debt retirement prior to March 1, 1992, may continue to be used for that
purpose until the original debt for which the revenues were pledged is retired,
or (b) committed prior to March 1, 1992, by such counties or cities to a project
may continue to be used for that purpose until the project is completed.

(4)
Revenues generated by the tax imposed by this section shall be deposited in a
separate account.

(5)
As used in this section, "city" means any city or town and
"capital project" means those public works projects of a local
government for planning, acquisition, construction, reconstruction, repair,
replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of streets, roads, highways,
sidewalks, street and road lighting systems, traffic signals, bridges, domestic
water systems, storm and sanitary sewer systems, and planning, construction,
reconstruction, repair, rehabilitation, or improvement of parks.

(6) When the governor files a notice of noncompliance under RCW
36.70A.340 with the secretary of state and the appropriate county or city, the
county or city's authority to impose the additional excise tax under this
section shall be temporarily rescinded until the governor files a subsequent
notice rescinding the notice of noncompliance.

---
END ---