BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that retaining and enhancing the economic viability of farms
is vital to improving the prosperity of our rural economies. The legislature
finds that farm land will not be retained unless farming operations are
profitable. In order to improve the profitability of farms, market demand for
the agricultural products needs to be enhanced.

The
purpose of this act is to direct the department of agriculture to explore ways
to improve the market demand for fresh fruits and vegetables for growers of
Washington state, including a "Grown in Washington" promotional
program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The department of agriculture shall develop a proposed program for promoting
fresh fruits and vegetables that are grown in Washington. In developing the
proposed program, the department shall conduct an inquiry into the following
areas:

(a)
Developing a chart as to the seasonal availability of various fresh fruits and
vegetables grown in the state and list sources for the various products;

(b)
Developing concepts for various marketing techniques that could be employed
including a "Grown in Washington" promotional campaign and
"Grown in Washington" stickers for fresh fruits and vegetables;

(c)
Developing concepts for disseminating information and marketing strategies that
could be used to promote fresh fruit and vegetables to buyers; and

(d)
Working with growers involved in the fresh fruit and vegetable industry to
develop the program and make recommendations on how the program would be funded
including authorizing the formation of a commodity commission for funding and
administering the program.

(2)
The department of agriculture shall form an advisory committee to provide input
on the development of the proposed program.

(3)
The department of agriculture shall report its written findings and
recommendations to the appropriate committees of the senate and the house of
representatives by December 15, 1999.

(4)
This section expires December 31, 1999.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The
sum of seventy thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the general fund to
the department of agriculture for the purpose of this act.

---
END ---