BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"City" means any city with a population greater than one hundred
thousand that is located in a county with a population of less than four
hundred thousand; and

(2)
"Convention center" means a convention, conference, or special events
center, or any combination of such facilities, and related parking facilities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) A
city is authorized to acquire, construct, own, remodel, maintain, equip,
reequip, repair, and operate a convention center.

(2)
The city may impose charges and fees for the use of the convention center and
may accept and expend or use gifts, grants, and donations for the purpose of
the convention center.

(3)
The city may impose taxes authorized in this chapter and use revenues derived
therefrom for the purpose of paying principal and interest payments on bonds
issued by the city to construct a convention center under this chapter.

(4)
A city may use the supplemental alternative public works contracting procedures
set forth in chapter 39.10 RCW in connection with the design, construction,
reconstruction, remodel, or alteration of a convention center under this
chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1) A
city may issue revenue bonds to fund a convention center under this chapter, or
portions of facilities, which it is authorized to provide or operate under this
chapter. Whenever revenue bonds are to be issued, the city shall create or
have created a special fund or funds from which, along with any reserves
created pursuant to RCW 39.44.140, the principal and interest on such revenue
bonds shall exclusively be payable. The city may obligate itself to set aside
and pay into the special fund or funds a fixed proportion or a fixed amount of
the revenues from the convention center, and all related additions, that are
funded by the revenue bonds. This amount or proportion shall be a lien and
charge against these revenues, subject only to operating and maintenance
expenses. The city shall have due regard for the cost of operation and
maintenance of the convention center, or additions, that are funded by the
revenue bonds, and shall not set aside into the special fund or funds a greater
amount or proportion of the revenues that in its judgment will be available
over and above the cost of maintenance and operation and the amount or
proportion, if any, of the revenue so previously pledged. The city may also
provide that revenue bonds payable out of the same source or sources of revenue
may later be issued on a parity with any revenue bonds being issued and sold.

(2)
Revenue bonds issued pursuant to this section shall not be an indebtedness of
the city issuing the bonds, and the interest and principal on the bonds shall
only be payable from the revenues lawfully pledged to meet the principal and
interest requirements and any reserves created pursuant to RCW 39.44.140. The
owner or bearer of a revenue bond or any interest coupon issued pursuant to
this section shall not have any claim against the city arising from the bond or
coupon except for payment from the revenues lawfully pledged to meet the
principal and interest requirements and any reserves created pursuant to RCW
39.44.140. The substance of the limitations included in this subsection shall
be plainly printed, written, or engraved on each bond issued pursuant to this
section.

(3)
Revenue bonds with a maturity in excess of thirty years shall not be issued.
The city shall by resolution determine for each revenue bond issue, the amount,
date, form, terms, conditions, denominations, maximum fixed or variable
interest rate or rates, maturity or maturities, redemption rights, registration
privileges, manner of execution, manner of sale, callable provisions, if any,
and covenants including the refunding of existing revenue bonds. Facsimile
signatures may be used on the bonds and any coupons. Refunding revenue bonds
may be issued in the same manner as revenue bonds are issued.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
city may levy and fix a tax of not more than one cent on twenty cents or
fraction thereof to be paid by the person who pays an admission charge to the
convention center. This includes a tax on persons who are admitted free of
charge or at reduced rates if other persons pay a charge or a regular higher
charge for the same privileges or accommodations.

The
term "admission charge" includes:

(1)
A charge made for season tickets or subscriptions;

(2)
A cover charge, or a charge made for use of seats and tables reserved or
otherwise, and other similar accommodations;

(3)
A charge made for food and refreshment if free entertainment, recreation, or
amusement is provided;

(4)
A charge made for rental or use of equipment or facilities for purposes of
recreation or amusement; if the rental of the equipment or facilities is
necessary to the enjoyment of a privilege for which a general admission is
charged, the combined charges shall be considered as the admission charge;

(5)
Automobile parking charges if the amount of the charge is determined according
to the number of passengers in the automobile.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A city authorized to construct a convention center under chapter 35.‑-‑
RCW (sections 1 through 4 of this act) may impose a sales and use tax in
accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is in addition to other
taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those persons who are
taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of
any taxable event within the city. The rate of tax shall not exceed 0.033
percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or value of the article
used in the case of a use tax.

(2)
The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be deducted from the
amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department
of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department of revenue shall
perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the county at no cost to the
city.

(3)
No tax may be collected under this section before August 1, 2000. The tax
imposed in this section shall expire when the bonds issued for the construction
of the convention center are retired, but not more than twenty years after the
tax is first collected.

(4)
Moneys collected under this section shall only be used for the purposes set
forth in section 2 of this act.

(5)
The definitions in section 1 of this act apply to this section.

Sec.
6. RCW
36.38.010 and 1997 c 220 s 301 (Referendum Bill No. 48) are each amended to
read as follows:

(1)
Any county may by ordinance enacted by its county legislative authority, levy
and fix a tax of not more than one cent on twenty cents or fraction thereof to
be paid for county purposes by persons who pay an admission charge to any
place, including a tax on persons who are admitted free of charge or at reduced
rates to any place for which other persons pay a charge or a regular higher
charge for the same or similar privileges or accommodations; and require that
one who receives any admission charge to any place shall collect and remit the
tax to the county treasurer of the county: PROVIDED, No county shall impose
such tax on persons paying an admission to any activity of any elementary or
secondary school.

(2)
As used in this chapter, the term "admission charge" includes a
charge made for season tickets or subscriptions, a cover charge, or a charge
made for use of seats and tables, reserved or otherwise, and other similar
accommodations; a charge made for food and refreshments in any place where any
free entertainment, recreation, or amusement is provided; a charge made for
rental or use of equipment or facilities for purpose of recreation or
amusement, and where the rental of the equipment or facilities is necessary to
the enjoyment of a privilege for which a general admission is charged, the
combined charges shall be considered as the admission charge. It shall also
include any automobile parking charge where the amount of such charge is
determined according to the number of passengers in any automobile.

(3)
Subject to subsections (4) and (5) of this section, the tax herein authorized
shall not be exclusive and shall not prevent any city or town within the taxing
county, when authorized by law, from imposing within its corporate limits a tax
of the same or similar kind: PROVIDED, That whenever the same or similar kind
of tax is imposed by any such city or town under RCW 35.21.280, no such
tax shall be levied within the corporate limits of such city or town by the
county.

(4)
Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, the legislative authority of a
county with a population of one million or more may exclusively levy taxes on
events in baseball stadiums constructed on or after January 1, 1995, that are
owned by a public facilities district under chapter 36.100 RCW and that have
seating capacities over forty thousand at the rates of:

(a)
Not more than one cent on twenty cents or fraction thereof, to be used for the
purpose of paying the principal and interest payments on bonds issued by a
county to construct a baseball stadium as defined in RCW 82.14.0485. If the
revenue from the tax exceeds the amount needed for that purpose, the excess
shall be placed in a contingency fund which may only be used to pay
unanticipated capital costs on the baseball stadium, excluding any cost
overruns on initial construction; and

(b)
Not more than one cent on twenty cents or fraction thereof, to be used for the
purpose of paying the principal and interest payments on bonds issued by a
county to construct a baseball stadium as defined in RCW 82.14.0485. The tax
imposed under this subsection (4)(b) shall expire when the bonds issued for the
construction of the baseball stadium are retired, but not later than twenty
years after the tax is first collected.

(5)
Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, the legislative authority of a
county that has created a public stadium authority to develop a stadium and
exhibition center under RCW 36.102.050 may levy and fix a tax on charges for
admission to events in a stadium and exhibition center, as defined in RCW
36.102.010, constructed in the county on or after January 1, 1998, that is
owned by a public stadium authority under chapter 36.102 RCW. The tax shall be
exclusive and shall preclude the city or town within which the stadium and
exhibition center is located from imposing a tax of the same or similar kind on
charges for admission to events in the stadium and exhibition center, and shall
preclude the imposition of a general county admissions tax on charges for
admission to events in the stadium and exhibition center. For the purposes of
this subsection, "charges for admission to events" means only the
actual admission charge, exclusive of taxes and service charges and the value
of any other benefit conferred by the admission. The tax authorized under this
subsection shall be at the rate of not more than one cent on ten cents or
fraction thereof. Revenues collected under this subsection shall be deposited
in the stadium and exhibition center account under RCW 43.99N.060 until the
bonds issued under RCW 43.99N.020 for the construction of the stadium and
exhibition center are retired. After the bonds issued for the construction of
the stadium and exhibition center are retired, the tax authorized under this
section shall be used exclusively to fund repair, reequipping, and capital
improvement of the stadium and exhibition center. The tax under this
subsection may be levied upon the first use of any part of the stadium and
exhibition center but shall not be collected at any facility already in
operation as of July 17, 1997.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 35 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---