BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as otherwise provided, the transportation budget of the state is
hereby adopted and, subject to the provisions hereinafter set forth, the
several amounts hereinafter specified, or as much thereof as may be necessary
to accomplish the purposes designated, are hereby appropriated from the several
accounts and funds hereinafter named to the designated state agencies and
offices for employee compensation and other expenses, for capital projects, and
for other specified purposes, including the payment of any final judgments
arising out of such activities, for the period ending June 30, 2001.

(2)
Legislation with fiscal impacts enacted in the 1997 or 1998 legislative session
not assumed in this act are not funded in the 1997-99 transportation budget.

(3)
Except as otherwise provided, legislation with fiscal impacts enacted in
the 1999 and 2000 legislative session not assumed in this act are not
funded in the 1999-01 transportation budget.

(4)
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this
subsection apply throughout this act.

(a)
"Fiscal year 2000" or "FY 2000" means the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2000.

(b)
"Fiscal year 2001" or "FY 2001" means the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2001.

(c)
"FTE" means full-time equivalent.

(((d)))
(f) "Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall
return to an unappropriated status.

(((e)))
(g) "Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent
only for the specified purpose. Unless otherwise specifically authorized in
this act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified purpose
which is unnecessary to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.

(((f)))
(h) "Performance-based budgeting" means a budget that bases
resource needs on quantified outcomes and results expected from use of the
total appropriation. "Performance-based budgeting" does not mean
incremental budgeting that focuses on justifying changes from the historic
budget or to line-item input-driven budgets.

(((g)))
(i) "Goals" means the statements of purpose that identify a
desired result or outcome. The statements shall be realistic, achievable,
directive, assignable, evaluative, and logically linked to the agency's mission
and statutory mandate.

(((h)))
(j) "Strategic plan" means the strategies agencies create for
investment choices in the future. All agency strategic plans shall present
alternative investment strategies for providing services.

Sec.
2. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 2 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The
legislature recognizes that the 1999 endangered species act listing or proposed
listing of salmonid species throughout the state of Washington may require
increased operational and capital expenditures for transportation. As the
state's fiscal obligations pursuant to the listing or proposed listing become
clearer over time, it may be necessary to revisit funding decisions reflected
in this act in order to shift resources to meet those obligations. The
department of transportation, the transportation improvement board, and the
county road administration board shall report to the legislature on December 1,
1999, and December 1, 2000, on capital project delay impacts, including
impact on costs and project delivery, due to the endangered species act listing
or proposed listing.

PART
I

GENERAL
GOVERNMENT AGENCIES-‑OPERATING

Sec.
101. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 101 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF AGRICULTURE

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ ((327,000))

350,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

((The
entire)) (1) $295,000 of the motor vehicle account--state
appropriation is provided solely for costs associated with the motor fuel
quality program.

(2)
$39,000 of the motor vehicle account‑‑state appropriation is
provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 6856 in the form passed by the
legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6856 is not enacted in the form passed by the
legislature this amount shall lapse.

Sec.
102. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 102 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE LEGISLATIVE
EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ ((900,000))

887,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
$103,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the local government
finance reporting system project. This amount shall lapse unless $207,000 is
appropriated for this project from the state general fund; and

(2)
$202,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the transportation
infrastructure needs data base project. This amount shall lapse unless
$405,000 is appropriated for this project in the omnibus operations
appropriations act.

(3)
$325,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for contracting with the
office of the state auditor for the collection of local government fiscal data
associated with the local government finance reporting system. In implementing
the reporting system, the legislative evaluation and accountability program
shall work with the local government finance study technical advisory
committee. The committee shall include, but not be limited to, one member from
the senate and one member from the house of representatives. An alternate
legislator shall also be picked for each designated legislator to serve in the
event that the designated legislator is unable to fulfill his or her duties on
the committee. This amount shall lapse unless the legislature appropriates
$325,000 for the same purpose by June 30, 1999, in the omnibus appropriations
act.

(4)
To the extent possible, the appropriation in subsections (1) through (3) of
this section shall utilize funds allocated under RCW 46.68.110(2).

(5)
The legislative evaluation and accountability program shall dedicate one FTE of
resource and time to serve house of representatives and senate transportation
budget-related activities.

Sec.
103. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 103 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE UTILITIES
AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION

Grade
Crossing Protective Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ ((111,000))

222,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The utilities and transportation commission shall develop a competitive rail
grade crossing safety grant program which will fully fund selected safety
projects to the extent allowable under chapter 81.53 RCW.

(((3)
The appropriation in this section is for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000.))

(2)
The utilities and transportation commission in conjunction with the department
of transportation and the Spokane regional transportation council shall study
and make recommendations on issues relating to railroad rights of way in the
Spokane valley. A status report must be provided to the transportation
committees of the house of representatives and the senate by December 1, 2000.

(3)
To the extent possible under current program guidelines, the utilities and
transportation commission's small projects program and grade crossing
protection program shall give preference to those projects that enhance safety
at railroad lines that operate high speed trains and are located within city
limits.

Sec.
104. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 104 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE
PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ ((931,000))

859,000

The appropriation in this section is subject to the following
conditions and limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that
activity: A report of actual expenditures and descriptions of the expenditures
from the motor vehicle fund will be submitted to the legislature with the
governor's 2001-2003 biennial budget request.

(End of part)

PART
II

TRANSPORTATION
AGENCIES

Sec.
201. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE WASHINGTON
TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION

Highway
Safety Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ ((1,452,000))

726,000

((Highway
Safety Account‑-Federal Appropriation $ 9,038,000

School
Zone Safety Account‑-State Appropriation $ 1,004,000))

Traffic
Safety Improvement--State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,471,000

Traffic
Safety Improvement--Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 9,038,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((11,494,000))

13,235,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
$25,000 of the highway safety account‑-state is provided as a one-time
appropriation to implement the Cooper Jones act, chapter 165, Laws of 1998.

(2)
$2,417,000 of the traffic safety improvement account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 6856 enacted in the form passed by
the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6856 is not enacted in the form passed by
the legislature this amount shall lapse. The amount provided in this
subsection is provided solely for state and local government safety projects.
Special consideration shall be given for school zone safety projects, bicycle
and pedestrian safety projects, and construction zone safety projects, to be
determined by the Washington traffic safety commission.

(3)
The Washington traffic safety commission may oversee no more than four pilot
projects regarding the use of traffic safety cameras at school zones and/or
railroad crossings and no more than one pilot project regarding the use of
traffic safety cameras at school zones, stoplights, and/or railroad crossings.
The traffic safety commission shall use the following guidelines to administer
the program:

(a)
Traffic safety cameras may take pictures of the vehicle and vehicle license
plate only;

(b)
The law enforcement agency of the city or county government shall plainly mark
the locations where the automated traffic enforcement system is used by placing
signs on street locations that clearly indicate to a driver that he or she is
entering a zone where traffic laws are enforced by an automated traffic
enforcement system;

(c)
Cities and counties using traffic safety cameras must provide periodic notice
by mail to its citizens indicating the zones in which the traffic safety
cameras will be used;

(d)
Notices of infractions must be mailed to the registered owner of a vehicle
within fourteen days of the infraction occurring;

(e)
The owner of the vehicle is not responsible for the violation if the owner of
the vehicle, within fifteen days after notification of the violation, furnishes
the officials or agents of the municipality that issued the citation with:

(i)
An affidavit made under oath, stating that the vehicle involved was, at the
time, stolen or in the care, custody, or control of some person other than the
registered owner; or

(ii)
Testimony in open court under oath that the person was not the operator of the
vehicle at the time of the alleged violation;

(f)
Infractions detected through the use of traffic safety cameras are not part of
the registered owner's driving record under RCW 46.52.101 and 46.52.120;

(g)
By January 1, 2001, the traffic safety commission shall provide a report to the
legislature regarding the use, public acceptance, outcomes, and other relevant
issues regarding traffic safety cameras demonstrated by the pilot projects.

Sec.
202. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE BOARD
OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERS

Pilotage
Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ ((290,000))

240,000

Sec.
203. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE COUNTY
ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD

Rural
Arterial Trust Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((72,510,000))

60,556,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((9,546,000))

1,643,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 376,000

County
Arterial Preservation Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((28,612,000))

28,533,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((111,044,000))

91,108,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: (($8,000,000))
$240,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided
solely for ((projects on the freight and goods systems on county roads))
the completion of a report updating the legislature on the progress of
projects for the freight and goods road system on county roads.

Sec.
204. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE TRANSPORTATION
IMPROVEMENT BOARD

Urban
Arterial Trust Account‑-State

Appropriation...................... ........ $ ((104,508,000))

104,358,000

Transportation
Improvement Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((99,414,000))

128,798,000

Public
Transportation Systems Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((33,496,000))

11,000,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 20,000,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((237,418,000))

264,156,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
To the extent practicable, the board shall give preference, for amounts which
would otherwise be granted to cities, to ((those)) arterial
improvement program projects which complement Washington state
department of transportation projects funded under the county and city
corridor congestion relief programs contained in section ((231(8)))
232 of this act.

(2)
The transportation improvement account‑-state appropriation includes
$40,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.26.500 and
the motor vehicle account--state appropriation includes $20,000,000 in proceeds
from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.843. These funds shall be
expended, in part, for the following projects:

(a)
Longview Port Alternate Rail Corridor;

(b)
Pt. Everett California Street Over-Crossing;

(c)
Union Gap's Valley Mall Boulevard Extension;

(d)
Pierce County's 8th Street East/BNSF Mainline Grade Separation;

(e)
Tukwila's 180th Street Grade Separation;

(f)
Everett's Riverfront Over-Crossing/Riverfront Parkway; and

(g)
Prosser Wine Country Road Project.

Sec.
205. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SENATE

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((2,586,000))

2,436,000

((The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is provided solely to fund the activities of
the senate transportation committee.

(2)
The senate transportation committee shall work during the 1999 interim with
members of the senate ways and means committee to assess funding options for
aviation.

(3)
The senate transportation committee shall evaluate the transportation functions
currently performed by the utilities and transportation commission including
but not limited to those regarding the issuance of certificates of public
convenience and necessity for auto transportation companies.

(4)
A legislative task force consisting of one member from each caucus of the
senate and one member from each caucus of the house of representatives shall
conduct a road jurisdiction study. The legislative task force shall appoint a
technical advisory panel consisting of representatives of cities, counties, and
the department of transportation. The study shall include but not be limited
to an examination of the following issues:

(a)
Whether changed conditions merit redesignation of certain local roadways as
state routes and the return of certain state routes to local jurisdictions;

(b)
Alternatives to current revenue distribution methodologies for funding roadway
and highway needs;

(c)
Determine roadway responsibilities, authorities, and practices by
jurisdictional level; and

(d)
Evaluate governance issues associated with road jurisdiction.

(5)
The committee shall oversee program accountability reviews of department of
transportation, department of licensing, and Washington state patrol programs
selected by the senate transportation committee.))

Sec.
206. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE LEGISLATIVE TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE

Motor
Vehicle Account--State Appropriation..... $ ((4,283,000))

3,633,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
$2,467,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided for
the operation of the house of representatives transportation committee. The
appropriation includes $500,000 for personal service contracts and other
activities as deemed necessary by the house of representatives transportation
committee.

(2)
((The transportation committees of the legislature shall evaluate the
transportation functions currently performed by the utilities and
transportation commission including but not limited to those regarding the
issuance of certificates of public convenience and necessity for auto transportation
companies.

(3)
A legislative task force consisting of one member from each caucus of the
senate and one member from each caucus of the house of representatives shall
conduct a road jurisdiction study. The legislative task force shall appoint a
technical advisory panel consisting of representatives of cities, counties, and
the department of transportation. The study shall include but not be limited
to an examination of the following issues:

(a)
Whether changed conditions merit redesignation of certain local roadways as
state routes and the return of certain state routes to local jurisdictions;

(b)
Alternatives to current revenue distribution methodologies for funding roadway
and highway needs;

(c)
Determine roadway responsibilities, authorities, and practices by
jurisdictional level; and

(d)
Evaluate governance issues associated with road jurisdiction.

(4)
The transportation committees of the legislature shall oversee program
accountability reviews of department of transportation, department of licensing,
and Washington state patrol programs selected by the senate transportation
committee)) To the extent possible, this appropriation shall
utilize funds allocated under RCW 46.68.110(2).

Sec.
207. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE BLUE
RIBBON COMMISSION ON TRANSPORTATION

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 1,800,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: (((1)))
The $1,800,000 motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for the purpose of enabling the blue ribbon commission on transportation
to fulfill its mission. The funds are to be administered by the senate
transportation committee and the house of representatives transportation
committee on behalf of the blue ribbon commission on transportation. To the
extent possible, this appropriation shall utilize funds allocated under RCW
46.68.110(2).

Sec.
208. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE MARINE
EMPLOYEES COMMISSION

Puget
Sound Ferry Operations Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ ((356,000))

322,000

Sec.
209. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE TRANSPORTATION
COMMISSION

((Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation........ $........................................... 807,000))

Motor
Vehicle Account--State Appropriation.......... $ 767,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: The
commission shall comply with the requirements in chapter 43.88 RCW when
developing the 2001-03 biennial budget requests.

Sec.
210. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE FREIGHT
MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD

((Transportation
Account)) Multimodal Fund‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((600,000))

521,000

Sec.
211. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL‑-FIELD OPERATIONS
BUREAU

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((154,538,000))

152,946,000

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-

Federal
Appropriation...................... $ 6,153,000

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-

Private/Local
Appropriation................ $ 169,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((160,860,000))

159,268,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
((The following amounts are provided solely for administration of the field
operations group subprogram: $120,372,000 of the state patrol highway account‑-state
appropriation; $2,854,000 of the state patrol highway account‑-federal
appropriation; and $83,000 of the state patrol highway account‑-private/local
appropriation.

(2))) The
following amounts are provided solely for the administration of the commercial
vehicle division subprogram: (($26,367,000)) $26,025,000 of the
state patrol highway account‑-state appropriation; $3,299,000 of the
state patrol highway account‑-federal appropriation; and $86,000 of the
state patrol highway account‑-private/local appropriation. The
appropriations shall only be used for commercial vehicle division activities
and shall not be used for other activities in the investigative services
bureau.

(((3)
$7,799,000 of the state patrol highway account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for the administration of the traffic investigation division
subprogram. This appropriation shall not be used for activities within the
investigative services bureau.

(4)
$1,137,000 of the state patrol highway account--state appropriation is provided
solely for the license fraud task force to begin on July 1, 1999. Positions
funded are one sergeant/detective, three Washington state patrol detectives,
and one clerical support person, for administrative support for the task force
as a whole. $115,400 of this amount is for reimbursement to the department of
revenue and $228,315 of this amount is for reimbursement to the attorney
general's office. If Senate Bill No. 5706 is not enacted in the form passed by
the legislature the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. Any funds
provided in this subsection not used to implement Senate Bill No. 5706 as
enacted by the legislature shall revert at the end of the 1999-01 biennium.

(5))) (2)
$1,435,000 of the state patrol highway account‑-state appropriation
is provided solely to the field operations group subprogram as a one-time
appropriation to begin funding phase III of the Washington state patrol's
upgrade to the state-wide emergency communication system. The Washington state
patrol shall provide a full analysis of the costs, benefits, and requirements
for completing all phases of the upgrade to the state-wide emergency
communication system to the senate transportation committee and the house of
representatives transportation committee by December 1, 1999.

(((6)))
(3) The Washington state patrol is authorized to use the federal
community-oriented policing program (COPS) for 18 COPS troopers to begin in
July 2000. The troopers must be used on the state's highways and up to six may
be utilized in the Vancouver, Washington area.

(4)
The Washington state patrol shall discontinue the vehicle license fraud
enforcement unit.

(5)
By June 30, 2000, the Washington state patrol shall fill a minimum of 21
commercial vehicle enforcement officer (CVEO) positions with noncommissioned
officers. If less than 21 CVEO vacancies exist, the state patrol shall hire or
transfer the appropriate number of noncommissioned personnel to eliminate all
CVEO vacancies in the commercial vehicle enforcement division.

(6)
$250,000 of the state patrol highway account--state appropriation is provided
solely for a vehicle camera pilot project. The patrol shall install video
cameras in 50 vehicles before August 31, 2000. The state patrol must report to
the transportation committees of the house of representatives and the senate by
January 1, 2001, on the effectiveness of video cameras in aiding on-road
traffic enforcement services and providing officer safety.

Sec.
212. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL‑-SUPPORT
SERVICES BUREAU

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((67,015,000))

65,634,000

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-

Federal
Appropriation...................... $ 104,000

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-

Private/Local
Appropriation................ $ 743,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((67,862,000))

66,481,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: $877,000
of the state patrol highway account‑‑state appropriation is
provided solely to maintain pursuit vehicles and provide for replacement of the
vehicles at 110,000 miles. The agency may purchase a total of 354 pursuit
vehicles during the biennium ending June 30, 2001. The appropriation in this
section reflects carry forward and new funding due to the consolidation of
gasoline, maintenance, parts, and pursuit vehicles into the fleet section of
the support services bureau.

Sec.
213. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING‑-MANAGEMENT
AND SUPPORT SERVICES

DOL
Services Account--State

Appropriation.............................. $ 123,000

Marine
Fuel Tax Refund Account--State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,000

Motorcycle
Safety Education Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((118,000))

102,000

Wildlife
Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ ((50,000))

80,000

Highway
Safety Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((6,578,000))

6,925,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((4,571,000))

3,832,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((11,317,000))

11,065,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:
$100,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is provided solely
for an independent study regarding the organizational structure of the
department of licensing. The study must include:

(1)
An examination of the current organizational structure of the department;

(2)
Recommendations on ways the department could reorganize to operate more
efficiently;

(3)
An examination of the available methods for providing licensing services
directly to citizens, either through department of licensing offices or
electronically. The department must include the findings of the study as part
of its 2001-03 biennial budget request;

(4)
$48,000 of the highway safety account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for the driver history initiative project, which requires the department
to contract the services of computer programmers to construct and implement a
program for the electronic transfer of citation information for the Seattle
municipal court directly to the department of licensing; and

(5)
$10,000 of the highway safety account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely to implement Senate Bill No. 6264 as enacted in the form passed by the
legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6264 is not enacted in the form passed by the
legislature this amount shall lapse.

Sec.
214. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING‑-INFORMATION
SYSTEMS

Marine
Fuel Tax Refund Account--State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,000

DOL
Services Account--State Appropriation...... $ 292,000

Motorcycle
Safety Education Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((102,000))

44,000

Wildlife
Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ ((46,000))

32,000

Highway
Safety Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ ((5,725,000))

5,757,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((3,651,000))

2,780,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((9,524,000))

8,907,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
$745,000 of the highway safety fund‑-state appropriation is a
reappropriation of funds originally appropriated for the document scanner
project in the 1997-99 biennium.

(2)
$28,000 of the highway safety account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for the driver history initiative project, which requires the department
to contract the services of computer programmers to construct and implement a
program for the electronic transfer of citation information for the Seattle
municipal court directly to the department of licensing.

(3)
$2,000 of the highway safety account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely to implement Senate Bill No. 6264 as enacted in the form passed by the
legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6264 is not enacted in the form passed by the
legislature this amount shall lapse.

Sec.
215. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF LICENSING‑-VEHICLE SERVICES

Marine
Fuel Tax Refund Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 26,000

Wildlife
Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 556,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((56,137,000))

53,139,000

DOL
Services Account‑-State Appropriation...... $ ((2,907,000))

4,232,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((59,626,000))

57,953,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(((4)))
(1) $300,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 6009 enacted in the form passed by
the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6009 is not enacted in the form passed by
the legislature the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((5)))
(2) $15,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement House Bill No. 2201 enacted in the form passed by
the legislature.

(3)
$300,000 of the DOL services account‑‑state appropriation is
provided solely for the purchase and implementation of a revenue system to
accompany the department's electronic commerce initiative.

Sec.
216. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF LICENSING‑-DRIVER SERVICES

Motorcycle
Safety Education Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 1,960,000

Highway
Safety Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ ((78,075,000))

78,141,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((80,035,000))

80,101,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$682,000 of the highway safety account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for the driver history initiative project, which requires the
department to contract the services of computer programmers to construct and
implement a program for the electronic transfer of citation information for the
Seattle municipal court directly to the department of licensing.

(2)
The department shall report to the transportation committees of the house of
representatives and the senate on the progress of the driver history initiative
project and make recommendations for implementing this project on a state-wide
level. The department must include its findings and recommendations as part of
its biennial budget request.

(3)
$2,880,000 of the highway safety account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for the department to enter into a contract for the implementation of an
improved state driver's license and identicard. The contract with the vendor
providing the improved license and identicard shall state that the license and
the identicard shall not contain: (a) The driver's social security number in
either visible or machine readable form; or (b) the driver's fingerprint or thumbprint.
Consistent with RCW 42.17.260(9) the department shall not sell or otherwise
make available any information that it gathers from citizens of the state of
Washington in administering the driver's licensing program except as already
authorized in Title 46 RCW.

(((2)))
(4) In September of 1999 the department of licensing shall report to the
senate transportation committee and the house of representatives transportation
committee on:

(a)
The controls implemented by the department to ensure the integrity and
credibility of the written driver's license test administered by the
department; and

(b)
The policies and procedures implemented by the department to ensure that the
driver's manuals produced and distributed by the department contain correct
data based on current federal, state, and local statutes, ordinances, and
rules.

(((4)))
(5) $17,000 of the highway safety fund--state appropriation is provided
solely to implement House Bill No. 1774 enacted in the form passed by the
legislature. If House Bill No. 1774 is not enacted in the form passed by the
legislature the amount referenced in this subsection shall lapse.

(((5)))
(6) $130,000 of the highway safety fund‑-state appropriation is
provided solely to implement House Bill No. 2259 enacted in the form passed by
the legislature. If House Bill No. 2259 is not enacted in the form passed by the
legislature the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((6)))
(7) $34,000 of the highway safety fund‑-state appropriation is
provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5374 enacted in the form passed by
the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 5374 is not enacted in the form passed by
the legislature the amount referenced in this subsection shall lapse.

(8)
$329,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is provided solely
to implement Senate Bill No. 5399 enacted as passed by the legislature.

(9)
$57,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is provided solely
to implement Senate Bill No. 6264 enacted in the form passed by the
legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6264 is not enacted in the form passed by the
legislature this amount shall lapse.

(10)
$46,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is provided solely
to implement Senate Bill No. 6785 enacted in the form passed by the
legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6785 is not enacted in the form passed by the
legislature this amount shall lapse.

Sec.
217. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-HIGHWAY
MANAGEMENT AND FACILITIES‑-PROGRAM D‑-OPERATING

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((44,508,000))

45,236,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation... $ 400,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((44,908,000))

45,636,000

Sec.
218. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-AVIATION‑-PROGRAM F

Aeronautics
Account‑-State Appropriation........ $...................................... ((4,010,000))

4,800,000

Aircraft
Search and Rescue Safety and

Education
Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 159,000

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ ((247,000))

47,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((4,416,000))

5,006,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: Grants awarded by the department of transportation shall
emphasize safety-related activities.

Sec.
219. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((630,010,000))

327,648,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation... $ ((234,939,000))

319,547,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ ((43,344,000))

52,079,000

((High
Capacity Transportation Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 110,000))

Special
Category C Account‑-State Appropriation $ 55,220,000

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ ((197,284,000))

7,564,000

Transportation
Account‑-Federal Appropriation... $........................................... ((56,808,000))

4,238,000

Puyallup
Tribal Settlement Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 8,662,000

((Transportation
Infrastructure Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,750,000

Transportation
Infrastructure Account‑-

Private/Local
Appropriation................ $ 1,750,000))

Multimodal
Fund‑-State Appropriation........... $ 24,908,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((1,229,877,000))

799,866,000

The
appropriations in this section are provided for the location, design, right of
way acquisition, or construction of state highway projects designated as
improvements under RCW 47.05.030. The appropriations in this section are
subject to the following conditions and limitations and specified amounts are
provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The special category C account‑-state appropriation of $55,220,000
includes $40,500,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by ((Senate
Bill No. 5060 or House Bill No. 1203 enacted in the form passed by the
legislature)) RCW 47.10.812. The transportation commission may
authorize the use of current revenues available to the department of
transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state
appropriation.

(2)
The motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation includes $1,285,000 in
proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.819(1) for match on
federal demonstration projects. The transportation commission may authorize
the use of current revenues available to the department of transportation in
lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.

(3)
The department shall report December 1st and June 1st of each year to the
senate transportation committee and the house of representatives transportation
committee and the office of financial management on the timing and the scope of
work being performed for the regional transit authority known as sound
transit. This report shall provide a description of all department activities
related to the regional transit authority including investments in state‑owned
infrastructure.

(4)
The motor vehicle account‑-federal appropriation in this section is
transferrable to the transportation account or multimodal fund to ensure
efficient funds management and program delivery.

(5)
((The north Sumner interchange project shall be funded entirely from the
motor vehicle account appropriation.)) $2,270,000 of the motor vehicle
account--state appropriation is provided solely for the north Sumner
interchange project. The project shall no longer receive a portion of its
funding from the economic development account.

(((6)
$34,920,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for the state program share of freight mobility projects as identified
by the freight mobility strategic investment board. The amount provided in
this subsection can only be expended upon authorization from the freight
mobility strategic investment board.

(7))) (6)
The motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation includes (($469,779,000))
$128,735,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.843. The transportation commission may authorize the use of current
revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds
for any part of the state appropriation.

(((8)
$500,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for analysis and design of congestion solutions at the intersections of
the South Lake Union/Mercer corridor with Interstate 5 and SR 99. The amount
provided in this subsection shall be expended on the state's portion of the
project. The department's authority to expend the amount referenced in this
subsection is contingent on the city of Seattle appropriating $500,000 or more
toward design and analysis for the local street portion of the project.

(9)
$10,000,000)) (7) $50,000,000 of the motor vehicle
account--state appropriation ((and $40,000,000 of the transportation account‑-state
appropriation are)) is provided as a cash contribution for the
development of the public private initiatives project at Tacoma Narrows. State
funds shall be used initially for the acquisition of right of way and the
forensic studies of the existing bridge including purchase of equipment
necessary to conduct the studies. The balance of state funds not required for
acquisition of right of way and forensic studies shall be placed with the
designated bond trustee at the same time the privately secured debt proceeds
are deposited. $5,527,000 of the amount provided in this subsection shall
be reimbursed from proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.834
for all forms of cash contributions, or the payment of other costs incident to
the location, development, design, right of way, and construction of the Tacoma
narrows bridge improvements under the public-private transportation initiative
program authorized under chapter 47.46 RCW.

(((11)))
(8) $5,800,000 of the motor vehicle account‑‑state
appropriation is provided solely for the completion of the weigh stations at
Stanwood and Cle Elum along with weigh in motion at those sites an weigh in
motion at Fort Lewis Northbound. The Washington state patrol and department of
transportation shall work cooperatively to complete these projects.

(((12)))
(9) $485,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is
a reappropriation provided solely to enable the translake committee to finalize
and present its recommendations. Upon presentation of the recommendations, or
upon the expenditure of the appropriation provided by this subsection, the
department of transportation shall disband the committee.

(((13)))
(10) $800,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-((state)) federal
appropriation is provided solely to the Washington state department of
transportation, ((office of urban mobility,)) to advance the
recommendations of the translake Washington study committee. These funds shall
be used to develop a scope of work for an environmental impact statement and
related engineering work, including an environmental strategy, a decision
process, a statement of purpose and need, and a formal notice of intent. None
of the appropriation for the scope of work for the environmental impact
statement shall be available to support any activities of the translake
Washington study committee.

(((14)))
(11) (($500,000)) $1,166,000 of the motor vehicle fund‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for predesign of the northeast 44th street
interchange on I-405. ((The department of transportation and the city of
Renton shall develop a proposal that includes a funding plan for the
interchange that specifies the partner's share of the cost. The department and
the city shall report to the legislative transportation committees by December
1, 1999.)) This amount shall be placed into reserve status until such
time as a one-third contribution is made by the city of Renton and a one-third
contribution is made by the project developer. If the city and developer
contributions are not obtained by October 31, 2000, this amount shall lapse.

(12)
$29,040,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided
for the state program share of phase one of the state route 519/intermodal
access road project. Federal funding may be substituted for this project
provided the total expenditures do not exceed the appropriation in this
subsection. The amount provided in this subsection can only be expended upon
authorization from the freight mobility strategic investment board.

(13)
The department of transportation shall provide a report to the transportation
committees of the house of representatives and the senate that summarizes
representative projects from each subprogram. The report shall compare the
cost benefit analysis used to select the project and the actual cost benefit
analysis following completion of the project. The report shall be included in
the department's biennial budget request.

(14)
The department of transportation is authorized to maximize the use of federal
and state funds in partnership with the Puget Sound regional council for
improvement projects and environmental impact studies.

(15)
State and federal appropriations are exchangeable between the improvement
program (Program I) and the preservation program (Program P) to ensure
efficient funds management and program delivery. Total expenditures shall not
exceed the total appropriation authority by the respective funding source.

(16)
The department's work force levels for highway construction for the 1999-2001
biennium shall be 2200 FTEs. Additional work force increases for highway
construction are authorized and shall not exceed five percent of the authorized
work force. The department shall report quarterly on program delivery and
related work force adjustments.

Sec.
220. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSPORTATION
ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS‑-PROGRAM K

((Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation... $........................................... 1,212,000))

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((10,162,000))

5,847,000

((TOTAL
APPROPRIATION............... $ 11,374,000))

The
appropriation((s)) in this section ((are)) is subject to
the following conditions and limitations and specified amounts are provided
solely for that activity:

(1)
The motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation includes (($10,162,000))
$4,635,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.834
for all forms of cash contributions, or the payment of other costs incident to
the location, development, design, right of way, and construction of the Tacoma
narrows bridge improvements under the public-private transportation initiative
program authorized under chapter 47.46 RCW; and for support costs of the
public-private transportation initiatives program.

(2)
The department of transportation and the freight mobility strategic investment
board must coordinate activities relating to relieving traffic congestion and
promoting the movement of freight.

Sec.
221. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE‑-PROGRAM M

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((251,426,000))

239,927,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation... $ ((887,000))

486,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,417,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((255,730,000))

243,830,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
If portions of the appropriations in this section are required to fund
maintenance work resulting from major disasters not covered by federal
emergency funds such as fire, flooding, and major slides, supplemental
appropriations will be requested to restore state funding for ongoing
maintenance activities.

(2)
The department shall request an unanticipated receipt for any federal moneys
received for emergency snow and ice removal and shall place an equal amount of
the motor vehicle fund‑-state into unallotted status. This exchange
shall not affect the amount of funding available for snow and ice removal.

(3)
The secretary of the department of transportation must provide a report to the
legislature on rest area services by September 1, 2000. The report must
examine the current services provided by rest areas and make recommendations on
potential methods for providing those services. The secretary must work with
the federal highway administration, services for the blind, and any other
groups that could provide services for and information regarding rest areas.
The department must also include its findings in its 2001-03 biennial budget
request.

Sec.
222. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-PRESERVATION‑-PROGRAM P

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((318,691,000))

211,320,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation... $ ((284,587,000))

311,087,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ ((3,117,000))

4,117,000

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ ((121,000))

29,000

Multimodal
Fund--State Appropriation........... $ 92,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((606,516,000))

526,645,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation includes $6,650,000 in proceeds
from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.761 and 47.10.762 for emergency
purposes. However, the transportation commission may authorize the use of
current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu of bond
proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.

(2)
The motor vehicle account‑-federal appropriation in this section is
transferrable to the transportation account or multimodal fund to ensure
efficient funds management and program delivery.

(3)
The department's work force levels for highway construction for the 1999-2001
biennium shall be 2200 FTEs. Additional work force increases for highway
construction are authorized and shall not exceed five percent of the authorized
work force. The department shall report quarterly on program delivery and
related work force adjustments.

(4)
The department of transportation is authorized to maximize the use of federal
and state funds to implement the provisions of this section.

(5)
State and federal appropriations are exchangeable between the improvement
program (Program I) and the preservation program (Program P) to ensure
efficient funds management and program delivery. Total expenditures shall not
exceed the total appropriation authority by the respective funding source.

Sec.
223. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-TRAFFIC
OPERATIONS‑-PROGRAM Q

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 221,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((37,085,000))

33,793,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation... $ 1,662,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 122,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((39,090,000))

35,798,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and the specified amount is provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation includes $4,324,000 for
state matching funds for federally selected competitive grant or congressional
earmark projects other than commercial vehicle information system and network
(CVISN). These moneys shall be placed into reserve status until such time as
federal funds are secured and a state match is required. If matching federal
funds are not obtained by September 30, 2000, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(2)
The motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation includes $600,000 for a
two-year pilot program for contracted roving service patrols. The department
shall provide a progress report on this pilot program to the office of
financial management, the senate transportation committee, and the house of
representatives transportation committee on December 1, 2000. The pilot
program will be evaluated with future direction and funding to be determined by
the documented results and benefits of the pilot program.

(3)
Projects selected by the department in this section must be selected using
safety-related and congestion-related criteria.

Sec.
224. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 224 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT‑-PROGRAM S

Puget
Sound Capital Construction Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((4,464,000))

2,989,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((98,390,000))

85,264,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation... $ 125,000

Puget
Sound Ferry Operations Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((6,308,000))

6,353,000

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ ((1,517,000))

474,000

Multimodal
Fund--State Appropriation........... $ 1,043,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((110,804,000))

96,248,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and the specified amount is provided solely for that activity:

(1)
(($586,000)) $86,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely to enable the secretary of transportation to
implement a leadership training program at the department of transportation.
The program shall include a mentoring component. The department shall develop
performance measures to evaluate the effectiveness of the program, including
but not limited to a performance measure to determine the effect of the program
on employee retention. The department shall provide a progress report on the
training program to the office of financial management, the senate
transportation committee, and the house of representatives transportation
committee by December 1, 2000.

(2)
$500,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided solely
for an independently contracted study of the department's organizational
administrative structure and financial systems. The study is to include, but
is not limited to, recommendations on:

(a)
A definition for administrative costs, including regional and program
administration, direct and indirect costs, direct project support, business
support functions and management, and fixed versus variable costs;

(b)
An administrative staffing cost model, including potential efficiencies, that
is in relation to direct program delivery;

(c)
A financial systems efficiency analysis, including the potential
cost-effectiveness of integrating department systems with standard state
financial systems that are currently developed and maintained by the office of
financial management;

(d)
A financial structure and system that can be easily accessed to review budgets
and expenditures for such administrative costs; and provide executive
information imperative for critical decision making; and

(e)
The organizational structure of the department and methods for providing
enhanced service through organizational improvements.

(3)
Appropriation transfers from transportation management and support to the
transportation equipment fund for management information services activities shall
be permitted through fiscal year 2000. Effective July 1, 2000, expenditures
for these activities shall be charged directly to transportation management and
support.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 225. RCW
47.08.125 (Transfer of purchases to transportation equipment
fund--Charge for computer services) and 1979 c 39 s 2 are each repealed.

Sec.
226. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 225 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND
RESEARCH‑-PROGRAM T

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((12,109,000))

9,909,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation... $ ((17,000,000))

18,200,000

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ ((1,371,000))

538,000

Multimodal
Fund--State Appropriation........... $ 833,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((30,480,000))

29,480,000

Sec.
227. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 226 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES‑-PROGRAM U

(1)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL TORT CLAIMS SUPPORT

Transportation
Account--State Appropriation.... $ 1,298,000

((Transportation
Account)) Multimodal Fund‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((2,595,000))

1,615,000

Puget
Sound Ferry Operations‑‑State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,155,000

(2)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE OFFICE OF THE STATE AUDITOR

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 907,000

(3)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION FACILITIES AND
SERVICES AND CONSOLIDATED MAIL SERVICES

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((3,743,000))

3,693,000

(4)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((2,240,000))

2,201,000

(5)
FOR PAYMENT OF SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY PREMIUMS AND ADMINISTRATION

Transportation
Account--State Appropriation.... $ 5,870,000

((Transportation
Account)) Multimodal Fund‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((12,039,000))

5,669,000

(6)
FOR PAYMENT OF SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY PREMIUMS AND ADMINISTRATION

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((3,462,000))

3,262,000

(7)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 158,000

(8)
((FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION STATE
PARKING SERVICES

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 90,000

(9))) FOR
PAYMENT OF THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION CAPITAL PROJECTS SURCHARGE

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 1,100,000

(((10)))
(9) FOR ARCHIVES AND RECORDS MANAGEMENT

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 392,000

Sec.
228. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 227 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-PUBLIC
TRANSPORTATION‑-PROGRAM V

High
Capacity Transportation Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((3,701,000))

1,451,000

Air
Pollution Control Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((6,253,000))

1,313,000

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ ((7,187,000))

1,893,000

Transportation
Account‑-Federal Appropriation... $........................................... ((7,345,000))

484,000

((Transportation
Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 105,000

Public
Transportation Systems Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 800,000))

Multimodal
Fund--State Appropriation........... $ 7,484,000

Multimodal
Fund--Federal Appropriation......... $ 6,861,000

Multimodal
Fund--Private/Local Appropriation... $ 105,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((24,391,000))

19,591,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
Appropriations in this section shall initially be allotted as appropriated
by this section. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not permit moneys
that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that
purpose. After May 1, 2000, after approval by the director of financial
management and the house of representatives and the senate transportation
committees and unless specifically prohibited by this act, the department may
transfer appropriations between the transportation account--state and the
multimodal fund--state appropriations. However, the program shall not expend
more than the total amount appropriated from these accounts.

(2)
Up to $750,000 of the transportation account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for grants and activities relating to coordinating special
needs transportation among state and local providers. When selecting grant
recipients, the agency council on coordinated transportation shall give
priority to projects and programs that can be accomplished in the 1999-2001
biennium. ((The department may expend up to $250,000 without a matching
appropriation. The department's authority to expend more than that amount is
conditioned upon the legislature authorizing a matching appropriation equal to
the total expenditure of the amount provided in this subsection.

(2)
$50,000 of the public transportation systems account‑-state appropriation
is provided solely to continue and enhance an existing pilot project between a
public transit provider and a school district expanding public transit service
to high school students in order to reduce the use of single occupancy
vehicles.))

(3)
The department shall assess its commute trip reduction program. The assessment
shall include an evaluation of tax credits or other incentives to employers who
reduce commute trips to their work sites by encouraging employees to
telecommute. Up to $50,000 of the air pollution control account--state
appropriation is provided for a pilot project implementing telecommuting as
part of the commute trip reduction program. The pilot project may include use
of tax credits or other financial incentives.

(4)
In evaluating applications for rural mobility grants to public transportation
agencies, the department shall give added weight to projects that improve
connectivity among transit providers and across jurisdictional boundaries.

(5)
$4,900,000 of the ((transportation account)) multimodal fund‑‑federal
appropriation is provided solely for commute trip reduction programs
administered by the department of transportation. These funds come from the
TEA‑21 congestion mitigation air quality program. ((The office of
financial management shall place $1,000,000 of the air pollution control
account‑‑state appropriation in reserve status.))

Sec.
229. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 228 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION‑-PROGRAM
W

Puget
Sound Capital Construction Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((140,135,000))

118,535,000

Puget
Sound Capital Construction Account‑-

Federal
Appropriation...................... $ ((29,575,000))

42,466,000

Passenger
Ferry Account‑-State Appropriation... $ ((789,000))

215,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((116,221,000))

1,000,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((286,720,000))

162,216,000

The
appropriations in this section are provided for improving the Washington state
ferry system, including, but not limited to, vessel acquisition, vessel
construction, major and minor vessel improvements, and terminal construction
and improvements. The appropriations in this section are subject to the
following conditions and limitations and specified amounts are provided solely
for that activity:

(1)
The appropriations in this section, unless otherwise specified, are provided to
carry out only the projects in the Washington state ferries capital program
plan - version ((3)) 2 - January 2000. The department shall
reconcile the 1997-99 capital expenditures within ninety days of the end of the
biennium and submit a final report to the senate transportation committee, the
house of representatives transportation committee, and the office of financial
management.

(2)
The Puget Sound capital construction account‑-state appropriation
includes $27,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.60.800
for vessel and terminal acquisition, major and minor improvements, and long
lead time materials acquisition for the Washington state ferries. The
transportation commission may authorize the use of current revenues available
to the Puget Sound capital construction account in lieu of bond proceeds for
any part of the state appropriation.

(((4)
The motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation includes $110,729,000 in
proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843. The
transportation commission may authorize the use of current revenues available
to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of
the state appropriation.

(5)
The department shall structure the request for proposal for the purchase of
passenger-only ferries authorized under RCW 47.60.652 to include the purchase
of a fifth back-up ferry to support maintenance schedules, emergency service
needs, and provide continuity of service on all passenger-only ferry routes.
The purchase of a fifth passenger-only ferry is subject to subsequent
legislative appropriation.))

Sec.
230. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 229 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-MARINE‑-PROGRAM X

Puget
Sound Ferry Operations Account--State

Appropriation.............................. $ 142,235,000

Marine
Operating Account‑-State Appropriation... $........................................... ((303,014,000))

148,664,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 290,899,000

The
appropriations in this section ((is)) are subject to the
following conditions and limitations and specified amounts are provided solely
for that activity:

(1)
((The appropriation is based on the budgeted expenditure of $29,104,000 for
vessel operating fuel in the 1999-2001 biennium. If the actual cost of fuel is
less than this budgeted amount, the excess amount may not be expended. If the
actual cost exceeds this amount, the department shall request a supplemental
appropriation.)) Appropriations in this section shall initially be
allotted as appropriated by this section. Subsequent allotment modifications
shall not permit moneys that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be
used for other than that purpose. After May 1, 2000, after approval by the
director of financial management and the house of representatives and the
senate transportation committees and unless specifically prohibited by this
act, the department may transfer appropriations between the marine operating
account--state and the Puget Sound ferry operations account--state
appropriations. However, the program shall not expend more than the total
amount appropriated from these accounts.

(2)
The appropriations in this section are based on the budgeted expenditure of
$29,514,000 for vessel operating fuel in the 1999-2001 biennium. If the actual
cost of fuel is less than this budgeted amount, the excess amount may not be
expended. If the actual cost exceeds this amount, the department shall request
a supplemental appropriation.

(3)
The appropriations in this section provide((s)) for the
compensation of ferry employees. The expenditures for compensation paid to
ferry employees during the 1999-2001 biennium may not exceed (($205,640,000))
$195,656,000 plus a dollar amount, as prescribed by the office of
financial management, that is equal to any insurance benefit increase granted
general government employees in excess of $341.75 a month annualized per
eligible marine employee multiplied by the number of eligible marine employees
for the respective fiscal year, a dollar amount as prescribed by the office of
financial management for costs associated with pension amortization charges,
and a dollar amount prescribed by the office of financial management for salary
increases during the 1999-2001 biennium. For the purposes of this section, the
expenditures for compensation paid to ferry employees shall be limited to
salaries and wages and employee benefits as defined in the office of financial
management's policies, regulations, and procedures named under objects of
expenditure "A" and "B" (7.2.6.2).

The
prescribed salary and insurance benefit increase or decrease dollar amount that
shall be allocated from the governor's compensation appropriations is in
addition to the appropriation contained in this section and may be used to
increase or decrease compensation costs, effective July 1, 1999, and
thereafter, as established in the 1999-2001 general fund operating budget.

(((3)
Up to $2,770,000 of the marine operating account‑-state appropriation may
be used for leasing and operating an appropriate passenger only ferry vessel
for the purpose of supporting existing, or testing new, passenger only service
while testing alternative vessel technologies.)) (4) The department,
when implementing ferry service reductions, shall, to the extent possible,
maintain peak hour vehicle and passenger service capacity, summer tourist route
capacity, and a fall/winter/spring presence on all domestic auto ferry routes,
while ensuring equitable treatment among the routes.

Sec.
231. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 230 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑- RAIL‑-PROGRAM
Y

Essential
Rail Assistance Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 85,000

High
Capacity Transportation Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((15,094,000))

6,794,000

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ ((95,915,000))

12,084,000

Transportation
Account‑-Federal Appropriation... $........................................... ((10,000,000))

9,000

Public
Transportation Systems Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((5,000,000))

3,050,000

Multimodal
Fund--State Appropriation........... $ 38,381,000

Multimodal
Fund--Federal Appropriation......... $ 9,991,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((126,094,000))

70,394,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
Appropriations in this section shall initially be allotted as appropriated
by this section. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not permit moneys
that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that
purpose. After May 1, 2000, after approval by the director of financial
management and the house of representatives and the senate transportation
committees and unless specifically prohibited by this act, the department may
transfer appropriations between the transportation account--state and the
multimodal fund--state appropriations. However, the program shall not expend more
than the total amount appropriated from these accounts.

(2)
No appropriation in this section may be used to fund rail passenger service
south of Portland, Oregon.

(((2)))
(3) $2,000,000 of the ((transportation account)) multimodal
fund‑-state appropriation and $4,000,000 of the high-capacity
transportation account‑-state appropriation are provided solely for the
freight rail assistance program to provide grants and loans for light density
rail lines.

(((3)
$3,000,000 of the high capacity transportation account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for acquisition of up to six rail passenger
cars to add capacity to existing advanced technology train sets operating in
Washington state.))

(4)
$6,298,000 of the ((high capacity transportation account)) multimodal
fund‑-state appropriation is provided to fund the operation of a
second train set providing additional roundtrip service from Seattle to
Vancouver, British Columbia. The department's authority to expend the
appropriation referenced in this subsection for service north of Blaine is
conditioned upon Canada, the province of British Columbia, and/or private
sources undertaking the capital expenditures necessary to make the rail capital
improvements required to facilitate improved round trip rail service between
Seattle and Vancouver, B.C.

(5)
(($10,000,000 of the transportation account‑-state appropriation and
$5,000,000 of the public transportation systems account‑-state
appropriation are provided solely for the King street maintenance facility to
be built in partnership with Amtrak. The amount referenced in this subsection
is conditioned on the execution of agreements between the department of
transportation, Amtrak, sound transit, and other participating parties which
will assure that the maintenance and operation of the maintenance facility will
not require state funding, except for billings for maintenance of state owned
passenger trains.

(6))) To
the greatest extent practicable, expenditure of funds shall maximize funds from
partnerships and coordinate with other agencies investing in track
improvements.

(((7)))
(6) $5,000,000 of the ((transportation account)) multimodal
fund‑-federal appropriation is provided from TEA-21 surface
transportation program enhancement funds is provided solely for restoration of
and improvements to the King Street station.

(7)
$500,000 of the high capacity transportation account‑-state appropriation
is provided solely for implementation of a state program to purchase
refrigerated express railcars, to be known as the George Sellar express
railcars, that may be leased for the purpose of hauling express shipments,
including but not limited to Washington produce, to market. Subject to
approval of the transportation commission, the department is authorized to
incur a federal railroad administration loan, which may include revenue backed
debt, of up to five million dollars for program implementation. The department
shall not expend the amount provided in this subsection until such time as the
department receives a federal administration loan of up to five million
dollars. The department shall make semiannual progress reports to the senate
transportation committee, the house of representatives transportation
committee, and the office of financial management until December 31, 2001, and
annual progress reports thereafter.

(8)
$100,000 of the multimodal fund--state appropriation is provided solely for the
department of transportation in conjunction with the utilities and
transportation commission and the Spokane regional transportation council to
study and make recommendations on issues related to railroad rights of way in
the Spokane valley. A status report shall be provided to the transportation
committees of the house of representatives and the senate by December 1, 2000.

Sec.
232. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 231 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-LOCAL PROGRAMS‑-PROGRAM Z

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((129,886,000))

52,401,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation... $ 8,040,000

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ ((10,767,000))

596,000

((Transportation
Infrastructure Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,250,000

Transportation
Infrastructure Account‑-

Private/Local
Appropriation................ $ 1,750,000))

High
Capacity Transportation Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 150,000

Highway
Infrastructure Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,500,000

Highway
Infrastructure Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 234,000

Urban
Arterial Trust Account--State

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,000,000

Public
Works Assistance Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 10,000,000

Multimodal
Fund--State Appropriation........... $ 106,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((155,577,000))

78,027,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
(($300,000 of the transportation)) $1,550,000 of the motor vehicle
account‑-state appropriation is provided solely to establish alternatives
for flood management and flood hazard reduction projects in the Chehalis basin.

(((a)
The department of transportation shall convene a technical committee to develop
watershed-based solutions to flooding within the Chehalis basin. The technical
committee shall be comprised of representatives of the department of
transportation, department of ecology, department of fish and wildlife, the
department of community, trade, and economic development, the military
department's emergency management division, and affected counties and tribes.
The department of transportation shall also seek the participation of the
United States army corps of engineers, federal emergency management
administration, the United States geological survey, the United States fish and
wildlife service, the United States environmental protection agency, and other
entities with critical knowledge related to the structural or nonstructural
flood hazard reduction projects in the Chehalis basin. Funds shall be
distributed by the department of transportation for alternative analysis,
mapping, and model testing projects as recommended by the technical committee.
The solutions considered by the technical committee shall be consistent with
fish and habitat recovery efforts and avoid additional flood hazard to
downstream communities. The department of transportation shall present a
report to the senate transportation committee and the house of representatives
transportation committee by December 1, 1999, regarding findings and progress
made by funded projects.

(b)
If the federal government makes funds available to accomplish the project
described in (a) of this subsection, the department of transportation shall
place the appropriation identified in this section in reserve.

(2)
$85,121,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for the state program share of freight mobility projects as identified
by the freight mobility strategic investment board. The amount provided in
this subsection can only be expended upon authorization from the freight
mobility strategic investment board.

(3))) (2)
$400,000 of the transportation account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for a study by the senate transportation committee and the house of
representatives transportation committee in cooperation with the port of Benton
developing a strategic corridor feasibility and master site plan for the port
of Benton. If the port of Benton does not provide at least $200,000 to fund
the plan development, the transportation fund‑-state appropriation
referenced in this subsection shall lapse and this subsection shall be null and
void.

(((4)))
(3) The motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation includes (($105,121,000))
$30,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.843. The transportation commission may authorize the use of current
revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds
for any part of the state appropriation.

(((5)))
(4) $10,000,000 of the ((transportation account)) public works
assistance account‑-state appropriation is provided solely to fund
the first phase of a multiphase cooperative project with the state of Oregon to
dredge the Columbia river. The department shall not expend the appropriation
in this section unless agreement on ocean disposal sites has been reached which
protects the state's commercial crab fishery. The amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse unless the state of Oregon appropriates a
dollar-for-dollar match to fund its share of the project.

(((6)))
(5) $3,108,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided
solely as a reimbursement to the department of transportation for the Allen
Street bridge project. These funds are to be redirected to the roadway
preservation program in section 222 of this act.

(6)
The motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation includes $1,167,000 in
proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.819(1). The
transportation commission may authorize the use of current revenues available
to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of
the state appropriation.

(7)
$5,000,000 of the ((motor vehicle)) urban arterial trust account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for a small city pavement preservation
program, to be administered by the department's ((TransAid)) highways
and local programs division. The department, in consultation with
stakeholders, shall establish program guidelines. The guidelines should
include but not be limited to a provision limiting program eligibility to
cities with a population of 2,500 or less.

(8)
$20,000,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for a county corridor congestion relief program, to be administered by
the department's ((TransAid)) highways and local programs
division. Urban corridors must connect to urban or significant activity
centers; begin or end at the intersection of another arterial, state highway,
or limited access freeway system; and provide an alternate route to the limited
access freeway system. The purpose of the program is to provide funding
for congested urban corridors, as defined and selected by the department of
transportation in consultation with counties((,)) and regional
transportation planning organizations((, and the transportation improvement
board)). At a minimum, project selection criteria should include:
Consistency with regional transportation plans; measurable improvements in
mobility; cost effectiveness; ((systemic)) systematic corridor
mobility improvements rather than isolated "spot" improvements; and
optimal timing for construction.

(9)
$5,000,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided solely
for improving traffic and pedestrian safety near schools. The ((TransAid))
highways and local programs division within the department of
transportation shall administer this program. Funds should be used for traffic
and pedestrian improvements near schools, including roadway channelization and
signalization.

(10)
The ((TransAid)) highways and local programs division within the
department of transportation shall develop a prequalification procedure for
potential bidders on projects administered or approved by the transportation
improvement board. The board shall work with other interested parties
including but not limited to associations representing general contractors and
the office of minority and women's business enterprises. The prequalification
procedure's goal is to ascertain that bidders are qualified by experience,
financing, equipment, and organization to do the work called for in the
contract documents. The prequalification procedure may require a bidder to (1)
satisfy threshold requirements established by the board prior to being
furnished a proposal form on any contract; or (2) complete a preaward survey of
the bidder's qualification prior to award.

(((11)
Up to $100,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for audits of city and county transportation funding to
determine whether any city or county has supplanted its local transportation
funding with state funding provided under sections 408 and 409 of this act.
The department shall report the results of this audit to the senate
transportation committee, the house of representatives transportation
committee, and the office of financial management by December 31, 2000.

(12) $5,000,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for city fish passage barrier removal and
habitat restoration. Funds should be used for eliminating fish passage
barriers, including stormwater facilities, and providing for habitat
restoration for salmonid species that are listed as threatened or endangered.
The amount provided in this section may only be expended upon authorization
from the department of transportation's environmental affairs office.)) (11)
$10,000,000 of the motor vehicle fund--state appropriation is provided solely
for a city corridor congestion relief program, to be administered by the
department's highways and local programs division. Urban corridors must
connect to urban or significant activity centers, begin or end at the
intersection of another arterial, state highway or limited access freeway
system, and provide an alternate route to the limited access freeway system.
The purpose of the program is to provide funding for congested urban corridors
as defined and selected by the department of transportation in consultation
with counties and regional transportation planning organizations. At a
minimum, project selection criteria should include: Consistency with regional
transportation plans; measurable improvements in mobility; cost effectiveness;
systematic corridor mobility improvements rather than isolated "spot"
improvements; and optimal timing for construction.

(End of part)

PART
III

TRANSPORTATION
AGENCIES CAPITAL FACILITIES

Sec.
301. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS)‑-CAPITAL

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((26,147,000))

15,231,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
Before any funds are expended for the transportation facility to be located in
Tumwater, Washington, the director of general administration shall conduct an
evaluation of the planned facility design and budget using life-cycle cost
analysis, value-engineering, and other techniques to maximize the long-term
effectiveness and efficiency of the facility or improvement as required under
RCW 43.82.010(10). Furthermore, the director shall present the findings of the
evaluation to the fiscal committees of the house of representatives and the
senate by December 31, 1999. Up to $100,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state
appropriation may be expended by the department of general administration to
conduct an analysis of future transportation-related facility office space
needs in Thurston county, by agency, for the next ten years. The analysis
shall consult with state agencies, private developers, and building owners to
determine the inventory of space available and planned over the next ten years
in government and nongovernment buildings, and the impact on current office
space. The analysis must be completed by January 31, 2000.

(2) The department of transportation is authorized to enter into a
financing contract using certificate of participation in the amount of
$14,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW to acquire and remodel a regional complex in the department's
southwest region.

(End of part)

PART
IV

TRANSFERS
AND DISTRIBUTIONS

Sec.
401. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE FUND AND
TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUE

Highway
Bond Retirement Account Appropriation... $........................................... ((184,810,000))

157,532,000

Ferry
Bond Retirement Account Appropriation.... $ ((53,353,000))

57,190,000

Transportation
Improvement Board Bond Retirement

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 35,158,000

Puget
Sound Capital Construction Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 270,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((6,543,000))

1,899,000

Special
Category C Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 405,000

Transportation
Improvement Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 400,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((280,539,000))

252,855,000

Sec.
402. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES:
FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL AGENT CHARGES

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Puget Sound Capital Construction

Account
Appropriation........................... $ ((36,000))

66,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ ((811,000))

467,000

Special
Category C Account Appropriation............. $...................................... ((53,000))

99,000

Transportation
Improvement Account Appropriation.... $ 98,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ ((900,000))

730,000

Sec.
403. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 403 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE
TREASURER‑-STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

Motor
Vehicle Fund Appropriation for

motor
vehicle fuel tax and overload

penalties
distribution..................... $ ((492,721,000))

483,325,000

Transportation
Fund Appropriation for

motor
vehicle excise tax distribution...... $ ((491,606,000))

227,371,000

Sec.
404. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 407 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-TRANSFERS

(((1)))
RV Account‑-State Appropriation:

For
transfer to the Motor Vehicle Fund‑-State........ $........................................... ((1,590,000))

1,865,000

(((2)
Transportation Account‑-State Appropriation:

For
transfer to the Transportation Infrastructure

Account‑-State...................................... $ 5,000,000))

The
department of transportation shall only transfer funds provided under this
subsection on an as‑needed basis.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 405. A
new section is added to 1999 sp.s. c 1 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSFERS. The
balance remaining at the close of the 2000 fiscal year in the transportation
equipment fund for management information services shall be transferred to the
motor vehicle fund.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 406. A
new section is added to 1999 sp.s. c 1 (uncodified) to read as follows:

WASHINGTON
TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION‑-TRANSFERS. The
balance remaining at the close of the 2000 fiscal year in the bicycle and
pedestrian safety account and the school zone safety account shall be
transferred to the traffic safety improvement account.

Sec.
407. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 413 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSFERS. The
department of transportation shall make the following transfers ((contingent
on passage of the bills referenced in each proviso as identified by bill number
in the form passed by the legislature)):

(((1)
If Senate Bill No. 5615 or House Bill No. 1588 is enacted in the form passed by
the legislature)) As set forth under chapter 94, Laws of 1999, the
department of transportation shall transfer((:

(a)
The balances remaining at the close of the 1997-99 biennium in the economic
development account and the transportation capital facilities account to the
motor vehicle account‑-state; and

(b))) the
balance remaining at the close of fiscal year 2000 in the marine operating
account to the Puget Sound ferry operations account.

(((2)
If neither Senate Bill No. 5615 nor House Bill No. 1588 is enacted in the form
passed by the legislature the department of transportation is authorized to
transfer any balances available in the highway construction stabilization
account to the motor vehicle account to fund the appropriations contained in
this act.))

Sec.
408. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 414 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT BOARD‑-TRANSFERS. The
transportation improvement board shall make the following transfers ((contingent
on passage of the bills referenced in each proviso as enacted in the form
passed by the legislature)):

(1)
((If Senate Bill No. 5360 or House Bill No. 1053 is enacted in the form
passed by the legislature)) As set forth under chapter 269, Laws of
1999, the transportation improvement board shall transfer the balances
remaining at the close of the 1997-99 biennium in the small city account and
the city hardship assistance account to the urban arterial trust account.

(2)
((If Senate Bill No. 5615 or House Bill No. 1588 is enacted in the form
passed by the legislature)) As set forth under chapter 94, Laws of 1999,
the transportation improvement board shall transfer:

(a)
The balances remaining at the close of the 1997-99 biennium in the small city
account and the city hardship assistance account to the urban arterial trust
account; and

(b)
The balance remaining at the close of the 1997-99 biennium in the central Puget
Sound public transportation systems account to the public transportation
systems account.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 409. A
new section is added to 1999 sp.s. c 1 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION--TRANSFERS. (1)
The balance remaining on April 30, 2000, in the transportation account shall be
transferred to the multimodal account. To facilitate the close-out of the
transportation account, the department may transfer revenues and expenditures
between the transportation account and the multimodal fund within the appropriations
provided in this act.

(2)
Motor Vehicle Account--State Appropriation:

For
transfer to the Puget Sound Capital Construction

Account--State...................................... $ 81,681,000

(3)
Transportation Equipment Fund--State

Appropriation:

For
transfer to the Motor Vehicle Account--State.... $ 5,000,000

(4)
Urban Arterial Trust Account Appropriation:

For
transfer to the Motor Vehicle Account........... $ 5,000,000

(5)
Public Transportation Systems Account Appropriation:

For
transfer to the Multimodal Fund.................. $.................................. 10,138,000

(6)
Motor Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation:

For
transfer to the Advanced Environmental Mitigation

Revolving
Account................................... $ 1,000,000

(7)
Motor Vehicle Fund‑-State Appropriation:

For
transfer to the State Patrol Highway Account.... $ 2,500,000

(8)
Multimodal Fund‑-State Appropriation:

For
transfer to the Puget Sound Ferry Operations

Account............................................. $ 5,000,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 410. A
new section is added to 1999 sp.s. c 1 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE OFFICE OF STATE TREASURER‑‑TRANSFERS. (1)
Rural Arterial Trust Account‑‑State Appropriation: For transfer to
the Motor Vehicle Account State............................................... $ 49,247,000

(2)
Motor Vehicle Account‑‑State Appropriation:

For transfer
to the Puget Sound Ferry Operations

Account‑‑State...................................... $ 49,247,000

(3)
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account‑‑State

Appropriation:
For transfer to the Multimodal

Fund‑‑State......................................... $ 49,247,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 411. (1)
1999 sp.s. c 1 s 408 (uncodified) is repealed.

(2) 1999 sp.s. c 1 s 409 (uncodified) is repealed.

(End of part)

PART
VI

PROVISIONS NECESSARY
TO IMPLEMENT APPROPRIATIONS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 601. A
new section is added to 1999 sp.s. c 1 (uncodified) to read as follows:

PERFORMANCE
BASED BUDGETING. (1) The department of licensing, the department of
transportation, the Washington state patrol, and the Washington traffic safety
commission, in cooperation with the office of financial management, the senate
transportation committee, and the house of representatives transportation
committee will continue the implementation of performance based budgeting. The
performance based budgeting process will provide a measurable link between
agency objectives, service levels, and budget. The agencies shall:

(a)
Continue to develop, enhance, validate, and test indicators of performance,
stated in achieving the agencies' goals; and

(b)
Refine performance based budgeting and investment levels in the following
programs:

(i)
Department of transportation: Maintenance program M, preservation program P,
traffic operations program Q, and marine program X;

(ii)
Department of licensing: Driver's services and vehicle services;

(iii)
Washington state patrol: Field operations bureau; and

(iv)
Washington traffic safety commission; and

(c)
Submit and implement a plan to provide program managers with the training and
technical assistance necessary to extend the practices of performance
measurement and performance based budgeting throughout agency programs.

(2)(a)
The agencies shall input monthly their financial information and quarterly
program performance measurements into the transportation executive information
system and will utilize the transportation executive information system
investment system in the development of their agency policy request budgets.

(b)
The department of licensing and the Washington state patrol shall submit
budgets to the legislature at the subprogram level.

(3)
Transportation agencies shall comply with the requirements of chapter 43.88 RCW
when developing the 2001-03 biennial budget requests. Under chapter 43.88 RCW
agencies must comply with the following requirements:

(a)
Agencies are prohibited from making any changes affecting the comparability of
agency expenditure information without prior legislative approval.
Reorganization of an agency's internal divisions affects the comparability of
agency information and is prohibited without approval from the legislature.

(b)
Agencies must submit biennial budget requests by a specific time and in a
specific format. Failure to comply with the provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW
hinders the legislature's budget process.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 602. A
new section is added to 1999 sp.s. c 1 (uncodified) to read as follows:

The
1999-01 department of transportation salary increases that were approved by the
personnel resources board in July 1999, must be absorbed by each program as
provided for in the July 1999 personnel resources board fiscal impact
statement.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 603. A
new section is added to 1999 sp.s. c 1 (uncodified) to read as follows:

DONATIONS
OF EMPLOYEE LEAVE. During the 1999-2001 fiscal
biennium, a state employee may, consistent with the provisions of RCW
41.04.665(3), donate leave to the existing leave balances of an employee who
dies in the line of duty between February 1, 2000, and June 30, 2001. The
value of the donated leave will be included in the deceased employee's final
compensation, but is not compensation earnable for the purposes of chapter
41.40 RCW. The agency head shall determine the total amount of leave that may
be donated under this section. The Washington personnel resources board may
adopt rules, in consultation with the office of financial management, as it
deems necessary for the implementation of this temporary benefit.

Sec.
604. RCW
81.84.010 and 1993 c 427 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No commercial ferry may hereafter operate any vessel or ferry for the public
use for hire between fixed termini or over a regular route upon the waters
within this state, including the rivers and lakes and Puget Sound, without
first applying for and obtaining from the commission a certificate declaring
that public convenience and necessity require such operation. Service
authorized by certificates issued before or after July 25, 1993, to a
commercial ferry operator shall be exercised by the operator in a manner
consistent with the conditions established in the certificate or tariffs:
PROVIDED, That no certificate shall be required for a vessel primarily engaged
in transporting freight other than vehicles, whose gross earnings from the
transportation of passengers and/or vehicles, are not more than ten percent of
the total gross annual earnings of such vessel: PROVIDED, That nothing herein
shall be construed to affect the right of any county public transportation
benefit area or other public agency within this state to construct, condemn,
purchase, operate, or maintain, itself or by contract, agreement, or lease,
with any person, firm, or corporation, ferries or boats across or wharfs at or
upon the waters within this state, including rivers and lakes and Puget Sound,
provided such operation is not over the same route or between the same
districts, being served by a certificate holder without first acquiring the
rights granted to the certificate holder under the certificate, nor shall this
chapter be construed to affect, amend, or invalidate any contract entered into
prior to January 15, 1927, for the operation of ferries or boats upon the
waters within this state, which was entered into in good faith by any county
with any person, firm, or corporation, except that in case of the operation or
maintenance by any county, city, town, port district, or other political
subdivision by contract, agreement, or lease with any person, firm, or
corporation, of ferries or boats across or wharfs at or upon the waters within
this state, including rivers and lakes and Puget Sound, the commission shall
have power and authority to regulate rates and services of such operation or
maintenance of ferries, boats, or wharfs, to make, fix, alter, or amend said
rates, and to regulate service and safety of operations thereof, in the manner
and to the same extent as it is empowered to regulate a commercial ferry,
notwithstanding the provisions of any act or parts of acts inconsistent
herewith.

(2)
The holder of a certificate of public convenience and necessity granted under
this chapter must initiate service within five years of obtaining the
certificate. The certificate holder shall report to the commission every six
months after the certificate is granted on the progress of the certificated
route. The reports shall include, but not be limited to, the progress of
environmental impact, parking, local government land use, docking, and
financing considerations. However, if service has not been initiated within
five years of obtaining the certificate, the commission may extend the
certificate on a twelve-month basis for up to three years if the six-month
progress reports indicate there is significant advancement toward initiating
service.

(3)
The commission shall review certificates in existence as of July 25, 1993,
where service is not being provided on all or any portion of the route or
routes certificated. Based on progress reports required under subsection (2)
of this section, the commission may grant an extension beyond that provided in
subsection (2) of this section. Such additional extension may not exceed a
total of two years.

(4)
Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the commission shall not issue
any certificates of public convenience and necessity for the operation of
passenger-only ferry service until June 30, 2001.

Sec.
605. RCW
81.84.070 and 1993 c 427 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The commission may, with or without a hearing, issue temporary certificates to
operate under this chapter, but only after it finds that the issuance of the
temporary certificate is necessary due to an immediate and urgent need and is
otherwise consistent with the public interest. The certificate may be issued
for a period of up to one hundred eighty days. The commission may prescribe
such special rules and impose special terms and conditions on the granting of
the certificate as in its judgment are reasonable and necessary in carrying out
this chapter. The commission shall collect a filing fee, not to exceed two
hundred dollars, for each application for a temporary certificate. The
commission shall not issue a temporary certificate to operate on a route for
which a certificate has been issued or for which an application by another
commercial ferry operator is pending.

(2)
Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the commission shall not issue
a temporary certificate for the operation of passenger-only ferry service until
June 30, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 606. The
following bills, as identified by bill number in the form as passed by the
legislature, are necessary to implement portions of this act: Senate Bill Nos.
6212, 6304, and 6856.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 607. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 608. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

(End of part)

BLUE
RIBBON COMMISSION ON TRANSPORTATION....................... 11

BOARD OF PILOTAGE
COMMISSIONERS................................. 7

COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION
BOARD................................ 7

DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE....................................... 3

DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING

DRIVER SERVICES................................................ 17

INFORMATION SYSTEMS............................................ 16

MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT
SERVICES................................ 15

VEHICLE SERVICES............................................... 17

DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION

AVIATION--PROGRAM F............................................ 19

CHARGES FROM OTHER
AGENCIES--PROGRAM U......................... 29

HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE--PROGRAM
M................................. 25

HIGHWAY MANAGEMENT AND
FACILITIES--PROGRAM D--OPERATING........ 19

IMPROVEMENTS--PROGRAM I........................................ 20

LOCAL PROGRAMS--PROGRAM Z...................................... 37

MARINE--PROGRAM X.............................................. 33

PRESERVATION--PROGRAM P........................................ 25

PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS)......... 43

PUBLIC
TRANSPORTATION--PROGRAM V............................... 30

RAIL--PROGRAM Y................................................ 35

TRAFFIC OPERATIONS--PROGRAM Q.................................. 26

TRANSFERS................................................... 45‑47

TRANSPORTATION ECONOMIC
PARTNERSHIPS--PROGRAM K................ 24

TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND
SUPPORT--PROGRAM S............... 27

TRANSPORTATION PLANNING,
DATA, AND RESEARCH--PROGRAM T......... 29

WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES
CONSTRUCTION--PROGRAM W............... 32

DONATIONS OF EMPLOYEE LEAVE.................................... 50

FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC
INVESTMENT BOARD.................... 12

LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND
ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM............... 3

LEGISLATIVE TRANSPORTATION
COMMITTEE........................... 10

MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION.................................... 11

PERFORMANCE BASED BUDGETING.................................... 49

SENATE.......................................................... 9

STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION........................... 5

STATE TREASURER

BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST................................... 44

STATE REVENUES FOR
DISTRIBUTION................................ 45

TRANSFERS.................................................. 45,
47

TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION...................................... 12

TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT
BOARD................................ 8

TRANSFERS...................................................... 46

UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION
COMMISSION......................... 4

WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU........................................ 12

SUPPORT SERVICES BUREAU........................................ 14

WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY
COMMISSION............................ 6

TRANSFERS...................................................... 45

--- END ---