BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 48.14 RCW to read as follows:

Each
authorized insurer shall, on or before March 1st of each year, pay to the state
treasurer through the commissioner's office, an amount equal to five dollars
for every contract of insurance issued or renewed during the previous calendar
year that insures against loss from damages to property as defined in RCW
48.11.040. Amounts paid to the treasurer under this section shall be placed in
the natural disaster relief account created in section 3 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout sections 2 through 6 of this act
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Natural disaster" includes events caused by weather, and weather
related events for which insurance cannot be obtained from an admitted carrier
under a standard property and casualty policy.

(2)
"Victims of natural disaster" means any individual, household, or
business organization who suffers loss as a result of a natural disaster to
property located within an area that has been declared a disaster by the
governor under RCW 43.06.010.

(3)
"Board" means the natural disaster relief compensation board created
in section 4 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
natural disaster relief account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All receipts from insurers paid to the treasurer under section 1 of
this act shall be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may
be used only for the purposes described in sections 4 and 5 of this act. Only
the board may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject
to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is
not required for expenditures.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
natural disaster relief compensation board is created. The board consists of
three members: The insurance commissioner, the secretary of health, and the
director of the department of community, trade, and economic development, or
their designees. Applications for compensation under this chapter shall be
received, processed, and granted or denied by the natural disaster relief
compensation board. The board will be convened by the governor in connection
with any declaration of emergency or disaster involving a natural disaster.
The insurance commissioner shall serve as chair. The board members shall
assign staff persons from their departments to carry out the duties of the
board as may be necessary. The board has the authority to contract with adjusters,
appraisers, or other specialists necessary to carry out the functions of the
board. These contracts shall be funded only by expenditures from the disaster
relief account created in section 3 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
board shall grant applications for loans or grants from the natural disaster
relief account as follows: Loans may be granted for up to ninety percent of
the loss, as determined by the board, upon verification that the loss meets the
requirements of this chapter, and that it is likely that the applicant has the
ability to repay the loan. Interest rates for loans under this chapter shall
be fixed by the board at a rate not to exceed two percentage points below the
current market rate for loans of a similar type. The maximum term for loans
made under this chapter is fifteen years. The value of claimed losses that are
the subject of applications for grants or loans under this chapter shall be
fixed by the board under rules adopted by the board. Grants may be made upon
verification that the loss meets the requirements of this chapter, up to sixty
percent of the loss if it is determined that the applicant has no present
ability to repay a loan under the terms of this section. Proceeds of grants or
loans made under this chapter must be used for one or more of the following
purposes: (1) To repair structures or fixtures damaged by a natural disaster
and identified as the subject of the loss; (2) if repair of structures is not
feasible, to relocate the residence or business of the applicant; (3) to repair
essential access roads or driveways or other infrastructure facilities located
on the property of the applicant; (4) to repair or replace vehicles damaged or
destroyed by the natural disaster; or (5) to repair or replace furniture,
equipment, or appliances damaged or destroyed by the natural disaster.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
board shall adopt those rules as may be necessary for the implementation of
chapter . . ., Laws of 1999 (this act), under chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
Sections 2 through 6 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---