BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
79.64.030 and 1993 c 460 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Funds
in the account derived from the gross proceeds of leases, sales, contracts,
licenses, permits, easements, and rights of way issued by the department and
affecting school lands, university lands, ((agricultural college lands,))
scientific school lands, normal school lands, capitol building lands, or
institutional lands shall be pooled and expended by the department solely for
the purpose of defraying the costs and expenses necessarily incurred in
managing and administering all of the trust lands enumerated in this section.
Such funds may be used for similar costs and expenses in managing and
administering other lands managed by the department provided that such
expenditures that have been or may be made on such other lands shall be repaid
to the resource management cost account together with interest at a rate
determined by the board of natural resources.

Costs
and expenses necessarily incurred in managing and administering agricultural
college lands shall not be deducted from proceeds derived from the sale of such
lands or from the sale of resources that are part of the lands. Costs and
expenses incurred in managing and administering agricultural college trust
lands shall be funded by appropriation under section 3 of this act.

An accounting shall be made annually of the accrued expenditures
from the pooled trust funds in the account. In the event the accounting
determines that expenditures have been made from moneys derived from trust
lands for the benefit of other lands, such expenditure shall be considered a
debt and an encumbrance against the property benefited, including property held
under chapter 76.12 RCW. The results of the accounting shall be reported to
the legislature at the next regular session. The state treasurer is
authorized, upon request of the department, to transfer funds between the
forest development account and the resource management cost account solely for
purpose of repaying loans pursuant to this section.

Sec.
2. RCW
79.64.040 and 1981 2nd ex.s. c 4 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board shall determine the amount deemed necessary in order to achieve the
purposes of this chapter and shall provide by rule for the deduction of this
amount from the gross proceeds of all leases, sales, contracts, licenses,
permits, easements, and rights of way issued by the department and affecting
public lands, provided that no deduction shall be made from the proceeds
from agricultural college lands. Moneys received as deposits from
successful bidders, advance payments, and security under RCW 79.01.132 and
79.01.204 prior to December 1, 1981, which have not been subjected to deduction
under this section are not subject to deduction under this section. The
deductions authorized under this section shall in no event exceed twenty-five
percent of the total sum received by the department in connection with any one
transaction pertaining to public lands other than second class tide and shore
lands and the beds of navigable waters, and fifty percent of the total gross
proceeds received by the department pertaining to second class tide and shore
lands and the beds of navigable waters.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 79.64 RCW to read as follows:

The
agricultural college trust management account is created in the state
treasury. To the account shall be deposited such funds as the legislature
directs or appropriates. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the costs of
managing the assets of the agricultural school trust.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---