BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.116.010 and 1991 c 3 s 365 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature hereby finds that an adequate supply of potable water for domestic,
commercial, and industrial use ((is)) and an adequate supply of water
for fish habitat use are vital to the health and well-being of the people
of the state. Readily available water for use in public water systems is
limited and should be developed and used efficiently with a minimum of loss or
waste and in a manner that preserves water for fish habitat.

In
order to maximize efficient and effective development of the state's public
water supply systems, the department of health, in coordination with the
department of ecology and the department of fish and wildlife shall assist
water purveyors by providing a procedure to coordinate the planning of ((the))
water supply for public water ((supply)) systems and fish
habitat.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.116.020 and 1977 ex.s. c 142 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
purposes of this chapter are:

(1)
To provide for the establishment of ((critical)) water supply service
areas related to water utility planning and development and fish habitat
planning, preservation, and restoration;

(2)
To provide for the development of ((minimum)) planning and design
standards for ((critical)) water supply service areas to insure that
water systems ((developed in these areas)) are consistent with regional
needs for public water supply and fish habitat;

(3)
To assist in the orderly and efficient administration of state financial
assistance programs for public water systems; and

(4)
To assist public water systems to meet reasonable standards of quality,
quantity, and pressure, and contribution to fish habitat.

Sec.
3. RCW
70.116.030 and 1991 c 3 s 366 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the following terms when used in this
chapter shall be defined as follows:

(1)
"Coordinated water system plan" means a plan for public water systems
within a ((critical)) coordinated water supply service area which
identifies the present and future needs of the systems and of the fish
habitat that the systems impact and sets forth means for meeting those
needs in the most efficient manner possible. Such a plan shall include
provisions for subsequently updating the plan. In areas where more than one
water system exists, a coordinated plan may consist of either: (a) A new plan
developed for the area following its designation as a ((critical)) coordinated
water supply service area; or (b) a compilation of compatible water system
plans existing at the time of such designation and containing such
supplementary provisions as are necessary to satisfy the requirements of this
chapter. Any such coordinated plan must include provisions regarding: ((Future))
Individual service area designations; assessment of the feasibility of
shared source, transmission, and storage facilities; ((emergency inter-ties))
assessment of water supply needs for fish habitat; interties; design
standards; and other concerns related to the construction and operation of the
water system facilities.

(2)
"((Critical)) Coordinated water supply service area"
means a geographical area which ((is characterized by a proliferation of))
includes more than one public water system, includes fish habitat, and may
also include small, inadequate water systems, or ((by)) water supply
problems which threaten the present or future water quality or reliability of
service or supply of water for fish habitat in such a manner that
efficient and orderly development may best be achieved through coordinated
planning by the water utilities in the area.

(3)
"Public water system" means any system providing water intended for,
or used for, human consumption or other domestic uses. It includes, but is not
limited to, the source, treatment for purifying purposes only, storage,
transmission, pumping, and distribution facilities where water is furnished to
any community, or number of individuals, or is made available to the public for
human consumption or domestic use, but excluding water systems serving one
single family residence. However, systems existing on September 21, 1977 which
are owner operated and serve less than ten single family residences or which
serve only one industrial plant shall be excluded from this definition and the
provisions of this chapter.

(4)
"Purveyor" means any agency or subdivision of the state or any
municipal corporation, firm, company, mutual or cooperative association,
institution, partnership, or person or any other entity, that owns or operates
for wholesale or retail service a public water system. It also means the authorized
agents of any such entities.

(5)
(("Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health or
the secretary's authorized representative.

(6)))
"Service area" means a specific geographical area ((serviced or
for which service is planned)) served by a purveyor and initially
established under a permit to appropriate water for municipal water supply or
subsequently established under this chapter and consistent with a permit to
appropriate water for municipal water supply.

Sec.
4. RCW
70.116.040 and 1977 ex.s. c 142 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The ((secretary)) department of health, in coordination with the
department of ecology, the department of fish and wildlife, and the
appropriate local planning agencies and purveyors, shall study geographical
areas where water supply problems related to uncoordinated planning, inadequate
water quality, insufficient water supply, fish habitat, or unreliable
service appear to exist. If the results of the study indicate that such water
supply problems do exist, the ((secretary)) department of health
or the county legislative authority shall ((designate the area involved as
being a critical)) establish a coordinated water supply service
area, consult with the department of ecology, the department of fish and
wildlife, and appropriate local planning agencies and purveyors, and
appoint a committee of not less than three representatives therefrom solely for
the purpose of establishing the proposed external boundaries of the ((critical))
coordinated water supply service area. The committee shall include a
representative from each purveyor serving more than fifty customers, the county
legislative authority, county planning agency, and health agencies. Such
proposed boundaries shall be established within six months of the appointment
of the committee.

During
the six month period following the establishment of the proposed external
boundaries of the ((critical)) coordinated water supply services
areas, the county legislative authority shall conduct public hearings on the
proposed boundaries and shall modify or ratify the proposed boundaries in
accordance with the findings of the public hearings. The boundaries shall
reflect the existing land usage, and permitted densities in county plans,
ordinances, and/or growth policies. If the proposed boundaries are not
modified during the six month period, the proposed boundaries shall be
automatically ratified and be the ((critical)) coordinated water
supply service area.

After
establishment of the external boundaries of the ((critical)) coordinated
water supply service area, no new public water systems may be approved within
the boundary area unless an existing water purveyor is unable to provide water
service.

(2)
At the time a ((critical)) coordinated water supply service area
is established, the external boundaries for such area shall not include any
fractional part of a purveyor's existing contiguous service area.

(3)
The external boundaries of the ((critical)) coordinated water
supply service area may be amended in accordance with procedures prescribed in
subsection (1) of this section for the establishment of the ((critical))
coordinated water supply service areas when such amendment is necessary
to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

Sec.
5. RCW
70.116.050 and 1995 c 376 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each purveyor within the boundaries of a ((critical)) coordinated
water supply service area shall develop a water system plan for the purveyor's present
and future service area if such a plan has not already been developed:
PROVIDED, That nonmunicipally owned public water systems are exempt from the
planning requirements of this chapter, except for the establishment of service
area boundaries and documentation of water supply if they have no plans
for water service beyond their existing service area: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
if the county legislative authority permits a change in development that will
increase the demand for water service of such a system beyond the existing
system's ability to provide minimum water service, the purveyor shall develop a
water system plan in accordance with this section. The establishment of future
service area boundaries shall be in accordance with RCW 70.116.070.

(2)
After the boundaries of a ((critical)) coordinated water supply
service area have been established pursuant to RCW 70.116.040, the committee
established in RCW 70.116.040 shall participate in the development of a
coordinated water system plan for the designated area. Such a plan shall
incorporate all water system plans developed pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section. The plan shall provide for maximum integration and coordination of
public water system facilities consistent with the protection and enhancement
of the public health and well-being. Decisions of the committee shall be by
majority vote of those present at meetings of the committee.

(3)
Those portions of a ((critical)) coordinated water supply service
area not yet served by a public water system shall have a coordinated water
system plan developed by existing purveyors based upon permitted densities in
county plans, ordinances, and/or growth policies for a minimum of five years
beyond the date of establishment of the boundaries of the ((critical)) coordinated
water supply service area.

(4)
To insure that the plan incorporates the proper designs to protect public
health and distributes water for public water supply and fish habitat,
the ((secretary)) department of health shall adopt ((regulations
pursuant to)) rules under chapter 34.05 RCW concerning the scope and
content of coordinated water system plans, and shall ensure, as minimum
requirements, that such plans:

(a)
Are reviewed by the appropriate local governmental agency to insure that the
plan ((is not inconsistent with)) implements the land use plans,
shoreline master programs, and/or developmental policies of the general purpose
local government or governments whose jurisdiction the water system plan affects.

(b)
((Recognize)) Are reviewed by the relevant governmental agency or
entity to insure that the plan implements all water resource plans, water
quality plans, ((and)) water pollution control plans, habitat
conservation plans, and licensing requirements which have been adopted by entities
and units of local, regional, and state government.

(c)
Incorporate the fire protection standards developed pursuant to RCW 70.116.080.

(d)
Identify ((the future)) water rights and the individual service
area boundaries of the public water system or systems included in the plan
within the ((critical)) coordinated water supply service area.

(e)
Identify feasible ((emergency inter-ties)) conjunctive uses and
interties between adjacent purveyors.

(f)
Include satellite system management requirements consistent with RCW
70.116.134.

(g)
Include policies and procedures that generally address failing water systems
for which counties may become responsible under RCW 43.70.195.

(5)
((If a "water general plan" for a critical water supply service
area or portion thereof has been prepared pursuant to chapter 36.94 RCW and
such a plan meets the requirements of subsections (1) and (4) of this section,
such a plan shall constitute the coordinated water system plan for the
applicable geographical area.

(6))) The
committee established in RCW 70.116.040 may develop and utilize a mechanism for
addressing disputes that arise in the development of the coordinated water
system plan.

(((7)))
(6) Prior to the submission of a coordinated water system plan to the ((secretary))
department of health for approval pursuant to RCW 70.116.060, the
legislative authorities of the counties in which the ((critical)) coordinated
water supply service area is located, together with the departments of
ecology and fish and wildlife, shall hold a public hearing thereon and
shall determine the plan's consistency with subsection (4) of this section. If
within sixty days of receipt of the plan, the legislative authorities and
the departments of ecology and fish and wildlife find any segment of a
proposed service area of a purveyor's plan or any segment of the coordinated
water system plan to be inconsistent with ((any current land use plans,
shoreline master programs, and/or developmental policies of the general purpose
local government or governments whose jurisdiction the water system plan
affects)) subsection (4) of this section, the ((secretary)) department
of health shall not approve that portion of the plan until the
inconsistency is resolved ((between the local government and the purveyor)).
If no comments have been received ((from the legislative authorities))
within sixty days of receipt of the plan, the ((secretary)) department
of health may consider the plan for approval.

(8) Any county legislative authority may adopt an abbreviated plan
for the provision of water supplies within its boundaries that includes
provisions for individual service area boundaries, minimum design
criteria, and review process. The elements of the abbreviated plan shall
conform to the criteria established by the department of health under
subsection (4) of this section and shall otherwise be consistent with other
adopted land use and resource plans. The county legislative authority may, in
lieu of the committee required under RCW 70.116.040, and the procedures
authorized in this section, utilize an advisory committee that is
representative of the water utilities and local governments within its
jurisdiction to assist in the preparation of the abbreviated plan, which may be
adopted by resolution and submitted to the ((secretary)) department
of health for approval. Purveyors within the boundaries covered by the
abbreviated plan need not develop a water system plan, except to the extent required
by the ((secretary or state board)) department of health under
other authority. Any abbreviated plan adopted by a county legislative
authority pursuant to this subsection shall be subject to the same provisions
contained in RCW 70.116.060 for coordinated water system plans that are
approved by the ((secretary)) department of health.

Sec.
6. RCW
70.116.060 and 1995 c 376 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A coordinated water system plan shall be submitted to the ((secretary)) department
of health for ((design)) approval within two years of the
establishment of the boundaries of a ((critical)) coordinated
water supply service area.

(2)
The ((secretary)) department of health shall review the
coordinated water system plan and, to the extent the plan is consistent with
the requirements of this chapter and ((regulations)) rules
adopted ((hereunder)) under it, shall approve the plan, provided
that the ((secretary)) department of health shall not approve
those portions of a coordinated water system plan that fail to meet the
requirements for future service area boundaries until any boundary dispute is
resolved as set forth in RCW 70.116.070.

(3)
Following the approval of a coordinated water system plan ((by the secretary)):

(a)
All purveyors constructing or proposing to construct public water system
facilities within the area covered by the plan shall comply with the plan.

(b)
No other purveyor shall establish a public water system within the area covered
by the plan, unless the local legislative authority determines that existing
purveyors are unable to provide the service in a timely and reasonable manner,
pursuant to guidelines developed by the ((secretary)) department of
health. An existing purveyor is unable to provide the service in a timely
manner if the water cannot be provided to an applicant for water within one
hundred twenty days unless specified otherwise by the local legislative
authority. If such a determination is made, the local legislative authority
shall require the new public water system to be constructed in accordance with
the construction standards and specifications embodied in the coordinated water
system plan approved for the area. The service area boundaries in the
coordinated plan for the affected utilities shall be revised to reflect the
decision of the local legislative authority.

(4)
The ((secretary)) department of health may deny proposals to
establish or to expand any public water system within a ((critical)) coordinated
water supply service area for which there is not an approved coordinated water
system plan at any time after two years of the establishment of the ((critical))
coordinated water supply service area: PROVIDED, That service
connections shall not be considered expansions.

(5)
The affected legislative authorities may develop and utilize a mechanism for
addressing disputes that arise in the implementation of the coordinated water
system plan after the plan has been approved ((by the secretary)).

(6)
After adoption of the initial coordinated water system plan, the local
legislative authority or the ((secretary)) department of health
may determine that the plan should be updated or revised. The legislative
authority may initiate an update at any time, but the ((secretary)) department
of health may initiate an update no more frequently than once every five
years. The update may encompass all or a portion of the plan, with the scope
of the update to be determined by the ((secretary)) department of
health, in coordination with the department of ecology and the department of
fish and wildlife, and the legislative authority. The process for the
update shall be the one prescribed in RCW 70.116.050.

(7)
The provisions of subsection (3) of this section shall not apply in any county
for which a coordinated water system plan has not been approved under
subsection (2) of this section.

(((8)
If the secretary initiates an update or revision of a coordinated water system
plan, the state shall pay for the cost of updating or revising the plan.))

Sec.
7. RCW
70.116.070 and 1995 c 376 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The proposed service area boundaries of public water systems within the ((critical))
coordinated water supply service area that are required to submit water
system plans under this chapter shall be identified in the system's plan. The
local legislative authority, or its planning department or other designee,
shall review the proposed boundaries to determine whether the proposed
boundaries of one or more systems overlap. The boundaries determined by the
local legislative authority not to overlap shall be incorporated into the
coordinated water system plan. Where any overlap exists, the local legislative
authority may attempt to resolve the conflict through procedures established
under RCW 70.116.060(5).

(2) Any final decision by a local legislative authority regarding
overlapping service areas, or any unresolved disputes regarding service area
boundaries, may be appealed or referred to the ((secretary)) department
of health in writing for resolution. After receipt of an appeal or
referral, the ((secretary)) department of health shall hold a
public hearing thereon. The ((secretary)) department of health
shall provide notice of the hearing by certified mail to each purveyor involved
in the dispute, to each county legislative authority having jurisdiction in the
area and to the public. The ((secretary)) department of health
shall provide public notice pursuant to the provisions of chapter 65.16 RCW.
Such notice shall be given at least twenty days prior to the hearing. The
hearing may be continued from time to time and, at the termination thereof, the
((secretary)) department of health may restrict the expansion of
service of any purveyor within the area if the ((secretary)) department
of health finds such restriction is necessary to provide the greatest
protection of the public health and well-being.

Sec.
8. RCW
70.116.134 and 1991 c 18 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The ((secretary)) department of health, in coordination with the
department of ecology shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW
establishing criteria for designating individuals or water purveyors as
qualified satellite system management agencies. The criteria shall set forth
minimum standards for designation as a satellite system management agency
qualified to assume ownership, operation, or both, of an existing or proposed
public water system. The criteria shall include demonstration of sufficient
water supply and financial integrity and operational capability, and may
require demonstration of previous experience in successful operation and
management of a public water system.

(2)
Each county shall identify potential satellite system management agencies to
the ((secretary)) department of health for areas where: (a) No
purveyor has been designated a future service area pursuant to this chapter, or
(b) an existing purveyor is unable or unwilling to provide service. Preference
shall be given to public utilities or utility districts or to investor-owned
utilities under the jurisdiction of the utilities and transportation
commission.

(3)
The ((secretary)) department of health shall approve satellite
system management agencies meeting the established criteria and shall maintain
and make available to counties a list of approved agencies. Prior to the
construction of a new public water system, the individual(s) proposing the new
system or requesting service shall first be directed by the local agency
responsible for issuing the construction or building permit to one or more
qualified satellite system management agencies designated for the service area
where the new system is proposed for the purpose of exploring the possibility
of a satellite agency either owning or operating the proposed new water system.

(4)
Approved satellite system management agencies shall be reviewed periodically by
the ((secretary)) department of health for continued compliance
with established criteria. The ((secretary)) department of health
may require status reports and other information necessary for such review.
Satellite system management agencies shall be subject to reapproval at the
discretion of the ((secretary)) department of health but not less
than once every five years.

(5)
The ((secretary)) department of health may assess reasonable fees
to process applications for initial approval and for periodic review of
satellite system management agencies. A satellite system management account is
hereby created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from
satellite system management agencies or applicants under subsection (4) of this
section shall be deposited into the account. Funds in this account may be used
only for administration of the satellite system management program.
Expenditures from the account shall be authorized by the ((secretary or the
secretary's designee)) department of health. The account is subject
to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for expenditures.

(6)
For purposes of this section, "satellite system management agency"
and "satellite agency" shall mean a person or entity that is
certified by the ((secretary)) department of health to own or
operate more than one public water system on a regional or county-wide basis,
without the necessity for a physical connection between such systems.

Sec.
9. RCW
90.03.255 and 1997 c 360 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department shall, when evaluating an application for a water right, transfer,
or change filed pursuant to RCW 90.03.250 or 90.03.380 that includes provision
for any water impoundment or other resource management technique, take into
consideration the benefits and costs, including environmental effects, of any
water impoundment or other resource management technique, including a
coordinated water system plan adopted under chapter 70.116 RCW, that is
included as a component of the application. The department's consideration
shall extend to any increased water supply that results from the impoundment or
other resource management technique, including but not limited to any recharge
of ground water that may occur, as a means of making water available or
otherwise offsetting the impact of the diversion of surface water proposed in
the application for the water right, transfer, or change. Provision for an
impoundment or other resource management technique in an application shall be
made solely at the discretion of the applicant and shall not otherwise be made
by the department as a condition for approving an application that does not
include such provision.

This
section does not lessen, enlarge, or modify the rights of any riparian owner,
or any existing water right acquired by appropriation or otherwise.

Sec.
10. RCW
90.03.260 and 1987 c 109 s 84 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
application for permit to appropriate water shall set forth the name and post
office address of the applicant, the source of water supply, the nature and
amount of the proposed use, the time during which water will be required each
year, the location and description of the proposed ditch, canal, or other work,
the time within which the completion of the construction and the time for the
complete application of the water to the proposed use. If for agricultural
purposes, it shall give the legal subdivision of the land and the acreage to be
irrigated, as near as may be, and the amount of water expressed in acre feet to
be supplied per season. If for power purposes, it shall give the nature of the
works by means of which the power is to be developed, the head and amount of
water to be utilized, and the uses to which the power is to be applied. If for
construction of a reservoir, it shall give the height of the dam, the capacity
of the reservoir, and the uses to be made of the impounded waters. If for municipal
water supply, it shall give the present population ((to be served, and, as
near as may be, the future requirement of the municipality)) and service
area, and the service area assigned in an approved coordinated water system
plan under chapter 70.116 RCW. If for mining purposes, it shall give the
nature of the mines to be served and the method of supplying and utilizing the
water; also their location by legal subdivisions. All applications shall be
accompanied by such maps and drawings, in duplicate, and such other data, as
may be required by the department, and such accompanying data shall be
considered as a part of the application.

Sec.
11. RCW
90.03.320 and 1997 c 445 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Actual construction work shall be commenced on any project for which permit has
been granted within such reasonable time as shall be prescribed by the
department, and shall thereafter be prosecuted with diligence and completed
within the time prescribed by the department. The department, in fixing the
time for the commencement of the work, or for the completion thereof and the
application of the water to the beneficial use prescribed in the permit, shall
take into consideration the cost and magnitude of the project and the
engineering and physical features to be encountered, and shall allow such time
as shall be reasonable and just under the conditions then existing, having due
regard for the public welfare and public interests affected: and, for good
cause shown, it shall extend the time or times fixed as aforesaid, and shall
grant such further period or periods as may be reasonably necessary, having due
regard to the good faith of the applicant and the public interests affected.

(2)
In fixing construction schedules and the time, or extension of time, for
application of water to beneficial use for municipal water supply purposes, the
department shall also take into consideration the term and amount of financing
required to complete the project, delays that may result from planned and
existing conservation and water use efficiency measures implemented by the
public water system, and the supply needs of the public water system's initial
service area and the service area assigned in an approved coordinated water system
plan under chapter 70.116 RCW, consistent with an approved comprehensive
plan under chapter 36.70A RCW, or in the absence of such a plan, a
county-approved comprehensive plan under chapter 36.70 RCW or a plan approved
under chapter 35.63 RCW, and related water demand projections prepared by
public water systems in accordance with state law. An existing comprehensive
plan under chapter 36.70A or 36.70 RCW, plan under chapter 35.63 RCW, or demand
projection may be used.

(3)
If the terms of the permit or extension thereof, are not complied with the
department shall give notice by registered mail that such permit will be
canceled unless the holders thereof shall show cause within sixty days why the
same should not be so canceled. If cause is not shown, the permit shall be
canceled.

Sec.
12. RCW
90.03.383 and 1991 c 350 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature recognizes the value of interties for improving the reliability
of public water systems, enhancing their management, and more efficiently
utilizing the increasingly limited resource. Given the continued growth in the
most populous areas of the state, the increased complexity of public water
supply management, and the trend toward regional planning and regional
solutions to resource issues, interconnections of public water systems through
interties provide a valuable tool to ensure reliable public water supplies for
the citizens of the state and adequate supplies of water for fish habitat.
Public water systems have been encouraged in the past to utilize interties to
achieve public health and resource management objectives. The legislature
finds that it is in the public interest to recognize interties existing and in
use as of January 1, ((1991)) 2000, and to have associated water
rights modified by the department of ecology to reflect current use of water
through those interties, pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. The
legislature further finds it in the public interest to ((develop a coordinated
process to review proposals for)) allow interties commencing use
after January 1, ((1991)) 2000, if they implement an approved
coordinated water system plan under chapter 70.116 RCW.

(2)
For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(a)
"Interties" are interconnections between public water systems
permitting exchange or delivery of water between those systems for other than
emergency supply purposes, where such exchange or delivery is within
established instantaneous and annual withdrawal rates specified in the systems'
existing water right permits or certificates, or contained in claims filed
pursuant to chapter 90.14 RCW, and which results in better management of public
water supply consistent with existing rights and obligations and resource
management needs. Interties include interconnections between public water
systems permitting exchange or delivery of water to serve as primary or
secondary sources of supply((, but do not include development of new sources
of supply to meet future demand)) for the place of use or service area
given in the application to appropriate water or the service area assigned in
an approved coordinated water system plan under chapter 70.116 RCW.

(b)
"Service area" is the area designated in a water system plan or a
coordinated water system plan pursuant to chapter 43.20 or 70.116 RCW
respectively. When a public water system does not have a designated service
area subject to the approval process of those chapters, the service area shall
be the designated place of use contained in the water right permit or
certificate, or contained in the claim filed pursuant to chapter 90.14 RCW.

(3)
Public water systems with interties existing and in use as of January 1, ((1991))
2000, or that have received written approval from the department of
health prior to that date, shall file written notice of those interties with
the department of health and the department of ecology. The notice may be
incorporated into the public water system's next five-year update of its
water system plan((, but shall be filed no later than June 30, 1996)).
The notice shall identify the location of the intertie; the dates of its first
use; the purpose, capacity, and current use; the intertie agreement of the
parties and the service areas assigned; and other information reasonably
necessary to modify the water right permit. Notwithstanding the provisions of
RCW 90.03.380 and 90.44.100, for public water systems with interties existing
and in use as of January 1, ((1991)) 2000, the department of
ecology, upon receipt of notice meeting the requirements of this subsection,
shall, as soon as practicable, modify the place of use descriptions in the
water right permits, certificates, or claims to reflect the actual use through
such interties, provided that the place of use is within service area
designations established in a water system plan approved pursuant to chapter
43.20 RCW, or a coordinated water system plan approved pursuant to chapter
70.116 RCW, and further provided that the water used is within the
instantaneous and annual withdrawal rates specified in the water right permit
((and)), that no outstanding complaints of impairment to existing
water rights have been filed with the department of ecology prior to September
1, ((1991)) 2000, and conditions to assure preservation of fish
habitat are included. Where ((such)) complaints of impairment have
been received, the department of ecology shall make all reasonable efforts to
resolve them in a timely manner through agreement of the parties or through
available administrative remedies.

(4)
Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 90.03.380 and 90.44.100, exchange or
delivery of water through interties commencing use after January 1, ((1991))
2000, shall be permitted when the intertie implements an approved
coordinated water system plan under chapter 70.116 RCW and improves overall
system reliability, enhances the manageability of the systems, provides
opportunities for conjunctive use, or delays or avoids the need to develop new
water sources, and otherwise meets the requirements of this section, provided
that each public water system's water use shall not exceed the instantaneous or
annual withdrawal rate specified in its water right authorization, shall not
adversely affect existing water rights, and shall ((not)) otherwise
be ((inconsistent)) consistent with state-approved plans ((such
as water system plans or other plans which include specific proposals for
construction of interties)). Interties commencing use after January 1,
1991, shall not be inconsistent with regional water resource plans developed
pursuant to chapter 90.54 RCW.

(5)
For public water systems subject to the approval process of chapter 43.20 RCW
or chapter 70.116 RCW, proposals for interties commencing use after January 1,
((1991)) 2000, shall ((be incorporated into water system plans
pursuant to chapter 43.20 RCW or)) implement coordinated water
system plans pursuant to chapter 70.116 RCW and shall be submitted to
the department of health and the department of ecology for review and approval
as provided for in subsections (5) through (9) of this section. ((The plan
shall state how the proposed intertie will improve overall system reliability,
enhance the manageability of the systems, provide opportunities for conjunctive
use, or delay or avoid the need to develop new water sources.))

(6)
The department of health, in coordination with the department of ecology
shall be responsible for review and approval of proposals for new interties.
In ((its review)) coordination with the department of ecology,
the department of health shall hold public hearings and consider public
comments and shall determine whether the intertie satisfies the criteria of
subsection (4) of this section, with the exception of water rights considerations,
which are the responsibility of the department of ecology, and shall determine
whether the intertie is necessary to address emergent public health or safety
concerns associated with public water supply and implement an approved
coordinated water system plan under chapter 70.116 RCW.

(7)
If the intertie is determined by the department of health to be necessary to
address emergent public health or safety concerns associated with public water
supply and implement an approved coordinated water system plan under chapter
70.116 RCW, the public water system shall amend its water system plan as
required and shall file an application with the department of ecology to change
its existing water right to reflect the proposed use of the water as described
in the approved water system plan. The department of ecology shall process the
application for change pursuant to RCW 90.03.380 or 90.44.100 as appropriate,
except that, notwithstanding the requirements of those sections regarding
notice and protest periods, applicants shall be required to publish notice one
time, and the comment period shall be fifteen days from the date of publication
of the notice. Within sixty days of receiving the application, the department
of ecology shall issue findings and advise the department of health if existing
water rights are determined to be adversely affected. If no determination is
provided by the department of ecology within the sixty-day period, the
department of health shall proceed as if existing rights are not adversely affected
by the proposed intertie. The department of ecology may obtain an extension of
the sixty-day period by submitting written notice to the department of health
and to the applicant indicating a definite date by which its determination will
be made. No additional extensions shall be granted, and in no event shall the
total review period for the department of ecology exceed one hundred eighty
days.

(8)
((If the department of health determines the proposed intertie appears to
meet the requirements of subsection (4) of this section but is not necessary to
address emergent public health or safety concerns associated with public water
supply, the department of health shall instruct the applicant to submit to the
department of ecology an application for change to the underlying water right
or claim as necessary to reflect the new place of use. The department of
ecology shall consider the applications pursuant to the provisions of RCW
90.03.380 and 90.44.100 as appropriate.)) If in its review of proposed interties
and associated water rights the department of ecology determines that
additional information is required to act on the application, the department
may request applicants to provide information necessary for its decision,
consistent with agency rules and written guidelines. Parties disagreeing with
the decision of the department of ecology on the application for change in
place of use may appeal the decision to the pollution control hearings board.

(9) The department of health may not approve plans
containing intertie proposals prior to the department of ecology's decision on
the water right application for change in place of use. ((However,
notwithstanding such approval, construction work on the intertie shall not
begin until the department of ecology issues the appropriate water right
document to the applicant consistent with the approved plan.))

---
END ---