BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature recognizes that thousands of Kosovar Albanian refugees have
been displaced by Serbian nationalists. As a result of this genocide, the
United States in cooperation with NATO has begun a bombing campaign aimed at
stopping the humanitarian crisis. Due to Serbian expulsion, the current crisis
in Kosovo has resulted in three hundred thousand displaced Kosovar Albanians.
Refugees have been pouring into neighboring countries at such excessive rates
that some borders are closing and refugees have no place to go. The United
States State Department has begun screening Kosovar Albanians in refugee camps
in Albania and Macedonia to bring approximately twenty thousand refugees to the
United States. In order that the state of Washington be prepared to handle the
possible refugees to this state, it is the intent of the legislature that the
state of Washington be financially prepared to accommodate these people.

(2)
The department of social and health services shall provide necessary temporary
assistance to Kosovar Albanian refugees who are temporary residents of
Washington state as a direct consequence of the humanitarian crisis in Kosovo.

(3)
The sum of two hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the
general fund to the department of social and health services for the purposes
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 1999, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

---
END ---