BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the intent of this act to encourage water conservation and reuse as a means of
meeting existing and future water supply demands, including the need to address
water supply needs for growing communities and new industrial, commercial, and
agriculture activities, and to address streamflow augmentation to address
salmon recovery and other instream water use needs.

---
END ---