BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
department of community, trade, and economic development was created in 1993 by
dissolving the prior department of community development and the prior
department of trade and economic development and transferring their
responsibilities and authorities to that newly created department.

The
purpose of this act is to effectively organize state efforts to address the
community and economic development needs of the citizens of the state of
Washington by restructuring the department of community, trade, and economic
development into two separate agencies, the department of community development
and the department of trade and economic development. The department of trade
and economic development will consist of the existing divisions of economic
development, international trade, and energy. The department of community
development will consist of the existing divisions of housing, community
services, and local government.

It
is the intent of the legislature that the restructuring will allow each agency
to: (1) Identify and develop a focused mission; (2) organize and deliver
services in a manner that is responsive to current and future needs; and (3)
effectively target resources to meet the identified mission and needs of the
citizens of the state of Washington in the most efficient and effective manner.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) On
or before September 1, 1999, the director of community, trade, and economic
development shall submit a plan to the governor for transferring the
department's trade, business development, tourism, and economic development
responsibilities and authorities to the newly created department of trade and economic
development, as provided in this act.

(2)
The plan shall include, but is not limited to, the following elements:

(a)
Strategies for a smooth transfer of responsibilities and authorities to the
newly created department of trade and economic development, including
implementation steps, evaluation measures, and benchmarks to measure the
effectiveness of the implementation steps;

(b)
Division of staff, supplies, equipment, and office space between the newly
created department of trade and economic development and the department that is
renamed as the department of community development; and

(c)
Recommendations for statutory changes for a more appropriate division of
responsibilities and authorities.

(3)
In developing the plan required under this section, the director shall
establish an advisory committee comprised of: (a) Two members of the house of
representatives, one member from each political caucus appointed by the speaker
of the house of representatives; (b) two members of the senate, one member from
each political caucus appointed by the president of the senate; (c) the
director of financial management or the director's designee; and (d)
representatives of groups using services and programs of the department that
include, but are not limited to counties, cities, port districts, economic
development councils, associate development organizations, businesses,
low-income housing interests, the for-profit and nonprofit housing industries,
Indian tribes, community service organizations, public safety groups, nonprofit
community and economic development organizations, international trade
organizations, minority and women business organizations, and other
organizations the director determines necessary for the development of the
plan.

(4)
The office of financial management, in consultation with the department, shall
advise the director and the advisory council on matters relating to the
department's budget and program functions.

(5)
The director shall implement the plan, as approved by the governor.

(6)
Effective October 1, 1999, the department of trade and economic development
shall be created, the transfer of responsibilities and authorities to this
newly created department shall occur, and the department of community, trade,
and economic development shall be renamed as the department of community
development.

PART
I

DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT

Sec.
101. RCW
43.330.020 and 1993 c 280 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

((A))
The department of community((, trade, and economic)) development
is created. Except as provided in chapter . . ., Laws of 1999
(this act), the department shall be vested with all powers and duties ((established
or transferred to it under this chapter)) formerly exercised by the
prior department of community development, before its merger with the prior
department of trade and economic development into the department of community,
trade, and economic development by chapter 280, Laws of 1993, and such
other powers and duties as may be authorized by law. ((Unless otherwise
specifically provided in chapter 280, Laws of 1993, the existing
responsibilities and functions of the agency programs will continue to be
administered in accordance with their implementing legislation.))

Sec.
102. RCW
43.63A.021 and 1997 c 367 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Department" means the department of community development.

(2)
"Director" means the director of community development.

(3)
"Dislocated forest products worker" means a forest products worker
who: (a)(i) Has been terminated or received notice of termination from
employment and is unlikely to return to employment in the individual's
principal occupation or previous industry because of a diminishing demand for
his or her skills in that occupation or industry; or (ii) is self-employed and
has been displaced from his or her business because of the diminishing demand
for the business's services or goods; and (b) at the time of last separation
from employment, resided in or was employed in a rural natural resources impact
area.

(((2)))
(4) "Forest products worker" means a worker in the forest
products industries affected by the reduction of forest fiber enhancement,
transportation, or production. The workers included within this definition
shall be determined by the employment security department, but shall include
workers employed in the industries assigned the major group standard industrial
classification codes "24" and "26" and the industries
involved in the harvesting and management of logs, transportation of logs and
wood products, processing of wood products, and the manufacturing and
distribution of wood processing and logging equipment. The commissioner may
adopt rules further interpreting these definitions. For the purposes of this
subsection, "standard industrial classification code" means the code
identified in RCW 50.29.025(6)(c).

(((3)))
(5) "Dislocated salmon fishing worker" means a finfish
products worker who: (a)(i) Has been terminated or received notice of
termination from employment and is unlikely to return to employment in the
individual's principal occupation or previous industry because of a diminishing
demand for his or her skills in that occupation or industry; or (ii) is
self-employed and has been displaced from his or her business because of the diminishing
demand for the business's services or goods; and (b) at the time of last
separation from employment, resided in or was employed in a rural natural
resources impact area.

(((4)))
(6) "Salmon fishing worker" means a worker in the finfish
industry affected by 1994 or future salmon disasters. The workers included
within this definition shall be determined by the employment security
department, but shall include workers employed in the industries involved in
the commercial and recreational harvesting of finfish including buying and
processing finfish. The commissioner may adopt rules further interpreting
these definitions.

Sec.
103. RCW
43.330.040 and 1993 c 280 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The director shall supervise and administer the activities of the department
and shall advise the governor and the legislature with respect to community ((and
economic)) development matters affecting the state.

(2)
In addition to other powers and duties granted to the director, the director
shall have the following powers and duties:

(a)
Enter into contracts on behalf of the state to carry out the purposes of this
chapter;

(b)
Act for the state in the initiation of or participation in any
multigovernmental program relative to the purpose of this chapter;

(c)
Accept and expend gifts and grants, whether such grants be of federal or other
funds;

(d)
Appoint ((such)) a deputy director((s,)) and
assistant directors((, and up to seven special assistants)) as may be
needed to administer the department. These employees are exempt from the
provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW;

(e)
Prepare and submit budgets for the department for executive and legislative
action;

(f)
Submit recommendations for legislative actions as are deemed necessary to
further the purposes of this chapter;

(g)
Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW and perform all other
functions necessary and proper to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(h)
Delegate powers, duties, and functions as the director deems necessary for
efficient administration, but the director shall be responsible for the
official acts of the officers and employees of the department; and

(i)
Perform other duties as are necessary and consistent with law.

(3)
When federal or other funds are received by the department, they shall be
promptly transferred to the state treasurer and thereafter expended only upon
the approval of the director.

(4)
The director may request information and assistance from all other agencies,
departments, and officials of the state, and may reimburse such agencies,
departments, or officials if such a request imposes any additional expenses
upon any such agency, department, or official.

(5)
The director shall, in carrying out the responsibilities of office, consult
with governmental officials, private groups, and individuals and with officials
of other states. All state agencies and their officials and the officials of
any political subdivision of the state shall cooperate with and give such
assistance to the department, including the submission of requested
information, to allow the department to carry out its purposes under this
chapter.

(6)
The director may establish additional advisory or coordinating groups with the
legislature, within state government, with state and other governmental units,
with the private sector and nonprofit entities or in specialized subject areas
as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(7)
The internal affairs of the department shall be under the control of the
director in order that the director may manage the department in a flexible and
intelligent manner as dictated by changing contemporary circumstances. Unless
specifically limited by law, the director shall have complete charge and
supervisory powers over the department. The director may create such
administrative structures as the director deems appropriate, except as
otherwise specified by law, and the director may employ such personnel as may
be necessary in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW, except as otherwise provided
by law.

Sec.
104. RCW
43.330.050 and 1993 c 280 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department shall be responsible for promoting community ((and economic))
development within the state by assisting the state's communities to increase
the quality of life of their citizens and their economic vitality, ((and by
assisting the state's businesses to maintain and increase their economic
competitiveness,)) while maintaining a healthy environment. Community ((and
economic)) development efforts ((shall)) include((: Efforts to
increase economic opportunity;)), but are not limited to, local
planning to manage growth((;)), the promotion and provision of
affordable housing and housing-related services((;)), providing
public infrastructure((; business and trade development; assisting firms and
industrial sectors to increase their competitiveness; fostering the development
of minority and women-owned businesses; facilitating technology development,
transfer, and diffusion;)), providing community services and
advocacy for low-income persons((;)), and public safety efforts.
The department shall have the following general functions and responsibilities:

(1)
Provide advisory assistance to the governor, other state agencies, and the
legislature on community ((and economic)) development matters and
issues;

(2)
Assist the governor in coordinating the activities of state agencies that have
an impact on local government and communities;

(3)
Cooperate with the legislature and the governor in the development and
implementation of strategic plans for the state's community ((and economic))
development efforts;

(4)
Solicit private and federal grants for ((economic and)) community
development programs and administer such programs in conjunction with other
programs assigned to the department by the governor or the legislature;

(5)
Cooperate with and provide technical and financial assistance to local
governments((, businesses,)) and community-based organizations serving
the communities of the state for the purpose of aiding and encouraging orderly,
productive, and coordinated community development of the state, and,
unless stipulated otherwise, give additional consideration to local communities
and ((individuals)) community‑based organizations with the
greatest relative need and the fewest resources;

(6)
Participate with other states or subdivisions thereof in interstate programs
and assist cities, towns, counties, municipal corporations, governmental
conferences or councils, and regional planning commissions to participate with
other states and provinces or their subdivisions;

(7)
Hold public hearings and meetings to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(8)
Conduct research and analysis in furtherance of the state's ((economic and))
community development efforts including maintenance of current information on
((market, demographic, and economic trends as they affect different
industrial sectors,)) geographic regions((,)) and communities with
special economic and social problems in the state; and

(9)
Develop a schedule of fees for services where appropriate.

Sec.
105. RCW
43.330.070 and 1993 c 280 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall work closely with local communities to increase their capacity
to respond to economic, environmental, and social problems and challenges. The
department shall coordinate the delivery of ((development services and))
related technical assistance to local communities or regional areas((.
It shall promote partnerships between the public and private sectors and
between state and local officials to encourage appropriate economic growth and
opportunity in communities throughout the state. The department)) and
shall promote appropriate ((local)) community development by: ((Supporting
the ability of communities to develop and implement strategic development
plans; assisting businesses to start up, maintain, or expand their operations;))
Encouraging public infrastructure investment and private and public
capital investment in local communities((;)), supporting efforts
to manage growth and provide affordable housing and housing services((;)),
and providing for the identification and preservation of the state's
historical and cultural resources((; and expanding employment opportunities)).

(2)
The department shall define a set of services including related training
and technical assistance that it will make available to local communities,
community-based nonprofit organizations, and regional areas((, or
businesses)). The department shall simplify access to these programs by
providing more centralized and user-friendly information and referral. The
department shall coordinate community ((and economic)) development
efforts to minimize program redundancy and maximize accessibility. The
department shall develop a set of criteria for targeting services to local
communities.

(3)
The department shall develop a coordinated and systematic approach to providing
related training to community-based nonprofit organizations, local communities,
and ((businesses)) regional areas. The approach shall be
designed to increase the ((economic and)) community development skills
available in local communities by providing training and funding for training
for local citizens((,)) and nonprofit organizations((, and
businesses)). The department shall emphasize providing training in those
communities most in need of state assistance.

Sec.
106. RCW
43.330.125 and 1995 c 347 s 430 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department ((of community, trade, and economic development)) shall
provide training and technical assistance to counties and cities to assist them
in fulfilling the requirements of chapter 36.70B RCW.

Sec.
107. RCW
43.330.135 and 1995 c 13 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department ((of community, trade, and economic development)) shall
distribute such funds as are appropriated for the state-wide technical support,
development, and enhancement of court-appointed special advocate programs.

(2)
In order to receive money under subsection (1) of this section, an organization
providing state-wide technical support, development, and enhancement of
court-appointed special advocate programs must meet all of the following
requirements:

(a)
The organization must provide state-wide support, development, and enhancement
of court-appointed special advocate programs that offer guardian ad litem
services as provided in RCW 26.12.175, 26.44.053, and 13.34.100;

(b)
All guardians ad litem working under court-appointed special advocate programs
supported, developed, or enhanced by the organization must be volunteers and
may not receive payment for services rendered pursuant to the program. The
organization may include paid positions that are exclusively administrative in
nature, in keeping with the scope and purpose of this section; and

(c)
The organization providing state-wide technical support, development, and
enhancement of court-appointed special advocate programs must be a public
benefit nonprofit corporation as defined in RCW 24.03.490.

(3)
If more than one organization is eligible to receive money under this section,
the department shall develop criteria for allocation of appropriated money
among the eligible organizations.

Sec.
108. RCW
43.63A.066 and 1993 c 280 s 58 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department ((of community, trade, and economic development)) shall have
primary responsibility for providing child abuse and neglect prevention
training to preschool age children participating in the federal head start
program or the early childhood education and assistance program established
under RCW 28A.215.010 through 28A.215.200 and 28A.215.900 through 28A.215.908.

Sec.
109. RCW
43.63A.115 and 1993 c 280 s 60 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The community action agency network, established initially under the federal economic
opportunity act of 1964 and subsequently under the federal community services
block grant program of 1981, as amended, shall be a delivery system for federal
and state anti-poverty programs in this state, including but not limited to the
community services block grant program, the low-income energy assistance
program, and the federal department of energy weatherization program.

(2)
Local community action agencies comprise the community action agency network.
The community action agency network shall serve low-income persons in the
counties. Each community action agency and its service area shall be
designated in the state federal community service block grant plan as prepared
by the department ((of community, trade, and economic development)).

(3) Funds for anti-poverty programs may be distributed to the
community action agencies by the department ((of community, trade, and
economic development)) and other state agencies in consultation with the
authorized representatives of community action agency networks.

Sec.
110. RCW
43.63A.125 and 1997 c 374 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

If
the legislature provides an appropriation to assist nonprofit organizations in
acquiring, constructing, or rehabilitating facilities used for the delivery of
nonresidential social services, the legislature may direct the department ((of
community, trade, and economic development)) to establish a competitive
process to prioritize applications for the assistance as follows:

(1)
The department shall conduct a state-wide solicitation of project applications
from local governments, nonprofit organizations, and other entities, as
determined by the department. The department shall evaluate and rank
applications in consultation with a citizen advisory committee using objective
criteria. At a minimum, applicants must demonstrate that the requested
assistance will increase the efficiency or quality of the social services it
provides to citizens. The evaluation and ranking process shall also include an
examination of existing assets that applicants may apply to projects. Grant
assistance under this section shall not exceed twenty-five percent of the total
cost of the project. The nonstate portion of the total project cost may
include, but is not limited to, land, facilities, and in-kind contributions.

(2)
The department shall submit a prioritized list of recommended projects to the
legislature by November 1st following the effective date of the appropriation.
The list shall include a description of each project, the amount of recommended
state funding, and documentation of nonstate funds to be used for the project.
The department shall not sign contracts or otherwise financially obligate funds
under this section until the legislature has approved a specific list of
projects.

(3)
In contracts for grants authorized under this section the department shall
include provisions which require that capital improvements shall be held by the
grantee for a specified period of time appropriate to the amount of the grant
and that facilities shall be used for the express purpose of the grant. If the
grantee is found to be out of compliance with provisions of the contract, the
grantee shall repay to the state general fund the principal amount of the grant
plus interest calculated at the rate of interest on state of Washington general
obligation bonds issued most closely to the date of authorization of the grant.

(4)
The department shall develop model contract provisions for compliance with
subsection (3) of this section and shall distribute its recommendations to the
appropriate legislative committees, the office of financial management, and to all
state agencies which provide capital grants to nonstate entities.

Sec.
111. RCW
43.63A.155 and 1993 c 280 s 61 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department ((of community, trade, and economic development)) shall retain
the bond information it receives under RCW 39.44.210 and 39.44.230 and shall
publish summaries of local government bond issues at least once a year.

The
department ((of community, trade, and economic development)) shall adopt
rules under chapter 34.05 RCW to implement RCW 39.44.210 and 39.44.230.

Sec.
112. RCW
43.63A.245 and 1993 c 280 s 64 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout RCW 43.63A.240 through 43.63A.270 (as recodified by this act).

(1)
"Agency" means one of the agencies or organizations participating in
the activities of the senior environmental corps.

(2)
"Coordinator" means the person designated by the director ((of community,
trade, and economic development)) with the advice of the council to
administer the activities of the senior environmental corps.

(3)
"Corps" means the senior environmental corps.

(4)
"Council" means the senior environmental corps coordinating council.

(("Department"
means the department of community, trade, and economic development.

"Director"
means the director of community, trade, and economic development or the
director's authorized representative.))

(5)
"Representative" means the person who represents an agency on the
council and is responsible for the activities of the senior environmental corps
in his or her agency.

(6)
"Senior" means any person who is fifty-five years of age or over.

(7)
"Volunteer" means a person who is willing to work without expectation
of salary or financial reward, and who chooses where he or she provides
services and the type of services he or she provides.

Sec.
113. RCW
43.63A.247 and 1994 c 264 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

The
senior environmental corps is created within the department ((of community,
trade, and economic development)). The department together with the
departments of agriculture, ((community, trade, and economic development,
employment security,)) ecology, fish and wildlife, health, and natural
resources, the employment security department, the parks and recreation
commission, and the Puget Sound ((water quality authority)) action
team shall participate in the administration and implementation of the
corps and shall appoint representatives to the council.

Sec.
114. RCW
43.63A.260 and 1994 c 264 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department shall convene a senior environmental corps coordinating council to
meet as needed to establish and assess policies, define standards for projects,
evaluate and select projects, develop recruitment, training, and placement
procedures, receive and review project status and completion reports, and
provide for recognition of volunteer activity. The council shall include
representatives appointed by the department, as well as the departments
of agriculture, ((community, trade, and economic development,)) ecology,
fish and wildlife, health, and natural resources, the parks and recreation
commission, and the Puget Sound ((water quality authority)) action
team. The council shall develop bylaws, policies and procedures to govern
its activities.

The
council shall advise the director on distribution of available funding for
corps activities.

Sec.
115. RCW
43.63A.275 and 1993 c 280 s 67 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each biennium the department ((of community, trade, and economic development))
shall distribute such funds as are appropriated for retired senior volunteer
programs (RSVP) as follows:

(a)
At least sixty-five percent of the moneys may be distributed according to
formulae and criteria to be determined by the department ((of community,
trade, and economic development)) in consultation with the RSVP directors
association.

(b)
Up to twenty percent of the moneys may be distributed by competitive grant
process to develop RSVP projects in counties not presently being served, or to
expand existing RSVP services into counties not presently served.

(c)
Ten percent of the moneys may be used by the department ((of community,
trade, and economic development)) for administration, monitoring of the
grants, and providing technical assistance to the RSVP projects.

(d)
Up to five percent of the moneys may be used to support projects that will
benefit RSVPs state-wide.

(2)
Grants under subsection (1) of this section shall give priority to programs in
the areas of education, tutoring, English as a second language, combating of
and education on drug abuse, housing and homeless, and respite care, and shall
be distributed in accordance with the following:

(a)
None of the grant moneys may be used to displace any paid employee in the area
being served.

(b)
Grants shall be made for programs that focus on:

(i)
Developing new roles for senior volunteers in nonprofit and public
organizations with special emphasis on areas targeted in section 1, chapter 65,
Laws of 1992. The roles shall reflect the diversity of the local senior
population and shall respect their life experiences;

(ii)
Increasing the expertise of volunteer managers and RSVP managers in the areas
of communication, recruitment, motivation, and retention of today's over-sixty
population;

(iii)
Increasing the number of senior citizens recruited, referred, and placed with
nonprofit and public organizations; and

(iv)
Providing volunteer support such as: Mileage to and from the volunteer
assignment, recognition, and volunteer insurance.

Sec.
116. RCW
43.63A.400 and 1993 c 280 s 72 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department ((of community, trade, and economic development)) shall
distribute grants to eligible public radio and television broadcast stations
under RCW 43.63A.410 and 43.63A.420 (as recodified by this act) to
assist with programming, operations, and capital needs.

Sec.
117. RCW
43.63A.410 and 1993 c 280 s 73 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Eligibility for grants under this section shall be limited to broadcast
stations which are:

(a)
Licensed to Washington state organizations, nonprofit corporations, or other
entities under section 73.621 of the regulations of the federal communications
commission; and

(b)
Qualified to receive community service grants from the federally chartered corporation
for public broadcasting. Eligibility shall be established as of February 28th
of each year.

(2)
The formula in this subsection shall be used to compute the amount of each
eligible station's grant under this section.

(a)
Appropriations under this section shall be divided into a radio fund, which
shall be twenty-five percent of the total appropriation under this section, and
a television fund, which shall be seventy-five percent of the total
appropriation under this section. Each of the two funds shall be divided into
a base grant pool, which shall be fifty percent of the fund, and an incentive
grant pool, which shall be the remaining fifty percent of the fund.

(b)
Each eligible participating public radio station shall receive an equal share
of the radio base grant pool, plus a share of the radio incentive grant pool
equal to the proportion its nonfederal financial support bears to the sum of
all participating radio stations' nonfederal financial support as most recently
reported to the corporation for public broadcasting.

(c)
Each eligible participating public television station shall receive an equal
share of the television base grant pool, plus a share of the television
incentive grant pool equal to the proportion its nonfederal financial support
bears to the sum of all participating television stations' nonfederal financial
support as most recently reported to the corporation for public broadcasting.

(3)
Annual financial reports to the corporation for public broadcasting by eligible
stations shall also be submitted by the stations to the department ((of
community, trade, and economic development)).

Sec.
118. RCW
43.63A.440 and 1997 c 367 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department ((of community, trade, and economic development)) shall
provide technical and financial assistance to communities adversely impacted by
reductions in timber harvested from federal, state, and private lands and
reduction of salmon fishing caused by efforts to maintain the long-term
viability of salmon stocks. The department shall use existing technical and
financial assistance resources to aid communities in planning, implementing,
and assembling financing for high priority community economic development
projects.

Sec.
119. RCW
43.63A.460 and 1993 c 280 s 76 are each amended to read as follows:

((Beginning
on July 1, 1991,)) The department ((of community, trade, and
economic development)) shall be responsible for performing all the consumer
complaint and related functions of the state administrative agency that are
required for purposes of complying with the regulations established by the
federal department of housing and urban development for manufactured housing,
including the preparation and submission of the state administrative plan.

The
department ((of community, trade, and economic development)) may enter
into state or local interagency agreements to coordinate site inspection
activities with record monitoring and complaint handling. The interagency
agreement may also provide for the reimbursement for cost of work that an
agency performs. The department may include other related areas in any
interagency agreements which are necessary for the efficient provision of
services.

((The
department of labor and industries shall transfer all records, files, books,
and documents necessary for the department of community, trade, and economic
development to assume these new functions.

The
directors of community, trade, and economic development and the department of
labor and industries shall immediately take such steps as are necessary to
ensure that this act is implemented on June 7, 1990.))

Sec.
120. RCW
43.63A.600 and 1995 c 226 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department ((of community, trade, and economic development)), as a
member of the agency rural community assistance task force shall establish and
administer the emergency mortgage and rental assistance program. The
department shall identify the communities most adversely affected by reductions
in timber and salmon harvest levels and shall prioritize assistance under this
program to these communities. The department shall work with the department of
social and health services and the rural community assistance ((recovery))
coordinator to develop the program in rural natural resources impact areas.
Organizations eligible to receive grant funds for distribution under the
program are those organizations that are eligible to receive assistance through
the Washington housing trust fund. The department shall disburse the funds to
eligible local organizations as grants. The local organizations shall use the
funds to make grants or loans as specified in RCW 43.63A.600 through 43.63A.640
(as recodified by this act). If funds are disbursed as loans, the local
organization shall establish a revolving grant and loan fund with funds
received as loan repayments and shall continue to make grants or loans or both
grants and loans from funds received as loan repayments to dislocated forest
products and dislocated salmon fishing workers eligible under the provisions of
RCW 43.63A.600 through 43.63A.640 (as recodified by this act) and to
other persons residing in rural natural resources impact areas who meet the requirements
of RCW 43.63A.600 through 43.63A.640 (as recodified by this act).

(2)
The goals of the program are to:

(a)
Provide temporary emergency mortgage loans or rental assistance grants or loans
on behalf of dislocated forest products and dislocated salmon fishing workers
in rural natural resources impact areas who are unable to make mortgage,
property tax, or rental payments on their permanent residences and are subject
to immediate eviction for nonpayment of mortgage installments, property taxes,
or nonpayment of rent;

(b)
Prevent the dislocation of individuals and families from their permanent
residences and their communities; and

(c)
Maintain economic and social stability in rural natural resources impact areas.

Sec.
121. RCW
43.330.152 and 1994 c 284 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

In
order to extend its services and programs, the department may charge reasonable
fees for services and products provided in the areas of financial assistance,
housing, ((international trade,)) community assistance, ((economic
development,)) and other service delivery areas, except as otherwise
provided. These fees are not intended to exceed the costs of providing the
service or preparing and distributing the product.

Sec.
122. RCW
43.330.155 and 1994 c 284 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
community ((and economic)) development fee account is created in the
state treasury. The department may create subaccounts as necessary. The account
consists of all receipts from fees charged by the department under RCW
43.330.150((,)) and 43.330.152((, and 43.210.110)) (as
recodified by this act). Expenditures from the account may be used only
for the purposes of this chapter. Only the director or the director's designee
may authorize expenditures from the account. Expenditures from the account may
be spent only after appropriation.

Sec.
123. RCW
43.330.156 and 1994 c 284 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The
fees authorized under RCW 43.330.150((,)) and 43.330.152((,
70.95H.040, and 43.210.110)) (as recodified by this act) shall be
adopted by rule pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 124. A
new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:

All
references to the director or department of community, trade, and economic
development in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the
director of community development or the department of community development.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 125. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
43.330.005 (Intent) and 1993 c 280 s 1;

(2) RCW
43.330.007 (Management responsibility) and 1993 c 280 s 2;

(3) RCW
43.330.010 (Definitions) and 1993 c 280 s 3; and

(4) RCW
43.330.900 (References to director and department) and 1993 c 280
s 79.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 126. The
following sections are each recodified as new sections in chapter 43.330 RCW:

RCW
43.31.855

RCW
43.31.857

RCW
43.63A.021

RCW
43.63A.066

RCW
43.63A.067

RCW
43.63A.105

RCW
43.63A.115

RCW
43.63A.125

RCW
43.63A.150

RCW
43.63A.155

RCW
43.63A.190

RCW
43.63A.215

RCW
43.63A.240

RCW
43.63A.245

RCW
43.63A.247

RCW
43.63A.249

RCW
43.63A.260

RCW
43.63A.265

RCW
43.63A.270

RCW
43.63A.275

RCW
43.63A.400

RCW
43.63A.410

RCW
43.63A.420

RCW
43.63A.440

RCW
43.63A.460

RCW
43.63A.465

RCW
43.63A.4651

RCW
43.63A.470

RCW
43.63A.475

RCW
43.63A.480

RCW
43.63A.485

RCW
43.63A.490

RCW
43.63A.500

RCW
43.63A.510

RCW
43.63A.550

RCW
43.63A.600

RCW
43.63A.610

RCW
43.63A.620

RCW
43.63A.630

RCW
43.63A.640

RCW
43.63A.650

RCW
43.63A.660

RCW
43.63A.670

RCW
43.63A.680

RCW
43.63A.720

RCW
43.63A.725

RCW
43.63A.730

RCW
43.63A.735

RCW
43.63A.740

RCW
43.63A.900

RCW
43.63A.901

RCW
43.63A.902

RCW
43.63A.903

RCW
43.330.145

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 127. The
following sections are recodified in chapter 43.330 RCW near the end of the
chapter:

RCW
43.330.152

RCW
43.330.155

RCW
43.330.156

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 128. The
code reviser shall insert notes following all sections containing references to
the department of community, trade, and economic development indicating that
this agency is now referred to as the department of community development.

PART
II

DEPARTMENT OF
TRADE AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 201. The
department of trade and economic development is created. Except as provided in
this act, the department shall be vested with all powers and duties formerly
exercised by the prior department of trade and economic development, before its
merger with the prior department of community development into the department
of community, trade, and economic development by chapter 280, Laws of 1993, and
such other powers and duties as may be authorized by law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 202.
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section
apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Associate development organization" means a local economic
development nonprofit corporation that is broadly representative of community
interests.

(2)
"Department" means the department of trade and economic development.

(3)
"Director" means the director of trade and economic development.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 203. (1)
The director shall supervise and administer the activities of the department
and shall advise the governor and the legislature with respect to economic
development matters affecting the state.

(2)
In addition to other powers and duties granted to the director, the director
shall have the following powers and duties:

(a)
To enter into contracts on behalf of the state to carry out the purposes of
this chapter;

(b)
To act for the state in the initiation of or participation in any
multigovernmental program relative to the purpose of this chapter;

(c)
To accept and expend gifts and grants, whether such grants be of federal or
other funds;

(d)
To appoint a deputy director and assistant directors as may be needed to
administer the department. These employees are exempt from the provisions of
chapter 41.06 RCW;

(e)
To prepare and submit budgets for the department for executive and legislative
action;

(f)
To submit recommendations for legislative actions as are deemed necessary to
further the purposes of this chapter;

(g)
To adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW and perform all other
functions necessary and proper to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(h)
To delegate powers, duties, and functions as the director deems necessary for
efficient administration, but the director shall be responsible for the
official acts of the officers and employees of the department; and

(i)
To perform other duties as are necessary and consistent with law.

(3)
When federal or other funds are received by the department, they shall be
promptly transferred to the state treasurer and thereafter expended only upon
the approval of the director.

(4)
The director may request information and assistance from all other agencies,
departments, and officials of the state, and may reimburse such agencies,
departments, or officials if such a request imposes any additional expenses
upon any such agency, department, or official.

(5)
The director shall, in carrying out the responsibilities of office, consult
with governmental officials, private groups, and individuals and with officials
of other states. All state agencies and their officials and the officials of
any political subdivision of the state shall cooperate with and give such
assistance to the department, including the submission of requested
information, to allow the department to carry out its purposes under this
chapter.

(6)
The director may establish additional advisory or coordinating groups with the
legislature, within state government, with state and other governmental units,
with the private sector and nonprofit entities or in specialized subject areas
as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(7)
The internal affairs of the department shall be under the control of the
director in order that the director may manage the department in a flexible and
intelligent manner as dictated by changing contemporary circumstances. Unless
specifically limited by law, the director shall have complete charge and
supervisory powers over the department. The director may create such
administrative structures as the director deems appropriate, except as
otherwise specified by law, and the director may employ such personnel as may
be necessary in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW, except as otherwise provided
by law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 204. The
department shall be responsible for promoting economic development within the
state by assisting the state's communities to increase the quality of life and
their economic vitality, while maintaining a quality environment. Economic
development efforts include, but are not limited to, efforts to increase
economic opportunities, business and trade development, assisting firms and
industrial sectors to increase their competitiveness, fostering the development
of minority and women-owned businesses, and facilitating the development,
transfer, and diffusion of technology.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 205. (1)
The department shall work closely with local communities to increase their
capacity to respond to economic problems and challenges. The department shall
coordinate the delivery of development services and related technical
assistance to local communities or regional areas. It shall promote
partnerships between the public and private sectors and between state and local
officials to encourage appropriate economic growth and opportunity in
communities throughout the state and shall promote appropriate local economic
development by supporting the ability of communities to develop and implement
strategic development plans, assisting businesses to start up, maintain, or
expand their operations, and expanding employment opportunities.

(2)
The department shall define a set of services including related training and
technical assistance that it will make available to local communities,
community-based nonprofit organizations, regional areas, or businesses. The
department shall simplify access to these programs by providing more
centralized and user-friendly information and referral. The department shall
coordinate economic development efforts to minimize program redundancy and
maximize accessibility. The department shall develop a set of criteria for
targeting services to local communities.

(3)
The department shall develop a coordinated and systematic approach to providing
related training to community-based nonprofit organizations, local communities,
and businesses. The approach shall be designed to increase the economic
development skills available in local communities by providing training and
funding for training for local citizens, nonprofit organizations, and
businesses. The department shall emphasize providing training in those communities
most in need of state assistance.

Sec.
206. RCW
43.330.904 and 1996 c 186 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All powers, duties, and functions of the state energy office relating to energy
resource policy and planning and energy facility siting are transferred to the
department ((of community, trade, and economic development)). All
references to the director or the state energy office in the Revised Code of
Washington shall be construed to mean the director or the department ((of
community, trade, and economic development)) when referring to the
functions transferred in this section.

The
director shall appoint an assistant director for energy policy, and energy
policy staff shall have no additional responsibilities beyond activities
concerning energy policy.

(2)(a)
All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written
material in the possession of the state energy office pertaining to the powers,
functions, and duties transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the
department ((of community, trade, and economic development)). All
cabinets, furniture, office equipment, software, data base, motor vehicles, and
other tangible property employed by the state energy office in carrying out the
powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be made available to the
department ((of community, trade, and economic development)).

(b)
Any appropriations made to the state energy office for carrying out the powers,
functions, and duties transferred ((shall, on July 1, 1996, be)) are
transferred and credited to the department ((of community, trade, and
economic development)).

(c)
Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any funds, books, documents,
records, papers, files, software, data base, equipment, or other tangible
property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the
duties and functions transferred, the director of financial management shall
make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the
state agencies concerned.

(3)
All employees of the state energy office engaged in performing the powers,
functions, and duties pertaining to the energy facility site evaluation council
are transferred to the jurisdiction of the department ((of community, trade,
and economic development)). All employees engaged in energy facility site
evaluation council duties classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil
service law, are assigned to the department ((of community, trade, and
economic development)) to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as
formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be
appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state
civil service.

(4)
All rules and all pending business before the state energy office pertaining to
the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be continued and acted upon
by the department ((of community, trade, and economic development)).
All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be
performed by the department ((of community, trade, and economic development)).

(5)
The transfer of the powers, duties, and functions of the state energy office
does not affect the validity of any act performed before July 1, 1996.

(6)
If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers
directed by this section, the director of the office of financial management
shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor,
and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and
adjustments in funds and appropriation.

(7)
The department ((of community, trade, and economic development)) shall
direct the closure of the financial records of the state energy office.

(8)
Responsibility for implementing energy education, applied research, and
technology transfer programs rests with Washington State University. The
department ((of community, trade, and economic development)) shall
provide Washington State University available existing and future oil
overcharge restitution and federal energy block funding for a minimum period of
five years to carry out energy programs under an interagency agreement with the
department ((of community, trade, and economic development)). The
interagency agreement shall also outline the working relationship between the
department ((of community, trade, and economic development)) and
Washington State University as it pertains to the relationship between energy
policy development and public outreach. Nothing in chapter 186, Laws of 1996
prohibits Washington State University from seeking grant, contract, or
fee-for-service funding for energy or related programs directly from other
entities.

Sec.
207. RCW
43.63A.230 and 1993 c 280 s 63 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department ((of community, trade, and economic development)) shall
integrate an employee ownership program within its existing technical
assistance programs. The employee ownership program shall provide technical
assistance to cooperatives authorized under chapter 23.78 RCW and conduct
educational programs on employee ownership and self-management. The department
shall include information on the option of employee ownership wherever
appropriate in its various programs.

(2)
The department shall maintain a list of firms and individuals with expertise in
the field of employee ownership and utilize such firms and individuals, as
appropriate, in delivering and coordinating the delivery of technical,
managerial, and educational services. In addition, the department shall work
with and rely on the services of the department of community development,
the employment security department, and state institutions of higher
education to promote employee ownership.

(3)
The department shall report to the governor, the appropriate economic
development committees of the senate and the house of representatives, and the
ways and means committees of each house by December 1st of ((1988,
and)) each year ((thereafter,)) on the accomplishments of the
employee-ownership program. Such reports shall include the number and types of
firms assisted, the number of jobs created by such firms, the types of
services, the number of workshops presented, the number of employees trained,
and the results of client satisfaction surveys distributed to those using the
services of the program.

(4)
For purposes of this section, an employee stock ownership plan qualifies as a
cooperative if at least fifty percent, plus one share, of its voting shares of
stock are voted on a one-person-one-vote basis.

Sec.
208. RCW
43.330.065 and 1996 c 253 s 303 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department ((of community, trade, and economic development)), in
consultation with the office of protocol, the office of the secretary of state,
the department of agriculture, and the employment security department shall
identify up to fifteen countries that are of strategic importance to the
development of Washington's international trade relations.

Sec.
209. RCW
43.330.080 and 1997 c 60 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall contract with associate development organizations or other
local organizations to increase the support for and coordination of ((community
and)) economic development services in communities or regional areas. The
organizations contracted with in each community or regional area shall be
broadly representative of community and economic interests. The organization
shall be capable of identifying key economic ((and community))
development problems, developing appropriate solutions, and mobilizing broad
support for recommended initiatives. The contracting organization shall work
with and include local governments, local chambers of commerce, private
industry councils, port districts, labor groups, institutions of higher education,
community action programs, and other appropriate private, public, or nonprofit
((community and)) economic development groups. The department shall be
responsible for determining the scope of services delivered under these
contracts.

(2)
Associate development organizations or other local development organizations
contracted with shall promote and coordinate, through local service agreements
with local governments, small business development centers, port districts,
community and technical colleges, private industry councils, and other
development organizations, for the efficient delivery of ((community and))
economic development services in their areas.

(3)
The department shall consult with associate development organizations, port
districts, local governments, and other local development organizations in the
establishment of service delivery regions throughout the state. The
legislature encourages local associate development organizations to form
partnerships with other associate development organizations in their region to
combine resources for better access to available services, to encourage
regional delivery of state services, and to build the local capacity of
communities in the region more effectively.

(4)
The department shall contract on a regional basis for surveys of key sectors of
the regional economy and the coordination of technical assistance to businesses
and employees within the key sectors. The department's selection of
contracting organizations or consortiums shall be based on the sufficiency of
the organization's or consortium's proposal to examine key sectors of the local
economy within its region adequately and its ability to coordinate the delivery
of services required by businesses within the targeted sectors. Organizations
contracting with the department shall work closely with the department to
examine the local economy and to develop strategies to focus on developing key
sectors that show potential for long-term sustainable growth. The contracting
organization shall survey businesses and employees in targeted sectors on a
periodic basis to gather information on the sector's business needs, expansion
plans, relocation decisions, training needs, potential layoffs, financing
needs, availability of financing, and other appropriate information about
economic trends and specific employer and employee needs in the region.

(5)
The contracting organization shall participate with the work force training and
education coordinating board as created in chapter 28C.18 RCW, and any regional
entities designated by that board, in providing for the coordination of job
skills training within its region.

Sec.
210. RCW
43.31.057 and 1993 c 280 s 39 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department ((of community, trade, and economic development)) is directed
to develop and promote means to stimulate the expansion of the market for
Washington products and shall have the following powers and duties:

(1)
To develop a pamphlet for state-wide circulation which will encourage the
purchase of items produced in the state of Washington;

(2)
To include in the pamphlet a listing of products of Washington companies which
individuals can examine when making purchases so they may have the opportunity
to select one of those products in support of this program;

(3)
To distribute the pamphlets on the broadest possible basis through local
offices of state agencies, business organizations, chambers of commerce, or any
other means the department deems appropriate;

(4)
In carrying out these powers and duties the department shall cooperate and
coordinate with other agencies of government and the private sector.

Sec.
211. RCW
43.31.093 and 1995 c 399 s 71 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department ((of community, trade, and economic development)) shall
contract with public and private agencies, institutions, and organizations to
conduct entrepreneurial training courses for minority and women-owned small
businesses. The instruction shall be intensive, practical training courses in
financing, marketing, managing, accounting, and recordkeeping for a small
business, with an emphasis on federal, state, local, or private programs
available to assist small businesses. The ((business assistance center))
department may recommend professional instructors, with practical
knowledge and experience on how to start and operate a business, to teach the
courses. Instruction shall be offered in major population centers throughout
the state at times and locations which are convenient for minority and women
small business owners and entrepreneurs.

Sec.
212. RCW
43.31.205 and 1993 c 280 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

In
an effort to enhance the economy of the Tri-Cities area, the department ((of
community, trade, and economic development)) is directed to promote the
existence of the lease between the state of Washington and the federal
government executed September 10, 1964, covering one thousand acres of land
lying within the Hanford reservation near Richland, Washington, and the
opportunity of subleasing the land to entities for nuclear-related industry, in
agreement with the terms of the lease. When promoting the existence of the
lease, the department shall work in cooperation with any associate development
organization located in or near the Tri-Cities area.

Sec.
213. RCW
43.31.409 and 1993 c 280 s 42 are each amended to read as follows:

((There
is created in the business assistance center of the department of community,
trade, and economic development)) The Washington investment
opportunities office is created in the department.

Sec.
214. RCW
43.31.422 and 1998 c 76 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
Hanford area economic investment fund is established in the custody of the
state treasurer. Moneys in the fund shall only be used for reasonable
assistant attorney general costs in support of the committee or pursuant to the
recommendations of the committee created in RCW 43.31.425 and the approval of
the director ((of community, trade, and economic development)) for
Hanford area revolving loan funds, Hanford area infrastructure projects, or
other Hanford area economic development and diversification projects, but may
not be used for government or nonprofit organization operating expenses. Up to
five percent of moneys in the fund may be used for program administration. For
the purpose of this chapter "Hanford area" means Benton and Franklin
counties. Disbursements from the fund shall be on the authorization of the
director ((of community, trade, and economic development)) or the
director's designee after an affirmative vote of at least six members of the
committee created in RCW 43.31.425 on any recommendations by the committee
created in RCW 43.31.425. The fund is subject to the allotment procedures
under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for disbursements.
The legislature intends to establish similar economic investment funds for
areas that develop low-level radioactive waste disposal facilities.

Sec.
215. RCW
43.31.504 and 1993 c 280 s 45 are each amended to read as follows:

The
child care facility fund committee is established within the ((business
assistance center of the)) department ((of community, trade, and
economic development)). The committee shall administer the child care
facility fund, with review by the director ((of community, trade, and
economic development)).

(1)
The committee shall have five members. The director of community, trade, and
economic development shall appoint the members, who shall include:

(a)
Two persons experienced in investment finance and having skills in providing
capital to new businesses, in starting and operating businesses, and providing
professional services to small or expanding businesses;

(b)
One person representing a philanthropic organization with experience in
evaluating funding requests;

(c)
One child care services expert; and

(d)
One early childhood development expert.

In
making these appointments, the director shall give careful consideration to
ensure that the various geographic regions of the state are represented and
that members will be available for meetings and are committed to working cooperatively
to address child care needs in Washington state.

(2)
The committee shall elect officers from among its membership and shall adopt
policies and procedures specifying the lengths of terms, methods for filling
vacancies, and other matters necessary to the ongoing functioning of the
committee.

(3)
Committee members shall serve without compensation, but may request
reimbursement for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(4)
Committee members shall not be liable to the state, to the child care facility
fund, or to any other person as a result of their activities, whether
ministerial or discretionary, as members except for willful dishonesty or
intentional violation of the law. The department ((of community, trade, and
economic development)) may purchase liability insurance for members and may
indemnify these persons against the claims of others.

Sec.
216. RCW
43.31.522 and 1993 c 280 s 46 are each amended to read as follows:

((Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout)) As used in RCW 43.31.524 and 43.31.526((:

(1)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(2)
"Center" means the business assistance center established under RCW
43.31.083.

(3)
"Director" means the director of community, trade, and economic
development.

(4)))
"local nonprofit organization" means a local nonprofit
organization organized to provide economic development or community development
services, including but not limited to associate development organizations,
economic development councils, and community development corporations.

Sec.
217. RCW
43.31.524 and 1993 c 280 s 47 are each amended to read as follows:

There
is established a Washington marketplace program within the ((business
assistance center established under RCW 43.31.083)) department. The
program shall assist businesses to competitively meet their needs for goods and
services within Washington state by providing information relating to the
replacement of imports or the fulfillment of new requirements with Washington
products produced in Washington state. The program shall place special
emphasis on strengthening rural economies in economically distressed areas of
the state meeting the criteria of an "eligible area" as defined in
RCW 82.60.020(3).

Sec.
218. RCW
43.31.641 and 1997 c 367 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department ((of community, trade, and economic development)), as a
member of the agency rural community assistance task force, shall:

(1)
Administer available federal grant funds to support strategic diversification
needs and opportunities of timber-dependent communities, value-added forest
products firms, and the value-added forest products industry in Washington
state.

(2)
Provide value-added wood products companies with building products export
development assistance.

Sec.
219. RCW
43.31.830 and 1993 c 280 s 53 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
It shall be the duty of the director ((of community, trade, and economic
development)) to certify, from the applications received, the state
international trade fair or fairs qualified and entitled to receive funds under
RCW ((67.16.100)) 15.76.115, and under rules established by the
director.

(2)
The director shall make annual allotments to state international trade fairs
determined qualified to be entitled to participate in the state trade fair fund
and shall fix times for the division of and payment from the state trade fair
fund: PROVIDED, That total payment to any one state international trade fair
shall not exceed sixty thousand dollars in any one year, where participation or
presentation occurs within the United States, and eighty thousand dollars in
any one year, where participation or presentation occurs outside the United
States: PROVIDED FURTHER, That a state international trade fair may qualify
for the full allotment of funds under either category. Upon certification of
the allotment and division of fair funds by the director the treasurer shall
proceed to pay the same to carry out the purposes of RCW 67.16.100.

Sec.
220. RCW
43.31.840 and 1993 c 280 s 54 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director ((of community, trade, and economic development)) shall at the
end of each year for which an annual allotment has been made, conduct a post
audit of all of the books and records of each state international trade fair
participating in the state trade fair fund. The purpose of such post audit
shall be to determine how and to what extent each participating state
international trade fair has expended all of its funds.

The
audit required by this section shall be a condition to future allotments of
money from the state international trade fair fund, and the director shall make
a report of the findings of each post audit and shall use such report as a
consideration in an application for any future allocations.

Sec.
221. RCW
43.31.855 and 1997 c 377 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The Washington state rural development council is established and governed by
an executive committee consisting of eleven members, appointed by the
governor. The members will include representatives from the following
categories: Business; natural resources; agriculture; environment; economic
development; education; health; human services; counties; cities; and tribal
governments.

(2)
New members of the executive committee are appointed for terms of three years
from the current membership list of the rural development council, as much as
possible. Committee members should be people who either live, work, or provide
direct services in rural areas. Committee membership must consist of no less
than ninety percent of the members living in a rural area. As a transition
strategy for the council, four representatives (business, counties, health,
agriculture) will be appointed in 1997, four (human services, natural
resources, cities, environment) in 1998, and three (economic development,
tribal government, education) in 1999. The new council will be fully formed in
1999.

(3)
The governor may make appointments from a list of candidates generated by the
executive committee. The executive committee shall generate a list of at least
three but not more than six candidates from recommendations from state-wide
associations. The list of candidates for the county representative shall be
generated by the Washington state association of counties. The list of
candidates for the city representative shall be generated by the association of
Washington cities. In making appointments, the governor shall consider an
equitable geographic distribution.

(4)
Members of the Washington state rural development council shall receive no
compensation for their services, but shall be eligible to receive reimbursement
for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(5)
The department ((of community, trade, and economic development)) may
provide staff support, administrative assistance, and office space to the
council as available.

(6)
The Washington state rural development council executive committee is
authorized to establish operating procedures, policies, and bylaws, and appoint
committees. In addition, the executive committee is responsible for hiring,
evaluating, and if necessary, firing the ((execute [executive])) executive
director according to state policies and rules.

(7)
The Washington state rural development council is directed to: Inform
legislators, the governor's office, state agencies, and federal agencies about
the rural perspective on community development issues; identify and in some
cases develop recommended improvements to existing resource delivery systems;
and serve as a liaison or intermediary between rural communities and public and
private resource providers. The council's mission is to improve the delivery
and accessibility of public and private resources to meet the needs of rural
communities.

(8)
This section expires June 30, 2003.

Sec.
222. RCW
43.31.857 and 1997 c 377 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature encourages state agencies to contribute financially to the rural
development council. In addition to the United States department of
agriculture and the ((state)) department ((of community, trade, and
economic development)), all state agencies, federal agencies, and
state-wide associations that make a significant financial contribution to the
rural development council shall be ex officio members. In particular, state
agencies serving rural areas, including the departments of agriculture, fish
and wildlife, ecology, employment security, health, natural resources, social
and health services, and transportation, and the utilities and transportation
commission, are encouraged to contribute financially. Financial contributions
from state agencies along with those from the private sector and state-wide
associations will enable the rural development council to leverage federal
funds at a three-to-one ratio annually.

(2)
This section expires June 30, 2003.

Sec.
223. RCW
43.31.960 and 1995 c 399 s 72 are each amended to read as follows:

The
principal proceeds from the sale of the bonds authorized in RCW 43.31.956 shall
be administered by the director ((of community, trade, and economic
development)).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 224. In
order to extend its services and programs, the department may charge reasonable
fees for services and products provided in the areas of financial assistance,
international trade, economic development, and other service delivery areas,
except as otherwise provided. These fees are not intended to exceed the costs
of providing the service or preparing and distributing the product.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 225. The
economic development fee account is created in the state treasury. The
department may create subaccounts as necessary. The account consists of all
receipts from fees charged by the department under RCW 43.210.110.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes of this
chapter. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. Expenditures from the account may be spent only
after appropriation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 226. The
fees authorized under RCW 70.95H.040 shall be adopted by rule pursuant to
chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 227. RCW
43.31.800 (State international trade fairs--"Director"
defined) and 1993 c 280 s 52, 1987 c 195 s 4, & 1965 c 148 s 2 are each
repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 228. The
following sections are each recodified as new sections in chapter 43.31 RCW:

RCW
43.63A.075

RCW
43.63A.230

RCW
43.63A.700

RCW
43.63A.710

RCW
43.63A.715

RCW
43.330.060

RCW
43.330.065

RCW
43.330.080

RCW
43.330.090

RCW
43.330.092

RCW
43.330.094

RCW
43.330.095

RCW
43.330.096

RCW
43.63A.690

RCW
43.330.904

PART
III

REFERENCES
TO DEPARTMENT OF

TRADE
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Sec.
301. RCW
43.17.065 and 1995 c 226 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Where power is vested in a department to issue permits, licenses,
certifications, contracts, grants, or otherwise authorize action on the part of
individuals, businesses, local governments, or public or private organizations,
such power shall be exercised in an expeditious manner. All departments with
such power shall cooperate with officials of the ((business assistance
center of the)) department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and
economic development, and any other state officials, when such officials
request timely action on the part of the issuing department.

(2)
((After August 1, 1991,)) Any agency to which subsection (1) of
this section applies shall, with regard to any permits or other actions that
are necessary for economic development in rural natural resources impact areas,
as defined in RCW 43.31.601, respond to any completed application within
forty-five days of its receipt; any response, at a minimum, shall include:

(a)
The specific steps that the applicant needs to take in order to have the
application approved; and

(b)
The assistance that will be made available to the applicant by the agency to
expedite the application process.

(3)
The agency rural community assistance task force established in RCW 43.31.621
shall oversee implementation of this section.

(4)
Each agency shall define what constitutes a completed application and make this
definition available to applicants.

Sec.
302. RCW
19.02.050 and 1997 c 391 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature hereby directs the full participation by the following agencies in
the implementation of this chapter:

(1)
Department of agriculture;

(2)
Secretary of state;

(3)
Department of social and health services;

(4)
Department of revenue;

(5)
Department of fish and wildlife;

(6)
Department of employment security;

(7)
Department of labor and industries;

(8)
Department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development;

(9)
Liquor control board;

(10)
Department of health;

(11)
Department of licensing;

(12)
Parks and recreation commission;

(13)
Utilities and transportation commission; and

(14)
Other agencies as determined by the governor.

Sec.
303. RCW
24.46.010 and 1995 c 399 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

It
is the finding of the legislature that foreign trade zones serve an important
public purpose by the creation of employment opportunities within the state and
that the establishment of zones designed to accomplish this purpose is to be
encouraged. It is the further intent of the legislature that the department of
((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development provide
assistance to entities planning to apply to the United States for permission to
establish such zones.

Sec.
304. RCW
28B.20.283 and 1995 c 399 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that the development and commercialization of new technology
is a vital part of economic development.

The
legislature also finds that it is in the interests of the state of Washington
to provide a mechanism to transfer and apply research and technology developed
at the institutions of higher education to the private sector in order to
create new products and technologies which provide job opportunities in
advanced technology for the citizens of this state.

It
is the intent of the legislature that the University of Washington, the
Washington State University, and the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development work cooperatively with the private
sector in the development and implementation of a world class technology transfer
program.

Sec.
305. RCW
28B.20.289 and 1995 c 399 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The technology center shall be administered by the board of directors of the
technology center.

(2)
The board shall consist of the following members: Fourteen members from among
individuals who are associated with or employed by technology-based industries
and have broad business experience and an understanding of high technology;
eight members from the state's universities with graduate science and
engineering programs; the executive director of the Spokane Intercollegiate
Research and Technology Institute or his or her designated representative; the
provost of the University of Washington or his or her designated representative;
the provost of the Washington State University or his or her designated
representative; and the director of the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development or his or her designated
representative. The term of office for each board member, excluding the
executive director of the Spokane Intercollegiate Research and Technology
Institute, the provost of the University of Washington, the provost of the
Washington State University, and the director of the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development, shall be three years. The
executive director of the technology center shall be an ex officio, nonvoting
member of the board. The board shall meet at least quarterly. Board members
shall be appointed by the governor based on the recommendations of the existing
board of the technology center, and the research universities. The governor
shall stagger the terms of the first group of appointees to ensure the long
term continuity of the board.

(3)
The duties of the board include:

(a)
Developing the general operating policies for the technology center;

(b)
Appointing the executive director of the technology center;

(c)
Approving the annual operating budget of the technology center;

(d)
Establishing priorities for the selection and funding of research projects that
guarantee the greatest potential return on the state's investment;

(e)
Approving and allocating funding for research projects conducted by the
technology center, based on the recommendations of the advisory committees for
each of the research centers;

(f)
In cooperation with the department of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development, developing a biennial work plan and five-year
strategic plan for the technology center that are consistent with the
state-wide technology development and commercialization goals;

(g)
Coordinating with the University of Washington, Washington State University,
and other participating institutions of higher education in the development of
training, research, and development programs to be conducted at the technology
center that shall be targeted to meet industrial needs;

(h)
Assisting the department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and
economic development in the department's efforts to develop state science and
technology public policies and coordinate publicly funded programs;

(i)
Reviewing annual progress reports on funded research projects that are prepared
by the advisory committees for each of the research centers;

(j)
Providing an annual report to the governor and the legislature detailing the
activities and performance of the technology center; and

(k)
Submitting annually to the department of community, trade, and economic
development an updated strategic plan and a statement of performance measured
against the mission, roles, and contractual obligations of the technology
center.

Sec.
306. RCW
28B.20.293 and 1995 c 399 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development
shall contract with the University of Washington for the expenditure of
state-appropriated funds for the operation of the Washington technology
center. The department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic
development shall provide guidance to the technology center regarding
expenditure of state-appropriated funds and the development of the center's
strategic plan. The director of the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development shall not withhold funds
appropriated for the technology center if the technology center complies with
the provisions of its contract with the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development. The department shall be
responsible to the legislature for the contractual performance of the center.

Sec.
307. RCW
28B.30.537 and 1998 c 245 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

The
IMPACT center shall:

(1)
Coordinate the teaching, research, and extension expertise of the college of
agriculture and home economics at Washington State University to assist in:

(a)
The design and development of information and strategies to expand the long-term
international markets for Washington agricultural products; and

(b)
The dissemination of such information and strategies to Washington exporters,
overseas users, and public and private trade organizations;

(2)
Research and identify current impediments to increased exports of Washington
agricultural products, and determine methods of surmounting those impediments
and opportunities for exporting new agricultural products and commodities to
foreign markets;

(3)
Prepare curricula to present and distribute information concerning
international trade in agricultural commodities and products to students,
exporters, international traders, and the public;

(4)
Provide high-quality research and graduate education and professional nondegree
training in international trade in agricultural commodities in cooperation with
other existing programs;

(5)
Ensure that activities of the center adequately reflect the objectives for the
state's agricultural market development programs established by the department
of agriculture as the lead state agency for such programs under chapter 43.23
RCW; and

(6) Link itself through cooperative agreements with the center for
international trade in forest products at the University of Washington, the
state department of agriculture, the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development, Washington's agriculture businesses
and associations, and other state agency data collection, processing, and
dissemination efforts.

Sec.
308. RCW
28B.50.262 and 1995 c 226 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

The
state board for community and technical colleges shall develop, in conjunction
with the center for international trade in forest products, the Washington
State University wood materials and engineering laboratory, and the department
of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development, a
competency-based technical degree program in wood product manufacturing and
wood technology and make it available in every college district that serves a
rural natural resources impact area.

Sec.
309. RCW
28B.65.040 and 1995 c 399 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The Washington high-technology coordinating board is hereby created.

(2)
The board shall be composed of eighteen members as follows:

(a)
Eleven shall be citizen members appointed by the governor, with the consent of
the senate, for four-year terms. In making the appointments the governor shall
ensure that a balanced geographic representation of the state is achieved and
shall attempt to choose persons experienced in high-technology fields,
including at least one representative of labor. Any person appointed to fill a
vacancy occurring before a term expires shall be appointed only for the remainder
of that term; and

(b)
Seven of the members shall be as follows: One representative from each of the
state's two research universities, one representative of the state college and
regional universities, the director for the state system of community and
technical colleges or the director's designee, the superintendent of public
instruction or the superintendent's designee, a representative of the higher
education coordinating board, and the director of the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development or the director's designee.

(3)
Members of the board shall not receive any salary for their services, but shall
be reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 for each
day actually spent in attending to duties as a member of the board.

(4) A citizen member of the board shall not be, during the term of
office, a member of the governing board of any public or private educational
institution, or an employee of any state or local agency.

Sec.
310. RCW
28B.65.050 and 1998 c 245 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The board shall oversee, coordinate, and evaluate the high-technology programs.

(2)
The board shall:

(a)
Determine the specific high-technology occupational fields in which technical
training is needed and advise the institutions of higher education and the
higher education coordinating board on their findings;

(b)
Identify economic areas and high-technology industries in need of technical
training and research and development critical to economic development and
advise the institutions of higher education and the higher education
coordinating board on their findings;

(c)
Oversee and coordinate the Washington high-technology education and training
program to ensure high standards, efficiency, and effectiveness;

(d)
Work cooperatively with the superintendent of public instruction to identify
the skills prerequisite to the high-technology programs in the institutions of
higher education;

(e)
Work cooperatively with and provide any information or advice which may be
requested by the higher education coordinating board during the board's review
of new baccalaureate degree program proposals which are submitted under this
chapter. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as altering or superseding
the powers or prerogatives of the higher education coordinating board over the
review of new degree programs as established in ((section 6(2) of this 1985
act)) RCW 28B.80.340;

(f)
Work cooperatively with the department of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development to identify the high-technology education and training
needs of existing Washington businesses and businesses with the potential to
locate in Washington;

(g)
Work towards increasing private sector participation and contributions in
Washington high-technology programs;

(h)
Identify and evaluate the effectiveness of state sponsored research related to
high technology; and

(i)
Establish and maintain a plan, including priorities, to guide high-technology
program development in public institutions of higher education, which plan
shall include an assessment of current high-technology programs, steps to
increase existing programs, new initiatives and programs necessary to promote
high technology, and methods to coordinate and target high-technology programs
to changing market opportunities in business and industry.

(3)
The board may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as it deems necessary to
carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(4)
The board shall cease to exist on June 30, 1987, unless extended by law for an
additional fixed period of time.

Sec.
311. RCW
28B.65.060 and 1995 c 399 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

Staff
support for the high-technology coordinating board shall be provided by the
department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development.

Sec.
312. RCW
28B.109.020 and 1996 c 253 s 402 are each amended to read as follows:

The
Washington international exchange scholarship program is created subject to
funding under RCW 28B.109.060. The program shall be administered by the
board. In administering the program, the board may:

(1)
Convene an advisory committee that may include but need not be limited to
representatives of the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the
department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development,
the secretary of state, private business, and institutions of higher education;

(2)
Select students to receive the scholarship with the assistance of a screening
committee composed of leaders in business, international trade, and education;

(3)
Adopt necessary rules and guidelines including rules for disbursing scholarship
funds to participants;

(4)
Publicize the program;

(5)
Solicit and accept grants and donations from public and private sources for the
program;

(6)
Establish and notify participants of service obligations; and

(7)
Establish a formula for selecting the countries from which participants may be
selected in consultation with the department of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development.

Sec.
313. RCW
28C.04.440 and 1995 c 399 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development
and the employment security department shall each enter into an interagency
agreement with the commission on vocational education to establish cooperative
working arrangements for the purposes of RCW 28C.04.410 through 28C.04.480.

Sec.
314. RCW
28C.04.460 and 1995 c 399 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development
or its successor shall for the purposes of RCW 28C.04.410 through 28C.04.480:

(1)
Work cooperatively with the commission on vocational education to market the
job skills program to business and economic development agencies and other
firms;

(2)
Recruit industries from outside the state to participate in the job skills
training program; and

(3)
Refer business and industry interested in developing a job skills training
program to the commission on vocational education.

Sec.
315. RCW
28C.18.060 and 1996 c 99 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board, in cooperation with the operating agencies of the state training system
and private career schools and colleges shall:

(1)
Concentrate its major efforts on planning, coordination evaluation, policy
analysis, and recommending improvements to the state's training system.

(2)
Advocate for the state training system and for meeting the needs of employers
and the work force for work force education and training.

(3)
Establish and maintain an inventory of the programs of the state training
system, and related state programs, and perform a biennial assessment of the
vocational education, training, and adult basic education and literacy needs of
the state; identify ongoing and strategic education needs; and assess the
extent to which employment, training, vocational and basic education,
rehabilitation services, and public assistance services represent a consistent,
integrated approach to meet such needs.

(4)
Develop and maintain a state comprehensive plan for work force training and
education, including but not limited to, goals, objectives, and priorities for
the state training system, and review the state training system for consistency
with the state comprehensive plan. In developing the state comprehensive plan
for work force training and education, the board shall use, but shall not be
limited to: Economic, labor market, and populations trends reports in office
of financial management forecasts; joint office of financial management and
employment security department labor force, industry employment, and
occupational forecasts; the results of scientifically based outcome, net-impact
and cost-benefit evaluations; the needs of employers as evidenced in formal
employer surveys and other employer input; and the needs of program
participants and workers as evidenced in formal surveys and other input from
program participants and the labor community.

(5)
In consultation with the higher education coordinating board, review and make
recommendations to the office of financial management and the legislature on
operating and capital facilities budget requests for operating agencies of the
state training system for purposes of consistency with the state comprehensive
plan for work force training and education.

(6)
Provide for coordination among the different operating agencies and components
of the state training system at the state level and at the regional level.

(7)
Develop a consistent and reliable data base on vocational education
enrollments, costs, program activities, and job placements from publicly funded
vocational education programs in this state.

(8)
Establish standards for data collection and maintenance for the operating
agencies of the state training system in a format that is accessible to use by
the board. The board shall require a minimum of common core data to be
collected by each operating agency of the state training system.

The
board shall develop requirements for minimum common core data in consultation
with the office of financial management and the operating agencies of the
training system.

(9)
Establish minimum standards for program evaluation for the operating agencies
of the state training system, including, but not limited to, the use of common
survey instruments and procedures for measuring perceptions of program
participants and employers of program participants, and monitor such program
evaluation.

(10)
Every two years administer scientifically based outcome evaluations of the
state training system, including, but not limited to, surveys of program
participants, surveys of employers of program participants, and matches with
employment security department payroll and wage files. Every five years
administer scientifically based net-impact and cost-benefit evaluations of the
state training system.

(11)
In cooperation with the employment security department, provide for the
improvement and maintenance of quality and utility in occupational information
and forecasts for use in training system planning and evaluation. Improvements
shall include, but not be limited to, development of state-based occupational
change factors involving input by employers and employees, and delineation of
skill and training requirements by education level associated with current and
forecasted occupations.

(12)
Provide for the development of common course description formats, common
reporting requirements, and common definitions for operating agencies of the
training system.

(13)
Provide for effectiveness and efficiency reviews of the state training system.

(14)
In cooperation with the higher education coordinating board, facilitate
transfer of credit policies and agreements between institutions of the state
training system, and encourage articulation agreements for programs
encompassing two years of secondary work force education and two years of postsecondary
work force education.

(15)
In cooperation with the higher education coordinating board, facilitate
transfer of credit policies and agreements between private training
institutions and institutions of the state training system.

(16)
Participate in the development of coordination criteria for activities under
the job training partnership act with related programs and services provided by
state and local education and training agencies.

(17)
Make recommendations to the commission of student assessment, the state board
of education, and the superintendent of public instruction, concerning basic
skill competencies and essential core competencies for K‑12 education.
Basic skills for this purpose shall be reading, writing, computation, speaking,
and critical thinking, essential core competencies for this purpose shall be
English, math, science/technology, history, geography, and critical thinking.
The board shall monitor the development of and provide advice concerning
secondary curriculum which integrates vocational and academic education.

(18)
Establish and administer programs for marketing and outreach to businesses and
potential program participants.

(19)
Facilitate the location of support services, including but not limited to, child
care, financial aid, career counseling, and job placement services, for
students and trainees at institutions in the state training system, and
advocate for support services for trainees and students in the state training
system.

(20)
Facilitate private sector assistance for the state training system, including
but not limited to: Financial assistance, rotation of private and public
personnel, and vocational counseling.

(21)
Facilitate programs for school-to-work transition that combine classroom education
and on-the-job training in industries and occupations without a significant
number of apprenticeship programs.

(22)
Encourage and assess progress for the equitable representation of racial and
ethnic minorities, women, and people with disabilities among the students,
teachers, and administrators of the state training system. Equitable, for this
purpose, shall mean substantially proportional to their percentage of the state
population in the geographic area served. This function of the board shall in
no way lessen more stringent state or federal requirements for representation
of racial and ethnic minorities, women, and people with disabilities.

(23)
Participate in the planning and policy development of governor set-aside grants
under P.L. 97‑300, as amended.

(24)
Administer veterans' programs, licensure of private vocational schools, the job
skills program, and the Washington award for vocational excellence.

(25)
Allocate funding from the state job training trust fund.

(26)
Work with the director of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic
development to ensure coordination between work force training priorities and
that department's economic development efforts.

(27)
Adopt rules as necessary to implement this chapter.

The
board may delegate to the director any of the functions of this section.

Sec.
316. RCW
36.01.120 and 1995 c 399 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

It
is the finding of the legislature that foreign trade zones serve an important
public purpose by the creation of employment opportunities within the state and
that the establishment of zones designed to accomplish this purpose is to be
encouraged. It is the further intent of the legislature that the department of
((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development provide
assistance to entities planning to apply to the United States for permission to
establish such zones.

Sec.
317. RCW
36.110.030 and 1995 c 399 s 45 are each amended to read as follows:

A
state-wide jail industries board of directors is established. The board shall
consist of the following members:

(1)
One sheriff and one police chief, to be selected by the Washington association
of sheriffs and police chiefs;

(2)
One county commissioner or one county councilmember to be selected by the
Washington state association of counties;

(3)
One city official to be selected by the association of Washington cities;

(4)
Two jail administrators to be selected by the Washington state jail
association, one of whom shall be from a county or a city with an established
jail industries program;

(5)
One prosecuting attorney to be selected by the Washington association of
prosecuting attorneys;

(6)
One administrator from a city or county corrections department to be selected
by the Washington correctional association;

(7)
One county clerk to be selected by the Washington association of county clerks;

(8)
Three representatives from labor to be selected by the governor. The
representatives may be chosen from a list of nominations provided by state-wide
labor organizations representing a cross-section of trade organizations;

(9)
Three representatives from business to be selected by the governor. The
representatives may be chosen from a list of nominations provided by state-wide
business organizations representing a cross-section of businesses, industries,
and all sizes of employers;

(10)
The governor's representative from the employment security department;

(11)
One member representing crime victims, to be selected by the governor;

(12)
One member representing on-line law enforcement officers, to be selected by the
governor;

(13)
One member from the department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and
economic development to be selected by the governor;

(14)
One member representing higher education, vocational education, or adult basic
education to be selected by the governor; and

(15)
The governor's representative from the correctional industries division of the
state department of corrections shall be an ex officio member for the purpose
of coordination and cooperation between prison and jail industries and to
further a positive relationship between state and local government offender
programs.

Sec.
318. RCW
43.07.360 and 1996 c 253 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature finds that knowledge of international exchange students who
have studied in Washington state institutions of higher education, especially
those from key trading partner countries, and knowledge of Washington state
students, interns, and citizens working and studying abroad, is critical to the
ability of Washington businesses and citizens to establish contacts and
networks in the competitive world market.

(2)
The legislature also finds that knowledge of worldwide business contacts,
government contacts, cultural contacts, and international friends is critical
to building a solid network of opportunities for developing trade relations for
our state.

(3)
The secretary of state may develop and maintain a data base, to be known as the
international contact data base, listing, in addition to any other
information: (a) Washington students, interns, and citizens working and
studying overseas; (b) international students who have studied at Washington
educational institutions; (c) exchange opportunities for Washington residents
wishing to participate in education, internships, or technical assistance
programs in the areas of agriculture, hydroelectric power, aerospace, computers
and technology, academics, medicine, and communications; (d) international
business contacts of those people interested in doing business with Washington
business; and (e) international government contacts, particularly with our key
trading partners.

The
data base may be designed to be used as a resource for Washington citizens,
businesses, and other entities seeking contacts in international trade markets
overseas.

(4)
The department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic
development, the department of agriculture, and the governor's office of
protocol may assist the secretary of state in designing and developing the data
base and in obtaining data for inclusion in the data base. Four-year
educational institutions and their alumni associations are encouraged to
maintain data concerning students studying or working abroad, international
students attending their institutions, and exchange opportunities available to
their students and other citizens, and to make such data freely available to
the secretary of state for inclusion in the data base.

(5)
The information contained in the data base may be made available on request for
inspection or copying for free or at cost. The secretary of state shall not
distinguish among persons requesting information from the data base, though the
secretary of state may request information from requesters for purposes of
monitoring trade contacts and evaluating the uses and effectiveness of the data
base.

(6)
Any person listed in the data base may request in writing that his or her name,
address, telephone number, or other identifying information be omitted from the
data base. Nothing in this section prohibits the secretary of state from
refusing to disclose information exempt from disclosure under RCW 42.17.310.

Sec.
319. RCW
43.21A.510 and 1995 c 399 s 66 are each amended to read as follows:

In
order to assist the department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and
economic development in providing information to businesses interested in
locating in Washington state, the department shall develop an environmental
profile of the state. This profile shall identify the state's natural
resources and describe how these assets are valuable to industry. Examples of
information to be included are water resources and quality, air quality, and
recreational opportunities related to natural resources.

Sec.
320. RCW
43.21A.515 and 1995 c 399 s 67 are each amended to read as follows:

In order
to emphasize the importance of the state's environmental laws and regulations
and to facilitate compliance with them, the department of ecology shall provide
assistance to businesses interested in locating in Washington state. When the
department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development
receives a query from an interested business through its industrial marketing
activities, it shall arrange for the department of ecology to provide
information on the state's environmental laws and regulations and methods of
compliance. This section shall facilitate compliance with state environmental
laws and regulations and shall not weaken their application or effectiveness.

Sec.
321. RCW
43.21A.612 and 1995 c 399 s 68 are each amended to read as follows:

Before
the director shall construct said steam generating facility within the state,
or make application for any permit, license or other right necessary thereto,
the director shall give notice thereof by publishing once a week for four
consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or
counties in which such project is located a statement of intention setting
forth the general nature, extent and location of the project. If any public
utility in the state or any operating agency desires to construct such
facility, such utility or operating agency shall notify the director thereof
within ten days after the last date of publication of such notice. If the
director determines that it is in the best public interest that the director
proceed with such construction rather than the public utility or operating
agency, the director shall so notify the director of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development, who shall set a date for hearing
thereon. If after considering the evidence introduced the director of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development finds that the public utility or
operating agency making the request intends to immediately proceed with such
construction and is financially capable of carrying out such construction and
further finds that the plan of such utility or operating agency is equally well
adapted to serve the public interest, the director shall enter an order so
finding and such order shall divest the director of authority to proceed
further with such construction or acquisition until such time as the other
public utility or agency voluntarily causes an assignment of its right or
interest in the project to the director or fails to procure any further
required governmental permit, license or authority or having procured such, has
the same revoked or withdrawn, in accordance with the laws and regulations of
such governmental entity, in which event the director shall have the same authority
to proceed as though the director had originally entered an order so
authorizing the director to proceed. If, after considering the evidence
introduced, the director of ((community,)) trade((,)) and
economic development finds that the public utility or agency making the request
does not intend to immediately proceed with such construction or acquisition or
is not financially capable of carrying out such construction or acquisition, or
finds that the plan of such utility or operating agency is not equally well
adapted to serve the public interest, the director shall then enter an order so
finding and authorizing the director to proceed with the construction or
acquisition of the facility.

Sec.
322. RCW
43.23.035 and 1995 c 399 s 70 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of agriculture is hereby designated as the agency of state
government for the administration and implementation of state agricultural
market development programs and activities, both domestic and foreign, and
shall, in addition to the powers and duties otherwise imposed by law, have the
following powers and duties:

(1)
To study the potential marketability of various agricultural commodities of
this state in foreign and domestic trade;

(2)
To collect, prepare, and analyze foreign and domestic market data;

(3)
To establish a program to promote and assist in the marketing of
Washington-bred horses: PROVIDED, That the department shall present a proposal
to the legislature no later than December 1, 1986, that provides for the
elimination of all state funding for the program after June 30, 1989;

(4)
To encourage and promote the sale of Washington's agricultural commodities and
products at the site of their production through the development and dissemination
of referral maps and other means;

(5)
To encourage and promote those agricultural industries, such as the wine
industry, which attract visitors to rural areas in which other agricultural
commodities and products are produced and are, or could be, made available for
sale;

(6)
To encourage and promote the establishment and use of public markets in this
state for the sale of Washington's agricultural products;

(7)
To maintain close contact with foreign firms and governmental agencies and to
act as an effective intermediary between foreign nations and Washington
traders;

(8)
To publish and disseminate to interested citizens and others information which
will aid in carrying out the purposes of chapters 43.23, 15.64, 15.65, and
15.66 RCW;

(9)
To encourage and promote the movement of foreign and domestic agricultural
goods through the ports of Washington;

(10)
To conduct an active program by sending representatives to, or engaging
representatives in, foreign countries to promote the state's agricultural
commodities and products;

(11)
To assist and to make Washington agricultural concerns more aware of the
potentials of foreign trade and to encourage production of those commodities
that will have high export potential and appeal;

(12)
To coordinate the trade promotional activities of appropriate federal, state,
and local public agencies, as well as civic organizations; and

(13)
To develop a coordinated marketing program with the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development, utilizing existing trade offices
and participating in mutual trade missions and activities.

As
used in this section, "agricultural commodities" includes products of
both terrestrial and aquatic farming.

Sec.
323. RCW
43.160.020 and 1997 c 367 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Board" means the community economic revitalization board.

(2)
"Bond" means any bond, note, debenture, interim certificate, or other
evidence of financial indebtedness issued by the board pursuant to this
chapter.

(3)
"Department" means the department of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development.

(4)
"Financial institution" means any bank, savings and loan association,
credit union, development credit corporation, insurance company, investment
company, trust company, savings institution, or other financial institution
approved by the board and maintaining an office in the state.

(5)
"Industrial development facilities" means "industrial
development facilities" as defined in RCW 39.84.020.

(6)
"Industrial development revenue bonds" means tax-exempt revenue bonds
used to fund industrial development facilities.

(7)
"Local government" or "political subdivision" means any
port district, county, city, town, special purpose district, and any other
municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations in the state providing
for public facilities under this chapter.

(8)
"Sponsor" means any of the following entities which customarily
provide service or otherwise aid in industrial or other financing and are
approved as a sponsor by the board: A bank, trust company, savings bank,
investment bank, national banking association, savings and loan association,
building and loan association, credit union, insurance company, or any other
financial institution, governmental agency, or holding company of any entity
specified in this subsection.

(9)
"Umbrella bonds" means industrial development revenue bonds from
which the proceeds are loaned, transferred, or otherwise made available to two
or more users under this chapter.

(10)
"User" means one or more persons acting as lessee, purchaser,
mortgagor, or borrower under a financing document and receiving or applying to
receive revenues from bonds issued under this chapter.

(11)
"Public facilities" means bridges, roads, domestic and industrial
water, sanitary sewer, storm sewer, railroad, electricity, natural gas, buildings
or structures, and port facilities.

(12)
"Rural natural resources impact area" means:

(a)
A nonmetropolitan county, as defined by the 1990 decennial census, that meets
three of the five criteria set forth in subsection (13) of this section;

(b)
A nonmetropolitan county with a population of less than forty thousand in the
1990 decennial census, that meets two of the five criteria as set forth in
subsection (13) of this section; or

(c)
A nonurbanized area, as defined by the 1990 decennial census, that is located
in a metropolitan county that meets three of the five criteria set forth in
subsection (13) of this section.

(13)
For the purposes of designating rural natural resources impact areas, the
following criteria shall be considered:

(a)
A lumber and wood products employment location quotient at or above the state
average;

(b)
A commercial salmon fishing employment location quotient at or above the state
average;

(c)
Projected or actual direct lumber and wood products job losses of one hundred
positions or more;

(d)
Projected or actual direct commercial salmon fishing job losses of one hundred
positions or more; and

(e)
An unemployment rate twenty percent or more above the state average. The
counties that meet these criteria shall be determined by the employment
security department for the most recent year for which data is available. For
the purposes of administration of programs under this chapter, the United
States post office five-digit zip code delivery areas will be used to determine
residence status for eligibility purposes. For the purpose of this definition,
a zip code delivery area of which any part is ten miles or more from an
urbanized area is considered nonurbanized. A zip code totally surrounded by
zip codes qualifying as nonurbanized under this definition is also considered
nonurbanized. The office of financial management shall make available a zip
code listing of the areas to all agencies and organizations providing services
under this chapter.

Sec.
324. RCW
43.160.115 and 1995 c 399 s 87 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to its powers and duties under this chapter, the community economic
revitalization board shall cooperate with the ((Washington state development
loan fund committee)) department in order to provide for
coordination of their very similar programs. Under this chapter, it is the
duty of the department ((of community, trade, and economic development and
the board)) to financially assist the committee to the extent required by
law. ((Funds appropriated to the board or the department of community,
trade, and economic development for the use of the board shall be transferred
to the department of community, trade, and economic development to the extent
required by law.))

Sec.
325. RCW
43.160.180 and 1995 c 399 s 88 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is hereby created the private activity bond subcommittee of the board.

(2)
The subcommittee shall be primarily responsible for reviewing and making
recommendations to the board on requests for certification and allocation
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 39.86 RCW and as authorized by rules
adopted by the board.

(3)
The subcommittee shall consist of the following members: Six members of the
board including: (a) The chair; (b) the county official; (c) the city
official; (d) the port district official; (e) a legislator, appointed by the
chair; and (f) the representative of the public. The members' terms shall
coincide with their terms of appointment to the board.

(4)
Staff support to the subcommittee shall be provided by the department ((of
community, trade, and economic development)).

(5)
Members of the subcommittee shall receive no compensation but shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(6)
If a vacancy on the subcommittee occurs by death, resignation, failure to hold
the office from which the member was appointed, or otherwise, the vacancy shall
be filled through the procedures specified for filling the corresponding
vacancy on the board.

Sec.
326. RCW
43.163.020 and 1995 c 399 s 89 are each amended to read as follows:

The
Washington economic development finance authority is established as a public
body corporate and politic, with perpetual corporate succession, constituting
an instrumentality of the state of Washington exercising essential governmental
functions. The authority is a public body within the meaning of RCW 39.53.010.

The
authority shall consist of eighteen (([seventeen])) members as follows:
The director of the department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and
economic development, the director of the department of community
development, the director of the department of agriculture, the state
treasurer, one member from each caucus in the house of representatives
appointed by the speaker of the house, one member from each caucus in the
senate appointed by the president of the senate, and ten public members with
one representative of women-owned businesses and one representative of
minority-owned businesses and with at least three of the members residing east
of the Cascades. The public members shall be residents of the state appointed
by the governor on the basis of their interest or expertise in trade,
agriculture or business finance or jobs creation and development. One of the
public members shall be appointed by the governor as chair of the authority and
shall serve as chair of the authority at the pleasure of the governor. The
authority may select from its membership such other officers as it deems
appropriate.

The
term of the persons appointed by the governor as public members of the
authority, including the public member appointed as chair, shall be four years
from the date of appointment, except that the term of three of the initial
appointees shall be for two years from the date of appointment and the term of
four of the initial appointees shall be for three years from the date of appointment.
The governor shall designate the appointees who will serve the two-year and
three-year terms.

In
the event of a vacancy on the authority due to death, resignation or removal of
one of the public members, or upon the expiration of the term of one of the
public members, the governor shall appoint a successor for the remainder of the
unexpired term. If either of the state offices is abolished, the resulting
vacancy on the authority shall be filled by the state officer who shall succeed
substantially to the power and duties of the abolished office.

Any
public member of the authority may be removed by the governor for misfeasance,
malfeasance or willful neglect of duty after notice and a public hearing,
unless such notice and hearing shall be expressly waived in writing by the
affected public member.

The
state officials serving in ex officio capacity may each designate an employee
of their respective departments to act on their behalf in all respects with
regard to any matter to come before the authority. Such designations shall be
made in writing in such manner as is specified by the rules of the authority.

The
members of the authority shall serve without compensation but shall be entitled
to reimbursement, solely from the funds of the authority, for expenses incurred
in the discharge of their duties under this chapter. The authority may borrow
funds from the department for the purpose of reimbursing members for expenses;
however, the authority shall repay the department as soon as practicable.

A majority
of the authority shall constitute a quorum.

Sec.
327. RCW
43.163.120 and 1998 c 245 s 51 are each amended to read as follows:

The
authority shall receive no appropriation of state funds. The department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development shall provide staff to the
authority, to the extent permitted by law, to enable the authority to
accomplish its purposes; the staff from the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development may assist the authority in
organizing itself and in designing programs, but shall not be involved in the
issuance of bonds or in making credit decisions regarding financing provided to
borrowers by the authority.

Sec.
328. RCW
43.168.020 and 1996 c 290 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
(("Committee" means the Washington state development loan fund
committee.

(2)))
"Department" means the department of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development.

(((3)))
(2) "Director" means the director of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development.

(((4)))
(3) "Distressed area" means: (a) A county which has an unemployment
rate which is twenty percent above the state average for the immediately
previous three years; (b) a county that has a median household income that is
less than seventy-five percent of the state median household income for the
previous three years; (c) a metropolitan statistical area, as defined by the
office of federal statistical policy and standards, United States department of
commerce, in which the average level of unemployment for the calendar year
immediately preceding the year in which an application is filed under this
chapter exceeds the average state unemployment for such calendar year by twenty
percent; (d) an area within a county, which area: (i) Is composed of
contiguous census tracts; (ii) has a minimum population of five thousand persons;
(iii) has at least seventy percent of its families and unrelated individuals
with incomes below eighty percent of the county's median income for families
and unrelated individuals; and (iv) has an unemployment rate which is at least
forty percent higher than the county's unemployment rate; or (e) a county
designated as a rural natural resources impact area under RCW 43.31.601 if an
application is filed by July 1, 1997. For purposes of this definition,
"families and unrelated individuals" has the same meaning that is
ascribed to that term by the federal department of housing and urban
development in its regulations authorizing action grants for economic
development and neighborhood revitalization projects.

(((5)))
(4) "Fund" means the Washington state development loan fund.

(((6)))
(5) "Local development organization" means a nonprofit
organization which is organized to operate within an area, demonstrates a
commitment to a long-standing effort for an economic development program, and
makes a demonstrable effort to assist in the employment of unemployed or
underemployed residents in an area.

(((7)))
(6) "Project" means the establishment of a new or expanded
business in an area which when completed will provide employment
opportunities. "Project" also means the retention of an existing
business in an area which when completed will provide employment opportunities.

Sec.
329. RCW
43.168.031 and 1995 c 399 s 92 are each amended to read as follows:

The
Washington state development loan fund committee shall be terminated on June
30, 1994, and its powers and duties transferred to the director of the
department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development.

Sec.
330. RCW
43.170.020 and 1995 c 399 s 93 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Department" means the department of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development.

(2)
"Director" means the director of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development.

(3)
"Program" means the small business innovators' opportunity program.

(4)
"Inventor" or "innovator" means one who thinks of, imagines,
or creates something new which may result in a device, contrivance, or process
for the first time, through the use of the imagination or ingenious thinking
and experimentation.

(5)
"Proposal" means a plan provided by an inventor or innovator on an
idea for an invention or an improvement.

(6)
"Higher education" means any university, college, community college,
or technical institute in this state.

Sec.
331. RCW
43.172.011 and 1995 c 399 s 96 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout RCW 43.172.020 through 43.172.110.

(1)
"Approved surety company" means a surety company approved by the
department for participation in providing direct bonding assistance to
qualified contractors.

(2)
"Bond" means any bond or security required for bid, payment, or
performance of contracts.

(3)
"Department" means the department of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development.

(4)
"Program" means the Washington state small business bonding
assistance program provided for in this chapter.

(5)
"Qualified contractor" means any resident minority business
enterprise or women's business enterprise, as determined by the department to
be consistent with the requirements of chapter 39.19 RCW and engaged in the
contracting business, which has obtained a certificate of accreditation from
the Washington state small business bonding assistance program.

Sec.
332. RCW
43.210.030 and 1998 c 109 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The small business export finance assistance center and its
branches shall be governed and managed by a board of seven directors appointed
by the governor, with the advice of the board, and confirmed by the senate.
The directors shall serve terms of four years following the terms of service
established by the initial appointments after June 11, 1998. Three appointees,
including directors on June 11, 1998, who are reappointed, must serve initial
terms of two years and, if a director is reappointed that director may serve a
consecutive four-year term. Four appointees, including directors on June 11,
1998, who are reappointed, must serve initial terms of four years and, if a
director is reappointed that director may serve a consecutive four-year term.
After the initial appointments, directors may serve two consecutive terms. The
directors may provide for the payment of their expenses. The directors shall
include the director of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic
development or the director's designee; representatives of a large financial
institution engaged in financing export transactions in the state of
Washington; a small financial institution engaged in financing export
transactions in the state of Washington; a large exporting company domiciled in
the state of Washington; a small exporting company in the state of Washington;
organized labor in a trade involved in international commerce; and a
representative at large. To the extent possible, appointments to the board
shall reflect geographical balance and the diversity of the state population.
Any vacancies on the board due to the expiration of a term or for any other
reason shall be filled by appointment by the governor for the unexpired term.

Sec.
333. RCW
43.210.050 and 1998 c 245 s 84 are each amended to read as follows:

The
small business export finance assistance center formed under RCW 43.210.020 and
43.210.030 shall enter into a contract under this chapter with the department
of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development or its
statutory successor. The contract shall require the center to provide export
assistance services, consistent with RCW 43.210.070 and 43.210.100 through
43.210.120, shall have a duration of two years, and shall require the center to
aggressively seek to fund its continued operation from nonstate funds. The
contract shall also require the center to report annually to the department on
its success in obtaining nonstate funding. Upon expiration of the contract,
any provisions within the contract applicable to the Pacific Northwest export
assistance project shall be automatically renewed without change provided the
legislature appropriates funds for administration of the small business export
assistance center and the Pacific Northwest export assistance project. The
provisions of the contract related to the Pacific Northwest export assistance
project may be changed at any time if the director of the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development or the president of the small
business export finance assistance center present compelling reasons supporting
the need for a contract change to the board of directors and a majority of the
board of directors agrees to the changes. The department of agriculture shall
be included in the contracting negotiations with the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development and the small business export
finance assistance center when the Pacific Northwest export assistance project
provides export services to industrial sectors within the administrative domain
of the Washington state department of agriculture.

Sec.
334. RCW
43.210.060 and 1995 c 399 s 108 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development
or its statutory successor shall adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as
necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

Sec.
335. RCW
43.330.092 and 1997 c 220 s 222 (Referendum Bill No. 48) are each amended to
read as follows:

The
film and video promotion account is created in the state treasury. All
receipts from RCW 36.102.060(14) must be deposited into the account. Moneys in
the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the
account may be used by the department ((of community, trade, and economic
development)) only for the purposes of promotion of the film and video
production industry in the state of Washington.

Sec.
336. RCW
43.330.094 and 1997 c 220 s 223 (Referendum Bill No. 48) are each amended to
read as follows:

The tourism development and promotion account is created in the
state treasury. All receipts from RCW 36.102.060(10) must be deposited into
the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used by the department ((of community,
trade, and economic development)) only for the purposes of promotion of the
tourism industry in the state of Washington.

Sec.
337. RCW
50.67.030 and 1994 sp.s. c 3 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to its duties under this chapter, the Washington state job training
coordinating council shall advise the employment security department and the
department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development
on the development and implementation of the Washington youthbuild program
created under chapter 50.72 RCW.

Sec.
338. RCW
50.72.030 and 1994 sp.s. c 3 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
Washington youthbuild program is established within the department. The
commissioner, in cooperation and consultation with the director of the
department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development,
shall:

(1)
Make grants, up to the lesser of three hundred thousand dollars or twenty-five
percent of the total costs of the youthbuild activities, to applicants eligible
to provide education and employment training under federal or state employment
training programs, for the purpose of carrying out a wide range of
multidisciplinary activities and services to assist economically disadvantaged
youth under the federal opportunities for youth: Youthbuild program (106 Stat.
3723; 42 U.S.C. Sec. 8011), or locally developed youthbuild-type programs for
economically disadvantaged youth; and

(2)
Coordinate youth employment and training efforts under the department's
jurisdiction and cooperate with other agencies and departments providing youth
services to ensure that funds appropriated for the purposes of this chapter
will be used to supplement funding from federal, state, local, or private
sources.

Sec.
339. RCW
70.95.265 and 1995 c 399 s 190 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department shall work closely with the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development, the department of general
administration, and with other state departments and agencies, the Washington
state association of counties, the association of Washington cities, and
business associations, to carry out the objectives and purposes of chapter 41,
Laws of 1975-'76 2nd ex. sess.

Sec.
340. RCW
70.95.810 and 1998 c 245 s 132 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In order to establish the feasibility of composting food and yard wastes, the
department shall provide funds, as available, to local governments submitting a
proposal to compost such wastes.

(2)
The department, in cooperation with the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development, may approve an application if the
project can demonstrate the essential parameters for successful composting,
including, but not limited to, cost-effectiveness, handling and safety
requirements, and current and potential markets.

Sec.
341. RCW
70.95H.007 and 1995 c 399 s 192 are each amended to read as follows:

There
is created the clean Washington center within the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development. As used in this chapter,
"center" means the clean Washington center.

Sec.
342. RCW
70.95H.050 and 1995 c 399 s 194 are each amended to read as follows:

The
center shall solicit financial contributions and support from manufacturing
industries and other private sector sources, foundations, and grants from
governmental sources to assist in conducting its activities. It may also use
separately appropriated funds of the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development for the center's activities.

Sec.
343. RCW
76.09.030 and 1995 c 399 s 207 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is hereby created the forest practices board of the state of Washington
as an agency of state government consisting of members as follows:

(a)
The commissioner of public lands or the commissioner's designee;

(b)
The director of the department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and
economic development or the director's designee;

(c)
The director of the department of agriculture or the director's designee;

(d)
The director of the department of ecology or the director's designee;

(e)
An elected member of a county legislative authority appointed by the governor:
PROVIDED, That such member's service on the board shall be conditioned on the
member's continued service as an elected county official; and

(f)
Six members of the general public appointed by the governor, one of whom shall
be an owner of not more than five hundred acres of forest land, and one of whom
shall be an independent logging contractor.

(2)
The members of the initial board appointed by the governor shall be appointed
so that the term of one member shall expire December 31, 1975, the term of one
member shall expire December 31, 1976, the term of one member shall expire
December 31, 1977, the terms of two members shall expire December 31, 1978, and
the terms of two members shall expire December 31, 1979. Thereafter, each
member shall be appointed for a term of four years. Vacancies on the board
shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments. Each member
of the board shall continue in office until his or her successor is appointed
and qualified. The commissioner of public lands or the commissioner's designee
shall be the chairman of the board.

(3)
The board shall meet at such times and places as shall be designated by the
chairman or upon the written request of the majority of the board. The principal
office of the board shall be at the state capital.

(4)
Members of the board, except public employees and elected officials, shall be
compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250. Each member shall be entitled to
reimbursement for travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties
as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(5)
The board may employ such clerical help and staff pursuant to chapter 41.06 RCW
as is necessary to carry out its duties.

Sec.
344. RCW
76.56.020 and 1994 c 282 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
center shall:

(1)
Coordinate the University of Washington's college of forest resources' faculty
and staff expertise to assist in:

(a)
The development of research and analysis for developing policies and strategies
which will expand forest-based international trade, including a major focus on
secondary manufacturing;

(b)
The development of technology or commercialization support for manufactured
products that will meet the evolving needs of international customers;

(c)
The development of research and analysis on other factors critical to
forest-based trade, including the quality and availability of raw wood
resources; and

(d)
The coordination, development, and dissemination of market and technical
information relevant to international trade in forest products, including a
major focus on secondary manufacturing;

(2)
Further develop and maintain computer data bases on world-wide forest products
production and trade in order to monitor and report on trends significant to
the Northwest forest products industry and support the center's research
functions; and coordinate this system with state, federal, and private sector
efforts to insure a cost-effective information resource that will avoid
unnecessary duplication;

(3)
Monitor international forest products markets and assess the status of the
state's forest products industry, including the competitiveness of small and
medium-sized secondary manufacturing firms in the forest products industry,
which for the purposes of this chapter shall be firms with annual revenues of
twenty-five million or less, and including the increased exports of
Washington-produced products of small and medium-sized secondary manufacturing
firms;

(4)
Provide high-quality research and graduate education and professional nondegree
training in international trade in forest products in cooperation with the
University of Washington's graduate school of business administration, the
school of law, the Jackson school of international studies, the Northwest
policy center of the graduate school of public administration, and other
supporting academic units;

(5)
Develop cooperative linkages with the international marketing program for
agricultural commodities and trade at Washington State University, the
international trade project of the United States forest service, the department
of natural resources, the department of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development, the small business export finance assistance center,
and other state and federal agencies to avoid duplication of effort and
programs;

(6)
Cooperate with personnel from the state's community and technical colleges in
their development of wood products manufacturing and wood technology curriculum
and offer periodic workshops on wood products manufacturing, wood technology,
and trade opportunities to community colleges and private educators and
trainers;

(7)
Provide for public dissemination of research, analysis, and results of the
center's programs to all groups, including direct assistance groups, through
technical workshops, short courses, international and national symposia,
cooperation with private sector networks and marketing associations, or other
means, including appropriate publications;

(8)
Establish an executive policy board, including representatives of small and
medium-sized businesses, with at least fifty percent of its business members
representing small businesses with one hundred or fewer employees and
medium-sized businesses with one hundred to five hundred employees. The
executive policy board shall also include a representative of the community and
technical colleges, representatives of state and federal agencies, and a
representative of a wood products manufacturing network or trade association of
small and medium-sized wood product manufacturers. The executive policy board
shall provide advice on: Overall policy direction and program priorities,
state and federal budget requests, securing additional research funds,
identifying priority areas of focus for research efforts, selection of projects
for research, and dissemination of results of research efforts; and

(9)
Establish advisory or technical committees for each research program area, to
advise on research program area priorities, consistent with the international
trade opportunities achievable by the forest products sector of the state and
region, to help ensure projects are relevant to industry needs, and to advise
on and support effective dissemination of research results. Each advisory or
technical committee shall include representatives of forest products industries
that might benefit from this research.

Service
on the committees and the executive policy board established in subsections (8)
and (9) of this section shall be without compensation but actual travel
expenses incurred in connection with service to the center may be reimbursed
from appropriated funds in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec.
345. RCW
77.12.710 and 1998 c 245 s 159 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature hereby directs the department to determine the feasibility and cost
of doubling the state-wide game fish production by the year 2000. The
department shall seek to equalize the effort and investment expended on
anadromous and resident game fish programs. The department shall provide the
legislature with a specific plan for legislative approval that will outline the
feasibility of increasing game fish production by one hundred percent over
current levels by the year 2000. The plan shall contain specific provisions to
increase both hatchery and naturally spawning game fish to a level that will
support the production goal established in this section consistent with
department policies. Steelhead trout, searun cutthroat trout, resident trout,
and warmwater fish producing areas of the state shall be included in the plan.

The
plan shall include the following critical elements:

(1)
Methods of determining current catch and production, and catch and production
in the year 2000;

(2)
Methods of involving fishing groups, including Indian tribes, in a cooperative
manner;

(3)
Methods for using low capital cost projects to produce game fish as
inexpensively as possible;

(4)
Methods for renovating and modernizing all existing hatcheries and rearing
ponds to maximize production capability;

(5)
Methods for increasing the productivity of natural spawning game fish;

(6)
Application of new technology to increase hatchery and natural productivity;

(7)
Analysis of the potential for private contractors to produce game fish for
public fisheries;

(8)
Methods to optimize public volunteer efforts and cooperative projects for
maximum efficiency;

(9)
Methods for development of trophy game fish fisheries;

(10)
Elements of coordination with the Pacific Northwest Power Council programs to
ensure maximum Columbia river benefits;

(11)
The role that should be played by private consulting companies in developing
and implementing the plan;

(12)
Coordination with federal fish and wildlife agencies, Indian tribes, and
department fish production programs;

(13)
Future needs for game fish predator control measures;

(14)
Development of disease control measures;

(15)
Methods for obtaining access to waters currently not available to anglers; and

(16)
Development of research programs to support game fish management and
enhancement programs.

The
department, in cooperation with the department of revenue, shall assess various
funding mechanisms and make recommendations to the legislature in the plan.
The department, in cooperation with the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development, shall prepare an analysis of the
economic benefits to the state that will occur when the game fish production is
increased by one hundred percent in the year 2000.

Sec.
346. RCW
81.80.450 and 1998 c 245 s 167 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic
development, in conjunction with the utilities and transportation commission
and the department of ecology, shall evaluate the effect of exempting motor
vehicles transporting recovered materials from rate regulation as provided
under RCW 81.80.440. The evaluation shall, at a minimum, describe the effect
of such exemption on:

(a)
The cost and timeliness of transporting recovered materials within the state;

(b)
The volume of recovered materials transported within the state;

(c)
The number of safety violations and traffic accidents related to transporting
recovered materials within the state; and

(d)
The availability of service related to transporting recovered materials from
rural areas of the state.

(2)
The commission shall adopt rules requiring persons transporting recovered
materials to submit information required under RCW 70.95.280. In adopting such
rules, the commission shall include procedures to ensure the confidentiality of
proprietary information.

Sec.
347. RCW
88.12.275 and 1997 c 391 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of licensing shall issue a whitewater river outfitter's license
to an applicant who submits a completed application, pays the required fee, and
complies with the requirements of this section.

(2)
An applicant for a whitewater river outfitter's license shall make application
upon a form provided by the department of licensing. The form must be
submitted annually and include the following information:

(a)
The name, residence address, and residence telephone number, and the business
name, address, and telephone number of the applicant;

(b)
Certification that all employees, subcontractors, or independent contractors
hired as guides meet training standards under RCW 88.12.245(2) before carrying
any passengers for hire;

(c)
Proof that the applicant has liability insurance for a minimum of three hundred
thousand dollars per claim for occurrences by the applicant and the applicant's
employees that result in bodily injury or property damage. All guides must be
covered by the applicant's insurance policy;

(d)
Certification that the applicant will maintain the insurance for a period of
not less than one year from the date of issuance of the license; and

(e)
Certification by the applicant that for a period of not less than twenty-four
months immediately preceding the application the applicant:

(i)
Has not had a license, permit, or certificate to carry passengers for hire on a
river revoked by another state or by an agency of the government of the United
States due to a conviction for a violation of safety or insurance coverage
requirements no more stringent than the requirements of this chapter; and

(ii)
Has not been denied the right to apply for a license, permit, or certificate to
carry passengers for hire on a river by another state.

(3)
The department of licensing shall charge a fee for each application, to be set
in accordance with RCW 43.24.086.

(4)
Any person advertising or representing himself or herself as a whitewater river
outfitter who is not currently licensed is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(5)
The department of licensing shall submit annually a list of licensed persons
and companies to the department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and
economic development, tourism promotion division.

(6)
If an insurance company cancels or refuses to renew insurance for a licensee,
the insurance company shall notify the department of licensing in writing of
the termination of coverage and its effective date not less than thirty days
before the effective date of termination.

(a)
Upon receipt of an insurance company termination notice, the department of
licensing shall send written notice to the licensee that on the effective date
of termination the department of licensing will suspend the license unless
proof of insurance as required by this section is filed with the department of
licensing before the effective date of the termination.

(b)
If an insurance company fails to give notice of coverage termination, this
failure shall not have the effect of continuing the coverage.

(c)
The department of licensing may suspend a license under this section if the
licensee fails to maintain in full force and effect the insurance required by
this section.

(7)
The state of Washington shall be immune from any civil action arising from the
issuance of a license under this section.

PART
IV

REFERENCES
TO DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT

AND DEPARTMENT OF
TRADE AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Sec.
401. RCW
41.06.070 and 1998 c 245 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:

(a)
The members of the legislature or to any employee of, or position in, the
legislative branch of the state government including members, officers, and
employees of the legislative council, joint legislative audit and review
committee, statute law committee, and any interim committee of the legislature;

(b)
The justices of the supreme court, judges of the court of appeals, judges of
the superior courts or of the inferior courts, or to any employee of, or
position in the judicial branch of state government;

(c)
Officers, academic personnel, and employees of technical colleges;

(d)
The officers of the Washington state patrol;

(e)
Elective officers of the state;

(f)
The chief executive officer of each agency;

(g)
In the departments of employment security and social and health services, the
director and the director's confidential secretary; in all other departments,
the executive head of which is an individual appointed by the governor, the
director, his or her confidential secretary, and his or her statutory assistant
directors;

(h)
In the case of a multimember board, commission, or committee, whether the
members thereof are elected, appointed by the governor or other authority,
serve ex officio, or are otherwise chosen:

(i)
All members of such boards, commissions, or committees;

(ii)
If the members of the board, commission, or committee serve on a part-time
basis and there is a statutory executive officer: The secretary of the board,
commission, or committee; the chief executive officer of the board, commission,
or committee; and the confidential secretary of the chief executive officer of
the board, commission, or committee;

(iii)
If the members of the board, commission, or committee serve on a full-time
basis: The chief executive officer or administrative officer as designated by
the board, commission, or committee; and a confidential secretary to the chair
of the board, commission, or committee;

(iv)
If all members of the board, commission, or committee serve ex officio: The
chief executive officer; and the confidential secretary of such chief executive
officer;

(i)
The confidential secretaries and administrative assistants in the immediate
offices of the elective officers of the state;

(j)
Assistant attorneys general;

(k)
Commissioned and enlisted personnel in the military service of the state;

(l)
Inmate, student, part-time, or temporary employees, and part-time professional
consultants, as defined by the Washington personnel resources board;

(m)
The public printer or to any employees of or positions in the state printing
plant;

(n)
Officers and employees of the Washington state fruit commission;

(o)
Officers and employees of the Washington state apple advertising commission;

(p)
Officers and employees of the Washington state dairy products commission;

(q)
Officers and employees of the Washington tree fruit research commission;

(r)
Officers and employees of the Washington state beef commission;

(s)
Officers and employees of any commission formed under chapter 15.66 RCW;

(t)
((Officers and employees of the state wheat commission formed under chapter
15.63 RCW;

(u)))
Officers and employees of agricultural commissions formed under chapter 15.65
RCW;

(((v)))
(u) Officers and employees of the nonprofit corporation formed under
chapter 67.40 RCW;

(((w)))
(v) Executive assistants for personnel administration and labor
relations in all state agencies employing such executive assistants including
but not limited to all departments, offices, commissions, committees, boards,
or other bodies subject to the provisions of this chapter and this subsection
shall prevail over any provision of law inconsistent herewith unless specific
exception is made in such law;

(((x)))
(w) In each agency with fifty or more employees: Deputy agency heads,
assistant directors or division directors, and not more than three principal
policy assistants who report directly to the agency head or deputy agency
heads;

(((y)))
(x) All employees of the marine employees' commission;

(((z)
Up to a total of five senior staff positions of the western library network
under chapter 27.26 RCW responsible for formulating policy or for directing
program management of a major administrative unit. This subsection (1)(z)
shall expire on June 30, 1997;

(aa))) (y)
Staff employed by the departments of community((, trade, and economic))
development and trade and economic development to administer energy
policy functions and manage energy site evaluation council activities under RCW
43.21F.045(2)(m);

(((bb)))
(z) Staff employed by Washington State University to administer energy
education, applied research, and technology transfer programs under RCW
43.21F.045 as provided in RCW 28B.30.900(5).

(2)
The following classifications, positions, and employees of institutions of
higher education and related boards are hereby exempted from coverage of this
chapter:

(a)
Members of the governing board of each institution of higher education and
related boards, all presidents, vice-presidents, and their confidential
secretaries, administrative, and personal assistants; deans, directors, and
chairs; academic personnel; and executive heads of major administrative or
academic divisions employed by institutions of higher education; principal
assistants to executive heads of major administrative or academic divisions;
other managerial or professional employees in an institution or related board
having substantial responsibility for directing or controlling program
operations and accountable for allocation of resources and program results, or
for the formulation of institutional policy, or for carrying out personnel
administration or labor relations functions, legislative relations, public
information, development, senior computer systems and network programming, or
internal audits and investigations; and any employee of a community college
district whose place of work is one which is physically located outside the
state of Washington and who is employed pursuant to RCW 28B.50.092 and assigned
to an educational program operating outside of the state of Washington;

(b)
Student, part-time, or temporary employees, and part-time professional
consultants, as defined by the Washington personnel resources board, employed
by institutions of higher education and related boards;

(c)
The governing board of each institution, and related boards, may also exempt
from this chapter classifications involving research activities, counseling of
students, extension or continuing education activities, graphic arts or
publications activities requiring prescribed academic preparation or special
training as determined by the board: PROVIDED, That no nonacademic employee
engaged in office, clerical, maintenance, or food and trade services may be
exempted by the board under this provision;

(d)
Printing craft employees in the department of printing at the University of
Washington.

(3)
In addition to the exemptions specifically provided by this chapter, the
Washington personnel resources board may provide for further exemptions
pursuant to the following procedures. The governor or other appropriate
elected official may submit requests for exemption to the Washington personnel
resources board stating the reasons for requesting such exemptions. The
Washington personnel resources board shall hold a public hearing, after proper
notice, on requests submitted pursuant to this subsection. If the board
determines that the position for which exemption is requested is one involving
substantial responsibility for the formulation of basic agency or executive
policy or one involving directing and controlling program operations of an
agency or a major administrative division thereof, the Washington personnel
resources board shall grant the request and such determination shall be final
as to any decision made before July 1, 1993. The total number of additional
exemptions permitted under this subsection shall not exceed one percent of the
number of employees in the classified service not including employees of
institutions of higher education and related boards for those agencies not
directly under the authority of any elected public official other than the
governor, and shall not exceed a total of twenty-five for all agencies under
the authority of elected public officials other than the governor.

The
salary and fringe benefits of all positions presently or hereafter exempted
except for the chief executive officer of each agency, full-time members of
boards and commissions, administrative assistants and confidential secretaries
in the immediate office of an elected state official, and the personnel listed
in subsections (1)(j) through (((v), (y), (z),)) (u) and (x) and
(2) of this section, shall be determined by the Washington personnel resources
board. However, beginning with changes proposed for the 1997-99 fiscal
biennium, changes to the classification plan affecting exempt salaries must
meet the same provisions for classified salary increases resulting from adjustments
to the classification plan as outlined in RCW 41.06.152.

Any
person holding a classified position subject to the provisions of this chapter
shall, when and if such position is subsequently exempted from the application
of this chapter, be afforded the following rights: If such person previously
held permanent status in another classified position, such person shall have a
right of reversion to the highest class of position previously held, or to a
position of similar nature and salary.

Any
classified employee having civil service status in a classified position who
accepts an appointment in an exempt position shall have the right of reversion
to the highest class of position previously held, or to a position of similar
nature and salary.

A
person occupying an exempt position who is terminated from the position for
gross misconduct or malfeasance does not have the right of reversion to a
classified position as provided for in this section.

Sec.
402. RCW
41.06.072 and 1995 c 399 s 59 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to the exemptions set forth in this chapter, this chapter shall not
apply within the departments of community((, trade, and economic))
development and trade and economic development to the director((,))
and one confidential secretary for each department, the deputy
directors, all assistant directors, the state historic preservation officer,
and up to two professional staff members within the emergency management
program.

Sec.
403. RCW
43.06.115 and 1998 c 245 s 47 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The governor may, by executive order, after consultation with or notification
of the executive-legislative committee on economic development created by
chapter . . . (Senate Bill No. 5300), Laws of 1993, declare a
community to be a "military impacted area." A "military
impacted area" means a community or communities, as identified in the
executive order, that experience serious social and economic hardships because
of a change in defense spending by the federal government in that community or
communities.

(2)
If the governor executes an order under subsection (1) of this section, the
governor shall establish a response team to coordinate state efforts to assist
the military impacted community. The response team may include, but not be
limited to, one member from each of the following agencies: (a) The department
of community((, trade, and economic)) development; (b) the department
of trade and economic development; (c) the department of social and health
services; (((c))) (d) the employment security department; (((d)))
(e) the state board for community and technical colleges; (((e)))
(f) the higher education coordinating board; and (((f))) (g)
the department of transportation. The governor may appoint a response team
coordinator. The governor shall seek to actively involve the impacted
community or communities in planning and implementing a response to the
crisis. The governor may seek input or assistance from the community
diversification advisory committee, and the governor may establish task forces
in the community or communities to assist in the coordination and delivery of
services to the local community. The state and community response shall
consider economic development, human service, and training needs of the
community or communities impacted.

Sec.
404. RCW
43.17.010 and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 16, 1993 c 472 s 17, and 1993 c 280 s 18 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

There
shall be departments of the state government which shall be known as (1) the
department of social and health services, (2) the department of ecology, (3)
the department of labor and industries, (4) the department of agriculture, (5)
the department of fish and wildlife, (6) the department of transportation, (7)
the department of licensing, (8) the department of general administration, (9)
the department of community((, trade, and economic)) development, (10)
the department of veterans affairs, (11) the department of revenue, (12) the
department of retirement systems, (13) the department of corrections, ((and))
(14) the department of health, ((and)) (15) the department of financial
institutions, and (16) the department of trade and economic development,
which shall be charged with the execution, enforcement, and administration of
such laws, and invested with such powers and required to perform such duties,
as the legislature may provide.

Sec.
405. RCW
43.17.020 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

There
shall be a chief executive officer of each department to be known as: (1) The
secretary of social and health services, (2) the director of ecology, (3) the
director of labor and industries, (4) the director of agriculture, (5) the
director of fish and wildlife, (6) the secretary of transportation, (7) the
director of licensing, (8) the director of general administration, (9) the
director of community((, trade, and economic)) development, (10) the
director of veterans affairs, (11) the director of revenue, (12) the director
of retirement systems, (13) the secretary of corrections, ((and)) (14)
the secretary of health, ((and)) (15) the director of financial
institutions, and (16) the director of trade and economic development.

Such
officers, except the secretary of transportation and the director of fish and
wildlife, shall be appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate,
and hold office at the pleasure of the governor. The secretary of
transportation shall be appointed by the transportation commission as
prescribed by RCW 47.01.041. The director of fish and wildlife shall be
appointed by the fish and wildlife commission as prescribed by RCW 77.04.055.

Sec.
406. RCW
43.160.030 and 1996 c 51 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The community economic revitalization board is hereby created to exercise the
powers granted under this chapter.

(2)
The board shall consist of the chairman of and one minority member appointed by
the speaker of the house of representatives from the committee of the house of
representatives that deals with issues of economic development, the chairman of
and one minority member appointed by the president of the senate from the
committee of the senate that deals with issues of economic development, and the
following members appointed by the governor: A recognized private or public
sector economist; one port district official; one county official; one city
official; one representative of the public; one representative of small
businesses each from: (a) The area west of Puget Sound, (b) the area east of
Puget Sound and west of the Cascade range, (c) the area east of the Cascade range
and west of the Columbia river, and (d) the area east of the Columbia river;
one executive from large businesses each from the area west of the Cascades and
the area east of the Cascades. The appointive members shall initially be
appointed to terms as follows: Three members for one-year terms, three members
for two-year terms, and three members for three-year terms which shall include
the chair. Thereafter each succeeding term shall be for three years. The
chair of the board shall be selected by the governor. The members of the board
shall elect one of their members to serve as vice-chair. The director of
community((, trade, and economic)) development, the director of trade
and economic development, the director of revenue, the commissioner of
employment security, and the secretary of transportation shall serve as
nonvoting advisory members of the board.

(3)
Management services, including fiscal and contract services, shall be provided
by the department to assist the board in implementing this chapter and the
allocation of private activity bonds.

(4)
Members of the board shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(5)
If a vacancy occurs by death, resignation, or otherwise of appointive members
of the board, the governor shall fill the same for the unexpired term. Members
of the board may be removed for malfeasance or misfeasance in office, upon
specific written charges by the governor, under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(6)
A member appointed by the governor may not be absent from more than fifty
percent of the regularly scheduled meetings in any one calendar year. Any
member who exceeds this absence limitation is deemed to have withdrawn from the
office and may be replaced by the governor.

Sec.
407. RCW
43.163.060 and 1995 c 399 s 90 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The authority is authorized to participate fully in federal and other
governmental economic development finance programs and to take such actions as
are necessary and consistent with this chapter to secure to itself and the
people of the state the benefits of those programs and to meet their
requirements.

(2)
The authority shall coordinate its programs with those contributing to a common
purpose found elsewhere in the departments of community((, trade, and
economic)) development, trade and economic development, agriculture
or employment security, or any other department or organization of, or
affiliated with, the state or federal government, and shall avoid any
duplication of such activities or programs provided elsewhere. The departments
of community((, trade, and economic)) development, trade and economic
development, agriculture, employment security and other relevant state
agencies shall provide to the authority all reports prepared in the course of
their ongoing activities which may assist in the identification of unmet
capital financing needs by small-sized and medium-sized businesses in the
state.

Sec.
408. RCW
47.39.090 and 1995 c 399 s 123 are each amended to read as follows:

In
developing the scenic and recreational highways program, the department shall
consult with the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development, the department of trade and economic development, the
department of natural resources, the parks and recreation commission, affected
cities, towns, and counties, regional transportation planning organizations,
state-wide bicycling organizations, and other interested parties. The scenic
and recreational highways program may identify entire highway loops or similar
tourist routes that could be developed to promote tourist activity and provide
concurrent economic growth while protecting the scenic and recreational quality
surrounding state highways.

Sec.
409. RCW
47.76.230 and 1995 c 380 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of transportation shall continue its responsibility for the
development and implementation of the state rail plan and programs, and the
utilities and transportation commission shall continue its responsibility for
intrastate rates, service, and safety issues.

(2)
The department of transportation shall maintain an enhanced data file on the
rail system. Proprietary annual station traffic data from each railroad and
the modal use of major shippers shall be obtained to the extent that such information
is available.

(3)
The department of transportation shall provide technical assistance, upon
request, to state agencies and local interests. Technical assistance includes,
but is not limited to, the following:

(a)
Rail project cost-benefit analyses conducted in accordance with methodologies
recommended by the Federal Railroad Administration;

(b)
Assistance in the formation of county rail districts and port districts; and

(c)
Feasibility studies for rail service continuation and/or rail service
assistance.

(4)
With funding authorized by the legislature, the department of transportation,
in collaboration with the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development, the department of trade and economic development, and local
economic development agencies, and other interested public and private
organizations, shall develop a cooperative process to conduct community and
business information programs and to regularly disseminate information on rail
matters.

Sec.
410. RCW
50.38.030 and 1995 c 399 s 142 are each amended to read as follows:

The
employment security department shall consult with the following agencies prior
to the issuance of the state occupational forecast:

(1)
Office of financial management;

(2)
Department of community((, trade, and economic)) development;

(3)
Department of labor and industries;

(4)
State board for community and technical colleges;

(5)
Superintendent of public instruction;

(6)
Department of social and health services;

(7)
Department of trade and economic development;

(8)
Work force training and education coordinating board; and

(((8)))
(9) Other state and local agencies as deemed appropriate by the
commissioner of the employment security department.

These
agencies shall cooperate with the employment security department, submitting
information relevant to the generation of occupational forecasts.

Sec.
411. RCW
80.50.030 and 1996 c 186 s 108 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is created and established the energy facility site evaluation council.

(2)(a)
The chairman of the council shall be appointed by the governor with the advice
and consent of the senate, shall have a vote on matters before the council,
shall serve for a term coextensive with the term of the governor, and is
removable for cause. The chairman may designate a member of the council to
serve as acting chairman in the event of the chairman's absence. The chairman
is a "state employee" for the purposes of chapter 42.52 RCW. As
applicable, when attending meetings of the council, members may receive
reimbursement for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060, and are eligible for compensation under RCW 43.03.250.

(b)
The chairman or a designee shall execute all official documents, contracts, and
other materials on behalf of the council. The ((Washington state))
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development and the
department of trade and economic development shall provide all administrative
and staff support for the council. The director of the department of
community, trade, and economic development has supervisory authority over the
staff of the council and shall employ such personnel as are necessary to
implement this chapter. Not more than three such employees may be exempt from
chapter 41.06 RCW.

(3)
The council shall consist of the directors, administrators, or their designees,
of the following departments, agencies, commissions, and committees or their
statutory successors:

(a)
Department of ecology;

(b)
Department of fish and wildlife;

(c)
Department of health;

(d)
Military department;

(e)
Department of community((, trade, and economic)) development;

(f)
Utilities and transportation commission;

(g)
Department of natural resources;

(h)
Department of agriculture;

(i)
Department of trade and economic development; and

(j)
Department of transportation.

(4)
The appropriate county legislative authority of every county wherein an
application for a proposed site is filed shall appoint a member or designee as
a voting member to the council. The member or designee so appointed shall sit
with the council only at such times as the council considers the proposed site
for the county which he or she represents, and such member or designee shall
serve until there has been a final acceptance or rejection of the proposed
site.

(5)
The city legislative authority of every city within whose corporate limits an
energy plant is proposed to be located shall appoint a member or designee as a
voting member to the council. The member or designee so appointed shall sit
with the council only at such times as the council considers the proposed site
for the city which he or she represents, and such member or designee shall
serve until there has been a final acceptance or rejection of the proposed
site.

(6)
For any port district wherein an application for a proposed port facility is
filed subject to this chapter, the port district shall appoint a member or
designee as a nonvoting member to the council. The member or designee so
appointed shall sit with the council only at such times as the council
considers the proposed site for the port district which he or she represents,
and such member or designee shall serve until there has been a final acceptance
or rejection of the proposed site. The provisions of this subsection shall not
apply if the port district is the applicant, either singly or in partnership or
association with any other person.

PART
V

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 501. Part
headings used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 502.
Sections 201 through 205 and 224 through 226 of this act are each added to
chapter 43.31 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 503.
Section 318 of this act expires December 31, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 504.
Sections 101 through 128, 201 through 228, 301 through 347, 401 through 411,
and 501 of this act take effect October 1, 1999.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 505.
Sections 1 and 2 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of
the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, and take effect immediately.

---
END ---