BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that adequate streamflows and lake levels are necessary for
protecting and recovering salmon stocks and for achieving the state's high
standards for protecting perennial water systems declared in the 1971 water
resource fundamentals. To achieve adequate flows requires as a predicate that
flow levels be expeditiously adopted. The establishment of these levels should
occur as early as possible in streams and rivers in which salmon populations
are in danger of extinction. Once levels are established, measures should be
implemented to ensure that existing flows are not diminished below these
levels, and that further measures are taken to restore streamflows currently
experiencing seasonal or periodic levels below these established levels. It is
therefore the purpose of this act to provide additional authority in the
state's water code to undertake these measures and to provide guidance to
administering agencies in establishing priorities to address critical needs
such as restoration of depressed salmon stocks.

---
END ---