BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. The
purpose of this act is to promote an increase in the conservation and efficient
use of water by public water systems; to encourage public water supply
management to occur on a regionally coordinated basis, where practicable, in a
fashion that balances the use of currently developed and future public water
supply with protection of the natural environment and instream resources,
including fisheries; and to better reflect the interests of tribes and other
existing water right holders in watershed management planning.

---
END ---