BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that changes and transfers under the water code are an
important means of satisfying existing and future water demands in the state.
Voluntary water transfers improve the administration of the state's existing
water resources by increasing the flexibility of water supply and allocation,
particularly during droughts and other water shortages. Creative approaches to
reallocation of water usage through transfers and changes provide opportunities
to address streamflow augmentation to address salmon recovery needs as well as
to address water supply needs for growing communities and new industrial,
commercial, and agricultural activities. Therefore it is the purpose of this
act to clarify the water code and to eliminate unwise doctrinal barriers that
impede or prevent parties from pursuing innovative transfer agreements, while
assuring that other recognized water rights and uses are protected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall accord priority to the processing of applications for
transfers and changes in water rights.

(2) The department in its discretion may process applications for
transfers or changes regarding water uses in a basin independently of the order
of processing or priority placed upon processing applications for new
withdrawals within the same basin, and independently of the order of processing
or priority placed upon any applications regarding water use in other basins.

---
END ---