BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the purpose of this act to provide local governments with a schedule for
revising shoreline master programs consistently with state guidelines in a
manner that provides the highest priority upon jurisdictions that are
experiencing both high growth and in which stocks listed or proposed for
listing under the federal endangered species act are located. It is also the
purpose of this act to provide greater guidance under shorelines, growth
management, and subdivision review laws in considering water supply management
and salmon recovery needs.

---
END ---