BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the purpose of this act to provide local governments and state agencies with
additional measures, such as increased financial assurance requirements, stop
work orders, and increased civil penalties, to ensure compliance with state and
local laws regarding shorelines management, water resource management, and
habitat protection.

---
END ---