BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that many people who are gainfully employed in Washington
state do not live in the state and therefore pay little or no taxes from which
many vital services are funded. Recognizing the importance of maintaining
roads and other services, it is the purpose of this chapter to supplement
county revenues.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
legislative authority of a county may impose an excise tax on persons residing
outside the state who are employed inside the county for the privilege of using
the local governmental services within the county. The amount of tax shall be
based upon the actual cost of governmental services received by persons
residing outside the state who are employed inside the county. Governmental
services that may be included when calculating the benefits received by
nonresidents include, but are not limited to, police protection, fire
protection, and the construction and maintenance of streets. The county shall
allocate and remit to each city or town the amount of such taxes collected by
the county for any county excise tax imposed on nonresidents employed within
any city or town of the county.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
county legislative authority imposing a tax under section 2 of this act shall
establish by ordinance or resolution all necessary and appropriate procedures
for the administration and collection of the tax. The ordinance or resolution
shall require the county to remit any taxes collected from nonresidents
employed in any city or town within the county to such city or town within
thirty days following collection.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 82 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---