BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
48.04.010 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 3 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The commissioner may hold a hearing for any purpose within the scope of this
code as he or she may deem necessary. The commissioner shall hold a hearing:

(a)
If required by any provision of this code; or

(b)
Upon written demand for a hearing made by any person aggrieved by any act,
threatened act, or failure of the commissioner to act, if such failure is
deemed an act under any provision of this code, or by any report, promulgation,
or order of the commissioner other than an order on a hearing of which such
person was given actual notice or at which such person appeared as a party, or
order pursuant to the order on such hearing.

(2)
Any such demand for a hearing shall specify in what respects such person is so
aggrieved and the grounds to be relied upon as basis for the relief to be
demanded at the hearing.

(3)
Unless a person aggrieved by a written order of the commissioner demands a
hearing thereon within ninety days after receiving notice of such order, or in
the case of a licensee under Title 48 RCW within ninety days after the
commissioner has mailed the order to the licensee at the most recent address
shown in the commissioner's licensing records for the licensee, the right to
such hearing shall conclusively be deemed to have been waived.

(4)
If a hearing is demanded by a licensee whose license has been temporarily
suspended pursuant to RCW 48.17.540, the commissioner shall hold such hearing
demanded within thirty days after receipt of the demand or within thirty days
of the effective date of a temporary license suspension issued after such
demand, unless postponed by mutual consent.

(5)
Any hearing held relating to section 27 or 30 of this act shall be presided
over by an administrative law judge assigned under chapter 34.12 RCW.

Sec.
2. RCW
48.20.028 and 1997 c 231 s 207 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(((a)
An insurer offering any health benefit plan to any individual shall offer and
actively market to all individuals a health benefit plan providing benefits
identical to the schedule of covered health benefits that are required to be
delivered to an individual enrolled in the basic health plan subject to RCW
48.43.025 and 48.43.035. Nothing in this subsection shall preclude an insurer
from offering, or an individual from purchasing, other health benefit plans
that may have more or less comprehensive benefits than the basic health plan,
provided such plans are in accordance with this chapter. An insurer offering a
health benefit plan that does not include benefits provided in the basic health
plan shall clearly disclose these differences to the individual in a brochure
approved by the commissioner.

(b)
A health benefit plan shall provide coverage for hospital expenses and services
rendered by a physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not
subject to the requirements of RCW 48.20.390, 48.20.393, 48.20.395, 48.20.397,
48.20.410, 48.20.411, 48.20.412, 48.20.416, and 48.20.420 if the health benefit
plan is the mandatory offering under (a) of this subsection that provides
benefits identical to the basic health plan, to the extent these requirements
differ from the basic health plan.

(2)))
Premiums for health benefit plans for individuals shall be calculated using the
adjusted community rating method that spreads financial risk across the
carrier's entire individual product population. All such rates shall conform
to the following:

(a)
The insurer shall develop its rates based on an adjusted community rate and may
only vary the adjusted community rate for:

(i)
Geographic area;

(ii)
Family size;

(iii)
Age;

(iv)
Tenure discounts; and

(v)
Wellness activities.

(b)
The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not use age brackets
smaller than five-year increments which shall begin with age twenty and end
with age sixty-five. Individuals under the age of twenty shall be treated as
those age twenty.

(c)
The insurer shall be permitted to develop separate rates for individuals age
sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is the primary payer and
coverage for which medicare is not the primary payer. Both rates shall be
subject to the requirements of this subsection.

(d)
The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than four hundred
twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups on January 1, 1996,
four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three hundred seventy-five percent
on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.

(e)
A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to reflect actuarially
justified differences in utilization or cost attributed to such programs not to
exceed twenty percent.

(f)
The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this section may not
be adjusted more frequently than annually except that the premium may be
changed to reflect:

(i)
Changes to the family composition;

(ii)
Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the individual; or

(iii)
Changes in government requirements affecting the health benefit plan.

(g)
For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that contains a
restricted network provision shall not be considered similar coverage to a
health benefit plan that does not contain such a provision, provided that the
restrictions of benefits to network providers result in substantial differences
in claims costs. This subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability
of benefits as provided in RCW 48.43.015.

(h)
A tenure discount for continuous enrollment in the health plan of two years or
more may be offered, not to exceed ten percent.

(((3)))
(2) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall pool
the medical experience of all individuals purchasing coverage, and shall not be
required to be pooled with the medical experience of health benefit plans
offered to small employers under RCW 48.21.045.

(((4)))
(3) As used in this section, "health benefit plan," (("basic
health plan,")) "adjusted community rate," and
"wellness activities" mean the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec.
3. RCW
48.41.020 and 1987 c 431 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

It
is the purpose and intent of the legislature to provide access to health
insurance coverage to all residents of Washington who are denied ((adequate))
health insurance ((for any reason)). ((It is the intent of the
legislature that adequate levels of health insurance coverage be made available
to residents of Washington who are otherwise considered uninsurable or who are
underinsured.)) It is the intent of the Washington state health insurance
coverage access act to provide a mechanism to ((insure)) ensure
the availability of comprehensive health insurance to persons unable to obtain
such insurance coverage on either an individual or group basis directly under
any health plan.

Sec.
4. RCW
48.41.030 and 1997 c 337 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

((As
used in this chapter, the following terms have the meaning indicated,)) The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the
context clearly requires otherwise((:)).

(1)
"Accounting year" means a twelve-month period determined by the board
for purposes of record-keeping and accounting. The first accounting year may
be more or less than twelve months and, from time to time in subsequent years,
the board may order an accounting year of other than twelve months as may be
required for orderly management and accounting of the pool.

(2)
"Administrator" means the entity chosen by the board to administer
the pool under RCW 48.41.080.

(3)
"Board" means the board of directors of the pool.

(4)
"Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner.

(5)
"Covered person" means any individual resident of this state who is
eligible to receive benefits from any member, or other health plan.

(6)
"Health care facility" has the same meaning as in RCW 70.38.025.

(7)
"Health care provider" means any physician, facility, or health care
professional, who is licensed in Washington state and entitled to reimbursement
for health care services.

(8)
"Health care services" means services for the purpose of preventing,
alleviating, curing, or healing human illness or injury.

(9)
"Health carrier" or "carrier" has the same meaning as in
RCW 48.43.005.

(10)
"Health coverage" means any group or individual disability insurance
policy, health care service contract, and health maintenance agreement, except
those contracts entered into for the provision of health care services pursuant
to Title XVIII of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395 et seq. The term
does not include short-term care, long-term care, dental, vision, accident,
fixed indemnity, disability income contracts, civilian health and medical
program for the uniform services (CHAMPUS), 10 U.S.C. 55, limited benefit or
credit insurance, coverage issued as a supplement to liability insurance,
insurance arising out of the worker's compensation or similar law, automobile
medical payment insurance, or insurance under which benefits are payable with
or without regard to fault and which is statutorily required to be contained in
any liability insurance policy or equivalent self-insurance.

(((10)))
(11) "Health plan" means any arrangement by which persons,
including dependents or spouses, covered or making application to be covered
under this pool, have access to hospital and medical benefits or reimbursement
including any group or individual disability insurance policy; health care
service contract; health maintenance agreement; uninsured arrangements of group
or group-type contracts including employer self-insured, cost-plus, or other
benefit methodologies not involving insurance or not governed by Title 48 RCW;
coverage under group-type contracts which are not available to the general
public and can be obtained only because of connection with a particular
organization or group; and coverage by medicare or other governmental
benefits. This term includes coverage through "health coverage" as
defined under this section, and specifically excludes those types of programs
excluded under the definition of "health coverage" in subsection (((9)))
(10) of this section.

(((11)))
(12) "Medical assistance" means coverage under Title XIX of
the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C., Sec. 1396 et seq.) and chapter
74.09 RCW.

(((12)))
(13) "Medicare" means coverage under Title XVIII of the Social
Security Act, (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395 et seq., as amended).

(((13)))
(14) "Member" means any commercial insurer which provides
disability insurance or stop loss insurance, any health care service
contractor, and any health maintenance organization licensed under Title 48
RCW. "Member" shall also mean, as soon as authorized by federal law,
employers and other entities, including a self-funding entity and employee
welfare benefit plans that provide health plan benefits in this state on or
after May 18, 1987. "Member" does not include any insurer, health
care service contractor, or health maintenance organization whose products are
exclusively dental products or those products excluded from the definition of
"health coverage" set forth in subsection (((9))) (10)
of this section.

(((14)))
(15) "Network provider" means a health care provider who has
contracted in writing with the pool administrator or a health carrier
contracting with the pool administrator to offer pool coverage to accept
payment from and to look solely to the pool or health carrier according
to the terms of the pool health plans.

(((15)))
(16) "Plan of operation" means the pool, including articles,
by-laws, and operating rules, adopted by the board pursuant to RCW 48.41.050.

(((16)))
(17) "Point of service plan" means a benefit plan offered by
the pool under which a covered person may elect to receive covered services
from network providers, or nonnetwork providers at a reduced rate of benefits.

(((17)))
(18) "Pool" means the Washington state health insurance pool
as created in RCW 48.41.040.

(((18)
"Substantially equivalent health plan" means a "health
plan" as defined in subsection (10) of this section which, in the judgment
of the board or the administrator, offers persons including dependents or
spouses covered or making application to be covered by this pool an overall
level of benefits deemed approximately equivalent to the minimum benefits
available under this pool.))

Sec.
5. RCW
48.41.040 and 1989 c 121 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is ((hereby)) created a nonprofit entity to be known as the
Washington state health insurance pool. All members in this state on or after
May 18, 1987, shall be members of the pool. When authorized by federal law,
all self-insured employers shall also be members of the pool.

(2)
((Pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW the commissioner shall, within ninety days
after May 18, 1987, give notice to all members of the time and place for the
initial organizational meetings of the pool.)) A board of directors shall
be established, which shall be comprised of ((nine)) eleven voting
members. The ((commissioner)) governor shall select ((three))
five members of the board who shall represent (a) the general public,
(b) health care providers, ((and)) (c) health insurance agents, (d)
consumers, and (e) private health care purchasers. ((The remaining))
Five members of the board shall be selected by election from among the
members of the pool((. The elected members shall)), and, to the
extent possible, shall include at least one representative of health
care service contractors, one representative of health maintenance
organizations, and one representative of commercial insurers which provides disability
insurance. The governor shall select one additional member of the board who
shall serve as chair. When self-insured organizations become eligible for
participation in the pool, the membership of the board shall be increased to ((eleven
and at least one member of the board shall represent the self-insurers)) thirteen.
One of the new members shall be appointed by the governor, and one, who shall
represent the self-insurers, shall be selected by election from among the
members of the pool. The insurance commissioner shall serve as an ex officio
nonvoting member.

(3)
Except for the chair, the original voting members of the board of
directors shall be appointed for intervals of one to three years. Thereafter, except
for the chair, all voting board members shall serve a term of three
years. The chair shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. Board
members shall receive no compensation, but shall be reimbursed for all travel
expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(4)
The board shall submit to the commissioner a plan of operation for the pool and
any amendments thereto necessary or suitable to assure the fair, reasonable,
and equitable administration of the pool. The commissioner shall, after notice
and hearing pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, approve the plan of operation if it
is determined to assure the fair, reasonable, and equitable administration of
the pool and provides for the sharing of pool losses on an equitable,
proportionate basis among the members of the pool. The plan of operation shall
become effective upon approval in writing by the commissioner consistent with
the date on which the coverage under this chapter must be made available. If
the board fails to submit a plan of operation within one hundred eighty days after
the appointment of the board or any time thereafter fails to submit acceptable
amendments to the plan, the commissioner shall, within ninety days after notice
and hearing pursuant to chapters 34.05 and 48.04 RCW, adopt such rules as are
necessary or advisable to effectuate this chapter. The rules shall continue in
force until modified by the commissioner or superseded by a plan submitted by
the board and approved by the commissioner.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
Thirty days from the effective date of this section, the existing board of
directors of the Washington state health insurance pool shall be dissolved, and
the appointment or election of new members under RCW 48.41.040 shall be
effective. For purposes of setting terms, the new members shall be treated as
original members.

Sec.
7. RCW
48.41.060 and 1997 c 337 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The board shall have the general powers and authority granted under the laws of
this state to insurance companies, health care service contractors, and health
maintenance organizations, licensed or registered to offer or provide the kinds
of health coverage defined under this title. In addition thereto, the board ((may:

(1)
Enter into contracts as are necessary or proper to carry out the provisions and
purposes of this chapter including the authority, with the approval of the
commissioner, to enter into contracts with similar pools of other states for
the joint performance of common administrative functions, or with persons or
other organizations for the performance of administrative functions;

(2)
Sue or be sued, including taking any legal action as necessary to avoid the
payment of improper claims against the pool or the coverage provided by or
through the pool;

(3))) shall:

(a)
Designate the tool to be used as the standard health questionnaire under
section 20 of this act. The tool must provide for an objective evaluation of
an individual's health status, based upon specific health conditions. The tool
shall be designed to allow each carrier to screen eight percent of its
applicants for individual coverage into the pool;

(b)
Establish appropriate rates, rate schedules, rate adjustments, expense
allowances, agent referral fees, claim reserve formulas and any other actuarial
functions appropriate to the operation of the pool. Rates shall not be
unreasonable in relation to the coverage provided, the risk experience, and
expenses of providing the coverage. Rates and rate schedules may be adjusted
for appropriate risk factors such as age and area variation in claim costs and
shall take into consideration appropriate risk factors in accordance with
established actuarial underwriting practices consistent with Washington state
small group plan rating requirements under RCW 48.44.023 and 48.46.066;

(((4)))
(c) Assess members of the pool in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter, and make advance interim assessments as may be reasonable and
necessary for the organizational or interim operating expenses. Any interim
assessments will be credited as offsets against any regular assessments due
following the close of the year;

(((5)))
(d) Issue policies of health coverage in accordance with the
requirements of this chapter;

(((6)))
(e) Establish procedures for the administration of the premium discounts
provided under RCW 48.41.200; and

(f)
Provide certification to the commissioner when assessments will exceed the
threshold level established in section 34 of this act.

(2)
In addition thereto, the board may:

(a)
Enter into contracts as are necessary or proper to carry out the provisions and
purposes of this chapter including the authority, with the approval of the
commissioner, to enter into contracts with similar pools of other states for
the joint performance of common administrative functions, or with persons or
other organizations for the performance of administrative functions;

(b)
Sue or be sued, including taking any legal action as necessary to avoid the
payment of improper claims against the pool or the coverage provided by or
through the pool;

(c)
Appoint appropriate legal, actuarial, and other committees as necessary
to provide technical assistance in the operation of the pool, policy, and other
contract design, and any other function within the authority of the pool; and

(((7)))
(d) Conduct periodic audits to assure the general accuracy of the
financial data submitted to the pool, and the board shall cause the pool to
have an annual audit of its operations by an independent certified public
accountant.

Sec.
8. RCW
48.41.080 and 1997 c 231 s 212 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board shall select an administrator from the membership of the pool whether
domiciled in this state or another state through a competitive bidding process
to administer the pool.

(1)
The board shall evaluate bids based upon criteria established by the board,
which shall include:

(a)
The administrator's proven ability to handle health coverage;

(b)
The efficiency of the administrator's claim-paying procedures;

(c)
An estimate of the total charges for administering the plan; and

(d)
The administrator's ability to administer the pool in a cost-effective manner.

(2)
The administrator shall serve for a period of three years subject to removal
for cause. At least six months prior to the expiration of each three-year
period of service by the administrator, the board shall invite all interested
parties, including the current administrator, to submit bids to serve as the
administrator for the succeeding three-year period. Selection of the
administrator for this succeeding period shall be made at least three months
prior to the end of the current three-year period.

(3)
The administrator shall perform such duties as may be assigned by the board
including:

(a)
((All)) Administering eligibility and administrative claim
payment functions relating to the pool;

(b)
Administering procedures to identify those eligible for premium discounts
under RCW 48.41.200;

(c)
Establishing a premium billing procedure for collection of premiums from
covered persons. Billings shall be made on a periodic basis as determined by
the board, which shall not be more frequent than a monthly billing;

(((c)))
(d) Performing all necessary functions to assure timely payment of
benefits to covered persons under the pool including:

(i)
Making available information relating to the proper manner of submitting a
claim for benefits to the pool, and distributing forms upon which submission shall
be made;

(ii)
Taking steps necessary to offer and administer managed care benefit plans; and

(iii)
Evaluating the eligibility of each claim for payment by the pool;

(((d)))
(e) Submission of regular reports to the board regarding the operation
of the pool. The frequency, content, and form of the report shall be as
determined by the board;

(((e)))
(f) Following the close of each accounting year, determination of net
paid and earned premiums, the expense of administration, and the paid and
incurred losses for the year and reporting this information to the board and
the commissioner on a form as prescribed by the commissioner.

(4)
The administrator shall be paid as provided in the contract between the board
and the administrator for its expenses incurred in the performance of its
services.

Sec.
9. RCW
48.41.090 and 1989 c 121 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Following the close of each accounting year, the pool administrator shall
determine the net premium (premiums less administrative expense allowances),
the pool expenses of administration, and incurred losses for the year, taking
into account investment income and other appropriate gains and losses.

(2)(a)
Each member's proportion of participation in the pool shall be determined
annually by the board based on annual statements and other reports deemed
necessary by the board and filed by the member with the commissioner; and shall
be determined by multiplying the total cost of pool operation by a fraction((,)).
The numerator of ((which)) the fraction equals that member's
total: Number of resident insured persons, including spouse and
dependents under the member's health plans; plus the number of resident
insured persons covered under stop loss policies issued to self-insured
employer plans, minus; the number of insured persons covered under individual
policies or contracts in the state during the preceding calendar year((,
and)). The denominator of ((which)) the fraction
equals the total number of resident insured persons including spouses and
dependents insured under all health plans, including employer purchased stop
loss policies, minus the number of insured persons covered under individual
policies or contracts in the state by pool members.

(b)
Except as provided in section 34 of this act, any deficit incurred by
the pool shall be recouped by assessments among members apportioned under this
subsection pursuant to the formula set forth by the board among members.

(3)
The board may abate or defer, in whole or in part, the assessment of a member
if, in the opinion of the board, payment of the assessment would endanger the
ability of the member to fulfill its contractual obligations. If an assessment
against a member is abated or deferred in whole or in part, the amount by which
such assessment is abated or deferred may be assessed against the other members
in a manner consistent with the basis for assessments set forth in subsection
(2) of this section. The member receiving such abatement or deferment shall
remain liable to the pool for the deficiency.

(4)
If assessments exceed actual losses and administrative expenses of the pool,
the excess shall be held at interest and used by the board to offset future
losses or to reduce pool premiums. As used in this subsection, "future
losses" includes reserves for incurred but not reported claims.

Sec.
10. RCW
48.41.100 and 1995 c 34 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any individual person who is a resident of this state is eligible for pool
coverage ((upon providing evidence of rejection for medical reasons, a
requirement of restrictive riders, an up-rated premium, or a preexisting
conditions limitation on health insurance, the effect of which is to
substantially reduce coverage from that received by a person considered a
standard risk, by at least one member within six months of the date of
application. Evidence of rejection may be waived in accordance with rules
adopted by the board)):

(a)
Upon providing evidence of a carrier's decision not to accept him or her for
enrollment in an individual health benefit plan based upon the results of the
standardized health questionnaire designated by the board and administered by
health carriers under section 20 of this act; or

(b)
By direct application to and acceptance by the pool. Upon direct application,
the administrator shall administer the standard health questionnaire. The
administrator shall inform the individual whether he or she has been accepted
for pool coverage within fifteen days of receipt of a completed application.
Anyone not accepted for pool coverage shall be given information regarding
other sources of health insurance in the state.

(2)
The following persons are not eligible for coverage by the pool:

(a)
Any person having terminated coverage in the pool unless (i) twelve months have
lapsed since termination, or (ii) that person can show continuous other
coverage which has been involuntarily terminated for any reason other than
nonpayment of premiums;

(b)
Any person on whose behalf the pool has paid out five hundred thousand dollars
in benefits;

(c)
Inmates of public institutions and persons whose benefits are duplicated under
public programs.

(((3)
Any person whose health insurance coverage is involuntarily terminated for any
reason other than nonpayment of premium may apply for coverage under the plan.))

Sec.
11. RCW
48.41.110 and 1997 c 231 s 213 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The pool ((is authorized to)) shall offer one or more ((managed))
care management plans of coverage. Such plans may, but are not required
to, include point of service features that permit participants to receive
in-network benefits or out-of-network benefits subject to differential cost
shares. Covered persons enrolled in the pool on January 1, ((1997)) 2000,
may continue coverage under the pool plan in which they are enrolled on that
date. However, the pool may incorporate managed care features into such
existing plans.

(2)
The administrator shall prepare a brochure outlining the benefits and
exclusions of the pool policy in plain language. After approval by the board
((of directors)), such brochure shall be made reasonably available to
participants or potential participants.

(3)
The health insurance policy issued by the pool shall pay only ((usual,
customary, and)) reasonable ((charges)) amounts for medically
necessary eligible health care services rendered or furnished for the diagnosis
or treatment of illnesses, injuries, and conditions which are not otherwise
limited or excluded. Eligible expenses are the ((usual, customary, and))
reasonable ((charges)) amounts for the health care services and
items for which benefits are extended under the pool policy. Such benefits
shall at minimum include, but not be limited to, the following services or
related items:

(a)
Hospital services, including charges for the most common semiprivate room, for
the most common private room if semiprivate rooms do not exist in the health
care facility, or for the private room if medically necessary, but limited to a
total of one hundred eighty inpatient days in a calendar year, and limited to
thirty days inpatient care for mental and nervous conditions, or alcohol, drug,
or chemical dependency or abuse per calendar year;

(b)
Professional services including surgery for the treatment of injuries,
illnesses, or conditions, other than dental, which are rendered by a health
care provider, or at the direction of a health care provider, by a staff of
registered or licensed practical nurses, or other health care providers;

(c)
The first twenty outpatient professional visits for the diagnosis or treatment
of one or more mental or nervous conditions or alcohol, drug, or chemical
dependency or abuse rendered during a calendar year by one or more physicians,
psychologists, or community mental health professionals, or, at the direction
of a physician, by other qualified licensed health care practitioners, in the case
of mental or nervous conditions, and rendered by a state certified chemical
dependency program approved under chapter 70.96A RCW, in the case of alcohol,
drug, or chemical dependency or abuse;

(d)
Drugs and contraceptive devices requiring a prescription;

(e)
Services of a skilled nursing facility, excluding custodial and convalescent
care, for not more than one hundred days in a calendar year as prescribed by a
physician;

(f)
Services of a home health agency;

(g)
Chemotherapy, radioisotope, radiation, and nuclear medicine therapy;

(h)
Oxygen;

(i)
Anesthesia services;

(j)
Prostheses, other than dental;

(k)
Durable medical equipment which has no personal use in the absence of the
condition for which prescribed;

(l)
Diagnostic x-rays and laboratory tests;

(m)
Oral surgery limited to the following: Fractures of facial bones; excisions of
mandibular joints, lesions of the mouth, lip, or tongue, tumors, or cysts
excluding treatment for temporomandibular joints; incision of accessory
sinuses, mouth salivary glands or ducts; dislocations of the jaw; plastic
reconstruction or repair of traumatic injuries occurring while covered under
the pool; and excision of impacted wisdom teeth;

(n)
Maternity care services((, as provided in the managed care plan to be
designed by the pool board of directors, and for which no preexisting condition
waiting periods may apply));

(o)
Services of a physical therapist and services of a speech therapist;

(p)
Hospice services;

(q)
Professional ambulance service to the nearest health care facility qualified to
treat the illness or injury; and

(r)
Other medical equipment, services, or supplies required by physician's orders
and medically necessary and consistent with the diagnosis, treatment, and
condition.

(((3)))
(4) The board shall design and employ cost containment measures and
requirements such as, but not limited to, care coordination, provider network
limitations, preadmission certification, and concurrent inpatient review which
may make the pool more cost-effective.

(((4)))
(5) The pool benefit policy may contain benefit limitations, exceptions,
and cost shares such as copayments, coinsurance, and deductibles that are
consistent with managed care products, except that differential cost shares may
be adopted by the board for nonnetwork providers under point of service plans.
The pool benefit policy cost shares and limitations must be consistent with
those that are generally included in health plans approved by the insurance
commissioner; however, no limitation, exception, or reduction may be used that
would exclude coverage for any disease, illness, or injury.

(((5)))
(6) The pool may not reject an individual for health plan coverage based
upon preexisting conditions of the individual or deny, exclude, or otherwise
limit coverage for an individual's preexisting health conditions; except that
it may impose a three-month benefit waiting period for preexisting conditions
for which medical advice was given, or for which a health care provider
recommended or provided treatment, or for which a prudent layperson would
have sought advice or treatment, within ((three)) six months
before the effective date of coverage. The pool may not avoid the requirements
of this section through the creation of a new rate classification or the
modification of an existing rate classification. Credit against the waiting
period shall be provided as required by section 19 of this act.

Sec.
12. RCW
48.41.120 and 1989 c 121 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to the limitation provided in subsection (3) of this section, a pool
policy offered in accordance with ((this chapter)) RCW 48.41.110(3)
shall impose a deductible. Deductibles of five hundred dollars and one
thousand dollars on a per person per calendar year basis shall initially be
offered. The board may authorize deductibles in other amounts. The deductible
shall be applied to the first five hundred dollars, one thousand dollars, or
other authorized amount of eligible expenses incurred by the covered person.

(2)
Subject to the limitations provided in subsection (3) of this section, a
mandatory coinsurance requirement shall be imposed at the rate of twenty
percent of eligible expenses in excess of the mandatory deductible.

(3)
The maximum aggregate out of pocket payments for eligible expenses by the
insured in the form of deductibles and coinsurance under a pool policy
offered in accordance with RCW 48.41.110(3) shall not exceed in a calendar
year:

(a)
One thousand five hundred dollars per individual, or three thousand dollars per
family, per calendar year for the five hundred dollar deductible policy;

(b)
Two thousand five hundred dollars per individual, or five thousand dollars per
family per calendar year for the one thousand dollar deductible policy; or

(c)
An amount authorized by the board for any other deductible policy.

(4)
Eligible expenses incurred by a covered person in the last three months of a
calendar year, and applied toward a deductible, shall also be applied toward
the deductible amount in the next calendar year.

Sec.
13. RCW
48.41.130 and 1997 c 231 s 215 are each amended to read as follows:

All
policy forms issued by the pool shall conform in substance to prototype forms
developed by the pool, and shall in all other respects conform to the
requirements of this chapter, and shall be filed with and approved by the
commissioner before they are issued. ((The pool shall not issue a pool
policy to any individual who, on the effective date of the coverage applied
for, already has or would have coverage substantially equivalent to a pool
policy as an insured or covered dependent, or who would be eligible for such
coverage if he or she elected to obtain it at a lesser premium rate. However,
coverage provided by the basic health plan, as established pursuant to chapter
70.47 RCW, shall not be deemed substantially equivalent for the purposes of this
section.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. A
new section is added to chapter 48.41 RCW to read as follows:

The
board shall design and offer a care management plan of coverage with the
following components:

(1)
Services similar to those contained in RCW 48.41.110(3) shall be covered. The
board is authorized to deviate from those services if medically appropriate,
cost-effective alternatives are available.

(2)
Alternative payment methodologies for network providers that may include but
are not limited to resource-based relative value fee schedules, capitation
payments, diagnostic related group fee schedules, and other similar strategies
including risk sharing arrangements.

(3)
Enrollee cost-sharing that may include but not be limited to point-of-service
cost-sharing for covered services and deductibles in amounts to be determined
by the board. The board shall include an annual maximum out-of-pocket payment
protection in the plan.

(4)
Other appropriate care management and cost containment measures determined
appropriate by the board, including but not limited to, care coordination,
provider network limitations, preadmission certification, and utilization
review.

Sec.
15. RCW
48.41.140 and 1987 c 431 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Coverage shall provide that health insurance benefits are applicable to
children of the person in whose name the policy is issued including adopted and
newly born natural children. Coverage shall also include necessary care and
treatment of medically diagnosed congenital defects and birth abnormalities.
If payment of a specific premium is required to provide coverage for the child,
the policy may require that notification of the birth or adoption of a child
and payment of the required premium must be furnished to the pool within
thirty-one days after the date of birth or adoption in order to have the
coverage continued beyond the thirty-one day period. For purposes of this
subsection, a child is deemed to be adopted, and benefits are payable, when the
child is physically placed for purposes of adoption under the laws of this
state with the person in whose name the policy is issued; and, when the person
in whose name the policy is issued assumes financial responsibility for the
medical expenses of the child. For purposes of this subsection, "newly
born" means, and benefits are payable, from the moment of birth.

(2)
A pool policy shall provide that coverage of a dependent, unmarried person
shall terminate when the person becomes nineteen years of age: PROVIDED, That
coverage of such person shall not terminate at age nineteen while he or she is
and continues to be both (a) incapable of self-sustaining employment by reason
of developmental disability or physical handicap and (b) chiefly dependent upon
the person in whose name the policy is issued for support and maintenance,
provided proof of such incapacity and dependency is furnished to the pool by
the policy holder within thirty-one days of the dependent's attainment of age
nineteen and subsequently as may be required by the pool but not more
frequently than annually after the two-year period following the dependent's
attainment of age nineteen.

(((3)
A pool policy may contain provisions under which coverage is excluded during a
period of six months following the effective date of coverage as to a given
covered individual for preexisting conditions, as long as medical advice or
treatment was recommended or received within a period of six months before the
effective date of coverage.

These
preexisting condition exclusions shall be waived to the extent to which similar
exclusions have been satisfied under any prior health insurance which was for
any reason other than nonpayment of premium involuntarily terminated, if the
application for pool coverage is made not later than thirty days following the
involuntary termination. In that case, with payment of appropriate premium,
coverage in the pool shall be effective from the date on which the prior
coverage was terminated.))

Sec.
16. RCW
48.41.200 and 1997 c 231 s 214 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The pool shall determine the standard risk rate by calculating the average ((group))
individual standard rate ((for groups comprised of up to fifty
persons)) charged for coverage comparable to pool coverage by the
five largest members, measured in terms of individual market enrollment,
offering such coverages in the state ((comparable to the pool
coverage)). In the event five members do not offer comparable coverage,
the standard risk rate shall be established using reasonable actuarial
techniques and shall reflect anticipated experience and expenses for such
coverage in the individual market.

(2)
Subject to subsection (3) of this section, maximum rates for pool coverage
shall be ((one hundred fifty percent for the indemnity health plan and one
hundred twenty-five percent for managed care plans of the rates established as
applicable for group standard risks in groups comprised of up to fifty persons))
as follows:

(a)
Maximum rates for a pool indemnity health plan shall be one hundred fifty
percent of the average rate calculated under subsection (1) of this section;

(b)
Maximum rates for a pool care management plan shall be one hundred twenty-five
percent of the average rate calculated under subsection (1) of this section;

(c)
Maximum rates for any pool plan for a person who, within sixty-three days of his
or her enrollment in the pool, has had at least twelve months of continuous
previous coverage shall be the average rate calculated under subsection (1) of
this section.

(3)(a)
Subject to (b) of this subsection:

(i)
The rate for any person whose current gross family income is less than two
hundred fifty-one percent of the federal poverty level shall be reduced by
thirty percent from what it would otherwise be;

(ii)
The rate for any person whose current gross family income is more than two
hundred fifty but less than three hundred one percent of the federal poverty
level shall be reduced by fifteen percent from what it would otherwise be;

(iii)
The rate for any person who has been enrolled in the pool for more than
thirty-six months shall be reduced by five percent from what it would otherwise
be;

(b)
In no event shall the rate for any person be less than the average rate
calculated under subsection (1) of this section.

Sec.
17. RCW
48.43.005 and 1997 c 231 s 202 and 1997 c 55 s 1 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

Unless
otherwise specifically provided, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Adjusted community rate" means the rating method used to establish
the premium for health plans adjusted to reflect actuarially demonstrated
differences in utilization or cost attributable to geographic region, age,
family size, and use of wellness activities.

(2)
"Basic health plan" means the plan described under chapter 70.47 RCW,
as revised from time to time.

(3)
"Basic health plan model plan" means a health plan as required in RCW
70.47.060(2)(d).

(4)
"Basic health plan services" means that schedule of covered health
services, including the description of how those benefits are to be administered,
that are required to be delivered to an enrollee under the basic health plan,
as revised from time to time.

(5)
"Catastrophic health plan" means:

(a)
In the case of a contract, agreement, or policy covering a single enrollee, a
health benefit plan requiring a calendar year deductible of, at a minimum, one
thousand five hundred dollars and an annual out-of-pocket expense required to
be paid under the plan (other than for premiums) for covered benefits of at
least three thousand dollars; and

(b)
In the case of a contract, agreement, or policy covering more than one
enrollee, a health benefit plan requiring a calendar year deductible of, at a
minimum, three thousand dollars and an annual out-of-pocket expense required to
be paid under the plan (other than for premiums) for covered benefits of at
least five thousand five hundred dollars; or

(c)
Any health benefit plan that provides benefits for hospital inpatient and
outpatient services, professional and prescription drugs provided in
conjunction with such hospital inpatient and outpatient services, and excludes
or substantially limits outpatient physician services and those services
usually provided in an office setting.

(6)
"Certification" means a determination by a review organization that
an admission, extension of stay, or other health care service or procedure has
been reviewed and, based on the information provided, meets the clinical
requirements for medical necessity, appropriateness, level of care, or
effectiveness under the auspices of the applicable health benefit plan.

(((6)))
(7) "Concurrent review" means utilization review conducted
during a patient's hospital stay or course of treatment.

(((7)))
(8) "Covered person" or "enrollee" means a person
covered by a health plan including an enrollee, subscriber, policyholder,
beneficiary of a group plan, or individual covered by any other health plan.

(((8)))
(9) "Dependent" means, at a minimum, the enrollee's legal spouse
and unmarried dependent children who qualify for coverage under the enrollee's
health benefit plan.

(((9)))
(10) "Eligible employee" means an employee who works on a
full-time basis with a normal work week of thirty or more hours. The term
includes a self-employed individual, including a sole proprietor, a partner of
a partnership, and may include an independent contractor, if the self-employed
individual, sole proprietor, partner, or independent contractor is included as
an employee under a health benefit plan of a small employer, but does not work
less than thirty hours per week and derives at least seventy-five percent of
his or her income from a trade or business through which he or she has
attempted to earn taxable income and for which he or she has filed the
appropriate internal revenue service form. Persons covered under a health
benefit plan pursuant to the consolidated omnibus budget reconciliation act of
1986 shall not be considered eligible employees for purposes of minimum
participation requirements of chapter 265, Laws of 1995.

(((10)))
(11) "Emergency medical condition" means the emergent and
acute onset of a symptom or symptoms, including severe pain, that would lead a
prudent layperson acting reasonably to believe that a health condition exists
that requires immediate medical attention, if failure to provide medical
attention would result in serious impairment to bodily functions or serious
dysfunction of a bodily organ or part, or would place the person's health in
serious jeopardy.

(((11)))
(12) "Emergency services" means otherwise covered health care
services medically necessary to evaluate and treat an emergency medical
condition, provided in a hospital emergency department.

(((12)))
(13) "Enrollee point-of-service cost-sharing" means amounts
paid to health carriers directly providing services, health care providers, or
health care facilities by enrollees and may include copayments, coinsurance, or
deductibles.

(((13)))
(14) "Grievance" means a written complaint submitted by or on behalf
of a covered person regarding: (a) Denial of payment for medical services or
nonprovision of medical services included in the covered person's health
benefit plan, or (b) service delivery issues other than denial of payment for
medical services or nonprovision of medical services, including dissatisfaction
with medical care, waiting time for medical services, provider or staff
attitude or demeanor, or dissatisfaction with service provided by the health
carrier.

(((14)))
(15) "Health care facility" or "facility" means
hospices licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW, hospitals licensed under chapter
70.41 RCW, rural health care facilities as defined in RCW 70.175.020,
psychiatric hospitals licensed under chapter 71.12 RCW, nursing homes licensed
under chapter 18.51 RCW, community mental health centers licensed under chapter
71.05 or 71.24 RCW, kidney disease treatment centers licensed under chapter
70.41 RCW, ambulatory diagnostic, treatment, or surgical facilities licensed
under chapter 70.41 RCW, drug and alcohol treatment facilities licensed under
chapter 70.96A RCW, and home health agencies licensed under chapter 70.127 RCW,
and includes such facilities if owned and operated by a political subdivision
or instrumentality of the state and such other facilities as required by
federal law and implementing regulations.

(((15)))
(16) "Health care provider" or "provider" means:

(a)
A person regulated under Title 18 or chapter 70.127 RCW, to practice health or
health-related services or otherwise practicing health care services in this
state consistent with state law; or

(b)
An employee or agent of a person described in (a) of this subsection, acting in
the course and scope of his or her employment.

(((16)))
(17) "Health care service" means that service offered or
provided by health care facilities and health care providers relating to the
prevention, cure, or treatment of illness, injury, or disease.

(((17)))
(18) "Health carrier" or "carrier" means a
disability insurer regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, a health care
service contractor as defined in RCW 48.44.010, or a health maintenance
organization as defined in RCW 48.46.020.

(((18)))
(19) "Health plan" or "health benefit plan" means
any policy, contract, or agreement offered by a health carrier to provide,
arrange, reimburse, or pay for health care services except the following:

(a)
Long-term care insurance governed by chapter 48.84 RCW;

(b)
Medicare supplemental health insurance governed by chapter 48.66 RCW;

(c)
Limited health care services offered by limited health care service contractors
in accordance with RCW 48.44.035;

(d)
Disability income;

(e)
Coverage incidental to a property/casualty liability insurance policy such as
automobile personal injury protection coverage and homeowner guest medical;

(f)
Workers' compensation coverage;

(g)
Accident only coverage;

(h)
Specified disease and hospital confinement indemnity when marketed solely as a
supplement to a health plan;

(i)
Employer-sponsored self-funded health plans;

(j)
Dental only and vision only coverage; and

(k)
Plans deemed by the insurance commissioner to have a short-term limited purpose
or duration, or to be a student-only plan that is guaranteed renewable while
the covered person is enrolled as a regular full-time undergraduate or graduate
student at an accredited higher education institution, after a written request
for such classification by the carrier and subsequent written approval by the
insurance commissioner.

(((19)))
(20) "Material modification" means a change in the actuarial
value of the health plan as modified of more than five percent but less than
fifteen percent.

(((20)))
(21) "Open enrollment" means the annual sixty-two day period
during the months of July and August during which every health carrier offering
individual health plan coverage must accept onto individual coverage any state
resident within the carrier's service area regardless of health condition who
submits an application in accordance with RCW 48.43.035(1).

(((21)))
(22) "Preexisting condition" means any medical condition,
illness, or injury that existed any time prior to the effective date of
coverage.

(((22)))
(23) "Premium" means all sums charged, received, or deposited
by a health carrier as consideration for a health plan or the continuance of a
health plan. Any assessment or any "membership," "policy,"
"contract," "service," or similar fee or charge made by a
health carrier in consideration for a health plan is deemed part of the
premium. "Premium" shall not include amounts paid as enrollee
point-of-service cost-sharing.

(((23)))
(24) "Review organization" means a disability insurer
regulated under chapter 48.20 or 48.21 RCW, health care service contractor as
defined in RCW 48.44.010, or health maintenance organization as defined in RCW
48.46.020, and entities affiliated with, under contract with, or acting on
behalf of a health carrier to perform a utilization review.

(((24)))
(25) "Small employer" means any person, firm, corporation,
partnership, association, political subdivision except school districts, or
self-employed individual that is actively engaged in business that, on at least
fifty percent of its working days during the preceding calendar quarter,
employed no more than fifty eligible employees, with a normal work week of
thirty or more hours, the majority of whom were employed within this state, and
is not formed primarily for purposes of buying health insurance and in which a
bona fide employer-employee relationship exists. In determining the number of
eligible employees, companies that are affiliated companies, or that are
eligible to file a combined tax return for purposes of taxation by this state,
shall be considered an employer. Subsequent to the issuance of a health plan
to a small employer and for the purpose of determining eligibility, the size of
a small employer shall be determined annually. Except as otherwise
specifically provided, a small employer shall continue to be considered a small
employer until the plan anniversary following the date the small employer no
longer meets the requirements of this definition. The term "small
employer" includes a self-employed individual or sole proprietor. The
term "small employer" also includes a self-employed individual or
sole proprietor who derives at least seventy-five percent of his or her income
from a trade or business through which the individual or sole proprietor has
attempted to earn taxable income and for which he or she has filed the
appropriate internal revenue service form 1040, schedule C or F, for the
previous taxable year.

(((25)))
(26) "Utilization review" means the prospective, concurrent,
or retrospective assessment of the necessity and appropriateness of the
allocation of health care resources and services of a provider or facility,
given or proposed to be given to an enrollee or group of enrollees.

(((26)))
(27) "Wellness activity" means an explicit program of an
activity consistent with department of health guidelines, such as, smoking
cessation, injury and accident prevention, reduction of alcohol misuse,
appropriate weight reduction, exercise, automobile and motorcycle safety, blood
cholesterol reduction, and nutrition education for the purpose of improving
enrollee health status and reducing health service costs.

Sec.
18. RCW
48.43.015 and 1995 c 265 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
For group health benefit plans, every health carrier shall waive any
preexisting condition exclusion or limitation for persons or groups who had
similar health coverage under a different health plan at any time during the
three-month period immediately preceding the date of application for the new
health plan if such person was continuously covered under the immediately
preceding health plan. If the person was continuously covered for at least
three months under the immediately preceding health plan, the carrier may not
impose a waiting period for coverage of preexisting conditions. If the person
was continuously covered for less than three months under the immediately
preceding health plan, the carrier must credit any waiting period under the immediately
preceding health plan toward the new health plan. For the purposes of this
subsection, a preceding health plan includes an employer provided self-funded
health plan.

(2)
Subject to the provisions of subsections (1) and (3) of this
section, nothing contained in this section requires a health carrier to amend a
health plan to provide new benefits in its existing health plans. In addition,
nothing in this section requires a carrier to waive benefit limitations not
related to an individual or group's preexisting conditions or health history.

(3)
A health carrier shall credit any preexisting condition waiting period in its
individual plans for a person who was enrolled in a group health benefit plan,
or an individual health benefit plan other than a catastrophic plan, at any
time during the sixty-three day period immediately preceding the date of
application for the new health plan. The carrier must credit the period of
coverage the person was continuously covered under the immediately preceding health
plan toward the waiting period of the new health plan. For the purposes of
this subsection, a preceding health plan includes an employer provided
self-funded health plan.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19. A
new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
No carrier may reject an individual for individual health plan coverage based
upon preexisting conditions of the individual and no carrier may deny, exclude,
or otherwise limit coverage for an individual's preexisting health conditions
except as provided in this section.

(2)
Preexisting condition waiting periods imposed upon a person enrolling in
individual coverage shall be no more restrictive than the following:

(a)
For individual coverage originally issued on or after the effective date of
this section, nine months for a preexisting condition for which medical advice
was given, or for which a health care provider recommended or provided
treatment or for which a prudent layperson would have sought advice or
treatment, within six months prior to the effective date of coverage.

(b)
For individual coverage originally issued on or after October 1, 2000, at the
choice of the person seeking coverage:

(i)
Nine months for a preexisting condition for which medical advice was given, or
for which a health care provider recommended or provided treatment or for which
a prudent layperson would have sought advice or treatment, within six months
prior to the effective date of coverage; or

(ii)
Six months for a preexisting condition for which medical advice was given, or
for which a health care provider recommended or provided treatment or for which
a prudent layperson would have sought advice or treatment, within six months
prior to the effective date of coverage. However, between the seventh and
twelfth month of coverage, inclusive, the carrier may impose cost-sharing for
coverage of the preexisting condition in excess of that otherwise applicable to
the underlying coverage. The additional preexisting condition cost-sharing
shall not exceed a deductible of one thousand five hundred dollars, and
coinsurance of eighty percent, up to a maximum out-of-pocket expenditure of
four thousand five hundred dollars. The maximum out-of-pocket expenditure for the
additional preexisting condition cost-sharing shall be adjusted annually
according to the inflation rate identified by the annual consumer price index,
as certified by the office of financial management.

(iii)
The enrollee shall select the option upon application.

(3)
Individual coverage preexisting condition exclusion waiting periods shall not
apply to prenatal care services.

(4)
No carrier may avoid the requirements of this section through the creation of a
new rate classification or the modification of an existing rate
classification. A new or changed rate classification will be deemed an attempt
to avoid the provisions of this section if the new or changed classification
would substantially discourage applications for coverage from individuals who
are higher than average health risks. These provisions apply only to
individuals who are Washington residents.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 20. A
new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in (a) and (b) of this subsection, a health carrier may
require any person applying for an individual health plan to complete the standard
health questionnaire designated under chapter 48.41 RCW.

(a)
If a person is seeking individual coverage due to his or her relocating to a
geographic area where their current health coverage is not offered, completion
of the standard health questionnaire shall not be a condition of coverage.

(b)
If a person is seeking individual coverage:

(i)
Because a health care provider with whom he or she has an established care
relationship and from whom he or she has received treatment within the past
twelve months is no longer part of the carrier's provider network under his or
her individual coverage; and

(ii)
His or her health care provider is part of another carrier's provider network;
and

(iii)
Application for coverage under that carrier's provider network individual
coverage is made within ninety days of his or her provider leaving the previous
carrier's provider network; then completion of the standard health
questionnaire shall not be a condition of coverage.

(2)(a)
If, based upon the results of the standard health questionnaire, the person
qualifies for coverage under the Washington state health insurance pool, the
carrier may decide not to accept the person's application for enrollment in its
individual health plan, subject to (c) of this subsection.

(b)
Within fifteen business days of receipt of a completed application, the carrier
shall provide written notice of the decision not to accept the person's
application for enrollment to both the applicant and the administrator of the
Washington state health insurance pool. The notice to the applicant shall
state that the person is eligible for health insurance provided by the
Washington state health insurance pool, and shall include information about the
Washington state health insurance pool and an application for such coverage.

(c)
Based upon application of the standardized health questionnaire, a carrier may
decide not to issue coverage to up to eight percent of its applicants for
individual health plans each calendar year.

(3)
If, based upon the results of the standardized health questionnaire, the person
does not qualify for coverage under the Washington state health insurance pool,
the carrier shall accept the person for enrollment if he or she resides within
the carrier's service area and provide or assure the provision of all covered
services regardless of age, sex, family structure, ethnicity, race, health
condition, geographic location, employment status, socioeconomic status, other
condition or situation, or the provisions of RCW 49.60.174(2). The
commissioner may grant a temporary exemption from this subsection if, upon
application by a health carrier, the commissioner finds that the clinical,
financial, or administrative capacity to serve existing enrollees will be
impaired if a health carrier is required to continue enrollment of additional
eligible individuals.

Sec.
21. RCW
48.43.025 and 1995 c 265 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
For group health benefit plans, no carrier may reject an individual for
health plan coverage based upon preexisting conditions of the individual and no
carrier may deny, exclude, or otherwise limit coverage for an individual's
preexisting health conditions; except that a carrier may impose a three-month
benefit waiting period for preexisting conditions for which medical advice was
given, or for which a health care provider recommended or provided treatment
within three months before the effective date of coverage.

(2)
No carrier may avoid the requirements of this section through the creation of a
new rate classification or the modification of an existing rate
classification. A new or changed rate classification will be deemed an attempt
to avoid the provisions of this section if the new or changed classification
would substantially discourage applications for coverage from individuals or
groups who are higher than average health risks. These provisions apply only
to individuals who are Washington residents.

Sec.
22. RCW
48.43.035 and 1995 c 265 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All health carriers shall accept for enrollment any state resident within the
carrier's service area and provide or assure the provision of all covered
services regardless of age, sex, family structure, ethnicity, race, health
condition, geographic location, employment status, socioeconomic status, other
condition or situation, or the provisions of RCW 49.60.174(2). The insurance
commissioner may grant a temporary exemption from this subsection, if, upon application
by a health carrier the commissioner finds that the clinical, financial, or
administrative capacity to serve existing enrollees will be impaired if a
health carrier is required to continue enrollment of additional eligible
individuals.

(2)
Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, all health plans shall
contain or incorporate by endorsement a guarantee of the continuity of coverage
of the plan. For the purposes of this section, a plan is "renewed"
when it is continued beyond the earliest date upon which, at the carrier's sole
option, the plan could have been terminated for other than nonpayment of
premium. In the case of group plans, the carrier may consider the group's
anniversary date as the renewal date for purposes of complying with the
provisions of this section.

(3)
The guarantee of continuity of coverage required in health plans shall not
prevent a carrier from canceling or nonrenewing a health plan for:

(a)
Nonpayment of premium;

(b)
Violation of published policies of the carrier approved by the insurance
commissioner;

(c)
Covered persons entitled to become eligible for medicare benefits by reason of
age who fail to apply for a medicare supplement plan or medicare cost, risk, or
other plan offered by the carrier pursuant to federal laws and regulations;

(d)
Covered persons who fail to pay any deductible or copayment amount owed to the
carrier and not the provider of health care services;

(e)
Covered persons committing fraudulent acts as to the carrier;

(f)
Covered persons who materially breach the health plan; or

(g)
Change or implementation of federal or state laws that no longer permit the
continued offering of such coverage.

(4)
The provisions of this section do not apply in the following cases:

(a)
A carrier has zero enrollment on a product; or

(b)
A carrier replaces a product and the replacement product is provided to all
covered persons within that class or line of business, includes all of the
services covered under the replaced product, and does not significantly limit
access to the kind of services covered under the replaced product. The health
plan may also allow unrestricted conversion to a fully comparable product; or

(c)
A carrier is withdrawing from a service area or from a segment of its service
area because the carrier has demonstrated to the insurance commissioner that
the carrier's clinical, financial, or administrative capacity to serve
enrollees would be exceeded.

(5)
The provisions of this section do not apply to health plans deemed by the
insurance commissioner to be unique or limited or have a short-term purpose,
after a written request for such classification by the carrier and subsequent
written approval by the insurance commissioner.

(6)
This section shall not apply to individual health benefit plans.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 23. A
new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, all individual health
plans shall contain or incorporate by endorsement a guarantee of the continuity
of coverage of the plan. For the purposes of this section, a plan is
"renewed" when it is continued beyond the earliest date upon which,
at the carrier's sole option, the plan could have been terminated for other
than nonpayment of premium.

(2)
The guarantee of continuity of coverage required in individual health plans
shall not prevent a carrier from canceling or nonrenewing a health plan for:

(a)
Nonpayment of premium;

(b)
Violation of published policies of the carrier approved by the commissioner;

(c)
Covered persons entitled to become eligible for medicare benefits by reason of
age who fail to apply for a medicare supplement plan or medicare cost, risk, or
other plan offered by the carrier pursuant to federal laws and regulations;

(d)
Covered persons who fail to pay any deductible or copayment amount owed to the
carrier and not the provider of health care services;

(e)
Covered persons committing fraudulent acts as to the carrier;

(f)
Covered persons who materially breach the health plan; or

(g)
Change or implementation of federal or state laws that no longer permit the
continued offering of such coverage.

(3)
This section does not apply in the following cases:

(a)
A carrier has zero enrollment on a product;

(b)
A carrier is withdrawing from a service area or from a segment of its service
area because the carrier has demonstrated to the commissioner that the
carrier's clinical, financial, or administrative capacity to serve enrollees
would be exceeded;

(c)
A carrier discontinues offering a particular type of health insurance coverage
offered in the individual market if: (i) The carrier provides notice to each
covered individual provided coverage of this type of such discontinuation at
least ninety days prior to the date of the discontinuation; (ii) the carrier
offers to each individual provided coverage of this type the option to enroll
in any other individual health insurance coverage currently being offered by
the carrier; and (iii) in exercising the option to discontinue coverage of this
type and in offering the option of coverage under (c)(ii) of this subsection,
the carrier acts uniformly without regard to any health status-related factor
of enrolled individuals or individuals who may become eligible for such
coverage; or

(d)
A carrier discontinues offering all individual health coverage in the state and
discontinues coverage under all existing individual health benefit plans if:
(i) The carrier provides notice to the commissioner of its intent to
discontinue offering all individual health coverage in the state and its intent
to discontinue coverage under all existing health benefit plans at least one
hundred eighty days prior to the date of the discontinuation of coverage under
all existing health benefit plans; and (ii) the carrier provides notice to each
covered individual of the intent to discontinue his or her existing health
benefit plan at least one hundred eighty days prior to the date of such discontinuation.
In the case of discontinuation under this subsection, the carrier may not issue
any individual health coverage in this state for a five-year period beginning
on the date of the discontinuation of the last health plan not so renewed.
Nothing in this subsection (3) shall be construed to require a carrier to
provide notice to the commissioner of its intent to discontinue offering a
health benefit plan to new applicants where the carrier does not discontinue
coverage of existing enrollees under that health benefit plan.

(4)
The provisions of this section do not apply to health plans deemed by the
commissioner to be unique or limited or have a short-term purpose, after a
written request for such classification by the carrier and subsequent written approval
by the commissioner.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 24. A
new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

Any
individual health plan other than a catastrophic health plan offered to new
applicants on or after January 1, 2000, shall include benefits described in
this subsection. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a
carrier to offer individual coverage.

(1)
Maternity services that include, with no enrollee cost-sharing requirements
beyond those generally applicable cost sharing requirements and those cost
sharing requirements that apply to preexisting conditions: Diagnosis of
pregnancy; prenatal care; delivery; care for complications of pregnancy;
physician services; hospital services; operating or other special procedure
rooms; radiology and laboratory services; appropriate medications; anesthesia;
and services required under RCW 48.43.115; and

(2)
Prescription drug benefits with at least a two thousand dollar benefit payable
by the carrier annually.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 25. A
new section is added to chapter 48.46 RCW to read as follows:

Notwithstanding
the provisions of this chapter, a health maintenance organization may offer
catastrophic health plans as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec.
26. RCW
48.44.020 and 1990 c 120 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any health care service contractor may enter into contracts with or for the
benefit of persons or groups of persons which require prepayment for health
care services by or for such persons in consideration of such health care
service contractor providing one or more health care services to such persons
and such activity shall not be subject to the laws relating to insurance if the
health care services are rendered by the health care service contractor or by a
participating provider.

(2)
The commissioner may on examination, subject to the right of the health care
service contractor to demand and receive a hearing under chapters 48.04 and
34.05 RCW, disapprove any individual or group contract form for any of
the following grounds:

(a)
If it contains or incorporates by reference any inconsistent, ambiguous or
misleading clauses, or exceptions and conditions which unreasonably or deceptively
affect the risk purported to be assumed in the general coverage of the
contract; or

(b)
If it has any title, heading, or other indication of its provisions
which is misleading; or

(c)
If purchase of health care services thereunder is being solicited by deceptive
advertising; or

(d)
((If, the benefits provided therein are unreasonable in relation to the
amount charged for the contract;

(e))) If
it contains unreasonable restrictions on the treatment of patients; or

(((f)))
(e) If it violates any provision of this chapter; or

(((g)))
(f) If it fails to conform to minimum provisions or standards required
by regulation made by the commissioner pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW; or

(((h)))
(g) If any contract for health care services with any state agency,
division, subdivision, board, or commission or with any political
subdivision, municipal corporation, or quasi-municipal corporation fails to
comply with state law.

(3)
In addition to the grounds listed in subsection (2) of this section, the
commissioner may disapprove any group contract if the benefits provided therein
are unreasonable in relation to the amount charged for the contract.

(4)(a)
Every contract between a health care service contractor and a participating
provider of health care services shall be in writing and shall state that in
the event the health care service contractor fails to pay for health care
services as provided in the contract, the enrolled participant shall not be liable
to the provider for sums owed by the health care service contractor. Every
such contract shall provide that this requirement shall survive termination of
the contract.

(b)
No participating provider, agent, trustee, or assignee may maintain any
action against an enrolled participant to collect sums owed by the health care
service contractor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 27. A
new section is added to chapter 48.44 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.

(a)
"Incurred claims expense" means claims paid plus the change in claims
reserves and liabilities.

(b)
"Incurred health care expense" means claims paid plus the health care
costs incurred in the delivery of health care services plus the change in
claims reserves and liabilities.

(c)
"Loss ratio" means the ratio of incurred claims expense or incurred
health care expense to earned premium stated on a percentage basis.

(2)
A health care service contractor shall file, for informational purposes only, a
notice of its schedule of rates for its individual contracts with the
commissioner prior to use.

(3)
A health care service contractor shall file with the notice required under
subsection (2) of this section supporting documentation of its method of
determining the rates charged. The commissioner may request only the following
supporting documentation:

(a)
A description of the health care service contractor's rate-making methodology;

(b)
An actuarially determined estimate of incurred claims which includes the
experience data, assumptions, and justifications of the health care service
contractor's projection;

(c)
The percentage of premium attributable in aggregate for nonclaims expenses used
to determine the adjusted community rates charged; and

(d)
A certification by a member of the American academy of actuaries, or other
person acceptable to the commissioner, that the adjusted community rate charged
can be reasonably expected to result in a loss ratio that meets or exceeds the
loss ratio standard established in subsection (7) of this section.

(4)
The commissioner may not disapprove or otherwise impede the implementation of
the filed rates.

(5)
By the last day of May each year any health care service contractor providing
individual health benefit plans in this state shall file for review by the
commissioner supporting documentation of its actual loss ratio for its
individual health benefit plans offered in this state in aggregate for the
preceding calendar year. The filing shall include a certification by a member
of the American academy of actuaries, or other person acceptable to the
commissioner, that the actual loss ratio has been calculated in accordance with
accepted actuarial principles.

(a)
At the expiration of a thirty-day period commencing with the date the filing is
delivered to the commissioner, the filing shall be deemed approved unless prior
thereto the commissioner contests the calculation of the actual loss ratio.

(b)
If the commissioner contests the calculation of the actual loss ratio, the
commissioner shall state in writing the grounds for contesting the calculation
to the health care service contractor.

(c)
Any dispute regarding the calculation of the actual loss ratio shall upon
written demand of either the commissioner or the health care service contractor
be submitted to hearing under chapters 48.04 and 34.05 RCW.

(6)
If the actual loss ratio for the preceding calendar year is less than the loss
ratio established in subsection (7) of this section, refunds are due and the
following shall apply:

(a)
The health care service contractor shall calculate a percentage of premium to
be refunded to contract holders by subtracting the actual loss ratio for the
preceding year from the loss ratio established in subsection (7) of this
section.

(b)
The refund due to each individual contract holder is the percentage calculated
in (a) of this subsection, multiplied by the premium earned from each contract
holder in the previous calendar year. Interest shall be added to the refund
due at a five percent annual rate calculated from the end of the calendar year
for which refunds are due to the date the refunds are made.

(c)
Any refund due a contract holder in excess of ten dollars shall be mailed to
the contract holder at his or her last known mailing address or credited
against any premiums due.

(d)
All refunds equal to or less than ten dollars shall be aggregated and such
amounts shall be remitted to the Washington state high risk pool to be used as
directed by the pool board of directors.

(e)
Any refund required to be issued under this section shall be issued within
thirty days after the actual loss ratio is deemed approved under subsection
(5)(a) of this section or the determination by an administrative law judge
under subsection (5)(c) of this section.

(f)
Any refund issued by a health care service contractor to a contract holder
under this section that remains unclaimed by that contract holder one year from
the date it was issued shall be remitted to the Washington state high risk pool
to be used as directed by the pool board of directors. Health care service
contractors that comply with this subsection shall be relieved of liability for
any unclaimed refunds.

(7) The loss ratio applicable to this section shall be seventy-four
percent minus the premium tax rate applicable to the health care service
contractor's individual contracts under RCW 48.14.0201.

Sec.
28. RCW
48.44.022 and 1997 c 231 s 208 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(((a)
A health care service contractor offering any health benefit plan to any
individual shall offer and actively market to all individuals a health benefit
plan providing benefits identical to the schedule of covered health benefits
that are required to be delivered to an individual enrolled in the basic health
plan, subject to the provisions in RCW 48.43.025 and 48.43.035. Nothing in
this subsection shall preclude a contractor from offering, or an individual
from purchasing, other health benefit plans that may have more or less
comprehensive benefits than the basic health plan, provided such plans are in
accordance with this chapter. A contractor offering a health benefit plan that
does not include benefits provided in the basic health plan shall clearly
disclose these differences to the individual in a brochure approved by the
commissioner.

(b)
A health benefit plan shall provide coverage for hospital expenses and services
rendered by a physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not
subject to the requirements of RCW 48.44.225, 48.44.240, 48.44.245, 48.44.290,
48.44.300, 48.44.310, 48.44.320, 48.44.325, 48.44.330, 48.44.335, 48.44.340,
48.44.344, 48.44.360, 48.44.400, 48.44.440, 48.44.450, and 48.44.460 if the
health benefit plan is the mandatory offering under (a) of this subsection that
provides benefits identical to the basic health plan, to the extent these
requirements differ from the basic health plan.

(2)))
Premium rates for health benefit plans for individuals shall be subject to the
following provisions:

(a)
The health care service contractor shall develop its rates based on an adjusted
community rate and may only vary the adjusted community rate for:

(i)
Geographic area;

(ii)
Family size;

(iii)
Age;

(iv)
Tenure discounts; and

(v)
Wellness activities.

(b)
The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not use age brackets
smaller than five-year increments which shall begin with age twenty and end
with age sixty-five. Individuals under the age of twenty shall be treated as
those age twenty.

(c)
The health care service contractor shall be permitted to develop separate rates
for individuals age sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare is the
primary payer and coverage for which medicare is not the primary payer. Both
rates shall be subject to the requirements of this subsection.

(d)
The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than four hundred
twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups on January 1, 1996,
four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three hundred seventy-five percent
on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.

(e)
A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to reflect actuarially justified
differences in utilization or cost attributed to such programs not to exceed
twenty percent.

(f)
The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this section may not
be adjusted more frequently than annually except that the premium may be
changed to reflect:

(i)
Changes to the family composition;

(ii)
Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the individual; or

(iii)
Changes in government requirements affecting the health benefit plan.

(g)
For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that contains a
restricted network provision shall not be considered similar coverage to a
health benefit plan that does not contain such a provision, provided that the
restrictions of benefits to network providers result in substantial differences
in claims costs. This subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability
of benefits as provided in RCW 48.43.015.

(h)
A tenure discount for continuous enrollment in the health plan of two years or
more may be offered, not to exceed ten percent.

(((3)))
(2) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall pool
the medical experience of all individuals purchasing coverage, and shall not be
required to be pooled with the medical experience of health benefit plans
offered to small employers under RCW 48.44.023.

(((4)))
(3) As used in this section and RCW 48.44.023 "health benefit
plan," "small employer," (("basic health plan,"))
"adjusted community rates," and "wellness activities" mean the
same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec.
29. RCW
48.46.060 and 1989 c 10 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any health maintenance organization may enter into agreements with or for the
benefit of persons or groups of persons, which require prepayment for health
care services by or for such persons in consideration of the health maintenance
organization providing health care services to such persons. Such activity is
not subject to the laws relating to insurance if the health care services are
rendered directly by the health maintenance organization or by any provider
which has a contract or other arrangement with the health maintenance
organization to render health services to enrolled participants.

(2)
All forms of health maintenance agreements issued by the organization to
enrolled participants or other marketing documents purporting to describe the
organization's comprehensive health care services shall comply with such
minimum standards as the commissioner deems reasonable and necessary in order
to carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter, and which fully
inform enrolled participants of the health care services to which they are
entitled, including any limitations or exclusions thereof, and such other
rights, responsibilities and duties required of the contracting health
maintenance organization.

(3)
Subject to the right of the health maintenance organization to demand and
receive a hearing under chapters 48.04 and 34.05 RCW, the commissioner may disapprove
an individual or group agreement form for any of the following grounds:

(a)
If it contains or incorporates by reference any inconsistent, ambiguous, or
misleading clauses, or exceptions or conditions which unreasonably or
deceptively affect the risk purported to be assumed in the general coverage of
the agreement;

(b)
If it has any title, heading, or other indication which is misleading;

(c)
If purchase of health care services thereunder is being solicited by deceptive
advertising;

(d)
((If the benefits provided therein are unreasonable in relation to the
amount charged for the agreement;

(e))) If
it contains unreasonable restrictions on the treatment of patients;

(((f)))
(e) If it is in any respect in violation of this chapter or if it fails
to conform to minimum provisions or standards required by the commissioner by
rule under chapter 34.05 RCW; or

(((g)))
(f) If any agreement for health care services with any state agency,
division, subdivision, board, or commission or with any political
subdivision, municipal corporation, or quasi-municipal corporation fails to
comply with state law.

(4)
In addition to the grounds listed in subsection (2) of this section, the
commissioner may disapprove any group agreement if the benefits provided
therein are unreasonable in relation to the amount charged for the agreement.

(5)
No health maintenance organization authorized under this chapter shall cancel
or fail to renew the enrollment on any basis of an enrolled participant or
refuse to transfer an enrolled participant from a group to an individual basis
for reasons relating solely to age, sex, race, or health status((: PROVIDED
HOWEVER, That)). Nothing contained herein shall prevent
cancellation of an agreement with enrolled participants (a) who violate any
published policies of the organization which have been approved by the
commissioner, or (b) who are entitled to become eligible for medicare benefits
and fail to enroll for a medicare supplement plan offered by the health
maintenance organization and approved by the commissioner, or (c) for failure
of such enrolled participant to pay the approved charge, including
cost-sharing, required under such contract, or (d) for a material breach of the
health maintenance agreement.

(((5)))
(6) No agreement form or amendment to an approved agreement form shall
be used unless it is first filed with the commissioner.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 30. A
new section is added to chapter 48.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.

(a)
"Incurred claims expense" means claims paid plus the change in claims
reserves and liabilities.

(b)
"Incurred health care expense" means claims paid plus the health care
costs incurred in the delivery of health care services plus the change in
claims reserves and liabilities.

(c)
"Loss ratio" means the ratio of incurred claims expense or incurred
health care expense to earned premium stated on a percentage basis.

(2)
A health maintenance organization shall file, for informational purposes only,
a notice of its schedule of rates for its individual agreements with the
commissioner prior to use.

(3)
A health maintenance organization shall file with the notice required under
subsection (2) of this section supporting documentation of its method of
determining the rates charged. The commissioner may request only the following
supporting documentation:

(a)
A description of the health maintenance organization's rate-making methodology;

(b)
An actuarially determined estimate of incurred claims which includes the
experience data, assumptions, and justifications of the health maintenance
organization's projection;

(c)
The percentage of premium attributable in aggregate for nonclaims expenses used
to determine the adjusted community rates charged; and

(d)
A certification by a member of the American academy of actuaries, or other
person acceptable to the commissioner, that the adjusted community rate charged
can be reasonably expected to result in a loss ratio that meets or exceeds the
loss ratio standard established in subsection (7) of this section.

(4)
The commissioner may not disapprove or otherwise impede the implementation of
the filed rates.

(5)
By the last day of May each year any health maintenance organization providing
individual health benefit plans in this state shall file for review by the
commissioner supporting documentation of its actual loss ratio for its
individual health benefit plans offered in the state in aggregate for the
preceding calendar year. The filing shall include a certification by a member
of the American academy of actuaries, or other person acceptable to the
commissioner, that the actual loss ratio has been calculated in accordance with
accepted actuarial principles.

(a)
At the expiration of a thirty-day period commencing with the date the filing is
delivered to the commissioner, the filing shall be deemed approved unless prior
thereto the commissioner contests the calculation of the actual loss ratio.

(b)
If the commissioner contests the calculation of the actual loss ratio, the
commissioner shall state in writing the grounds for contesting the calculation
to the health maintenance organization.

(c)
Any dispute regarding the calculation of the actual loss ratio shall, upon
written demand of either the commissioner or the health maintenance
organization, be submitted to hearing under chapters 48.04 and 34.05 RCW.

(6)
If the actual loss ratio for the preceding calendar year is less than the loss
ratio established in subsection (7) of this section, refunds are due and the
following shall apply:

(a)
The health maintenance organization shall calculate a percentage of premium to
be refunded to enrollees by subtracting the actual loss ratio for the preceding
year from the loss ratio established in subsection (7) of this section.

(b)
The refund due to each enrollee is the percentage calculated in (a) of this
subsection, multiplied by the premium earned from each enrollee in the previous
calendar year. Interest shall be added to the refund due at a five percent
annual rate calculated from the end of the calendar year for which refunds are
due to the date the refunds are made.

(c)
Any refund due an enrollee in excess of ten dollars shall be mailed to the
enrollee at his or her last known mailing address or credited against any
premiums due.

(d)
All refunds equal to or less than ten dollars shall be aggregated and such
amounts shall be remitted to the Washington state high risk pool to be used as
directed by the pool board of directors.

(e)
Any refund required to be issued under this section shall be issued within
thirty days after the actual loss ratio is deemed approved under subsection
(5)(a) of this section or the determination by an administrative law judge
under subsection (5)(c) of this section.

(f)
Any refund issued by a health maintenance organization to an enrollee under
this section that remains unclaimed by that enrollee one year from the date it
was issued shall be remitted to the Washington state high risk pool to be used
as directed by the pool board of directors. Health maintenance organizations
that comply with this subsection shall be relieved of liability for any unclaimed
refunds.

(7)
The loss ratio applicable to this section shall be seventy-four percent minus
the premium tax rate applicable to the health maintenance organization's
individual contracts under RCW 48.14.0201.

Sec.
31. RCW
48.46.064 and 1997 c 231 s 209 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(((a)
A health maintenance organization offering any health benefit plan to any
individual shall offer and actively market to all individuals a health benefit
plan providing benefits identical to the schedule of covered health benefits
that are required to be delivered to an individual enrolled in the basic health
plan, subject to the provisions in RCW 48.43.025 and 48.43.035. Nothing in
this subsection shall preclude a health maintenance organization from offering,
or an individual from purchasing, other health benefit plans that may have more
or less comprehensive benefits than the basic health plan, provided such plans
are in accordance with this chapter. A health maintenance organization
offering a health benefit plan that does not include benefits provided in the
basic health plan shall clearly disclose these differences to the individual in
a brochure approved by the commissioner.

(b)
A health benefit plan shall provide coverage for hospital expenses and services
rendered by a physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW but is not
subject to the requirements of RCW 48.46.275, 48.46.280, 48.46.285, 48.46.290,
48.46.350, 48.46.355, 48.46.375, 48.46.440, 48.46.480, 48.46.510, 48.46.520,
and 48.46.530 if the health benefit plan is the mandatory offering under (a) of
this subsection that provides benefits identical to the basic health plan, to
the extent these requirements differ from the basic health plan.

(2)))
Premium rates for health benefit plans for individuals shall be subject to the
following provisions:

(a)
The health maintenance organization shall develop its rates based on an
adjusted community rate and may only vary the adjusted community rate for:

(i)
Geographic area;

(ii)
Family size;

(iii)
Age;

(iv)
Tenure discounts; and

(v)
Wellness activities.

(b)
The adjustment for age in (a)(iii) of this subsection may not use age brackets
smaller than five-year increments which shall begin with age twenty and end
with age sixty-five. Individuals under the age of twenty shall be treated as
those age twenty.

(c)
The health maintenance organization shall be permitted to develop separate
rates for individuals age sixty-five or older for coverage for which medicare
is the primary payer and coverage for which medicare is not the primary payer.
Both rates shall be subject to the requirements of this subsection.

(d)
The permitted rates for any age group shall be no more than four hundred
twenty-five percent of the lowest rate for all age groups on January 1, 1996,
four hundred percent on January 1, 1997, and three hundred seventy-five percent
on January 1, 2000, and thereafter.

(e)
A discount for wellness activities shall be permitted to reflect actuarially
justified differences in utilization or cost attributed to such programs not to
exceed twenty percent.

(f)
The rate charged for a health benefit plan offered under this section may not
be adjusted more frequently than annually except that the premium may be
changed to reflect:

(i)
Changes to the family composition;

(ii)
Changes to the health benefit plan requested by the individual; or

(iii)
Changes in government requirements affecting the health benefit plan.

(g)
For the purposes of this section, a health benefit plan that contains a
restricted network provision shall not be considered similar coverage to a
health benefit plan that does not contain such a provision, provided that the
restrictions of benefits to network providers result in substantial differences
in claims costs. This subsection does not restrict or enhance the portability
of benefits as provided in RCW 48.43.015.

(h)
A tenure discount for continuous enrollment in the health plan of two years or
more may be offered, not to exceed ten percent.

(((3)))
(2) Adjusted community rates established under this section shall pool
the medical experience of all individuals purchasing coverage, and shall not be
required to be pooled with the medical experience of health benefit plans
offered to small employers under RCW 48.46.066.

(((4)))
(3) As used in this section and RCW 48.46.066, "health benefit
plan," (("basic health plan,")) "adjusted community
rate," "small employer," and "wellness activities"
mean the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

Sec.
32. RCW
70.47.060 and 1998 c 314 s 17 and 1998 c 148 s 1 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

The
administrator has the following powers and duties:

(1)
To design and from time to time revise a schedule of covered basic health care
services, including physician services, inpatient and outpatient hospital
services, prescription drugs and medications, and other services that may be
necessary for basic health care. In addition, the administrator may, to the
extent that funds are available, offer as basic health plan services chemical
dependency services, mental health services and organ transplant services;
however, no one service or any combination of these three services shall increase
the actuarial value of the basic health plan benefits by more than five percent
excluding inflation, as determined by the office of financial management. All
subsidized and nonsubsidized enrollees in any participating managed health care
system under the Washington basic health plan shall be entitled to receive
covered basic health care services in return for premium payments to the plan.
The schedule of services shall emphasize proven preventive and primary health
care and shall include all services necessary for prenatal, postnatal, and
well-child care. However, with respect to coverage for groups of subsidized
enrollees who are eligible to receive prenatal and postnatal services through
the medical assistance program under chapter 74.09 RCW, the administrator shall
not contract for such services except to the extent that such services are
necessary over not more than a one-month period in order to maintain continuity
of care after diagnosis of pregnancy by the managed care provider. The
schedule of services shall also include a separate schedule of basic health
care services for children, eighteen years of age and younger, for those
subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollees who choose to secure basic coverage
through the plan only for their dependent children. In designing and revising
the schedule of services, the administrator shall consider the guidelines for
assessing health services under the mandated benefits act of 1984, RCW
48.47.030, and such other factors as the administrator deems appropriate.

However,
with respect to coverage for subsidized enrollees who are eligible to receive
prenatal and postnatal services through the medical assistance program under
chapter 74.09 RCW, the administrator shall not contract for such services
except to the extent that the services are necessary over not more than a
one-month period in order to maintain continuity of care after diagnosis of
pregnancy by the managed care provider.

(2)(a)
To design and implement a structure of periodic premiums due the administrator
from subsidized enrollees that is based upon gross family income, giving
appropriate consideration to family size and the ages of all family members.
The enrollment of children shall not require the enrollment of their parent or
parents who are eligible for the plan. The structure of periodic premiums
shall be applied to subsidized enrollees entering the plan as individuals
pursuant to subsection (9) of this section and to the share of the cost of the
plan due from subsidized enrollees entering the plan as employees pursuant to
subsection (10) of this section.

(b)
To determine the periodic premiums due the administrator from nonsubsidized
enrollees. Premiums due from nonsubsidized enrollees shall be in an amount
equal to the cost charged by the managed health care system provider to the
state for the plan plus the administrative cost of providing the plan to those
enrollees and the premium tax under RCW 48.14.0201.

(c)
An employer or other financial sponsor may, with the prior approval of the
administrator, pay the premium, rate, or any other amount on behalf of a
subsidized or nonsubsidized enrollee, by arrangement with the enrollee and
through a mechanism acceptable to the administrator.

(d)
To develop, as an offering by every health carrier providing coverage identical
to the basic health plan, as configured on January 1, 1996, a basic health plan
model plan with uniformity in enrollee cost-sharing requirements.

(3)
To design and implement a structure of enrollee cost sharing due a managed
health care system from subsidized and nonsubsidized enrollees. The structure
shall discourage inappropriate enrollee utilization of health care services,
and may utilize copayments, deductibles, and other cost-sharing mechanisms, but
shall not be so costly to enrollees as to constitute a barrier to appropriate
utilization of necessary health care services.

(4)
To limit enrollment of persons who qualify for subsidies so as to prevent an
overexpenditure of appropriations for such purposes. Whenever the
administrator finds that there is danger of such an overexpenditure, the
administrator shall close enrollment until the administrator finds the danger
no longer exists.

(5)
To limit the payment of subsidies to subsidized enrollees, as defined in RCW
70.47.020. The level of subsidy provided to persons who qualify may be based
on the lowest cost plans, as defined by the administrator.

(6)
To adopt a schedule for the orderly development of the delivery of services and
availability of the plan to residents of the state, subject to the limitations
contained in RCW 70.47.080 or any act appropriating funds for the plan.

(7)
To solicit and accept applications from managed health care systems, as defined
in this chapter, for inclusion as eligible basic health care providers under
the plan for either subsidized enrollees, or nonsubsidized enrollees, or
both. The administrator shall endeavor to assure that covered basic health
care services are available to any enrollee of the plan from among a selection
of two or more participating managed health care systems. In adopting any
rules or procedures applicable to managed health care systems and in its
dealings with such systems, the administrator shall consider and make suitable
allowance for the need for health care services and the differences in local
availability of health care resources, along with other resources, within and
among the several areas of the state. Contracts with participating managed
health care systems shall ensure that basic health plan enrollees who become
eligible for medical assistance may, at their option, continue to receive
services from their existing providers within the managed health care system if
such providers have entered into provider agreements with the department of
social and health services.

(8)
To receive periodic premiums from or on behalf of subsidized and nonsubsidized
enrollees, deposit them in the basic health plan operating account, keep
records of enrollee status, and authorize periodic payments to managed health
care systems on the basis of the number of enrollees participating in the
respective managed health care systems.

(9)
To accept applications from individuals residing in areas served by the plan,
on behalf of themselves and their spouses and dependent children, for
enrollment in the Washington basic health plan as subsidized or nonsubsidized
enrollees, to establish appropriate minimum-enrollment periods for enrollees as
may be necessary, and to determine, upon application and on a reasonable
schedule defined by the authority, or at the request of any enrollee,
eligibility due to current gross family income for sliding scale premiums.
Funds received by a family as part of participation in the adoption support
program authorized under RCW 26.33.320 and 74.13.100 through 74.13.145 shall
not be counted toward a family's current gross family income for the purposes
of this chapter. When an enrollee fails to report income or income changes
accurately, the administrator shall have the authority either to bill the
enrollee for the amounts overpaid by the state or to impose civil penalties of
up to two hundred percent of the amount of subsidy overpaid due to the enrollee
incorrectly reporting income. The administrator shall adopt rules to define
the appropriate application of these sanctions and the processes to implement
the sanctions provided in this subsection, within available resources. No
subsidy may be paid with respect to any enrollee whose current gross family
income exceeds twice the federal poverty level or, subject to RCW 70.47.110,
who is a recipient of medical assistance or medical care services under chapter
74.09 RCW. If a number of enrollees drop their enrollment for no apparent good
cause, the administrator may establish appropriate rules or requirements that
are applicable to such individuals before they will be allowed to reenroll in
the plan.

(10)
To accept applications from business owners on behalf of themselves and their
employees, spouses, and dependent children, as subsidized or nonsubsidized
enrollees, who reside in an area served by the plan. The administrator may
require all or the substantial majority of the eligible employees of such
businesses to enroll in the plan and establish those procedures necessary to
facilitate the orderly enrollment of groups in the plan and into a managed
health care system. The administrator may require that a business owner pay at
least an amount equal to what the employee pays after the state pays its
portion of the subsidized premium cost of the plan on behalf of each employee
enrolled in the plan. Enrollment is limited to those not eligible for medicare
who wish to enroll in the plan and choose to obtain the basic health care
coverage and services from a managed care system participating in the plan.
The administrator shall adjust the amount determined to be due on behalf of or
from all such enrollees whenever the amount negotiated by the administrator
with the participating managed health care system or systems is modified or the
administrative cost of providing the plan to such enrollees changes.

(11)
To determine the rate to be paid to each participating managed health care
system in return for the provision of covered basic health care services to
enrollees in the system. Although the schedule of covered basic health care
services will be the same for similar enrollees, the rates negotiated with
participating managed health care systems may vary among the systems. In
negotiating rates with participating systems, the administrator shall consider
the characteristics of the populations served by the respective systems,
economic circumstances of the local area, the need to conserve the resources of
the basic health plan trust account, and other factors the administrator finds
relevant.

(12)
To monitor the provision of covered services to enrollees by participating
managed health care systems in order to assure enrollee access to good quality
basic health care, to require periodic data reports concerning the utilization
of health care services rendered to enrollees in order to provide adequate
information for evaluation, and to inspect the books and records of
participating managed health care systems to assure compliance with the purposes
of this chapter. In requiring reports from participating managed health care
systems, including data on services rendered enrollees, the administrator shall
endeavor to minimize costs, both to the managed health care systems and to the
plan. The administrator shall coordinate any such reporting requirements with
other state agencies, such as the insurance commissioner and the department of
health, to minimize duplication of effort.

(13)
To evaluate the effects this chapter has on private employer-based health care
coverage and to take appropriate measures consistent with state and federal
statutes that will discourage the reduction of such coverage in the state.

(14)
To develop a program of proven preventive health measures and to integrate it
into the plan wherever possible and consistent with this chapter.

(15)
To provide, consistent with available funding, assistance for rural residents,
underserved populations, and persons of color.

(16)
In consultation with appropriate state and local government agencies, to
establish criteria defining eligibility for persons confined or residing in
government-operated institutions.

Sec.
33. RCW
70.47.100 and 1987 1st ex.s. c 5 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A managed health care ((systems)) system participating in the
plan shall do so by contract with the administrator and shall provide, directly
or by contract with other health care providers, covered basic health care
services to each enrollee covered by its contract with the administrator
as long as payments from the administrator on behalf of the enrollee are
current. A participating managed health care system may offer, without
additional cost, health care benefits or services not included in the schedule
of covered services under the plan. A participating managed health care system
shall not give preference in enrollment to enrollees who accept such additional
health care benefits or services. Managed health care systems participating in
the plan shall not discriminate against any potential or current enrollee based
upon health status, sex, race, ethnicity, or religion. The administrator may
receive and act upon complaints from enrollees regarding failure to provide
covered services or efforts to obtain payment, other than authorized
copayments, for covered services directly from enrollees, but nothing in this
chapter empowers the administrator to impose any sanctions under Title 18 RCW
or any other professional or facility licensing statute.

(2)
The plan shall allow, at least annually, an opportunity for enrollees to
transfer their enrollments among participating managed health care systems
serving their respective areas. The administrator shall establish a period of
at least twenty days in a given year when this opportunity is afforded
enrollees, and in those areas served by more than one participating managed
health care system the administrator shall endeavor to establish a uniform
period for such opportunity. The plan shall allow enrollees to transfer their
enrollment to another participating managed health care system at any time upon
a showing of good cause for the transfer.

((Any
contract between a hospital and a participating managed health care system
under this chapter is subject to the requirements of RCW 70.39.140(1) regarding
negotiated rates.))

(3)
Prior to negotiating with any managed health care system, the administrator
shall determine, on an actuarially sound basis, the reasonable cost of
providing the schedule of basic health care services, expressed in terms of
upper and lower limits, and recognizing variations in the cost of providing the
services through the various systems and in different areas of the state.

(4)
In negotiating with managed health care systems for participation in the plan,
the administrator shall adopt a uniform procedure that includes at least the
following:

(((1)))
(a) The administrator shall issue a request for proposals, including
standards regarding the quality of services to be provided; financial integrity
of the responding systems; and responsiveness to the unmet health care needs of
the local communities or populations that may be served;

(((2)))
(b) The administrator shall then review responsive proposals and may
negotiate with respondents to the extent necessary to refine any proposals;

(((3)))
(c) The administrator may then select one or more systems to provide the
covered services within a local area; and

(((4)))
(d) The administrator may adopt a policy that gives preference to
respondents, such as nonprofit community health clinics, that have a history of
providing quality health care services to low-income persons.

(5)
The administrator may contract with a managed health care system to provide
covered basic health care services to either subsidized enrollees, or
nonsubsidized enrollees, or both.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 34. A
new section is added to chapter 48.41 RCW to read as follows:

The
Washington state health insurance pool account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. All receipts from moneys specifically appropriated to the
account must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be
used only to cover deficits incurred by the Washington state health insurance
pool under this chapter in excess of the threshold established in this
section. To the extent funds are available in the account, funds shall be
expended from the account only to offset that portion of the deficit that would
otherwise have to be recovered by imposing an assessment on members in excess
of a threshold of seventy cents per insured person per month. The commissioner
shall authorize expenditures from the account, to the extent that funds are
available in the account, upon certification by the pool board that assessments
will exceed the threshold level established in this section. The account is
subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an
appropriation is not required for expenditures.

Sec.
35. RCW
43.84.092 and 1997 c 218 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations
shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4)
of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local
leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the
local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system plan
2 account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource management cost
account, the site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account,
the state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system plan 2
account, the transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust
fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of
Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension
principal account, the volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension
administrative account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1
retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington state health insurance pool
account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington
State University building account, the Washington State University bond
retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western
Washington University capital projects account. Earnings derived from
investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent
fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their
respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the central Puget Sound public transportation account, the city
hardship assistance account, the county arterial preservation account, the
department of licensing services account, the economic development account, the
essential rail assistance account, the essential rail banking account, the
ferry bond retirement fund, the gasohol exemption holding account, the grade
crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account, the highway
bond retirement fund, the highway construction stabilization account, the
highway safety account, the marine operating fund, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the small city
account, the special category C account, the state patrol highway account, the
transfer relief account, the transportation capital facilities account, the
transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation
improvement account, the transportation revolving loan account, and the urban arterial
trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

Sec.
36. RCW
43.84.092 and 1998 c 341 s 708 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations
shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4)
of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local
leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the
local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system plan 2 account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource
management cost account, the site closure account, the special wildlife
account, the state employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance
reserve account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment
board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the
teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system
combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the transportation infrastructure account,
the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement
fund, the University of Washington building account, the volunteer fire
fighters' relief and pension principal account, the volunteer fire fighters'
relief and pension administrative account, the Washington judicial retirement
system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and
fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state health
insurance pool account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the
Washington State University building account, the Washington State University
bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings derived from
investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent
fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their
respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's
service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the central Puget Sound public transportation account, the city
hardship assistance account, the county arterial preservation account, the
department of licensing services account, the economic development account, the
essential rail assistance account, the essential rail banking account, the
ferry bond retirement fund, the gasohol exemption holding account, the grade
crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account, the highway
bond retirement fund, the highway construction stabilization account, the
highway safety account, the marine operating fund, the motor vehicle fund, the
motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage account, the public
transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account,
the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the
rural arterial trust account, the safety and education account, the small city
account, the special category C account, the state patrol highway account, the
transfer relief account, the transportation capital facilities account, the
transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation
improvement account, the transportation revolving loan account, and the urban
arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 37. A
new section is added to chapter 48.01 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Nothing in this title shall be construed to require a carrier, as defined in
RCW 48.43.005, to offer any health benefit plan for sale or to prohibit a
carrier from ceasing sale of any or all health benefit plans to new enrollees.

(2)
This section is intended to clarify, and not modify, existing law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 38. (1)
The task force on health care reinsurance is created, and is composed of seven
members, including: Three members appointed by the governor, one of whom shall
be the chair of the Washington state health insurance pool; two members of the
senate, one member of each party caucus appointed by the president of the
senate; and two members of the house of representatives, one member of each
party caucus appointed by the co-speakers of the house of representatives. The
chair shall be elected by the task force from among its members.

(2)
The task force shall:

(a)
Monitor the provisions of this act regarding its effect on:

(i)
Carrier participation in the individual market, especially in areas where
coverage is currently minimal;

(ii)
Affordability and availability of private health plan coverage;

(iii)
Washington state health insurance pool operations; and

(iv)
The Washington basic health plan operations;

(b)
After studying the feasibility of reinsurance as a method of health insurance
market stability, develop a reinsurance system implementation plan as
appropriate; and

(c)
Seek participation from interested parties, including but not limited to
consumer, carriers, health care providers, health care purchasers, and
insurance brokers and agents, in an effective manner.

(3)
In the conduct of its business, the task force shall have access to all health
data available by statute to health-related state agencies and may, to the
extent that funds are available, purchase necessary analytical and staff
support.

(4)
Task force members will receive no compensation for their service.

(5)
The task force shall submit an interim report to the governor and the
legislature in January 2000 and a final report no later than December 1, 2000.

(6)
The task force expires December 31, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 39. (1)
The sum of seventy-five thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the
general fund to the task force on health care reinsurance created in section 38
of this act.

(2)
The sum of fifty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the general fund to
the task force on health care reinsurance created in section 38 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 40. This
act expires January 1, 2004.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 41. RCW
48.41.180 (Offer of coverage to eligible persons) and 1987 c 431
s 18 are each repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 42. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 43. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---