BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.52.0531 and 1997 c 259 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as provided in subsection (5) of this section for one-year levies for school
nurse programs, the maximum dollar amount which may be levied by or for any
school district for maintenance and operation support under the provisions of
RCW 84.52.053 shall be determined as follows:

(1)
For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1997, the maximum dollar
amount shall be calculated pursuant to the laws and rules in effect in November
1996.

(2)
For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and thereafter, the
maximum dollar amount shall be the sum of (a) plus or minus (b) and (c) of this
subsection minus (d) of this subsection:

(a)
The district's levy base as defined in subsection (3) of this section
multiplied by the district's maximum levy percentage as defined in subsection
(4) of this section;

(b)
For districts in a high/nonhigh relationship, the high school district's
maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the nonhigh school district's maximum
levy amount shall be increased by an amount equal to the estimated amount of
the nonhigh payment due to the high school district under RCW 28A.545.030(3)
and 28A.545.050 for the school year commencing the year of the levy;

(c)
For districts in an interdistrict cooperative agreement, the nonresident school
district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced and the resident school
district's maximum levy amount shall be increased by an amount equal to the per
pupil basic education allocation included in the nonresident district's levy
base under subsection (3) of this section multiplied by:

(i)
The number of full-time equivalent students served from the resident district
in the prior school year; multiplied by:

(ii)
The serving district's maximum levy percentage determined under subsection (4)
of this section; increased by:

(iii)
The percent increase per full-time equivalent student as stated in the state
basic education appropriation section of the biennial budget between the prior
school year and the current school year divided by fifty-five percent;

(d)
The district's maximum levy amount shall be reduced by the maximum amount of
state matching funds for which the district is eligible under RCW 28A.500.010.

(3)
For excess levies for collection in calendar year 1998 and thereafter, a
district's levy base shall be the sum of allocations in (a) through (c) of this
subsection received by the district for the prior school year, including
allocations for compensation increases, plus the sum of such allocations
multiplied by the percent increase per full time equivalent student as stated
in the state basic education appropriation section of the biennial budget
between the prior school year and the current school year and divided by
fifty-five percent. A district's levy base shall not include local school district
property tax levies or other local revenues, or state and federal allocations
not identified in (a) through (c) of this subsection.

(a)
The district's basic education allocation as determined pursuant to RCW
28A.150.250, 28A.150.260, and 28A.150.350;

(b)
State and federal categorical allocations for the following programs:

(i)
Pupil transportation;

(ii)
Special education;

(iii)
Education of highly capable students;

(iv)
Compensatory education, including but not limited to learning assistance, migrant
education, Indian education, refugee programs, and bilingual education;

(v)
Food services; and

(vi)
State-wide block grant programs; and

(c)
Any other federal allocations for elementary and secondary school programs,
including direct grants, other than federal impact aid funds and allocations in
lieu of taxes.

(4)
A district's maximum levy percentage shall be twenty-two percent in 1998 and
twenty-four percent in 1999 and every year thereafter; plus, for qualifying
districts, the grandfathered percentage determined as follows:

(a)
For 1997, the difference between the district's 1993 maximum levy percentage
and twenty percent; and

(b)
For 1998 and thereafter, the percentage calculated as follows:

(i)
Multiply the grandfathered percentage for the prior year times the district's
levy base determined under subsection (3) of this section;

(ii)
Reduce the result of (b)(i) of this subsection by any levy reduction funds as
defined in subsection (((5))) (6) of this section that are to be
allocated to the district for the current school year;

(iii)
Divide the result of (b)(ii) of this subsection by the district's levy base;
and

(iv)
Take the greater of zero or the percentage calculated in (b)(iii) of this
subsection.

(5)
In accordance with RCW 84.52.053, an additional one-year levy may be imposed
to support school nurse programs in an amount necessary to provide one school
nurse for every two thousand full-time equivalent students in the school
district.

(6)
"Levy reduction funds" shall mean increases in state funds from the
prior school year for programs included under subsection (3) of this section:
(a) That are not attributable to enrollment changes, compensation increases, or
inflationary adjustments; and (b) that are or were specifically identified as
levy reduction funds in the appropriations act. If levy reduction funds are
dependent on formula factors which would not be finalized until after the start
of the current school year, the superintendent of public instruction shall
estimate the total amount of levy reduction funds by using prior school year
data in place of current school year data. Levy reduction funds shall not
include moneys received by school districts from cities or counties.

(((6)))
(7) For the purposes of this section, "prior school year"
means the most recent school year completed prior to the year in which the
levies are to be collected.

(((7)))
(8) For the purposes of this section, "current school year"
means the year immediately following the prior school year.

(((8)))
(9) Funds collected from transportation vehicle fund tax levies shall
not be subject to the levy limitations in this section.

(((9))) (10) The superintendent of public instruction
shall develop rules and regulations and inform school districts of the
pertinent data necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

---
END ---