BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
Access to modern telecommunication facilities and services is essential to the
economic and educational well-being of all persons and entities, in both rural
and urban areas.

(2)
Many persons and entities, particularly in rural areas, do not have adequate
access to modern telecommunication facilities and services.

(3)
Public utility districts are well-positioned to provide modern telecommunication
facilities and services in a cost-effective manner, particularly in rural
areas, because of existing rights-of-ways, infrastructure ownership, experience
delivering utility services, and economies of scale achieved by fully utilizing
utility telecommunication systems.

(4)
Provision of telecommunication facilities and services by public utility
districts will stimulate competition among telecommunication providers, to the
benefit of all telecommunication consumers and users.

(5)
Economic development and educational opportunities, particularly in rural
areas, will be increased by public utility districts providing cost-effective
telecommunication facilities and services, thus reducing the economic and
educational disparity between rural and urban areas.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 54.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A public utility district may construct, purchase, acquire, develop, finance,
lease, license, handle, provide, add to, alter, improve, repair, operate, and
maintain any telecommunication facilities and related equipment, within or
without the district's limits, with capacity sufficient not only for its own
use, but also for use by any other person or entity, whether public or private,
within or without the district's limits, for any purpose, without limitation as
to quantity or capacity, with full and exclusive authority to regulate and
control the use and price thereof, free from the jurisdiction and control of
the utilities and transportation commission. A public utility district has
full discretion to classify the uses and availability of such facilities and
equipment on any reasonable ground and the rates charged shall be uniform for
the same class of customers. Any person or entity seeking to sell
telecommunication services shall, for such purpose, have reasonable and
nondiscriminatory access to a public utility district's telecommunication
facilities, at rates set by the district, provided that such a person or entity
shall allow the district equivalent access to the telecommunication facilities
of such a person or entity. No telecommunication facilities owned by any other
person or entity shall be acquired by a public utility district through the
power of eminent domain.

(2)
A public utility district may sell, lease, license, handle, finance, and
provide any telecommunication services and related equipment, including but not
limited to internet, television, videoconferencing, multimedia transmissions,
security monitoring, and other products, to any person or entity, whether
public or private, within or without the district's limits, for any purpose,
without limitation as to quantity or capacity, with full and exclusive
authority to regulate and control the price thereof, free from the jurisdiction
and control of the utilities and transportation commission. However, a
majority of the voters of the district voting, or a majority of the voters of a
defined portion of the district voting if the telecommunication services are to
be provided to only that portion of the district, shall first approve a ballot
proposition authorizing the district to provide telecommunication services.

(3)
The commission of a public utility district by resolution may submit to the
voters of the district, or the voters of a defined portion of the district if
the telecommunication services are to be provided to only that portion of the
district, for their approval or rejection the proposal that the public utility
district be authorized to exercise the powers set forth in subsection (2) of
this section. The legislative authority of the county in which the public
utility district is located, upon receipt of the resolution of the public
utility district commission, shall submit such a proposal to the voters of the
district, or the voters of a defined portion of a district as provided in this
section, at the next general election in substantially the following terms:

Shall Public Utility District No. . . . .
of . . . . . . . . .

County be authorized to sell and provide
telecommunication services?

Yes
. . .

No
. . .

Within
ten days after such an election, the election board of the county shall canvass
the returns, and if at such an election a majority of voters voting on the
proposition shall vote in favor of such authority, the district shall have the
powers set forth in subsection (2) of this section.

(4)
Except as otherwise specifically provided, in carrying out the powers
authorized under this section, a public utility district may exercise any of
the powers granted to it with respect to electrical energy, water, and sewage
under this title and other applicable law.

(5) Nothing contained in this section shall diminish, change, or
alter the existing authority of public utility districts.

---
END ---