BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 44.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature recognizes the need to provide a means for interim appointments
in the case of mental or physical incapacities that render any member of the
legislature temporarily unable to perform his or her legislative duties.

(2)
Whenever a member of the legislature transmits to the appropriate office, the
secretary of the senate in the case of a senator or the chief clerk of the
house of representatives in the case of a representative, his or her written
declaration that he or she is unable to discharge the powers and duties of his
or her office and until he or she transmits to the secretary of the senate or
to the chief clerk of the house of representatives, as appropriate, a written
declaration to the contrary, such powers and duties shall be discharged by an
interim appointee.

(3)
The interim appointment shall be made in the manner set forth in Article II,
section 15, of the state Constitution.

(4) If the position becomes vacant due to death or resignation of
the member, or removal of the member pursuant to RCW 42.12.010, then the
interim appointee shall immediately relinquish the position, and the vacancy
shall be filled in the manner set forth in Article II, section 15 of the state
Constitution.

---
END ---