BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
4.96.041 and 1993 c 449 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever an action or proceeding for damages is brought against any past or
present officer, employee, or volunteer of a local governmental entity of this
state, arising from acts or omissions while performing or in good faith
purporting to perform his or her official duties, such officer, employee, or
volunteer may request the local governmental entity to authorize the defense of
the action or proceeding at the expense of the local governmental entity.

(2)
If the legislative authority of the local governmental entity, or the local
governmental entity using a procedure created by ordinance or resolution, finds
that the acts or omissions of the officer, employee, or volunteer were, or in
good faith purported to be, within the scope of his or her official duties, the
request shall be granted. If the request is granted, the necessary expenses of
defending the action or proceeding shall be paid by the local governmental
entity. Any monetary judgment against the officer, employee, or volunteer
shall be paid on approval of the legislative authority of the local
governmental entity or by a procedure for approval created by ordinance or
resolution.

(3)
The necessary expenses of defending an elective officer of the local
governmental entity in a judicial hearing to determine the sufficiency of a
recall charge as provided in RCW 29.82.023 shall be paid by the local
governmental entity if the officer requests such defense and approval is
granted by both the legislative authority of the local governmental entity and
the attorney representing the local governmental entity. The expenses paid by
the local governmental entity may include costs associated with an appeal of
the decision rendered by the superior court concerning the sufficiency of the
recall charge.

(4)
When an officer, employee, or volunteer of the local governmental entity other
than a law enforcement officer covered under subsection (5) of this section
has been represented at the expense of the local governmental entity under
subsection (1) of this section and the court hearing the action has found that
the officer, employee, or volunteer was acting within the scope of his or her
official duties, and a judgment has been entered against the officer, employee,
or volunteer under chapter 4.96 RCW or 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1981 et seq., thereafter
the judgment creditor shall seek satisfaction for nonpunitive damages only from
the local governmental entity, and judgment for nonpunitive damages shall not
become a lien upon any property of such officer, employee, or volunteer. The
legislative authority of a local governmental entity may, pursuant to a
procedure created by ordinance or resolution, agree to pay an award for
punitive damages.

(5)
When a law enforcement officer makes a request for defense under subsection (1)
of this section, the determination under subsection (2) of this section as to
whether or not the acts or omissions of the law enforcement officer were, or in
good faith purported to be, within the scope of his or her official duties
shall be made within sixty days. If the request is granted, the necessary
expenses of defending the action or proceeding shall be paid by the local
governmental entity. When a law enforcement officer of the local governmental
entity has been represented at the expense of the local governmental entity
under subsection (1) of this section and the court hearing the action has found
that the law enforcement officer was acting within the scope of his or her
official duties, and a judgment has been entered against the law enforcement
officer under chapter 4.96 RCW or 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1981 et seq., any monetary
judgment against the law enforcement officer shall be paid by the legislative
authority of the local governmental entity, and thereafter the judgment
creditor shall seek satisfaction for damages only from the local governmental
entity, and judgment for damages shall not become a lien upon any property of
such law enforcement officer.

For the purposes of this section, "law enforcement
officer" has the meaning provided in RCW 9.41.010.

---
END ---