BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 90.58 RCW to read as follows:

The
implementation of the shoreline management act through the shoreline master
program requires a full integration with the necessary habitat protection
measures for threatened and endangered species. The inclusion of specie
protection requirements are not fully defined until the development and
approval of a threatened or endangered specie recovery plan is developed for
each federally listed evolutionarily significant unit by the federal regulatory
agency charged with the development of the recovery plan for that specie.

The
shoreline master program guidelines shall be consistent with the habitat
protection elements necessary for the recovery of listed species as defined in
the federally developed recovery plans for each listed evolutionarily
significant unit. However, the guidelines may not be used as the states'
enforcement tool to require compliance with any federal law. Recovery plans
for each listed species may vary markedly due to scientific findings that apply
to each species' biological needs and limiting factors. These variations in
biological requirements necessary for the recovery of each individual specie
shall be incorporated into shoreline master programs through the review and
approval of the shoreline master program by the independent science panel
established under RCW 75.46.050.

Premature
alteration of the shoreline management act state master program may cause
uncertainty and place unnecessary financial burdens upon private landowners and
city and county governments if changes are made before an independent science
panel review and finalization of federal recovery plans, thus necessitating a
number of major plan revisions within a short period of time, all occurring before
vital scientific review has been accomplished at the state and federal level.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 90.58 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall suspend the revision of all shoreline management act master
programs until such time as federal threatened or endangered salmon recovery
plans are finalized for each evolutionarily significant unit. Only upon
completion and approval of a federal specie recovery plan shall the department
incorporate those findings into a new shoreline master program for the
geographic area covered by federal threatened or endangered listing.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 90.58 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall submit each draft shoreline master plan to the independent
science panel authorized under RCW 75.46.050 for purposes of review, comment,
and approval. The department shall not adopt a shoreline master plan unless
the independent science panel has approved it in its entirety. The independent
science panel must certify that the plan is the best scientific methodology
that will lead to specie recovery.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 90.58 RCW to read as follows:

The
independent science panel created in RCW 75.46.050, in cooperation with the
Washington association of counties and the Washington association of cities,
shall report annually to the legislature concerning the effects of this chapter
and chapter 36.70A RCW on the recovery of endangered species.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

The
growth management hearings boards created in RCW 36.70A.250, working in
cooperation with the association of Washington counties and the association of
Washington cities, shall report to the legislature annually concerning local
actions to integrate the shoreline management act, chapter 90.58 RCW, and the
growth management provisions of this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. By
January 1, 2002, the department of community, trade, and economic development
must provide to the legislature recommendations on how to compensate landowners
for restrictions on land use incurred due to the growth management act, chapter
36.70A RCW, and the shoreline management act, chapter 90.58 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

Until
such time as criteria and a full compensation plan have been approved by the
legislature, state and local governments may not require any change in
shoreline land use that is in effect as of January 1, 1999. The designation of
lands to be stream buffers under this chapter, and the shoreline management
act, chapter 90.58 RCW, may not take effect until full compensation is enacted
into law by the legislature.

Shoreline
management guidelines shall apply uniformly to all shoreline lands for all land
use designations under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
new section is added to chapter 90.58 RCW to read as follows:

Until
such time as criteria and a full compensation plan have been approved by the
legislature, state and local governments may not require any change in
shoreline land use that is in effect as of January 1, 1999. The designation of
lands to be stream buffers under this chapter, and the growth management act,
chapter 36.70A RCW, may not take effect until full compensation is enacted into
law by the legislature.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. The
department of ecology shall hold a public hearing on the draft shoreline
management rules proposed on March 30, 1999, in any county where the county
legislative authority requests such a hearing, prior to December 31, 1999. The
legislature shall review the rules and their impact during the 2000 regular
session and make any necessary changes in law. The department of ecology shall
delay implementation of the rules as provided in chapter ...., Laws of 1999
(this act).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. A
new section is added to chapter 90.58 RCW to read as follows:

Counties
and cities have the sole authority to define the application of best available
science and adaptive management principles to the policies, ordinances, and
administrative procedures used to implement this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. A
new section is added to chapter 90.58 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature reaffirms that the provisions of this chapter do not apply to
construction and practices normal or necessary for farming, irrigation, and
ranching activities, including agricultural service roads and utilities on
shorelands, and the construction and maintenance of irrigation structures
including but not limited to head gates, pumping facilities, and irrigation
channels.

Sec.
12. RCW
90.58.060 and 1995 c 347 s 304 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall periodically review and adopt guidelines consistent with
RCW 90.58.020, containing the elements specified in RCW 90.58.100 for:

(a)
Development of master programs for regulation of the uses of shorelines; and

(b)
Development of master programs for regulation of the uses of shorelines of
state-wide significance.

(2)
Before adopting or amending guidelines under this section, the department shall
provide an opportunity for public review and comment as follows:

(a)
The department shall mail copies of the proposal to all cities, counties, and
federally recognized Indian tribes, and to any other person who has requested a
copy, and shall publish the proposed guidelines in the Washington state
register. Comments shall be submitted in writing to the department within
sixty days from the date the proposal has been published in the register.

(b)
The department shall hold at least four public hearings on the proposal in
different locations throughout the state to provide a reasonable opportunity
for residents in all parts of the state to present statements and views on the
proposed guidelines. Notice of the hearings shall be published at least once
in each of the three weeks immediately preceding the hearing in one or more
newspapers of general circulation in each county of the state. If an amendment
to the guidelines addresses an issue limited to one geographic area, the number
and location of hearings may be adjusted consistent with the intent of this
subsection to assure all parties a reasonable opportunity to comment on the
proposed amendment. The department shall accept written comments on the
proposal during the sixty-day public comment period and for seven days after
the final public hearing.

(c)
At the conclusion of the public comment period, the department shall review the
comments received and modify the proposal consistent with the provisions of
this chapter. The proposal shall then be published for adoption pursuant to
the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.

(3)
The department may propose amendments to the guidelines not more than once each
year. At least once every five years the department shall conduct a review of
the guidelines pursuant to the procedures outlined in subsection (2) of this
section.

(4)
This section is subject to the provisions of chapter . . ., Laws of
1999 (this act).

Sec.
13. RCW
36.70A.480 and 1995 c 347 s 104 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
For shorelines of the state, the goals and policies of the shoreline management
act as set forth in RCW 90.58.020 are added as one of the goals of this chapter
as set forth in RCW 36.70A.020. The goals and policies of a shoreline master
program for a county or city approved under chapter 90.58 RCW shall be
considered an element of the county or city's comprehensive plan. The goals
and policies of a shoreline master program for a county or a city approved
under chapter 90.58 RCW shall be considered an element of the county or city's
comprehensive plan only after a scientific review of the shoreline master
program conducted by the independent science panel in RCW 75.46.050. All
other portions of the shoreline master program for a county or city adopted
under chapter 90.58 RCW, including use regulations, shall be considered a part
of the county or city's development regulations.

(2)
The shoreline master program shall be adopted pursuant to the procedures of
chapter 90.58 RCW rather than the procedures set forth in this chapter for the
adoption of a comprehensive plan or development regulations.

Sec.
14. RCW
75.46.050 and 1998 c 246 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The governor shall request the national academy of sciences, the American
fisheries society, or a comparable institution to screen candidates to serve as
members on the independent science panel. The institution that conducts the
screening of the candidates shall submit a list of the nine most qualified
candidates to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and
the majority leader of the senate. The candidates shall reflect expertise in
habitat requirements of salmon, protection and restoration of salmon
populations, artificial propagation of salmon, hydrology, or geomorphology.

(2)
The speaker of the house of representatives and the majority leader in the
senate shall each remove one name from the nomination list. The governor shall
consult with tribal representatives and the governor shall appoint five
scientists from the remaining names on the nomination list.

(3)
The members of the independent science panel shall serve four-year terms. The
independent science panel members shall elect the chair of the panel among
themselves every two years. The members of the independent science panel shall
be compensated as provided in RCW 43.03.250 and reimbursed for travel expenses
in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(4)
The independent science panel shall be governed by generally accepted
guidelines and practices governing the activities of independent science boards
such as the national academy of sciences. The purpose of the independent
science panel is to help ensure that sound science is used in salmon recovery
efforts. The governor's salmon recovery office shall request review of salmon
recovery plans by the science review panel. The science review panel does not
have the authority to review individual projects or project lists developed
under RCW 75.46.060, 75.46.070, and 75.46.080 or to make policy decisions.

(5)
The independent science panel shall act as the peer review panel for all
state and local shoreline master plans and growth management plans that would
affect endangered species.

(6) The independent science panel shall submit its findings
to the legislature and the governor.

---
END ---