BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
sum of three million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated from the general fund to the superintendent of public instruction
for the biennium ending June 30, 2001, for matching grants to enhance security
in schools. This appropriation is a supplement to the five million nine
hundred twenty-three thousand dollars school security appropriation contained
in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5180, section 501(2)(e) (omnibus
operating budget act), and shall be expended in the same manner and for the
same purposes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
sum of two million five hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated from the general fund to the superintendent of
public instruction for the biennium ending June 30, 2001, for school safety
programs for prevention and intervention. The funds shall be allocated to each
educational service district based on the full-time equivalent enrollment in
the educational service district in the prior school year. The funds may be
expended for proven-effective programs to improve safety in schools,
including: Peer counseling and peer mediation; nonviolence and leadership
training for staff and students; establishing local hotlines; and start-up
grants for before-and-after school programs for at-risk youth. The programs
may be provided by educational service districts or consortiums of educational
service districts or local school districts. The specific programs to be
provided shall be determined by each educational service district in
consultation with its school districts.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
sum of one million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated from the general fund to the superintendent of public instruction
for the biennium ending June 30, 2001, for alternative school start-up grants.
This appropriation is a supplement to the two million dollars alternative
school start-up appropriation contained in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No.
5180, section 501(2)(l) (omnibus operating budget act), and shall be expended
in the same manner and for the same purposes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
sum of five hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary,
is appropriated from the general fund to the superintendent of public
instruction for the biennium ending June 30, 2001, for school safety plan
grants. This appropriation is a supplement to the one million dollars safety
plan appropriation contained in Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5180,
section 501(2)(q) (omnibus operating budget act), and shall be expended in the same
manner and for the same purposes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
biennial appropriations in this act shall be allotted by the office of
financial management evenly between fiscal year 2000 and fiscal year 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999.

---
END ---