BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
29.19.020 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 20 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
On the fourth Tuesday in May of each year in which a president of the United
States is to be nominated and elected, a presidential primary shall be held at
which voters may vote for the nominee of a major political party for the office
of president. ((The secretary of state may propose an alternative date for
the primary)) No later than the first day of August of the year
before the year in which a president is to be nominated and elected, the
secretary of state may propose an alternative date for the presidential primary
that is no earlier than the first Tuesday in March of the year in which a
president is to be nominated and elected.

(2)
No later than the first day of September of the year before the year in which a
presidential nominee is selected, the state committee of any major political
party that will use the primary results for candidates of that party may
propose an alternative date for that primary that is no earlier than the
first Tuesday in March of the year in which a president is to be nominated and
elected.

(3)
If an alternative date is proposed under subsection (1) or (2) of this section,
a committee consisting of the chair and the vice-chair of the state committee
of each major political party, the secretary of state, the majority leader and
minority leader of the senate, and the speaker and the minority leader of the
house of representatives shall meet and, if affirmed by a two-thirds vote of
the members of the committee, the date of the primary shall be changed to
the proposed alternative date. The committee shall meet and decide on the
proposed alternate date not later than the first day of October of the year
before the year in which a presidential nominee is selected. The secretary of
state shall convene and preside over the meeting of the committee. A committee
member other than a legislator may appoint, in writing, a designee to serve on
his or her behalf. A legislator who is a member of the committee may appoint,
in writing, another legislator to serve on his or her behalf.

(4) If an alternate date is approved under this section, the
secretary of state shall adopt rules under RCW 29.19.070 to adjust the
deadlines in RCW 29.19.030 and related provisions of this chapter to correspond
with the date that has been approved.

---
END ---