BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that federal hydroelectric licensing and relicensing
requirements can significantly impact the economy, environment, property
values, and quality of life of many communities in the state.

Local
impacts may be compounded by the simultaneous requirements of the endangered
species act, the clean water act, and the federal environmental protection act,
rendering hydroelectric licensing and relicensing procedures even more complex.

Hydroelectric
licensing and relicensing procedures allow for collaborative processes
involving interested entities including state agencies and local governments
and for combining the consultation processes of different federal agencies.
These collaborative processes can often lead to the most balanced and
reasonable outcome proposals.

The
scope and importance of the issues necessitate the involvement of the state and
local communities. However, the complexity of the issues makes it difficult
for local communities to afford adequate resources to participate effectively.

It
is in the state's interest to support collaborative processes in hydroelectric
licensing and relicensing and to assist local communities to participate
effectively in those processes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:

Counties
or cities may apply to the department for grants to assist communities to
participate in a federal hydroelectric licensing and relicensing collaborative
process that includes the goals of meeting endangered species act and clean
water act requirements. Subject to available funding, the department shall
provide grants for this purpose. The department may develop procedures for
processing the grant applications and may develop criteria for prioritizing
requests. Prioritization of the requests shall be based on, but not limited
to, submittal of a proposed process that includes broad community involvement,
peer review of science, and economic, engineering, environmental, and legal
analysis.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The sum of one million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the general fund to
the department of community, trade, and economic development for the purposes
of this act.

(2) The sum of one million dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the
general fund to the department of community, trade, and economic development
for the purposes of this act.

---
END ---