BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.20.505 and 1999 c . . . (SB 5374) s 9 are each amended to read as
follows:

Every person applying for a special endorsement of a driver's
license authorizing such person to drive a motorcycle or a motor-driven cycle
shall pay ((an examination)) a fee of two dollars which is not
refundable. In addition, the endorsement fee for the initial motorcycle
endorsement shall be six dollars and the subsequent renewal endorsement fee
shall be fourteen dollars. The initial and renewal endorsement fees shall be
deposited in the motorcycle safety education account of the highway safety
fund.

Sec.
2. RCW
46.20.515 and 1999 c . . . (SB 5374) s 11 are each amended to read as
follows:

The
motorcycle endorsement examination must emphasize maneuvers necessary for
on-street operation, including emergency braking and turning as may be required
to avoid an impending collision. The department may waive all or part of
the examination for persons who satisfactorily complete the voluntary
motorcycle operator training and education program authorized under RCW
46.20.520.

Sec.
3. RCW
46.30.020 and 1991 sp.s. c 25 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
No person may operate a motor vehicle subject to registration under chapter
46.16 RCW in this state unless the person is insured under a motor vehicle
liability policy with liability limits of at least the amounts provided in RCW
46.29.090, is self-insured as provided in RCW 46.29.630, is covered by a
certificate of deposit in conformance with RCW 46.29.550, or is covered by a
liability bond of at least the amounts provided in RCW 46.29.090. Written
proof of financial responsibility for motor vehicle operation must be provided
on the request of a law enforcement officer in the format specified under RCW
46.30.030.

(b)
A person who drives a motor vehicle that is required to be registered in
another state that requires drivers and owners of vehicles in that state to
maintain insurance or financial responsibility shall, when requested by a law
enforcement officer, provide evidence of financial responsibility or insurance
as is required by the laws of the state in which the vehicle is registered.

(c)
When asked to do so by a law enforcement officer, failure to display an
insurance identification card as specified under RCW 46.30.030 creates a
presumption that the person does not have motor vehicle insurance.

(d)
Failure to provide proof of motor vehicle insurance is a traffic infraction and
is subject to penalties as set by the supreme court under RCW 46.63.110 or
community service.

(2)
If a person cited for a violation of subsection (1) of this section appears in
person before the court and provides written evidence that at the time the
person was cited, he or she was in compliance with the financial responsibility
requirements of subsection (1) of this section, the citation shall be
dismissed. In lieu of personal appearance, a person cited for a violation of
subsection (1) of this section may, before the date scheduled for the person's
appearance before the court, submit by mail to the court written evidence that
at the time the person was cited, he or she was in compliance with the
financial responsibility requirements of subsection (1) of this section, in
which case the citation shall be dismissed without cost, except that the court
may assess court administrative costs of twenty-five dollars at the time of
dismissal.

(3)
The provisions of this chapter shall not govern((:

(a))) the
operation of a motor vehicle registered under RCW 46.16.305(1), governed by RCW
46.16.020, or registered with the Washington utilities and transportation
commission as common or contract carriers((;)), or

(((b)))
the operation of a ((motorcycle as defined in RCW 46.04.330, a))
motor-driven cycle as defined in RCW 46.04.332, or a moped as defined in RCW
46.04.304.

(4)
RCW 46.29.490 shall not be deemed to govern all motor vehicle liability
policies required by this chapter but only those certified for the purposes
stated in chapter 46.29 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

This chapter does not apply to the use of motorcycles that are
loaned to the department of licensing exclusively for purposes of providing
motorcycle training under RCW 46.20.520, or to persons contracting with the
department to provide such training.

---
END ---