BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
23B.04.010 and 1998 c 102 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A corporate name:

(a)
Must contain the word "corporation," "incorporated,"
"company," or "limited," or the abbreviation
"corp.," "inc.," "co.," or "ltd.";

(b)
Must not contain language stating or implying that the corporation is organized
for a purpose other than those permitted by RCW 23B.03.010 and its articles of
incorporation;

(c)
Must not contain any of the following words or phrases: "Bank,"
"banking," "banker," "trust,"
"cooperative," or any combination of the words "industrial"
and "loan," or any combination of any two or more of the words
"building," "savings," "loan," "home,"
"association," and "society," or any other words or phrases
prohibited by any statute of this state; ((and))

(d)
Must not contain the phrase "state of Washington" or
"Washington state," unless authorized to do so by the state of
Washington. A violation of this subsection shall constitute an unfair or
deceptive act or practice in violation of RCW 19.86.020. Businesses in
violation of this subsection on the effective date of this act have six months
from the effective date of this act to comply with this subsection, and will
not be penalized during this six-month period; and

(e)
Except as authorized by subsections (2) and (3) of this section, must be
distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state from:

(i)
The corporate name of a corporation incorporated or authorized to transact
business in this state;

(ii)
A corporate name reserved or registered under chapter 23B.04 RCW;

(iii)
The fictitious name adopted under RCW 23B.15.060 by a foreign corporation
authorized to transact business in this state because its real name is
unavailable;

(iv)
The corporate name or reserved name of a not-for-profit corporation
incorporated or authorized to conduct affairs in this state under chapter 24.03
RCW;

(v)
The name or reserved name of a mutual corporation or miscellaneous corporation
incorporated or authorized to do business under chapter 24.06 RCW;

(vi)
The name or reserved name of a foreign or domestic limited partnership formed
or registered under chapter 25.10 RCW;

(vii)
The name or reserved name of a limited liability company organized or
registered under chapter 25.15 RCW; and

(viii)
The name or reserved name of a limited liability partnership registered under
chapter 25.04 RCW.

(2)
A corporation may apply to the secretary of state for authorization to use a
name that is not distinguishable upon the records from one or more of the names
described in subsection (1) of this section. The secretary of state shall
authorize use of the name applied for if:

(a)
The other corporation, company, holder, limited liability partnership, or
limited partnership consents to the use in writing and files with the secretary
of state documents necessary to change its name or the name reserved or
registered to a name that is distinguishable upon the records of the secretary
of state from the name of the applying corporation; or

(b)
The applicant delivers to the secretary of state a certified copy of the final
judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the applicant's
right to use the name applied for in this state.

(3)
A corporation may use the name, including the fictitious name, of another
domestic or foreign corporation, limited liability company, limited
partnership, or limited liability partnership, that is used in this state if
the other entity is formed or authorized to transact business in this state, and
the proposed user corporation:

(a)
Has merged with the other corporation, limited liability company, or limited
partnership; or

(b)
Has been formed by reorganization of the other corporation.

(4)
This title does not control the use of assumed business names or "trade
names."

(5)
A name shall not be considered distinguishable upon the records of the
secretary of state by virtue of:

(a)
A variation in any of the following designations for the same name:
"Corporation," "incorporated," "company,"
"limited," "partnership," "limited partnership,"
"limited liability company," or "limited liability
partnership," or the abbreviations "corp.," "inc.,"
"co.," "ltd.," "LP," "L.P.,"
"LLP," "L.L.P.," "LLC," or "L.L.C.";

(b)
The addition or deletion of an article or conjunction such as "the"
or "and" from the same name;

(c)
Punctuation, capitalization, or special characters or symbols in the same name;
or

(d)
Use of abbreviation or the plural form of a word in the same name.

Sec.
2. RCW
23B.15.060 and 1998 c 102 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No certificate of authority shall be issued to a foreign corporation unless the
corporate name of such corporation:

(a)
Contains the word "corporation," "incorporated,"
"company," or "limited," or the abbreviation
"corp.," "inc.," "co.," or "ltd.";

(b)
Does not contain language stating or implying that the corporation is organized
for a purpose other than that permitted by RCW 23B.03.010 and its articles of
incorporation;

(c)
Does not contain any of the following words or phrases: "Bank,"
"banking," "banker," "trust,"
"cooperative," or any combination of the words "industrial"
and "loan," or any combination of any two or more words
"building," "savings," "loan," "home,"
"association," and "society," or any other words or phrases
prohibited by any statute of this state; ((and))

(d)
Does not contain the phrase "state of Washington" or
"Washington state," unless authorized to do so by the state of
Washington. A violation of this subsection shall constitute an unfair or
deceptive act or practice in violation of RCW 19.86.020. Businesses in
violation of this subsection on the effective date of this act have six months
from the effective date of this act to comply with this subsection, and will
not be penalized during this six-month period; and

(e)
Except as authorized by subsections (4) and (5) of this section, is
distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state from:

(i)
The corporate name of a corporation incorporated or authorized to transact
business in this state;

(ii)
A corporate name reserved or registered under chapter 23B.04 RCW;

(iii)
The fictitious name adopted pursuant to subsection (3) of this section by a
foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state because its
real name is unavailable;

(iv)
The corporate name or reserved name of a not-for-profit corporation
incorporated or authorized to conduct affairs in this state under chapter 24.03
RCW;

(v)
The name or reserved name of a mutual corporation or miscellaneous corporation
incorporated or authorized to do business under chapter 24.06 RCW;

(vi)
The name or reserved name of a foreign or domestic limited partnership formed
or registered under chapter 25.10 RCW;

(vii)
The name or reserved name of any limited liability company organized or
registered under chapter 25.15 RCW; and

(viii)
The name or reserved name of any limited liability partnership registered under
chapter 25.04 RCW.

(2)
A name shall not be considered distinguishable under the same grounds as
provided under RCW 23B.04.010.

(3)
If the corporate name of a foreign corporation does not satisfy the
requirements of subsection (1) of this section, the foreign corporation to
obtain or maintain a certificate of authority to transact business in this
state:

(a)
May add the word "corporation," "incorporated,"
"company," or "limited," or the abbreviation
"corp.," "inc.," "co.," or "ltd.," to
its corporate name for use in this state; or

(b)
May use a fictitious name to transact business in this state if its real name
is unavailable and it delivers to the secretary of state for filing a copy of
the resolution of its board of directors, certified by its secretary, adopting
the fictitious name.

(4)
A foreign corporation may apply to the secretary of state for authorization to
use a name that is not distinguishable upon the records from one or more of the
names described in subsection (1)(((d))) (e) of this section.
The secretary of state shall authorize use of the name applied for if:

(a)
The other corporation, company, holder, limited liability partnership, or
limited partnership consents to the use in writing and files with the secretary
of state documents necessary to change its name or the name reserved or
registered to a name that is distinguishable upon the records of the secretary
of state from the name of the applying corporation; or

(b)
The applicant delivers to the secretary of state a certified copy of the final
judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the applicant's
right to use the name applied for in this state.

(5)
A foreign corporation may use in this state the name, including the fictitious
name, of another domestic or foreign corporation that is used in this state if
the other corporation is incorporated or authorized to transact business in
this state and the foreign corporation:

(a)
Has merged with the other corporation; or

(b)
Has been formed by reorganization of the other corporation.

(6)
If a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state changes
its corporate name to one that does not satisfy the requirements of subsection
(1) of this section, it may not transact business in this state under the
changed name until it adopts a name satisfying such requirements and obtains an
amended certificate of authority under RCW 23B.15.040.

Sec.
3. RCW
24.03.045 and 1998 c 102 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
corporate name:

(1)
Shall not contain any word or phrase which indicates or implies that it is
organized for any purpose other than one or more of the purposes contained in
its articles of incorporation.

(2)
Must not contain the phrase "state of Washington" or
"Washington state," unless authorized to do so by the state of
Washington. A violation of this subsection shall constitute an unfair or
deceptive act or practice in violation of RCW 19.86.020. Businesses in
violation of this subsection on the effective date of this act have six months
from the effective date of this act to comply with this subsection, and will
not be penalized during this six-month period.

(3)(a)
Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this subsection, must be distinguishable
upon the records of the secretary of state from:

(i)
The corporate name or reserved name of a corporation or domestic corporation
organized or authorized to transact business under this chapter;

(ii)
A corporate name reserved or registered under chapter 23B.04 RCW;

(iii)
The fictitious name adopted under RCW 23B.15.060 by a foreign corporation
authorized to transact business in this state because its real name is
unavailable;

(iv)
The name or reserved name of a mutual corporation or miscellaneous corporation
incorporated or authorized to do business under chapter 24.06 RCW;

(v)
The name or reserved name of a foreign or domestic limited partnership formed
or registered under chapter 25.10 RCW;

(vi)
The name or reserved name of a limited liability company organized or
registered under chapter 25.15 RCW; and

(vii)
The name or reserved name of a limited liability partnership registered under
chapter 25.04 RCW.

(b)
A corporation may apply to the secretary of state for authorization to use a
name that is not distinguishable upon the records from one or more of the names
described in (a) of this subsection. The secretary of state shall authorize
use of the name applied for if:

(i)
The other corporation, company, holder, limited liability partnership, or
limited partnership consents to the use in writing and files with the secretary
of state documents necessary to change its name or the name reserved or
registered to a name that is distinguishable upon the records of the secretary
of state from the name of the applying corporation; or

(ii)
The applicant delivers to the secretary of state a certified copy of the final
judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the applicant's
right to use the name applied for in this state.

(c)
A corporation may use the name, including the fictitious name, of another
domestic or foreign corporation, limited liability company, limited
partnership, or limited liability partnership, that is used in this state if
the other entity is formed or authorized to transact business in this state,
and the proposed user corporation:

(i)
Has merged with the other corporation, limited liability company, or limited
partnership; or

(ii)
Has been formed by reorganization of the other corporation.

(((3)))
(4) Shall be transliterated into letters of the English alphabet, if it
is not in English.

(((4)))
(5) Shall not include or end with "incorporated,"
"company," "corporation," "partnership,"
"limited partnership," or "Ltd.," or any abbreviation
thereof, but may use "club," "league,"
"association," "services," "committee," "fund,"
"society," "foundation,"
". . . . . ., a nonprofit corporation," or
any name of like import.

(((5)))
(6) May only include the term "public benefit" or names of
like import if the corporation has been designated as a public benefit
nonprofit corporation by the secretary in accordance with this chapter.

(((6)))
(7) A name shall not be considered distinguishable upon the records of
the secretary of state by virtue of:

(a)
A variation in any of the following designations for the same name:
"Corporation," "incorporated," "company,"
"limited," "partnership," "limited partnership,"
"limited liability company," or "limited liability
partnership," or the abbreviations "corp.," "inc.,"
"co.," "ltd.," "LP," "L.P.,"
"LLP," "L.L.P.," "LLC," or "L.L.C.";

(b)
The addition or deletion of an article or conjunction such as "the"
or "and" from the same name;

(c)
Punctuation, capitalization, or special characters or symbols in the same name;
or

(d)
Use of abbreviation or the plural form of a word in the same name.

(((7)))
(8) This title does not control the use of assumed business names or
"trade names."

Sec.
4. RCW
24.06.045 and 1998 c 102 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
corporate name:

(1)
Shall not contain any word or phrase which indicates or implies that it is
organized for any purpose other than one or more of the purposes contained in
its articles of incorporation.

(2)
Must not contain the phrase "state of Washington" or
"Washington state," unless authorized to do so by the state of
Washington. A violation of this subsection shall constitute an unfair or
deceptive act or practice in violation of RCW 19.86.020. Businesses in
violation of this subsection on the effective date of this act have six months
from the effective date of this act to comply with this subsection, and will
not be penalized during this six-month period.

(3)(a)
Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this subsection, must be distinguishable
upon the records of the secretary of state from:

(i)
The corporate name of a corporation organized or authorized to transact
business in this state;

(ii)
A corporate name reserved or registered under chapter 23B.04 RCW;

(iii)
The name or reserved name of a mutual corporation or miscellaneous corporation
incorporated or authorized to do business under this chapter;

(iv)
The fictitious name adopted under RCW 23B.15.060 by a foreign corporation
authorized to transact business in this state because its real name is
unavailable;

(v)
The corporate name or reserved name of a not-for-profit corporation
incorporated or authorized to conduct affairs in this state under chapter 24.03
RCW;

(vi)
The name or reserved name of a foreign or domestic limited partnership formed
or registered under chapter 25.10 RCW;

(vii)
The name or reserved name of a limited liability company organized or
registered under chapter 25.15 RCW; and

(viii)
The name or reserved name of a limited liability partnership registered under
chapter 25.04 RCW.

(b)
A corporation may apply to the secretary of state for authorization to use a
name that is not distinguishable upon the records from one or more of the names
described in (a) of this subsection. The secretary of state shall authorize
use of the name applied for if:

(i)
The other corporation, company, holder, limited liability partnership, or
limited partnership consents to the use in writing and files with the secretary
of state documents necessary to change its name or the name reserved or
registered to a name that is distinguishable upon the records of the secretary
of state from the name of the applying corporation; or

(ii)
The applicant delivers to the secretary of state a certified copy of the final
judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the applicant's
right to use the name applied for in this state.

(c)
A corporation may use the name, including the fictitious name, of another domestic
or foreign corporation, limited liability company, limited partnership, or
limited liability partnership, that is used in this state if the other entity
is incorporated, organized, formed, or authorized to transact business in this
state, and the proposed user corporation:

(i)
Has merged with the other corporation, limited liability company, or limited
partnership; or

(ii)
Has been formed by reorganization of the other corporation.

(((3)))
(4) Shall be transliterated into letters of the English alphabet if it
is not in English.

(((4)))
(5) The name of any corporation formed under this section shall not
include nor end with "incorporated", "company", or
"corporation" or any abbreviation thereof, but may use
"club", "league", "association",
"services", "committee", "fund",
"society", "foundation",
". . . . . ., a nonprofit mutual corporation",
or any name of like import.

(((5)))
(6) A name shall not be considered distinguishable upon the records of
the secretary of state by virtue of:

(a)
A variation in any of the following designations for the same name:
"Corporation," "incorporated," "company,"
"limited," "partnership," "limited partnership,"
"limited liability company," or "limited liability
partnership," or the abbreviations "corp.," "inc.,"
"co.," "ltd.," "LP," "L.P.,"
"LLP," "L.L.P.," "LLC," or "L.L.C.";

(b)
The addition or deletion of an article or conjunction such as "the"
or "and" from the same name;

(c)
Punctuation, capitalization, or special characters or symbols in the same name;
or

(d)
Use of abbreviation or the plural form of a word in the same name.

(((6)))
(7) This title does not control the use of assumed business names or
"trade names."

Sec.
5. RCW
25.05.505 and 1998 c 103 s 1102 are each amended to read as follows:

The
name of a limited liability partnership shall contain the words "limited
liability partnership" or the abbreviation "L.L.P." or
"LLP" as the last words or letters of its name.

The
name must not contain the phrase "state of Washington" or
"Washington state," unless authorized to do so by the state of
Washington. A violation of this section shall constitute an unfair or
deceptive act or practice in violation of RCW 19.86.020. Businesses in
violation of this subsection on the effective date of this act have six months
from the effective date of this act to comply with this subsection, and will
not be penalized during this six-month period.

Sec.
6. RCW
25.10.020 and 1998 c 102 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The name of each limited partnership formed pursuant to this chapter as set
forth in its certificate of limited partnership:

(a)
Shall contain the words "limited partnership" or the abbreviation
"LP" or "L.P.";

(b)
May not contain the name of a limited partner unless (i) it is also the name of
a general partner, or the corporate name of a corporate general partner, or
(ii) the business of the limited partnership had been carried on under that
name before the admission of that limited partner;

(c)
May not contain any of the following words or phrases: "Bank",
"banking", "banker", "trust",
"cooperative"; or any combination of the words "industrial"
and "loan"; or any combination of any two or more of the words
"building", "savings", "loan", "home",
"association" and "society"; or any other words or phrases
prohibited by any statute of this state;

(d)
Must not contain the phrase "state of Washington" or
"Washington state," unless authorized to do so by the state of
Washington. A violation of this subsection shall constitute an unfair or
deceptive act or practice in violation of RCW 19.86.020. Businesses in
violation of this subsection on the effective date of this act have six months
from the effective date of this act to comply with this subsection, and will
not be penalized during this six-month period; and

(e)
Except as authorized by subsections (2) and (3) of this section, must be
distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state from:

(i)
The name or reserved name of a foreign or domestic limited partnership;

(ii)
The name of a limited liability company reserved, registered, or formed under
the laws of this state or qualified to do business as a foreign limited liability
company in this state under chapter 25.15 RCW;

(iii)
The corporate name of a corporation incorporated or authorized to transact
business in this state;

(iv)
A corporate name reserved or registered under chapter 23B.04 RCW;

(v)
The corporate name or reserved name of a not-for-profit corporation
incorporated or authorized to conduct affairs in this state under chapter 24.03
RCW;

(vi)
The name or reserved name of a mutual corporation or miscellaneous corporation
incorporated or authorized to do business under chapter 24.06 RCW;

(vii)
The fictitious name adopted under RCW 23B.15.060 by a foreign corporation
authorized to transact business in this state because its real name is
unavailable; and

(viii)
The name or reserved name of a limited liability partnership registered under
chapter 25.04 RCW.

(2)
A limited partnership may apply to the secretary of state for authorization to
use a name that is not distinguishable upon the records from one or more of the
names described in subsection (1) of this section. The secretary of state
shall authorize use of the name applied for if:

(a)
The other limited partnership, company, corporation, limited liability
partnership, or holder consents to the use in writing and files with the secretary
of state documents necessary to change its name or the name reserved or
registered to a name that is distinguishable upon the records of the secretary
of state from the name of the applying limited partnership; or

(b)
The applicant delivers to the secretary of state a certified copy of the final
judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the applicant's
right to use the name applied for in this state.

(3)
A limited partnership may use the name, including the fictitious name, of
another domestic or foreign limited partnership, limited liability company,
limited liability partnership, or corporation that is used in this state if the
other entity is organized, incorporated, formed, or authorized to transact
business in this state and the proposed user limited partnership:

(a)
Has merged with the other limited partnership, limited liability company,
limited liability partnership, or corporation; or

(b)
Results from reorganization with the other limited partnership, limited
liability company, or corporation.

(4)
A name shall not be considered distinguishable upon the records of the
secretary of state by virtue of:

(a)
A variation in any of the following designations for the same name:
"Corporation," "incorporated," "company,"
"limited," "partnership," "limited partnership,"
"limited liability company," or "limited liability
partnership," or the abbreviations "corp.," "inc.,"
"co.," "ltd.," "LP," "L.P.,"
"LLP," "L.L.P.," "LLC," or "L.L.C.";

(b)
The addition or deletion of an article or conjunction such as "the"
or "and" from the same name;

(c)
Punctuation, capitalization, or special characters or symbols in the same name;
or

(d)
Use of abbreviation or the plural form of a word in the same name.

(5)
This chapter does not control the use of assumed business names or "trade
names."

Sec.
7. RCW
25.15.010 and 1998 c 102 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The name of each limited liability company as set forth in its certificate of
formation:

(a)
Must contain the words "Limited Liability Company," the words
"Limited Liability" and abbreviation "Co.," or the
abbreviation "L.L.C." or "LLC";

(b)
Except as provided in subsection (1)(d) of this section, may contain the name
of a member or manager;

(c)
Must not contain language stating or implying that the limited liability
company is organized for a purpose other than those permitted by RCW 25.15.030;

(d)
Must not contain any of the words or phrases:"Bank,"
"banking," "banker," "trust,"
"cooperative," "partnership," "corporation,"
"incorporated," or the abbreviations "corp.,"
"ltd.," or "inc.," or "LP," "L.P.,"
"LLP," "L.L.P.," or any combination of the words "industrial"
and "loan," or any combination of any two or more of the words
"building," "savings," "loan," "home,"
"association," and "society," or any other words or phrases
prohibited by any statute of this state; ((and))

(e)
Must not contain the phrase "state of Washington" or
"Washington state," unless authorized to do so by the state of
Washington. A violation of this subsection shall constitute an unfair or
deceptive act or practice in violation of RCW 19.86.020. Businesses in
violation of this subsection on the effective date of this act have six months
from the effective date of this act to comply with this subsection, and will
not be penalized during this six-month period; and

(f)
Must be distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state from the
names described in RCW 23B.04.010(1)(((d))) (e) and
25.10.020(1)(((d))) (e), and the names of any limited liability
company reserved, registered, or formed under the laws of this state or
qualified to do business as a foreign limited liability company in this state.

(2)
A limited liability company may apply to the secretary of state for
authorization to use any name which is not distinguishable upon the records of
the secretary of state from one or more of the names described in subsection
(1)(((e))) (f) of this section. The secretary of state shall
authorize use of the name applied for if the other corporation, limited
partnership, limited liability partnership, or limited liability company
consents in writing to the use and files with the secretary of state documents
necessary to change its name or the name reserved or registered to a name that
is distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state from the name of
the applying limited liability company.

(3)
A name shall not be considered distinguishable upon the records of the
secretary of state by virtue of:

(a)
A variation in any of the following designations for the same name:
"Corporation," "incorporated," "company,"
"limited," "partnership," "limited partnership,"
"limited liability company," or "limited liability
partnership," or the abbreviations "corp.," "inc.,"
"co.," "ltd.," "LP," "L.P.,"
"LLP," "L.L.P.," "LLC," or "L.L.C.";

(b)
The addition or deletion of an article or conjunction such as "the"
or "and" from the same name;

(c)
Punctuation, capitalization, or special characters or symbols in the same name;
or

(d)
Use of abbreviation or the plural form of a word in the same name.

(4)
This chapter does not control the use of assumed business names or "trade
names."

Sec.
8. RCW
25.15.045 and 1999 c 128 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person or group of persons licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render
professional services within this or any other state may organize and become a
member or members of a professional limited liability company under the provisions
of this chapter for the purposes of rendering professional service. A
"professional limited liability company" is subject to all the
provisions of chapter 18.100 RCW that apply to a professional corporation, and
its managers, members, agents, and employees shall be subject to all the
provisions of chapter 18.100 RCW that apply to the directors, officers,
shareholders, agents, or employees of a professional corporation, except as
provided otherwise in this section. Nothing in this section prohibits a person
duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render professional services
in any jurisdiction other than this state from becoming a member of a
professional limited liability company organized for the purpose of rendering
the same professional services. Nothing in this section prohibits a
professional limited liability company from rendering professional services
outside this state through individuals who are not duly licensed or otherwise
legally authorized to render such professional services within this state.
Persons engaged in a profession and otherwise meeting the requirements of this
chapter may operate under this chapter as a professional limited liability
company so long as each member personally engaged in the practice of the
profession in this state is duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to
practice the profession in this state and:

(a)
At least one manager of the company is duly licensed or otherwise legally
authorized to practice the profession in this state; or

(b)
Each member in charge of an office of the company in this state is duly
licensed or otherwise legally authorized to practice the profession in this
state.

(2)
If the company's members are required to be licensed to practice such
profession, and the company fails to maintain for itself and for its members
practicing in this state a policy of professional liability insurance, bond, or
other evidence of financial responsibility of a kind designated by rule by the
state insurance commissioner and in the amount of at least one million dollars
or a greater amount as the state insurance commissioner may establish by rule
for a licensed profession or for any specialty within a profession, taking into
account the nature and size of the business, then the company's members are
personally liable to the extent that, had the insurance, bond, or other
evidence of responsibility been maintained, it would have covered the liability
in question.

(3)
For purposes of applying the provisions of chapter 18.100 RCW to a professional
limited liability company, the terms "director" or
"officer" means manager, "shareholder" means member,
"corporation" means professional limited liability company,
"articles of incorporation" means certificate of formation,
"shares" or "capital stock" means a limited liability
company interest, "incorporator" means the person who executes the
certificate of formation, and "bylaws" means the limited liability
company agreement.

(4)
The name of a professional limited liability company must contain either the words
"Professional Limited Liability Company," or the words
"Professional Limited Liability" and the abbreviation
"Co.," or the abbreviation "P.L.L.C." or "PLLC"
provided that the name of a professional limited liability company organized to
render dental services shall contain the full names or surnames of all members
and no other word than "chartered" or the words "professional
services" or the abbreviation "P.L.L.C." or "PLLC."

(5)
The name of a professional limited liability company must not contain the
phrase "state of Washington" or "Washington state," unless
authorized to do so by the state of Washington. A violation of this subsection
shall constitute an unfair or deceptive act or practice in violation of RCW
19.86.020. Businesses in violation of this subsection on the effective date of
this act have six months from the effective date of this act to comply with
this subsection, and will not be penalized during this six-month period.

(6)
Subject to the provisions in article VII of this chapter, the following may be
a member of a professional limited liability company and may be the transferee
of the interest of an ineligible person or deceased member of the professional
limited liability company:

(a)
A professional corporation, if its shareholders, directors, and its officers
other than the secretary and the treasurer, are licensed or otherwise legally
authorized to render the same specific professional services as the
professional limited liability company; and

(b)
Another professional limited liability company, if the managers and members of
both professional limited liability companies are licensed or otherwise legally
authorized to render the same specific professional services.

(((6)))
(7)(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, health care
professionals who are licensed or certified pursuant to chapters 18.06, 18.19,
18.22, 18.25, 18.29, 18.34, 18.35, 18.36A, 18.50, 18.53, 18.55, 18.57, 18.57A,
18.64, 18.71, 18.71A, 18.79, 18.83, 18.89, 18.108, and 18.138 RCW may own
membership interests in and render their individual professional services
through one limited liability company and are to be considered, for the purpose
of forming a limited liability company, as rendering the "same specific
professional services" or "same professional services" or
similar terms.

(b)
Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, health care professionals
who are regulated under chapters 18.59 and 18.74 RCW may own membership
interests in and render their individual professional services through one
limited liability company formed for the sole purpose of providing professional
services within their respective scope of practice.

(c) Formation of a limited liability company under this subsection
does not restrict the application of the uniform disciplinary act under chapter
18.130 RCW, or any applicable health care professional statutes under Title 18
RCW, including but not limited to restrictions on persons practicing a health
profession without being appropriately credentialed and persons practicing
beyond the scope of their credential.

---
END ---