BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.01.010 and 1965 c 8 s 43.01.010 are each amended to read as follows:

The
governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, treasurer, auditor, attorney
general, superintendent of public instruction, and commissioner of
public lands((, and insurance commissioner,)) shall hold office for the
term of four years, and until their successors are elected and qualified; and
the term shall commence on the Wednesday after the second Monday of January
following their election.

Sec.
2. RCW
48.02.010 and 1947 c 79 s .02.01 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There shall be an insurance commissioner of this state who shall be ((elected
at the time and in the manner that other state officers are elected)) appointed
by the governor, with the consent of the senate.

(2)
The commissioner in office ((at)) on the effective date of this
((code)) act shall continue in office for the remainder of the
term for which he was elected and until his successor is ((duly elected and
qualified)) appointed.

(3)
"Commissioner," where used in this ((code)) title,
means the insurance commissioner of this state.

Sec.
3. RCW
43.17.010 and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 16, 1993 c 472 s 17, and 1993 c 280 s 18 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

There
shall be departments of the state government which shall be known as (1) the
department of social and health services, (2) the department of ecology, (3)
the department of labor and industries, (4) the department of agriculture, (5)
the department of fish and wildlife, (6) the department of transportation, (7)
the department of licensing, (8) the department of general administration, (9)
the department of community, trade, and economic development, (10) the
department of veterans affairs, (11) the department of revenue, (12) the
department of retirement systems, (13) the department of corrections, ((and))
(14) the department of health, ((and)) (15) the department of financial
institutions, and (16) the office of the insurance commissioner, which
shall be charged with the execution, enforcement, and administration of such
laws, and invested with such powers and required to perform such duties, as the
legislature may provide.

Sec.
4. RCW
43.17.020 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

There
shall be a chief executive officer of each department to be known as: (1) The
secretary of social and health services, (2) the director of ecology, (3) the
director of labor and industries, (4) the director of agriculture, (5) the
director of fish and wildlife, (6) the secretary of transportation, (7) the
director of licensing, (8) the director of general administration, (9) the
director of community, trade, and economic development, (10) the director of
veterans affairs, (11) the director of revenue, (12) the director of retirement
systems, (13) the secretary of corrections, ((and)) (14) the secretary
of health, ((and)) (15) the director of financial institutions, and
(16) the office of the insurance commissioner.

Such
officers, except the secretary of transportation and the director of fish and
wildlife, shall be appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate,
and hold office at the pleasure of the governor. The secretary of
transportation shall be appointed by the transportation commission as
prescribed by RCW 47.01.041. The director of fish and wildlife shall be
appointed by the fish and wildlife commission as prescribed by RCW 77.04.055.

Sec.
5. RCW
42.17.2401 and 1996 c 186 s 504 are each amended to read as follows:

For
the purposes of RCW 42.17.240, the term "executive state officer"
includes:

(1)
The chief administrative law judge, the director of agriculture, ((the
administrator of the office of marine safety,)) the administrator of the
Washington basic health plan, the director of the department of services for
the blind, the director of the state system of community and technical
colleges, the director of community, trade, and economic development, the
secretary of corrections, the director of ecology, the commissioner of
employment security, the chairman of the energy facility site evaluation
council, the secretary of the state finance committee, the director of
financial management, the director of fish and wildlife, the executive
secretary of the forest practices appeals board, the director of the gambling
commission, the director of general administration, the secretary of health,
the administrator of the Washington state health care authority, the executive
secretary of the health care facilities authority, the executive secretary of
the higher education facilities authority, the executive secretary of the horse
racing commission, the executive secretary of the human rights commission, the
executive secretary of the indeterminate sentence review board, the director of
the department of information services, the insurance commissioner, the
director of the interagency committee for outdoor recreation, the executive
director of the state investment board, the director of labor and industries,
the director of licensing, the director of the lottery commission, the director
of the office of minority and women's business enterprises, the director of
parks and recreation, the director of personnel, the executive director of the
public disclosure commission, the director of retirement systems, the director
of revenue, the secretary of social and health services, the chief of the
Washington state patrol, the executive secretary of the board of tax appeals,
the secretary of transportation, the secretary of the utilities and
transportation commission, the director of veterans affairs, the president of
each of the regional and state universities and the president of The Evergreen
State College, each district and each campus president of each state community
college;

(2)
Each professional staff member of the office of the governor;

(3)
Each professional staff member of the legislature; and

(4) Central Washington University board of trustees, board of
trustees of each community college, each member of the state board for
community and technical colleges, state convention and trade center board of
directors, committee for deferred compensation, Eastern Washington University
board of trustees, Washington economic development finance authority, The
Evergreen State College board of trustees, executive ethics board, forest
practices appeals board, forest practices board, gambling commission,
Washington health care facilities authority, each member of the Washington
health services commission, higher education coordinating board, higher
education facilities authority, horse racing commission, state housing finance
commission, human rights commission, indeterminate sentence review board, board
of industrial insurance appeals, information services board, interagency committee
for outdoor recreation, state investment board, commission on judicial conduct,
legislative ethics board, liquor control board, lottery commission, marine
oversight board, Pacific Northwest electric power and conservation planning
council, parks and recreation commission, personnel appeals board, board of
pilotage commissioners, pollution control hearings board, public disclosure
commission, public pension commission, shorelines hearing board, public
employees' benefits board, board of tax appeals, transportation commission,
University of Washington board of regents, utilities and transportation
commission, Washington state maritime commission, Washington personnel
resources board, Washington public power supply system executive board,
Washington State University board of regents, Western Washington University
board of trustees, and fish and wildlife commission.

---
END ---