BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that incidents of violence in schools raise concerns about
ensuring and promoting school safety. For learning to occur, schools must
first be safe places for children, teachers, and other school employees. Recognizing
that violent behavior tends to escalate if tolerated, it is the intent of the
legislature to provide targeted and appropriate sanctions for the interference
with school activities by force or violence before it rises to the level of
substantial or grievous bodily harm.

The
legislature further finds that interscholastic activities provide valuable
opportunities for participants to develop social and personal skills that can
be useful throughout their lives. These activities also benefit other students
and spectators by building school spirit, unity, community support, and
community identity. Interscholastic activities would not be possible without
the commitment of officials, judges, referees, and volunteers who work at the
events for little or no financial gain. The legislature finds that the values
engendered in interscholastic activities are being undermined by participants
and spectators who do not respect the commitment of these officials.
Increasingly, these people are expressing their dissatisfaction through
inappropriate verbal abuse and behavior directed at the officials. The
legislature recognizes that officials, judges, referees, and volunteers at
interscholastic events are particularly vulnerable to inappropriate conduct
because their attention is focused on the conduct of the events. The
legislature intends to provide additional support and protection for officials
conducting interscholastic events.

Sec.
2. RCW
28A.635.090 and 1996 c 321 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
It ((shall be)) is unlawful for any person, singly or in concert
with others, to interfere by force or violence with any administrator, teacher,
classified employee, person under contract with the school or school district, sports
official certified by or registered with the Washington interscholastic
activities association, or student of any common school who is in the
peaceful discharge or conduct of his or her duties or studies.

(2)
Any such interference by force or violence committed by a student shall be
grounds for immediate suspension or expulsion of the student. If the
interference is committed by a student at an interscholastic activity, the
student may be excluded from participating in or attending that activity for up
to twelve months.

(3)
Any person who violates this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and, upon
conviction thereon, shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars, or
imprisoned in jail not more than six months, or both such fine and
imprisonment. A person, other than a student, shall, upon conviction, be
excluded from entering the school where the crime was committed or attending
the interscholastic activity in which the crime was committed for a period of
up to twelve months.

Sec.
3. RCW
28A.635.100 and 1990 c 33 s 541 are each amended to read as follows:

It
((shall be)) is unlawful for any person, singly or in concert
with others, to intimidate by threat of force or violence any administrator,
teacher, classified employee, or student of any common school who is in the
peaceful discharge or conduct of his or her duties or studies.

Any
person who violates this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and, upon
conviction thereon, shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars, or imprisoned
in jail not more than six months, or both such fine and imprisonment.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. RCW
28A.635.120 (Violations under RCW 28A.635.090 and
28A.635.100--Penalty) and 1990 c 33 s 543 & 1971 c 45 s 6 are each repealed.

---
END ---