BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
LEGISLATIVE INTENT. The legislature finds that workers are often
required to work long days and even longer weeks. These practices hurt working
families, make affordable child care difficult to find, and lead to higher stress
levels and industrial injury and occupational disease rates. These practices
limit employment opportunities to a smaller number of workers rather than
extend employment opportunities to a larger number of workers. Thus, it is the
intent of the legislature that workers not be required to work overtime.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
MANDATORY OVERTIME PROHIBITED. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this act,
no employer may require an employee to work: (a) More than eight hours in any
work day; or (b) more than forty hours in any work week. An employee is not
prohibited from voluntarily agreeing to work more than eight hours in any work
day or more than forty hours in any work week.

(2)
Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, an employee may be required to
work up to ten hours in a work day if the employer's work week is based on four
ten-hour days in a work week. An employee is not prohibited from voluntarily
agreeing to work more than ten hours in any work day.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
OVERTIME COMPENSATION REQUIRED. Nothing in this act limits the application of
RCW 49.46.130.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
EMPLOYEE DEFINED. For the purposes of this act, "employee" includes
any individual employed by an employer except:

(1)
An individual exempt under RCW 49.46.010(5) (a) through (n) or RCW
49.46.130(2) (a) through (i);

(2)
An individual employed by a private utility and performing emergency work
necessary for the public health and safety, if the utility has exhausted
reasonable efforts to have the work performed voluntarily by other employees;

(3)
An individual employed in fire protection, law enforcement, or emergency
medical services;

(4)
An individual performing work in emergency situations that endanger public
health and safety, including, but not limited to, fires, natural disasters,
civil disorders, utility interruptions, services required by the armed forces
of the United States, including work performed under a contract with the United
States department of defense when the work is necessary because of the
declaration of a national emergency, or other situations determined by the
department to be emergencies endangering public health and safety;

(5)
An individual employed by an employer packing or processing perishable
agricultural or horticultural commodities, or perishable freshwater or
saltwater fish or shellfish or their products; or

(6)
An individual employed by an employer registered as an aquatic farmer with the
department of agriculture in accordance with RCW 75.58.040, and performing work
defined as aquaculture in RCW 15.85.020.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
VARIANCE. (1) An employer may petition the department for a variance from the
requirements of section 2 of this act if at least eighty percent of the
employer's employees in the affected work unit or, if the employees are
represented by an exclusive bargaining representative, in the affected
bargaining unit vote by secret ballot to approve a written proposal for
regularly scheduled hours of work of more than eight hours in a work day or of
more than forty hours in a work week. The agreement may not permit the
employer to require any employee to work more than twelve hours in a work day
or more than an average of forty-two hours per work week in four consecutive
work weeks.

(2)(a)
The department shall adopt rules providing for the election procedures and
documentation required to apply for a variance under this section. The rules
shall include provisions that require employee approval of the variance no less
than annually, and that make supervisors ineligible to vote.

(b)
For the purposes of this section, "supervisor" means any employee
having authority, in the interest of the employer, to hire, transfer, suspend,
lay off, recall, promote, discharge, assign, reward, or discipline other
employees, or responsibly to direct them, or to adjust their grievances, or
effectively to recommend such action, if in connection with the foregoing the
exercise of such authority is not of a merely routine or clerical nature, but
requires the use of independent judgment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
CONTINUOUS PRODUCTION OPERATIONS. (1) Notwithstanding section 2 of this act,
an employee may be required to work part of the next succeeding work shift
following the work shift completed by the employee if:

(a)
The work is required because of an unanticipated event, including, but not
limited to, employee illness or emergency repair of production equipment, but
not including a need to increase production to meet an increase in market
demand, and the unanticipated event has or may halt a continuous production
operation;

(b)(i)
In good faith, the employer has exhausted reasonable attempts to obtain
voluntary work during the succeeding shift; or

(ii)
The employee has critical skills and expertise that are required for the work;
and

(c)
As requested by the employee, the employer has assisted the employee to acquire
safe transportation to his or her residence following the succeeding shift, and
has assisted the employee to address child care or other family obligations
successfully. At the time of requiring the employee to work part of the next
succeeding shift, the employer shall inform the employee of the employer's
obligation under this section.

(2)
This section may not permit an employer to require any employee to work more
than twelve consecutive hours, or to work during more than two consecutive work
shifts, or to require, in any calendar month, more than sixteen hours beyond
the hours of work that may be required under section 2 of this act.

(3)
For the purposes of this section:

(a)
"Continuous production operation" means a workplace that routinely
operates twenty-four hours a day in the following industries: (i) Primary
metal processing, in an industry assigned the major group standard industrial
classification code "33" or the equivalent code in a successor
classification system by the employment security department; or (ii) paper and
allied products, in an industry assigned the major group standard industrial
classification code "26" or the equivalent code in a successor
classification system by the employment security department.

(b)
"Standard industrial classification code" means the code identified
in RCW 50.29.025(6)(c).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
DISCRIMINATION PROHIBITED. (1) No employer may discharge or in any manner
discriminate against an employee because the employee exercises any of the
rights provided in this act, including the right to vote under section 5 of
this act.

(2)
Any employee who believes that he or she has been discharged or otherwise
discriminated against in violation of this section may, within one year after
such violation occurs, file a complaint with the director alleging such
discrimination. Upon receipt of a complaint, the director shall cause an
investigation to be made as the director deems appropriate. If, after
investigation, the director determines that the provisions of this section have
been violated, the director may bring an action in superior court of the county
in which the violation is alleged to have occurred against the person or
persons alleged to have violated the provisions of this section. If the
director declines to investigate a complaint of discrimination under the
provisions of this section, or declines to institute legal action following an
investigation, the employee may institute the action on his or her own behalf
after receiving notice of the director's decision not to investigate or
initiate legal action on the case. In any action under this section, the
superior court shall have jurisdiction, for cause shown, to restrain violations
of this act and to order all appropriate relief including rehiring or
reinstatement of the employee to his or her former position with back pay.

(3)
Within ninety days of the receipt of the complaint filed under this section,
the director shall notify the complainant of the determination under subsection
(2) of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS. (1) Nothing in this act shall be construed
to diminish an employer's obligation to comply with any collective bargaining
agreement which provides greater rights to employees than the rights provided
under this act.

(2)
If employees are covered by an unexpired collective bargaining agreement
containing terms that conflict with this act, and the agreement expires on or
after the effective date of this act, this act shall apply to these employees
on the first day following expiration of the collective bargaining agreement.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. RULE
MAKING. The director is authorized to adopt rules in accordance with chapter
34.05 RCW that are necessary to implement this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10.
Captions used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12.
Sections 2 through 9 of this act are each added to chapter 49.46 RCW.

---
END ---