BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
43.131.391 (Diabetes cost reduction act--Termination) and 1997 c
276 s 7; and

(2) RCW
43.131.392 (Diabetes cost reduction act--Repeal) and 1997 c 276 s
8.

---
END ---