BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.655.060 and 1999 c 373 s 501 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The Washington commission on student learning is hereby established. The
primary purposes of the commission are to identify the knowledge and skills all
public school students need to know and be able to do based on the student
learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210, to develop student assessment and school
accountability systems, to review current school district data reporting
requirements and make recommendations on what data is necessary for the
purposes of accountability and meeting state information needs, and to take
other steps necessary to develop a performance-based education system. The
commission shall include three members of the state board of education, three
members appointed by the governor before July 1, 1992, and five members
appointed no later than June 1, 1993, by the governor elected in the November
1992 election. The governor shall appoint a chair from the commission members,
and fill any vacancies in gubernatorial appointments that may occur. The state
board of education shall fill any vacancies of state board of education
appointments that may occur. In making the appointments, educators, business
leaders, and parents shall be represented, and nominations from state-wide
education, business, and parent organizations shall be requested. Efforts
shall be made to ensure that the commission reflects the racial and ethnic
diversity of the state's K-12 student population and that the major geographic
regions in the state are represented. Appointees shall be qualified
individuals who are supportive of educational restructuring, who have a
positive record of service, and who will devote sufficient time to the
responsibilities of the commission to ensure that the objectives of the
commission are achieved.

(2)
The commission shall establish advisory committees. Membership of the advisory
committees shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, professionals from
the office of the superintendent of public instruction and the state board of
education, and other state and local educational practitioners and student
assessment specialists.

(3)
The commission, with the assistance of the advisory committees, shall:

(a)
Develop essential academic learning requirements based on the student learning
goals in RCW 28A.150.210. Essential academic learning requirements shall be
developed, to the extent possible, for each of the student learning goals in
RCW 28A.150.210. Goals one and two shall be considered primary. Essential
academic learning requirements for RCW 28A.150.210(1), goal one, and the
mathematics component of RCW 28A.150.210(2), goal two, shall be completed no
later than March 1, 1995. Essential academic learning requirements that
incorporate the remainder of RCW 28A.150.210 (2), (3), and (4), goals two,
three, and four, shall be completed no later than March 1, 1996. To the
maximum extent possible, the commission shall integrate goal four and the
knowledge and skill areas in the other goals in the development of the
essential academic learning requirements;

(b)(i)
The commission and superintendent of public instruction shall develop a
state-wide academic assessment system for use in the elementary, middle, and
high school years designed to determine if each student has learned the
essential academic learning requirements identified in (a) of this subsection.
The academic assessment system shall include a variety of assessment methods,
including criterion-referenced and performance-based measures. Performance
standards for determining if a student has successfully completed an assessment
shall be determined by the commission and the superintendent of public
instruction in consultation with the advisory committees required in subsection
(2) of this section.

(ii)
The assessment system shall be designed so that the results under the
assessment system are used by educators as tools to evaluate instructional
practices, and to initiate appropriate educational support for students who
have not learned the essential academic learning requirements at the
appropriate periods in the student's educational development.

(iii)
Assessments measuring the essential academic learning requirements shall be
available for voluntary use by school districts and shall be required to be
administered by school districts according to the following schedule unless the
legislature takes action to delay or prevent implementation of the assessment
system and essential academic learning requirements.

Assessments Assessments

available
for required to be

voluntary
use administered

(School
years) (School years)

Reading,
Writing,

Communication,
Mathematics

-
Elementary school 1996-97 1997-98

-
Middle school 1997-98 2000-01

- High
school 1998-99 2000-01

Science

-
Middle and high 1999-00 2000-01

school

-
Elementary school 2001-02 2004-05

Social
Studies

-
Elementary, middle, 2002-03 2005-06

and
high school

((Arts

-
Middle and high 2003-04 2006-07

school

-
Elementary school 2003-04 2007-08

Health,
Fitness

-
Middle and high 2003-04 2006-07

school

-
Elementary school 2003-04 2007-08))

The
completed assessments and assessments still in development shall be transferred
by the commission on student learning to the superintendent of public
instruction by June 30, 1999.

(iv)
To the maximum extent possible, the commission and the superintendent of public
instruction shall integrate knowledge and skill areas in development of the
assessments.

Assessments
for goals three and four of RCW 28A.150.210 shall be integrated in the
essential academic learning requirements and assessments for goals one and two.

(v)
The commission on student learning may modify the essential academic learning
requirements and the assessments, as needed, before June 30, 1999. The
superintendent of public instruction may modify the essential academic learning
requirements and the assessments, as needed, after June 30, 1999. The
commission and superintendent shall, upon request, provide opportunities for
the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate to
review the assessments and proposed modifications to the essential academic
learning requirements before the modifications are adopted.

(vi)
The commission and the superintendent of public instruction shall develop
assessments that are directly related to the essential academic learning
requirements, and are not biased toward persons with different learning styles,
racial or ethnic backgrounds, or on the basis of gender;

(c)
After a determination is made by the state board of education that the high
school assessment system has been implemented and that it is sufficiently
reliable and valid, successful completion of the high school assessment shall
lead to a certificate of mastery. The certificate of mastery shall be obtained
by most students at about the age of sixteen, and is evidence that the student
has successfully mastered the essential academic learning requirements during
his or her educational career. The certificate of mastery shall be required
for graduation but shall not be the only requirement for graduation. The
commission shall make recommendations to the state board of education regarding
the relationship between the certificate of mastery and high school graduation
requirements. Upon achieving the certificate of mastery, schools shall provide
students with the opportunity to pursue career and educational objectives
through educational pathways that emphasize integration of academic and
vocational education. Educational pathways may include, but are not limited
to, programs such as work-based learning, school-to-work transition, tech prep,
vocational-technical education, running start, and preparation for technical
college, community college, or university education. Any middle school, junior
high school, or high school using educational pathways shall ensure that all
participating students will continue to have access to the courses and
instruction necessary to meet admission requirements at baccalaureate
institutions. Students shall be allowed to enter the educational pathway of
their choice. Before accepting a student into an educational pathway, the
school shall inform the student's parent of the pathway chosen, the
opportunities available to the student through the pathway, and the career
objectives the student will have exposure to while pursuing the pathway.
Parents and students dissatisfied with the opportunities available through the
selected educational pathway shall be provided with the opportunity to transfer
the student to any other pathway provided in the school. Schools may not
develop educational pathways that retain students in high school beyond the
date they are eligible to graduate, and may not require students who transfer
between pathways to complete pathway requirements beyond the date the student
is eligible to graduate;

(d)
Consider methods to address the unique needs of special education students when
developing the assessments in (b) and (c) of this subsection;

(e)
Consider methods to address the unique needs of highly capable students when
developing the assessments in (b) and (c) of this subsection;

(f)
Develop recommendations on the time, support, and resources, including
technical assistance, needed by schools and school districts to help students
achieve the essential academic learning requirements. These recommendations
shall include an estimate for the legislature, superintendent of public
instruction, and governor on the expected cost of implementing the academic
assessment system;

(g)
Develop recommendations for consideration by the higher education coordinating
board for adopting college and university entrance requirements for public
school students that are consistent with the essential academic learning
requirements and the certificate of mastery;

(h)
Review current school district data reporting requirements for the purposes of
accountability and meeting state information needs. The commission on student
learning shall report recommendations to the joint select committee on
education restructuring by September 15, 1996, on:

(i)
What data is necessary to compare how school districts are performing before
the essential academic learning requirements and the assessment system are
implemented with how school districts are performing after the essential
academic learning requirements and the assessment system are implemented; and

(ii)
What data is necessary pertaining to school district reports under the
accountability systems developed by the commission on student learning under
this section;

(i)
Recommend to the legislature, governor, state board of education, and
superintendent of public instruction:

(i)
A state-wide accountability system to monitor and evaluate accurately and
fairly at elementary, middle, and high schools the level of learning occurring
in individual schools and school districts with regard to the goals included in
RCW 28A.150.210 (1) through (4). The accountability system must assess each
school individually against its own baseline, schools with similar
characteristics, and schools state-wide. The system shall include school-site,
school district, and state-level accountability reports;

(ii)
A school assistance program to help schools and school districts that are
having difficulty helping students meet the essential academic learning
requirements as measured by performance on the elementary, middle school, and
high school assessments;

(iii)
A system to intervene in schools and school districts in which significant
numbers of students persistently fail to learn the essential academic learning
requirements or meet the standards established for the elementary, middle
school, and high school assessments; and

(iv)
An awards program to provide incentives to school staff to help their students
learn the essential academic learning requirements, with each school being
assessed individually against its own baseline, schools with similar
characteristics, and the state-wide average. Incentives shall be based on the
rate of percentage change of students achieving the essential academic learning
requirements and progress on meeting the state-wide average. School staff
shall determine how the awards will be spent.

The
commission shall make recommendations regarding a state-wide accountability
system for reading in grades kindergarten through four by November 1, 1997.
Recommendations for an accountability system in the other subject areas and
grade levels shall be made no later than June 30, 1999;

(j)
Report annually by December 1st to the legislature, the governor, the
superintendent of public instruction, and the state board of education on the
progress, findings, and recommendations of the commission; and

(k)
Make recommendations to the legislature and take other actions necessary or
desirable to help students meet the student learning goals.

(4)
The commission shall coordinate its activities with the state board of
education and the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(5)
The commission shall seek advice broadly from the public and all interested
educational organizations in the conduct of its work, including holding
periodic regional public hearings.

(6)
The commission shall select an entity to provide staff support and the office
of the superintendent of public instruction shall provide administrative
oversight and be the fiscal agent for the commission. The commission may
direct the office of the superintendent of public instruction to enter into
subcontracts, within the commission's resources, with school districts,
teachers, higher education faculty, state agencies, business organizations, and
other individuals and organizations to assist the commission in its
deliberations.

(7)
Members of the commission shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided
in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(8)(a)
By September 30, 1997, the commission on student learning, the state board of
education, and the superintendent of public instruction shall jointly present
recommendations to the education committees of the house of representatives and
the senate regarding the high school assessments, the certificate of mastery,
and high school graduation requirements.

In
preparing recommendations, the commission on student learning shall convene an
ad hoc working group to address questions, including:

(i)
What type of document shall be used to identify student performance and
achievement and how will the document be described?

(ii)
Should the students be required to pass the high school assessments in all
skill and content areas, or only in select skill and content areas, to
graduate?

(iii)
How will the criteria for establishing the standards for passing scores on the
assessments be determined?

(iv)
What timeline should be used in phasing-in the assessments as a graduation
requirement?

(v)
What options may be used in demonstrating how the results of the assessments
will be displayed in a way that is meaningful to students, parents,
institutions of higher education, and potential employers?

(vi)
Are there other or additional methods by which the assessments could be used to
identify achievement such as endorsements, standards of proficiency, merit
badges, or levels of achievement?

(vii)
Should the assessments and certificate of mastery be used to satisfy college or
university entrance criteria for public school students? If yes, how should
these methods be phased-in?

(b)
The ad hoc working group shall report its recommendations to the commission on
student learning, the state board of education, and the superintendent of
public instruction by June 15, 1997. The commission shall report the ad hoc
working group's recommendations to the education committees of the house of
representatives and senate by July 15, 1997. Final recommendations of the
commission on student learning, the state board of education, and the
superintendent of public instruction shall be presented to the education
committees of the house of representatives and the senate by September 30,
1997.

(9) The Washington commission on student learning shall expire on
June 30, 1999.

---
END ---