BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
47.30.020 and 1971 ex.s. c 130 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Facilities
for pedestrians, equestrians, or bicyclists ((shall)) may be
incorporated into the design of highways and freeways along corridors where
such facilities do not exist upon a finding that such facilities would be of
joint use and conform to the comprehensive plans of public agencies for the
development of such facilities, will not duplicate existing or proposed routes,
and that safety to both motorists and to pedestrians, equestrians, and
bicyclists would be enhanced by the segregation of traffic.

((In
planning and design of all highways, every effort shall be made consistent with
safety to promote joint usage of rights of way for trails and paths in
accordance with the comprehensive plans of public agencies.))

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW 47.30.050
(Expenditures for paths and trails--Minimum amount) and 1999 c 269 s 11, 1979
ex.s. c 121 s 2, & 1972 ex.s. c 103 s 4 are each repealed.

---
END ---