BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW to read as follows:

The
department is required to identify all transportation projects and activities
that are primarily intended to reduce traffic congestion. Once identified, the
department must prioritize the projects using the following criteria:

(1)
The department must review the capacity of those highways known to have
congestion problems, and determine at what percentage of capacity the highway
is operating. Those highways that are closest to capacity or most over
capacity shall receive the highest priority; and

(2) Each of the department's geographic administrative regions must
complete its congestion reduction projects in the order of their prioritized
ranking. The highest priority projects in each region must be completed before
starting on lower priority projects.

---
END ---