BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 47.38 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department must adopt by rule a comprehensive program that allows private
entities to operate state-owned safety rest areas.

(2)
The program to allow private entities to operate state-owned safety rest areas
must meet the following criteria:

(a)
In addition to commercial services offered, privately operated safety rest
areas must also offer equivalent services, at no charge, currently provided by
state-operated safety rest areas;

(b)
The department must lease the rights to operate safety rest areas for a
commercially reasonable period of time, but no longer than twenty years;

(c)
The department may lease the right to operate either individual safety rest
areas, or groups of safety rest areas, or both, to a private entity; and

(d) The department must take all necessary action to ensure the
most favorable lease rates for the state, whether by bid or other reasonable
manner, and to require the lessee to enter into any other contract or agreement
to protect the state and its citizens from commercial harm or other type of
harm.

---
END ---