BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Motor vehicles are exempt from property taxation.

(2) "Motor vehicle" means all motor vehicles, trailers
and semitrailers used, or of the type designed primarily to be used, upon the
public streets and highways, for the convenience or pleasure of the owner, or
for the conveyance, for hire or otherwise, of persons or property, including
fixed loads and facilities for human habitation; but shall not include (a)
vehicles carrying exempt licenses, (b) dock and warehouse tractors and their
cars or trailers, lumber carriers of the type known as spiders, and all other
automotive equipment not designed primarily for use upon public streets, or
highways, (c) motor vehicles or their trailers used entirely upon private
property, (d) mobile homes and travel trailers as defined in RCW 82.50.010, or
(e) motor vehicles owned by nonresident military personnel of the armed forces
of the United States stationed in the state of Washington provided personnel
were also nonresident at the time of their entry into military service.

---
END ---