BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
82.44.010 (Definitions) and 1990 c 42 s 301, 1979 c 107 s 10,
1971 ex.s. c 299 s 54, 1967 c 121 s 4, 1963 c 199 s 1, & 1961 c 15 s
82.44.010;

(2) RCW
82.44.015 (Ride-sharing passenger motor vehicles
excluded--Notice--Liability for tax) and 1996 c 244 s 7, 1993 c 488 s 3, 1982 c
142 s 1, & 1980 c 166 s 3;

(3) RCW
82.44.020 (Basic and clean air excise tax
imposed--Exceptions--Liability of residents for out-of-state licensing) and
1998 c 321 s 3 (Referendum Bill No. 49), 1993 sp.s. c 23 s 61, 1993 c 123 s 2,
1991 c 199 s 220, 1990 c 42 s 302, & 1988 c 191 s 1;

(4) RCW
82.44.022 (Credit on personal-use motor vehicle) and 1998 c 321 s
2 (Referendum Bill No. 49);

(5) RCW
82.44.023 (Exemption--Rental cars--Alteration of license plate month
and year tabs--Rules--Taxes upon sale) and 1998 c 321 s 38 (Referendum Bill No.
49), 1998 c 145 s 1, 1994 c 227 s 3, & 1992 c 194 s 8;

(6) RCW
82.44.025 (Exemption--Vehicles of Taipei Economic and Cultural
Office) and 1998 c 321 s 39 (Referendum Bill No. 49) & 1996 c 139 s 3;

(7) RCW
82.44.030 (Tax on motor vehicle dealers) and 1971 ex.s. c 299 s
51 & 1961 c 15 s 82.44.030;

(8) RCW
82.44.041 (Valuation of vehicles) and 1998 c 321 s 4 (Referendum
Bill No. 49) & 1990 c 42 s 303;

(9) RCW
82.44.060 (Payment of tax based on registration year--Transfer of
ownership) and 1990 c 42 s 304, 1981 c 222 s 12, 1979 c 158 s 233, 1975-'76 2nd
ex.s. c 54 s 2, 1975 1st ex.s. c 118 s 14, 1963 c 199 s 4, & 1961 c 15 s
82.44.060;

(10) RCW
82.44.065 (Appeal of valuation) and 1990 c 42 s 305;

(11) RCW
82.44.080 (Tax additional) and 1961 c 15 s 82.44.080;

(12) RCW
82.44.090 (Penalty for issuing plates without collecting tax) and
1961 c 15 s 82.44.090;

(13) RCW
82.44.100 (Tax receipt) and 1961 c 15 s 82.44.100;

(14) RCW
82.44.110 (Disposition of revenue) and 1998 c 321 s 5 (Referendum
Bill No. 49), 1997 c 338 s 68, & 1997 c 149 s 911;

(15) RCW
82.44.120 (Refunds, collections of erroneous
amounts--Claims--False statement, penalty) and 1993 c 307 s 3, 1990 c 42 s 307,
1989 c 68 s 2, 1983 c 26 s 3, 1979 c 120 s 2, 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 95, 1974
ex.s. c 54 s 4, 1967 c 121 s 2, 1963 c 199 s 5, & 1961 c 15 s 82.44.120;

(16) RCW
82.44.130 (Ad valorem taxation barred) and 1961 c 15 s 82.44.130;

(17) RCW
82.44.140 (Director of licensing may act) and 1979 c 158 s 237,
1967 c 121 s 3, & 1961 c 15 s 82.44.140;

(18) RCW
82.44.150 (Apportionment and distribution of motor vehicle excise
taxes generally) and 1999 c 94 s 30, 1998 c 321 s 6 (Referendum Bill No. 49),
1995 2nd sp.s. c 14 s 538, 1994 c 241 s 1, & 1993 c 491 s 2;

(19) RCW
82.44.155 (City police and fire protection assistance
account--Distribution to cities and towns--Apportionment) and 1998 c 321 s 40
(Referendum Bill No. 49), 1993 c 492 s 254, 1991 c 199 s 223, & 1990 c 42 s
309;

(20) RCW
82.44.157 (Transfer of funds pursuant to government service
agreement) and 1994 c 266 s 14;

(21) RCW
82.44.160 (Distribution to municipal research council) and 1999 c
309 s 931 & 1995 c 28 s 1;

(22) RCW
82.44.170 (Computation of excise taxes when commingled with
licensing fees) and 1990 c 42 s 311, 1987 c 244 s 56, & 1985 c 380 s 22;

(23) RCW
82.44.180 (Transportation fund--Deposits and distributions) and
1999 c 402 s 5, 1999 c 94 s 31, 1998 c 321 s 41 (Referendum Bill No. 49), &
1995 c 269 s 2601;

(24) RCW
82.44.190 (Transportation infrastructure account--Deposits and
distributions--Subaccounts) and 1996 c 262 s 2;

(25) RCW
82.44.195 (Transportation infrastructure account--Highway
infrastructure account--Finding--Intent--Purpose--1996 c 262) and 1996 c 262 s
1; and

(26) RCW
82.44.900 (Severability--Construction--1961 c 15) and 1961 c 15 s
82.44.900.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Motor vehicles are exempt from property taxation.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "motor vehicle"
means all motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers used, or of the type
designed primarily to be used, upon the public streets and highways, for the
convenience or pleasure of the owner, or for the conveyance, for hire or
otherwise, of persons or property, including fixed loads and facilities for
human habitation; but shall not include (a) vehicles carrying exempt licenses,
(b) dock and warehouse tractors and their cars or trailers, lumber carriers of
the type known as spiders, and all other automotive equipment not designed
primarily for use upon public streets or highways, (c) motor vehicles or their
trailers used entirely upon private property, (d) mobile homes and travel
trailers as defined in RCW 82.50.010, or (e) motor vehicles owned by nonresident
military personnel of the armed forces of the United States stationed in the
state of Washington provided personnel were also nonresident at the time of
their entry into military service.

---
END ---