BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
47.60.120 and 1993 c 427 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If the department acquires or constructs, maintains, and operates any ((ferry
crossings upon or)) toll bridges over Puget Sound or any of its tributary
or connecting waters, there shall not be constructed, operated, or maintained
any other ((ferry crossing upon or)) bridge over any such waters within
ten miles of any such ((crossing or)) bridge operated or maintained by
the department excepting such bridges ((or ferry crossings)) in
existence, and being operated and maintained under a lawfully issued franchise
at the time of the ((location of the ferry crossing or)) construction of
the toll bridge by the department.

(2)
The ten-mile distance in subsection (1) of this section means ten statute miles
measured by airline distance. ((The ten-mile restriction shall be applied
by comparing the two end points (termini) of a state ferry crossing to those of
a private ferry crossing.))

(3)
((The Washington utilities and transportation commission may, upon written
petition of a commercial ferry operator certificated or applying for
certification under chapter 81.84 RCW, and upon notice and hearing, grant a
waiver from the ten-mile restriction. The waiver must not be detrimental to
the public interest. In making a decision to waive the ten-mile restriction,
the commission shall consider, but is not limited to, the impact of the waiver
on transportation congestion mitigation, air quality improvement, and the
overall impact on the Washington state ferry system. The commission shall act
upon a request for a waiver within ninety days after the conclusion of the
hearing. A waiver is effective for a period of five years from the date of
issuance. At the end of five years the waiver becomes permanent unless
appealed within thirty days by the commission on its own motion, the
department, or an interested party.

(4))) The department shall not maintain and operate
any ((ferry crossing or)) toll bridge over Puget Sound or any of its
tributary or connecting waters that would infringe upon any franchise lawfully
issued by the state and in existence and being exercised at the time of the ((location
of the ferry crossing or)) construction of the toll bridge by the
department, without first acquiring the rights granted to such franchise holder
under the franchise.

Sec.
2. RCW
81.84.020 and 1993 c 427 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Upon the filing of an application the commission shall give reasonable notice
to the department, affected cities and counties, and any common carrier which
might be adversely affected, of the time and place for hearing on such
application. The commission shall have power after hearing, to issue the
certificate as prayed for, or to refuse to issue it, or to issue it for the
partial exercise only of the privilege sought, and may attach to the exercise
of the rights granted by said certificate such terms and conditions as in its
judgment the public convenience and necessity may require; but the commission
shall not have power to grant a certificate to operate between districts and/or
into any territory ((prohibited by RCW 47.60.120 or)) already served by
an existing certificate holder, unless such existing certificate holder has
failed or refused to furnish reasonable and adequate service or has failed to
provide the service described in its certificate or tariffs after the time
period allowed to initiate service has elapsed: PROVIDED, A certificate shall
be granted when it shall appear to the satisfaction of the commission that the
commercial ferry was actually operating in good faith over the route for which
such certificate shall be sought, on January 15, 1927: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That
in case two or more commercial ferries shall upon said date have been operating
vessels upon the same route, or between the same districts the commission shall
determine after public hearing whether one or more certificates shall issue,
and in determining to whom a certificate or certificates shall be issued, the
commission shall consider all material facts and circumstances including the
prior operation, schedules, and services rendered by either of the ferries, and
in case more than one certificate shall issue, the commission shall fix and
determine the schedules and services of the ferries to which the certificates
are issued to the end that duplication of service be eliminated and public
convenience be furthered.

(2)
Before issuing a certificate, the commission shall determine that the applicant
has the financial resources to operate the proposed service for at least twelve
months, based upon the submission by the applicant of a pro forma financial
statement of operations. Issuance of a certificate shall be determined upon,
but not limited to, the following factors: Ridership and revenue forecasts;
the cost of service for the proposed operation; an estimate of the cost of the
assets to be used in providing the service; a statement of the total assets on
hand of the applicant that will be expended on the proposed operation; and a
statement of prior experience, if any, in such field by the applicant. The
documentation required of the applicant under this section shall comply with
the provisions of RCW 9A.72.085.

(3) Subsection (2) of this section does not apply to an application
for a certificate that is pending as of July 25, 1993.

---
END ---