BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall sell all passenger-only vessels within two years of the
effective date of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each
repealed, effective July 1, 2002:

(1) RCW
47.60.560 (General obligation bonds--Ferries--Authorized--Purposes--Passenger-only
vessels--Issuance, sale, and retirement) and 1986 c 290 s 8, 1985 c 176 s 1,
1984 c 7 s 336, & 1977 ex.s. c 360 s 1;

(2) RCW
47.60.645 (Passenger ferry account) and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 14 s
558;

(3) RCW
47.60.649 (Passenger-only ferry service--Finding) and 1998 c 166
s 1;

(4) RCW
47.60.652 (Passenger-only ferry service--Vessel and terminal
acquisition, procurement, and construction) and 1998 c 166 s 2; and

(5) RCW
47.60.654 (Passenger-only ferry service--Contingency) and 1998 c
166 s 3.

---
END ---