BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.17.020 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

There
shall be a chief executive officer of each department to be known as: (1) The
secretary of social and health services, (2) the director of ecology, (3) the
director of labor and industries, (4) the director of agriculture, (5) the
director of fish and wildlife, (6) the secretary of transportation, (7) the
director of licensing, (8) the director of general administration, (9) the
director of community, trade, and economic development, (10) the director of
veterans affairs, (11) the director of revenue, (12) the director of retirement
systems, (13) the secretary of corrections, ((and)) (14) the secretary
of health, and (15) the director of financial institutions.

Such
officers, except ((the secretary of transportation and)) the director of
fish and wildlife, shall be appointed by the governor, with the consent of the
senate, and hold office at the pleasure of the governor. ((The secretary of
transportation shall be appointed by the transportation commission as
prescribed by RCW 47.01.041.)) The director of fish and wildlife shall be
appointed by the fish and wildlife commission as prescribed by RCW 77.04.055.

Sec.
2. RCW
47.01.041 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 53 s 28 are each amended to read as follows:

The
executive head of the department of transportation shall be the secretary of
transportation, who shall be appointed by the ((transportation commission))
governor, with the consent of the senate, and shall be paid a salary to
be fixed by the governor in accordance with the provisions of RCW 43.03.040.
The secretary shall be an ex officio member of the commission without a vote.
The secretary shall be the chief executive officer of the commission ((and
be responsible to it, and shall be guided by policies established by it)).
The secretary shall serve ((until removed by the commission, but only for
incapacity, incompetence, neglect of duty, malfeasance in office, or failure to
carry out the commission's policies. Before a motion for dismissal shall be
acted on by the commission, the secretary shall be granted a hearing on formal
written charges before the full commission. An action by the commission to
remove the secretary shall be final)) at the pleasure of the governor.

---
END ---