BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.61.165 and 1999 c 206 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
state department of transportation and the local authorities ((are
authorized to)) may not reserve all or any portion of any highway
under their respective jurisdictions, including any designated lane or ramp,
for the exclusive or preferential use of public transportation vehicles or
private motor vehicles carrying no fewer than a specified number of passengers
((when such limitation will increase the efficient utilization of the
highway or will aid in the conservation of energy resources. Regulations
authorizing such exclusive or preferential use of a highway facility may be
declared to be effective at all times or at specified times of day or on
specified days. Violation of a restriction of highway usage prescribed by the
appropriate authority under this section is a traffic infraction)).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
81.100.010 (Purpose) and 1990 c 43 s 12;

(2) RCW
81.100.020 (Definitions) and 1990 c 43 s 13;

(3) RCW
81.100.030 (Employer tax) and 1991 c 363 s 153 & 1990 c 43 s
14;

(4) RCW
81.100.040 (Adoption of goals) and 1990 c 43 s 15;

(5) RCW
81.100.050 (Survey of tax use) and 1990 c 43 s 16;

(6) RCW
81.100.060 (Excise tax) and 1998 c 321 s 34 (Referendum Bill No.
49), 1992 c 194 s 12, 1991 c 363 s 154, & 1990 c 43 s 17;

(7) RCW
81.100.070 (High occupancy vehicle account) and 1991 sp.s. c 13 ss
105, 119 & 1990 c 43 s 18;

(8) RCW
81.100.080 (Use of funds) and 1990 c 43 s 19;

(9) RCW
81.100.090 (Interlocal agreements) and 1990 c 43 s 20; and

(10) RCW
81.100.100 (Urban public transportation system) and 1990 c 43 s
21.

---
END ---