BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
49.60.040 and 1997 c 271 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"Person" includes one or more individuals, partnerships,
associations, organizations, corporations, cooperatives, legal representatives,
trustees and receivers, or any group of persons; it includes any owner, lessee,
proprietor, manager, agent, or employee, whether one or more natural persons;
and further includes any political or civil subdivisions of the state and any
agency or instrumentality of the state or of any political or civil subdivision
thereof;

(2)
"Commission" means the Washington state human rights commission;

(3)
"Employer" includes any person acting in the interest of an employer,
directly or indirectly, who employs eight or more persons, and does not include
any religious or sectarian organization not organized for private profit;

(4)
"Employee" does not include any individual employed by his or her
parents, spouse, or child, or in the domestic service of any person;

(5)
"Labor organization" includes any organization which exists for the
purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing with employers concerning grievances
or terms or conditions of employment, or for other mutual aid or protection in
connection with employment;

(6)
"Employment agency" includes any person undertaking with or without
compensation to recruit, procure, refer, or place employees for an employer;

(7)
"Marital status" means the legal status of being married, single,
separated, divorced, or widowed;

(8)
"National origin" includes "ancestry";

(9)
"Full enjoyment of" includes the right to purchase any service,
commodity, or article of personal property offered or sold on, or by, any
establishment to the public, and the admission of any person to accommodations,
advantages, facilities, or privileges of any place of public resort,
accommodation, assemblage, or amusement, without acts directly or indirectly
causing persons of any particular race, creed, color, sex, national origin, or
with any sensory, mental, or physical disability, or the use of a trained dog
guide or service animal by a disabled person, to be treated as not welcome,
accepted, desired, or solicited;

(10)(a)
"Any place of public resort, accommodation, assemblage, or amusement"
includes, but is not limited to, any place, licensed or unlicensed, kept for
gain, hire, or reward, or where charges are made for admission, service,
occupancy, or use of any property or facilities, whether conducted for the
entertainment, housing, or lodging of transient guests, or for the benefit,
use, or accommodation of those seeking health, recreation, or rest, or for the
burial or other disposition of human remains, or for the sale of goods,
merchandise, services, or personal property, or for the rendering of personal
services, or for public conveyance or transportation on land, water, or in the
air, including the stations and terminals thereof and the garaging of vehicles,
or where food or beverages of any kind are sold for consumption on the
premises, or where public amusement, entertainment, sports, or recreation of
any kind is offered with or without charge including golf and/or country
clubs whether public or private, or where medical service or care is made
available, or where the public gathers, congregates, or assembles for amusement,
recreation, or public purposes, or public halls, public elevators, and public
washrooms of buildings and structures occupied by two or more tenants, or by
the owner and one or more tenants, or any public library or educational
institution, or schools of special instruction, or nursery schools, or day care
centers or children's camps((: PROVIDED, That));

(b)
Nothing contained in this ((definition)) subsection shall be
construed to include or apply to any institute, bona fide club other than a
golf and/or country club, or place of accommodation, which is by its nature
distinctly private, including fraternal organizations, though where public use
is permitted that use shall be covered by this chapter; nor shall anything
contained in this definition apply to any educational facility, columbarium,
crematory, mausoleum, or cemetery operated or maintained by a bona fide
religious or sectarian institution;

(11)
"Real property" includes buildings, structures, dwellings, real
estate, lands, tenements, leaseholds, interests in real estate cooperatives,
condominiums, and hereditaments, corporeal and incorporeal, or any interest
therein;

(12)
"Real estate transaction" includes the sale, appraisal, brokering,
exchange, purchase, rental, or lease of real property, transacting or applying
for a real estate loan, or the provision of brokerage services;

(13)
"Dwelling" means any building, structure, or portion thereof that is
occupied as, or designed or intended for occupancy as, a residence by one or
more families, and any vacant land that is offered for sale or lease for the
construction or location thereon of any such building, structure, or portion thereof;

(14)
"Sex" means gender;

(15)
"Aggrieved person" means any person who: (a) Claims to have been
injured by an unfair practice in a real estate transaction; or (b) believes
that he or she will be injured by an unfair practice in a real estate transaction
that is about to occur;

(16)
"Complainant" means the person who files a complaint in a real estate
transaction;

(17)
"Respondent" means any person accused in a complaint or amended
complaint of an unfair practice in a real estate transaction;

(18)
"Credit transaction" includes any open or closed end credit
transaction, whether in the nature of a loan, retail installment transaction,
credit card issue or charge, or otherwise, and whether for personal or for
business purposes, in which a service, finance, or interest charge is imposed,
or which provides for repayment in scheduled payments, when such credit is
extended in the regular course of any trade or commerce, including but not
limited to transactions by banks, savings and loan associations or other
financial lending institutions of whatever nature, stock brokers, or by a
merchant or mercantile establishment which as part of its ordinary business
permits or provides that payment for purchases of property or service therefrom
may be deferred;

(19)
"Families with children status" means one or more individuals who
have not attained the age of eighteen years being domiciled with a parent or
another person having legal custody of such individual or individuals, or with
the designee of such parent or other person having such legal custody, with the
written permission of such parent or other person. Families with children
status also applies to any person who is pregnant or is in the process of
securing legal custody of any individual who has not attained the age of
eighteen years;

(20)
"Covered multifamily dwelling" means: (a) Buildings consisting of
four or more dwelling units if such buildings have one or more elevators; and
(b) ground floor dwelling units in other buildings consisting of four or more
dwelling units;

(21)
"Premises" means the interior or exterior spaces, parts, components,
or elements of a building, including individual dwelling units and the public
and common use areas of a building;

(22)
"Dog guide" means a dog that is trained for the purpose of guiding
blind persons or a dog that is trained for the purpose of assisting hearing
impaired persons;

(23) "Service animal" means an animal that is trained for
the purpose of assisting or accommodating a disabled person's sensory, mental,
or physical disability.

---
END ---