BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
4.24.550 and 1998 c 220 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Public agencies are ((authorized)) required to release
information to the public regarding sex offenders and kidnapping offenders when
the agency determines that disclosure of the information is relevant and
necessary to protect the public and counteract the danger created by the
particular offender. This ((authorization)) requirement applies
to information regarding: (a) Any person adjudicated or convicted of a sex
offense as defined in RCW 9A.44.130 or a kidnapping offense as defined by RCW
9A.44.130; (b) any person under the jurisdiction of the indeterminate sentence
review board as the result of a sex offense or kidnapping offense; (c) any
person committed as a sexually violent predator under chapter 71.09 RCW or as a
sexual psychopath under chapter 71.06 RCW; (d) any person found not guilty of a
sex offense or kidnapping offense by reason of insanity under chapter 10.77
RCW; and (e) any person found incompetent to stand trial for a sex offense or
kidnapping offense and subsequently committed under chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW.

(2)
The extent of the public disclosure of relevant and necessary information shall
be rationally related to: (a) The level of risk posed by the offender to the
community; (b) the locations where the offender resides, expects to reside, or
is regularly found; and (c) the needs of the affected community members for
information to enhance their individual and collective safety.

(3)
Local law enforcement agencies shall consider the following guidelines in
determining the extent of a public disclosure made under this section: (a) For
offenders classified as risk level I, the agency shall share information with
other appropriate law enforcement agencies and ((may)) shall
disclose, upon request, relevant, necessary, and accurate information to any
victim or witness to the offense and to any individual community member who
lives near the residence where the offender resides, expects to reside, or is
regularly found; (b) for offenders classified as risk level II, the agency ((may))
shall also disclose relevant, necessary, and accurate information to
public and private schools, child day care centers, family day care providers,
businesses and organizations that serve primarily children, women, or
vulnerable adults, and neighbors and community groups near the residence where
the offender resides, expects to reside, or is regularly found; and (c) for
offenders classified as risk level III, the agency ((may)) shall
also disclose relevant, necessary, and accurate information to the public at
large.

(4)
Local law enforcement agencies that disseminate information pursuant to this
section shall: (a) Review available risk level classifications made by the
department of corrections, the department of social and health services, and
the indeterminate sentence review board; (b) assign risk level classifications
to all offenders about whom information will be disseminated; and (c) make a
good faith effort to notify the public and residents at least fourteen days
before the offender is released from confinement or, where an offender moves
from another jurisdiction, as soon as possible after the agency learns of the
offender's move, except that in no case may this notification provision be
construed to require an extension of an offender's release date. The juvenile
court shall provide local law enforcement officials with all relevant information
on offenders allowed to remain in the community in a timely manner.

(5)
An appointed or elected public official, public employee, or public agency as
defined in RCW 4.24.470 is immune from civil liability for damages for any
discretionary risk level classification decisions or release of relevant and
necessary information, unless it is shown that the official, employee, or
agency acted with gross negligence or in bad faith. The immunity in this
section applies to risk level classification decisions and the release of
relevant and necessary information regarding any individual for whom disclosure
is authorized. The decision of a local law enforcement agency or official to
classify an offender to a risk level other than the one assigned by the department
of corrections, the department of social and health services, or the
indeterminate sentence review board, or the release of any relevant and
necessary information based on that different classification shall not, by
itself, be considered gross negligence or bad faith. The immunity provided
under this section applies to the release of relevant and necessary information
to other public officials, public employees, or public agencies, and to the
general public.

(6)
Except as may otherwise be provided by law, nothing in this section shall
impose any liability upon a public official, public employee, or public agency
for failing to release information authorized under this section.

(7)
Nothing in this section implies that information regarding persons designated
in subsection (1) of this section is confidential except as may otherwise be
provided by law.

(8) When a local law enforcement agency or official classifies an
offender differently than the offender is classified by the department of
corrections, the department of social and health services, or the indeterminate
sentence review board, the law enforcement agency or official shall notify the
appropriate department or the board and submit its reasons supporting the
change in classification.

---
END ---