BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the personal responsibility and work opportunity
reconciliation act of 1996, known as the federal welfare reform law, placed a
major emphasis on the concept of personal responsibility for welfare
recipients. The legislature finds that the state, as a partner in welfare
reform, also has a major responsibility to help those in need who are applicants
or recipients of temporary assistance for needy families. The state's
responsibility includes the timely assessment and identification of applicants
or recipients who are presently the victims of domestic violence, in order to
refer them for appropriate help or treatment, and in order to promote their
safety and well-being by avoiding inappropriate work activity assignments that
may place the victims at increased risk.

The
legislature intends that the caseworkers, social workers, case managers, those
performing client assessments, and job service specialists who come into direct
contact with applicants or recipients of temporary assistance for needy
families will be trained to identify and assist domestic violence victims.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The department shall develop screening procedures for identifying victims of
domestic violence and monitor compliance with such procedures by its employees,
contractors, and subcontractors. Such procedures shall include universal
notification to all applicants and recipients of temporary assistance for needy
families and state family assistance of the following:

(a)
Availability of supportive services;

(b)
Options for exemption or deferral of program requirements that make it more
difficult for applicants or recipients to escape from domestic violence or
unfairly penalize them for being victims of domestic violence;

(c)
Procedures for obtaining supportive services or applying for exemptions or
deferrals; and

(d)
Procedures for voluntary and confidential disclosure of eligibility by the
client for referrals to supportive services and deferral of program
requirements.

(2)
Notification shall be given in writing and orally at the time of application.
Domestic violence screening procedures shall also include indicators of the
risk of domestic violence for use by the department's employees, contractors,
and subcontractors during all interactions with applicants and recipients. The
domestic violence screening procedures shall also include a procedure to review
confirmed cases of domestic violence involving recipients in order to develop
better ways to identify and successfully respond to the risk of domestic violence
as early as possible. Notification procedures allow applicants and recipients
to voluntarily and confidentially disclose their eligibility for services or
deferral at any time. At no time may an applicant or recipient's decision not
to disclose eligibility for services, exemptions, or deferrals preclude
disclosure at a later date, nor may it preclude future access to services,
exemptions, or deferrals.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
department shall monitor compliance with departmental procedures contained in
section 2 of this act by department employees, contractors, and subcontractors,
to ensure that any information regarding any applicant or recipient of
temporary assistance for needy families who claims to be a past or present
victim of domestic violence or an individual at risk of future domestic
violence, whether provided by the victim or by a third party, shall remain
confidential. This information shall be used by the department solely for the
purpose of referral to services under section 4 of this act or determining
eligibility for deferrals of program requirements. Information regarding
victims of domestic violence or anyone who claims to be a victim of domestic
violence shall not be released to any outside party or parties or other
governmental agencies unless the information is required to be disclosed by law
or unless authorized in writing by the applicant or recipient. This includes,
but is not limited to information on the applicant or recipient's current address,
workplace, or work placement, that the individual has been identified as the
victim of domestic violence, or any details concerning the domestic violence.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
department shall develop and monitor compliance with procedures for the
department and its employees, contractors, and subcontractors for referring
victims of domestic violence to appropriate services. Whenever an applicant or
recipient of temporary assistance for needy families or state family assistance
self-identifies, or is otherwise identified, as a past or present victim of
domestic violence or a person at risk of future domestic violence, the
department shall refer that individual to an employee trained in domestic
violence issues who will provide information about how to contact existing
local services. Services may include but are not limited to: Shelters for
battered individuals, medical services, domestic abuse hotlines, emergency aid
for individuals fleeing domestic violence, legal counseling and advocacy, law
enforcement, mental health care, counseling, support groups, and financial
assistance for victims of crime.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
Nothing in sections 2 through 4 of this act may be interpreted as requiring any
action by a domestic violence victim such as seeking an order of protection,
attending counseling, or other actions not required of other applicants or
recipients.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
department of social and health services and the employment security department
shall provide or contract to provide specialized training in culturally
competent identification and appropriate assistance of domestic violence
victims. Training shall include, at a minimum, the need for safety and
confidentiality, the identification of patterns and cycles of abuse, and
awareness of local and regional resources for legal assistance, counseling, and
safe house organizations.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. Sections
2 through 6 of this act are each added to chapter 74.08A RCW.

---
END ---