BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.94A.175 and 1988 c 153 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

If
the offender violates any condition of postrelease supervision, a hearing may
be conducted in the same manner as provided in RCW 9.94A.200. Jurisdiction
shall be with the court of the county in which the offender was sentenced.
However, the court may order a change of venue to the offender's county of
residence or where the violation occurred, for the purpose of holding a
violation hearing.

After
the hearing, the court may order the offender to be confined for up to sixty
days per violation in the county jail. Reimbursement to a city or county for
the care of offenders who are detained solely for violating a condition of
postrelease supervision shall be ((under RCW 70.48.440)) made
pursuant to section 3 of this act. A county shall be reimbursed for indigent
defense costs for offenders who are detained solely for violating a condition
of postrelease supervision in accordance with regulations to be promulgated by
the office of financial management. An offender may be held in jail at state
expense pending the hearing, and any time served while awaiting the hearing
shall be credited against confinement imposed for a violation. The court shall
retain jurisdiction for the purpose of holding the violation hearing and
imposing a sanction.

Sec.
2. RCW
9.94A.207 and 1999 c 196 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The secretary may issue warrants for the arrest of any offender who violates a
condition of community placement or community custody. The arrest warrants
shall authorize any law enforcement or peace officer or community corrections
officer of this state or any other state where such offender may be located, to
arrest the offender and place him or her in total confinement pending
disposition of the alleged violation. The department shall compensate the
local jurisdictions ((at the office of financial management's
adjudicated rate,)) in accordance with ((RCW 70.48.440)) section
3 of this act. A community corrections officer, if he or she has
reasonable cause to believe an offender in community placement or community
custody has violated a condition of community placement or community custody,
may suspend the person's community placement or community custody status and
arrest or cause the arrest and detention in total confinement of the offender,
pending the determination of the secretary as to whether the violation has
occurred. The community corrections officer shall report to the secretary all
facts and circumstances and the reasons for the action of suspending community
placement or community custody status. A violation of a condition of community
placement or community custody shall be deemed a violation of the sentence for
purposes of RCW 9.94A.195. The authority granted to community corrections officers
under this section shall be in addition to that set forth in RCW 9.94A.195.

(2)
Inmates, as defined in RCW 72.09.015, sentenced to more than twelve months
of total confinement, who have been transferred to community custody or
community placement and who are detained in a local correctional facility
are the financial responsibility of the department of corrections((, except
as provided in subsection (3) of this section)). The community custody
inmate shall be removed from the local correctional facility, except as
provided in subsection (3) of this section, not later than eight days,
excluding weekends and holidays, following admittance to the local correctional
facility and notification that the inmate is available for movement to a state
correctional institution.

(3)
The department may negotiate with local correctional authorities for an
additional period of detention; however, sex offenders sanctioned for community
custody violations under RCW 9.94A.205(2) to a term of confinement shall remain
in the local correctional facility for the complete term of the sanction. ((For
confinement sanctions imposed under RCW 9.94A.205(2)(a), the local correctional
facility shall be financially responsible. For confinement sanctions imposed
under RCW 9.94A.205(2)(b), the department of corrections shall be financially
responsible for that portion of the sanction served during the time in which
the sex offender is on community custody in lieu of earned release, and the
local correctional facility shall be financially responsible for that portion
of the sanction served by the sex offender after the time in which the sex
offender is on community custody in lieu of earned release.)) The
department, in consultation with the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs and those counties in which the sheriff does not operate a
correctional facility, shall establish a methodology for determining the
department's local correctional facilities bed utilization rate, for each
county in calendar year 1998, for offenders being held for violations of
conditions of community custody, community placement, or community
supervision. For confinement sanctions imposed under RCW 9.94A.205(2) (c) or
(d) where the offender has been sentenced to a term of community custody
under RCW 9.94A.383, the local correctional facility shall continue to be
financially responsible to the extent of the calendar year 1998 bed utilization
rate. If the department's use of bed space in local correctional facilities of
any county for confinement sanctions imposed on felony offenders
sentenced to a term of community custody under RCW 9.94A.383 and confined to
the local correctional facility pursuant to RCW 9.94A.205(2) (c) or (d)
exceeds the 1998 bed utilization rate for the county, the department shall
compensate the county for the excess use at the per diem rate equal to the
lowest rate charged by the county under its contract with a municipal
government during the year in which the use occurs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall reimburse cities and counties for the care of sentenced felons
who are the financial responsibility of the department and who are detained in
a city or county jail at the per diem rate equal to the lowest rate charged by
that county under its contract with a municipal government during the year in
which the use occurs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. RCW
70.48.440 (Office of financial management to establish
reimbursement rate for cities and counties--Rate until June 30,
1985--Re-establishment of rates) and 1984 c 235 s 5 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This
act takes effect July 1, 2002.

---
END ---