BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
67.70.042 and 1997 c 220 s 207 are each amended to read as follows:

The lottery commission shall conduct ((at least two but not more
than four scratch games with sports themes per year)) new games and
additional drawings for games existing on the effective date of this act.
These games are intended to generate additional moneys sufficient to cover the
distributions under RCW 67.70.240(4). For purposes of this section, the
lottery may accept and market prize promotions provided in conjunction with
private sector marketing efforts.

---
END ---