BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.14.200 and 1998 c 321 s 8 (Referendum Bill No. 49) are each amended to read
as follows:

There
is created in the state treasury a special account to be known as the
"county sales and use tax equalization account." ((Into this
account shall be placed a portion of all motor vehicle excise tax receipts as
provided in RCW 82.44.110.)) In calendar year 2000, the state treasurer
shall transfer into the county sales and use tax equalization account from the
general fund the sum of five million eight hundred thousand dollars divided
into two equal deposits occurring on the first day of the months of July and
October. In calendar year 2001, the state treasurer shall transfer into the
county sales and use tax equalization account from the general fund the sum of
eight million two hundred thousand dollars divided into four equal deposits occurring
on the first day of the months of January, April, July, and October. For each
calendar year thereafter, the state treasurer shall increase the total transfer
by the fiscal growth factor, as defined in RCW 43.135.025, forecast for that
fiscal year by the office of financial management in November of the preceding
year. Funds in this account shall be allocated by the state treasurer
according to the following procedure:

(1)
Prior to April 1st of each year the director of revenue shall inform the state
treasurer of the total and the per capita levels of revenues for the
unincorporated area of each county and the state-wide weighted average per
capita level of revenues for the unincorporated areas of all counties imposing
the sales and use tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) for the previous
calendar year.

(2) ((At
such times as distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150)) On the first
day of the months of January, April, July, and October of each year, the
state treasurer shall apportion to each county imposing the sales and use tax
under RCW 82.14.030(1) at the maximum rate and receiving less than one hundred
fifty thousand dollars from the tax for the previous calendar year, an amount
from the county sales and use tax equalization account sufficient, when added
to the amount of revenues received the previous calendar year by the county, to
equal one hundred fifty thousand dollars.

The
department of revenue shall establish a governmental price index as provided in
this subsection. The base year for the index shall be the end of the third
quarter of 1982. Prior to November 1, 1983, and prior to each November 1st
thereafter, the department of revenue shall establish another index figure for
the third quarter of that year. The department of revenue may use the implicit
price deflators for state and local government purchases of goods and services
calculated by the United States department of commerce to establish the
governmental price index. Beginning on January 1, 1984, and each January 1st
thereafter, the one hundred fifty thousand dollar base figure in this
subsection shall be adjusted in direct proportion to the percentage change in
the governmental price index from 1982 until the year before the adjustment.
Distributions made under this subsection for 1984 and thereafter shall use this
adjusted base amount figure.

(3)
Subsequent to the distributions under subsection (2) of this section and at
such times as distributions are made under ((RCW 82.44.150)) subsection
(2) of this section, the state treasurer shall apportion to each county
imposing the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(1) at the maximum rate and
receiving less than seventy percent of the state-wide weighted average per
capita level of revenues for the unincorporated areas of all counties as
determined by the department of revenue under subsection (1) of this section,
an amount from the county sales and use tax equalization account sufficient,
when added to the per capita level of revenues for the unincorporated area
received the previous calendar year by the county, to equal seventy percent of
the state-wide weighted average per capita level of revenues for the
unincorporated areas of all counties determined under subsection (1) of this
section, subject to reduction under subsections (6) and (7) of this section.
When computing distributions under this section, any distribution under
subsection (2) of this section shall be considered revenues received from the
tax imposed under RCW 82.14.030(1) for the previous calendar year.

(4)
Subsequent to the distributions under subsection (3) of this section and at
such times as distributions are made under ((RCW 82.44.150)) subsection
(2) of this section, the state treasurer shall apportion to each county
imposing the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate and
receiving a distribution under subsection (2) of this section, a third
distribution from the county sales and use tax equalization account. The
distribution to each qualifying county shall be equal to the distribution to
the county under subsection (2) of this section, subject to the reduction under
subsections (6) and (7) of this section. To qualify for the total distribution
under this subsection, the county must impose the tax under RCW 82.14.030(2)
for the entire calendar year. Counties imposing the tax for less than the full
year shall qualify for prorated allocations under this subsection proportionate
to the number of months of the year during which the tax is imposed.

(5)
Subsequent to the distributions under subsection (4) of this section and at
such times as distributions are made under ((RCW 82.44.150)) subsection
(2) of this section, the state treasurer shall apportion to each county
imposing the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate and
receiving a distribution under subsection (3) of this section, a fourth
distribution from the county sales and use tax equalization account. The
distribution to each qualifying county shall be equal to the distribution to
the county under subsection (3) of this section, subject to the reduction under
subsections (6) and (7) of this section. To qualify for the distributions
under this subsection, the county must impose the tax under RCW 82.14.030(2)
for the entire calendar year. Counties imposing the tax for less than the full
year shall qualify for prorated allocations under this subsection proportionate
to the number of months of the year during which the tax is imposed.

(6)
Revenues distributed under subsections (2) through (5) of this section in any
calendar year shall not exceed an amount equal to seventy percent of the
state-wide weighted average per capita level of revenues for the unincorporated
areas of all counties during the previous calendar year. If distributions
under subsections (3) through (5) of this section cannot be made because of
this limitation, then distributions under subsections (3) through (5) of this
section shall be reduced ratably among the qualifying counties.

(7) If
inadequate revenues exist in the county sales and use tax equalization account
to make the distributions under subsections (3) through (5) of this section,
then the distributions under subsections (3) through (5) of this section shall
be reduced ratably among the qualifying counties. At such time during the year
as additional funds accrue to the county sales and use tax equalization
account, additional distributions shall be made under subsections (3) through
(5) of this section to the counties.

(8) If
the level of revenues in the county sales and use tax equalization account
exceeds the amount necessary to make the distributions under subsections (2)
through (5) of this section, at such times as distributions are made under ((RCW
82.44.150)) subsection (2) of this section, the state treasurer
shall apportion an amount to the county public health account created in RCW
70.05.125 equal to the adjustment under RCW 70.05.125(2)(b).

(9) If
the level of revenues in the county sales and use tax equalization account
exceeds the amount necessary to make the distributions under subsections (2)
through (5) and (8) of this section, then the additional revenues shall be
credited and transferred as follows:

(a)
Fifty percent to the public facilities construction loan revolving account
under RCW 43.160.080; and

(b)
Fifty percent to the distressed county public facilities construction loan
account under RCW 43.160.220, or so much thereof as will not cause the balance
in the account to exceed twenty-five million dollars. Any remaining funds
shall be deposited into the public facilities construction loan revolving
account.

Sec.
2. RCW
82.14.210 and 1996 c 64 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

There
is created in the state treasury a special account to be known as the
"municipal sales and use tax equalization account." ((Into this
account shall be placed such revenues as are provided under RCW
82.44.110(1)(e).)) In calendar year 2000, the state treasurer shall
transfer into the municipal sales and use tax equalization account from the
general fund the sum of thirty-one million four hundred thousand dollars
divided into two equal deposits occurring on the first day of the months of
July and October. In calendar year 2001, the state treasurer shall transfer
into the municipal sales and use tax equalization account from the general fund
the sum of forty-four million four hundred thousand dollars divided into four
equal deposits occurring on the first day of the months of January, April,
July, and October. For each calendar year thereafter, the state treasurer
shall increase the total transfer by the fiscal growth factor, as defined in
RCW 43.135.025, forecast for that fiscal year by the office of financial
management in November of the preceding year. Funds in this account shall
be allocated by the state treasurer according to the following procedure:

(1)
Prior to January 1st of each year the department of revenue shall determine the
total and the per capita levels of revenues for each city and the state-wide
weighted average per capita level of revenues for all cities imposing the sales
and use tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) for the previous calendar year.

(2) ((At
such times as distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150)) On the first
day of the months of January, April, July, and October of each year, the
state treasurer shall apportion to each city not imposing the sales and use tax
under RCW 82.14.030(2) an amount from the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account equal to the amount distributed to the city under RCW
82.44.155, multiplied by forty‑five fifty‑fifths.

(3)
Subsequent to the distributions under subsection (2) of this section, and at
such times as distributions are made under ((RCW 82.44.150)) subsection
(2) of this section, the state treasurer shall apportion to each city
imposing the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(1) at the maximum rate and
receiving less than seventy percent of the state-wide weighted average per
capita level of revenues for all cities as determined by the department of
revenue under subsection (1) of this section, an amount from the municipal
sales and use tax equalization account sufficient, when added to the per capita
level of revenues received the previous calendar year by the city, to equal
seventy percent of the state-wide weighted average per capita level of revenues
for all cities determined under subsection (1) of this section, subject to
reduction under subsection (6) of this section.

(4)
Subsequent to the distributions under subsection (3) of this section, and at
such times as distributions are made under ((RCW 82.44.150)) subsection
(2) of this section, the state treasurer shall apportion to each city
imposing the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate and
receiving a distribution under subsection (3) of this section, a third
distribution from the municipal sales and use tax equalization account. The
distribution to each qualifying city shall be equal to the distribution to the
city under subsection (3) of this section, subject to the reduction under subsection
(6) of this section. To qualify for the distributions under this subsection,
the city must impose the tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) for the entire calendar
year. Cities imposing the tax for less than the full year shall qualify for
prorated allocations under this subsection proportionate to the number of
months of the year during which the tax is imposed.

(5)
For a city with an official incorporation date after January 1, 1990, municipal
sales and use tax equalization distributions shall be made according to the
procedures in this subsection. Municipal sales and use tax equalization
distributions to eligible new cities shall be made at the same time as
distributions are made under subsections (3) and (4) of this section. The
department of revenue shall follow the estimating procedures outlined in this
subsection until the new city has received a full year's worth of revenues
under RCW 82.14.030(1) as of the January municipal sales and use tax
equalization distribution.

(a)
Whether a newly incorporated city determined to receive funds under this
subsection receives its first equalization payment at the January, April, July,
or October municipal sales and use tax equalization distribution shall depend
on the date the city first imposes the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1).

(i) A
newly incorporated city imposing the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1)
effective as of January 1st shall be eligible to receive funds under this
subsection beginning with the April municipal sales and use tax equalization
distribution of that year.

(ii) A
newly incorporated city imposing the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1)
effective as of February 1st, March 1st, or April 1st shall be eligible to
receive funds under this subsection beginning with the July municipal sales and
use tax equalization distribution of that year.

(iii)
A newly incorporated city imposing the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1)
effective as of May 1st, June 1st, or July 1st shall be eligible to receive
funds under this subsection beginning with the October municipal sales and use
tax equalization distribution of that year.

(iv) A
newly incorporated city imposing the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1)
effective as of August 1st, September 1st, or October 1st shall be eligible to
receive funds under this subsection beginning with the January municipal sales
and use tax equalization distribution of the next year.

(v) A
newly incorporated city imposing the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1)
effective as of November 1st or December 1st shall be eligible to receive funds
under this subsection beginning with the April municipal sales and use tax
equalization distribution of the next year.

(b)
For purposes of calculating the amount of funds the new city should receive
under this subsection, the department of revenue shall:

(i)
Estimate the per capita amount of revenues from the tax authorized under RCW
82.14.030(1) that the new city would have received had the city received
revenues from the tax the entire calendar year;

(ii)
Calculate the amount provided under subsection (3) of this section based on the
per capita revenues determined under (b)(i) of this subsection;

(iii)
Prorate the amount determined under (b)(ii) of this subsection by the number of
months the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) is imposed.

(c) A
new city imposing the tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate and
receiving a distribution calculated under (b) of this subsection shall receive
another distribution from the municipal sales and use tax equalization
account. This distribution shall be equal to the calculation made under
(b)(ii) of this subsection, prorated by the number of months the city imposes
the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(2) at the full rate.

(d)
The department of revenue shall advise the state treasurer of the amounts
calculated under (b) and (c) of this subsection and the state treasurer shall
distribute these amounts to the new city from the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account subject to the limitations imposed in subsection (6) of
this section.

(e)
Revenues estimated under this subsection shall not affect the calculation of
the state-wide weighted average per capita level of revenues for all cities
made under subsection (1) of this section.

(6) If
inadequate revenues exist in the municipal sales and use tax equalization
account to make the distributions under subsection (3), (4), or (5) of this
section, then the distributions under subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this
section shall be reduced ratably among the qualifying cities. At such time
during the year as additional funds accrue to the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account, additional distributions shall be made under subsections
(3), (4), and (5) of this section to the cities.

(7)
If the level of revenues in the municipal sales and use tax equalization
account exceeds the amount necessary to make the distributions under
subsections (2) through (5) of this section, then the additional revenues shall
be apportioned among the several cities within the state ratably on the basis
of population as last determined by the office of financial management:
PROVIDED, That no such distribution shall be made to those cities receiving a
distribution under subsection (2) of this section.

---
END ---