BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.46.196 and 1991 c 261 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

((No
person participating in a gambling activity shall in the course of such
participation, directly or indirectly)) "Cheating" as used in
this chapter means to:

(1)
Employ or attempt to employ any device, scheme, or artifice to defraud any
other participant or any operator;

(2)
Engage in any act, practice, or course of operation as would operate as a fraud
or deceit upon any other participant or any operator;

(3)
Engage in any act, practice, or course of operation while participating in a
gambling activity with the intent of cheating any other participant or the
operator to gain an advantage in the game over the other participant or
operator; or

(4)
Cause, aid, abet, or conspire with another person to cause any other person to
violate subsections (1) through (3) of this section.

((Any
person violating this section shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor subject to
the penalty set forth in RCW 9A.20.021.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 9.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of cheating in the first degree if he or she engages in, or
knowingly causes, aids, abets, or conspires with another to engage in cheating
and:

(a)
While engaging in cheating, acts in concert with or conspires with five or more
people; or

(b)
Is licensed by the state of Washington to conduct, manage, or act as an
employee in any authorized gambling activity and engages in cheating upon any
premises.

(2)
Cheating in the first degree is a class B felony subject to the penalty set
forth in RCW 9A.20.021.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 9.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of cheating in the second degree if he or she engages in, or
knowingly causes, aids, abets, or conspires with another to engage in cheating
and, while engaging in cheating, acts in concert with or conspires with another
person or persons but fewer than five people.

(2)
Cheating in the second degree is a class C felony subject to the penalty set
forth in RCW 9A.20.021.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 9.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of cheating in the third degree if he or she engages in
cheating and his or her conduct does not constitute cheating in the first or
second degree.

(2) Cheating in the third degree is a gross misdemeanor subject to
the penalty set forth in RCW 9A.20.021.

---
END ---