BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that:

(1)
State parks are a valuable asset to the people of the state of Washington,
contributing to their health, education, and well-being;

(2)
Well maintained state parks are an attraction and contribute significantly to
the economic well-being of the state of Washington;

(3)
Well maintained state parks encourage the appreciation of the natural resources
and natural beauty of the state of Washington;

(4)
There is an increasing demand for more state parks and more state parks services;

(5)
There are individuals and groups who desire to contribute to the continued
vitality of the state parks system;

(6)
Providing a tax-deductible method for individuals and groups to contribute is
an effective way of increasing available funds to improve the state parks
system; and

(7)
It is in the public interest to create a nonprofit foundation to provide such a
method for individuals and groups to contribute to the preservation,
restoration, and enhancement of the state parks system.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
purpose of the Washington state parks gift foundation is to solicit support for
the state parks system, cooperate with other organizations, and to encourage
gifts to support and improve the state parks.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Foundation" means the Washington state parks gift foundation,
created in section 4 of this act.

(2)
"State parks" means that system of parks administered by the
commission under this title.

(3)
"Eligible grant recipients" includes any and all of the activities of
the commission in carrying out the provisions of this title.

(4)
"Eligible projects" means any project, action, or part of any project
or action that serves to preserve, restore, improve, or enhance the state
parks.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
By September 1, 2000, the commission shall file articles of incorporation in
accordance with the Washington nonprofit corporation act, chapter 24.03 RCW, to
establish the Washington state parks gift foundation. The foundation shall not
be an agency, instrumentality, or political subdivision of the state and shall
not disburse public funds.

(2)
The foundation shall have a board of directors consisting of up to fifteen
members. Initial members of the board shall be appointed by the governor and
collectively have experience in business, charitable giving, outdoor recreation,
and parks administration. Initial appointments shall be made by September 30,
2000. Subsequent board members shall be elected by the general membership of
the foundation.

(3)
Members of the board shall serve three-year terms, except for the initial
terms, which shall be staggered by the governor to achieve a balanced mix of
terms on the board. Members of the board may serve up to a maximum of three
terms. At the end of a term, a member may continue to serve until a successor
has been elected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
As soon as practicable, the board of directors shall organize themselves and
the foundation suitably to carry out the duties of the foundation, including
achieving federal tax-exempt status.

(2)
The foundation shall actively solicit contributions from individuals and groups
for the benefit of the state parks.

(3)
The foundation shall develop criteria for guiding themselves in either the
creation of an endowment, or the making of grants to eligible grant recipients
and eligible projects in the state parks, or both.

(4)
A competitive grant process shall be conducted at least annually by the
foundation to award funds to the state parks. Competitive grant applications
shall only be submitted to the foundation by the commission. The process shall
be started as soon as practicable. Grants shall be awarded to eligible
projects consistent with the criteria developed by the foundation and shall be
available only for state parks use on eligible projects.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. Money
provided to the state parks by the foundation shall not be used to supplant
preexisting funding sources.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 79A RCW.

---
END ---