BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the flood plains of the state's rivers are a part of the
river system and have a significant function, in respect to channel movement
and fish habitat, which is especially important in light of the listings and
potential listings of fish as threatened or endangered under the federal
endangered species act. The legislature further finds that the potential
impacts of surface mining on the significant functions of flood plains are
site-specific, consistently requiring thorough environmental review of
individual projects. The legislature also finds that the state environmental
policy act, rules adopted to implement it, and other applicable environmental
and land use laws prevent unnecessary duplication of environmental review, appropriately
assign responsibilities among local governments and state agencies with
regulatory jurisdiction, and help to protect property and its value.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW to read as follows:

Except
for metals mining and milling operations subject to RCW 43.21C.039, and
notwithstanding any provision in RCW 43.21C.030 and 43.21C.031 to the contrary,
an environmental impact statement shall be prepared for any new or expanded
public or private surface mine when all or part of the proposed mine falls
within a flood plain as defined in WAC 173‑22‑030.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 78.44 RCW to read as follows:

Except for metals mining and milling operations subject to RCW
78.56.050, an environmental impact statement must be prepared for any new or
expanded public or private surface mine when all or part of the proposed mine
falls within a flood plain as defined in WAC 173-22-030.

---
END ---