BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the department of social and health services is required
to fulfill an immense number of responsibilities. Due to this, the department
of social and health services has grown to an unmanageable and unwieldy
bureaucracy that cannot function effectively. It is the intent of the
legislature to abolish the department of social and health services and to
divide the divisions of the department into four separate state agencies. It
is also the intent of the legislature to eliminate the executive division of
the department of social and health services, including but not limited to the
office of the secretary.

PART
1

DEPARTMENT OF
INCOME AND MEDICAL ASSISTANCE

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 101. As
used in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise:

(1)
"Department" means the department of income and medical assistance.

(2)
"Director" means the director of income and medical
assistance.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 102. There
is hereby created a department of state government to be known as the
department of income and medical assistance. The department shall be vested
with all powers and duties transferred to it under this chapter and such other
powers and duties as may be authorized by law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 103. The
executive head and appointing authority of the department shall be the
director. The director shall be appointed by the governor, with the consent of
the senate, and shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. The director
shall be paid a salary to be fixed by the governor in accordance with RCW
43.03.040. If a vacancy occurs in the position while the senate is not in
session, the governor shall make a temporary appointment until the next meeting
of the senate.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 104. It is
the intent of the legislature wherever possible to place the internal affairs
of the department under the control of the director in order that the director
may institute therein the flexible, alert, and intelligent management of its
business that changing contemporary circumstances require. Therefore, whenever
the director's authority is not specifically limited by law, the director shall
have complete charge and supervisory powers over the department. The director
may create such administrative structures as the director considers
appropriate, except as otherwise specified by law. The director may employ
such assistants and personnel as may be necessary for the general
administration of the department. This employment shall be in accordance with
the state civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW, except as otherwise provided.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 105. The
department shall be subdivided into divisions as necessary. Except as
otherwise specified or as federal requirements may differently require, these
divisions shall be established and organized in accordance with plans to be
prepared by the director and approved by the governor. In preparing such
plans, the director shall endeavor to promote efficient public management, to
improve programs, and to take full advantage of the economies, both fiscal and
administrative, to be gained from the consolidation of functions and agencies
under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 106. The
director shall appoint a deputy director, a department personnel director, and
such assistant directors as may be needed to administer the department. The
deputy director shall have charge and general supervision of the department in
the absence or disability of the director and, in case of a vacancy in the
office of director, shall continue in charge of the department until a
successor is appointed and qualified, or until the governor appoints an acting
director.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 107. Any
power or duty vested in or transferred to the director by law, or executive
order, may be delegated by the director to the deputy director or to any other
assistant or subordinate; but the director shall be responsible for the
official acts of the officers and employees of the department.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 108. The
director may appoint such advisory committees or councils as may be required by
any federal legislation as a condition to the receipt of federal funds by the
department. The director may also appoint state-wide committees or councils on
such subject matters as are or come within the department's responsibilities.
The state-wide committees and councils shall have representation from both
major political parties and shall have substantial consumer representation.
The committees or councils shall be constituted as required by federal law or
as the director may determine. The members of the committees or councils shall
hold office as follows: One-third to serve one year; one-third to serve two
years; and one-third to serve three years. Upon expiration of the original
terms, subsequent appointments shall be for three years except in the case of a
vacancy, in which event appointment shall be only for the remainder of the
unexpired term for which the vacancy occurs. No member may serve more than two
consecutive terms.

Members
of such state advisory committees or councils may be paid their travel expenses
in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 109. In
furtherance of the policy of the state to cooperate with the federal government
in all of the programs under the jurisdiction of the department, such rules as
may become necessary to entitle the state to participate in federal funds may
be adopted, unless expressly prohibited by law. Any internal reorganization
carried out under the terms of this chapter shall meet federal requirements
which are a necessary condition to state receipt of federal funds. Any section
or provision of law dealing with the department which may be susceptible to
more than one construction shall be interpreted in favor of the construction
most likely to comply with federal laws entitling this state to receive federal
funds for the various programs of the department. If any law dealing with the
department is ruled to be in conflict with federal requirements which are a
prescribed condition of the allocation of federal funds to the state, or to any
departments or agencies thereof, the conflicting part is declared to be
inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 110. A
new section is added to chapter 41.06 RCW to read as follows:

In
addition to the exemptions under RCW 41.06.070, the provisions of this chapter
shall not apply in the department of income and medical assistance to the
director, the director's personal secretary, the deputy director, all division
directors and assistant directors, and one confidential secretary for each of
these officers.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 111. (1)
All powers, duties, and functions of the department of social and health
services pertaining to income and medical assistance are transferred to the
department of income and medical assistance. All references to the secretary
or the department of social and health services in the Revised Code of
Washington shall be construed to mean the director or the department of income
and medical assistance when referring to the functions transferred in this
section.

(2)(a)
All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written
material in the possession of the department of social and health services
pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be delivered
to the custody of the department of income and medical assistance. All
cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible
property employed by the department of social and health services in carrying
out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be made available to
the department of income and medical assistance. All funds, credits, or other
assets held in connection with the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall be assigned to the department of income and medical assistance.

(b)
Any appropriations made to the department of social and health services for
carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on the
effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to the department
of income and medical assistance.

(c)
Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books,
documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used
or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and
functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a
determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state
agencies concerned.

(3)
All employees of the department of social and health services engaged in
performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred are transferred to the
jurisdiction of the department of income and medical assistance. All employees
classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned
to the department of income and medical assistance to perform their usual
duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to
any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and
rules governing state civil service.

(4)
All rules and all pending business before the department of social and health
services pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be
continued and acted upon by the department of income and medical assistance.
All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be
performed by the department of income and medical assistance.

(5)
The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the department
of social and health services shall not affect the validity of any act
performed before the effective date of this section.

(6)
If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers
directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify
the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state
treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments
in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with
the certification.

(7)
Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any existing
collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing collective
bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or until the bargaining
unit has been modified by action of the personnel board as provided by law.

PART
2

DEPARTMENT
OF LONG-TERM CARE

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 201. As
used in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise:

(1)
"Department" means the department of long-term care.

(2)
"Director" means the director of long-term care.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 202. There
is hereby created a department of state government to be known as the
department of long-term care. The department shall be vested with all powers
and duties transferred to it under this chapter and such other powers and
duties as may be authorized by law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 203. The
executive head and appointing authority of the department shall be the
director. The director shall be appointed by the governor, with the consent of
the senate, and shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. The director
shall be paid a salary to be fixed by the governor in accordance with RCW
43.03.040. If a vacancy occurs in the position while the senate is not in
session, the governor shall make a temporary appointment until the next meeting
of the senate.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 204. It is
the intent of the legislature wherever possible to place the internal affairs
of the department under the control of the director in order that the director may
institute therein the flexible, alert, and intelligent management of its
business that changing contemporary circumstances require. Therefore, whenever
the director's authority is not specifically limited by law, the director shall
have complete charge and supervisory powers over the department. The director
may create such administrative structures as the director considers
appropriate, except as otherwise specified by law. The director may employ
such assistants and personnel as may be necessary for the general
administration of the department. This employment shall be in accordance with
the state civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW, except as otherwise provided.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 205. The
department shall be subdivided into divisions as necessary. Except as
otherwise specified or as federal requirements may differently require, these
divisions shall be established and organized in accordance with plans to be
prepared by the director and approved by the governor. In preparing such
plans, the director shall endeavor to promote efficient public management, to
improve programs, and to take full advantage of the economies, both fiscal and
administrative, to be gained from the consolidation of functions and agencies
under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 206. The
director shall appoint a deputy director, a department personnel director, and
such assistant directors as may be needed to administer the department. The
deputy director shall have charge and general supervision of the department in
the absence or disability of the director and, in case of a vacancy in the
office of director, shall continue in charge of the department until a
successor is appointed and qualified, or until the governor appoints an acting
director.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 207. Any
power or duty vested in or transferred to the director by law, or executive
order, may be delegated by the director to the deputy director or to any other
assistant or subordinate; but the director shall be responsible for the
official acts of the officers and employees of the department.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 208. The
director may appoint such advisory committees or councils as may be required by
any federal legislation as a condition to the receipt of federal funds by the
department. The director may also appoint state-wide committees or councils on
such subject matters as are or come within the department's responsibilities.
The state-wide committees and councils shall have representation from both
major political parties and shall have substantial consumer representation.
The committees or councils shall be constituted as required by federal law or
as the director may determine. The members of the committees or councils shall
hold office as follows: One-third to serve one year; one-third to serve two
years; and one-third to serve three years. Upon expiration of the original
terms, subsequent appointments shall be for three years except in the case of a
vacancy, in which event appointment shall be only for the remainder of the
unexpired term for which the vacancy occurs. No member may serve more than two
consecutive terms.

Members
of such state advisory committees or councils may be paid their travel expenses
in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 209. In
furtherance of the policy of the state to cooperate with the federal government
in all of the programs under the jurisdiction of the department, such rules as
may become necessary to entitle the state to participate in federal funds may
be adopted, unless expressly prohibited by law. Any internal reorganization
carried out under the terms of this chapter shall meet federal requirements
which are a necessary condition to state receipt of federal funds. Any section
or provision of law dealing with the department which may be susceptible to
more than one construction shall be interpreted in favor of the construction
most likely to comply with federal laws entitling this state to receive federal
funds for the various programs of the department. If any law dealing with the
department is ruled to be in conflict with federal requirements which are a
prescribed condition of the allocation of federal funds to the state, or to any
departments or agencies thereof, the conflicting part is declared to be
inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 210. A
new section is added to chapter 41.06 RCW to read as follows:

In
addition to the exemptions under RCW 41.06.070, the provisions of this chapter
shall not apply in the department of long-term care to the director, the
director's personal secretary, the deputy director, all division directors and
assistant directors, and one confidential secretary for each of these officers.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 211. (1)
All powers, duties, and functions of the department of social and health
services pertaining to long-term care are transferred to the department of
long-term care. All references to the secretary or the department of social
and health services in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to
mean the director or the department of long-term care when referring to the
functions transferred in this section.

(2)(a)
All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written
material in the possession of the department of social and health services
pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be delivered
to the custody of the department of long-term care. All cabinets, furniture,
office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the
department of social and health services in carrying out the powers, functions,
and duties transferred shall be made available to the department of long-term
care. All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with the powers,
functions, and duties transferred shall be assigned to the department of
long-term care.

(b)
Any appropriations made to the department of social and health services for
carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on the
effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to the department
of long-term care.

(c)
Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books,
documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used
or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and
functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a
determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state
agencies concerned.

(3)
All employees of the department of social and health services engaged in
performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred are transferred to the
jurisdiction of the department of long-term care. All employees classified
under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the
department of long-term care to perform their usual duties upon the same terms
as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be
appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil
service.

(4)
All rules and all pending business before the department of social and health
services pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be
continued and acted upon by the department of long-term care. All existing
contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by
the department of long-term care.

(5)
The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the department
of social and health services shall not affect the validity of any act
performed before the effective date of this section.

(6)
If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers
directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify
the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state
treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments
in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with
the certification.

(7)
Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any existing
collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing collective
bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or until the bargaining
unit has been modified by action of the personnel board as provided by law.

PART
3

DEPARTMENT OF
CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILY SERVICES

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 301. As
used in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise:

(1)
"Department" means the department of children, youth, and family
services.

(2)
"Director" means the director of children, youth, and family
services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 302. There
is hereby created a department of state government to be known as the
department of children, youth, and family services. The department shall be
vested with all powers and duties transferred to it under this chapter and such
other powers and duties as may be authorized by law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 303. The
executive head and appointing authority of the department shall be the
director. The director shall be appointed by the governor, with the consent of
the senate, and shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. The director
shall be paid a salary to be fixed by the governor in accordance with RCW
43.03.040. If a vacancy occurs in the position while the senate is not in
session, the governor shall make a temporary appointment until the next meeting
of the senate.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 304. It is
the intent of the legislature wherever possible to place the internal affairs
of the department under the control of the director in order that the director
may institute therein the flexible, alert, and intelligent management of its
business that changing contemporary circumstances require. Therefore, whenever
the director's authority is not specifically limited by law, the director shall
have complete charge and supervisory powers over the department. The director
may create such administrative structures as the director considers
appropriate, except as otherwise specified by law. The director may employ
such assistants and personnel as may be necessary for the general
administration of the department. This employment shall be in accordance with
the state civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW, except as otherwise provided.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 305. The
department shall be subdivided into divisions as necessary. Except as
otherwise specified or as federal requirements may differently require, these
divisions shall be established and organized in accordance with plans to be
prepared by the director and approved by the governor. In preparing such
plans, the director shall endeavor to promote efficient public management, to
improve programs, and to take full advantage of the economies, both fiscal and
administrative, to be gained from the consolidation of functions and agencies
under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 306. The
director shall appoint a deputy director, a department personnel director, and
such assistant directors as may be needed to administer the department. The
deputy director shall have charge and general supervision of the department in
the absence or disability of the director and, in case of a vacancy in the
office of director, shall continue in charge of the department until a
successor is appointed and qualified, or until the governor appoints an acting
director.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 307. Any
power or duty vested in or transferred to the director by law, or executive
order, may be delegated by the director to the deputy director or to any other
assistant or subordinate; but the director shall be responsible for the
official acts of the officers and employees of the department.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 308. The
director may appoint such advisory committees or councils as may be required by
any federal legislation as a condition to the receipt of federal funds by the
department. The director may also appoint state-wide committees or councils on
such subject matters as are or come within the department's responsibilities.
The state-wide committees and councils shall have representation from both
major political parties and shall have substantial consumer representation.
The committees or councils shall be constituted as required by federal law or
as the director may determine. The members of the committees or councils shall
hold office as follows: One-third to serve one year; one-third to serve two
years; and one-third to serve three years. Upon expiration of the original
terms, subsequent appointments shall be for three years except in the case of a
vacancy, in which event appointment shall be only for the remainder of the
unexpired term for which the vacancy occurs. No member may serve more than two
consecutive terms.

Members
of such state advisory committees or councils may be paid their travel expenses
in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 309. In
furtherance of the policy of the state to cooperate with the federal government
in all of the programs under the jurisdiction of the department, such rules as
may become necessary to entitle the state to participate in federal funds may
be adopted, unless expressly prohibited by law. Any internal reorganization
carried out under the terms of this chapter shall meet federal requirements
which are a necessary condition to state receipt of federal funds. Any section
or provision of law dealing with the department which may be susceptible to
more than one construction shall be interpreted in favor of the construction
most likely to comply with federal laws entitling this state to receive federal
funds for the various programs of the department. If any law dealing with the
department is ruled to be in conflict with federal requirements which are a
prescribed condition of the allocation of federal funds to the state, or to any
departments or agencies thereof, the conflicting part is declared to be
inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 310. A
new section is added to chapter 41.06 RCW to read as follows:

In
addition to the exemptions under RCW 41.06.070, the provisions of this chapter
shall not apply in the department of children, youth, and family services to
the director, the director's personal secretary, the deputy director, all
division directors and assistant directors, and one confidential secretary for
each of these officers.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 311. (1)
All powers, duties, and functions of the department of social and health
services pertaining to children, youth, and family services are transferred to
the department of children, youth, and family services. All references to the
secretary or the department of social and health services in the Revised Code
of Washington shall be construed to mean the director or the department of
children, youth, and family services when referring to the functions
transferred in this section.

(2)(a)
All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written
material in the possession of the department of social and health services
pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be delivered
to the custody of the department of children, youth, and family services. All
cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible
property employed by the department of social and health services in carrying
out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be made available to
the department of children, youth, and family services. All funds, credits, or
other assets held in connection with the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be assigned to the department of children, youth, and family
services.

(b)
Any appropriations made to the department of social and health services for
carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on the
effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to the department
of children, youth, and family services.

(c)
Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books,
documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used
or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and
functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a
determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state
agencies concerned.

(3)
All employees of the department of social and health services engaged in
performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred are transferred to the
jurisdiction of the department of children, youth, and family services. All
employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are
assigned to the department of children, youth, and family services to perform
their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights,
subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the
laws and rules governing state civil service.

(4)
All rules and all pending business before the department of social and health
services pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be
continued and acted upon by the department of children, youth, and family
services. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and
shall be performed by the department of children, youth, and family services.

(5)
The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the department
of social and health services shall not affect the validity of any act
performed before the effective date of this section.

(6)
If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers
directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify
the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state
treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments
in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with
the certification.

(7)
Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any existing collective
bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing collective bargaining
agreement until the agreement has expired or until the bargaining unit has been
modified by action of the personnel board as provided by law.

PART
4

DEPARTMENT OF
REHABILITATIVE AND HEALTH SERVICES

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 401. As
used in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise:

(1)
"Department" means the department of rehabilitative and health
services.

(2)
"Director" means the director of rehabilitative and health services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 402. There
is hereby created a department of state government to be known as the
department of rehabilitative and health services. The department shall be
vested with all powers and duties transferred to it under this chapter and such
other powers and duties as may be authorized by law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 403. The
executive head and appointing authority of the department shall be the
director. The director shall be appointed by the governor, with the consent of
the senate, and shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. The director
shall be paid a salary to be fixed by the governor in accordance with RCW
43.03.040. If a vacancy occurs in the position while the senate is not in
session, the governor shall make a temporary appointment until the next meeting
of the senate.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 404. It is
the intent of the legislature wherever possible to place the internal affairs
of the department under the control of the director in order that the director
may institute therein the flexible, alert, and intelligent management of its
business that changing contemporary circumstances require. Therefore, whenever
the director's authority is not specifically limited by law, the director shall
have complete charge and supervisory powers over the department. The director
may create such administrative structures as the director considers
appropriate, except as otherwise specified by law. The director may employ
such assistants and personnel as may be necessary for the general
administration of the department. This employment shall be in accordance with
the state civil service law, chapter 41.06 RCW, except as otherwise provided.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 405. The
department shall be subdivided into divisions as necessary. Except as
otherwise specified or as federal requirements may differently require, these
divisions shall be established and organized in accordance with plans to be
prepared by the director and approved by the governor. In preparing such
plans, the director shall endeavor to promote efficient public management, to
improve programs, and to take full advantage of the economies, both fiscal and
administrative, to be gained from the consolidation of functions and agencies
under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 406. The
director shall appoint a deputy director, a department personnel director, and
such assistant directors as may be needed to administer the department. The
deputy director shall have charge and general supervision of the department in
the absence or disability of the director and, in case of a vacancy in the
office of director, shall continue in charge of the department until a
successor is appointed and qualified, or until the governor appoints an acting
director.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 407. Any
power or duty vested in or transferred to the director by law, or executive
order, may be delegated by the director to the deputy director or to any other
assistant or subordinate; but the director shall be responsible for the
official acts of the officers and employees of the department.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 408. The
director may appoint such advisory committees or councils as may be required by
any federal legislation as a condition to the receipt of federal funds by the
department. The director may also appoint state-wide committees or councils on
such subject matters as are or come within the department's responsibilities.
The state-wide committees and councils shall have representation from both
major political parties and shall have substantial consumer representation.
The committees or councils shall be constituted as required by federal law or
as the director may determine. The members of the committees or councils shall
hold office as follows: One-third to serve one year; one-third to serve two
years; and one-third to serve three years. Upon expiration of the original
terms, subsequent appointments shall be for three years except in the case of a
vacancy, in which event appointment shall be only for the remainder of the
unexpired term for which the vacancy occurs. No member may serve more than two
consecutive terms.

Members
of such state advisory committees or councils may be paid their travel expenses
in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 409. In
furtherance of the policy of the state to cooperate with the federal government
in all of the programs under the jurisdiction of the department, such rules as
may become necessary to entitle the state to participate in federal funds may
be adopted, unless expressly prohibited by law. Any internal reorganization
carried out under the terms of this chapter shall meet federal requirements
which are a necessary condition to state receipt of federal funds. Any section
or provision of law dealing with the department which may be susceptible to
more than one construction shall be interpreted in favor of the construction
most likely to comply with federal laws entitling this state to receive federal
funds for the various programs of the department. If any law dealing with the
department is ruled to be in conflict with federal requirements which are a
prescribed condition of the allocation of federal funds to the state, or to any
departments or agencies thereof, the conflicting part is declared to be
inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 410. A
new section is added to chapter 41.06 RCW to read as follows:

In
addition to the exemptions under RCW 41.06.070, the provisions of this chapter
shall not apply in the department of rehabilitative and health services to the
director, the director's personal secretary, the deputy director, all division
directors and assistant directors, and one confidential secretary for each of these
officers.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 411. (1)
All powers, duties, and functions of the department of social and health
services pertaining to rehabilitative and health services are transferred to
the department of rehabilitative and health services. All references to the
secretary or the department of social and health services in the Revised Code
of Washington shall be construed to mean the director or the department of
rehabilitative and health services when referring to the functions transferred
in this section.

(2)(a)
All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written
material in the possession of the department of social and health services
pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be delivered
to the custody of the department of rehabilitative and health services. All
cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible
property employed by the department of social and health services in carrying
out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be made available to
the department of rehabilitative and health services. All funds, credits, or
other assets held in connection with the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be assigned to the department of rehabilitative and health
services.

(b)
Any appropriations made to the department of social and health services for
carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on the
effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to the department
of rehabilitative and health services.

(c)
Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books,
documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used
or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and
functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a
determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state
agencies concerned.

(3)
All employees of the department of social and health services engaged in
performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred are transferred to the
jurisdiction of the department of rehabilitative and health services. All
employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are
assigned to the department of rehabilitative and health services to perform
their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights,
subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the
laws and rules governing state civil service.

(4)
All rules and all pending business before the department of social and health
services pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be
continued and acted upon by the department of rehabilitative and health
services. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and
shall be performed by the department of rehabilitative and health services.

(5)
The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the department
of social and health services shall not affect the validity of any act
performed before the effective date of this section.

(6)
If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers
directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify
the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state
treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments
in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with
the certification.

(7)
Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any existing
collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing collective
bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or until the bargaining
unit has been modified by action of the personnel board as provided by law.

PART
5

GENERAL
DEPARTMENTAL PROVISIONS

Sec.
501. RCW
43.17.010 and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 16, 1993 c 472 s 17, and 1993 c 280 s 18 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

There
shall be departments of the state government which shall be known as (1) the
department of social and health services, (2) the department of ecology, (3)
the department of labor and industries, (4) the department of agriculture, (5)
the department of fish and wildlife, (6) the department of transportation, (7)
the department of licensing, (8) the department of general administration, (9)
the department of community, trade, and economic development, (10) the
department of veterans affairs, (11) the department of revenue, (12) the
department of retirement systems, (13) the department of corrections, ((and))
(14) the department of health, ((and)) (15) the department of financial
institutions, (16) the department of income and medical assistance, (17) the
department of long-term care, (18) the department of children, youth, and
family services, and (19) the department of rehabilitative and health services,
which shall be charged with the execution, enforcement, and administration of
such laws, and invested with such powers and required to perform such duties,
as the legislature may provide.

Sec.
502. RCW
43.17.020 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

There
shall be a chief executive officer of each department to be known as: (1) The
secretary of social and health services, (2) the director of ecology, (3) the
director of labor and industries, (4) the director of agriculture, (5) the
director of fish and wildlife, (6) the secretary of transportation, (7) the
director of licensing, (8) the director of general administration, (9) the
director of community, trade, and economic development, (10) the director of
veterans affairs, (11) the director of revenue, (12) the director of retirement
systems, (13) the secretary of corrections, ((and)) (14) the secretary
of health, ((and)) (15) the director of financial institutions, (16)
the director of income and medical assistance, (17) the director of long-term
care, (18) the director of children, youth, and family services, and (19) the
director of rehabilitative and health services.

Such
officers, except the secretary of transportation and the director of fish and
wildlife, shall be appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate,
and hold office at the pleasure of the governor. The secretary of
transportation shall be appointed by the transportation commission as
prescribed by RCW 47.01.041. The director of fish and wildlife shall be
appointed by the fish and wildlife commission as prescribed by RCW 77.04.055.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 503. (1)
By July 1, 2000, the governor shall appoint a transition team chaired by the
secretary of the department of social and health services to direct the details
of administration of this act. The team shall consist of representatives from
the office of financial management, the legislature, and the divisions of the
department of social and health services.

(2)
The transition team shall divide up the functions of the department of social
and health services into the new departments set out under section 2 of this
act after the effective date of this section as follows:

(a)
All support services including but not limited to personnel, financial,
administration, auditing, comptroller, constituent relations, and legal
services of the attorney general's office shall be the responsibility of each
respective department; and

(b)
All personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or
other tangible property required for the direct provision of services to the
public shall be transferred to the department to be responsible for the
services.

PART
6

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 601.
Sections 101 through 109 of this act shall constitute a new chapter in Title 43
RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 602.
Sections 201 through 209 of this act shall constitute a new chapter in Title 43
RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 603.
Sections 301 through 309 of this act shall constitute a new chapter in Title 43
RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 604.
Sections 401 through 409 of this act shall constitute a new chapter in Title 43
RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 605.
Section 503 of this act shall expire January 1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 606. Part
headings as used in this act do not constitute any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 607. (1)
Section 503 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the
public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately.

(2) Sections 1, 101 though 111, 201 through 211, 301 through 311,
401 through 411, 501, 502, and 601 through 605 of this act shall take effect
September 15, 2001.

---
END ---