BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 36.23 RCW to read as follows:

County
clerks are authorized to accept credit cards, charge cards, debit cards, smart
cards, stored value cards, federal wire, and automatic clearinghouse system
transactions, or other electronic communication, for payment of all fees and
moneys due the court under RCW 36.18.012 through 36.18.020, and for the payment
of court-ordered legal financial obligations of criminal defendants which
include, but are not limited to, fines, fees, assessments, restitution, and
crime victims' compensation. A payer desiring to pay by credit card, charge
card, debit card, smart card, stored value card, federal wire, and automatic
clearinghouse system transactions, or other electronic communication shall bear
the cost of processing the transaction.

---
END ---