BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
26.09.020 and 1997 c 58 s 945 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A petition in a proceeding for dissolution of marriage, legal separation, or
for a declaration concerning the validity of a marriage, shall allege the
following:

(a)
The last known residence of each party;

(b)
((The social security number of each party;

(c))) The
date and place of the marriage;

(((d)))
(c) If the parties are separated the date on which the separation
occurred;

(((e)))
(d) The names, ages, and addresses of any child dependent upon either or
both spouses and whether the wife is pregnant;

(((f)))
(e) Any arrangements as to the residential schedule of, decision making
for, dispute resolution for, and support of the children and the maintenance of
a spouse;

(((g)))
(f) A statement specifying whether there is community or separate
property owned by the parties to be disposed of; and

(((h)))
(g) The relief sought.

(2)
Either or both parties to the marriage may initiate the proceeding.

(3)
The petitioner shall complete and file with the petition a certificate ((under
RCW 70.58.200)) on the form provided by the department of health.

Sec.
2. RCW
26.09.173 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 2 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

The
party seeking the establishment or modification of a child support order shall
file with the clerk of the court the child support order summary report. The
summary report shall be on the form developed by the administrator for the
courts pursuant to RCW 26.18.210 and shall include the social security
numbers and driver's license numbers of the parties to the action. The
party must complete the form and file the form with the court order. The clerk
of the court must forward the original of the form to the ((administrator
for the courts on at least a monthly basis)) Washington state support
registry within five days of the entry of the order. The clerk of the court
shall not retain a copy of the form in the court file or otherwise.

Sec.
3. RCW
26.18.210 and 1990 1st ex.s. c 2 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The administrator for the courts shall develop a child support order summary
report form to provide for the reporting of summary information in every case
in which a child support order is entered or modified either judicially or
administratively. The administrator for the courts shall attempt to the
greatest extent possible to make the form simple and understandable by the
parties. The form shall indicate the following:

(a)
The county in which the order was entered and the cause number;

(b)
Whether it was a judicial or administrative order;

(c)
Whether the order is an original order or from a modification;

(d)
The number of children of the parties and the ((children's ages)) name,
date of birth, and social security number, if any, of each child;

(e)
The name of the obligee;

(f)
The combined monthly net income of parties;

(((f)))
(g) The ((monthly)) social security number of the father and
his net income ((of the father)) as determined by the court;

(((g)))
(h) The ((monthly)) social security number of the mother and
her net income ((of the mother)) as determined by the court;

(((h)))
(i) The basic child support obligation for each child as determined from
the economic table;

(((i)))
(j) Whether or not the court deviated from the child support for each
child;

(((j)))
(k) The reason or reasons stated by the court for the deviation;

(((k)))
(l) The amount of child support after the deviation;

(((l)))
(m) Any amount awarded for day care;

(((m)))
(n) Any other extraordinary amounts in the order;

(((n)))
(o) Any amount ordered for postsecondary education;

(((o)))
(p) The total amount of support ordered;

(((p)))
(q) In the case of a modification, the amount of support in the previous
order;

(((q)))
(r) If the change in support was in excess of thirty percent, whether
the change was phased in;

(((r)))
(s) The amount of the transfer payment ordered;

(((s)))
(t) Which parent was ordered to make the transfer payment; ((and

(t))) (u)
The date of the entry of the order; and

(v)
Whether the order requires payment to be made to the Washington state support
registry and payment services are required.

(2)
The administrator for the courts shall make the form available to the parties.

Sec.
4. RCW
26.23.033 and 1997 c 58 s 903 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The division of child support, Washington state support registry shall operate
a state case registry containing records of all orders establishing or
modifying a support order that are entered after October 1, 1998.

(2)
The superior court clerk, the office of administrative hearings, and the
department of social and health services shall, within five days of entry,
forward to the Washington state support registry((,)) a true and correct
copy of all superior court orders and the originals of child support summary
reports or administrative orders establishing or modifying a support
obligation that provide that support payments shall be made to the support
registry. The clerk of the court shall not retain a copy of the form in the
court file or otherwise.

(3)
The division of child support shall reimburse the clerk for the reasonable
costs of copying and sending copies of court orders to the registry at the
reimbursement rate provided in Title IV‑D of the federal social security
act.

(4)
((Effective October 1, 1998,)) The superior court clerk, the
office of administrative hearings, and the department of social and health
services shall, within five days of entry, forward to the Washington state
support registry a true and correct copy of all superior court orders and
the originals of child support summary reports or administrative orders
establishing or modifying a support obligation. The clerk of the court
shall not retain a copy of the form in the court file or otherwise.

(5)
Receipt of a child support summary report or support order by the
registry or other action under this section on behalf of a person or persons
who have not made a written application for support enforcement services to the
division of child support and who are not recipients of public assistance is
deemed to be:

(a)
A request for payment services only if the child support summary report or
order requires payment to the Washington state support registry;

(b)
A submission for inclusion in the state case registry if the child support
summary report or order does not require that support payments be made to
the Washington state support registry.

Sec.
5. RCW
26.23.045 and 1997 c 58 s 902 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The division of child support, Washington state support registry, shall provide
support enforcement services under the following circumstances:

(a)
Whenever public assistance under RCW 74.20.330 is paid;

(b)
Whenever a request for support enforcement services under RCW 74.20.040 is
received;

(c)
When a support order or child support summary report which contains
language directing a responsible parent to make support payments to the
Washington state support registry under RCW 26.23.050 is submitted and the
division of child support receives a written application for services or is
already providing services;

(d)
When the obligor submits a support order or support payment, and an
application, to the Washington state support registry.

(2)
The division of child support shall continue to provide support enforcement services
for so long as and under such conditions as the department shall establish by
regulation or until the superior court enters an order removing the requirement
that the obligor make support payments to the Washington state support registry
as provided for in RCW 26.23.050.

Sec.
6. RCW
26.23.050 and 1998 c 160 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If the division of child support is providing support enforcement services
under RCW 26.23.045, or if a party is applying for support enforcement services
by signing the application form on the bottom of the support order, the
superior court shall include in all court orders that establish or modify a
support obligation:

(a)
A provision that orders and directs the responsible parent to make all support
payments to the Washington state support registry;

(b)
A statement that withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings,
assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and personal property
under the child support statutes of this or any other state, without further
notice to the responsible parent at any time after entry of the court order,
unless:

(i)
One of the parties demonstrates, and the court finds, that there is good cause
not to require immediate income withholding and that withholding should be
delayed until a payment is past due; or

(ii)
The parties reach a written agreement that is approved by the court that
provides for an alternate arrangement;

(c)
A statement that the receiving parent might be required to submit an accounting
of how the support is being spent to benefit the child; and

(d)
A statement that the responsible parent's privileges to obtain and maintain a
license, as defined in RCW 74.20A.320, may not be renewed, or may be suspended
if the parent is not in compliance with a support order as provided in RCW
74.20A.320.

As
used in this subsection and subsection (3) of this section, "good cause
not to require immediate income withholding" means a written determination
of why implementing immediate wage withholding would not be in the child's best
interests and, in modification cases, proof of timely payment of previously
ordered support.

(2)
In all other cases not under subsection (1) of this section, the court may
order the responsible parent to make payments directly to the person entitled
to receive the payments, to the Washington state support registry, or may order
that payments be made in accordance with an alternate arrangement agreed upon
by the parties.

(a)
The superior court shall include in all orders under this subsection that
establish or modify a support obligation:

(i)
A statement that withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings,
assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and personal property
under the child support statutes of this or any other state, without further
notice to the responsible parent at any time after entry of the court order,
unless:

(A)
One of the parties demonstrates, and the court finds, that there is good cause
not to require immediate income withholding and that withholding should be
delayed until a payment is past due; or

(B)
The parties reach a written agreement that is approved by the court that
provides for an alternate arrangement; and

(ii)
A statement that the receiving parent may be required to submit an accounting
of how the support is being spent to benefit the child.

As
used in this subsection, "good cause not to require immediate income
withholding" is any reason that the court finds appropriate.

(b)
The superior court may order immediate or delayed income withholding as
follows:

(i)
Immediate income withholding may be ordered if the responsible parent has
earnings. If immediate income withholding is ordered under this subsection,
all support payments shall be paid to the Washington state support registry.
The superior court shall issue a mandatory wage assignment order as set forth
in chapter 26.18 RCW when the support order is signed by the court. The parent
entitled to receive the transfer payment is responsible for serving the
employer with the order and for its enforcement as set forth in chapter 26.18
RCW.

(ii)
If immediate income withholding is not ordered, the court shall require that
income withholding be delayed until a payment is past due. The support order
shall contain a statement that withholding action may be taken against wages,
earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real and personal
property under the child support statutes of this or any other state, without
further notice to the responsible parent, after a payment is past due.

(c)
If a mandatory wage withholding order under chapter 26.18 RCW is issued under
this subsection and the division of child support provides support enforcement
services under RCW 26.23.045, the existing wage withholding assignment is
prospectively superseded upon the division of child support's subsequent
service of an income withholding notice.

(3)
The office of administrative hearings and the department of social and health
services shall require that all support obligations established as
administrative orders include a provision which orders and directs that the
responsible parent shall make all support payments to the Washington state
support registry. All administrative orders shall also state that the
responsible parent's privileges to obtain and maintain a license, as defined in
RCW 74.20A.320, may not be renewed, or may be suspended if the parent is not in
compliance with a support order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320. All
administrative orders shall also state that withholding action may be taken
against wages, earnings, assets, or benefits, and liens enforced against real
and personal property under the child support statutes of this or any other
state without further notice to the responsible parent at any time after entry
of the order, unless:

(a)
One of the parties demonstrates, and the presiding officer finds, that there is
good cause not to require immediate income withholding; or

(b)
The parties reach a written agreement that is approved by the presiding officer
that provides for an alternate agreement.

(4)
If the support order does not include the provision ordering and directing that
all payments be made to the Washington state support registry and a statement
that withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or
benefits if a support payment is past due or at any time after the entry of the
order, or that a parent's licensing privileges may not be renewed, or may be
suspended, the division of child support may serve a notice on the responsible
parent stating such requirements and authorizations. Service may be by
personal service or any form of mail requiring a return receipt.

(5)
Every support order shall state:

(a)
The address where the support payment is to be sent;

(b)
That withholding action may be taken against wages, earnings, assets, or
benefits, and liens enforced against real and personal property under the child
support statutes of this or any other state, without further notice to the
responsible parent at any time after entry of a support order, unless:

(i)
One of the parties demonstrates, and the court finds, that there is good cause
not to require immediate income withholding; or

(ii)
The parties reach a written agreement that is approved by the court that
provides for an alternate arrangement;

(c)
The income of the parties, if known, or that their income is unknown and the
income upon which the support award is based;

(d)
The support award as a sum certain amount;

(e)
The specific day or date on which the support payment is due;

(f)
The ((social security number,)) residence address, date of birth,
telephone number, ((driver's license number,)) and name and address of
the employer of the responsible parent, except as provided under subsection (6)
of this section;

(g)
The ((social security number and)) residence address of the physical
custodian except as provided in subsection (6) or (7) of this section;

(h)
The names((,)) and dates of birth((, and social security
numbers, if any,)) of the dependent children;

(i)
A provision requiring the responsible parent to keep the Washington state
support registry informed of whether he or she has access to health insurance
coverage at reasonable cost and, if so, the health insurance policy
information;

(j)
That any parent owing a duty of child support shall be obligated to provide
health insurance coverage for his or her child if coverage that can be extended
to cover the child is or becomes available to that parent through employment or
is union-related as provided under RCW 26.09.105;

(k)
That if proof of health insurance coverage or proof that the coverage is
unavailable is not provided within twenty days, the obligee or the department
may seek direct enforcement of the coverage through the obligor's employer or
union without further notice to the obligor as provided under chapter 26.18
RCW;

(l)
The reasons for not ordering health insurance coverage if the order fails to
require such coverage;

(m)
That the responsible parent's privileges to obtain and maintain a license, as
defined in RCW 74.20A.320, may not be renewed, or may be suspended if the
parent is not in compliance with a support order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320;
and

(n)
That each parent must:

(i)
Provide the state case registry with the information required by RCW 26.23.055;
and

(ii)
Update the information provided to the state case registry when the information
changes.

(6)
The address and employer's name and address of either party may be omitted from
a support order if:

(a)
There is reason to believe that release of the address information may result
in physical or emotional harm to the party or to the child; or

(b)
A restraining or protective order is in effect to protect one party from the
other party.

(7)
The physical custodian's address shall be omitted from an order entered under
the administrative procedure act.

(8)
When a party's employment or address is omitted from an order, the order shall
state that the information is known to the division of child support, state
case registry.

(9) After the responsible parent has been ordered or notified to
make payments to the Washington state support registry under this section, the
responsible parent shall be fully responsible for making all payments to the
Washington state support registry and shall be subject to payroll deduction or
other income‑withholding action. The responsible parent shall not be
entitled to credit against a support obligation for any payments made to a
person or agency other than to the Washington state support registry except as
provided under RCW 74.20.101. A civil action may be brought by the payor to
recover payments made to persons or agencies who have received and retained
support moneys paid contrary to the provisions of this section.

---
END ---