BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to the conditions in subsections (2) through (4) of this section, the
legislative body of a county or city, through ordinance or resolution, may
submit an authorizing proposition to the voters of the city or county, and if
the proposition is approved by a majority of the persons voting, impose a sales
and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is in
addition to other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected on the sale of
or charge made for new construction. The tax shall be deducted from the amount
of tax otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department of
revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW.

(2)
The rate of tax shall not exceed one percent of the selling price in the case
of a sales tax or value of the article used in the case of a use tax.

(3)
A county or city may impose the tax authorized under subsection (1) of this
section only if it meets the following requirements:

(a)
The county or city is planning under RCW 36.70A.040;

(b)
The county or city is in compliance with all deadlines under chapter 36.70A
RCW;

(c)
The county or city is not under an order of noncompliance issued by a growth
management hearings board;

(d)
The county or city has adopted a capital facilities plan under chapter 36.70A
RCW that is consistent with its comprehensive plan;

(e)
The tax is approved by a vote of the people, as specified in subsection (1) of
this section; and

(f)
The county or city files with the department a statement signed by the chief
executive officer of the county or city that it meets the requirements set
forth in (a) through (e) of this subsection.

(4)
Moneys collected under this section: (a) Must be used for the purpose of
implementing a county's or city's capital facilities plan adopted under chapter
36.70A RCW; and (b) shall be used to supplement, and not supplant, any other
funds expended by a county or city for the same purpose.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---