BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.14.010 and 1997 c 429 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"City" means either (a) a city or town with a population of at least
((one hundred)) fifty thousand or (b) the largest city or town,
if there is no city or town with a population of at least ((one hundred))
fifty thousand, located in a county planning under the growth management
act.

(2)
"Governing authority" means the local legislative authority of a city
having jurisdiction over the property for which an exemption may be applied for
under this chapter.

(3)
"Growth management act" means chapter 36.70A RCW.

(4)
"Multiple-unit housing" means a building having four or more dwelling
units not designed or used as transient accommodations and not including hotels
and motels. Multifamily units may result from new construction or
rehabilitated or conversion of vacant, underutilized, or substandard buildings
to multifamily housing.

(5)
"Owner" means the property owner of record.

(6)
"Permanent residential occupancy" means multiunit housing that
provides either rental or owner occupancy on a nontransient basis. This
includes owner-occupied or rental accommodation that is leased for a period of
at least one month. This excludes hotels and motels that predominately offer
rental accommodation on a daily or weekly basis.

(7)
"Rehabilitation improvements" means modifications to existing
structures, that are vacant for twelve months or longer, that are made to
achieve a condition of substantial compliance with existing building codes or
modification to existing occupied structures which increase the number of
multifamily housing units.

(8)
"Residential targeted area" means an area within an urban center that
has been designated by the governing authority as a residential targeted area
in accordance with this chapter.

(9)
"Substantial compliance" means compliance with local building or
housing code requirements that are typically required for rehabilitation as
opposed to new construction.

(10)
"Urban center" means a compact identifiable district where urban
residents may obtain a variety of products and services. An urban center must
contain:

(a)
Several existing or previous, or both, business establishments that may include
but are not limited to shops, offices, banks, restaurants, governmental
agencies;

(b)
Adequate public facilities including streets, sidewalks, lighting, transit,
domestic water, and sanitary sewer systems; and

(c) A mixture of uses and activities that may include housing,
recreation, and cultural activities in association with either commercial or
office, or both, use.

---
END ---