BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.94.130 and 1998 c 342 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The board shall exercise all powers of the authority except as
otherwise provided. The board shall conduct its first meeting within thirty
days after all of its members have been appointed or designated as provided in
RCW 70.94.100. The board shall meet at least ten times per year. All meetings
shall be publicly announced prior to their occurrence. All meetings shall be
open to the public. A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business and shall be necessary for any action taken by the
board. The board shall elect from its members a chair and such other officers
as may be necessary. Any member of the board may designate a regular alternate
to serve on the board in his or her place with the same authority as the member
when he or she is unable to attend. In no event may a regular alternate serve
as the permanent chair. Each member of the board, or his or her representative,
((shall)) may receive from the authority compensation consistent
with such authority's rates (but not to exceed one thousand dollars per year)
for time spent in the performance of duties under this chapter, ((plus))
and shall be reimbursed for the actual and necessary expenses incurred
by the member in ((such)) the performance of his or her duties.
The board may appoint a control officer, and any other personnel, and shall
determine their salaries, and pay same, together with any other proper indebtedness,
from authority funds.

---
END ---