BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.33A.025 and 1999 c 226 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Notwithstanding any provision of RCW 43.43.700 through 43.43.815, the state
investment board ((may)) shall require a criminal history record
check for conviction records through the Washington state patrol criminal
identification system, and through the federal bureau of investigation, for the
purpose of conducting preemployment evaluations of ((prospective new
appointees or employees)) each finalist candidate for a board staff
position exempt from the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW, or for any
other position in which the employee will have authority for or access to:
(a) Funds under the jurisdiction or responsibility of the investment
board((,)); or ((to)) (b) data or security
systems of the investment board or designs for such systems. The record check
shall include a fingerprint check using a complete Washington state criminal
identification fingerprint card, which shall be forwarded by the state patrol
to the federal bureau of investigation.

(2)
Information received by the investment board pursuant to this section shall be
made available by the investment board only to board employees involved in the
selection, hiring, background investigation, or job assignment of the person
who is the subject of the record check, or to that subject person, and it shall
be used only for the purposes of making, supporting, or defending decisions
regarding the appointment or hiring of persons for these positions, or securing
any necessary bonds or other requirements for such employment. Otherwise, the
reports, and information contained therein, shall remain confidential and shall
not be subject to the disclosure requirements of chapter 42.17 RCW.

(3)
Fees charged by the Washington state patrol, or the federal bureau of
investigation, for conducting these investigations and providing these reports
shall be paid by the investment board.

---
END ---