BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
66.24.450 and 1999 c 281 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No club shall be entitled to a spirits, beer, and wine private club license:

(a)
Unless such private club has been in continuous operation for at least one year
immediately prior to the date of its application for such license;

(b)
Unless the private club premises be constructed and equipped, conducted,
managed, and operated to the satisfaction of the board and in accordance with
this title and the regulations made thereunder;

(c)
Unless the board shall have determined pursuant to any regulations made by it
with respect to private clubs, that such private club is a bona fide private
club; it being the intent of this section that license shall not be granted to
a club which is, or has been, primarily formed or activated to obtain a license
to sell liquor, but solely to a bona fide private club, where the sale of
liquor is incidental to the main purposes of the spirits, beer, and wine
private club, as defined in RCW 66.04.010(7);

(d)
Unless, in the case of a golf or country club, equal access to and full
enjoyment of all club facilities is provided to all members of the club and to
all members of the public to the same extent that public use is allowed,
however a golf or country club may create membership classes that are not
discriminatory and may conduct occasional tournaments that are restricted by
gender.

(2)
The annual fee for a spirits, beer, and wine private club license, whether
inside or outside of an incorporated city or town, is seven hundred twenty
dollars per year.

(3)
The board may issue an endorsement to the spirits, beer, and wine private club
license that allows up to forty nonclub, member-sponsored events using club
liquor. Visitors and guests may attend these events only by invitation of the
sponsoring member or members. These events may not be open to the general
public. The fee for the endorsement shall be an annual fee of nine hundred
dollars. Upon the board's request, the holder of the endorsement must provide
the board or the board's designee with the following information at least
seventy-two hours prior to the event: The date, time, and location of the
event; the name of the sponsor of the event; and a brief description of the
purpose of the event.

Sec.
2. RCW
84.34.108 and 1999 sp.s. c 4 s 706 and 1999 c 233 s 22 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:

(1)
When land has once been classified under this chapter, a notation of such
classification shall be made each year upon the assessment and tax rolls and
such land shall be valued pursuant to RCW 84.34.060 or 84.34.065 until removal
of all or a portion of such classification by the assessor upon occurrence of
any of the following:

(a)
Receipt of notice from the owner to remove all or a portion of such
classification;

(b)
Sale or transfer to an ownership, except a transfer that resulted from a
default in loan payments made to or secured by a governmental agency that
intends to or is required by law or regulation to resell the property for the
same use as before, making all or a portion of such land exempt from ad valorem
taxation;

(c)
Sale or transfer of all or a portion of such land to a new owner, unless the
new owner has signed a notice of classification continuance, except transfer to
an owner who is an heir or devisee of a deceased owner shall not, by itself,
result in removal of classification. The notice of continuance shall be on a
form prepared by the department of revenue. If the notice of continuance is not
signed by the new owner and attached to the real estate excise tax affidavit,
all additional taxes calculated pursuant to subsection (4) of this section
shall become due and payable by the seller or transferor at time of sale. The
county auditor shall not accept an instrument of conveyance of classified land
for filing or recording unless the new owner has signed the notice of
continuance or the additional tax has been paid, as evidenced by the real
estate excise tax stamp affixed thereto by the treasurer. The seller,
transferor, or new owner may appeal the new assessed valuation calculated under
subsection (4) of this section to the county board of equalization.
Jurisdiction is hereby conferred on the county board of equalization to hear
these appeals;

(d)
Determination by the assessor, after giving the owner written notice and an
opportunity to be heard, that all or a portion of such land no longer meets the
criteria for classification under this chapter. The criteria for
classification pursuant to this chapter continue to apply after classification
has been granted;

(e)
Determination by the assessor, after giving the owner written notice and an
opportunity to be heard, that all or a portion of such land is in use as a golf
or country club and that the golf or country club does not allow equal access
to and full enjoyment of all club facilities by all members of the club, and by
all members of the public to the extent that public use is allowed, however a
golf or country club may create membership classes that are not discriminatory
and may conduct occasional tournaments that are restricted by gender.

The
granting authority, upon request of an assessor, shall provide reasonable
assistance to the assessor in making a determination whether such land continues
to meet the qualifications of RCW 84.34.020 (1) or (3). The assistance shall
be provided within thirty days of receipt of the request.

(2)
Land may not be removed from classification because of:

(a)
The creation, sale, or transfer of forestry riparian easements under RCW
76.13.120; or

(b)
The creation, sale, or transfer of a fee interest or a conservation easement
for the riparian open space program under RCW 76.09.040.

(3)
Within thirty days after such removal of all or a portion of such land from
current use classification, the assessor shall notify the owner in writing,
setting forth the reasons for such removal. The seller, transferor, or owner
may appeal such removal to the county board of equalization.

(4)
Unless the removal is reversed on appeal, the assessor shall revalue the
affected land with reference to full market value on the date of removal from
classification. Both the assessed valuation before and after the removal of
classification shall be listed and taxes shall be allocated according to that
part of the year to which each assessed valuation applies. Except as provided
in subsection (6) of this section, an additional tax, applicable interest, and
penalty shall be imposed which shall be due and payable to the county treasurer
thirty days after the owner is notified of the amount of the additional tax.
As soon as possible, the assessor shall compute the amount of such an
additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty and the treasurer shall mail
notice to the owner of the amount thereof and the date on which payment is
due. The amount of such additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty shall
be determined as follows:

(a)
The amount of additional tax shall be equal to the difference between the
property tax paid as "open space land", "farm and agricultural
land", or "timber land" and the amount of property tax otherwise
due and payable for the seven years last past had the land not been so
classified;

(b)
The amount of applicable interest shall be equal to the interest upon the
amounts of such additional tax paid at the same statutory rate charged on
delinquent property taxes from the dates on which such additional tax could
have been paid without penalty if the land had been assessed at a value without
regard to this chapter;

(c)
The amount of the penalty shall be as provided in RCW 84.34.080. The penalty
shall not be imposed if the removal satisfies the conditions of RCW 84.34.070.

(5)
Additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty, shall become a lien on such
land which shall attach at the time such land is removed from classification
under this chapter and shall have priority to and shall be fully paid and
satisfied before any recognizance, mortgage, judgment, debt, obligation or
responsibility to or with which such land may become charged or liable. Such
lien may be foreclosed upon expiration of the same period after delinquency and
in the same manner provided by law for foreclosure of liens for delinquent real
property taxes as provided in RCW 84.64.050 now or as hereafter amended. Any
additional tax unpaid on its due date shall thereupon become delinquent. From
the date of delinquency until paid, interest shall be charged at the same rate
applied by law to delinquent ad valorem property taxes.

(6)
The additional tax, applicable interest, and penalty specified in subsection
(4) of this section shall not be imposed if the removal of classification
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section resulted solely from:

(a)
Transfer to a government entity in exchange for other land located within the
state of Washington;

(b)(i)
A taking through the exercise of the power of eminent domain, or (ii) sale or
transfer to an entity having the power of eminent domain in anticipation of the
exercise of such power, said entity having manifested its intent in writing or
by other official action;

(c)
A natural disaster such as a flood, windstorm, earthquake, or other such
calamity rather than by virtue of the act of the landowner changing the use of
such property;

(d)
Official action by an agency of the state of Washington or by the county or
city within which the land is located which disallows the present use of such
land;

(e)
Transfer of land to a church when such land would qualify for exemption
pursuant to RCW 84.36.020;

(f)
Acquisition of property interests by state agencies or agencies or
organizations qualified under RCW 84.34.210 and 64.04.130 for the purposes
enumerated in those sections: PROVIDED, That at such time as these property
interests are not used for the purposes enumerated in RCW 84.34.210 and
64.04.130 the additional tax specified in subsection (4) of this section shall
be imposed;

(g)
Removal of land classified as farm and agricultural land under RCW
84.34.020(2)(d);

(h)
Removal of land from classification after enactment of a statutory exemption
that qualifies the land for exemption and receipt of notice from the owner to
remove the land from classification;

(i)
The creation, sale, or transfer of forestry riparian easements under RCW 76.13.120;
or

(j)
The creation, sale, or transfer of a fee interest or a conservation easement
for the riparian open space program under RCW 76.09.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act takes effect January 1, 2001.

---
END ---