BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
49.04.010 and 1984 c 287 s 97 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director of labor and industries shall appoint an apprenticeship council,
composed of three representatives each from employer and employee
organizations, respectively. The terms of office of the members of the
apprenticeship council first appointed by the director of labor and industries
shall be as follows: One representative each of employers and employees shall
be appointed for one year, two years, and three years, respectively.
Thereafter, each member shall be appointed for a term of three years. The
governor shall appoint a public member to the apprenticeship council for a
three-year term. The appointment of the public member is subject to
confirmation by the senate. Each member shall hold office until his or her
successor is appointed and has qualified and any vacancy shall be filled by
appointment for the unexpired portion of the term. The state official who has
been designated by the commission for vocational education as being in charge
of trade and industrial education and the state official who has immediate
charge of the state public employment service shall ex officio be members of ((said))
the council, without vote. Each member of the council, not otherwise
compensated by public moneys, shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance
with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 and shall be compensated in accordance with
RCW 43.03.240. The apprenticeship council with the consent of employee and
employer groups shall: (1) Establish standards for apprenticeship agreements
in conformity with the provisions of this chapter; (2) issue such rules and
regulations as may be necessary to carry out the intent and purposes of this
chapter, including a procedure to resolve an impasse should a tie vote of the
council occur; and (3) perform such other duties as are hereinafter imposed.
Not less than once a year the apprenticeship council shall make a report to the
director of labor and industries of its activities and findings which shall be
available to the public.

Sec.
2. RCW
49.04.050 and 1979 ex.s. c 37 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Standards
of apprenticeship agreements are as follows:

(1)
A statement of the trade or craft to be taught and the required hours for
completion of apprenticeship which shall be not less than two thousand hours of
reasonably continuous employment.

(2)
A statement of the processes in the trade or craft divisions in which the
apprentice is to be taught and the approximate amount of time to be spent at
each process.

(3)
A statement of the number of hours to be spent by the apprentice in work and
the number of hours to be spent in related and supplemental instruction which
instruction shall be not less than one hundred forty-four hours per year.

(4)
A statement of the age of the apprentice which may not be less than sixteen
years of age.

(5)
A statement of the progressively increasing scale of wages to be paid the
apprentice.

(6)
Provision for a period of probation during which the apprenticeship council or
the supervisor of apprenticeship may terminate an apprenticeship agreement at
the request in writing of any party thereto. After the probationary period the
apprenticeship council, or the supervisor of apprenticeship, under the
procedure approved by the council, shall be empowered to terminate the
apprenticeship agreement in accordance with the provisions of such agreement.

(7)
Provision that the services of the supervisor and the apprenticeship council
may be utilized for consultation regarding the settlement of differences arising
out of the apprenticeship agreement where such differences cannot be adjusted
locally or in accordance with the established trade procedure.

(8)
Provision that if an employer is unable to fulfill his or her obligation
under the apprenticeship agreement he or she may transfer such
obligation to another employer.

(9)
Such additional standards as may be prescribed in accordance with the
provisions of this chapter.

Sec.
3. RCW
49.04.080 and 1963 c 172 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Under
the supervision of the director of labor and industries and with the advice and
guidance of the apprenticeship council, the supervisor of apprenticeship shall
encourage and promote the making of such other types of on-the-job training
agreements and projects, in addition to apprenticeship agreements, as ((he))
the supervisor of apprenticeship in his or her discretion shall
find meritorious.

Sec.
4. RCW
49.08.050 and 1903 c 58 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon
the failure of the director of labor and industries, in any case, to secure the
creation of a board of arbitration, it shall become his or her duty to
request a sworn statement from each party to the dispute of the facts upon
which their dispute and their reasons for not submitting the same to
arbitration are based. Any sworn statement made to the director of labor and
industries under this provision shall be for public use and shall be given
publicly in such newspapers as desire to use it.

Sec.
5. RCW
49.12.050 and 1994 c 164 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
employer shall keep a record of the names of all employees employed by him or
her, and shall on request permit the director to inspect such record.

Sec.
6. RCW
49.12.250 and 1985 c 336 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each employer shall make such file(s) available locally within a reasonable period
of time after the employee requests the file(s).

(2)
An employee annually may petition that the employer review all information in
the employee's personnel file(s) that are regularly maintained by the employer
as a part of ((his)) the employer's business records or are
subject to reference for information given to persons outside of the company.
The employer shall determine if there is any irrelevant or erroneous
information in the file(s), and shall remove all such information from the
file(s). If an employee does not agree with the employer's determination, the
employee may at his or her request have placed in the employee's personnel file
a statement containing the employee's rebuttal or correction. Nothing in this
subsection prevents the employer from removing information more frequently.

(3)
A former employee shall retain the right of rebuttal or correction for a period
not to exceed two years.

Sec.
7. RCW
49.17.020 and 1997 c 362 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

((For
the purposes of this chapter:)) The definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
((The term)) "Agriculture" means farming and includes,
but is not limited to:

(a)
The cultivation and tillage of the soil;

(b)
Dairying;

(c)
The production, cultivation, growing, and harvesting of any agricultural or
horticultural commodity;

(d)
The raising of livestock, bees, fur-bearing animals, or poultry; and

(e)
Any practices performed by a farmer or on a farm, incident to or in connection
with such farming operations, including but not limited to preparation for
market and delivery to:

(i)
Storage;

(ii)
Market; or

(iii)
Carriers for transportation to market.

((The
term)) "Agriculture" does not mean a farmer's processing
for sale or handling for sale a commodity or product grown or produced by a
person other than the farmer or the farmer's employees.

(2)
((The term)) "Director" means the director of the
department of labor and industries, or his or her designated
representative.

(3)
((The term)) "Department" means the department of labor
and industries.

(4)
((The term)) "Employer" means any person, firm,
corporation, partnership, business trust, legal representative, or other
business entity which engages in any business, industry, profession, or
activity in this state and employs one or more employees or who contracts with
one or more persons, the essence of which is the personal labor of such person
or persons and includes the state, counties, cities, and all municipal
corporations, public corporations, political subdivisions of the state, and
charitable organizations: PROVIDED, That any person, partnership, or business
entity not having employees, and who is covered by the industrial insurance act
shall be considered both an employer and an employee.

(5)
((The term)) "Employee" means an employee of an
employer who is employed in the business of his or her employer whether
by way of manual labor or otherwise and every person in this state who is
engaged in the employment of or who is working under an independent contract
the essence of which is his or her personal labor for an employer under
this chapter whether by way of manual labor or otherwise.

(6)
((The term)) "Person" means one or more individuals,
partnerships, associations, corporations, business trusts, legal
representatives, or any organized group of persons.

(7)
((The term)) "Safety and health standard" means a
standard which requires the adoption or use of one or more practices, means,
methods, operations, or processes reasonably necessary or appropriate to
provide safe or healthful employment and places of employment.

(8)
((The term)) "Workplace" means any plant, yard, premises,
room, or other place where an employee or employees are employed for the
performance of labor or service over which the employer has the right of access
or control, and includes, but is not limited to, all workplaces covered by
industrial insurance under Title 51 RCW, as now or hereafter amended.

(9) ((The term)) "Working day" means a
calendar day, except Saturdays, Sundays, and all legal holidays as set forth in
RCW 1.16.050, as now or hereafter amended, and for the purposes of the
computation of time within which an act is to be done under the provisions of
this chapter, shall be computed by excluding the first working day and
including the last working day.

Sec.
8. RCW
49.17.050 and 1998 c 224 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In
the adoption of rules and regulations under the authority of this chapter, the
director shall:

(1)
Provide for the preparation, adoption, amendment, or repeal of rules and
regulations of safety and health standards governing the conditions of
employment of general and special application in all workplaces;

(2)
Provide for the adoption of occupational health and safety standards which are
at least as effective as those adopted or recognized by the United States
secretary of labor under the authority of the Occupational Safety and Health
Act of 1970 (Public Law 91-596; 84 Stat. 1590);

(3)
Provide a method of encouraging employers and employees in their efforts to
reduce the number of safety and health hazards at their workplaces and to
stimulate employers and employees to institute new and to perfect existing
programs for providing safe and healthful working conditions;

(4)
Provide for the promulgation of health and safety standards and the control of
conditions in all workplaces concerning gases, vapors, dust, or other airborne
particles, toxic materials, or harmful physical agents which shall set a
standard which most adequately assures, to the extent feasible, on the basis of
the best available evidence, that no employee will suffer material impairment
of health or functional capacity even if such employee has regular exposure to
the hazard dealt with by such standard for the period of his or her
working life; any such standards shall require where appropriate the use of
protective devices or equipment and for monitoring or measuring any such gases,
vapors, dust, or other airborne particles, toxic materials, or harmful physical
agents;

(5)
Provide for appropriate reporting procedures by employers with respect to such
information relating to conditions of employment which will assist in achieving
the objectives of this chapter;

(6)
Provide for the frequency, method, and manner of the making of inspections of
workplaces without advance notice; ((and,))

(7)
Provide for the publication and dissemination to employers, employees, and
labor organizations and the posting where appropriate by employers of
informational, education, or training materials calculated to aid and assist in
achieving the objectives of this chapter;

(8)
Provide for the establishment of new and the perfection and expansion of
existing programs for occupational safety and health education for employers
and employees, and, in addition institute methods and procedures for the
establishment of a program for voluntary compliance solely through the use of
advice and consultation with employers and employees with recommendations
including recommendations of methods to abate violations relating to the
requirements of this chapter and all applicable safety and health standards and
rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to the authority of this chapter;

(9)
Provide for the adoption of safety and health standards requiring the use of
safeguards in trenches and excavations and around openings of hoistways,
hatchways, elevators, stairways, and similar openings;

(10)
Provide for the promulgation of health and safety standards requiring the use
of safeguards for all vats, pans, trimmers, cut off, gang edger, and other
saws, planers, presses, formers, cogs, gearing, belting, shafting, coupling,
set screws, live rollers, conveyors, mangles in laundries, and machinery of
similar description, which can be effectively guarded with due regard to the
ordinary use of such machinery and appliances and the danger to employees
therefrom, and with which the employees of any such workplace may come in
contact while in the performance of their duties and prescribe methods,
practices, or processes to be followed by employers which will enhance the
health and safety of employees in the performance of their duties when in
proximity to machinery or appliances mentioned in this subsection; and

(11)
Certify that no later than twenty business days prior to the effective date of
any significant legislative rule, as defined by RCW 34.05.328, a meeting of
impacted parties is convened to: (a) Identify ambiguities and problem areas in
the rule; (b) coordinate education and public relations efforts by all parties;
(c) provide comments regarding internal department training and enforcement
plans; and (d) provide comments regarding appropriate evaluation mechanisms to
determine the effectiveness of the new rule. The meeting shall include a
balanced representation of both business and labor from impacted industries,
department personnel responsible for the above subject areas, and other
agencies or key stakeholder groups as determined by the department. An
existing advisory committee may be utilized if appropriate.

Sec.
9. RCW
49.17.060 and 1973 c 80 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
employer:

(1)
Shall furnish to each of his or her employees a place of employment free
from recognized hazards that are causing or likely to cause serious injury or
death to his or her employees: PROVIDED, That no citation or order
assessing a penalty shall be issued to any employer solely under the authority
of this subsection except where no applicable rule or regulation has been
adopted by the department covering the unsafe or unhealthful condition of
employment at the workplace; and

(2)
Shall comply with the rules, regulations, and orders promulgated under this
chapter.

Sec.
10. RCW
49.17.070 and 1973 c 80 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The director, or ((his)) the director's authorized
representative, in carrying out his or her duties under this chapter,
upon the presentation of appropriate credentials to the owner, manager,
operator, or agent in charge, is authorized:

(((1)))
(a) To enter without delay and at all reasonable times the factory,
plant, establishment, construction site, or other area, workplace, or
environment where work is performed by an employee of an employer; and

(((2)))
(b) To inspect, survey, and investigate during regular working hours and
at other reasonable times, and within reasonable limits and in a reasonable
manner, any such workplace and all pertinent conditions, structures, machines,
apparatus, devices, equipment, and materials therein, and to question privately
any such employer, owner, operator, agent, or employee((;)).

(((3)))
(2) In making inspections and making investigations under this chapter
the director may require the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the
production of evidence under oath. Witnesses shall be paid the same fees and
mileage that are paid witnesses in the superior courts. In the case of
contumacy, failure, or refusal of any person to obey such an order, any
superior court within the jurisdiction of which such person is found, or
resides, or transacts business, upon the application of the director, shall
have jurisdiction to issue to such person an order requiring such person to
appear to produce evidence if, as, and when so ordered, and to give testimony
relating to the matter under investigation or in question, and any failure to
obey such order of the court may be punished by ((said)) the
court as a contempt thereof.

Sec.
11. RCW
49.17.080 and 1973 c 80 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any employer may apply to the director for a temporary order granting a variance
from any safety and health standard promulgated by rule or regulation under the
authority of this chapter. Such temporary order shall be granted only if the
employer files an application which meets the requirements of subsection (2) of
this section and establishes that the employer is unable to comply with a
safety or health standard because of the unavailability of professional or
technical personnel or of materials and equipment needed to come into
compliance with the safety and health standard or because necessary
construction or alteration of facilities cannot be completed by the effective
date of such safety and health standard, that ((he)) the employer
is taking all available steps to safeguard his or her employees against
the hazards covered by the safety and health standard, and ((he)) the
employer has an effective program for coming into compliance with such
safety and health standard as quickly as practicable. Any temporary order
issued under the authority of this subsection shall prescribe the practices,
means, methods, operations, and processes which the employer must adopt and use
while the order is in effect and state in detail ((his)) the
employer's program for coming into compliance with the safety and health
standard. Such a temporary order may be granted only after notice to employees
and an opportunity for a hearing upon request of the employer or any affected
employee. The name of any affected employee requesting a hearing under the
provisions of this subsection shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed
without the consent of such employee. The director may issue one interim order
to be effective until a determination is made or a decision rendered if a
hearing is demanded. No temporary order may be in effect for longer than the
period needed by the employer to achieve compliance with the standard, or one
year, whichever is shorter, except that such an order may be renewed not more
than twice, so long as the requirements of this subsection are met and if an
application for renewal is filed at least ninety days prior to the expiration
date of the order. No renewal of a temporary order may remain in effect for
longer than one hundred eighty days.

(2)
An application for a temporary order under this section shall contain:

(a)
A specification of the safety and health standard or portion thereof from which
the employer seeks a variance;

(b)
A representation by the employer, supported by representations from qualified
persons having first hand knowledge of the facts represented, that he or she
is unable to comply with the safety and health standard or portion thereof and
a detailed statement of the reasons therefor;

(c)
A statement of the steps the employer has taken and will take, with specific
dates, to protect employees against the hazard covered by the standard;

(d)
A statement as to when the employer expects to be able to comply with the
standard or portion thereof and what steps he or she has taken and will
take, with dates specified, to come into compliance with the standard; and

(e)
A certification that the employer, by the date of mailing or delivery of the
application to the director, has informed his or her employees of the
application by providing a copy thereof to his or her employees or their
authorized representative by posting a copy of such application in a place or
places reasonably accessible to all employees or by other appropriate means of
notification and by mailing a copy to the authorized representative of such
employees; the application shall set forth the manner in which the employees
have been so informed. The application shall also advise employees and their
employee representatives of their right to apply to the director to conduct a
hearing upon the application for a variance.

Sec.
12. RCW
49.17.090 and 1973 c 80 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
employer may apply to the director for an order for a variance from any rule or
regulation establishing a safety and health standard promulgated under this
chapter. Affected employees shall be given notice of each such application and
in the manner prescribed by RCW 49.17.080 shall be informed of their right to
request a hearing on any such application. The director shall issue such order
granting a variance, after opportunity for an inspection, if ((he)) the
director determines or decides after a hearing has been held, if request
for hearing has been made, that the applicant for the variance has demonstrated
by a preponderance of the evidence that the conditions, practices, means,
methods, operations, or processes used or proposed to be used by such applicant
employer will provide employment and places of employment to his or her
employees which are as safe and healthful as those which would prevail if he or
she complied with the safety and health standard or standards from which
the variance is sought. The order so issued shall prescribe the conditions the
employer must maintain, and the practices, means, methods, operations, and
processes which he or she must adopt and utilize to the extent they
differ from the standard in question. At any time after six months has elapsed
from the date of the issuance of the order granting a variance upon application
of an employer, employee, or the director on ((his)) the director's
own motion, after notice has been given in the manner prescribed for the
issuance of such order may modify or revoke the order granting the variance
from any standard promulgated under the authority of this chapter.

Sec.
13. RCW
49.17.100 and 1986 c 192 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A
representative of the employer and an employee representative authorized by the
employees of such employer shall be given an opportunity to accompany the
director, or ((his)) the director's authorized representative,
during the physical inspection of any workplace for the purpose of aiding such
inspection. Where there is no authorized employee representative, the director
or ((his)) the director's authorized representative shall consult
with a reasonable number of employees concerning matters of health and safety
in the workplace. The director may adopt procedural rules and regulations to
implement the provisions of this section: PROVIDED, That neither this section,
nor any other provision of this chapter, shall be construed to interfere with,
impede, or in any way diminish the right of employees to bargain collectively
with their employers through representatives of their own choosing concerning
wages or standards or conditions of employment which equal or exceed those
established under the authority of this chapter.

Sec.
14. RCW
49.17.110 and 1973 c 80 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
employee shall comply with the provisions of this chapter and all rules,
regulations, and orders issued pursuant to the authority of this chapter which
are applicable to his or her own actions and conduct in the course of
his or her employment. Any employee or representative of employees who
in good faith believes that a violation of a safety or health standard,
promulgated by rule under the authority of this chapter exists that threatens
physical harm to employees, or that an imminent danger to such employees
exists, may request an inspection of the workplace by giving notice to the
director or ((his)) the director's authorized representative of
such violation or danger. Any such notice shall be reduced to writing, shall
set forth with reasonable particularity the grounds for the notice, and shall
be signed by the employee or representative of employees. A copy of the notice
shall be provided the employer or ((his)) the employer's agent no
later than at the time of inspection, except that, upon the request of the
person giving such notice, his or her name and the names of individual
employees referred to therein shall not appear in such copy or on any record
published, released, or made available pursuant to any provision of this
chapter. If upon receipt of such notification the director determines that
there are reasonable grounds to believe that such violation or danger exists,
((he)) the director shall make a special inspection as soon as
practicable, to determine if such violation or danger exists. If the director
determines there are no reasonable grounds to believe that a violation or
danger exists, he or she shall notify the employer and the employee or
representative of the employees in writing of such determination.

Prior
to or during any inspection of a workplace, any employee or representative of
employees employed in such workplace may notify the director or any
representative of the director responsible for conducting the inspection, in
writing, of any violation of this chapter which he or she has reason to
believe exists in such workplace. The director shall, by rule, establish
procedures for informal review of any refusal by a representative of the
director to issue a citation with respect to any such alleged violation, and
shall furnish the employee or representative of employees requesting such
review a written statement of the reasons for the director's final disposition
of the case.

Sec.
15. RCW
49.17.130 and 1973 c 80 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If upon inspection or investigation, the director, or ((his)) the
director's authorized representative, believes that an employer has
violated a requirement of RCW 49.17.060, or any safety or health standard
promulgated by rules of the department, or any conditions of an order granting
a variance, which violation is such that a danger exists from which there is a
substantial probability that death or serious physical harm could result to any
employee, the director or ((his)) the director's authorized
representative shall issue a citation and may issue an order immediately
restraining any such condition, practice, method, process, or means in the
workplace. Any order issued under this section may require such steps to be
taken as may be necessary to avoid, correct, or remove such danger and prohibit
the employment or presence of any individual in locations or under conditions
where such danger exists, except individuals whose presence is necessary to
avoid, correct, or remove such danger or to maintain the capacity of a
continuous process operation in order that the resumption of normal operations
may be had without a complete cessation of operations, or where a cessation of
operations is necessary, to permit such to be accomplished in a safe and
orderly manner. In addition, if any machine or equipment, or any part thereof,
is in violation of a requirement of RCW 49.17.060 or any safety or health
standard promulgated by rules of the department, and the operation of such
machine or equipment gives rise to a substantial probability that death or
serious physical harm could result to any employee, and an order of immediate
restraint of the use of such machine or equipment has been issued under this
subsection, the use of such machine or equipment is prohibited, and a notice to
that effect shall be attached thereto by the director or ((his)) the
director's authorized representative.

(2)
Whenever the director, or ((his)) director's authorized
representative, concludes that a condition of employment described in
subsection (1) of this section exists in any workplace, he or she shall
promptly inform the affected employees and employers of the danger.

(3)
At any time that a citation or a citation and order restraining any condition
of employment or practice described in subsection (1) of this section is issued
by the director, or ((his)) the director's authorized representative,
he or she may in addition request the attorney general to make an
application to the superior court of the county wherein such condition of
employment or practice exists for a temporary restraining order or such other
relief as appears to be appropriate under the circumstances.

Sec.
16. RCW
49.17.160 and 1973 c 80 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No person shall discharge or in any manner discriminate against any employee
because such employee has filed any complaint or instituted or caused to be
instituted any proceeding under or related to this chapter, or has testified or
is about to testify in any such proceeding or because of the exercise by such
employee on behalf of himself or herself or others of any right afforded
by this chapter.

(2)
Any employee who believes that he or she has been discharged or
otherwise discriminated against by any person in violation of this section may,
within thirty days after such violation occurs, file a complaint with the director
alleging such discrimination. Upon receipt of such complaint, the director
shall cause such investigation to be made as ((he)) the director
deems appropriate. If upon such investigation, the director determines that
the provisions of this section have been violated, ((he)) the
director shall bring an action in the superior court of the county wherein
the violation is alleged to have occurred against the person or persons who is
alleged to have violated the provisions of this section. If the director
determines that the provisions of this section have not been violated, the
employee may institute the action on his or her own behalf within thirty
days of such determination. In any such action the superior court shall have
jurisdiction, for cause shown, to restrain violations of subsection (1) of this
section and order all appropriate relief including rehiring or reinstatement of
the employee to his or her former position with back pay.

(3)
Within ninety days of the receipt of the complaint filed under this section,
the director shall notify the complainant of his or her determination
under subsection (2) of this section.

Sec.
17. RCW
49.17.170 and 1973 c 80 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In addition to and after having invoked the powers of restraint vested in the
director as provided in RCW 49.17.130 the superior courts of the state of
Washington shall have jurisdiction upon petition of the director, through the
attorney general, to enjoin any condition or practice in any workplace from
which there is a substantial probability that death or serious physical harm
could result to any employee immediately or before the imminence of such danger
can be eliminated through the enforcement procedures otherwise provided by this
chapter. Any order issued under this section may require such steps to be
taken as may be necessary to avoid, correct, or remove such danger and prohibit
the employment or presence of any individual in locations or under conditions
where such danger exists, except individuals whose presence is necessary to
avoid, correct, or remove such danger or to maintain the capacity of a
continuous process operation to resume normal operation without a complete
cessation of operations, or where a cessation of operations is necessary, to
permit such to be accomplished in a safe and orderly manner.

(2)
Upon the filing of any such petition the superior courts of the state of
Washington shall have jurisdiction to grant such injunctive relief or temporary
restraining order pending the outcome of enforcement proceedings pursuant to
this chapter, except that no temporary restraining order issued without notice
shall be effective for a period longer than five working days.

(3)
Whenever and as soon as any authorized representative of the director concludes
that a condition or practice described in subsection (1) exists in any
workplace, he or she shall inform the affected employees and employers
of the danger and may recommend to the director that relief be sought under
this section.

(4)
If the director arbitrarily or capriciously fails to invoke his or her
restraining authority under RCW 49.17.130 or fails to seek relief under this
section, any employee who may be injured by reason of such failure, or the
representative of such employees, may bring an action against the director in
the superior court for the county in which the danger is alleged to exist for a
writ of mandamus to compel the director to seek such an order and for such
further relief as may be appropriate or seek the director to exercise his or
her restraining authority under RCW 49.17.130.

Sec.
18. RCW
49.17.180 and 1995 c 403 s 629 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in RCW 43.05.090, any employer who willfully or repeatedly
violates the requirements of RCW 49.17.060, of any safety or health standard
promulgated under the authority of this chapter, of any existing rule or
regulation governing the conditions of employment promulgated by the
department, or of any order issued granting a variance under RCW 49.17.080 or
49.17.090 may be assessed a civil penalty not to exceed seventy thousand
dollars for each violation. A minimum penalty of five thousand dollars shall
be assessed for a willful violation.

(2)
Any employer who has received a citation for a serious violation of the
requirements of RCW 49.17.060, of any safety or health standard promulgated
under the authority of this chapter, of any existing rule or regulation governing
the conditions of employment promulgated by the department, or of any order
issued granting a variance under RCW 49.17.080 or 49.17.090 as determined in
accordance with subsection (6) of this section, shall be assessed a civil
penalty not to exceed seven thousand dollars for each such violation.

(3)
Any employer who has received a citation for a violation of the requirements of
RCW 49.17.060, of any safety or health standard promulgated under this chapter,
of any existing rule or regulation governing the conditions of employment
promulgated by the department, or of any order issued granting a variance under
RCW 49.17.080 or 49.17.090, where such violation is specifically determined not
to be of a serious nature as provided in subsection (6) of this section, may be
assessed a civil penalty not to exceed seven thousand dollars for each such
violation, unless such violation is determined to be de minimis.

(4)
Any employer who fails to correct a violation for which a citation has been
issued under RCW 49.17.120 or 49.17.130 within the period permitted for its
correction, which period shall not begin to run until the date of the final
order of the board of industrial insurance appeals in the case of any review
proceedings under this chapter initiated by the employer in good faith and not
solely for delay or avoidance of penalties, may be assessed a civil penalty of
not more than seven thousand dollars for each day during which such failure or
violation continues.

(5)
Any employer who violates any of the posting requirements of this chapter, or
any of the posting requirements of rules promulgated by the department pursuant
to this chapter related to employee or employee representative's rights to
notice, including but not limited to those employee rights to notice set forth
in RCW 49.17.080, 49.17.090, 49.17.120, 49.17.130, 49.17.220(1) and
49.17.240(2), shall be assessed a penalty not to exceed seven thousand dollars
for each such violation. Any employer who violates any of the posting
requirements for the posting of informational, educational, or training
materials under the authority of RCW 49.17.050(7), may be assessed a penalty
not to exceed seven thousand dollars for each such violation.

(6)
For the purposes of this section, a serious violation shall be deemed to exist
in a workplace if there is a substantial probability that death or serious
physical harm could result from a condition which exists, or from one or more
practices, means, methods, operations, or processes which have been adopted or
are in use in such workplace, unless the employer did not, and could not with
the exercise of reasonable diligence, know of the presence of the violation.

(7)
The director, or ((his)) the director's authorized
representatives, shall have authority to assess all civil penalties provided in
this section, giving due consideration to the appropriateness of the penalty
with respect to the number of affected employees of the employer being charged,
the gravity of the violation, the size of the employer's business, the good
faith of the employer, and the history of previous violations.

(8)
Civil penalties imposed under this chapter shall be paid to the director for
deposit in the supplemental pension fund established by RCW 51.44.033. Civil
penalties may be recovered in a civil action in the name of the department
brought in the superior court of the county where the violation is alleged to
have occurred, or the department may utilize the procedures for collection of
civil penalties as set forth in RCW 51.48.120 through 51.48.150.

Sec.
19. RCW
49.17.190 and 1986 c 20 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any person who gives advance notice of any inspection to be conducted under the
authority of this chapter, without the consent of the director or ((his))
the director's authorized representative, shall, upon conviction be
guilty of a gross misdemeanor and be punished by a fine of not more than one
thousand dollars or by imprisonment for not more than six months, or by both.

(2)
Whoever knowingly makes any false statement, representation, or certification
in any application, record, report, plan, or other document filed or required
to be maintained pursuant to this chapter shall, upon conviction be guilty of a
gross misdemeanor and be punished by a fine of not more than ten thousand
dollars, or by imprisonment for not more than six months or by both.

(3)
Any employer who willfully and knowingly violates the requirements of
RCW 49.17.060, any safety or health standard promulgated under this chapter,
any existing rule or regulation governing the safety or health conditions of
employment and adopted by the director, or any order issued granting a variance
under RCW 49.17.080 or 49.17.090 and that violation caused death to any
employee shall, upon conviction be guilty of a gross misdemeanor and be
punished by a fine of not more than one hundred thousand dollars or by
imprisonment for not more than six months or by both; except, that if the
conviction is for a violation committed after a first conviction of such
person, punishment shall be a fine of not more than two hundred thousand
dollars or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both.

(4)
Any employer who has been issued an order immediately restraining a condition,
practice, method, process, or means in the workplace, pursuant to RCW 49.17.130
or 49.17.170, and who nevertheless continues such condition, practice, method,
process, or means, or who continues to use a machine or equipment or part
thereof to which a notice prohibiting such use has been attached, shall be
guilty of a gross misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine
of not more than ten thousand dollars or by imprisonment for not more than six
months, or by both.

(5)
Any employer who shall knowingly remove, displace, damage, or destroy, or cause
to be removed, displaced, damaged, or destroyed any safety device or safeguard
required to be present and maintained by any safety or health standard, rule,
or order promulgated pursuant to this chapter, or pursuant to the authority
vested in the director under RCW 43.22.050 shall, upon conviction, be guilty of
a misdemeanor and be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars or
by imprisonment for not more than ninety days, or by both.

(6)
Whenever the director has reasonable cause to believe that any provision of
this section defining a crime has been violated by an employer, the director
shall cause a record of such alleged violation to be prepared, a copy of which
shall be referred to the prosecuting attorney of the county wherein such
alleged violation occurred, and the prosecuting attorney of such county shall
in writing advise the director of the disposition he or she shall make
of the alleged violation.

Sec.
20. RCW
49.17.200 and 1973 c 80 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

All information reported to or otherwise obtained by the director,
or ((his)) the director's authorized representative, in
connection with any inspection or proceeding under the authority of this
chapter, which contains or which might reveal a trade secret shall be
considered confidential, except that such information may be disclosed to other
officers or employees concerned with carrying out this chapter, or when
relevant in any proceeding under this chapter. In any such proceeding the
director, the board of industrial insurance appeals, or the court shall issue
such orders as may be appropriate to protect the confidentiality of trade
secrets.

Sec.
21. RCW
49.17.220 and 1973 c 80 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each employer shall make, keep, and preserve, and make available to the
director such records regarding his or her activities relating to this
chapter as the director may prescribe by regulation as necessary or appropriate
for the enforcement of this chapter or for developing information regarding the
causes and prevention of occupational accidents and illnesses. In order to
carry out the provisions of this section such regulations may include
provisions requiring employers to conduct periodic inspections. The director
shall also issue regulations requiring that employers, through posting of
notices or other appropriate means, keep their employees informed of their
protections and obligations under this chapter, including the provisions of
applicable safety and health standards.

(2)
The director shall prescribe regulations requiring employers to maintain
accurate records, and to make periodic reports of work-related deaths, and of
injuries and illnesses other than minor injuries requiring only first aid
treatment and which do not involve medical treatment, loss of consciousness,
restriction of work or motion, or transfer to another job.

(3)
The director shall issue regulations requiring employers to maintain accurate
records of employee exposures to potentially toxic materials or harmful
physical agents which are required to be monitored or measured. Such
regulations shall provide employees or their representatives with an
opportunity to observe such monitoring or measuring, and to have access to the
records thereof. Such regulations shall also make appropriate provisions for
each employee or former employee to have access to such records as will
indicate his or her own exposure to toxic materials or harmful physical
agents. Each employer shall promptly notify any employee who has been or is
being exposed to toxic materials or harmful physical agents in concentrations
or at levels which exceed those prescribed by any applicable safety and health
standard promulgated under this chapter and shall inform any employee who is
being thus exposed of the corrective action being taken.

Sec.
22. RCW
49.17.240 and 1973 c 80 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The director in the promulgation of rules under the authority of this chapter
shall establish safety and health standards for conditions of employment of
general and/or specific applicability for all industries, businesses,
occupations, crafts, trades, and employments subject to the provisions of this
chapter, or those that are a national or accepted federal standard. In
adopting safety and health standards for conditions of employment, the director
shall solicit and give due regard to all recommendations by any employer,
employee, or labor representative of employees.

(2)
Any safety and health standard adopted by rule of the director shall, where
appropriate, prescribe the use of labels or other forms of warning to insure
that employees are apprised of all hazards to which they may be exposed,
relevant symptoms, and appropriate emergency treatment, and proper conditions
and precautions of safe use or exposure. Where appropriate, such rules shall
so prescribe suitable protective equipment and control or technological
procedures to be used in connection with such hazards and shall provide for
monitoring or measuring employee exposure at such locations and intervals, and
in such manner as may be reasonably necessary for the protection of employees.
In addition, where appropriate, any such rule shall prescribe the type and
frequency of medical examinations or other tests which shall be made available,
by the employer or at his or her cost, to employees exposed to such
hazards in order to most effectively determine whether the health of such
employees is adversely affected by such exposure. In the event that such
medical examinations are in the nature of research, as determined by the director,
such examinations may be furnished at the expense of the department. The
results of such examinations or tests shall be furnished only to the director,
other appropriate agencies of government, and at the request of the employee to
his or her physician.

(3)
Whenever the director adopts by rule any safety and health standard he or
she may at the same time provide by rule the effective date of such
standard which shall not be less than thirty days, excepting emergency rules,
but may be made effective at such time in excess of thirty days from the date
of adoption as specified in any rule adopting a safety and health standard.
Any rule not made effective thirty days after adoption, having a delayed
effectiveness in excess of thirty days, may only be made upon a finding made by
the director that such delayed effectiveness of the rule is reasonably
necessary to afford the affected employers a reasonable opportunity to make
changes in methods, means, or practices to meet the requirements of the adopted
rule. Temporary orders granting a variance may be utilized by the director in
lieu of the delayed effectiveness in the adoption of any rule.

Sec.
23. RCW
49.17.260 and 1973 c 80 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

In
furtherance of the objects and purposes of this chapter, the director shall
develop and maintain an effective program of collection, compilation, and
analysis of industrial safety and health statistics. The director, or ((his))
the director's authorized representative, shall investigate and analyze
industrial catastrophes, serious injuries, and fatalities occurring in any
workplace subject to this chapter, in an effort to ascertain whether such
injury or fatality occurred as the result of a violation of this chapter, or
any safety and health standard, rule, or order promulgated pursuant to this
chapter, or if not, whether a safety and health standard or rule should be
promulgated for application to such circumstances. The director shall adopt
rules relating to the conducting and reporting of such investigations. Such
investigative report shall be deemed confidential and only available upon order
of the superior court after notice to the director and an opportunity for
hearing: PROVIDED, That such investigative reports shall be made available
without the necessity of obtaining a court order, to employees of governmental
agencies in the performance of their official duties, to the injured ((workman))
worker or his or her legal representative or his or her
labor organization representative, or to the legal representative or labor
organization representative of a deceased ((workman)) worker who
was the subject of an investigation, or to the employer of the injured or
deceased ((workman)) worker or any other employer or person whose
actions or business operation is the subject of the report of investigation, or
any attorney representing a party in any pending legal action in which an
investigative report constitutes relevant and material evidence in such legal
action.

Sec.
24. RCW
49.24.040 and 1937 c 131 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

If
an employee is a new employee, an absentee for ten or more successive days, an
employee who has worked in compressed air continuously for three months or a
beginner in compressed air who has worked but a single ((shaft [shift]))
shift as required by RCW 49.24.050, the officer required by RCW
49.24.030(1) shall examine him or her and declare him or her
physically fit to work in compressed air before permitting him or her to
enter or reenter the working chamber. Excessive users of intoxicants shall not
be permitted to work in compressed air.

Sec.
25. RCW
49.24.150 and 1941 c 194 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

When
locking explosives and detonators into the air chamber, they shall be kept at
opposite ends of the lock. While explosives and detonators are being taken
through, no ((men)) persons other than the lock tender and the
carriers shall be permitted in the lock.

Sec.
26. RCW
49.24.180 and 1941 c 194 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

While work is in progress, the employer shall employ a competent
person who shall make a regular inspection at least once every working day of
all engines, boilers, steam pipes, drills, air pipes, air gauges, air locks,
dynamos, electric wiring, signaling apparatus, brakes, cages, buckets, hoists,
cables, ropes, timbers, supports, and all other apparatus and appliances; and
he or she shall immediately upon discovery of any defect, report same in
writing to the employer, or ((his)) the employer's agent in
charge.

Sec.
27. RCW
49.24.190 and 1941 c 194 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

No
employee shall ride on any loaded car, cage or bucket, nor walk up or down any
incline or shaft while any car, cage or bucket is above him or her.

Sec.
28. RCW
49.24.220 and 1941 c 194 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No greater quantity of explosives than that which is required for immediate use
shall be taken into the working chamber.

(2)
Explosives shall be conveyed in a suitable covered wooden box.

(3)
Detonators shall be conveyed in a separate covered wooden box.

(4)
Explosives and detonators shall be taken separately into the caissons.

(5)
After blasting is completed, all explosives and detonators shall be returned at
once to the magazine.

(6)
No naked light shall be used in the vicinity of open chests or magazines
containing explosives, nor near where a charge is being primed.

(7)
No tools or other articles shall be carried with the explosives or with the
detonators.

(8)
All power lines and electric light wires shall be disconnected at a point outside
the blasting switch before the loading of holes. No current by grounding of
power or bonded rails shall be allowed beyond blasting switch after explosives
are taken in preparatory to blasting, and under no circumstances shall grounded
current be used for exploding blasts.

(9)
Before drilling is commenced on any shift, all remaining holes shall be
examined with a wooden stick for unexploded charges or cartridges, and if any
are found, same shall be refired before work proceeds.

(10)
No person shall be allowed to deepen holes that have previously contained
explosives.

(11)
All wires in broken rock shall be carefully traced and search made for
unexploded cartridges.

(12)
Whenever blasting is being done in a tunnel, at points liable to break through
to where other ((men)) persons are at work, the foreman or person
in charge shall, before any holes are loaded, give warning of danger to all
persons that may be working where the blasts may break through, and he or
she shall not allow any holes to be charged until warning is acknowledged
and ((men)) workers are removed.

(13)
Blasters when testing circuit through charged holes shall use sufficient
leading wires to be at a safe distance and shall use only approved types of
galvanometers. No tests of circuits in charged holes shall be made until ((men))
persons are removed to safe distance.

(14)
No blasts shall be fired with fuse, except electrically ignited fuse, in
vertical or steep shafts.

(15) In shaft sinking where the electric current is used for
firing, a separate switch not controlling any electric lights must be used for
blasting and proper safeguard similar to those in tunnels must be followed in
order to insure against premature firing.

Sec.
29. RCW
49.24.230 and 1941 c 194 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

When
firing by electricity from power or lighting wires, a proper switch shall be
furnished with lever down when "off".

The
switch shall be fixed in a locked box to which no person shall have access
except the blaster. There shall be provided flexible leads or connecting wires
not less than five feet in length with one end attached to the incoming lines
and the other end provided with plugs that can be connected to an effective
ground. After blasting, the switch lever shall be pulled out, the wires
disconnected and the box locked before any person shall be allowed to return,
and shall remain so locked until again ready to blast.

In
the working chamber all electric light wires shall be provided with a
disconnecting switch, which must be thrown to disconnect all current from the
wires in the working chamber before electric light wires are removed or the
charge exploded.

Before
blasting the blaster shall cause a sufficient warning to be sounded and shall
compel all persons to retreat to a safe shelter, before he or she sets
off the blast, and shall permit no one to return until conditions are safe.

Sec.
30. RCW
49.24.260 and 1941 c 194 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

All
shafting used in pneumatic caissons shall be provided with ladders, which are
to be kept clear and in good condition at all times. The distance between the
centers of the rungs of a ladder shall not exceed fourteen inches and shall not
vary more than one inch in any one piece of shafting. The length of the ladder
rungs shall not be less than nine inches. The rungs of the ladder shall in no
case be less than three inches from the wall or other obstruction in the
shafting or opening in which the ladder shall be used. Under no circumstances
shall a ladder inclining backward from the vertical be installed. A suitable
ladder shall be provided from the top of all locks to the surface.

All
man shafts shall be lighted at a distance of every ten feet with a guarded
incandescent lamp.

All
outside caisson air locks shall be provided with a platform not less than
forty-two inches wide, and provided with a guard rail forty-two inches high.

All
caissons in which fifteen or more ((men)) persons are employed
shall have two locks, one of which shall be used as a man lock. Man locks and
man shafts shall be in charge of a ((man)) person whose duty it
shall be to operate ((said)) the lock and shaft. All caissons
more than ten feet in diameter shall be provided with a separate man shaft,
which shall be kept clear and in operating order at all times.

Locks
shall be so located that the distance between the bottom door and water level
shall be not less than three feet.

Sec.
31. RCW
49.24.290 and 1941 c 194 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

In
all shafts where ((men)) persons are hoisted or lowered, an
iron-bonneted cage shall be used for the conveyance of ((men)) persons,
but this provision shall not apply to shafts in the process of sinking or
during the dismantling of the shaft after work in the tunnel is substantially
completed.

Cages
shall be provided with bonnets consisting of two steel plates not less than
three-sixteenths of an inch in thickness, sloping toward each side and so
arranged that they may be readily pushed upward to afford egress to persons
therein, and such bonnet shall cover the top of the cage in such manner as to
protect persons in the cage from falling objects.

Cages
shall be entirely enclosed on two sides with solid partition or wire mesh not
less than No. 8 U.S. Standard gauge, no opening in which shall exceed two
inches.

Cages
shall be provided with hanging chains or other similar devices for hand holds.

Every
cage shall be provided with an approved safety catch of sufficient strength to
hold the cage with its maximum load at any point in the shaft.

All
parts of the hoisting apparatus, cables, brakes, guides and fastenings shall be
of the most substantial design and shall be arranged for convenient
inspection. The efficiency of all safety devices shall be established by
satisfactory tests before the cages are put into service and at least once
every three months thereafter and a record thereof kept.

The
test of the safety catch shall consist of releasing the cage suddenly in such
manner that the safety catches shall have opportunity to grip the guides.

Sec.
32. RCW
49.24.310 and 1941 c 194 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

Where
tunnels are driven from shafts more than two hundred and fifty feet deep, a
telephone system shall be established and maintained, communicating with the
surface at each such shaft, and with a station or stations readily and quickly
accessible to the ((men)) persons at the working level.

Sec.
33. RCW
49.24.370 and 1941 c 194 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director of labor and industries shall establish such rules and regulations as
he or she deems primarily necessary for the safety of the employees
employed in tunnels, quarries, caissons and subways and shall be guided by the
most modern published studies and researches made by persons or institutions
into the correction of the evils chargeable to improper safeguards and
inspection of the tools, machinery, equipment and places of work obtaining in
the industries covered by RCW 49.24.080 through 49.24.380.

Sec.
34. RCW
49.26.010 and 1973 c 30 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Air-borne
asbestos dust and particles, such as those from sprayed asbestos slurry,
asbestos-coated ventilating ducts, and certain other applications of asbestos
are known to produce irreversible lung damage and bronchogenic carcinoma. One
American of every four dying in urban areas of the United States has asbestos
particles or dust in his or her lungs. The nature of this problem is
such as to constitute a hazard to the public health and safety, and should be
brought under appropriate regulation.

Sec.
35. RCW
49.28.100 and 1953 c 271 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

It
shall be unlawful for any employer to permit any of his or her employees
to operate on docks, in warehouses and/or in or on other waterfront properties
any power driven mechanical equipment for the purpose of loading cargo on, or
unloading cargo from, ships, barges, or other watercraft, or of assisting in
such loading or unloading operations, for a period in excess of twelve and
one-half hours at any one time without giving such person an interval of eight
hours' rest: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, The provisions of this section and RCW
49.28.110 shall not be applicable in cases of emergency, including fire,
violent storms, leaking or sinking ships or services required by the armed
forces of the United States.

Sec.
36. RCW
49.32.020 and 1933 ex.s. c 7 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

In
the interpretation of this chapter and in determining the jurisdiction and
authority of the courts of the state of Washington, as such jurisdiction and
authority are herein defined and limited, the public policy of the state of
Washington is hereby declared as follows:

WHEREAS,
Under prevailing economic conditions, developed with the aid of governmental
authority for owners of property to organize in the corporate and other forms
of ownership association, the individual unorganized worker is commonly
helpless to exercise actual liberty of contract and to protect his or her
freedom of labor, and thereby to obtain acceptable terms and conditions of
employment, wherefore, though he or she should be free to decline to
associate with his or her fellows, it is necessary that he or she
have full freedom of association, self-organization, and designation of
representatives of his or her own choosing, to negotiate the terms and
conditions of his or her employment, and that he or she shall be
free from interference, restraint, or coercion of employers of labor, or their
agents, in the designation of such representatives or in self-organization or
in other concerted activities for the purpose of collective bargaining or other
mutual aid or protections; therefore, the following definitions of, and
limitations upon, the jurisdiction and authority of the courts of the state of
Washington are hereby enacted.

Sec.
37. RCW
49.32.030 and 1933 ex.s. c 7 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
undertaking or promise, such as is described in this section, or any other
undertaking or promise in conflict with the public policy declared in RCW
49.32.020, is hereby declared to be contrary to the public policy of the state
of Washington, shall not be enforceable in any court of the state of
Washington, and shall not afford any basis for the granting of legal or equitable
relief by any such court, including specifically the following:

Every
undertaking or promise hereafter made, whether written or oral, express or
implied, constituting or contained in any contract or agreement of hiring or
employment between any individual, firm, company, association, or corporation
and any employee or prospective employee of the same, whereby((‑-)):

(1)
Either party to such contract or agreement undertakes or promises not to join,
become, or remain a member of any labor organization or of any employer
organization; or

(2)
Either party to such contract or agreement undertakes or promises that he or
she will withdraw from an employment relation in the event that he or
she joins, becomes, or remains a member of any labor organization or of any
employer organization.

Sec.
38. RCW
49.32.072 and 1933 ex.s. c 7 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

No
court of the state of Washington or any judge or judges thereof shall have
jurisdiction to issue a temporary or permanent injunction in any case involving
or growing out of a labor dispute, as herein defined, except after hearing the
testimony of witnesses in open court (with opportunity for cross-examination)
in support of the allegations of a complaint made under oath, and testimony in
opposition thereto, if offered, and except after findings of fact by the court,
to the effect((‑-)):

(1)
That unlawful acts have been threatened and will be committed unless restrained
or have been committed and will be continued unless restrained, but no
injunction or temporary restraining order shall be issued on account of any
threat or unlawful act excepting against the person or persons, association, or
organization making the threat or committing the unlawful act or actually
authorizing or ratifying the same after actual knowledge thereof;

(2)
That substantial and irreparable injury to complainant's property will follow;

(3)
That as to each item of relief granted greater injury will be inflicted upon
complainant by the denial of relief than will be inflicted upon defendants by
the granting of relief;

(4)
That complainant has no adequate remedy at law; and

(5)
That the public officers charged with the duty to protect complainant's
property are unable or unwilling to furnish adequate protection.

Such
hearing shall be held after due and personal notice thereof has been given, in
such manner as the court shall direct, to all persons against whom relief is
sought, and also to the chief of those public officials of the county and city
within which the unlawful acts have been threatened or committed charged with
the duty to protect complainant's property: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That if a
complainant shall also allege that, unless a temporary restraining order shall
be issued without notice, a substantial and irreparable injury to complainant's
property will be unavoidable, such a temporary restraining order may be issued
upon testimony under oath, sufficient, if sustained, to justify the court in
issuing a temporary injunction upon a hearing after notice. Such a temporary
restraining order shall be effective for no longer than five days and shall become
void at the expiration of ((said)) five days. No temporary restraining
order or temporary injunction shall be issued except on condition that
complainant shall first file an undertaking with adequate security in an amount
to be fixed by the court sufficient to recompense those enjoined for any loss,
expense, or damage caused by the improvident or erroneous issuance of such
order or injunction, including all reasonable costs (together with a reasonable
attorney's fee) and expense of defense against the order or against the
granting of any injunctive relief sought in the same proceeding and
subsequently denied by the court.

The
undertaking herein mentioned shall be understood to signify an agreement
entered into by the complainant and the surety upon which a decree may be
rendered in the same suit or proceeding against ((said)) the
complainant and surety, upon a hearing to assess damages of which hearing
complainant and surety shall have reasonable notice, the ((said))
complainant and surety submitting themselves to the jurisdiction of the court
for that purpose. But nothing herein contained shall deprive any party having
a claim or cause of action under or upon such undertaking from electing to
pursue his or her ordinary remedy by suit at law or in equity.

Sec.
39. RCW
49.32.110 and 1933 ex.s. c 7 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

((When
used in this chapter, and for the purpose of this chapter‑‑)) The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
A case shall be held to involve or to grow out of a labor dispute when the case
involves persons who are engaged in the same industry, trade, or occupation; or
have direct or indirect interests therein; or who are employees of the same
employer; or who are members of the same or an affiliated organization of
employers or employees; whether such dispute is: (a) Between one
or more employers or associations of employers and one or more employees or
associations of employees; (b) between one or more employers or associations of
employers and one or more employers or association of employers; or (c) between
one or more employees or association of employees and one or more employees or
association of employees; or when the case involves any conflicting or
competing interests in a "labor dispute" (((as hereinafter
defined))) of "persons participating or interested" therein (((as
hereinafter defined))).

(2)
A person or association shall be held to be a person participating or
interested in a labor dispute if relief is sought against him or ((it)) her,
and if he or ((it)) she is engaged in the same industry, trade,
craft, or occupation in which dispute occurs, or has a direct or indirect
interest therein or is a member, officer, or agent of any association composed
in whole or in part of employers or employees engaged in such industry, trade,
craft, or occupation.

(3)
The term "labor dispute" includes any controversy concerning terms or
conditions of employment, or concerning the association or representation of
persons in negotiating, fixing, maintaining, changing, or seeking to arrange
terms or conditions of employment, regardless of whether or not the disputants
stand in the proximate relation of employer and employee.

Sec.
40. RCW
49.32.080 and 1971 c 81 s 116 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever any court of the state of Washington shall issue or deny
any temporary injunction in a case involving or growing out of a labor dispute,
the court shall, upon the request of any party to the proceedings, and on his or
her filing the usual bond for costs, forthwith certify the entire record of
the case, including a transcript of the evidence taken, to the supreme court or
the court of appeals for its review. Upon the filing of such record in the
supreme court or the court of appeals, the appeal shall be heard and the
temporary injunctive order affirmed, modified, or set aside with the greatest
possible expedition, giving the proceedings precedence over all other matters
except older matters of the same character.

Sec.
41. RCW
49.36.015 and 1919 c 185 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

No restraining order or injunction shall be granted by any court of
this state, or any judge or judges thereof in any case between an employer and
employee or between employer and employees or between employees or between
persons employed and persons seeking employment involving or growing out of a
dispute concerning terms or conditions of employment, unless necessary to
prevent irreparable damage to property or to a personal right or to a property
right of the party making the application, for which injury there is no
adequate remedy at law, and such petition must be in writing describing such
damage or injury feared by the applicant, and sworn to by the applicant or ((his))
the applicant's agent or attorney. No such restraining order or
injunction shall prohibit any such person or persons, whether singly or in
concert, from terminating any relation of employment or from ceasing to perform
any work or labor; or from paying or giving to, or withholding from any person
engaged in such dispute, any strike benefits or other moneys or things of
value; or from doing any act or thing which might lawfully be done in the
absence of such dispute by any party thereto; nor shall any of the acts specified
in this section be considered or held to be illegal or unlawful in any court of
the state.

Sec.
42. RCW
49.40.040 and 1919 c 191 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon
the written petition of either the employer or the employee setting forth in
ordinary and concise language the facts and questions in dispute, the director
of labor and industries shall, in person or by his or her duly
authorized deputy, and is hereby authorized to hear and determine all disputes concerning
wages earned at seasonal labor, and allow or reject deductions made from such
wages for moneys advanced or supplies furnished before the wages are earned for
money paid or supplies furnished during the season or for money paid to third
persons upon the written order of the employee.

Sec.
43. RCW
49.40.050 and 1919 c 191 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon
the filing of any such petition, the director of labor and industries shall
notify the other party to the dispute of the time and place when and where such
petition will be heard, and may set ((said)) the petition for a
hearing before a regularly appointed deputy at such place in the state as he or
she shall determine is most convenient for the parties, and the director or
((his)) the director's deputy shall have power and authority to
issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of
books, papers and records at such hearing, and to administer oaths. Obedience
to such subpoenas shall be enforced by the courts of the county where such
hearing is held.

Sec.
44. RCW
49.40.060 and 1919 c 191 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director of labor and industries, or his or her deputy holding the
hearing shall, after such hearing, determine the amount due from the employer
to the employee, and shall make findings of fact and an award in accordance
therewith, which findings and award shall be filed in the office of the
director and a copy thereof served upon the employer and upon the employee by
registered mail directed to their last known post office address.

Sec.
45. RCW
49.44.020 and 1909 c 249 s 424 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
person who shall give, offer or promise, directly or indirectly, any
compensation, gratuity or reward to any duly constituted representative of a
labor organization, with intent to influence him or her in respect to
any of his or her acts, decisions or other duties as such representative,
or to induce him or her to prevent or cause a strike by the employees of
any person or corporation, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

Sec.
46. RCW
49.44.030 and 1909 c 249 s 425 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
person who, being the duly constituted representative of a labor organization,
shall ask or receive, directly or indirectly, any compensation, gratuity or
reward, or any promise thereof, upon any agreement or understanding that any of
his or her acts, decisions or other duties as such representative, or
any act to prevent or cause a strike of the employees of any person or
corporation shall be influenced thereby, shall be guilty of a gross
misdemeanor.

Sec.
47. RCW
49.44.060 and 1909 c 249 s 426 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
person who shall give, offer or promise, directly or indirectly, any
compensation, gratuity or reward to any agent, employee or servant of any
person or corporation, with intent to influence his or her action in
relation to his or her principal's, employer's or master's business,
shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

Sec.
48. RCW
49.44.080 and 1909 c 249 s 281 are each amended to read as follows:

Every person who shall willfully and maliciously, either
alone or in combination with others, break a contract of service or employment,
knowing or having reasonable cause to believe that the consequence of his or
her so doing will be to endanger human life or to cause grievous bodily
injury, or to expose valuable property to destruction or serious injury, shall
be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Sec.
49. RCW
49.46.040 and 1959 c 294 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The director or ((his)) the director's designated representatives
may investigate and gather data regarding the wages, hours, and other
conditions and practices of employment in any industry subject to this chapter,
and may enter and inspect such places and such records (and make such
transcriptions thereof), question such employees, and investigate such facts,
conditions, practices, or matters as he or she may deem necessary or
appropriate to determine whether any person has violated any provision of this
chapter, or which may aid in the enforcement of the provisions of this chapter.

(2)
With the consent and cooperation of federal agencies charged with the
administration of federal labor laws, the director may, for the purpose of
carrying out ((his)) the director's functions and duties under
this chapter, utilize the services of federal agencies and their employees and,
notwithstanding any other provision of law, may reimburse such federal agencies
and their employees for services rendered for such purposes.

(3)
Every employer subject to any provision of this chapter or of any order issued
under this chapter shall make, keep, and preserve such records of the persons
employed by him or her and of the wages, hours, and other conditions and
practices of employment maintained by him or her, and shall preserve
such records for such periods of time, and shall make reports therefrom to the
director as he or she shall prescribe by regulation as necessary or
appropriate for the enforcement of the provisions of this chapter or the
regulations thereunder.

(4)
The director is authorized to make such regulations regulating, restricting, or
prohibiting industrial homework as are necessary or appropriate to prevent the
circumvention or evasion of and to safeguard the minimum wage rate prescribed
in this chapter, and all existing regulations of the director relating to
industrial homework are hereby continued in full force and effect.

Sec.
50. RCW
49.46.070 and 1959 c 294 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
employer subject to any provision of this chapter or of any regulation issued
under this chapter shall make, and keep in or about the premises wherein any
employee is employed, a record of the name, address, and occupation of each of
his or her employees, the rate of pay, and the amount paid each pay
period to each such employee, the hours worked each day and each work week by
such employee, and such other information as the director shall prescribe by
regulation as necessary or appropriate for the enforcement of the provisions of
this chapter or of the regulations thereunder. Such records shall be open for
inspection or transcription by the director or ((his)) the director's
authorized representative at any reasonable time. Every such employer shall
furnish to the director or to ((his)) the director's authorized representative
on demand a sworn statement of such records and information upon forms
prescribed or approved by the director.

Sec.
51. RCW
49.46.090 and 1959 c 294 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any employer who pays any employee less than wages to which such employee is
entitled under or by virtue of this chapter, shall be liable to such employee
affected for the full amount of such wage rate, less any amount actually paid
to such employee by the employer, and for costs and such reasonable attorney's
fees as may be allowed by the court. Any agreement between such employee and
the employer to work for less than such wage rate shall be no defense to such
action.

(2)
At the written request of any employee paid less than the wages to which he or
she is entitled under or by virtue of this chapter, the director may take
an assignment under this chapter or as provided in RCW 49.48.040 of such wage
claim in trust for the assigning employee and may bring any legal action
necessary to collect such claim, and the employer shall be required to pay the
costs and such reasonable attorney's fees as may be allowed by the court.

Sec.
52. RCW
49.46.100 and 1959 c 294 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any employer who hinders or delays the director or ((his)) the
director's authorized representatives in the performance of his or her
duties in the enforcement of this chapter, or refuses to admit the director or
((his)) the director's authorized representatives to any place of
employment, or fails to make, keep, and preserve any records as required under
the provisions of this chapter, or falsifies any such record, or refuses to
make any record accessible to the director or ((his)) the director's
authorized representatives upon demand, or refuses to furnish a sworn statement
of such record or any other information required for the proper enforcement of
this chapter to the director or ((his)) the director's authorized
representatives upon demand, or pays or agrees to pay wages at a rate less than
the rate applicable under this chapter, or otherwise violates any provision of
this chapter or of any regulation issued under this chapter shall be deemed in
violation of this chapter and shall, upon conviction therefor, be guilty of a
gross misdemeanor.

(2)
Any employer who discharges or in any other manner discriminates against any
employee because such employee has made any complaint to his or her
employer, to the director, or ((his)) the director's authorized
representatives that he or she has not been paid wages in accordance
with the provisions of this chapter, or that the employer has violated any
provision of this chapter, or because such employee has caused to be instituted
or is about to cause to be instituted any proceeding under or related to this
chapter, or because such employee has testified or is about to testify in any
such proceeding shall be deemed in violation of this chapter and shall, upon
conviction therefor, be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

Sec.
53. RCW
49.46.130 and 1998 c 239 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as otherwise provided in this section, no employer shall employ any of
his or her employees for a work week longer than forty hours unless such
employee receives compensation for his or her employment in excess of
the hours above specified at a rate not less than one and one-half times the
regular rate at which he or she is employed.

(2)
This section does not apply to:

(a)
Any person exempted pursuant to RCW 49.46.010(5). The payment of compensation
or provision of compensatory time off in addition to a salary shall not be a
factor in determining whether a person is exempted under RCW 49.46.010(5)(c);

(b)
Employees who request compensating time off in lieu of overtime pay;

(c)
Any individual employed as a seaman whether or not the seaman is employed on a
vessel other than an American vessel;

(d)
Seasonal employees who are employed at concessions and recreational
establishments at agricultural fairs, including those seasonal employees
employed by agricultural fairs, within the state provided that the period of
employment for any seasonal employee at any or all agricultural fairs does not
exceed fourteen working days a year;

(e)
Any individual employed as a motion picture projectionist if that employee is
covered by a contract or collective bargaining agreement which regulates hours
of work and overtime pay;

(f)
An individual employed as a truck or bus driver who is subject to the
provisions of the Federal Motor Carrier Act (49 U.S.C. Sec. 3101 et seq. and 49
U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.), if the compensation system under which the truck or
bus driver is paid includes overtime pay, reasonably equivalent to that
required by this subsection, for working longer than forty hours per week;

(g)
Any individual employed: (i) On a farm, in the employ of any
person, in connection with the cultivation of the soil, or in connection with
raising or harvesting any agricultural or horticultural commodity, including
raising, shearing, feeding, caring for, training, and management of livestock,
bees, poultry, and furbearing animals and wildlife, or in the employ of the
owner or tenant or other operator of a farm in connection with the operation, management,
conservation, improvement, or maintenance of such farm and its tools and
equipment; or (ii) in packing, packaging, grading, storing or delivering to
storage, or to market or to a carrier for transportation to market, any
agricultural or horticultural commodity; or (iii) in commercial canning,
commercial freezing, or any other commercial processing, or with respect to
services performed in connection with the cultivation, raising, harvesting, and
processing of oysters or in connection with any agricultural or horticultural
commodity after its delivery to a terminal market for distribution for
consumption;

(h)
Any industry in which federal law provides for an overtime payment based on a
work week other than forty hours. However, the provisions of the federal law
regarding overtime payment based on a work week other than forty hours shall
nevertheless apply to employees covered by this section without regard to the
existence of actual federal jurisdiction over the industrial activity of the
particular employer within this state. For the purposes of this subsection,
"industry" means a trade, business, industry, or other activity, or
branch, or group thereof, in which individuals are gainfully employed (section
3(h) of the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, as amended (Public Law 93-259);

(i)
Any hours worked by an employee of a carrier by air subject to the provisions
of subchapter II of the Railway Labor Act (45 U.S.C. Sec. 181 et seq.), when
such hours are voluntarily worked by the employee pursuant to a shift-trading
practice under which the employee has the opportunity in the same or in other
work weeks to reduce hours worked by voluntarily offering a shift for trade or
reassignment.

(3)
No employer shall be deemed to have violated subsection (1) of this section by
employing any employee of a retail or service establishment for a work week in
excess of the applicable work week specified in subsection (1) of this section
if:

(a)
The regular rate of pay of the employee is in excess of one and one-half times
the minimum hourly rate required under RCW 49.46.020; and

(b)
More than half of the employee's compensation for a representative period, of
not less than one month, represents commissions on goods or services.

In
determining the proportion of compensation representing commissions, all
earnings resulting from the application of a bona fide commission rate is to be
deemed commissions on goods or services without regard to whether the computed
commissions exceed the draw or guarantee.

(4)
No employer of commissioned salespeople primarily engaged in the business of
selling automobiles, trucks, recreational vessels, recreational vessel
trailers, recreational vehicle trailers, recreational campers, manufactured
housing, or farm implements to ultimate purchasers shall violate subsection (1)
of this section with respect to such commissioned salespeople if the
commissioned salespeople are paid the greater of:

(a)
Compensation at the hourly rate, which may not be less than the rate required
under RCW 49.46.020, for each hour worked up to forty hours per week, and
compensation of one and one-half times that hourly rate for all hours worked
over forty hours in one week; or

(b)
A straight commission, a salary plus commission, or a salary plus bonus applied
to gross salary.

(5)
No public agency shall be deemed to have violated subsection (1) of this
section with respect to the employment of any employee in fire protection
activities or any employee in law enforcement activities (including security
personnel in correctional institutions) if: (a) In a work period of
twenty-eight consecutive days the employee receives for tours of duty which in
the aggregate exceed two hundred forty hours; or (b) in the case of such an
employee to whom a work period of at least seven but less than twenty-eight
days applies, in his or her work period the employee receives for tours of duty
which in the aggregate exceed a number of hours which bears the same ratio to
the number of consecutive days in his or her work period as two hundred forty
hours bears to twenty-eight days; compensation at a rate not less than one and
one-half times the regular rate at which he or she is employed.

Sec.
54. RCW
49.48.010 and 1971 ex.s. c 55 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
When any employee shall cease to work for an employer, whether by discharge or
by voluntary withdrawal, the wages due him or her on account of his or
her employment shall be paid to him or her at the end of the
established pay period: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That this paragraph shall not apply
when workers are engaged in an employment that normally involves working for
several employers in the same industry interchangeably, and the several employers
or some of them cooperate to establish a plan for the weekly payment of wages
at a central place or places and in accordance with a unified schedule of
paydays providing for at least one payday each week; but this subsection shall
not apply to any such plan until ten days after notice of their intention to
set up such a plan shall have been given to the director of labor and
industries by the employers who cooperate to establish the plan; and having
once been established, no such plan can be abandoned except after notice of
their intention to abandon such plan has been given to the director of labor
and industries by the employers intending to abandon the plan: PROVIDED
FURTHER, That the duty to pay an employee forthwith shall not apply if the
labor-management agreement under which the employee has been employed provides
otherwise.

(2)
It shall be unlawful for any employer to withhold or divert any portion of an
employee's wages unless the deduction is:

(((1)))
(a) Required by state or federal law; or

(((2)))
(b) Specifically agreed upon orally or in writing by the employee and
employer; or

(((3)))
(c) For medical, surgical or hospital care or service, pursuant to any
rule or regulation: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the deduction is openly, clearly
and in due course recorded in the employer's books and records.

((Paragraph
three)) (3) Subsection (2) of this section shall not be construed to
affect the right of any employer or former employer to sue upon or collect any
debt owed to ((said)) the employer or former employer by his or
her employees or former employees.

Sec.
55. RCW
49.48.030 and 1971 ex.s. c 55 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

In
any action in which any person is successful in recovering judgment for wages or
salary owed to him or her, reasonable attorney's fees, in an amount to
be determined by the court, shall be assessed against ((said)) the
employer or former employer: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That this section shall not
apply if the amount of recovery is less than or equal to the amount admitted by
the employer to be owing for ((said)) wages or salary.

Sec.
56. RCW
49.48.050 and 1935 c 96 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing
herein contained shall be construed to limit the authority of the prosecuting
attorney of any county to prosecute actions, both civil and criminal, for such
violations of RCW 49.48.040 through 49.48.080 as may come to his or her
knowledge, or to enforce the provisions hereof independently and without
specific direction of the director of labor and industries.

Sec.
57. RCW
49.48.060 and 1971 ex.s. c 55 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If upon investigation by the director, after taking assignments of any wage
claim under RCW 49.48.040, it appears to the director that the employer is
representing to his or her employees that he or she is able to
pay wages for their services and that the employees are not being paid for
their services, the director may require the employer to give a bond in such
sum as the director deems reasonable and adequate in the circumstances, with
sufficient surety, conditioned that the employer will for a definite future
period not exceeding six months conduct his or her business and pay his or
her employees in accordance with the laws of the state of Washington.

(2)
If within ten days after demand for such bond the employer fails to provide the
same, the director may commence a suit against the employer in the superior
court of appropriate jurisdiction to compel him or her to furnish such
bond or cease doing business until he or she has done so. The employer
shall have the burden of proving the amount thereof to be excessive.

(3)
If the court finds that there is just cause for requiring such bond and that
the same is reasonable, necessary or appropriate to secure the prompt payment
of the wages of the employees of such employer and his or her compliance
with RCW 49.48.010 through 49.48.080, the court shall enjoin such employer from
doing business in this state until the requirement is met, or shall make other,
and may make further, orders appropriate to compel compliance with the
requirement.

Upon
being informed of a wage claim against an employer or former employer, the
director shall, if such claim appears to be just, immediately notify the
employer or former employer, of such claim by mail. If the employer or former
employer fails to pay the claim or make satisfactory explanation to the
director of his or her failure to do so, within thirty days thereafter,
the employer or former employer shall be liable to a penalty of ten percent of
that portion of the claim found to be justly due. The director shall have a
cause of action against the employer or former employer for the recovery of
such penalty, and the same may be included in any subsequent action by the
director on ((said)) the wage claim, or may be exercised
separately after adjustment of such wage claim without court action.

Sec.
58. RCW
49.48.090 and 1909 c 32 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

No
assignment of, or order for, wages to be earned in the future to secure a loan
of less than three hundred dollars, shall be valid against an employer of the
person making ((said)) the assignment or order unless ((said))
the assignment or order is accepted in writing by the employer, and ((said))
the assignment or order, and the acceptance of the same, have been filed
and recorded with the county auditor of the county where the party making ((said))
the assignment or order resides, if a resident of the state, or in which
he or she is employed, if not a resident of the state.

Sec.
59. RCW 49.48.120
and 1981 c 333 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

If
at the time of the death of any person, his or her employer is indebted
to him or her for work, labor, and services performed, and no executor
or administrator of his or her estate has been appointed, such employer
shall upon the request of the surviving spouse forthwith pay ((said)) the
indebtedness, in such an amount as may be due not exceeding the sum of two
thousand five hundred dollars, to the ((said)) surviving spouse or if
the decedent leaves no surviving spouse, then to the child or children, or if
no children, then to the father or mother of ((said)) the
decedent: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That if by virtue of a community property
agreement between the decedent and the surviving spouse, which meets the
requirements of RCW 26.16.120, the right to such indebtedness became the sole
property of the surviving spouse upon the death of the decedent, the employer
shall pay to the surviving spouse the total of such indebtedness or that
portion which is governed by the community property agreement upon presentation
of ((said)) the agreement accompanied by affidavit of the
surviving spouse stating that such agreement was executed in good faith between
the parties thereto and had not been rescinded by the parties prior to the
death of the decedent: PROVIDED FURTHER, That in all cases the employer shall
require proof of claimant's relationship to decedent by affidavit, and shall
require claimant to acknowledge receipt of such payment in writing. Any payments
made by an employer pursuant to the provisions of RCW 49.48.115 and 49.48.120
shall operate as a full and complete discharge of the employer's indebtedness
to the extent of ((said)) the payment, and no employer shall
thereafter be liable therefor to the decedent's estate, or the decedent's
executor or administrator thereafter appointed. The employer may also pay the
indebtedness upon presentation of an affidavit as provided in RCW 11.62.010.

Sec.
60. RCW
49.48.150 and 1992 c 177 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout RCW 49.48.160 through 49.48.190.

(1)
"Commission" means compensation paid a sales representative by a principal
in an amount based on a percentage of the dollar amount of certain orders for
or sales of the principal's product.

(2)
"Principal" means a person, whether or not the person has a permanent
or fixed place of business in this state, who:

(a)
Manufactures, produces, imports, or distributes a product for sale to customers
who purchase the product for resale;

(b)
Uses a sales representative to solicit orders for the product; and

(c)
Compensates the sales representative in whole or in part by commission.

(3)
"Sales representative" means a person who solicits, on behalf of a
principal, orders for the purchase at wholesale of the principal's product, but
does not include a person who places orders for his or her own account
for resale, or purchases for his or her own account for resale, or sells
or takes orders for the direct sale of products to the ultimate consumer.

Sec.
61. RCW
49.52.010 and 1975 c 34 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

All
moneys collected by any employer from his or ((its)) her
employees and all money to be paid by any employer as his or her
contribution for furnishing, either directly, or through contract, or
arrangement with a hospital association, corporation, firm or individual, of
medicine, medical or surgical treatment, nursing, hospital service, ambulance
service, dental service, burial service, or any or all of the above enumerated
services, or any other necessary service, contingent upon sickness, accident or
death, are hereby declared to be a trust fund for the purposes for which the
same are collected. The trustees (or their administrator, representative, or
agent under direction of the trustees) of such fund are authorized to take such
action as is deemed necessary to ensure that the employer contributions are
made including, but not limited to filing actions at law, and filing liens
against moneys due to the employer from the performance of labor or furnishing
of materials to which the employees contributed their services. ((Such
trust fund is subject to the provisions of chapter 48.52 RCW.))

Sec.
62. RCW
49.52.020 and 1975 c 34 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

In
case any employer collecting moneys from his or her employees or making
contributions to any type of benefit plan for any or all of the purposes
specified in RCW 49.52.010, shall enter into a contract or arrangement with any
hospital association, corporation, firm or individual, to furnish any such
service to its employees, the association, corporation, firm or individual
contracting to furnish such services, shall have a lien upon such trust fund
prior to all other liens except taxes. The lien hereby created shall attach
from the date of the arrangement or contract to furnish such services and may
be foreclosed in the manner provided by law for the foreclosure of other liens
on personal property.

Sec.
63. RCW
49.52.050 and 1941 c 72 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
employer or officer, vice principal or agent of any employer, whether ((said))
the employer be in private business or an elected public official, who:

(1)
Shall collect or receive from any employee a rebate of any part of wages
theretofore paid by such employer to such employee; or

(2)
Willfully and with intent to deprive the employee of any part of his or
her wages, shall pay any employee a lower wage than the wage such employer
is obligated to pay such employee by any statute, ordinance, or contract; or

(3)
Shall willfully make or cause another to make any false entry in any
employer's books or records purporting to show the payment of more wages to an
employee than such employee received; or

(4)
Being an employer or a person charged with the duty of keeping any employer's
books or records shall willfully fail or cause another to fail to show
openly and clearly in due course in such employer's books and records any
rebate of or deduction from any employee's wages; or

(5)
Shall willfully receive or accept from any employee any false receipt
for wages;

Shall
be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Sec.
64. RCW
49.52.070 and 1939 c 195 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
employer and any officer, vice principal or agent of any employer who shall
violate any of the provisions of subdivisions (1) and (2) of RCW 49.52.050
shall be liable in a civil action by the aggrieved employee or his or her
assignee to judgment for twice the amount of the wages unlawfully rebated or
withheld by way of exemplary damages, together with costs of suit and a
reasonable sum for attorney's fees: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the benefits of
this section shall not be available to any employee who has knowingly submitted
to such violations.

Sec.
65. RCW
49.52.090 and 1935 c 29 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Every person, whether as a representative of an awarding or public
body or officer, or as a contractor or subcontractor doing public work, or
agent or officer thereof, who takes or receives, or conspires with another to
take or receive, for his or her own use or the use of any other person
acting with him or her any part or portion of the wages paid to any
laborer, ((workman)) worker or mechanic, including a piece worker
and working subcontractor, in connection with services rendered upon any public
work within this state, whether such work is done directly for the state, or
public body or officer thereof, or county, city and county, city, town,
township, district or other political subdivision of the ((said)) state
or for any contractor or subcontractor engaged in such public work for such an
awarding or public body or officer, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

Sec.
66. RCW
49.56.010 and Code 1881 s 1972 are each amended to read as follows:

In
all assignments of property made by any person to trustees or assignees on
account of the inability of the person at the time of the assignment to pay his
or her debts, or in proceedings in insolvency, the wages of the miners,
mechanics, ((salesmen)) salespeople, servants, clerks or laborers
employed by such persons to the amount of one hundred dollars, each, and for
services rendered within sixty days previously, are preferred claims, and must
be paid by such trustees or assignees before any other creditor or creditors of
the assignor.

Sec.
67. RCW
49.56.030 and Code 1881 s 1974 are each amended to read as follows:

In
cases of executions, attachments and writs of similar nature issued against any
person, except for claims for labor done, any miners, mechanics, salesmen,
servants, clerks and laborers who have claims against the defendant for labor
done, may give notice of their claims and the amount thereof, sworn to by the
person making the claim to the creditor and the officer executing either of
such writs at any time before the actual sale of property levied on, and unless
such claim is disputed by the debtor or a creditor, such officer must pay to
such person out of the proceeds of the sale, the amount each is entitled to
receive for services rendered within sixty days next preceding the levy of the
writ, not exceeding one hundred dollars. If any or all the claims so presented
and claiming preference under this chapter, are disputed by either the debtor
or a creditor, the person presenting the same must commence an action within
ten days from the recovery thereof, and must prosecute his or her action
with due diligence, or be forever barred from any claim of priority of payment
thereof; and the officer shall retain possession of so much of the proceeds of
the sale as may be necessary to satisfy such claim, until the determination of
such action; and in case judgment be had for the claim or any part thereof,
carrying costs, the costs taxable therein shall likewise be a preferred claim
with the same rank as the original claim.

Sec.
68. RCW
49.64.030 and 1953 c 45 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 26.16.030, whenever payment
or refund is made to an employee, former employee, or his or her
beneficiary or estate pursuant to and in full compliance with a written
retirement, death or other employee benefit plan or savings plan, such payment
or refund shall fully discharge the employer and any trustee or insurance
company making such payment or refund from all adverse claims thereto unless,
before such payment or refund is made, the employer or former employer, where
the payment is made by the employer or former employer, has received at its
principal place of business within this state, written notice by or on behalf
of some other person that such other person claims to be entitled to such
payment or refund or some part thereof, or where a trustee or insurance company
is making the payment, such notice has been received by the trustee or
insurance company at its home office or its principal place of business within
this state, and if none, such notice may be made on the secretary of state:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That nothing contained in this section shall affect any
claim or right to any such payment or refund or part thereof as between all
persons other than employer and the trustee or insurance company making such
payment or refund.

Sec.
69. RCW
49.66.020 and 1973 2nd ex.s. c 3 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"Health care activity" includes any hospital, nursing home,
institution, agency or establishment, exclusive of those operated by the state,
its municipalities, or political subdivisions, having for one of its principal
purposes the preservation of health or the care of sick, aged or infirm
persons.

(2)
"Bargaining unit" includes any group of employees of a health care
activity having substantially common interests with respect to working
conditions. The composition of a bargaining unit may be determined by common
consent between an employer and its employees, or, in the event either party
shall apply to the director of labor and industries for a determination of the
composition of a bargaining unit, it shall be determined by the director of
labor and industries or his or her delegated representative. No
bargaining unit shall be found appropriate if it includes guards together with
other employees.

(3)
"Employee" includes any registered nurse or licensed practical nurse
or service personnel performing services for wages for a health care activity.
The term shall not apply to a member of a religious order assigned to a health
care activity by the order as a part of his or her obligations to it;
nor shall it apply to persons performing services in connection with healing by
prayer or spiritual means alone in accordance with the tenets and practices of
recognized church or religious denominations by adherents thereof; nor shall it
apply to supervisors.

(4)
"Employer" includes any person, agency, corporation, company or other
organization engaged in the operation of a health care activity, whether for
profitable or charitable purposes.

(5)
"Supervisor" means any individual having authority, in the interest
of the employer, to hire, transfer, suspend, lay off, recall, promote,
discharge, assign, reward, or discipline other employees, or responsibly to
direct them, or to adjust their grievances, or effectively to recommend such
action, if in connection with the foregoing the exercise of such authority is
not of a merely routine or clerical nature, but requires the use of independent
judgment. Supervisor includes registered nurses only if administrative
supervision is his or her primary duty and activity.

(6)
"Guard" means any individual employed as a guard to enforce against
employees and other persons rules to protect property of the employer or to
protect the safety of persons on the employer's premises.

(7)
"Director" means the director of the department of labor and
industries.

(8)
"Department" means the department of labor and industries.

Sec.
70. RCW
49.66.030 and 1973 2nd ex.s. c 3 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

An
employee association shall be deemed the properly designated representative of
a bargaining unit when it can show evidence that bargaining rights have been
assigned to it by a majority of the employees in the bargaining unit. Should
questions arise concerning the representative status of any employee
organization claiming to represent a bargaining unit of employees, upon
petition by such an organization, it shall be the duty of the director, acting
by himself or herself or through a designee to investigate and determine
the composition of the organization. Any organization found authorized by not
less than thirty percent of the employees of a bargaining unit shall be
eligible to apply for an election to determine its rights to represent the
unit. If more than one organization shall claim to represent any unit, the
director, or ((his)) the director's designee, may conduct an
election by secret ballot to determine which organization shall be authorized
to represent the unit. In order to be certified as a bargaining
representative, an employee organization must receive, in a secret ballot
election, votes from a majority of the employees who vote in the election,
except that nothing in this section shall prohibit the voluntary recognition of
a labor organization as a bargaining representative by an employer upon a
showing of reasonable proof of majority. In any election held pursuant to this
section, there shall be a choice on the ballot for employees to designate that
they do not wish to be represented by any bargaining representative. No
representation election shall be directed in any bargaining unit or any
subdivision thereof within which, in the preceding twelve-month period, a valid
election has been held. Thirty percent of the employees of an employer may
file a petition for a secret ballot election to ascertain whether the employee
organization which has been certified or is currently recognized by their
employer as their bargaining representative is no longer their bargaining
representative.

No
employee organization shall be certified as the representative of employees in
a bargaining unit of guards, if such organization admits to membership, or is
affiliated directly or indirectly with an organization which admits to
membership, employees other than guards. The determination shall be based upon
a plurality of votes cast in such election, and shall remain in effect for a
period of not less than one year. In determining appropriate bargaining units,
the director shall limit such units to groups consisting of registered nurses,
licensed practical nurses or service personnel: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That if a
majority of each such classification desires inclusion within a single
bargaining unit, they may combine into a single unit.

Sec.
71. RCW
49.66.050 and 1973 2nd ex.s. c 3 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

It
shall be an unfair labor practice and unlawful, for any employee organization
or its agent to:

(1)
Restrain or coerce: (a) Employees in the exercise of their right
to refrain from self-organization, or (b) an employer in the selection of its
representatives for purposes of collective bargaining or the adjustment of
grievances;

(2)
Cause or attempt to cause an employer to discriminate against an employee in violation
of subsection (3) of RCW 49.66.040 or to discriminate against an employee with
respect to whom membership in such organization has been denied or terminated
on some ground other than his or her failure to tender the periodic dues
and initiation fees uniformly required as a condition of acquiring or retaining
membership;

(3)
Refuse to meet and bargain in good faith with an employer, provided it is the
duly designated representative of the employer's employees for purposes of
collective bargaining;

(4)
Require of employees covered by a union security agreement the payment, as a
condition precedent to becoming a member of such organization, of a fee in an
amount which the director finds excessive or discriminatory under all the
circumstances. In making such a finding, the director shall consider, among
other relevant factors, the practices and customs of labor organizations in the
particular industry, and the wages currently paid to the employees affected;

(5)
Cause or attempt to cause an employer to pay or deliver or agree to pay or
deliver any money or other thing of value, in the nature of an exaction, for
services which are not performed or not to be performed;

(6)
Enter into any contract or agreement, express or implied, whereby an employer
or other person ceases or refrains, or agrees to cease or refrain, from
handling, using, selling, transporting or otherwise dealing in any of the
products or services of any other employer or person, or to cease doing
business with any other employer or person, and any such contract or agreement
shall be unenforceable and void; or

(7)
Engage in, or induce or encourage any individual employed by any employer or to
engage in, an activity prohibited by RCW 49.66.060.

Sec.
72. RCW
49.66.060 and 1972 ex.s. c 156 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

No
employee organization, bargaining representative, person or employee shall
authorize, sanction, engage in, or participate in a strike (including but not
limited to a concerted work stoppage of any kind, concerted slowdown or
concerted refusal or failure to report for work or perform work) or picketing
against an employer under any circumstances, whether arising out of a
recognition dispute, bargaining impasse or otherwise: PROVIDED, That nothing
in this section shall prohibit picketing or other publicity for the sole
purpose of truthfully advising the public of the existence of a dispute with
the employer, unless an effect of such picketing or other publicity is:
(a) To induce any employee of the employer or any other individual, in
the course of his or her employment, not to pick up, deliver or transfer
goods, not to enter the employer's premises, or not to perform services; or (b)
to induce such an employee or individual to engage in a strike.

Sec.
73. RCW
49.66.080 and 1973 2nd ex.s. c 3 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director shall have the power to make such rules and regulations not
inconsistent with this chapter, including the establishment of procedures for
the hearing and determination of charges alleging unfair labor practices, and
for a determination on application by either party when an impasse has arisen,
and as ((he)) the director shall determine are necessary to
effectuate its purpose and to enable him or her to carry out its
provisions.

Sec.
74. RCW
49.66.090 and 1973 2nd ex.s. c 3 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

In
the event that a health care activity and an employees' bargaining unit shall
reach an impasse, the matters in dispute shall be submitted to a board of
arbitration composed of three arbitrators for final and binding resolution.
The board shall be selected in the following manner: Within ten days, the
employer shall appoint one arbitrator and the employees shall appoint one
arbitrator. The two arbitrators so selected and named shall within ten days
agree upon and select the name of a third arbitrator who shall act as ((chairman))
chair. If, upon the expiration of the period allowed therefor the
arbitrators are unable to agree on the selection of a third arbitrator, such
arbitrator shall be appointed at the request of either party in accordance with
the provisions of RCW 7.04.050 and he or she shall act as ((chairman))
chair of the arbitration board.

Sec.
75. RCW
49.70.170 and 1999 c 309 s 917 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The worker and community right to know fund is hereby established in the
custody of the state treasurer. The department shall deposit all moneys
received under this chapter in the fund. Moneys in the fund may be spent only
for the purposes of this chapter following legislative appropriation.
Disbursements from the fund shall be on authorization of the director or the
director's designee. During the 1999-2001 fiscal biennium, moneys in the fund
may also be used by the military department for the purpose of assisting the
state emergency response commission and coordinating local emergency planning
activities. The fund is subject to the allotment procedure provided under
chapter 43.88 RCW.

(2)
The department shall assess each employer who reported ten thousand four
hundred or more worker hours in the prior calendar year an annual fee to
provide for the implementation of this chapter. The department shall
promulgate rules establishing a fee schedule for all employers who reported ten
thousand four hundred or more worker hours in the prior calendar year and are
engaged in business operations having a standard industrial classification, as
designated in the standard industrial classification manual prepared by the
federal office of management and budget, within major group numbers 01 through
08 (agriculture and forestry industries), numbers 10 through 14 (mining
industries), numbers 15 through 17 (construction industries), numbers 20
through 39 (manufacturing industries), numbers 41, 42, and 44 through 49 (transportation,
communications, electric, gas, and sanitary services), number 75 (automotive
repair, services, and garages), number 76 (miscellaneous repair services),
number 80 (health services), and number 82 (educational services). The
department shall establish the annual fee for each employer who reported ten
thousand four hundred or more worker hours in the prior calendar year in
industries identified by this section, provided that fees assessed shall not be
more than two dollars and fifty cents per full time equivalent employee. The
annual fee shall not exceed fifty thousand dollars. The fees shall be
collected solely from employers whose industries have been identified by rule
under this chapter. The department shall promulgate rules allowing employers
who do not have hazardous substances at their workplace to request an exemption
from the assessment and shall establish penalties for fraudulent exemption
requests. All fees collected by the department pursuant to this section shall
be collected in a cost-efficient manner and shall be deposited in the fund.

(3)
Records required by this chapter shall at all times be open to the inspection
of the director, or ((his)) the director's designee including,
the traveling auditors, agents or assistants of the department provided for in
RCW 51.16.070 and 51.48.040. The information obtained from employer records
under the provisions of this section shall be subject to the same
confidentiality requirements as set forth in RCW 51.16.070.

(4)
An employer may appeal the assessment of the fee or penalties pursuant to the
procedures set forth in Title 51 RCW and accompanying rules except that the
employer shall not have the right of appeal to superior court as provided in
Title 51 RCW. The employer from whom the fee or penalty is demanded or
enforced, may however, within thirty days of the board of industrial insurance
appeal's final order, pay the fee or penalty under written protest setting
forth all the grounds upon which such fee or penalty is claimed to be unlawful,
excessive or otherwise improper and thereafter bring an action in superior
court against the department to recover such fee or penalty or any portion of
the fee or penalty which was paid under protest.

(5) Repayment shall be made to the general fund of any moneys
appropriated by law in order to implement this chapter.

---
END ---