BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that workers in the high technology industry are often
required to work long days and even longer weeks. Companies in the high
technology industry profit from these workers and their overtime hours. Yet
these workers do not earn overtime pay for overtime hours, and often sacrifice
job security and benefits. These practices hurt working families, make
affordable child care difficult to find, and lead to higher stress levels and
industrial injury and occupational disease rates. These practices limit
employment opportunities to a smaller number of workers rather than extend
employment opportunities to a larger number of workers. Thus, it is the intent
of the legislature that the overtime provisions of the state minimum wage act
apply to computer system analysts, computer programmers, software engineers,
software developers, and other similarly skilled workers.

Sec.
2. RCW
49.46.010 and 1997 c 203 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"Director" means the director of labor and industries;

(2)
"Wage" means compensation due to an employee by reason of employment,
payable in legal tender of the United States or checks on banks convertible
into cash on demand at full face value, subject to such deductions, charges, or
allowances as may be permitted by rules of the director;

(3)
"Employ" includes to permit to work;

(4)
"Employer" includes any individual, partnership, association,
corporation, business trust, or any person or group of persons acting directly
or indirectly in the interest of an employer in relation to an employee;

(5)
"Employee" includes any individual employed by an employer but shall
not include:

(a)
Any individual (i) employed as a hand harvest laborer and paid on a piece rate
basis in an operation which has been, and is generally and customarily
recognized as having been, paid on a piece rate basis in the region of
employment; (ii) who commutes daily from his or her permanent residence to the
farm on which he or she is employed; and (iii) who has been employed in
agriculture less than thirteen weeks during the preceding calendar year;

(b)
Any individual employed in casual labor in or about a private home, unless
performed in the course of the employer's trade, business, or profession;

(c)
Any individual employed in a bona fide executive, administrative, or
professional capacity or in the capacity of outside salesman as those terms are
defined and delimited by rules of the director. However, those terms may
not be defined or delimited to include a computer system analyst, a computer
programmer, a software engineer, a software developer, or another similarly
skilled worker who is compensated for his or her services on an hourly basis.
However, those terms shall be defined and delimited by the Washington personnel
resources board pursuant to chapter 41.06 RCW;

(d)
Any individual engaged in the activities of an educational, charitable,
religious, state or local governmental body or agency, or nonprofit
organization where the employer-employee relationship does not in fact exist or
where the services are rendered to such organizations gratuitously. If the
individual receives reimbursement in lieu of compensation for normally incurred
out-of-pocket expenses or receives a nominal amount of compensation per unit of
voluntary service rendered, an employer-employee relationship is deemed not to
exist for the purpose of this section or for purposes of membership or
qualification in any state, local government or publicly supported retirement
system other than that provided under chapter 41.24 RCW;

(e)
Any individual employed full time by any state or local governmental body or
agency who provides voluntary services but only with regard to the provision of
the voluntary services. The voluntary services and any compensation therefor
shall not affect or add to qualification, entitlement or benefit rights under
any state, local government, or publicly supported retirement system other than
that provided under chapter 41.24 RCW;

(f)
Any newspaper vendor or carrier;

(g)
Any carrier subject to regulation by Part 1 of the Interstate Commerce Act;

(h)
Any individual engaged in forest protection and fire prevention activities;

(i)
Any individual employed by any charitable institution charged with child care
responsibilities engaged primarily in the development of character or
citizenship or promoting health or physical fitness or providing or sponsoring
recreational opportunities or facilities for young people or members of the
armed forces of the United States;

(j)
Any individual whose duties require that he or she reside or sleep at the place
of his or her employment or who otherwise spends a substantial portion of his
or her work time subject to call, and not engaged in the performance of active
duties;

(k)
Any resident, inmate, or patient of a state, county, or municipal correctional,
detention, treatment or rehabilitative institution;

(l)
Any individual who holds a public elective or appointive office of the state,
any county, city, town, municipal corporation or quasi municipal corporation,
political subdivision, or any instrumentality thereof, or any employee of the
state legislature;

(m)
All vessel operating crews of the Washington state ferries operated by the
department of transportation;

(n)
Any individual employed as a seaman on a vessel other than an American vessel;

(6)
"Occupation" means any occupation, service, trade, business,
industry, or branch or group of industries or employment or class of employment
in which employees are gainfully employed;

(7)
"Retail or service establishment" means an establishment seventy-five
percent of whose annual dollar volume of sales of goods or services, or both,
is not for resale and is recognized as retail sales or services in the
particular industry.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The
director of the department of labor and industries shall repeal any rules
inconsistent with the purposes and provisions of this act.

---
END ---