BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)(a)
The legislature finds that the department of social and health services is
inadequately responsive to the needs of those it serves. Over the years, the
department has grown dysfunctionally large and unfocused. Citizen problems
with the department range from failure to return phone calls and provide
answers to questions regarding needed services, to serious endangerment of the
lives and safety of those the department was designed to protect. The
dysfunctionality of the department has resulted in tragedy for some clients,
and litigation for the state. Given the fact that the department is
responsible for those in our society least able to care for themselves,
including children, the frail, elderly and disabled, and families struggling
with poverty or abuse, it is imperative that the state reevaluate the role of
the department, and redesign state agencies to better serve and protect
Washington families.

(b)
The legislature therefor intends that a new department be created that is
designed to help working families. The department of work force services
should consist of employment security functions, combined with the WorkFirst
program, and low-income child care. The legislature intends that this
realignment of essential state services be used as an opportunity to dedicate
state resources to helping working families, those emerging from poverty, and
children in need, enabling the functions that remain in a separate, newly
designed department of social and health services to become more responsive and
focused upon the needs of clients.

(c)
The governor shall propose a plan of reorganization, for legislative
consideration in a timely manner, in a collaborative effort to make life
better, safer, and more promising for Washingtonians in need.

(2) By
January 8, 2001, the governor shall submit a plan to the legislature for
creating a department of work force services to improve and restructure the
delivery of employment and welfare services, including appropriate child care
components.

(3)
The goals of the plan are:

(a)
Improved delivery of job and welfare services to Washington residents;

(b)
Improved efficiencies in administration of service delivery;

(c)
Appropriate restructuring of public agencies and programs primarily charged
with direct or contractual delivery of job and welfare services, in order to
improve the assessment of the needs of Washington residents and provide more
timely and appropriate response to such needs, with reduced duplication of
effort and correction of illogical or inconsistent placement of programs;

(d) A
reexamination of the principles that were the foundation of the department of
social and health services, and whether those principles remain operative in
the structure of welfare, employment, and human services delivery by the state;
and

(e)
Creation of a model of job and welfare delivery that emphasizes:

(i)
Ongoing positive outcomes, based upon performance measures;

(ii)
Ease of public access to information and services;

(iii)
Reliable review and analysis of efficiencies in agency administrative
structures; and

(iv)
Accountability to the public and the legislature.

(4)
This section expires January 31, 2001.

---
END ---