BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
74.08.050 and 1971 ex.s. c 169 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Application
for a grant in any category of public assistance shall be made to the county
office by the applicant or by another on ((his)) the applicant's
behalf, and shall be reduced to writing upon a standard form((s))
prescribed by the department, and a written acknowledgment of receipt of the
application by the department shall be given to each applicant at the time of
making application. The application form shall be streamlined so that
applicants for various types of public assistance can be identified and
cross-referred to programs for which they are eligible, based upon a single,
universal assistance application form.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 74.08A RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall convene a working group that includes stakeholders and
recipients of public assistance to establish basic customer service performance
measures and goals. The customer service measures and goals will seek to make
support for working families a priority. Customer service measures may
include, but are not limited to: Hours of operation that allow working
families to get services without missing work; streamlining requirements to
make it easier for working families to begin and continue using supportive
benefits; wait times; access to benefits that support work; access to job
training and education; and access to services for families with limited
literacy or English skills, and families with special needs.

The
department shall report to the legislature by January 2001 and make available
to the public the establishment of customer service measures and goals, the
process for agreeing on those measures and goals, and departmental action to
assure the goals are being met. The department shall make a written report to
the legislature on the ongoing attainment of customer service goals twice per
year.

Sec.
3. RCW
74.09.530 and 1979 c 141 s 345 are each amended to read as follows:

The amount and nature of medical assistance and the determination
of eligibility of recipients for medical assistance shall be the responsibility
of the department of social and health services. The department shall
establish reasonable standards of assistance and resource and income exemptions
which shall be consistent with the provisions of the Social Security Act and
with the regulations of the secretary of health, education and welfare for
determining eligibility of individuals for medical assistance and the extent of
such assistance to the extent that funds are available from the state and
federal government. The department shall not consider resources in
determining continuing eligibility for recipients eligible under section 1931
of the social security act.

---
END ---