BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that persons in need of services provided by the department
of social and health services are often frustrated in their attempts to receive
information or resolve problems with the department by the use of complex
automated voice mail systems. Instead of being able to access a live person,
who could answer their questions or direct their calls, clients of the
department are subjected to a series of automated voice mail options, often
with no forwarding to a live employee. Messages left on voice mail frequently
do not receive a prompt response. In view of the serious, and at times even
life-threatening, nature of many of the calls to the agency responsible for the
protection of children, the frail and elderly, and the mentally ill, as well as
families in poverty, the legislature finds it is unacceptable to prevent access
by blockading the public with voice mail, unreturned calls, and long hold
times.

The
legislature intends that the department staff its primary public access telephones
with a live person option, providing those in need for whom voice mail options
are inappropriate with the opportunity to speak promptly with a department
employee trained to respond to their questions, or direct their calls.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.20A RCW to read as follows:

The department shall not be allowed to use an automated telephone
system for answering telephone calls placed to the department's primary public
service phone numbers, during regular hours of operation, unless the automated
telephone system provides, as the first menu option, an option that permits a
caller to speak directly to an employee of the department, without listening to
the entire recorded message. Incoming telephone calls on primary public
service numbers shall be answered promptly, and the department shall monitor
length of time any incoming call is put on hold, with the goal of reducing hold
time to five minutes or less. No employee of the department may use an
automated phone answering system to screen telephone calls for the purpose of
refusing to communicate with any person if the subject matter of the telephone
message or the identity of the caller relates to a duty or responsibility of
the division or unit of the department for which the employee performs
services, or relates to a duty or responsibility of the employee. The
department of general administration shall ensure that each division or unit of
the department of social and health services establishes a procedure for
answering telephone calls placed to the department during regular business
hours that conforms to the requirements of this section.

---
END ---