BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
LEGISLATIVE INTENT. The legislature finds that a church is not
liable for the intentional or criminal acts of a third party unless the church
has either a duty to control the third party or a duty to protect the victim.
Recent court decisions, such as Funkhouser v. Wilson, 138 Wash.2d 699,
985 P.2d 262 (1999), have confused these theories of liability. It is the
intent of the legislature to clarify when an action in tort based on the
intentional or criminal act of a third party may be maintained against a
church.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 4.08 RCW to read as follows:

ACTION
AGAINST CHURCHES. An action in tort based on the intentional or criminal act
of a third party may not be maintained against a church unless the act occurred
while:

(1)
The third party was working in a paid or a volunteer position for the church;

(2)
The victim was on the premises of the church;

(3)
The victim was in the custody of the church; or

(4)
The victim was participating in an activity sponsored or organized by the
church.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3.
CAPTIONS. Captions used in this act are not any part of the law.

---
END ---