BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
68.50.530 and 1996 c 178 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout RCW 68.50.520 through 68.50.630 and 68.50.901 through 68.50.904 and
sections 2 through 4 of this act.

(1)
"Anatomical gift" means a donation of all or part of a human body to
take effect upon or after death.

(2)
"Decedent" means a deceased individual.

(3)
"Document of gift" means a card, a statement attached to or imprinted
on a motor vehicle operator's license, a will, or other writing used to make an
anatomical gift.

(4)
"Donor" means an individual who makes an anatomical gift of all or
part of the individual's body.

(5)
"Enucleator" means an individual who is qualified to remove or
process eyes or parts of eyes.

(6)
"Hospital" means a facility licensed under chapter 70.41 RCW, or as a
hospital under the law of any state or a facility operated as a hospital by the
United States government, a state, or a subdivision of a state.

(7)
"Part" means an organ, tissue, eye, bone, artery, blood, fluid, or
other portion of a human body.

(8)
"Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate,
trust, partnership, joint venture, association, government, governmental
subdivision or agency, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(9)
"Physician" or "surgeon" means an individual licensed or
otherwise authorized to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine
and surgery under chapters 18.71 and 18.57 RCW.

(10) "Priority
distribution" means the donor's determination that his or her organs shall
first be distributed to a transplant program located within the state of
Washington.

(11)
"Procurement organization" means a person licensed, accredited, or
approved under the laws of any state for procurement, distribution, or storage
of human bodies or parts.

(((11)))
(12) "State" means a state, territory, or possession of the
United States, the District of Columbia, or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico.

(((12)))
(13) "Technician" means an individual who is qualified to
remove or process a part.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A new
section is added to chapter 68.50 RCW to read as follows:

All
documents of gift shall include a provision that permits the donor to designate
priority distribution.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A new
section is added to chapter 68.50 RCW to read as follows:

Every
donor has the absolute right to specify priority distribution of his or her
organs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A new
section is added to chapter 68.50 RCW to read as follows:

The
donor's designation of priority distribution shall be adhered to or the
document of gift is invalid.

---
END ---