BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 79A.05 RCW to read as follows:

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the commission
may directly dispose of up to ten contiguous acres of real property, without
public auction, to resolve trespass, property ownership disputes, and boundary
adjustments with adjacent property owners. Real property to be disposed of
under this section may be disposed of only after appraisal and for at least
fair market value, and only if the transaction is in the best interest of the
state.

---
END ---