BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
79.12.600 and 1949 c 203 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

When
((wheat, barley, rye, corn, other grain or peas)) crops that are
covered by a share crop lease are harvested, the lessee shall give written
notice to the commissioner that the crop is being harvested, and shall also
give to the commissioner the name and address of the warehouse or elevator to
which such ((grain or peas)) crops are sold or in which such ((grain
or peas)) crops will be stored. The lessee shall also serve on the
owner of such warehouse or elevator a written copy of so much of the lease as
shall show the percentage of division of the proceeds of such crop as between
lessee and lessor. The owner of such warehouse or elevator shall make out ((two
warehouse receipts, one receipt showing the percentage of grain or peas
belonging to the state and the other showing the percentage of grain or peas
belonging to the lessee, and the respective amounts thereof)) a
warehouse receipt, which receipt may be negotiable or nonnegotiable as directed
by the state, showing the percentage of crops belonging to the state, and the
respective gross and net amounts, grade, and location thereof, and shall
deliver to the commissioner the receipt for the state's percentage of such ((grain
or peas)) crops within ten days after ((he)) the owner
has received such instructions.

---
END ---