BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the state of Washington has a dynamic high technology
industry. Employment in the high technology industry has grown since 1990 from
sixty thousand to more than one hundred thousand persons. The legislature
further finds that to stay competitive and help the industry grow,
opportunities for postgraduate study need to be created in Washington state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. By
June 30, 2001, the higher education coordinating board shall evaluate and make
recommendations to appropriate committees of the legislature about the creation
of a doctoral program in computer science and engineering. In making its
recommendations, the board shall look at issues that shall include but not be
limited to:

(1)
Future and current job opportunities for persons with doctoral degrees in
computer science and engineering within the state of Washington and within the
United States;

(2)
To the extent information is available, the number of persons employed in
Washington state in the computer science and engineering fields with doctoral
degrees in computer science and engineering and the names of the institutions
granting those degrees;

(3)
The number of students in undergraduate or master's degree programs in computer
science and engineering in Washington who would be interested in pursuing
doctoral degrees; and

(4) Where the program should be located.

---
END ---