BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 79.90 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The purpose of a port management agreement authorized in RCW 79.90.475 is to
assure that the port manages state-owned aquatic land in the same manner as the
state would act in implementing state laws, rules, and policies adopted for
state-owned aquatic lands. To that end, as laws, rules, and policies change to
address a wide variety of social, legal, and financial risk management issues,
the role of the port as described in any port management agreement must change
as well.

(2)
Any existing port management agreement that is not in complete compliance with
any change in law, rule, or policy shall be modified within three years of the
effective date of any change in law, rule, or policy. For purposes of this
section, any action by the board of natural resources to adopt or modify a
model port management agreement shall also result in a modification within
three years of any existing port management agreement so that the agreement is
consistent with the model.

(3)
The term of a port management agreement shall not exceed thirty years from the
effective date of the signed agreement.

Sec.
2. RCW
79.90.475 and 1984 c 221 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon
request of a port district, the department and port district may enter into an
agreement authorizing the port district to manage state-owned aquatic lands
abutting or used in conjunction with and contiguous to uplands owned, leased,
or otherwise managed by a port district, for port purposes as provided in Title
53 RCW. Such agreement shall include, but not be limited to, provisions
defining the specific area to be managed, the term, conditions of occupancy,
reservations, periodic review, and other conditions to ensure consistency with
the state Constitution and the policies of this chapter. If a port district
acquires operating management, lease, or ownership of real property which abuts
state-owned aquatic lands currently under lease from the state to a person
other than the port district, the port district shall manage such aquatic lands
if: (1) The port district acquires the leasehold interest in accordance with
state law, or (2) the current lessee and the department agree to termination of
the current lease to accommodate management by the port. The administration of
aquatic lands covered by a management agreement shall be consistent with the
aquatic land policies of chapters 79.90 through 79.96 RCW and the implementing
regulations adopted by the department. The administrative procedures for
management of the lands shall be those of Title 53 RCW.

No
rent shall be due the state for the use of state-owned aquatic lands managed
under this section for water-dependent or water-oriented uses. If a port
district manages state-owned aquatic lands under this section and either leases
or otherwise permits any person to use such lands, the rental fee attributable
to such aquatic land only shall be comparable to the rent charged lessees for
the same or similar uses by the department: PROVIDED, That a port district
need not itemize for the lessee any charges for state-owned aquatic lands
improved by the port district for use by carriers by water. If a port leases
state-owned aquatic lands to any person for nonwater-dependent use, eighty-five
percent of the revenue attributable to the rent of the state-owned aquatic land
only shall be paid to the state.

Upon
application for a management agreement, and so long as the application is
pending and being diligently pursued, no rent shall be due the department for
the lease by the port district of state-owned aquatic lands included within the
application for water-dependent or water-oriented uses. The application
process shall not extend more than one year from the date of application
without written consent of both parties. If the parties fail to reach an
agreement in writing to extend the application process within the one-year
period, the application shall lapse and payment for any lease shall be
reinstituted retroactive to the beginning of the application period. In the
event of a lapse in application, reapplication may not occur within one year of
the date of the notification of the lapse in application.

The
department and representatives of the port industry shall develop a proposed
model management agreement which shall be used as the basis for negotiating the
management agreements required by this section. The model management agreement
shall be reviewed and approved by the board of natural resources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3.
Section 1 of this act takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---