BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. This
act is intended to cure any ambiguity that might have led to the Washington
supreme court's decision in State v. Cruz, Cause No. 67147-8 (October 7,
1999). A decision as to whether a prior conviction shall be included in an
individual's offender score should be determined by the law in effect on the
day the current offense was committed. This act is also intended to clarify
the applicability of statutes creating new sentencing alternatives or modifying
the availability of existing alternatives.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW to read as follows:

Any sentence imposed under this chapter shall be determined in
accordance with the law in effect when the current offense was committed.

---
END ---