BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.94A.030 and 1999 c 352 s 8, 1999 c 197 s 1, and 1999 c 196 s 2 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Collect," or any derivative thereof, "collect and remit,"
or "collect and deliver," when used with reference to the department
of corrections, means that the department, either directly or through a
collection agreement authorized by RCW 9.94A.145, is responsible for monitoring
and enforcing the offender's sentence with regard to the legal financial
obligation, receiving payment thereof from the offender, and, consistent with
current law, delivering daily the entire payment to the superior court clerk
without depositing it in a departmental account.

(2)
"Commission" means the sentencing guidelines commission.

(3)
"Community corrections officer" means an employee of the department
who is responsible for carrying out specific duties in supervision of sentenced
offenders and monitoring of sentence conditions.

(4)
"Community custody" means that portion of an offender's sentence of
confinement in lieu of earned release time or imposed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.120
(((5),)) (6), (7), (8), (((10), or)) (9), (11), or
(12), or RCW 9.94A.383, served in the community subject to controls placed
on the offender's movement and activities by the department of corrections.
For offenders placed on community custody for crimes committed on or after July
1, 2000, the department shall assess the offender's risk of reoffense and may
establish and modify conditions of community custody, in addition to those
imposed by the court, based upon the risk to community safety.

(5)
"Community custody range" means the minimum and maximum period of
community custody included as part of a sentence under RCW 9.94A.120(((11)))
(12), as established by the sentencing guidelines commission or the
legislature under RCW 9.94A.040, for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000.

(6)
"Community placement" means that period during which the offender is
subject to the conditions of community custody and/or postrelease supervision,
which begins either upon completion of the term of confinement (postrelease
supervision) or at such time as the offender is transferred to community
custody in lieu of earned release. Community placement may consist of entirely
community custody, entirely postrelease supervision, or a combination of the
two.

(7)
"Community service" means compulsory service, without compensation,
performed for the benefit of the community by the offender.

(8)
"Community supervision" means a period of time during which a
convicted offender is subject to crime-related prohibitions and other sentence
conditions imposed by a court pursuant to this chapter or RCW 16.52.200(6) or
46.61.524. For first-time offenders, the supervision may include crime-related
prohibitions and other conditions imposed pursuant to RCW 9.94A.120(((5)))
(6). Where the court finds that any offender has a chemical dependency
that has contributed to his or her offense, the conditions of supervision may,
subject to available resources, include treatment. For purposes of the
interstate compact for out-of-state supervision of parolees and probationers,
RCW 9.95.270, community supervision is the functional equivalent of probation and
should be considered the same as probation by other states.

(9)
"Confinement" means total or partial confinement as defined in this
section.

(10)
"Conviction" means an adjudication of guilt pursuant to Titles 10 or
13 RCW and includes a verdict of guilty, a finding of guilty, and acceptance of
a plea of guilty.

(11)
"Court-ordered legal financial obligation" means a sum of money that
is ordered by a superior court of the state of Washington for legal financial
obligations which may include restitution to the victim, statutorily imposed
crime victims' compensation fees as assessed pursuant to RCW 7.68.035, court
costs, county or interlocal drug funds, court-appointed attorneys' fees, and
costs of defense, fines, and any other financial obligation that is assessed to
the offender as a result of a felony conviction. Upon conviction for vehicular
assault while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW
46.61.522(1)(b), or vehicular homicide while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug, RCW 46.61.520(1)(a), legal financial
obligations may also include payment to a public agency of the expense of an
emergency response to the incident resulting in the conviction, subject to the
provisions in RCW 38.52.430.

(12)
"Crime-related prohibition" means an order of a court prohibiting
conduct that directly relates to the circumstances of the crime for which the
offender has been convicted, and shall not be construed to mean orders
directing an offender affirmatively to participate in rehabilitative programs
or to otherwise perform affirmative conduct. However, affirmative acts
necessary to monitor compliance with the order of a court may be required by
the department.

(13)
"Criminal history" means the list of a defendant's prior convictions
and juvenile adjudications, whether in this state, in federal court, or
elsewhere. The history shall include, where known, for each conviction (a)
whether the defendant has been placed on probation and the length and terms
thereof; and (b) whether the defendant has been incarcerated and the length of
incarceration.

(14)
"Day fine" means a fine imposed by the sentencing judge that equals
the difference between the offender's net daily income and the reasonable
obligations that the offender has for the support of the offender and any
dependents.

(15)
"Day reporting" means a program of enhanced supervision designed to
monitor the defendant's daily activities and compliance with sentence conditions,
and in which the defendant is required to report daily to a specific location
designated by the department or the sentencing judge.

(16)
"Department" means the department of corrections.

(17)
"Determinate sentence" means a sentence that states with exactitude
the number of actual years, months, or days of total confinement, of partial
confinement, of community supervision, the number of actual hours or days of
community service work, or dollars or terms of a legal financial obligation.
The fact that an offender through "earned release" can reduce the
actual period of confinement shall not affect the classification of the
sentence as a determinate sentence.

(18)
"Disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings of an
individual remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any amount
required by law to be withheld. For the purposes of this definition,
"earnings" means compensation paid or payable for personal services,
whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonuses, or otherwise, and,
notwithstanding any other provision of law making the payments exempt from
garnishment, attachment, or other process to satisfy a court-ordered legal
financial obligation, specifically includes periodic payments pursuant to
pension or retirement programs, or insurance policies of any type, but does not
include payments made under Title 50 RCW, except as provided in RCW 50.40.020
and 50.40.050, or Title 74 RCW.

(19)
"Drug offense" means:

(a)
Any felony violation of chapter 69.50 RCW except possession of a controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.401(d)) or forged prescription for a controlled substance
(RCW 69.50.403);

(b)
Any offense defined as a felony under federal law that relates to the
possession, manufacture, distribution, or transportation of a controlled
substance; or

(c)
Any out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state
would be a felony classified as a drug offense under (a) of this subsection.

(20)
"Escape" means:

(a)
Escape in the first degree (RCW 9A.76.110), escape in the second degree (RCW
9A.76.120), willful failure to return from furlough (RCW 72.66.060), willful
failure to return from work release (RCW 72.65.070), or willful failure to be
available for supervision by the department while in community custody (RCW
72.09.310); or

(b)
Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of
this state would be a felony classified as an escape under (a) of this
subsection.

(21)
"Felony traffic offense" means:

(a)
Vehicular homicide (RCW 46.61.520), vehicular assault (RCW 46.61.522), eluding
a police officer (RCW 46.61.024), or felony hit-and-run injury-accident (RCW
46.52.020(4)); or

(b)
Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of
this state would be a felony classified as a felony traffic offense under (a)
of this subsection.

(22)
"Fines" means the requirement that the offender pay a specific sum of
money over a specific period of time to the court.

(23)
"First-time offender" means any person who is convicted of a felony
(a) not classified as a violent offense or a sex offense under this chapter, or
(b) that is not the manufacture, delivery, or possession with intent to
manufacture or deliver a controlled substance classified in Schedule I or II
that is a narcotic drug or flunitrazepam classified in Schedule IV, nor the
manufacture, delivery, or possession with intent to deliver methamphetamine,
its salts, isomers, and salts of its isomers as defined in RCW 69.50.206(d)(2),
nor the selling for profit of any controlled substance or counterfeit substance
classified in Schedule I, RCW 69.50.204, except leaves and flowering tops of
marihuana, who previously has never been convicted of a felony in this state,
federal court, or another state, and who has never participated in a program of
deferred prosecution for a felony offense.

(24)
"Habitual offender" means a person who:

(a)
Has a current conviction for any felony;

(b)
Has, before the commission of the offense under (a) of this subsection, been
convicted, whether in this state or elsewhere, of any crime which under the
laws of this state would be a felony, or has been convicted on at least two
separate occasions, whether in this state or elsewhere, of any crime which
under the laws of this state would be a serious gross misdemeanor; and

(c)
Is not a persistent offender.

(25)
"Home detention" means a program of partial confinement available to
offenders wherein the offender is confined in a private residence subject to
electronic surveillance.

(((25)))
(26) "Most serious offense" means any of the following
felonies or a felony attempt to commit any of the following felonies, as now
existing or hereafter amended:

(a)
Any felony defined under any law as a class A felony or criminal solicitation
of or criminal conspiracy to commit a class A felony;

(b)
Assault in the second degree;

(c)
Assault of a child in the second degree;

(d)
Child molestation in the second degree;

(e)
Controlled substance homicide;

(f)
Extortion in the first degree;

(g)
Incest when committed against a child under age fourteen;

(h)
Indecent liberties;

(i)
Kidnapping in the second degree;

(j)
Leading organized crime;

(k)
Manslaughter in the first degree;

(l)
Manslaughter in the second degree;

(m)
Promoting prostitution in the first degree;

(n)
Rape in the third degree;

(o)
Robbery in the second degree;

(p)
Sexual exploitation;

(q)
Vehicular assault;

(r)
Vehicular homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by
any person while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as
defined by RCW 46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless
manner;

(s)
Any other class B felony offense with a finding of sexual motivation, as
"sexual motivation" is defined under this section;

(t)
Any other felony with a deadly weapon verdict under RCW 9.94A.125;

(u)
Any felony offense in effect at any time prior to December 2, 1993, that is
comparable to a most serious offense under this subsection, or any federal or
out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of this state would
be a felony classified as a most serious offense under this subsection;

(v)(i)
A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.88.100(1) (a), (b), and
(c), chapter 260, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess. as it existed until July 1, 1979,
RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (c) as it existed from July 1, 1979, until June
11, 1986, and RCW 9A.44.100(1) (a), (b), and (d) as it existed from June 11,
1986, until July 1, 1988;

(ii)
A prior conviction for indecent liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1)(c) as it
existed from June 11, 1986, until July 1, 1988, if: (A) The crime was
committed against a child under the age of fourteen; or (B) the relationship
between the victim and perpetrator is included in the definition of indecent
liberties under RCW 9A.44.100(1)(c) as it existed from July 1, 1988, through
July 27, 1997, or RCW 9A.44.100(1) (d) or (e) as it existed from July 25, 1993,
through July 27, 1997.

(((26)))
(27) "Nonviolent offense" means an offense which is not a
violent offense.

(((27)))
(28) "Offender" means a person who has committed a felony
established by state law and is eighteen years of age or older or is less than
eighteen years of age but whose case is under superior court jurisdiction under
RCW 13.04.030 or has been transferred by the appropriate juvenile court to a
criminal court pursuant to RCW 13.40.110. Throughout this chapter, the terms
"offender" and "defendant" are used interchangeably.

(((28)))
(29) "Partial confinement" means confinement for no more than
one year in a facility or institution operated or utilized under contract by
the state or any other unit of government, or, if home detention or work crew
has been ordered by the court, in an approved residence, for a substantial
portion of each day with the balance of the day spent in the community.
Partial confinement includes work release, home detention, work crew, and a
combination of work crew and home detention as defined in this section.

(((29)))
(30) "Persistent offender" is an offender who:

(a)(i)
Has been convicted in this state of any felony considered a most serious
offense; and

(ii)
Has, before the commission of the offense under (a) of this subsection, been
convicted as an offender on at least two separate occasions, whether in this
state or elsewhere, of felonies that under the laws of this state would be
considered most serious offenses and would be included in the offender score
under RCW 9.94A.360; provided that of the two or more previous convictions, at
least one conviction must have occurred before the commission of any of the
other most serious offenses for which the offender was previously convicted; or

(b)(i)
Has been convicted of: (A) Rape in the first degree, rape of a child in the
first degree, child molestation in the first degree, rape in the second degree,
rape of a child in the second degree, or indecent liberties by forcible
compulsion; (B) murder in the first degree, murder in the second degree,
homicide by abuse, kidnapping in the first degree, kidnapping in the second
degree, assault in the first degree, assault in the second degree, assault of a
child in the first degree, or burglary in the first degree, with a finding of
sexual motivation; or (C) an attempt to commit any crime listed in this
subsection (((29))) (30)(b)(i); and

(ii)
Has, before the commission of the offense under (b)(i) of this subsection, been
convicted as an offender on at least one occasion, whether in this state or
elsewhere, of an offense listed in (b)(i) of this subsection. A conviction for
rape of a child in the first degree constitutes a conviction under ((subsection
(29)))(b)(i) of this subsection only when the offender was sixteen
years of age or older when the offender committed the offense. A conviction
for rape of a child in the second degree constitutes a conviction under ((subsection
(29)))(b)(i) of this subsection only when the offender was eighteen
years of age or older when the offender committed the offense.

(((30)))
(31) "Postrelease supervision" is that portion of an
offender's community placement that is not community custody.

(((31)))
(32) "Restitution" means the requirement that the offender pay
a specific sum of money over a specific period of time to the court as payment
of damages. The sum may include both public and private costs. The imposition
of a restitution order does not preclude civil redress.

(((32)))
(33) "Risk assessment" means the application of an objective
instrument supported by research and adopted by the department for the purpose
of assessing an offender's risk of reoffense, taking into consideration the
nature of the harm done by the offender, place and circumstances of the
offender related to risk, the offender's relationship to any victim, and any
information provided to the department by victims. The results of a risk
assessment shall not be based on unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations.

(((33)))
(34) "Serious gross misdemeanor" means any of the following gross
misdemeanors:

(a)
Assault in the fourth degree, RCW 9A.36.041;

(b)
Reckless endangerment, RCW 9A.36.050;

(c)
Jury tampering, RCW 9A.72.140;

(d)
Tampering with physical evidence, RCW 9A.72.150;

(e)
Rendering criminal assistance in the first degree, RCW 9A.76.070(2)(a);

(f)
Rendering criminal assistance in the second degree, RCW 9A.76.080(2)(b);

(g)
Compounding, RCW 9A.76.100;

(h)
Escape in the third degree, RCW 9A.76.130;

(i)
Riot, RCW 9A.84.010(2)(b);

(j)
Criminal attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit a class C felony
defined in Title 9A RCW;

(k)
Driving under the influence, RCW 46.61.502; and

(l)
Physical control of vehicle under the influence, RCW 46.61.504.

(35)
"Serious traffic offense" means:

(a)
Driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW
46.61.502), actual physical control while under the influence of intoxicating
liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.504), reckless driving (RCW 46.61.500), or
hit-and-run an attended vehicle (RCW 46.52.020(5)); or

(b)
Any federal, out-of-state, county, or municipal conviction for an offense that
under the laws of this state would be classified as a serious traffic offense
under (a) of this subsection.

(((34)))
(36) "Serious violent offense" is a subcategory of violent
offense and means:

(a)
Murder in the first degree, homicide by abuse, murder in the second degree,
manslaughter in the first degree, assault in the first degree, kidnapping in
the first degree, or rape in the first degree, assault of a child in the first
degree, or an attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to commit
one of these felonies; or

(b)
Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of
this state would be a felony classified as a serious violent offense under (a)
of this subsection.

(((35)))
(37) "Sentence range" means the sentencing court's
discretionary range in imposing a nonappealable sentence.

(((36)))
(38) "Sex offense" means:

(a)
A felony that is a violation of chapter 9A.44 RCW, other than RCW
9A.44.130(10), or RCW 9A.64.020 or 9.68A.090 or a felony that is, under chapter
9A.28 RCW, a criminal attempt, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy to
commit such crimes;

(b)
Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1,
1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a sex offense in (a) of this
subsection;

(c)
A felony with a finding of sexual motivation under RCW 9.94A.127 or 13.40.135;
or

(d)
Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of
this state would be a felony classified as a sex offense under (a) of this
subsection.

(((37)))
(39) "Sexual motivation" means that one of the purposes for
which the defendant committed the crime was for the purpose of his or her
sexual gratification.

(((38)))
(40) "Total confinement" means confinement inside the physical
boundaries of a facility or institution operated or utilized under contract by
the state or any other unit of government for twenty-four hours a day, or
pursuant to RCW 72.64.050 and 72.64.060.

(((39)))
(41) "Transition training" means written and verbal
instructions and assistance provided by the department to the offender during
the two weeks prior to the offender's successful completion of the work ethic
camp program. The transition training shall include instructions in the
offender's requirements and obligations during the offender's period of
community custody.

(((40)))
(42) "Victim" means any person who has sustained emotional,
psychological, physical, or financial injury to person or property as a direct
result of the crime charged.

(((41)))
(43) "Violent offense" means:

(a)
Any of the following felonies, as now existing or hereafter amended: Any
felony defined under any law as a class A felony or an attempt to commit a
class A felony, criminal solicitation of or criminal conspiracy to commit a
class A felony, manslaughter in the first degree, manslaughter in the second
degree, indecent liberties if committed by forcible compulsion, kidnapping in
the second degree, arson in the second degree, assault in the second degree,
assault of a child in the second degree, extortion in the first degree, robbery
in the second degree, drive-by shooting, vehicular assault, and vehicular
homicide, when proximately caused by the driving of any vehicle by any person
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug as defined by RCW
46.61.502, or by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner;

(b)
Any conviction for a felony offense in effect at any time prior to July 1,
1976, that is comparable to a felony classified as a violent offense in (a) of
this subsection; and

(c)
Any federal or out-of-state conviction for an offense that under the laws of
this state would be a felony classified as a violent offense under (a) or (b)
of this subsection.

(((42)))
(44) "Work crew" means a program of partial confinement
consisting of civic improvement tasks for the benefit of the community of not
less than thirty-five hours per week that complies with RCW 9.94A.135. The
civic improvement tasks shall have minimal negative impact on existing private
industries or the labor force in the county where the service or labor is
performed. The civic improvement tasks shall not affect employment
opportunities for people with developmental disabilities contracted through
sheltered workshops as defined in RCW 82.04.385. Only those offenders sentenced
to a facility operated or utilized under contract by a county or the state, or
sanctioned under RCW 9.94A.205, are eligible to participate on a work crew.
Offenders sentenced for a sex offense as defined in subsection (((36))) (38)
of this section are not eligible for the work crew program.

(((43)))
(45) "Work ethic camp" means an alternative incarceration
program designed to reduce recidivism and lower the cost of corrections by
requiring offenders to complete a comprehensive array of real-world job and
vocational experiences, character-building work ethics training, life
management skills development, substance abuse rehabilitation, counseling,
literacy training, and basic adult education.

(((44)))
(46) "Work release" means a program of partial confinement
available to offenders who are employed or engaged as a student in a regular
course of study at school. Participation in work release shall be conditioned
upon the offender attending work or school at regularly defined hours and
abiding by the rules of the work release facility.

Sec.
2. RCW
9.94A.120 and 1999 c 324 s 2, 1999 c 197 s 4, 1999 c 196 s 5, and 1999 c 147 s
3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

When
a person is convicted of a felony, the court shall impose punishment as
provided in this section.

(1)
Except as authorized in subsections (2), (4), (5), (6), (7), and (((8)))
(9) of this section, the court shall impose a sentence within the
sentence range for the offense.

(2)
The court may impose a sentence outside the standard sentence range for that
offense if it finds, considering the purpose of this chapter, that there are
substantial and compelling reasons justifying an exceptional sentence.

(3)
Whenever a sentence outside the standard range is imposed, the court shall set
forth the reasons for its decision in written findings of fact and conclusions
of law. A sentence outside the standard range shall be a determinate sentence.

(4)
A persistent offender shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement for
life without the possibility of parole or, when authorized by RCW 10.95.030 for
the crime of aggravated murder in the first degree, sentenced to death,
notwithstanding the maximum sentence under any other law. An offender
convicted of the crime of murder in the first degree shall be sentenced to a
term of total confinement not less than twenty years. An offender convicted of
the crime of assault in the first degree or assault of a child in the first
degree where the offender used force or means likely to result in death or
intended to kill the victim shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement
not less than five years. An offender convicted of the crime of rape in the
first degree shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement not less than
five years. The foregoing minimum terms of total confinement are mandatory and
shall not be varied or modified as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
In addition, all offenders subject to the provisions of this subsection shall
not be eligible for community custody, earned release time, furlough, home
detention, partial confinement, work crew, work release, or any other form of
early release as defined under RCW 9.94A.150 (1), (2), (3), (((5))) (6),
(((7))) (8), or (((8))) (9), or any other form of
authorized leave of absence from the correctional facility while not in the
direct custody of a corrections officer or officers during such minimum terms
of total confinement except: (a) In the case of an offender in need of
emergency medical treatment; (b) for the purpose of commitment to an inpatient
treatment facility in the case of an offender convicted of the crime of rape in
the first degree; or (c) for an extraordinary medical placement when authorized
under RCW 9.94A.150(4).

(5)
Notwithstanding the maximum sentence under any other law:

(a)
An habitual offender shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement of ten
years, except when (b) of this subsection applies;

(b)
An habitual offender shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement of
fifteen years if the habitual offender has been convicted, whether in this
state or elsewhere:

(i)
On at least two separate occasions of any crime which under the laws of this
state would be a felony;

(ii)
On at least four separate occasions of any crime which under the laws of this
state would be a serious gross misdemeanor; or

(iii)
On at least three separate occasions of any crime which under the laws of this
state would be a combination of one felony and two or more serious gross misdemeanors.

(6)(a)
In sentencing a first-time offender the court may waive the imposition of a
sentence within the sentence range and impose a sentence which may include up
to ninety days of confinement in a facility operated or utilized under contract
by the county and a requirement that the offender refrain from committing new
offenses. The sentence may also include a term of community supervision or
community custody as specified in (b) of this subsection, which, in addition to
crime-related prohibitions, may include requirements that the offender perform
any one or more of the following:

(i)
Devote time to a specific employment or occupation;

(ii)
Undergo available outpatient treatment for up to the period specified in (b) of
this subsection, or inpatient treatment not to exceed the standard range of
confinement for that offense;

(iii)
Pursue a prescribed, secular course of study or vocational training;

(iv)
Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the community
corrections officer prior to any change in the offender's address or
employment;

(v)
Report as directed to a community corrections officer; or

(vi)
Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations as provided in RCW 9.94A.030
and/or perform community service work.

(b)
The terms and statuses applicable to sentences under (a) of this subsection
are:

(i)
For sentences imposed on or after July 25, 1999, for crimes committed before
July 1, 2000, up to one year of community supervision. If treatment is
ordered, the period of community supervision may include up to the period of
treatment, but shall not exceed two years; and

(ii)
For crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000, up to one year of community
custody unless treatment is ordered, in which case the period of community custody
may include up to the period of treatment, but shall not exceed two years. Any
term of community custody imposed under this subsection (((5))) (6)
is subject to conditions and sanctions as authorized in this subsection (((5)))
(6) and in subsection (((11))) (12)(b) and (c) of this
section.

(c)
The department shall discharge from community supervision any offender
sentenced under this subsection (((5))) (6) before July 25, 1999,
who has served at least one year of community supervision and has completed any
treatment ordered by the court.

(((6)))
(7)(a) An offender is eligible for the special drug offender sentencing
alternative if:

(i)
The offender is convicted of a felony that is not a violent offense or sex
offense and the violation does not involve a sentence enhancement under RCW
9.94A.310 (3) or (4);

(ii)
The offender has no current or prior convictions for a sex offense or violent
offense in this state, another state, or the United States;

(iii)
For a violation of the uniform controlled substances act under chapter 69.50
RCW or a criminal solicitation to commit such a violation under chapter 9A.28
RCW, the offense involved only a small quantity of the particular controlled
substance as determined by the judge upon consideration of such factors as the
weight, purity, packaging, sale price, and street value of the controlled
substance; and

(iv)
The offender has not been found by the United States attorney general to be
subject to a deportation detainer or order.

(b)
If the standard range is greater than one year and the sentencing judge
determines that the offender is eligible for this option and that the offender
and the community will benefit from the use of the special drug offender
sentencing alternative, the judge may waive imposition of a sentence within the
standard range and impose a sentence that must include a period of total
confinement in a state facility for one-half of the midpoint of the standard
range. During incarceration in the state facility, offenders sentenced under
this subsection shall undergo a comprehensive substance abuse assessment and
receive, within available resources, treatment services appropriate for the
offender. The treatment services shall be designed by the division of alcohol
and substance abuse of the department of social and health services, in
cooperation with the department of corrections.

The
court shall also impose:

(i)
The remainder of the midpoint of the standard range as a term of community
custody which must include appropriate substance abuse treatment in a program
that has been approved by the division of alcohol and substance abuse of the
department of social and health services;

(ii)
Crime-related prohibitions including a condition not to use illegal controlled
substances; and

(iii)
A requirement to submit to urinalysis or other testing to monitor that status.

The
court may prohibit the offender from using alcohol or controlled substances and
may require that the monitoring for controlled substances be conducted by the
department or by a treatment alternatives to street crime program or a
comparable court or agency-referred program. The offender may be required to
pay thirty dollars per month while on community custody to offset the cost of
monitoring. In addition, the court shall impose three or more of the following
conditions:

(A)
Devote time to a specific employment or training;

(B)
Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the
community corrections officer before any change in the offender's address or
employment;

(C)
Report as directed to a community corrections officer;

(D)
Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations;

(E)
Perform community service work;

(F)
Stay out of areas designated by the sentencing judge;

(G)
Such other conditions as the court may require such as affirmative conditions.

(c)
If the offender violates any of the sentence conditions in (b) of this
subsection, a violation hearing shall be held by the department unless waived
by the offender. If the department finds that conditions have been willfully
violated, the offender may be reclassified to serve the remaining balance of
the original sentence.

(d)
The department shall determine the rules for calculating the value of a day
fine based on the offender's income and reasonable obligations which the
offender has for the support of the offender and any dependents. These rules
shall be developed in consultation with the administrator for the courts, the
office of financial management, and the commission.

(e)
An offender who fails to complete the special drug offender sentencing
alternative program or who is administratively terminated from the program
shall be reclassified to serve the unexpired term of his or her sentence as
ordered by the sentencing judge and shall be subject to all rules relating to
earned early release time. An offender who violates any conditions of
supervision as defined by the department shall be sanctioned. Sanctions may
include, but are not limited to, reclassifying the offender to serve the
unexpired term of his or her sentence as ordered by the sentencing judge. If an
offender is reclassified to serve the unexpired term of his or her sentence,
the offender shall be subject to all rules relating to earned early release
time.

(((7)))
(8) If a sentence range has not been established for the defendant's
crime, the court shall impose a determinate sentence which may include not more
than one year of confinement; community service work; until July 1, 2000, a
term of community supervision not to exceed one year and on and after July 1,
2000, a term of community custody not to exceed one year, subject to conditions
and sanctions as authorized in subsection (((11))) (12)(b) and
(c) of this section; and/or other legal financial obligations. The court may
impose a sentence which provides more than one year of confinement if the court
finds, considering the purpose of this chapter, that there are substantial and
compelling reasons justifying an exceptional sentence.

(((8)))
(9)(a)(i) When an offender is convicted of a sex offense other than a
violation of RCW 9A.44.050 or a sex offense that is also a serious violent
offense and has no prior convictions for a sex offense or any other felony sex
offenses in this or any other state, the sentencing court, on its own motion or
the motion of the state or the defendant, may order an examination to determine
whether the defendant is amenable to treatment.

The
report of the examination shall include at a minimum the following: The
defendant's version of the facts and the official version of the facts, the
defendant's offense history, an assessment of problems in addition to alleged
deviant behaviors, the offender's social and employment situation, and other
evaluation measures used. The report shall set forth the sources of the
evaluator's information.

The
examiner shall assess and report regarding the defendant's amenability to
treatment and relative risk to the community. A proposed treatment plan shall
be provided and shall include, at a minimum:

(A)
Frequency and type of contact between offender and therapist;

(B)
Specific issues to be addressed in the treatment and description of planned
treatment modalities;

(C)
Monitoring plans, including any requirements regarding living conditions,
lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by family members and others;

(D)
Anticipated length of treatment; and

(E)
Recommended crime-related prohibitions.

The
court on its own motion may order, or on a motion by the state shall order, a
second examination regarding the offender's amenability to treatment. The
evaluator shall be selected by the party making the motion. The defendant
shall pay the cost of any second examination ordered unless the court finds the
defendant to be indigent in which case the state shall pay the cost.

(ii)
After receipt of the reports, the court shall consider whether the offender and
the community will benefit from use of this special sex offender sentencing
alternative and consider the victim's opinion whether the offender should
receive a treatment disposition under this subsection. If the court determines
that this special sex offender sentencing alternative is appropriate, the court
shall then impose a sentence within the sentence range. If this sentence is
less than eleven years of confinement, the court may suspend the execution of
the sentence and impose the following conditions of suspension:

(A)
The court shall place the defendant on community custody for the length of the
suspended sentence or three years, whichever is greater, and require the
offender to comply with any conditions imposed by the department of corrections
under subsection (((15))) (16) of this section;

(B)
The court shall order treatment for any period up to three years in duration.
The court in its discretion shall order outpatient sex offender treatment or
inpatient sex offender treatment, if available. A community mental health
center may not be used for such treatment unless it has an appropriate program
designed for sex offender treatment. The offender shall not change sex
offender treatment providers or treatment conditions without first notifying
the prosecutor, the community corrections officer, and the court, and shall not
change providers without court approval after a hearing if the prosecutor or
community corrections officer object to the change. In addition, as conditions
of the suspended sentence, the court may impose other sentence conditions
including up to six months of confinement, not to exceed the sentence range of
confinement for that offense, crime-related prohibitions, and requirements that
the offender perform any one or more of the following:

(I)
Devote time to a specific employment or occupation;

(II)
Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the
community corrections officer prior to any change in the offender's address or
employment;

(III)
Report as directed to the court and a community corrections officer;

(IV)
Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations as provided in RCW 9.94A.030,
perform community service work, or any combination thereof; or

(V)
Make recoupment to the victim for the cost of any counseling required as a
result of the offender's crime; and

(C)
Sex offenders sentenced under this special sex offender sentencing alternative
are not eligible to accrue any earned release time while serving a suspended
sentence.

(iii)
The sex offender therapist shall submit quarterly reports on the defendant's
progress in treatment to the court and the parties. The report shall reference
the treatment plan and include at a minimum the following: Dates of
attendance, defendant's compliance with requirements, treatment activities, the
defendant's relative progress in treatment, and any other material as specified
by the court at sentencing.

(iv)
At the time of sentencing, the court shall set a treatment termination hearing
for three months prior to the anticipated date for completion of treatment.
Prior to the treatment termination hearing, the treatment professional and
community corrections officer shall submit written reports to the court and
parties regarding the defendant's compliance with treatment and monitoring
requirements, and recommendations regarding termination from treatment,
including proposed community supervision conditions. Either party may request
and the court may order another evaluation regarding the advisability of
termination from treatment. The defendant shall pay the cost of any additional
evaluation ordered unless the court finds the defendant to be indigent in which
case the state shall pay the cost. At the treatment termination hearing the
court may: (A) Modify conditions of community custody, and either (B)
terminate treatment, or (C) extend treatment for up to the remaining period of
community custody.

(v)
If a violation of conditions occurs during community custody, the department
shall either impose sanctions as provided for in RCW 9.94A.205(2)(a) or refer
the violation to the court and recommend revocation of the suspended sentence
as provided for in (a)(vi) of this subsection.

(vi)
The court may revoke the suspended sentence at any time during the period of
community custody and order execution of the sentence if: (A) The defendant
violates the conditions of the suspended sentence, or (B) the court finds that
the defendant is failing to make satisfactory progress in treatment. All
confinement time served during the period of community custody shall be
credited to the offender if the suspended sentence is revoked.

(vii)
Except as provided in (a)(viii) of this subsection, after July 1, 1991,
examinations and treatment ordered pursuant to this subsection shall only be
conducted by sex offender treatment providers certified by the department of
health pursuant to chapter 18.155 RCW.

(viii)
A sex offender therapist who examines or treats a sex offender pursuant to this
subsection (((8))) (9) does not have to be certified by the
department of health pursuant to chapter 18.155 RCW if the court finds that:
(A) The offender has already moved to another state or plans to move to another
state for reasons other than circumventing the certification requirements; (B)
no certified providers are available for treatment within a reasonable
geographical distance of the offender's home; and (C) the evaluation and
treatment plan comply with this subsection (((8))) (9) and the
rules adopted by the department of health.

(ix)
For purposes of this subsection (((8))) (9), "victim"
means any person who has sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or
financial injury to person or property as a result of the crime charged.
"Victim" also means a parent or guardian of a victim who is a minor
child unless the parent or guardian is the perpetrator of the offense.

(x)
If the defendant was less than eighteen years of age when the charge was filed,
the state shall pay for the cost of initial evaluation and treatment.

(b)
When an offender commits any felony sex offense on or after July 1, 1987, and
is sentenced to a term of confinement of more than one year but less than six
years, the sentencing court may, on its own motion or on the motion of the
offender or the state, request the department of corrections to evaluate
whether the offender is amenable to treatment and the department may place the
offender in a treatment program within a correctional facility operated by the
department.

Except
for an offender who has been convicted of a violation of RCW 9A.44.040 or
9A.44.050, if the offender completes the treatment program before the expiration
of his or her term of confinement, the department of corrections may request
the court to convert the balance of confinement to community supervision and to
place conditions on the offender including crime-related prohibitions and
requirements that the offender perform any one or more of the following:

(i)
Devote time to a specific employment or occupation;

(ii)
Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the
community corrections officer prior to any change in the offender's address or
employment;

(iii)
Report as directed to the court and a community corrections officer;

(iv)
Undergo available outpatient treatment.

If
the offender violates any of the terms of his or her community supervision, the
court may order the offender to serve out the balance of his or her community
supervision term in confinement in the custody of the department of
corrections.

Nothing
in this subsection (((8))) (9)(b) shall confer eligibility for
such programs for offenders convicted and sentenced for a sex offense committed
prior to July 1, 1987. This subsection (((8))) (9)(b) does not
apply to any crime committed after July 1, 1990.

(c)
Offenders convicted and sentenced for a sex offense committed prior to July 1,
1987, may, subject to available funds, request an evaluation by the department
of corrections to determine whether they are amenable to treatment. If the
offender is determined to be amenable to treatment, the offender may request
placement in a treatment program within a correctional facility operated by the
department. Placement in such treatment program is subject to available funds.

(d)
Within the funds available for this purpose, the department shall develop and
monitor transition and relapse prevention strategies, including risk assessment
and release plans, to reduce risk to the community after sex offenders' terms
of confinement in the custody of the department.

(((9)))
(10)(a)(i) When a court sentences a person to a term of total
confinement to the custody of the department of corrections for an offense
categorized as a sex offense or a serious violent offense committed after July
1, 1988, but before July 1, 1990, assault in the second degree, assault of a
child in the second degree, any crime against a person where it is determined
in accordance with RCW 9.94A.125 that the defendant or an accomplice was armed
with a deadly weapon at the time of commission, or any felony offense under
chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW not sentenced under subsection (((6))) (7)
of this section, committed on or after July 1, 1988, but before July 25, 1999,
the court shall in addition to the other terms of the sentence, sentence the
offender to a one-year term of community placement beginning either upon
completion of the term of confinement or at such time as the offender is
transferred to community custody in lieu of earned release in accordance with
RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2). When the court sentences an offender under this
subsection to the statutory maximum period of confinement then the community
placement portion of the sentence shall consist entirely of such community
custody to which the offender may become eligible, in accordance with RCW 9.94A.150
(1) and (2). Any period of community custody actually served shall be credited
against the community placement portion of the sentence.

(ii)
Except for persons sentenced under (b) of this subsection or subsection (((10)))
(11)(a) of this section, when a court sentences a person to a term of
total confinement to the custody of the department of corrections for a violent
offense, any crime against a person under RCW 9.94A.440(2), or any felony
offense under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW not sentenced under subsection (((6)))
(7) of this section, committed on or after July 25, 1999, but before
July 1, 2000, the court shall in addition to the other terms of the sentence,
sentence the offender to a one-year term of community placement beginning
either upon completion of the term of confinement or at such time as the
offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of earned release in
accordance with RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2). When the court sentences the
offender under this subsection (((9))) (10)(a)(ii) to the
statutory maximum period of confinement, then the community placement portion
of the sentence shall consist entirely of such community custody to which the
offender may become eligible, in accordance with RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2).
Any period of community custody actually served shall be credited against the
community placement portion of the sentence.

(b)
When a court sentences a person to a term of total confinement to the custody
of the department of corrections for an offense categorized as a sex offense
committed on or after July 1, 1990, but before June 6, 1996, or a serious
violent offense, vehicular homicide, or vehicular assault, committed on or
after July 1, 1990, but before July 1, 2000, the court shall in addition to
other terms of the sentence, sentence the offender to community placement for
two years or up to the period of earned release awarded pursuant to RCW
9.94A.150 (1) and (2), whichever is longer. The community placement shall
begin either upon completion of the term of confinement or at such time as the
offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of earned release in
accordance with RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2). When the court sentences an
offender under this subsection to the statutory maximum period of confinement
then the community placement portion of the sentence shall consist entirely of
the community custody to which the offender may become eligible, in accordance
with RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2). Any period of community custody actually
served shall be credited against the community placement portion of the
sentence. Unless a condition is waived by the court, the terms of community
placement for offenders sentenced pursuant to this section shall include the
following conditions:

(i)
The offender shall report to and be available for contact with the assigned
community corrections officer as directed;

(ii)
The offender shall work at department of corrections-approved education,
employment, and/or community service;

(iii)
The offender shall not possess or consume controlled substances except pursuant
to lawfully issued prescriptions;

(iv)
The offender shall pay supervision fees as determined by the department of
corrections;

(v)
The residence location and living arrangements are subject to the prior
approval of the department of corrections during the period of community
placement; and

(vi)
The offender shall submit to affirmative acts necessary to monitor compliance
with the orders of the court as required by the department.

(c)
As a part of any sentence imposed under (a) or (b) of this subsection, the
court may also order any of the following special conditions:

(i)
The offender shall remain within, or outside of, a specified geographical
boundary;

(ii)
The offender shall not have direct or indirect contact with the victim of the
crime or a specified class of individuals;

(iii)
The offender shall participate in crime-related treatment or counseling
services;

(iv)
The offender shall not consume alcohol;

(v)
The offender shall comply with any crime-related prohibitions; or

(vi)
For an offender convicted of a felony sex offense against a minor victim after
June 6, 1996, the offender shall comply with any terms and conditions of
community placement imposed by the department of corrections relating to
contact between the sex offender and a minor victim or a child of similar age
or circumstance as a previous victim.

(d)
Prior to transfer to, or during, community placement, any conditions of
community placement may be removed or modified so as not to be more restrictive
by the sentencing court, upon recommendation of the department of corrections.

(((10)))
(11)(a) When a court sentences a person to the custody of the department
of corrections for an offense categorized as a sex offense committed on or
after June 6, 1996, but before July 1, 2000, the court shall, in addition to
other terms of the sentence, sentence the offender to community custody for
three years or up to the period of earned release awarded pursuant to RCW
9.94A.150 (1) and (2), whichever is longer. The community custody shall begin
either upon completion of the term of confinement or at such time as the
offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of earned release in
accordance with RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2).

(b)
Unless a condition is waived by the court, the terms of community custody shall
be the same as those provided for in subsection (((9))) (10)(b)
of this section and may include those provided for in subsection (((9)))
(10)(c) of this section. As part of any sentence that includes a term
of community custody imposed under this subsection, the court shall also
require the offender to comply with any conditions imposed by the department of
corrections under subsection (((15))) (16) of this section.

(c)
At any time prior to the completion of a sex offender's term of community
custody, if the court finds that public safety would be enhanced, the court may
impose and enforce an order extending any or all of the conditions imposed
pursuant to this section for a period up to the maximum allowable sentence for
the crime as it is classified in chapter 9A.20 RCW, regardless of the
expiration of the offender's term of community custody. If a violation of a
condition extended under this subsection occurs after the expiration of the
offender's term of community custody, it shall be deemed a violation of the
sentence for the purposes of RCW 9.94A.195 and may be punishable as contempt of
court as provided for in RCW 7.21.040.

(((11)))
(12)(a) When a court sentences a person to the custody of the department
of corrections for a sex offense, a violent offense, any crime against a person
under RCW 9.94A.440(2), or a felony offense under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW
not sentenced under subsection (((6))) (7) of this section,
committed on or after July 1, 2000, the court shall in addition to the other
terms of the sentence, sentence the offender to community custody for the
community custody range or up to the period of earned release awarded pursuant
to RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2), whichever is longer. The community custody shall
begin either upon completion of the term of confinement or at such time as the
offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of earned release in
accordance with RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2).

(b)
Unless a condition is waived by the court, the conditions of community custody
shall include those provided for in subsection (((9))) (10)(b)(i)
through (vi) of this section. The conditions may also include those provided
for in subsection (((9))) (10)(c)(i) through (vi) of this
section. The court may also order the offender to participate in
rehabilitative programs or otherwise perform affirmative conduct reasonably
related to the circumstances of the offense, the offender's risk of
reoffending, or the safety of the community, and the department shall enforce
such conditions pursuant to (f) of this subsection. As part of any sentence
that includes a term of community custody imposed under this subsection, the
court shall also require the offender to comply with any conditions imposed by
the department of corrections under subsection (((15))) (16) of
this section. The department shall assess the offender's risk of reoffense and
may establish and modify additional conditions of the offender's community custody
based upon the risk to community safety. The department may not impose
conditions that are contrary to those ordered by the court and may not
contravene or decrease court imposed conditions. The department shall notify
the offender in writing of any such conditions or modifications. In setting,
modifying, and enforcing conditions of community custody, the department shall
be deemed to be performing a quasi-judicial function.

(c)
If an offender violates conditions imposed by the court or the department
pursuant to this subsection during community custody, the department may
transfer the offender to a more restrictive confinement status and impose other
available sanctions as provided in RCW 9.94A.205 and 9.94A.207.

(d)
Except for terms of community custody under subsection (((8))) (9)
of this section, the department shall discharge the offender from community
custody on a date determined by the department, which the department may
modify, based on risk and performance of the offender, within the range or at
the end of the period of earned release, whichever is later.

(e)
At any time prior to the completion or termination of a sex offender's term of
community custody, if the court finds that public safety would be enhanced, the
court may impose and enforce an order extending any or all of the conditions
imposed pursuant to this section for a period up to the maximum allowable
sentence for the crime as it is classified in chapter 9A.20 RCW, regardless of
the expiration of the offender's term of community custody. If a violation of
a condition extended under this subsection occurs after the expiration of the
offender's term of community custody, it shall be deemed a violation of the
sentence for the purposes of RCW 9.94A.195 and may be punishable as contempt of
court as provided for in RCW 7.21.040. If the court extends a condition beyond
the expiration of the term of community custody, the department is not
responsible for supervision of the offender's compliance with the condition.

(f)
Within the funds available for community custody, the department shall
determine conditions and duration of community custody on the basis of risk to
community safety, and shall supervise offenders during community custody on the
basis of risk to community safety and conditions imposed by the court. The
secretary shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this subsection (((11)))
(12)(f).

(g)
By the close of the next business day after receiving notice of a condition
imposed or modified by the department, an offender may request an
administrative review under rules adopted by the department. The condition
shall remain in effect unless the reviewing officer finds that it is not
reasonably related to any of the following: (i) The crime of conviction; (ii)
the offender's risk of reoffending; or (iii) the safety of the community.

(((12)))
(13) If the court imposes a sentence requiring confinement of thirty
days or less, the court may, in its discretion, specify that the sentence be
served on consecutive or intermittent days. A sentence requiring more than
thirty days of confinement shall be served on consecutive days. Local jail
administrators may schedule court-ordered intermittent sentences as space
permits.

(((13)))
(14) If a sentence imposed includes payment of a legal financial
obligation, the sentence shall specify the total amount of the legal financial
obligation owed, and shall require the offender to pay a specified monthly sum
toward that legal financial obligation. Restitution to victims shall be paid
prior to any other payments of monetary obligations. Any legal financial
obligation that is imposed by the court may be collected by the department,
which shall deliver the amount paid to the county clerk for credit. The
offender's compliance with payment of legal financial obligations shall be
supervised by the department for ten years following the entry of the judgment
and sentence or ten years following the offender's release from total
confinement. All monetary payments ordered shall be paid no later than ten
years after the last date of release from confinement pursuant to a felony
conviction or the date the sentence was entered unless the superior court
extends the criminal judgment an additional ten years. If the legal financial
obligations including crime victims' assessments are not paid during the
initial ten-year period, the superior court may extend jurisdiction under the
criminal judgment an additional ten years as provided in RCW 9.94A.140,
9.94A.142, and 9.94A.145. If jurisdiction under the criminal judgment is
extended, the department is not responsible for supervision of the offender
during the subsequent period. Independent of the department, the party or
entity to whom the legal financial obligation is owed shall have the authority
to utilize any other remedies available to the party or entity to collect the
legal financial obligation. Nothing in this section makes the department, the
state, or any of its employees, agents, or other persons acting on their behalf
liable under any circumstances for the payment of these legal financial
obligations. If an order includes restitution as one of the monetary
assessments, the county clerk shall make disbursements to victims named in the
order.

(((14)))
(15) Except as provided under RCW 9.94A.140(1) and 9.94A.142(1), a court
may not impose a sentence providing for a term of confinement or community
supervision, community placement, or community custody which exceeds the
statutory maximum for the crime as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(((15)))
(16) All offenders sentenced to terms involving community supervision,
community service, community placement, community custody, or legal financial
obligation shall be under the supervision of the department of corrections and
shall follow explicitly the instructions and conditions of the department of
corrections. The department may require an offender to perform affirmative
acts it deems appropriate to monitor compliance with the conditions of the
sentence imposed.

(a)
The instructions shall include, at a minimum, reporting as directed to a
community corrections officer, remaining within prescribed geographical
boundaries, notifying the community corrections officer of any change in the
offender's address or employment, and paying the supervision fee assessment.

(b)
For offenders sentenced to terms involving community custody for crimes
committed on or after June 6, 1996, the department may include, in addition to
the instructions in (a) of this subsection, any appropriate conditions of
supervision, including but not limited to, prohibiting the offender from having
contact with any other specified individuals or specific class of individuals.
For offenders sentenced to terms of community custody for crimes committed on
or after July 1, 2000, the department may additionally require the offender to
participate in rehabilitative programs or otherwise perform affirmative
conduct, and to obey all laws.

The
conditions authorized under this subsection (((15))) (16)(b) may
be imposed by the department prior to or during an offender's community custody
term. If a violation of conditions imposed by the court or the department
pursuant to subsection (((10))) (11) of this section occurs
during community custody, it shall be deemed a violation of community placement
for the purposes of RCW 9.94A.207 and shall authorize the department to
transfer an offender to a more restrictive confinement status as provided in
RCW 9.94A.205. At any time prior to the completion of an offender's term of
community custody, the department may recommend to the court that any or all of
the conditions imposed by the court or the department pursuant to subsection (((10)))
(11) or (((11))) (12) of this section be continued beyond
the expiration of the offender's term of community custody as authorized in
subsection (((10))) (11)(c) or (((11))) (12)(e) of
this section.

The
department may require offenders to pay for special services rendered on or
after July 25, 1993, including electronic monitoring, day reporting, and telephone
reporting, dependent upon the offender's ability to pay. The department may
pay for these services for offenders who are not able to pay.

(((16)))
(17) All offenders sentenced to terms involving community supervision,
community service, community custody, or community placement under the
supervision of the department of corrections shall not own, use, or possess
firearms or ammunition. Offenders who own, use, or are found to be in actual
or constructive possession of firearms or ammunition shall be subject to the
appropriate violation process and sanctions. "Constructive
possession" as used in this subsection means the power and intent to
control the firearm or ammunition. "Firearm" as used in this
subsection means a weapon or device from which a projectile may be fired by an
explosive such as gunpowder.

(((17)))
(18) The sentencing court shall give the offender credit for all
confinement time served before the sentencing if that confinement was solely in
regard to the offense for which the offender is being sentenced.

(((18)))
(19) A departure from the standards in RCW 9.94A.400 (1) and (2)
governing whether sentences are to be served consecutively or concurrently is
an exceptional sentence subject to the limitations in subsections (2) and (3) of
this section, and may be appealed by the defendant or the state as set forth in
RCW 9.94A.210 (2) through (6).

(((19)))
(20) The court shall order restitution whenever the offender is
convicted of a felony that results in injury to any person or damage to or loss
of property, whether the offender is sentenced to confinement or placed under
community supervision, unless extraordinary circumstances exist that make
restitution inappropriate in the court's judgment. The court shall set forth
the extraordinary circumstances in the record if it does not order restitution.

(((20)))
(21) As a part of any sentence, the court may impose and enforce an
order that relates directly to the circumstances of the crime for which the
offender has been convicted, prohibiting the offender from having any contact
with other specified individuals or a specific class of individuals for a
period not to exceed the maximum allowable sentence for the crime, regardless
of the expiration of the offender's term of community supervision or community
placement.

(((21)))
(22) The court may order an offender whose sentence includes community
placement or community supervision to undergo a mental status evaluation and to
participate in available outpatient mental health treatment, if the court finds
that reasonable grounds exist to believe that the offender is a mentally ill
person as defined in RCW 71.24.025, and that this condition is likely to have
influenced the offense. An order requiring mental status evaluation or
treatment must be based on a presentence report and, if applicable, mental
status evaluations that have been filed with the court to determine the
offender's competency or eligibility for a defense of insanity. The court may
order additional evaluations at a later date if deemed appropriate.

(((22)))
(23) In any sentence of partial confinement, the court may require the
defendant to serve the partial confinement in work release, in a program of
home detention, on work crew, or in a combined program of work crew and home detention.

(((23)))
(24) All court-ordered legal financial obligations collected by the
department and remitted to the county clerk shall be credited and paid where
restitution is ordered. Restitution shall be paid prior to any other payments
of monetary obligations.

(((24)))
(25) In sentencing an offender convicted of a crime of domestic
violence, as defined in RCW 10.99.020, if the offender has a minor child, or if
the victim of the offense for which the offender was convicted has a minor
child, the court may, as part of any term of community supervision, order the
offender to participate in a domestic violence perpetrator program approved
under RCW 26.50.150.

(((25)))
(26)(a) Sex offender examinations and treatment ordered as a special
condition of community placement or community custody under this section shall
be conducted only by sex offender treatment providers certified by the
department of health under chapter 18.155 RCW unless the court finds that: (i)
The offender has already moved to another state or plans to move to another
state for reasons other than circumventing the certification requirements; (ii)
no certified providers are available for treatment within a reasonable
geographic distance of the offender's home, as determined in rules adopted by
the secretary; (iii) the evaluation and treatment plan comply with the rules
adopted by the department of health; or (iv) the treatment provider is employed
by the department. A treatment provider selected by an offender who is not
certified by the department of health shall consult with a certified provider
during the offender's period of treatment to ensure compliance with the rules
adopted by the department of health. The frequency and content of the
consultation shall be based on the recommendation of the certified provider.

(b)
A sex offender's failure to participate in treatment required as a condition of
community placement or community custody is a violation that will not be
excused on the basis that no treatment provider was located within a reasonable
geographic distance of the offender's home.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act applies only to crimes committed on or after the effective date of this
act.

---
END ---