BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
77.32.450 and 1998 c 191 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A big game hunting license is required to hunt for big game. A big game
license allows the holder to hunt for forest grouse, unclassified wildlife,
and the individual species identified within a specific big game combination
license package. Each big game license includes one transport tag for each
species purchased in that package. A hunter may not purchase more than one
license for each big game species except as authorized by rule of the
commission. The fees for annual big game combination packages are as follows:

(a)
Big game number 1: Deer, elk, bear, and cougar. The fee for this license is
sixty-six dollars for residents, six hundred sixty dollars for nonresidents,
and thirty-three dollars for youth.

(b)
Big game number 2: Deer and elk. The fee for this license is fifty-six
dollars for residents, five hundred sixty dollars for nonresidents, and
twenty-eight dollars for youth.

(c)
Big game number 3: Deer or elk, bear, and cougar. At the time of purchase,
the holder must identify either deer or elk. The fee for this license is
forty-six dollars for residents, four hundred sixty dollars for nonresidents,
and twenty-three dollars for youth.

(d)
Big game number 4: Deer or elk. At the time of purchase, the holder must
identify either deer or elk. The fee for this license is thirty-six dollars
for residents, three hundred sixty dollars for nonresidents, and eighteen
dollars for youth.

(e)
Big game number 5: Bear and cougar. The fee for this license is twenty
dollars for residents, two hundred dollars for nonresidents, and ten dollars
for youth.

(2)
In the event that the commission authorizes a two animal big game limit, the fees
for the second animal are as follows:

(a)
Elk: The fee is twenty dollars for residents, two hundred dollars for
nonresidents, and ten dollars for youth.

(b)
Deer: The fee is twenty dollars for residents, two hundred dollars for
nonresidents, and ten dollars for youth.

(c)
Bear: The fee is ten dollars for residents, one hundred dollars for
nonresidents, and five dollars for youth.

(d)
Cougar: The fee is ten dollars for residents, one hundred dollars for
nonresidents, and five dollars for youth.

(3)
In the event that the commission authorizes a special permit hunt for goat,
sheep, or moose, the permit fees are as follows:

(a)
Mountain goat: The fee is one hundred dollars for residents, one thousand
dollars for nonresidents, and fifty dollars for youth.

(b)
Sheep: The fee is one hundred dollars for residents, one thousand dollars for
nonresidents, and fifty dollars for youth.

(c)
Moose: The fee is one hundred dollars for residents, one thousand dollars for
nonresidents, and fifty dollars for youth.

Authorization
to hunt the species set out under subsection (3)(a) through (c) of this section
is by special permit identified under RCW 77.32.370.

(4) The commission may adopt rules to reduce the price of a license
or eliminate the transportation tag requirements concerning bear or cougar when
necessary to meet harvest objectives.

Sec.
2. RCW
77.32.460 and 1998 c 191 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A small game hunting license is required to hunt for all classified wild
animals and wild birds, except big game. A small game license also allows
the holder to hunt for unclassified wildlife. The small game license
includes one transport tag for turkey.

(a)
The fee for this license is thirty dollars for residents, one hundred fifty
dollars for nonresidents, and fifteen dollars for youth.

(b)
The fee for this license if purchased in conjunction with a big game
combination license package is sixteen dollars for residents, eighty dollars
for nonresidents, and eight dollars for youth.

(c)
The fee for a three-consecutive-day small game license is fifty dollars for
nonresidents.

(2) The fee for each additional turkey tag is eighteen dollars for
residents, sixty dollars for nonresidents, and nine dollars for youth.

---
END ---