BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.88C.010 and 1997 c 168 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The caseload forecast council is hereby created. The council shall consist of
two individuals appointed by the governor and four individuals, one of whom is
appointed by the chairperson of each of the two largest political caucuses in
the senate and house of representatives. The chair of the council shall be
selected from among the four caucus appointees. The council may select such
other officers as the members deem necessary.

(2)
The council shall employ a caseload forecast supervisor to supervise the
preparation of all caseload forecasts. As used in this chapter,
"supervisor" means the caseload forecast supervisor.

(3)
Approval by an affirmative vote of at least five members of the council is
required for any decisions regarding employment of the supervisor. Employment
of the supervisor shall terminate after each term of three years. At the end
of the first year of each three-year term the council shall consider extension
of the supervisor's term by one year. The council may fix the compensation of
the supervisor. The supervisor shall employ staff sufficient to accomplish the
purposes of this section.

(4)
The caseload forecast council shall oversee the preparation of and approve, by
an affirmative vote of at least four members, the official state caseload
forecasts prepared under RCW 43.88C.020. If the council is unable to approve a
forecast before a date required in RCW 43.88C.020, the supervisor shall submit
the forecast without approval and the forecast shall have the same effect as if
approved by the council.

(5)
A council member who does not cast an affirmative vote for approval of the
official caseload forecast may request, and the supervisor shall provide, an
alternative forecast based on assumptions specified by the member.

(6)
Members of the caseload forecast council shall serve without additional
compensation but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW
44.04.120 while attending sessions of the council or on official business
authorized by the council. Nonlegislative members of the council shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(7)
"Caseload," as used in this chapter, means the number of persons
expected to meet entitlement requirements and require the services of public
assistance programs, state correctional institutions, state correctional noninstitutional
supervision, state institutions for juvenile offenders, the common school
system, long-term care, medical assistance, foster care, and adoption support.

(8)
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions provided in RCW
43.88.020 apply to this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. If
specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or
chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2000, in the omnibus appropriations
act, this act is null and void.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---