BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that:

(1)
The state of Washington is affected by national, regional, and state-wide
changes that are transforming the nature of the electric power industry;

(2)
Washington has a long tradition of energy policies that support energy
efficiency and renewable energy development. These policies have reduced air
and water pollution and protected the environment, stimulated economic
development, made homes more comfortable, reduced operating costs for
businesses, and made industries more competitive;

(3)
The Washington state electricity system study, commissioned by the 55th
legislature through chapter 300, Laws of 1998, confirmed that current changes
in the electric industry have had the unintended consequence of shortening
utility planning horizons and reducing incentives for electric utilities to
invest in energy conservation and renewable resources;

(4)
The Washington state electricity system study also found that there are
significant energy conservation resources that cost the same or less than the
least costly new electric generation options and that while some
nonhydroelectric renewable resources may not be cost-effective in the
short-term, they provide significant environmental and energy system benefits
to warrant development; and

(5)
It is in the interest of Washington's economy and environment to have a
competitively neutral and nonbypassable mechanism that will assure delivery of
all cost-effective energy conservation, provide low-income households with
energy efficiency services, and secure development of new nonhydroelectric
renewable resources.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Auditor" means the office of the state auditor.

(2)
"Commission" means the Washington state utilities and transportation
commission.

(3)
"Consumer-owned utility" includes a municipal electric utility formed
under Title 35 RCW, a public utility district formed under Title 54 RCW, an
irrigation district formed under chapter 87.03 RCW, a cooperative formed under
chapter 23.86 RCW, a mutual corporation or association formed under chapter
24.06 RCW, a port district formed under Title 53 RCW, or a water-sewer district
formed under Title 57 RCW, that is engaged in the business of distributing
electricity to more than one retail electric customer in the state.

(4)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(5)
"Direct service customer" means any end-user of electricity who
obtains electricity directly from the transmission grid and not through a
distribution utility, including those customers defined in section 3(8) of the
Pacific Northwest electric power planning and conservation act, P.L. 96-501.

(6)
"Distribution utility" means any investor-owned or consumer-owned
utility that owns, operates, or manages any distribution plant for hire within
this state.

(7)
"Governing body" means the board of directors, city council, or the
commissioners of any consumer-owned utility as defined in this section.

(8)
"Investor-owned utility" means a corporation owned by investors that
meets the definition of RCW 80.04.010 and is engaged in distributing
electricity to more than one retail electric customer in the state.

(9)
"Low-income energy efficiency services" includes repairs,
weatherization, installation of energy-efficient appliances and fixtures for
low-income residences, and investment in new construction of low-income
households to exceed the state energy code, for the purpose of enhancing energy
efficiency.

(10)
"Low-income" means a household meeting eligibility guidelines for the
federal low-income home energy assistance program.

(11)
"New nonhydroelectric renewable resource" means a renewable resource,
renewable resource project or addition to an existing renewable resource
project, excluding electric generation facilities fueled by water, that is
contracted by a consumer-owned utility or investor-owned utility after December
31, 1999 or starts operation after December 31, 1999.

(12)
"Renewable resources" as defined in RCW 19.29A.010 means electricity
generation facilities fueled by: (a) Water; (b) wind; (c) solar energy; (d)
geothermal energy; (e) landfill gas; or (f) biomass energy based on solid
organic fuels from wood, forest, or field residues or dedicated energy crops
that do not include wood pieces that have been treated with chemical
preservatives such as creosote, pentachlorophenol, or copper chrome arsenic.

(13)
"System benefits charge" means a nonbypassable competitively neutral
charge on all end-use electricity customers and direct service customers to
fund investment in energy conservation, renewable resources, and low-income
energy efficiency services.

(14)
"Total annual revenues from the retail sale of electricity services in the
state" means the total amount of revenues spent each year by Washington
end-users for electricity services including distribution, transmission,
generation, ancillary services, metering and billing, transition charges, and
other types of costs included in consumer-owned utility or investor-owned
utility electric rates on the effective date of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
Beginning July 1, 2001, and each year from July 1st to June 30th thereafter, a
minimum annual state-wide energy conservation, renewable resources, and
low-income energy efficiency services investment standard for investor-owned
utilities, consumer-owned utilities, and direct service customers is
established equal to at least three percent of the total annual revenues from
the retail sale of electricity services in the state.

(2)
Each Washington electricity distribution utility shall annually allocate at
least three percent of the total annual revenues from the retail sale of
electricity to consumers within its distribution service territory toward
meeting this standard. Nothing in this chapter limits distribution utilities
from exceeding this standard.

(3)
Each direct service customer shall annually allocate at least three percent of
its total expenditures for electric services toward meeting this standard.
Nothing in this chapter limits direct service customers from exceeding this
standard.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
The appropriate nonbypassable collection mechanism to comply with the standard
and allocation determination outlined in this chapter shall be determined by
the commission for all distribution utilities under its jurisdiction. The
mechanism must be nonbypassable for all customers regardless of energy
supplier.

(2)
All consumer-owned utilities will determine the appropriate nonbypassable
collection mechanism to comply with the standard and allocation determination
outlined in this chapter. The mechanism must be nonbypassable for all
customers regardless of energy supplier.

(3)
Any distribution utility that has fewer than seventeen customers per mile of
line and has retail electric power rates that exceed the state average electric
power rate as defined by the United States department of energy's energy
information administration may, at its option, adopt a minimum standard less
than the amount it is projected to collect under section 3 of this act, except
that in no case may such a distribution utility spend less, on average, than
one and one-half percent of revenues during the first five years after the
effective date of this section.

(4)
Each direct service customer shall annually forward to the distribution utility
in the service territory of which the company is located an amount equal to the
amount specified in section 3(3) of this act, less those funds qualifying under
section 5(3) of this act. In determining its total annual expenditures for
retail electric services, the direct service customer either shall rely on
consumption and total revenue data from the 1994 report "Generation and
Sales Statistics from the Bonneville Power Administration" or shall
provide documentation to the department showing expenditure data for the most
recent annual period ending June 30th. If a direct service customer chooses to
provide expenditure data to the department, from that time forward, the
customer may no longer rely on 1994 data. Documentation provided to the
department is considered proprietary information. The department can report
such information only in the aggregate for all direct service customers in the
state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
Funds shall be allocated for the following purposes:

(a)
Energy conservation measures, including but not limited to local conservation
and regional market transformation efforts;

(b)
New nonhydroelectric renewable resources, including new local and regional
renewable energy projects and research, development, or demonstration projects;
and

(c)
Low-income energy efficiency services.

(2)
The funds collected by investor-owned utilities and consumer-owned utilities
under the minimum standard shall be expended as follows:

(a)
49.5 percent of the funds shall be allocated at the discretion of the
distribution utility for purposes identified in subsection (1) of this
section. The distribution utility may use a portion of these funds for
administration and evaluation activities related to implementation of this act;

(b)
14 percent of the funds shall be invested in cost-effective regional energy
efficiency market transformation activities. Distribution utilities
contributing to the Northwest energy efficiency alliance through their
Bonneville power administration rates will be credited an equivalent amount
toward this portion of the charge;

(c)
12.5 percent of the funds shall be forwarded to the department for
administering programs that provide low-income energy efficiency services.
These funds may be distributed through the state-wide network of weatherization
assistance program providers for weatherization of residences occupied by
low-income households;

(d)
12.5 percent of the funds shall be devoted to the above market costs of the
development and commercialization of new nonhydroelectric renewable resources,
renewable resource research and development, and development and demonstration
of distributed renewable resources;

(e)
11 percent of the funds shall be invested in cost-effective conservation; and

(f)
.5 percent of the funds shall be forwarded to the department to fund its
responsibilities set forth in this chapter.

(3)(a)
Direct service customers and any end-use customer of a distribution utility
that uses large amounts of electricity (defined as > 10 aMW per facility)
shall receive credit for up to 36.5 percent of the minimum standard for the
funds that it contributes to the distribution utility for local installation of
energy efficiency measures, if the customer invests these funds in documented
cost-effective conservation investments made in the customer's facilities.
Such credit shall not include the customer's contribution to low-income energy
efficiency service costs. If an independent audit determines there is no
available conservation measure at the site that would have a simple payback of
one and one-half to ten years, the customer shall receive the full credit of
36.5 percent of the minimum standard.

(i)
The department will confirm that energy savings from the package of energy
conservation measures implemented by a direct service customer has a cost less
than or equal to the customer's avoided costs and each individual measure has
simple payback greater than eighteen months. Upon determination, a customer
may apply for a credit for those costs from the local distribution utility to
whom they send their funds.

(ii)
The distribution utility will confirm that energy savings from the package of
energy conservation measures implemented by an end-use customer under (a) of
this subsection has a cost less than or equal to the customer's avoided costs
and each individual measure has simple payback greater than eighteen months.
Upon determination, a customer may receive a credit for those costs from its
distribution utility.

(b)
A direct service customer and any end-use customer of a distribution utility
that uses large amounts of electricity as defined in (a) of this subsection is
eligible for a credit for up to 36.5 percent of the minimum standard for direct
investments in new nonhydroelectric renewable resources for use within the
customer's facility.

(c)
A direct service customer contributing to the Northwest energy efficiency
alliance through its Bonneville power administration rates is eligible for a
credit for up to fourteen percent of the minimum standard.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. (1)
On or before October 1, 2002, and annually thereafter, each investor-owned
utility must demonstrate to the commission compliance with the minimum annual
investment standard created in section 3 of this act for the annual period
ending the previous June 30th.

(2)
On or before October 1, 2002, and annually thereafter, each consumer-owned
utility and direct service customer must demonstrate to the auditor, or by
independent audit, compliance with the minimum annual investment standard
created in section 3 of this act for the annual period ending the previous June
30th.

(3)
Consumer-owned distribution utilities may demonstrate their compliance with the
minimum investment standard "in the aggregate" by participating in
collaborative/consortia efforts with other Washington consumer-owned
distribution utilities.

(4)
If the auditor or commission determines, within sixty days after receipt of
utility compliance filing, that a utility has failed to collect funds to meet
the minimum investment standard for the previous reporting period, the
distribution utility shall immediately implement a tariff to collect a uniform
nonbypassable system benefits charge. The tariff will collect revenue
equivalent to achieving the minimum investment standard as if implemented
according to section 3 of this act.

(5)
If by July 1, 2003, and annually thereafter, the auditor or commission
determines that a utility's compliance filing shows that less than ninety
percent of funds collected to meet the minimum investment standard have been
allocated for the purposes described in section 5 of this act and if the
department has allocated more than ninety percent of the total funds forwarded
to the department under section 5 of this act for administering programs that
provide low-income energy efficiency services, the unallocated utility funds
will be forwarded to the department for additional investment in low-income
energy efficiency programs. Otherwise, unallocated funds will be carried over
for expenditure by the utility in the following year.

(6)
A commission-regulated distribution utility's expenses for the local
conservation (excluding low-income energy efficiency services) portion of the
funds must be for cost-effective conservation (based on avoided generation,
transmission and distribution costs, and associated environmental externality
costs) and approved and verified by the commission.

(7)
A consumer-owned utility's expenses for the local conservation portion of the
funds (excluding low-income energy efficiency services) must be for cost-effective
conservation (based on avoided generation, transmission and distribution costs,
and associated environmental externality costs) and approved and verified by
the governing body.

(8)
The department shall convene a group of stakeholders, including the commission,
to advise on the development of criteria for energy conservation, market
transformation and renewable energy expenditures, program implementation
guidelines that qualify toward the minimum annual expenditure standard, and a
dispute resolution process to address distribution utility or direct service
customer complaints on findings of failure to comply with program
implementation guidelines. The department will consider all existing and
appropriate criteria and guidelines where applicable, and may rely on work of
regional power planning committees in determining criteria and guidelines. The
commission has the final authority to approve criteria and program
implementation guidelines for the investor-owned utilities. The department
shall adopt rules for reporting energy conservation and renewable resource
expenditures and energy savings as applicable. No expenditures for power from
renewable resource projects memorialized in contracts or memorandum of
understandings before January 1, 2000, shall be eligible for meeting the
minimum expenditure standard of this chapter.

(9)
In the event that a consumer-owned utility fails to satisfy the program
implementation guidelines developed in subsection (8) of this section, the
department will issue a warning to the noncomplying utility and provide
technical assistance to the utility to improve program effectiveness. After
two consecutive years of unacceptable programs, the department will assume
program responsibility and distribute funds for the noncomplying utility in
accordance with the allocation formulas set forth in section 5 of this act,
except that the funds to be used for local conservation, excluding low-income
energy efficiency services, may, at the discretion of the department, be
competitively bid to an energy service provider, to an energy conservation
nonprofit organization, or to the noncomplying utility to be spent on energy
conservation projects in the noncomplying utility's service territory until
such time as the noncompliance is remediated. During this period of interim
administration, the department will not make any commitments greater than three
years of the local conservation funding it is administering.

(10)
In the event that an investor-owned utility fails to satisfy the program implementation
guidelines developed in subsection (8) of this section, the commission will
issue a warning to the noncomplying utility and notify the department, which
will provide technical assistance to the utility to improve program
effectiveness. After two consecutive years of unacceptable programs, the
department will assume program responsibility and distribute funds for the
noncomplying utility in accordance with the allocation formulas set forth in
section 5 of this act, except that the funds to be used for local conservation
excluding low-income energy efficiency services, may, at the discretion of the
department, be competitively bid to an energy service provider, to an energy
conservation nonprofit organization, or to the noncomplying utility to be spent
on energy conservation projects in the noncomplying utility's service territory
until such time as the noncompliance is remediated. During this period of
interim administration, the department will not make any commitments greater
than three years of the local conservation funding it is administering.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. (1)
On or before December 1, 2003, and biennially thereafter, the department shall
submit a report to the legislature on the accomplishments of the investment
standard created in this chapter and unachieved cost-effective opportunities,
and make recommendations for revisions to the standard.

(2)
On or before January 1, 2010, the department shall review and recommend
continuation, modification, or discontinuation of the minimum investment
standard based on an assessment of the effectiveness of the standard, market
conditions, and unachieved opportunities.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 80 RCW.

---
END ---