BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 16.72 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a)
It is unlawful for any person to sell or place into the stream of commerce the
fur of a domestic dog or cat or any product that contains the fur of a domestic
dog or cat unless it is accurately labeled as containing the same.

(b)
The sale of each fur or fur product that is either improperly labeled or has no
label in violation of (a) of this subsection constitutes a separate offense.

(c)(i)
The first conviction under this subsection is a misdemeanor punishable under
RCW 9A.20.021(3), and by a mandatory fine of not less than two hundred fifty
dollars.

(ii)
A second conviction under this subsection is a gross misdemeanor punishable
under RCW 9A.20.021(2), and by a mandatory fine of not less than five hundred
dollars.

(iii)
A third or subsequent conviction under this subsection is a class C felony
punishable under RCW 9A.20.021(1)(c), and by a mandatory fine of not less than
one thousand dollars.

(d)
For the purposes of this section, "fur" means the fur or pelt of a
domestic dog or cat.

(2)
The fines imposed under this section shall not be suspended or deferred in
whole or in part.

(3)
Violation of this section constitutes a violation of chapter 19.86 RCW, the
consumer protection act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 16.72 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a)
In addition to the penalties imposed by the court under section 1 of this act,
the following are subject to seizure and forfeiture and no property right
exists in them:

(i)
All fur that is not labeled as "domestic dog" or "domestic
cat";

(ii)
All products containing fur that are not labeled as containing domestic dog or
cat fur.

(b)
For the purposes of this section, "fur" means the fur or pelt of a
domestic dog or cat.

(2)(a)
A forfeiture of property encumbered by a bona fide security interest is subject
to the interest of the secured party if, at the time the security interest was
created, the secured party neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or
omission.

(b)
Personal property subject to forfeiture under this chapter may be seized by any
law enforcement officer of this state upon process issued by any superior court
having jurisdiction over the property. Seizure of personal property without
process may be made if:

(i)
The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search warrant; or

(ii)
The property subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior judgment in
favor of the state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture proceeding based upon
this chapter.

(c)
In the event of seizure pursuant to (b) of this subsection, proceedings for
forfeiture shall be deemed commenced by the seizure. The law enforcement
agency under whose authority the seizure was made shall cause notice to be
served within fifteen days following the seizure on the owner of the property
seized and the person in charge thereof and any person having any known right
or interest therein, including any community property interest, of the seizure
and intended forfeiture of the seized property. Notice of seizure in the case
of property subject to a security interest that has been perfected by filing a
financing statement in accordance with chapter 62A.9 RCW, or a certificate of
title, shall be made by service upon the secured party or the secured party's
assignee at the address shown on the financing statement or the certificate of
title. The notice of seizure in other cases may be served by any method
authorized by law or court rule including but not limited to service by
certified mail with return receipt requested. Service by mail shall be deemed
complete upon mailing within the fifteen-day period following the seizure.

(d)
If no person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in writing of the
person's claim of ownership or right to possession of items specified in
subsection (1)(a)(i) or (ii) of this section within forty-five days of the
seizure, the item seized shall be deemed forfeited. The community property
interest in real property of a person whose spouse committed a violation giving
rise to seizure of the real property may not be forfeited if the person did not
participate in the violation.

(e)
If any person notifies the seizing law enforcement agency in writing of the
person's claim of ownership or right to possession of items specified in
subsection (1)(a)(i) or (ii) of this section within forty-five days of the
seizure, the person or persons shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to be
heard as to the claim or right. The hearing shall be before the chief law
enforcement officer of the seizing agency or the chief law enforcement
officer's designee, except where the seizing agency is a state agency as
defined in RCW 34.12.020(4), the hearing shall be before the chief law enforcement
officer of the seizing agency or an administrative law judge appointed under
chapter 34.12 RCW, except that any person asserting a claim or right may remove
the matter to a court of competent jurisdiction. Removal of any matter
involving personal property may only be accomplished according to the rules of
civil procedure. The person seeking removal of the matter must serve process
against the state, county, political subdivision, or municipality that operates
the seizing agency, and any other party of interest, in accordance with RCW
4.28.080 or 4.92.020, within forty-five days after the person seeking removal
has notified the seizing law enforcement agency of the person's claim of
ownership or right to possession. The court to which the matter is to be
removed shall be the district court when the aggregate value of personal
property is within the jurisdictional limit set forth in RCW 3.66.020. A
hearing before the seizing agency and any appeal therefrom shall be under Title
34 RCW. In a court hearing between two or more claimants to the article or
articles involved, the prevailing party shall be entitled to a judgment for
costs and reasonable attorneys' fees. The burden of producing evidence shall
be upon the person claiming to be the lawful owner or the person claiming to
have the lawful right to possession of the property. The seizing law
enforcement agency shall promptly return the article or articles to the
claimant upon a determination by the administrative law judge or court that the
claimant is the present lawful owner or is lawfully entitled to possession
thereof of items specified in subsection (1)(a)(i) or (ii) of this section.

(3)
Upon the conviction of any person under section 1 of this act and following the
conclusion of all appeals in the matter, all fur forfeited under this section
shall be destroyed.

(4)
Each seizing agency shall retain records of forfeited property for at least
seven years.

Sec.
3. RCW
9.94A.320 and 1999 c 352 s 3, 1999 c 322 s 5, and 1999 c 45 s 4 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:

TABLE 2

CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVEL

XVIAggravated Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)

XVHomicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)

Malicious explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))

Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)

XIVMurder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)

XIIIMalicious explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))

Malicious placement of an explosive 1 (RCW
70.74.270(1))

XIIAssault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)

Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW
70.74.272(1)(a))

Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)

Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)

XIManslaughter 1 (RCW
9A.32.060)

Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)

Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)

XChild Molestation 1 (RCW
9A.44.083)

Indecent Liberties (with
forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a))

Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)

Leading Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))

Malicious explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))

Manufacture of methamphetamine (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Over 18 and deliver heroin, methamphetamine, a
narcotic from Schedule I or II, or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV to someone
under 18 (RCW 69.50.406)

IXAssault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)

Controlled Substance Homicide (RCW 69.50.415)

Explosive devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)

Homicide by Watercraft, by being under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW ((88.12.029)) 79A.60.050)

Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))

Malicious placement of an explosive 2 (RCW
70.74.270(2))

Over 18 and deliver narcotic from Schedule III, IV,
or V or a nonnarcotic, except flunitrazepam or methamphetamine, from Schedule
I-V to someone under 18 and 3 years junior (RCW 69.50.406)

Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)

Sexual Exploitation (RCW
9.68A.040)

Vehicular Homicide, by being under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)

VIIIArson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)

Deliver or possess with intent to deliver
methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Homicide by Watercraft, by the operation of any
vessel in a reckless manner (RCW ((88.12.029)) 79A.60.050)

Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver amphetamine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(ii))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver heroin or cocaine (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Possession of ephedrine or pseudoephedrine with
intent to manufacture methamphetamine (RCW 69.50.440)

Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)

Selling for profit (controlled or counterfeit) any
controlled substance (RCW 69.50.410)

Vehicular Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle
in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)

VIIBurglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020)

Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)

Dealing in depictions of minor engaged in sexually
explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.050)

Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)

Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard for the safety of
others (RCW ((88.12.029)) 79A.60.050)

Indecent Liberties (without forcible compulsion) (RCW
9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))

Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)

Involving a minor in drug dealing (RCW 69.50.401(f))

Malicious placement of an explosive 3 (RCW
70.74.270(3))

Sending, bringing into state depictions of minor
engaged in sexually explicit conduct (RCW 9.68A.060)

Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in the first degree
(RCW 9.41.040(1)(a))

Use of a Machine Gun in Commission of a Felony (RCW
9.41.225)

Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for the safety of
others (RCW 46.61.520)

VIBail Jumping with Murder 1
(RCW 9A.76.170(2)(a))

Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)

Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))

Intimidating a Judge (RCW
9A.72.160)

Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110,
9A.72.130)

Malicious placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW
70.74.272(1)(b))

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver narcotics from Schedule I or II (except heroin or cocaine) or
flunitrazepam from Schedule IV (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(i))

Rape of a Child 3 (RCW
9A.44.079)

Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)

VAbandonment of dependent
person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)

Advancing money or property
for extortionate extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)

Bail Jumping with class A
Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(2)(b))

Child Molestation 3 (RCW
9A.44.089)

Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW
9A.42.020)

Custodial Sexual Misconduct
1 (RCW 9A.44.160)

Delivery of imitation controlled substance by person
eighteen or over to person under eighteen (RCW 69.52.030(2))

Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)

Extortionate Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)

Extortionate Means to Collect Extensions of Credit
(RCW 9A.82.040)

Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))

Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)

On and after July 1, 2000: No-Contact Order
Violation: Domestic Violence Pretrial Condition (RCW 10.99.040(4) (b) and (c))

On and after July 1, 2000: No-Contact Order
Violation: Domestic Violence Sentence Condition (RCW 10.99.050(2))

On and after July 1, 2000: Protection Order
Violation: Domestic Violence Civil Action (RCW 26.50.110 (4) and (5))

On and after July 1, 2000: Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)

Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)

Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)

Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)

Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)

Rendering Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)

Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)

Sexually Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)

IVArson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)

Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)

Assault by Watercraft (RCW ((88.12.032)) 79A.60.060)

Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW
9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)

Commercial Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)

Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))

Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)

Hit and Run‑-Injury Accident (RCW
46.52.020(4))

Hit and Run with Vessel‑-Injury Accident (RCW
((88.12.155(3))) 79A.60.200(3))

Indecent Exposure to Person Under Age Fourteen
(subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)

Influencing Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW
9A.82.070)

Knowingly Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW
9A.82.050(2))

Malicious Harassment (RCW 9A.36.080)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver narcotics from Schedule III, IV, or V or nonnarcotics from Schedule I-V
(except marijuana, amphetamine, methamphetamines, or flunitrazepam) (RCW
69.50.401(a)(1) (iii) through (v))

Residential Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)

Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)

Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)

Use of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW
9A.82.080 (1) and (2))

Vehicular Assault (RCW 46.61.522)

Willful Failure to Return from Furlough (RCW
72.66.060)

IIIAbandonment of dependent person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)

Assault 3 (RCW 9A.36.031)

Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)

Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW
9A.76.170(2)(c))

Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)

Communication with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW
9.68A.090)

Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)

Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)

Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)

Delivery of a material in lieu of a controlled
substance (RCW 69.50.401(c))

Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)

Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)

Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)

Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)

Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)

Maintaining a Dwelling or Place for Controlled Substances
(RCW 69.50.402(a)(6))

Malicious Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)

Manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to
deliver marijuana (RCW 69.50.401(a)(1)(iii))

Manufacture, distribute, or possess with intent to
distribute an imitation controlled substance (RCW 69.52.030(1))

Patronizing a Juvenile
Prostitute (RCW 9.68A.100)

Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)

Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)

Possession of Machine Gun or Short-Barreled Shotgun
or Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)

Promoting Prostitution 2
(RCW 9A.88.080)

Recklessly
Trafficking in Stolen Property (RCW 9A.82.050(1))

Securities Act violation
(RCW 21.20.400)

Tampering with a Witness
(RCW 9A.72.120)

Telephone Harassment (subsequent conviction or
threat of death) (RCW 9.61.230)

Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.080)

Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)

Unlawful possession of firearm in the second degree
(RCW 9.41.040(1)(b))

Unlawful Use of Building for Drug Purposes (RCW
69.53.010)

Willful Failure to Return from Work Release (RCW
72.65.070)

IIComputer Trespass 1 (RCW
9A.52.110)

Counterfeiting
(RCW 9.16.035(3))

Create, deliver, or
possess a counterfeit controlled substance (RCW 69.50.401(b))

Domestic Dog or Cat
Fur Labeling Violation (section 1(1)(c)(iii) of this act)

Escape from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)

Health Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)

Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)

Possession of controlled substance that is either
heroin or narcotics from Schedule I or II or flunitrazepam from Schedule IV
(RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession of phencyclidine (PCP) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)

Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property
(valued at one thousand five hundred dollars or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)

Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)

Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW
18.130.190(7))

IAttempting to Elude a
Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)

False Verification for
Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)

Forged Prescription (RCW
69.41.020)

Forged Prescription for a
Controlled Substance (RCW 69.50.403)

Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)

Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)

Possess Controlled Substance that is a Narcotic from
Schedule III, IV, or V or Non-narcotic from Schedule I-V (except phencyclidine
or flunitrazepam) (RCW 69.50.401(d))

Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)

Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)

Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission (RCW
9A.56.070)

Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)

Theft of Rental, Leased, or Lease-purchased Property
(valued at two hundred fifty dollars or more but less than one thousand five
hundred dollars) (RCW 9A.56.096(4))

Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW
9A.56.060)

Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.140 (2) and
(3))

Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW
9A.52.095)

---
END ---