BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.93.030 and 1998 c 257 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter unless the context indicates otherwise:

(1)
"Department" means the department of ecology;

(2)
"Director" means the director of the department of ecology;

(3)
"Disposable package or container" means all packages or containers
defined as such by rules and regulations adopted by the department of ecology;

(4)
"Hazardous substance" has the same meaning as the term is defined
in either RCW 70.95C.020, or RCW 70.105.010, or both;

(5)
"Litter" means all waste material including but not limited to
disposable packages or containers thrown or deposited as herein prohibited and
solid waste that is illegally dumped, but not including the wastes of the
primary processes of mining, logging, sawmilling, farming, or manufacturing;

(((5)))
(6) "Litter bag" means a bag, sack, or other container made of
any material which is large enough to serve as a receptacle for litter inside
the vehicle or watercraft of any person. It is not necessarily limited to the
state approved litter bag but must be similar in size and capacity;

(((6)))
(7) "Litter receptacle" means those containers adopted by the
department of ecology and which may be standardized as to size, shape,
capacity, and color and which shall bear the state anti-litter symbol, as well
as any other receptacles suitable for the depositing of litter;

(((7)))
(8) "Person" means any political subdivision, government
agency, municipality, industry, public or private corporation, copartnership,
association, firm, individual, or other entity whatsoever;

(((8)))
(9) "Recycling" means transforming or remanufacturing waste
materials into a finished product for use other than landfill disposal or
incineration;

(((9)))
(10) "Recycling center" means a central collection point for
recyclable materials;

(((10)))
(11) "Vehicle" includes every device capable of being moved
upon a public highway and in, upon, or by which any persons or property is or
may be transported or drawn upon a public highway, excepting devices moved by
human or animal power or used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks;

(((11)))
(12) "Waste reduction" means reducing the amount or toxicity
of waste generated or reusing materials;

(((12)))
(13) "Watercraft" means any boat, ship, vessel, barge, or
other floating craft;

(((13)))
(14) "Public place" means any area that is used or held out
for use by the public whether owned or operated by public or private interests.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.93.060 and 1997 c 159 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No person shall throw, drop, deposit, discard, or otherwise dispose of litter
upon any public property in the state or upon private property in this state
not owned by him or her or in the waters of this state whether from a vehicle
or otherwise including but not limited to any public highway, public park,
beach, campground, forest land, recreational area, trailer park, highway, road,
street, or alley except:

(a)
When the property is designated by the state or its agencies or political
subdivisions for the disposal of garbage and refuse, and the person is
authorized to use such property for that purpose;

(b)
Into a litter receptacle in a manner that will prevent litter from being
carried away or deposited by the elements upon any part of said private or
public property or waters.

(2)(a)
Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, it is a class 3 civil
infraction as provided in RCW 7.80.120 for a person to litter in an amount less
than or equal to one cubic foot.

(b)
It is a class 1 civil infraction as provided in RCW 7.80.120 for a person to
litter in an amount greater than one cubic foot in an incorporated area of a
county. Unless suspended or modified by a court, the person shall also pay
a litter cleanup fee of twenty-five dollars per cubic foot of litter. The
court may, in addition to or in lieu of part or all of the cleanup fee, order
the person to pick up and remove litter from the property, with prior
permission of the legal owner or, in the case of public property, of the agency
managing the property.

(c)
It is a misdemeanor for a person to litter in an amount greater than one cubic
foot in an unincorporated area of a county. The person shall also pay a litter
cleanup restitution payment equal to twice the actual cost of cleanup, or fifty
dollars per cubic foot of litter, whichever is greater. The court shall
distribute one-half of the restitution payment to the landowner and one-half of
the restitution payment to the law enforcement agency investigating the
incident. The court may, in addition to or in lieu of part or all of the
cleanup restitution payment, order the person to pick up and remove litter from
the property, with prior permission of the legal owner or, in the case of
public property, of the agency managing the property.

(d)
Except as otherwise provided by law, it is a gross misdemeanor for a person to
litter, in any amount, a hazardous substance in an unincorporated area of a
county. The person shall also pay a litter cleanup restitution payment equal
to twice the actual costs of cleanup or one hundred dollars per cubic foot of
litter, whichever is greater. The court shall distribute one-half of the
restitution payment to the landowner and one-half of the restitution payment to
the law enforcement agency investigating the incident.

(3)
If the violation occurs in a state park, the court shall, in addition to any
other penalties assessed, order the person to perform twenty-four hours of
community service in the state park where the violation occurred if the state
park has stated an intent to participate as provided in RCW ((43.51.048(2)))
79A.05.050.

(4)
It is a class 1 civil infraction as provided in RCW 7.80.120 for a person to
discard, in violation of this section, a cigarette, cigar, or other tobacco
product that is capable of starting a fire.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 70.93 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Upon the conviction of a person for a violation of RCW 70.93.060(2) (c) or (d),
a peace officer specified under RCW 9A.04.110 may seize without warrant
vehicles, gear, appliances, or any other items or articles they have probable
cause to believe have been used in violation of RCW 70.93.060(2) (c) or (d).
However, a peace officer may not seize any item or article, other than for
evidence, if under the circumstances it is reasonable to conclude that the
violation was inadvertent. The property seized is subject to forfeiture to the
enforcement agency that seized the property under this section regardless of
ownership. Property seized may be recovered by its owner by depositing into
court a cash bond equal to the value of the seized property but not more than
twenty‑five thousand dollars. Such cash bond is subject to forfeiture in
lieu of the property. Forfeiture of property seized under this section is a
civil forfeiture against property intended to be a remedial civil sanction.

(2)
In the event of a seizure of property under this section, jurisdiction to begin
the forfeiture proceedings shall commence upon seizure. Within fifteen days
following the seizure, the seizing authority shall serve a written notice of
intent to forfeit property on the owner of the property seized and on any
person having any known right or interest in the property seized. Notice may
be served by any method authorized by law or court rule, including service by
certified mail with return receipt requested. Service by mail is deemed
complete upon mailing within the fifteen‑day period following the
seizure.

(3)
Persons claiming a right of ownership or right to possession of property are
entitled to a hearing to contest forfeiture. Such a claim shall specify the
claim of ownership or possession and shall be made in writing and served on the
director within forty‑five days of the seizure. If the seizing authority
has complied with notice requirements and there is no claim made within
forty-five days, then the property shall be forfeited to the agency that seized
the property.

(4)
If any person timely serves the administrative head of the enforcement agency
that seized the property with a claim to property, the person shall be afforded
an opportunity to be heard as to the person's claim or right. The hearing
shall be before the administrator or the administrator's designee, or before an
administrative law judge appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW, except that a
person asserting a claim or right may remove the matter to a court of competent
jurisdiction if the aggregate value of the property seized is more than five
thousand dollars.

(5)
The hearing to contest forfeiture and any subsequent appeal shall be as
provided for in Title 34 RCW. The seizing authority has the burden to
demonstrate that it had reason to believe the property was held with intent to
violate or was used in violation of RCW 70.93.060(2) (c) or (d). The person
contesting forfeiture has the burden of production and proof by a preponderance
of evidence that the person owns or has a right to possess the property and:

(a)
That the property was not held with intent to violate or used in violation of
RCW 70.93.060(2) (c) or (d); or

(b)
If the property is a vehicle, that the illegal use or planned illegal use of
the vehicle occurred without the owner's knowledge or consent, and that the
owner acted reasonably to prevent illegal uses of the vehicle.

(6)
A forfeiture of a conveyance encumbered by a perfected security interest is
subject to the interest of the secured party if the secured party neither had
knowledge of nor consented to the act or omission. No security interest in
seized property may be perfected after seizure.

(7)
If seized property is forfeited under this section the enforcement agency may
retain it for official use unless the property is required to be destroyed, or
upon application by any law enforcement agency of the state, release such
property to the agency for the use of enforcing the criminal law, or sell such
property, and retain the net proceeds and use the proceeds to expand and
improve the enforcement agency's litter control activity. Money retained under
this section may not be used to supplant preexisting funding sources.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---