BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A new
section is added to chapter 79A.05 RCW to read as follows:

The
commission shall allow the use of metal detectors for recreational purposes in
all state parks, except in areas where a historic archaeological resource has
been identified under RCW 27.53.030(11) and the commission has held a hearing
in the area and made findings of fact concerning the resource. In those state
park areas that do not contain historic archaeological resources, the use of
metal detectors is permitted subject to reasonable rules set forth by the
commission. The commission must adopt rules consistent with this policy by
December 31, 2000.

---
END ---