BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Any state resident may purchase from the authority any plan purchased for the
public employees' benefit program or for the basic health plan.

(2)
The premium paid by each resident for health insurance coverage under this
section may not exceed the lowest cost the state paid to purchase that plan in
fiscal year 1999, except that the premium may be adjusted to reflect changes in
the implicit price deflator for all items as determined by the office of
financial management.

(3)
No resident whose gross family income is less than the equivalent of forty-five
thousand dollars for a family of four, or three hundred percent of the federal
poverty level as periodically adjusted for inflation, may be required to pay
more than ten percent of their gross family income to obtain coverage under
this section.

(4)
Any additional public funds that may be necessary to implement this section
shall be raised by the legislature through increases in the tobacco tax as
authorized under chapter 82.26 RCW.

(5) No public employee or basic health plan enrollee may be charged
more or receive fewer health benefits as a consequence of this section.

---
END ---