BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
PATIENT RIGHTS. It is the intent of the legislature that patients
covered by health plans receive quality health care designed to maintain and
improve their health. The purpose of this act is to ensure that health plan
patients:

(1)
Have improved access to information regarding their health plans;

(2)
Have sufficient and timely access to appropriate health care services, and
choice among health care providers;

(3)
Are assured that health care decisions are made by appropriate medical
personnel;

(4)
Have access to a quick and impartial process for appealing plan decisions;

(5)
Are protected from unnecessary invasions of health care privacy; and

(6)
Are assured that personal health care information will be used only as
necessary to obtain and pay for health care or to improve the quality of care.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
HEALTH INFORMATION PRIVACY. (1) Each carrier that offers a health plan must
develop and implement policies and procedures governing the collection, use,
and disclosure of health information. These policies and procedures must
include methods for enrollees to access information about themselves and to
amend any information that is inaccurate, for enrollees to restrict the
disclosure of sensitive information about themselves, and for enrollees to
obtain information about the carrier's health information policies. In
addition, these policies and procedures must include methods for carrier
oversight and enforcement of information policies, for carrier storage and
disposal of health information, and for carrier conformance to state and
federal laws governing the collection, use, and disclosure of personally
identifiable health information. Each carrier must provide a summary notice of
its health information policies to enrollees, including the enrollee's right to
restrict the collection, use, and disclosure of their own health information.

(2)
Except as otherwise required by statute or rule, or a carrier's disclosure made
pursuant to requirements in RCW 70.02.050 and 70.02.900 for health care
providers, a carrier is, and all persons acting at the direction of or on
behalf of a carrier or in receipt of an enrollee's personally identifiable
health information are, prohibited from collecting, using, or disclosing
personally identifiable health information unless authorized in writing by the
person who is the subject of the information. At a minimum, such authorization
must be valid for a limited time and purpose; be specific as to purpose and
types of information to be collected, used, or disclosed; and identify the
persons who will be receiving the information.

(3)
Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent: (a) The creation, use,
or release of anonymous data that has been coded or encrypted to protect the
identity of the individual, and for which there is no reasonable basis to
believe that the information could be used to identify an individual; or (b)
the release by a carrier of personally identifiable health information for
health research subject to the requirements of the federal "common
rule" at 21 C.F.R. Secs. 50 and 56 (1968) and 45 C.F.R. Sec. 46 (1972).

(4)
The commissioner shall adopt rules to implement this section and shall take
into consideration health information privacy standards recommended by the
national association of insurance commissioners and other related professional
organizations.

(5)
The commissioner shall enforce the provisions of chapter 70.02 RCW as they
apply to carriers.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
INFORMATION DISCLOSURE. (1) A carrier that offers a health plan may not offer
to sell a health plan to an enrollee or to any group representative, agent,
employer, or enrollee representative without first offering to provide, and
providing upon request, the following information before purchase or selection:

(a)
A listing of covered benefits, including prescription drug categories,
definitions of terms such as generic versus brand name, and policies regarding
coverage of drugs, such as how they become approved or taken off the formulary,
and how enrollees may be involved in decisions about benefits;

(b)
A listing of exclusions, reductions, and limitations to covered benefits,
including policies and practices related to any drug formulary, and any definition
of medical necessity or other coverage criteria upon which they may be based;

(c)
A statement of the carrier's policies for protecting the confidentiality of
health information;

(d)
A statement containing the cost of premiums and enrollee point-of-service
cost-sharing requirements;

(e)
A summary explanation of the carrier's grievance process;

(f)
A statement regarding the availability of a point-of-service option, if any,
and how the option operates; and

(g)
A convenient means of obtaining a list of participating providers, including
disclosure of network arrangements that restrict access to providers within any
plan network. The offer to provide the information referenced in this
subsection must be clearly and prominently displayed on any information
provided to any prospective enrollee or to any prospective group
representative, agent, employer, or enrollee representative.

(2)
Upon the request of any person, including a current enrollee, prospective
enrollee, or the insurance commissioner, a carrier and the Washington state
health care authority, established by chapter 41.05 RCW, in relation to the
uniform medical plan must provide written information regarding any health care
plan it offers, that includes the following written information:

(a)
Any documents, instruments, or other information referred to in the enrollment
agreement;

(b)
A full description of the procedures to be followed by an enrollee for
consulting a provider other than the primary care provider and whether the
enrollee's primary care provider, the carrier's medical director, or another
entity must authorize the referral;

(c)
Procedures, if any, that an enrollee must first follow for obtaining prior
authorization for health care services;

(d)
A written description of any reimbursement or payment arrangements, including,
but not limited to, capitation provisions, fee-for-service provisions, and
health care delivery efficiency provisions, between a carrier and a provider or
network;

(e)
An annual accounting of all payments made by the carrier which have been
counted against any payment limitations, visit limitations, or other overall
limitations on a person's coverage under a plan;

(f)
A copy of the carrier's grievance process for claim or service denial and for
dissatisfaction with care;

(g)
Descriptions and justifications for provider compensation programs, including
any incentives or penalties that are intended to encourage providers to
withhold services or minimize or avoid referrals to specialists; and

(h)
The criteria used by the carrier to make utilization review and medical
necessity determinations.

(3)
Each carrier and the Washington state health care authority shall provide to
all enrollees and prospective enrollees a list of available disclosure items.

(4)
Nothing in this section requires a carrier or provider to divulge proprietary
information to an enrollee including the specific contractual terms and
conditions between a carrier and a provider.

(5)
No carrier may advertise, market, or present any health plan to the public as a
plan that covers services that help prevent illness or promote the health of
enrollees unless it:

(a)
Provides all clinical preventive health services provided by the basic health
plan, authorized by chapter 70.47 RCW;

(b)
Monitors and reports annually to enrollees on standardized measures of health
care and satisfaction of all enrollees in the health plan. The state
department of health shall recommend appropriate standardized measures for this
purpose, after consideration of national standardized measurement systems
adopted by national managed care accreditation organizations and state agencies
that purchase managed health care services;

(c)
Demonstrates a partnership with the state department of health or a local
health jurisdiction, by means of a letter from the secretary of the state
department of health or the local health jurisdiction verifying the plan's
current active participation in community-wide efforts to maintain and improve
the health status of its enrollees through activities such as public health
educational programs; and

(d)
Makes available upon request to enrollees its integrated plan to identify and
manage the most prevalent diseases within its enrolled population, including
cancer, heart disease, and stroke.

(6)
No carrier may preclude or discourage its providers from informing an enrollee
of the care he or she requires, including various treatment options, and
whether in the providers' view such care is consistent with the plan's health
coverage criteria, or otherwise covered by the enrollee's service agreement
with the carrier. No carrier may prohibit, discourage, or penalize a provider
otherwise practicing in compliance with the law from advocating on behalf of an
enrollee with a carrier. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
authorize a provider to bind a carrier to pay for any service.

(7)
No carrier may preclude or discourage enrollees or those paying for their
coverage from discussing the comparative merits of different carriers with
their providers. This prohibition specifically includes prohibiting or
limiting providers participating in those discussions even if critical of a
carrier.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
ACCESS TO APPROPRIATE HEALTH SERVICES. (1) Each enrollee in a health plan must
have adequate choice among qualified health care providers.

(2)
Each carrier must allow an enrollee to choose a primary care provider who is
accepting new enrollees from a list of participating providers.

(3)
Each carrier must have a process whereby an enrollee whose medical condition so
warrants is authorized to use a medical specialist as a primary care provider,
or to receive a standing referral to a specialist for an extended period of
time. This may include enrollees suffering from chronic diseases and those
with other special needs.

(4)
Each carrier must provide for appropriate and timely referral of enrollees to a
choice of specialists within the plan if specialty care is warranted. If the
type of medical specialist needed for a specific condition is not represented
on the specialty panel, enrollees must have access to nonparticipating
specialty health care providers.

(5)
Each carrier must provide, upon the request of an enrollee, access by the
enrollee to a second opinion regarding any medical diagnosis or treatment plan
from a qualified provider of the enrollee's choice. However, the carrier's
payment to a nonparticipating provider offering the second opinion may be
limited to the amount that the carrier would pay a participating provider for a
second opinion. The consumer is responsible for payment of any charges in
excess of the amount paid to the nonparticipating provider by the carrier.

(6)
Each carrier must, at the carrier's expense, allow enrollees to continue
receiving services from a primary care provider whose contract with the plan or
whose contract with a subcontractor is being terminated by the plan or
subcontractor without cause under the terms of that contract for no longer than
sixty days following notice of termination to the enrollees or, in group
coverage arrangements involving periods of open enrollment, only until the end
of the next open enrollment period. The provider's relationship with the
carrier or subcontractor must be continued on the same terms and conditions as
those of the contract the plan or subcontractor is terminating, except for any
provision requiring that the carrier assign new enrollees to the terminated
provider.

(7)
Each carrier must communicate enrollee information required in this chapter by
means that ensure that a substantial portion of the enrollee population can
make use of this information.

(8)
Every carrier shall meet the standards set forth in this section and any rules
adopted by the commissioner to implement this section. For the purposes of
this section, the commissioner shall consider relevant standards adopted by
national managed care accreditation organizations and state agencies that
purchase managed health care services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
HEALTH CARE DECISIONS. (1) Carriers that offer a health plan shall maintain a
documented utilization review program description and written utilization
review criteria based on reasonable medical evidence. The program must include
a method for reviewing and updating criteria. Carriers shall make clinical
protocols, medical management standards, and other review criteria available
upon request to participating providers.

(2)
The commissioner shall adopt, in rule, standards for this section after reviewing
relevant standards adopted by national managed care accreditation organizations
and the state agencies that purchase managed health care services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
RETROSPECTIVE DENIAL OF SERVICES. (1) A health carrier that offers a health
plan shall not retrospectively deny coverage for emergency and nonemergency
care that had prior authorization under the plan's written policies.

(2)
The commissioner shall adopt, in rule, standards for this section after
reviewing relevant standards adopted by national managed care accreditation
organizations and the state agencies that purchase managed health care
services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
GRIEVANCE PROCESS. (1) Each carrier that offers a health plan must have a
fully operational, comprehensive grievance process that complies with the
requirements of this section and any rules adopted by the commissioner to
implement this section. For the purposes of this section, the commissioner
shall consider grievance process standards adopted by national managed care
accreditation organizations and state agencies that purchase managed health
care services.

(2)
Each carrier must provide written notice to an enrollee and the enrollee's
provider of its decision to modify, discontinue, or deny a health service for
the enrollee.

(3)
Each carrier must process as a grievance:

(a)
An enrollee's complaint about the quality or availability of a health service;

(b)
An enrollee's complaint about an issue other than the quality or availability
of a health service that the carrier has not resolved within response timelines
established by the commissioner in rules; and

(c)
An enrollee's request that the carrier reconsider: (i) Its decision to modify,
discontinue, or deny a health service, or (ii) its initial resolution of a
complaint or grievance made by an enrollee.

(4)
To process a grievance, each carrier must:

(a)
Provide written notice to the enrollee when the grievance is received;

(b)
Assist the enrollee with the grievance process;

(c)
Expedite a grievance if the enrollee's provider or the carrier's medical
director determines, or if other evidence indicates that following the
grievance process response timelines could seriously jeopardize the enrollee's
health or ability to regain maximum function;

(d)
Cooperate with a representative chosen by the enrollee;

(e)
Consider information submitted by the enrollee;

(f)
Investigate and resolve the grievance; and

(g)
Provide written notice of its resolution of the grievance to the enrollee and,
with the permission of the enrollee, to the enrollee's providers.

(5)
Written notice required by subsections (2) and (4) of this section must
explain:

(a)
The carrier's decision and the supporting coverage or clinical reasons,
including any alternative health service that may be appropriate; and

(b)
The carrier's grievance process, including information, as appropriate, about
how to exercise enrollee's rights to obtain a second opinion, how to continue
receiving services as provided in this section, and how to discuss a grievance
resolution with an impartial carrier representative authorized to review and
modify the grievance resolution.

(6)
When an enrollee requests that the carrier reconsider its decision to modify or
discontinue a health service that an enrollee is receiving through the plan,
the carrier must continue to provide that health service until the grievance is
resolved. If the resolution affirms the carrier's decision, the enrollee may
be responsible for the cost of this continued health service.

(7)
Each carrier must provide a clear explanation of the grievance process upon
request, upon enrollment to new enrollees, and annually to enrollees and
subcontractors.

(8)
Each carrier must: Track each grievance until final resolution; maintain, and
make accessible to the commissioner for a period of three years, a log of all
grievances; and identify and evaluate trends in grievances.

NEW
SECTION. Sec.
8.
INDEPENDENT REVIEW OF HEALTH CARE DISPUTES. (1)
There is a need for a process for the fair consideration of enrollee complaints
relating to decisions by carriers that offer a health plan to modify,
discontinue, or deny coverage of or payment for health care. The commissioner
shall adopt rules that:

(a)
Permit an enrollee to seek review of a carrier's decision to modify,
discontinue, or deny a health service by an independent review organization,
after the carrier has completed its grievance procedures and its decision is
unfavorable to the enrollee, or the carrier has exceeded the timelines for
grievances established by the commissioner, without good cause and without
reaching a decision;

(b)
Establish and use a rotational registry system for the assignment of a
certified independent review organization to each appeal;

(c)
Require carriers to provide to the appropriate independent review organization
not later than the third business day after the date the carrier receives a
request for review a copy of:

(i)
Any medical records of the enrollee that are relevant to the review;

(ii)
Any documents used by the plan in making the determination to be reviewed by
the organization;

(iii)
Any documentation and written information submitted to the carrier in support
of the appeal; and

(iv)
A list of each physician or health care provider who has provided care to the
enrollee and who may have medical records relevant to the appeal;

(d)
Authorize reviewers to make determinations regarding the medical necessity or
appropriateness of, or the application of health plan coverage provisions to,
health care services for an enrollee. Independent review is not intended to
override health plan contract provisions that clearly exclude coverage of
particular types of medical services or procedures, or treatment of particular
health conditions. In reviewing disputes related to coverage, reviewers should
consider any and all contract provisions related to the health service that is
the subject of the dispute. The medical reviewers' determinations must be
based upon their expert medical judgment, after consideration of relevant
medical, scientific, and cost-effectiveness evidence; and

(e)
Require carriers to comply with the independent review organization's
determination, and to pay for the independent review.

(2)
Health information or other confidential or proprietary information in the
custody of a carrier may be provided to an independent review organization,
subject to rules adopted by the commissioner.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. A
new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

INDEPENDENT
REVIEW ORGANIZATIONS. (1)
The department of health shall:

(a)
Adopt rules providing a procedure for contracting with one or more
organizations to perform independent review of health care disputes described
in section 8 of this act. The organization shall:

(i)
Assign expert reviewers who are licensed physicians or other licensed health
care providers with substantial current clinical experience dealing with the
same health condition under review;

(ii)
Be advised by a consumer advisory board that is broadly representative of the
patient population whose claims are to be reviewed; and

(iii)
Meet other reasonable requirements of the department directly related to the
functions the organization is to perform under section 8 of this act;

(b)
Designate every two years one or more organizations selected in accordance with
this subsection to perform the functions listed in section 8 of this act; and

(c)
Ensure that the organization is free from interference by state government in
its functioning except to ensure that it complies with the contract it has with
the department and this act.

(2)
The rules adopted under subsection (1)(a) of this section must ensure:

(a)
The confidentiality of medical records transmitted to an independent review
organization for use in independent reviews;

(b)
The qualifications and independence of each health care provider or physician
making review determinations for an independent review organization. Any
health care provider or physician making a review determination in a specific
review must be free of any actual or potential conflict of interest or bias
with respect to the carrier whose decision is being reviewed, any health care
provider or facility who has made a treatment recommendation or determination
prior to the appeal being initiated by the consumer, or the consumer;

(c)
The fairness of the procedures used by an independent review organization in
making the determinations; and

(d)
Timely notice to enrollees of the results of the independent review, including
the clinical basis for the determination.

(3)
The rules adopted under subsection (1)(a) of this section must require that
each independent review organization make its determination:

(a)
Not later than the earlier of:

(i)
The fifteenth day after the date the independent review organization receives
the information necessary to make the determination; or

(ii)
The twentieth day after the date the independent review organization receives
the request that the determination be made; and

(b)
In cases of a condition that could seriously jeopardize the enrollee's health
or ability to regain maximum function, not later than the earlier of:

(i)
Seventy-two hours after the date the independent review organization receives
the information necessary to make the determination; or

(ii)
The eighth day after the date the independent review organization receives the
request that the determination be made.

(4)
The rules adopted under subsection (1)(a) of this section must require that the
independent review organization proceed to a final determination once a request
for determination has been made, unless requested otherwise by both the carrier
and the enrollee, or the enrollee's representative.

(5)
To be certified as an independent review organization under this chapter, an
organization must submit to the department an application in the form required
by the department. The application must include:

(a)
For an applicant that is publicly held, the name of each stockholder or owner
of more than five percent of any stock or options;

(b)
The name of any holder of bonds or notes of the applicant that exceed one
hundred thousand dollars;

(c)
The name and type of business of each corporation or other organization that
the applicant controls or is affiliated with and the nature and extent of the
affiliation or control;

(d)
The name and a biographical sketch of each director, officer, and executive of
the applicant and any entity listed under (c) of this subsection and a description
of any relationship the named individual has with:

(i)
A carrier;

(ii)
A utilization review agent;

(iii)
A nonprofit health corporation;

(iv)
A health care provider; or

(v)
A group representing any of the entities described by (d)(i) through (iv) of
this subsection;

(e)
The percentage of the applicant's revenues that are anticipated to be derived
from reviews conducted under section 8 of this act;

(f)
A description of the areas of expertise of the health care professionals making
review determinations for the applicant; and

(g)
The procedures to be used by the independent review organization in making
review determinations regarding reviews conducted under section 8 of this act.

(6)
The independent review organization shall annually submit the information
required by subsection (5) of this section. If at any time there is a material
change in the information included in the application under subsection (5) of
this section, the independent review organization shall submit updated
information to the department.

(7)
An independent review organization may not be a subsidiary of, or in any way
owned or controlled by, a carrier or a trade or professional association of
carriers.

(8)
An independent review organization, and individuals acting on its behalf, are
immune from suit in a civil action when performing functions under this act.
However, this immunity does not apply to an act or omission made in bad faith
or that involves gross negligence.

(9)
In adopting rules for this section, the department shall take into
consideration standards adopted by national managed care accreditation
organizations and state agencies that purchase managed health care services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11.
CARRIER MEDICAL DIRECTOR. Any carrier that offers a health plan and any
self-insured health plan subject to the jurisdiction of Washington state shall
designate a medical director who is licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW.
However, a naturopathic or complementary alternative medical plan may have a
medical director licensed under chapter 18.36A RCW.

Sec.
12. RCW
51.04.020 and 1994 c 164 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director shall:

(1)
Establish and adopt rules governing the administration of this title;

(2)
Ascertain and establish the amounts to be paid into and out of the accident
fund;

(3)
Regulate the proof of accident and extent thereof, the proof of death and the
proof of relationship and the extent of dependency;

(4)
Supervise the medical, surgical, and hospital treatment to the intent that it
may be in all cases efficient and up to the recognized standard of modern
surgery;

(5)
Issue proper receipts for moneys received and certificates for benefits accrued
or accruing;

(6)
Investigate the cause of all serious injuries and report to the governor from
time to time any violations or laxity in performance of protective statutes or
regulations coming under the observation of the department;

(7)
Compile statistics which will afford reliable information upon which to base
operations of all divisions under the department;

(8)
Make an annual report to the governor of the workings of the department;

(9)
Be empowered to enter into agreements with the appropriate agencies of other
states relating to conflicts of jurisdiction where the contract of employment
is in one state and injuries are received in the other state, and insofar as
permitted by the Constitution and laws of the United States, to enter into
similar agreements with the provinces of Canada; and

(10)
Designate a medical director who is licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW.

Sec.
13. RCW
74.09.050 and 1979 c 141 s 335 are each amended to read as follows:

The
secretary shall appoint such professional personnel and other assistants and
employees, including professional medical screeners, as may be reasonably
necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. The medical screeners
shall be supervised by one or more physicians who shall be appointed by the
secretary or his or her designee. The secretary shall appoint a
medical director who is licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. A
new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

HEALTH
CARE AUTHORITY MEDICAL DIRECTOR. The administrator shall designate a medical
director who is licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15.
CARRIER LIABILITY. (1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout
this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(a)
"Enrollee" means an individual covered by a health plan, including
dependents.

(b)
"Health care provider" means the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

(c)
"Health carrier" means the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005.

(d)
"Health plan" means the same as defined in RCW 48.43.005, except that
it includes a policy, contract, or agreement offered by any person, not just a
health carrier.

(2)(a)
A health carrier shall adhere to the accepted standard of care for health care
providers under chapter 7.70 RCW when arranging for the provision of medically
necessary health care services to its enrollees. A health carrier shall be
liable for any and all harm proximately caused by its failure to follow that
standard of care when the failure resulted in the denial, delay, or
modification of the health care service recommended for, or furnished to, an
enrollee.

(b)
A health carrier is also liable for damages for harm to an enrollee proximately
caused by health care treatment decisions made by its:

(i)
Employees;

(ii)
Independent contractors;

(iii)
Agents; or

(iv)
Ostensible agents who are acting on its behalf and over whom it has the right
to exercise influence or control or has actually exercised influence or control
that result from a failure to follow the accepted standard of care. For
purposes of this section, health care providers and facilities who are included
in and subject to chapter 7.70 RCW, and groups of health care providers formed
primarily for the purpose of providing or arranging for health care services to
individuals shall not be considered independent contractors, agents, or
ostensible agents.

(3)
It is a defense to any action asserted under this section against a health
carrier that:

(a)
The health care service in question is not a benefit provided under the plan;

(b)
Neither the health carrier, nor any employee, independent contractor, agent,
ostensible agent, or representative for whose conduct the health carrier is
liable under subsection (2)(b) of this section, controlled, influenced, or
participated in the health care decision; or

(c)
The health carrier did not deny or delay payment for treatment prescribed or
recommended by a health care provider for the enrollee.

(4)
This section does not create any liability on the part of an employer, an
employer group purchasing organization that purchases coverage or assumes risk
on behalf of its employers, or a governmental agency that purchases coverage on
behalf of individuals and families. The governmental entity established to
offer and provide health insurance to public employees and their covered
dependents under RCW 41.05.140 is subject to liability under this section.

(5)
Nothing in any law of this state prohibiting a health carrier from practicing
medicine or being licensed to practice medicine may be asserted as a defense by
the health carrier in an action brought against it under this section.

(6)(a)
An enrollee or an enrollee's representative may not maintain a cause of action
under this section against a health carrier unless: (i) The affected enrollee
or the enrollee's representative has sought independent review of the health
care treatment decision under section 8 of this act; (ii) the independent
review organization has overturned the carrier's decision to modify,
discontinue, or deny a health service; and (iii) the carrier's decision to
modify, discontinue, or deny a health service caused substantial harm to the
enrollee. As used in this subsection, "substantial harm" means loss
of life, loss or significant impairment of limb or bodily function, significant
disfigurement, severe or chronic pain or disease, or substantial mental
impairment that results in the inability of the enrollee to meet his or her basic
needs.

(b)
This subsection (6) does not prohibit an enrollee from pursuing other
appropriate remedies, including injunctive relief, a declaratory judgment, or
other relief available under law, if its requirements place the enrollee's
health in serious jeopardy.

(7)
In an action against a health carrier, a finding that a health care provider is
an employee, independent contractor, agent, or ostensible agent of such a
health carrier shall not be based solely on proof that the person's name
appears in a listing of approved physicians or health care providers made
available to enrollees under a health plan.

(8)
Any action under this section shall be commenced within three years of the
completion of the independent review process under section 8 of this act.

(9)
This section does not apply to workers' compensation insurance under Title 51
RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16.
DELEGATION OF DUTIES. Each carrier is accountable for and must oversee any
activities required by this act that it delegates to any subcontractor or
independent contractor. No contract with a subcontractor or independent
contractor executed by the health carrier may relieve the health carrier of its
obligations to any enrollee for the provision of health care services or of its
responsibility for compliance with statutes or rules.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17.
APPLICATION. This act applies to: Health plans offered, renewed, or issued by
a carrier; medical assistance provided under RCW 74.09.522; the basic health
plan offered under chapter 70.47 RCW; and public employee health benefits
provided under chapter 41.05 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. A
new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

Each
health plan that provides medical insurance offered to public employees and
their covered dependents under this chapter, including plans created by
insuring entities, plans not subject to the provisions of Title 48 RCW, and
plans created under RCW 41.05.140, are subject to the provisions of sections 1
through 8, 14, and 15 of this act.

Sec.
19. RCW
70.47.130 and 1997 c 337 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The activities and operations of the Washington basic health plan under this
chapter, including those of managed health care systems to the extent of their
participation in the plan, are exempt from the provisions and requirements of
Title 48 RCW except:

(a)
Benefits as provided in RCW 70.47.070;

(b)
Managed health care systems are subject to the provisions of sections 1
through 8, 14, and 15 of this act;

(c)
Persons appointed or authorized to solicit applications for enrollment in the
basic health plan, including employees of the health care authority, must
comply with chapter 48.17 RCW. For purposes of this subsection (1)(((b)))
(c), "solicit" does not include distributing information and
applications for the basic health plan and responding to questions; and

(((c)))
(d) Amounts paid to a managed health care system by the basic health
plan for participating in the basic health plan and providing health care
services for nonsubsidized enrollees in the basic health plan must comply with
RCW 48.14.0201.

(2)
The purpose of the 1994 amendatory language to this section in chapter 309,
Laws of 1994 is to clarify the intent of the legislature that premiums paid on
behalf of nonsubsidized enrollees in the basic health plan are subject to the
premium and prepayment tax. The legislature does not consider this clarifying
language to either raise existing taxes nor to impose a tax that did not exist
previously.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 20. This
act may be known and cited as the health care patient bill of rights.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 21.
Captions used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 22.
Sections 1 through 8, 10, 14, and 15 of this act are each added to chapter
48.43 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 23. To
the extent permitted by law, if any provision of this act conflicts with state
or federal law, such provision must be construed in a manner most favorable to
the enrollee.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 24. If any
provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other
persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 25. EFFECTIVE
DATE. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, this act
applies to contracts renewing after June 30, 2001.

(2)
Sections 10 through 13 of this act take effect January 1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 26. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
48.43.075 (Informing patients about their care--Health carriers
may not preclude or discourage) and 1996 c 312 s 2;

(2) RCW
48.43.095 (Information provided to an enrollee or a prospective
enrollee) and 1996 c 312 s 4; and

(3) RCW
48.43.105 (Preparation of documents that compare health
carriers--Immunity--Due diligence) and 1996 c 312 s 5.

---
END ---