BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
INTENT. It is the intent of the legislature to provide tax
exemptions and credits to reduce straw and stubble burning of cereal grains,
and field and turf grass grown for seed, and to encourage alternatives to straw
and stubble burning. The legislature also intends that the exemptions and
credits apply to existing and new facilities, machinery, and equipment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

SALES
TAX EXEMPTION FOR GROWERS. (1) The tax levied by RCW 82.08.020 does not apply
to sales of machinery and equipment used primarily for removing straw and
stubble, including raking, baling, loading, handling, storing, or transporting
straw from the field to on-farm storage if the following conditions are met:

(a)
In order to qualify for the exemption in this subsection a grower must have
conducted, under a state permit, straw or stubble burning in the previous five
years. The straw and stubble handled by the machinery and equipment, for which
the exemption is taken, must be greater than fifty percent of the total tonnage
handled by the machinery and equipment.

(b)
A grower who conducts straw or stubble burning within five years of taking the
exemption shall be immediately liable for the tax exempted and shall be subject
to penalties and interest under chapter 82.32 RCW.

(c)
A grower taking the exemption under this section must keep records as deemed
necessary by the department to verify eligibility under this section.

(2)
The department of agriculture and the department of ecology shall provide the
department with the information the department deems necessary to administer
this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

USE
TAX EXEMPTION FOR GROWERS. (1) The provisions of this chapter do not apply in
respect to a grower's use of machinery and equipment used primarily for
removing straw and stubble, including raking, baling, loading, handling,
storing, or transporting straw from the field to on-farm storage if the
following conditions are met:

(a)
In order to qualify for the exemption in this subsection a grower must have
conducted, under a state permit, straw or stubble burning in the previous five years.
The straw and stubble handled by the machinery and equipment, for which the
exemption is taken, must be greater than fifty percent of the total tonnage
handled by the machinery and equipment.

(b)
A grower who conducts straw or stubble burning within five years of taking the
exemption shall be immediately liable for the tax exempted and shall be subject
to penalties and interest under chapter 82.32 RCW.

(c)
A grower taking the exemption under this section must keep records as deemed
necessary by the department to verify eligibility under this section.

(2)
The department of agriculture and the department of ecology shall provide the
department with the information the department deems necessary to administer
this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

BUSINESS
AND OCCUPATION TAX CREDIT FOR STRAW-BASED PRODUCT MANUFACTURES. (1) A
manufacturer of straw-based products may take a credit against the tax imposed
by this chapter, subject to the limitations in this section.

(2)(a)
The credit under this section may be taken for tax years 2001 and 2002 if the
total acreage of straw and stubble burned in the state has been reduced by
twenty-five percent from 1998 levels in 2000 as certified by the department of
ecology. By December 15, 2000, the department of ecology shall notify the
department whether the reduction has been achieved. By January 1, 2001, the
department shall notify persons eligible for the credit under this section,
whether the credit is authorized for tax years 2001 and 2002.

(b)
The credit under this section may be taken for tax years 2003 and 2004 if the
total acreage of straw and stubble burned in the state has been reduced by
fifty percent from 1998 levels in 2002 as certified by the department of
ecology. By December 15, 2002, the department of ecology shall notify the
department whether the reduction has been achieved. By January 1, 2003, the
department shall notify persons eligible for the credit under this section,
whether the credit is authorized for tax years 2003 and 2004.

(c)
The credit under this section may be taken for tax years 2005 and 2006 if the
total acreage of wheat stubble burned in the state has been reduced by seventy-five
percent from 1998 levels in 2004 as certified by the department of ecology. By
December 15, 2004, the department of ecology shall notify the department
whether the reduction has been achieved. By January 1, 2005, the department
shall notify persons eligible for the credit under this section, whether the
credit is authorized for tax years 2005 and 2006.

(d)
The credit under this section may be taken for tax years 2007 and 2008 if the
total amount of straw and stubble burned in the state has been reduced by
ninety percent from 1998 levels in 2006 as certified by the department of
ecology. By December 15, 2006, the department of ecology shall notify the
department whether the reduction has been achieved. By January 1, 2007, the
department shall notify persons eligible for the credit under this section,
whether the credit is authorized for tax years 2007 and 2008.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:

DEFINITIONS.
The definitions in this section apply throughout sections 2 through 4 of this
act unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Grower" means any person who is engaged in the business of growing
or producing cereal grains or field and turf grass, upon the person's own lands
or upon the lands in which the person has a present right of possession, for
sale or for use by the person in a manufacturing process.

(2)
"Machinery and equipment" means equipment designed and used for
raking, baling, loading, handling and transporting straw from the field to
on-farm storage, but does not include machinery used for highway purposes.

(3)
"Straw" means the residual of a crop, harvested for its seeds, that
is pulled or cut from the ground after harvest.

(4)
"Stubble" means the residual of a crop, harvested for its seeds, that
remains attached to the ground after harvest.

(5)
"Straw-based product" means a manufactured product containing no less
than fifty percent straw.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
Captions used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 2 through 5 of this act expire December 31, 2008.

---
END ---