BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
No child may be placed or remain in out-of-home care under this chapter or
chapter 13.34 RCW when there is a conflict of interest on the part of any adult
residing in the home in which the child is to be or has been placed. A
conflict of interest exists when:

(a)
There is an adult in the home who, as a result of: (i) His or her employment;
and (ii) an allegation of abuse or neglect of the child, conducts or has
conducted an investigation of the allegation; or

(b)
The child has been, is, or is likely to be a witness in any cause of action
against any adult in the home when the cause includes: (i) An allegation of
abuse or neglect against the child or any sibling of the child; or (ii) a claim
of damages resulting from wrongful interference with the parent-child
relationship of the child and his or her biological or adoptive parent.

(2)
For purposes of this section, "investigation" means the exercise of
professional judgment in the review of allegations of abuse or neglect by: (a)
Law enforcement personnel; (b) persons employed by, or under contract with, the
state; (c) persons licensed to practice law and their employees; and (d) mental
health professionals as defined in chapter 71.05 RCW.

(3)
The prohibition set forth in subsection (1) of this section may not be waived
or deferred by the department under any circumstance or at the request of any
person, regardless of who has made the request or the length of time of the
requested placement.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
When the secretary has reasonable cause to believe that an employee has
violated the conflict of interest provisions in section 1 of this act,
notwithstanding any rule adopted under chapter 41.06 RCW, the secretary shall
immediately suspend the employee.

(2)
The secretary shall immediately institute proceedings to terminate the
employment of any person who is found by the department, based upon a
preponderance of the evidence, to have violated the conflict of interest
provisions in section 1 of this act.

(3)
When the secretary has reasonable cause to believe that the employee of a
contractor has violated the conflict of interest provisions in section 1 of
this act, the secretary shall require the employee of a contractor to be
immediately removed from any employment position which would permit the
employee to make or influence placement decisions.

(4)
The secretary shall disqualify for employment with a contractor in any position
which would permit the employee to make or influence placement decisions, any
person who is found by the department, based upon a preponderance of evidence,
to have violated the conflict of interest provisions of section 1 of this act.

(5)
The secretary, when considering the renewal of a contract with a contractor who
has taken action under subsection (3) or (4) of this section, shall require the
contractor to demonstrate that there has been significant progress made in
reducing the likelihood that the contractor's employees would violate the
conflict of interest provisions in section 1 of this act. The secretary shall
not renew a contract unless he or she determines that significant progress has
been made.

(6) For purposes of RCW 50.20.060, a person terminated under this
section shall be considered discharged for misconduct.

---
END ---