BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 70.02 RCW to read as follows:

Any
institutional review board operating in the state of Washington shall:

(1)
Have more than one nonscientific member on the board. More than one
nonscientific member must participate in any portion of a board meeting where
research plans or protocols are reviewed;

(2)
Have more than one noninstitutional board member. The same person cannot
represent both a nonscientific and a noninstitutional board member. More than
one noninstitutional board member must participate in any portion of a board
meeting where research plans or protocols are reviewed;

(3)
Have scientists comprise at least one-third, but no more than two-thirds of the
board membership; and

(4) Invalidate the vote of any board member with a property or
fiscal interest in the research being reviewed. No board member shall vote on
research in which he or she has a property or fiscal interest.

---
END ---