BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
Domestic violence, harassment, sex offenses, and violent offenses continue to
be pervasive in our society. Victims of violence may be fired from or forced
to quit their employment to take time off to obtain medical care or legal
assistance. It is in the public interest that victims of violence be able to
secure their personal safety, minimize their physical and emotional injuries,
maintain their financial independence, and reduce the sometimes devastating
economic consequences of such violence. For these reasons, it is the intent of
the legislature that victims of violence be entitled to take reasonable leave
to seek medical treatment, prepare for and attend court proceedings, and obtain
other relevant services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a)
An employee who is a victim of violence shall be entitled to leave for one or
more of the following purposes: (i) To receive medical treatment; (ii) to
prepare for and attend court proceedings; or (iii) to obtain services to remedy
a crisis resulting from domestic violence, harassment, a sex offense, or a
violent offense.

(b)
The leave required by this subsection (1) may be unpaid.

(2)(a)
An employee who is a victim of violence shall be entitled to use his or her
accrued personal leave, sick leave, and vacation leave, if any, for the
purposes set forth in subsection (1) of this section.

(b)
An employer shall grant leave under this subsection (2) subject only to the
usual terms and conditions under which personal leave, sick leave, and vacation
leave are granted. These terms and conditions may include, by way of example
and not limitation, payment of wages, continuation of benefits, or authorization.

(3)
Neither subsection (1) nor (2) of this section is violated if the request for
leave is not communicated to the employer within a reasonable time under the
circumstances.

(4)
Leave taken under subsection (1) or (2) of this section may be taken on a
reduced leave schedule subject to the approval of the employer.

Sec.
3. RCW
49.78.005 and 1997 c 16 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the department shall cease
to administer and enforce this chapter beginning on July 27, 1997, and until
the earlier of the following dates:

(a)
The effective date of the repeal of the federal family and medical leave act of
1993 (Act Feb. 5, 1993, P.L. 103-3, 107 Stat. 6); or

(b)
July 1st of the year following the year in which amendments to the federal
family and medical leave act of 1993 (Act Feb. 5, 1993, P.L. 103-3, 107 Stat.
6) take effect that provide less family leave than is provided under RCW
49.78.030. In determining whether the federal law provides the same or more
leave, the department shall only consider whether (i) the total period of leave
allowed under the amended federal law is twelve or more workweeks in a
twenty-four month period, and (ii) the types of leave authorized under the
amended federal law are similar to the types authorized in this chapter.

(2)(a)
An employee's right under RCW 49.78.070(1)(b) to be returned to a workplace
within twenty miles of the employee's workplace when leave commenced shall remain
in effect.

(b)
An employee's rights under section 2 of this act shall remain in effect. For
an employee who exercises any right provided under section 2 of this act, the
employee's rights under RCW 49.78.070 and 49.78.080 shall also remain in effect.

(c)
The family leave required by 29 U.S.C. ((29.2612)) Sec. 2612
(a)(1)(A) and (B) of the federal family and medical leave act of 1993 (Act Feb.
5, 1993, P.L. 103-3, 107 Stat. 6) shall be in addition to any leave for
sickness or temporary disability because of pregnancy or childbirth.

(d)
The department shall enforce this subsection under RCW 49.78.140 through
49.78.190, except that an initial notice of infraction related to an
employee's rights under RCW 49.78.070 shall state that the employer has
thirty days in which to take corrective action. No infraction or penalty may
be assessed if the employer complies with the requirements of the initial
notice of infraction related to an employee's rights under RCW 49.78.070.

Sec.
4. RCW
49.78.020 and 1996 c 178 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Child" means a biological or adopted child, or a stepchild, living
with the employee.

(2)
"Department" means the department of labor and industries.

(3)
"Domestic violence" means domestic violence as defined in RCW
26.50.010.

(4)
"Employee" means a person other than an independent contractor
employed by an employer on a continuous basis for the previous fifty-two weeks
for at least thirty-five hours per week.

(((4)))
(5) "Employer" means: (a) Any person, firm, corporation,
partnership, business trust, legal representative, or other business entity
which engages in any business, industry, profession, or activity in this state
and includes any unit of local government including, but not limited to, a
county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or
political subdivision, which (i) employed a daily average of one hundred or
more employees during the last calendar quarter at the place where the employee
requesting leave reports for work, or (ii) employed a daily average of one
hundred or more employees during the last calendar quarter within a twenty mile
radius of the place where the employee requesting leave reports for work, where
the employer maintains a central hiring location and customarily transfers
employees among workplaces; and (b) the state, state institutions, and state
agencies.

(((5)))
(6) "Family leave" means leave from employment to care for a
newborn or newly adopted child under the age of six or a child under eighteen
years old with a terminal health condition, as provided in RCW 49.78.030.

(((6)))
(7) "Harassment" means harassment as defined in RCW 9A.46.060.

(8)
"Health care provider" means a person licensed as a physician under chapter
18.71 RCW or an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW.

(((7)))
(9) "Parent" means a biological or adoptive parent, or a
stepparent.

(((8)))
(10) "Reduced leave schedule" means leave scheduled for fewer
than an employee's usual number of hours or days per workweek.

(((9)))
(11) "Sex offense" means a sex offense as defined in RCW
9.94A.030.

(12)
"Terminal health condition" means a condition caused by injury,
disease, or illness, that, within reasonable medical judgment, is incurable and
will produce death within the period of leave to which the employee is
entitled.

(13)
"Victim" means a person:

(a)
Who has sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury as a
direct result of violence; and

(b)
Who is: (i) Obtaining or receiving medical treatment; (ii) pursuing legal
protection or remedies; or (iii) seeking certification as a program participant
under RCW 40.24.030.

(14) "Violent offense" means a violent offense as
defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

Sec.
5. RCW
49.78.070 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 11 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to subsection (2) of this section, an employee who exercises any right
provided under RCW 49.78.030 or section 2 of this act shall be entitled,
upon return from leave or during any reduced leave schedule:

(a)
To the same position held by the employee when the leave commenced; or

(b)
To a position with equivalent benefits and pay at a workplace within twenty
miles of the employee's workplace when leave commenced; or

(c)
If the employer's circumstances have so changed that the employee cannot be
reinstated to the same position, or a position of equivalent pay and benefits,
the employee shall be reinstated in any other position which is vacant and for
which the employee is qualified.

(2)
The entitlement under subsection (1) of this section is subject to bona fide
changes in compensation or work duties, and does not apply if:

(a)
The employee's position is eliminated by a bona fide restructuring, or
reduction-in-force;

(b)
The employee's workplace is permanently or temporarily shut down for at least
thirty days;

(c)
The employee's workplace is moved to a location at least sixty miles from the
location of the workplace when leave commenced;

(d)
An employee on family leave takes another job; or

(e)
The employee fails to provide timely notice of family leave as required under
RCW 49.78.040, or fails to return on the established ending date of leave.

Sec.
6. RCW
49.78.080 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 11 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The taking of leave under this chapter shall not result in the loss of any
benefit, including seniority or pension rights, accrued before the date on
which the leave commenced.

(2)
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require the employer to grant
benefits, including seniority or pension rights, during any period of leave.

(3)
All policies applied during the period of leave to the classification of employees
to which the employee on leave belongs shall apply to the employee on leave.

(4) During any period of leave taken under RCW 49.78.030 or
section 2 of this act, if the employee is not eligible for any employer
contribution to medical or dental benefits under an applicable collective
bargaining agreement or employer policy during any period of leave, an employer
shall allow the employee to continue, at his or her own expense, medical or
dental insurance coverage, including any spouse and dependent coverage, in
accordance with state or federal law. The premium to be paid by the employee
shall not exceed one hundred two percent of the applicable premium for the
leave period.

---
END ---