BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
LEGISLATIVE INTENT. Recent efforts to study the contingent work
force in Washington state have focused, in part, on the definitions of terms
used to describe certain employment relationships. These efforts have revealed
that federal and state laws contain distinct and sometimes conflicting
definitions of these terms. Likewise, government agencies and interested
parties often use conflicting definitions of these terms. The legislature
finds that common definitions of these terms would aid these efforts, and
ensure that their results could be more easily compared and contrasted. For
this reason, the legislature intends to adopt common definitions for the sole
purpose of guiding efforts undertaken by the state, its institutions, and its
agencies to study the contingent work force, and framing policy discussions
related to the contingent work force.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this section shall be used solely to guide
efforts undertaken by the state, its institutions, and its agencies to study
the contingent work force, and to frame policy discussions related to the
contingent work force. (1) "Employee" means any individual
who performs services for wages, salary, or other reimbursement under any
contract of hire, written or oral, express or implied, with an employer.

(2)
"Employer" means any person who employs one or more employees.

(3)
"Full-time employee" means any employee who works forty hours per
workweek or the number of hours per workweek that the employer considers to be
full-time, whichever is less.

(4)
"Independent contractor" means any independent contractor as defined
by common law.

(5)
"Part-time employee" means any employee who is not full-time.

(6)
"Permanent employee" means any employee who is hired for an
indefinite period of time.

(7)
"Permatemp" means any permanent employee who performs the same work
as or work comparable to that performed by other permanent employees, but who
the employer classifies as a temporary employee.

(8)
"Temporary agency" means any person regularly undertaking with or
without compensation to procure employees for an employer temporarily or to
procure for employees opportunities to work for an employer.

(9)
"Temporary employee" means any employee who is not permanent.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
Captions used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4.
Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 49 RCW.

---
END ---