BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
13.04.155 and 1997 c 266 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever a minor enrolled in any common school is convicted in adult criminal
court, or adjudicated or entered into a diversion agreement with the juvenile
court on any of the following offenses, the court must notify the principal of
the student's school of the disposition of the case, after first notifying the
parent or legal guardian that such notification will be made:

(a)
A violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;

(b)
A sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;

(c)
Inhaling toxic fumes under chapter 9.47A RCW;

(d)
A controlled substances violation under chapter 69.50 RCW;

(e)
A liquor violation under RCW 66.44.270; and

(f)
Any crime under chapters 9.41, 9A.36, 9A.40, 9A.46, and 9A.48 RCW.

(2)
The principal must provide the information received under subsection (1) of
this section to every teacher of any student who qualifies under subsection (1)
of this section and any other personnel who, in the judgment of the principal,
supervises the student or for security purposes should be aware of the
student's record. The principal must provide the information to teachers and
other personnel based on any written records that the principal maintains or
receives from a juvenile court administrator or a law enforcement agency
regarding the student.

(3) Any information received by a principal or school personnel
under this section is confidential and may not be further disseminated except
as provided in RCW 28A.225.330, other statutes or case law, and the family and
educational and privacy rights act of 1994, 20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g et seq.

---
END ---