BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the federal clean air act amendments of 1990 sought to
accelerate the deployment of low-emission vehicles through the use of
nonmonetary incentives. The federal regulations adopted to implement the clean
air act amendments allow states to exempt federally certified and labeled
low-emission vehicles from high occupancy vehicle restrictions for
single-occupant vehicles. In addition, the federal transportation equity act
of the twenty-first century encourages and permits states to extend the high
occupancy vehicle lane access exemption to nonfleet owners of low-emission vehicles.

The
legislature finds that the goals of the state and federal clean air acts will
be advanced by extending the use of the high occupancy vehicle lanes to
federally certified low-emission vehicles as long as the vehicles are not a
significant cause of congestion in the high occupancy vehicle lanes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 46.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department may issue special low-emission license plates, bearing the
standard background, for passenger vehicles that are federally certified,
pursuant to Title 40, Chapter 1, Part 88, Code of Federal Regulations and
labeled in accordance with that title, as: (a) Inherently low-emission
vehicles; (b) ultra low-emission vehicles; or (c) zero-emission vehicles.

(2)
The department shall issue the special low-emission license plates upon payment
by the applicant of all license fees, but the department may not set or charge
an additional fee for the special low-emission license plates. The department
shall replace, at cost, license plates issued under this section if they are
lost, stolen, damaged, defaced, or destroyed. The low-emission license plates
shall remain with the vehicle for which they were initially issued and may not
be used on another vehicle.

(3)
The department shall revoke the special low-emission designation if the vehicle
is required to have a standard emission test, under chapter 70.120 RCW, and it
fails the test. If the vehicle fails the emission test the vehicle's owner
shall return the special low-emission license plates to the department within
fifteen days and apply for regular license plates.

(4)
The use of a special low-emission license plate on a vehicle that is not
federally certified, or on a certified vehicle that has failed an emission test
more than fifteen days previous, is a traffic infraction.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The state department of transportation and the local authorities, in
consultation with the department of ecology, may permit a vehicle with one or
more occupants to operate in high occupancy vehicle lanes if it is certified as
an inherently low-emission vehicle, ultra low-emission vehicle, or zero-emission
vehicle pursuant to Title 40, Chapter 1, Part 88, Code of Federal Regulations,
is labeled in accordance with that title, and bears a special low-emission
license plate as provided in section 2 of this act.

(2)
Inherently low-emission fleet vehicles that have been certified, labeled, and
issued special low-emission license plates shall be allowed in the high
occupancy vehicle lanes with only one occupant in federally designated
nonattainment air pollution areas. For the purpose of this section "fleet"
means a vehicle owner who is in a nonattainment area and owns a total of at
least ten motor vehicles, including the inherently low-emission vehicle, which
operate in the owner's fleet.

(3)
The department of transportation, in consultation with the department of
ecology, may adopt rules establishing temporal exemptions, such as time-of-day
or day-of-week, which authorize various classes of low-emission vehicles to use
the high occupancy vehicle lanes regardless of the amount of traffic.

(4)
The department of transportation may remove or restore the low-emission vehicle
access to any high occupancy vehicle lane, or portions of those lanes, during
periods of peak congestion, if the department of transportation finds the
vehicles are a significant cause of congestion in the high occupancy vehicle
lanes. In making the decision to allow, remove, or restore a classification of
low-emission vehicles under this section, preference shall be given to the
class of vehicles that have the lowest emissions.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 70.120 RCW to read as follows:

If
a vehicle with special low-emission license plates authorized in section 2 of
this act fails an emission test required under this chapter, the department
shall immediately notify the department of licensing of the failure.

Sec.
5. RCW
81.100.020 and 1990 c 43 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Transit agency" means a city that operates a transit system, a
public transportation benefit area, a county transportation authority, or a metropolitan
municipal corporation.

(2)
The "high occupancy vehicle system" includes high occupancy vehicle
lanes, related high occupancy vehicle facilities, and high occupancy vehicle
programs.

(3)
"High occupancy vehicle lanes" mean lanes reserved for public
transportation vehicles ((only or public transportation vehicles)) and may
include private vehicles carrying no fewer than a specified number of
passengers under RCW 46.61.165 or vehicles with special low-emission license
plates authorized in section 2 of this act.

(4)
"Related facilities" means park and ride lots, park and pool lots,
ramps, bypasses, turnouts, signal preemption, and other improvements designed
to maximize use of the high occupancy vehicle system.

(5)
"High occupancy vehicle program" means advertising the high occupancy
vehicle system, promoting carpool, vanpool, and transit use, providing vanpool
vehicles, and enforcement of driving restrictions governing high occupancy
vehicle lanes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 70.120 RCW to read as follows:

The
departments of ecology, licensing, and transportation may adopt rules as
necessary to implement this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 70.120 RCW to read as follows:

The
department of ecology, in consultation with the department of licensing and the
department of transportation, shall review the relevant data on low-emission
vehicles licensed under section 2 of this act, analyze their effects on
improving air quality in this state, review their impacts on traffic flows in
the high occupancy vehicle lanes, and make recommendations to the legislature
regarding whether the low-emission licensing program should be extended.

The
department shall report its findings under this section to the legislature by
December 15, 2004.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. This
act takes effect January 1, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. This
act expires June 30, 2005.

---
END ---