BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
79.38.050 and 1981 c 204 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of natural resources shall create, maintain, and administer a
revolving fund, to be known as the access road revolving fund in which shall be
deposited all moneys received by it from users of access roads as payment for
costs incurred or to be incurred in maintaining, repairing, and reconstructing
access roads, or public roads used to provide access to public lands or state
forest lands. The department may use moneys in the fund for the purposes for
which they were obtained ((without)) with appropriation by the
legislature.

---
END ---