BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
operation of passenger-only ferries within the state is a matter of public
interest. If the department of transportation discontinues its operations on
passenger-only ferry crossings, or decides not to pursue passenger-only ferry
crossings that have been previously budgeted and approved by the transportation
commission, the public interest requires that persons and entities other than
the department be allowed the opportunity to operate passenger-only ferry
service on those crossings. The lease of passenger-only ferries and facilities
from the department, or provision of money, equipment, or materials, or the
provision of equipment, materials, services, or facilities at below-market
value by a public entity, to allow an entity to operate passenger-only ferry
service is for the benefit of the public to ensure adequate passenger-only
ferry service along passenger-only ferry crossings.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"Commission" means the Washington utilities and transportation
commission.

(2)
"Department" means the Washington department of transportation.

(3)
"Passenger-only ferry" means any vessel operating for the public use
for hire over a regular route between fixed termini, excluding:

(a)
Auto ferries;

(b)
Charter service, as defined in RCW 81.84.005;

(c)
Excursion service, as defined in RCW 81.84.005;

(d)
Common carrier ferries, defined as vessels primarily engaged in transporting
freight other than vehicles, whose gross earnings from the transportation of
passengers are not more than ten percent of the total gross earnings of the
vessel;

(e)
Launch service, defined as the transportation of either passengers, or freight,
or both, to or from a vessel underway, at anchor, or at a dock; and

(f)
All vessels or services described in RCW 81.84.007.

(4)
"Passenger-only ferry operator" includes, but is not limited to, a
nonprofit corporation, public-private partnership, transit agency,
municipality, private entity, person, or any combination of them.

(5)
"Public participation" includes the provision of money, equipment, or
materials, or the provision of equipment, materials, services, or facilities
at below-market value by a public entity.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
All applications to operate passenger-only ferry service upon the waters of
this state, including rivers, lakes, and Puget Sound are subject to the provisions
of this chapter. Any public entities, nonprofit corporation, public‑private
partnership, transit agency, municipality, private entity, person, or any
combination of them, may apply to the commission for a permit to operate
passenger‑only ferry service.

(2)
Applicants who filed an application under chapter 81.84 RCW before February 1,
2000, will have the first option for a passenger-only ferry permit under this
chapter for the ferry crossing applied for in chapter 81.84 RCW.

(3)
The commission may, upon written application, and upon notice and hearing,
grant a passenger-only ferry permit to operate service at a passenger-only
ferry crossing that was discontinued by the department, or at any other ferry
crossing upon the waters of this state, including rivers, lakes, and Puget
Sound. The commission shall act on an application for a passenger-only ferry
permit within ninety days after the conclusion of the hearing. A
passenger-only ferry permit is effective for an initial period of five years.
The commission may revoke or cancel the permit on its own motion if the
passenger-only ferry permit holder has not initiated service within one year
after the commission grants the permit. The commission may renew
passenger-only ferry permits for periods of three years, subject to compliance
with all rules, and provision of adequate service.

(4)(a)
In deciding whether to grant a passenger-only ferry permit the commission shall
consider, at a minimum:

(i)
The applicant's ability to initiate service within one year;

(ii)
The adequacy of service to the community;

(iii)
The effect of the applicant's proposed service on operation of auto ferry
service by the department; and

(iv)
The effect of the applicant's proposed service on transportation congestion
mitigation.

(b)
When determining whether an applicant can initiate service, the commission
shall consider, at a minimum, whether the applicant:

(i)
Has sufficient financial resources, which may include public participation;

(ii)
Has sufficient experience and knowledge of ferry operations;

(iii)
Has made or is making arrangements for parking, docking, vessels, and
coordination of ground transportation; and

(iv)
Has identified or met any local government land use or environmental
requirements.

(c)
When determining whether an applicant will provide adequate service to the
community, the commission shall consider, at a minimum:

(i)
How the proposed service compares to that previously provided by the department
along the crossing, if applicable;

(ii)
Whether the applicant has coordinated its service with ground transportation;
and

(iii)
The number of runs the applicant proposes to operate.

(5)
The commission may grant only one passenger-only ferry permit for operation at
a particular ferry crossing for a given time period.

(6)
The department shall designate an employee with knowledge of ferry operations
as a technical advisor to assist the commission in implementing this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
The department shall immediately notify the commission when it becomes apparent
that the department will discontinue one or more passenger-only ferry crossings
or that it has decided not to pursue one or more passenger-only ferry crossings
that had been previously budgeted and approved by the transportation
commission. The commission shall compile a mailing list of interested persons
that includes, at a minimum: All certificated commercial ferry operators; all
common carrier vessel operators; all affected counties, municipalities, public
transportation benefit areas, metropolitan municipal corporations, and regional
transit authorities; and all other persons who have notified the commission in
writing that they desire to be on the mailing list.

(2)
The commission shall notify all persons on the mailing list that one or more
passenger-only ferry crossing routes are eligible under this chapter for
issuance of a passenger-only ferry permit. The commission shall accept written
petitions from qualified applicants for a period of one hundred twenty days
from the date of the notice unless the commission makes a finding that the
public interest requires a shorter notice period, in which case the minimum
notice period is thirty days from the date of the notice.

(3)
To the extent that the department, before the effective date of this section,
has made the decision to discontinue one or more passenger-only ferry crossings
or has decided not to pursue one or more passenger-only ferry crossings that
had been previously budgeted and approved by the transportation commission, the
commission shall compile the mailing list and make notification to interested
persons as soon as practicable after that date.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
commission, in issuing a permit to a passenger-only ferry operator, shall
require that liability and property damage insurance be acquired and maintained
on each vessel or ferry to be used to provide service, in the amount of not
less than one hundred thousand dollars for any recovery for personal injury by
one person, and not less than one million dollars and in an additional amount
that the commission determines, for all persons receiving personal injury and
property damage by reason of one act of negligence, and not less than fifty
thousand dollars for damage to property of any person other than the insured;
or combined bodily injury and property damage liability insurance of not less
than one million dollars. Proof of liability or property damage insurance or
surety bond required by this section must be filed with the commission and kept
in full force and effect, and failure to do so is cause for cancellation of the
operator's permit.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
passenger-only ferry permit holder may lease passenger-only ferries and
facilities from the department as long as the lease of the ferries or
facilities does not conflict with the operation of the Washington state ferry
system.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. No
passenger-only ferry permit granted under this chapter may be sold, assigned,
leased, mortgaged, or in any manner transferred, either by the act of the
permit holder, or by operation of law, without first obtaining the commission's
approval.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. For
the purposes of this section only, passenger-only ferry operators are
considered to be commercial ferries as defined in chapter 81.84 RCW and shall
comply with RCW 81.24.030 requiring annual report filing and payment of
regulatory fees and RCW 81.84.040 requiring the payment of application filing
fees.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. The
commission may adopt rules for operation of passenger-only ferry service, to
include rules concerning the process for issuing a passenger-only ferry permit,
determining adequacy of service, and establishing fares. The degree and level
of regulation may vary with the degree and level of public participation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. If
the department decides to resume service on a passenger-only ferry crossing,
the commission shall not renew any existing passenger-only ferry permit for
that crossing previously granted by it. During the remainder of the term of
the permit, the Washington state ferry system shall not extend similar or
competing passenger-only ferry services along that crossing, except upon a
proper showing that the passenger-only ferry operator is not providing adequate
service. Nothing in this section precludes the Washington state ferry system
from entering into an agreement with the passenger-only ferry permit holder, or
purchasing or condemning the permit authority or equipment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. The commission,
upon complaint by an interested party, or on its own motion after notice and
opportunity for hearing, may cancel, revoke, suspend, alter, or amend a permit
issued under this chapter on any of the following grounds:

(1)
Failure of the permit holder to initiate the proposed service within one year
after the permit has been granted;

(2)
Violation of any provision of this chapter;

(3)
Violation of or failure to observe the provisions or conditions of the permit
or tariff;

(4)
Violation of an order, decision, rule, regulation, or requirement established
by the commission under this chapter;

(5)
Failure of a permit holder to maintain the required insurance coverage in full
force and effect; or

(6)
Failure or refusal to furnish reasonable and adequate service after initiating
service.

The
commission shall take appropriate action within thirty days upon a complaint by
an interested party or of its own finding that this section has been violated.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. All
applicable provisions of this title relating to procedure, powers of the
commission, and penalties apply to the operation and regulation of
passenger-only ferry operators under this chapter, except as those provisions
may conflict with this chapter and rules adopted under it by the commission.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. If
any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance
is held invalid, the remainder of the chapter or application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

Sec.
14. RCW
81.84.010 and 1993 c 427 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except for certificates to provide commercial ferry service issued before
February 1, 2000, all applications for passenger-only ferry service must be
filed under section 3 of this act. Except for ferries granted permits under
that section, no commercial ferry may hereafter operate any vessel or ferry
for the public use for hire between fixed termini or over a regular route upon
the waters within this state, including the rivers and lakes and Puget Sound,
without first applying for and obtaining from the commission a certificate
declaring that public convenience and necessity require such operation.
Service authorized by certificates issued before or after July 25, 1993, to a
commercial ferry operator shall be exercised by the operator in a manner
consistent with the conditions established in the certificate or tariffs:
PROVIDED, That no certificate shall be required for a vessel primarily engaged
in transporting freight other than vehicles, whose gross earnings from the
transportation of passengers and/or vehicles, are not more than ten percent of
the total gross annual earnings of such vessel((: PROVIDED, That)).

(2)
Nothing ((herein shall be construed to)) in this chapter
affects the right of any county public transportation authority,
public transportation benefit area authority, or other public agency
within this state to construct, condemn, purchase, operate, or maintain, itself
or by contract, agreement, or lease, with any person, firm, or corporation,
ferries or boats across or wharfs at or upon the waters within this state, including
rivers and lakes and Puget Sound, provided such operation is not over the same
route or between the same districts, being served by a certificate holder
without first acquiring the rights granted to the certificate holder under the
certificate((, nor shall this chapter be construed to affect, amend, or
invalidate any contract entered into prior to January 15, 1927, for the
operation of ferries or boats upon the waters within this state, which was
entered into in good faith by any county with any person, firm, or corporation,
except that in case of the operation or maintenance by any county, city, town,
port district, or other political subdivision by contract, agreement, or lease
with any person, firm, or corporation, of ferries or boats across or wharfs at
or upon the waters within this state, including rivers and lakes and Puget
Sound, the commission shall have power and authority to regulate rates and
services of such operation or maintenance of ferries, boats, or wharfs, to
make, fix, alter, or amend said rates, and to regulate service and safety of
operations thereof, in the manner and to the same extent as it is empowered to
regulate a commercial ferry, notwithstanding the provisions of any act or parts
of acts inconsistent herewith)).

(((2)))
(3) The holder of a certificate of public convenience and necessity
granted under this chapter must initiate service within five years of obtaining
the certificate. The certificate holder shall report to the commission every
six months after the certificate is granted on the progress of the certificated
route. The reports shall include, but not be limited to, the progress of
environmental impact, parking, local government land use, docking, and
financing considerations. However, if service has not been initiated within
five years of obtaining the certificate, the commission may extend the
certificate on a twelve-month basis for up to three years if the six-month
progress reports indicate there is significant advancement toward initiating
service.

(((3)
The commission shall review certificates in existence as of July 25, 1993,
where service is not being provided on all or any portion of the route or
routes certificated. Based on progress reports required under subsection (2)
of this section, the commission may grant an extension beyond that provided in
subsection (2) of this section. Such additional extension may not exceed a
total of two years.))

Sec.
15. RCW
81.84.060 and 1993 c 427 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The
commission, upon complaint by an interested party, or upon its own motion after
notice and opportunity for hearing, may cancel, revoke, suspend, alter, or
amend a certificate issued under this chapter on any of the following grounds:

(1)
Failure of the certificate holder to initiate service by the conclusion of the
fifth year after the certificate has been granted or by the conclusion of an
extension granted under RCW 81.84.010 (((2) or (3))), if the commission
has considered the progress report information required under RCW 81.84.010 (((2)
or (3)));

(2)
Failure of the certificate holder to file an annual report;

(3)
The filing by a certificate holder of an annual report that shows no revenue in
the previous twelve-month period after service has been initiated;

(4)
The violation of any provision of this chapter;

(5)
The violation of or failure to observe the provisions or conditions of the
certificate or tariffs;

(6)
The violation of an order, decision, rule, regulation, or requirement established
by the commission under this chapter;

(7)
Failure of a certificate holder to maintain the required insurance coverage in
full force and effect; or

(8)
Failure or refusal to furnish reasonable and adequate service after initiating
service.

The
commission shall take appropriate action within thirty days upon a complaint by
an interested party or of its own finding that a provision of this section has
been violated.

Sec.
16. RCW
47.60.120 and 1993 c 427 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If the department acquires or constructs, maintains, and operates any ferry
crossings upon or toll bridges over Puget Sound or any of its tributary or
connecting waters, there shall not be constructed, operated, or maintained any
other ferry crossing upon or bridge over any such waters within ten miles of
any such crossing or bridge operated or maintained by the department excepting
such bridges or ferry crossings in existence, and being operated and maintained
under a lawfully issued franchise at the time of the location of the ferry
crossing or construction of the toll bridge by the department.

(2)
The ten-mile distance in subsection (1) of this section means ten statute miles
measured by airline distance. The ten-mile restriction shall be applied by
comparing the two end points (termini) of a state ferry crossing to those of a
private ferry crossing.

(3)
The Washington utilities and transportation commission may, upon written
petition of a commercial ferry operator certificated or applying for
certification under chapter 81.84 RCW, or upon written petition from a
passenger-only ferry operator as provided for under section 3 of this act,
and upon notice and hearing, grant a waiver from the ten-mile restriction. The
waiver must not be detrimental to the public interest. In making a decision to
waive the ten-mile restriction, the commission shall consider, but is not
limited to, the impact of the waiver on transportation congestion mitigation,
air quality improvement, and the overall impact on the Washington state ferry
system. The commission shall act upon a request for a waiver within ninety
days after the conclusion of the hearing. A waiver is effective for a period
of five years from the date of issuance. At the end of five years the waiver
becomes permanent unless appealed within thirty days by the commission on its
own motion, the department, or an interested party.

(4)
The department shall not maintain and operate any ferry crossing or toll bridge
over Puget Sound or any of its tributary or connecting waters that would
infringe upon any franchise lawfully issued by the state and in existence and
being exercised at the time of the location of the ferry crossing or toll
bridge by the department, without first acquiring the rights granted to such
franchise holder under the franchise.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17. A
new section is added to chapter 81.104 RCW to read as follows:

High-capacity
transportation systems may operate passenger-only ferry service. This includes
responsibility for system implementation. Contracts and agreements to operate
passenger-only ferry service may include public-private partnerships,
design-build, turnkey, and super turnkey purchasing methods authorized under
federal law applicable to joint development projects, such as P.L. 105-178 and
62 Fed. Reg. 12266.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. A
new section is added to chapter 81.104 RCW to read as follows:

RCW
81.104.100 and 81.104.110 do not apply to an assumption of a high-capacity
responsibility, route, or plan element by one agency from another, such as the
assumption by a local transit agency of the responsibility, route, or plan
element of a state transportation agency if the assuming agency undertakes all
the obligations of the planning process and the assumption is approved by the
appropriate regional planning process.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19. (1)
The joint task force on ferries is created, to be composed of:

(a)
Eight members of the legislature selected as follows:

(i)
Four members of the senate, two from each of the major caucuses, to be
appointed by the chair of the senate transportation committee;

(ii)
Four members of the house of representatives, two from each of the major
caucuses, to be appointed by the cochairs of the house of representatives
transportation committee; and

(b)
At least one person designated by the cochairs representing each of the
following:

(i)
Ferry advisory committees;

(ii)
Persons who do not use ferries;

(iii)
Labor organizations representing ferry workers;

(iv)
Washington State Ferries;

(v)
Transit operators;

(vi)
The office of financial management; and

(vii)
Other groups as deemed appropriate by the cochairs of the task force.

(2)
The transportation committees shall provide staff support as mutually agreed by
the cochairs of the joint select committee. The chair of the senate
transportation committee and the cochairs of the house of representatives
transportation committee shall designate the cochairs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 20. The
joint task force on ferries shall meet during the interim and report back to
the transportation committees of the senate and house of representatives by
December 15, 2000. The task force is charged with development of an orderly
process to examine all possible solutions that are presented to the task force,
including, but not limited to, continued operation of passenger-only ferry
service by Washington State Ferries, state and local partnerships, local
partnerships, government and nonprofit partnerships, and private operations.
The task force shall consider public options first, nonprofit options second,
and private operations third.

The
report to the senate and house of representatives transportation committees
must include, but is not limited to, analysis and recommendations on the
following:

(1)
Continued operation of all current passenger-only ferry routes and levels of
service by Washington State Ferries;

(2)
Continued operation of selected passenger-only ferry routes or reduced levels
of service on selected routes;

(3)
Operation of selected routes by any public entity or combination of public
entities;

(4)
Operation of selected routes by any nonprofit entity or combination of
nonprofit entities;

(5)
Operation of selected routes by any private entity or combination of private
entities;

(6)
Ferry fare equity between ferry routes of different lengths;

(7)
Establishment of a target for recovery of operating costs from fare revenue
when operations include participation by a public entity; and

(8)
In consultation with Washington State Ferries, the feasibility of transferring
an auto ferry to cover a route between Vashon/Southworth and downtown Seattle
if passenger-only service is discontinued.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 21.
Sections 1 through 13 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 81 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 22.
Sections 19 and 20 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of
the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, and take effect immediately.

---
END ---