BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.70.480 and 1992 c 98 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of health shall adopt guidelines and protocols for how emergency
medical personnel shall respond when summoned to the site of an injury or
illness for the treatment of a person who has signed a written directive or
durable power of attorney requesting that he or she not receive futile
emergency medical treatment.

The guidelines shall include development of a simple form that
shall be used state-wide.

---
END ---