BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Cardiopulmonary resuscitation" means measures to restore cardiac
function or to support ventilation in the event of cardiac or respiratory
arrest. Cardiopulmonary resuscitation shall not include measures to improve
ventilation and cardiac functions in the absence of an arrest.

(2)
"Do-not-resuscitate" means a decision to not attempt cardiopulmonary
resuscitation in the event a patient suffers cardiac or respiratory arrest.

(3)
"Legal representative" means a person authorized under RCW 7.70.065
to provide informed consent to health care for a patient who is incompetent, as
defined in RCW 11.88.010(1)(e).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
Consent to cardiopulmonary resuscitation or to do-not-resuscitate may be
provided by the patient or legal representative when a licensed physician has
determined and documented at least one of the following factors:

(a)
A high medical probability, based on the patient's current medical condition,
that the patient's heart will stop or breathing will stop, or both will stop;

(b)
Cardiopulmonary resuscitation treatment would be medically futile;

(c)
The patient has a terminal condition as defined in RCW 70.122.020;

(d)
The patient has a permanent unconscious condition, as defined in RCW
70.122.020; or

(e)
Resuscitation would impose an extraordinary burden on the patient given the
patient's current medical condition and the expected outcome of resuscitation
for the patient.

(2)
A consent to cardiopulmonary resuscitation or do-not-resuscitate expressed
according to this chapter must be honored. This chapter must not be
interpreted to limit the ability of an adult person to execute a directive
under chapter 70.122 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3.
Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 70 RCW.

---
END ---