BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.02.130 and 1991 c 335 s 601 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person authorized to consent to health care for another may exercise the
rights of that person under this chapter to the extent necessary to effectuate
the terms or purposes of the grant of authority. If the patient is a minor and
is authorized to consent to health care without parental consent under federal
and state law, only the minor may exercise the rights of a patient under this
chapter as to information pertaining to health care to which the minor lawfully
consented. In cases where parental consent is required, a health care provider
may rely, without incurring any civil or criminal liability for such reliance,
on the representation of a parent that he or she is authorized to consent to
health care for the minor patient regardless of whether:

(a)
The parents are married, unmarried, or separated at the time of the
representation;

(b)
The consenting parent is, or is not, a custodial parent of the minor;

(c)
The giving of consent by a parent is, or is not, full performance of any
agreement between the parents, or of any order or decree in any action entered
pursuant to chapter 26.09 RCW.

(2) A person authorized to act for a patient shall act in good
faith to represent the best interests of the patient. It is a misdemeanor
offense punishable under RCW 9.92.030 for a person authorized to act for a
patient under the age of eighteen to knowingly and willingly deny authorization
of medical care to the minor, which causes the death of the minor.

---
END ---