BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
13.34.030 and 1999 c 267 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

For
purposes of this chapter:

(1)
"Abandoned" means when the child's parent, guardian, or other
custodian has expressed, either by statement or conduct, an intent to forego,
for an extended period, parental rights or responsibilities despite an ability
to exercise such rights and responsibilities. If the court finds that the
petitioner has exercised due diligence in attempting to locate the parent, no
contact between the child and the child's parent, guardian, or other custodian
for a period of three months creates a rebuttable presumption of abandonment,
even if there is no expressed intent to abandon.

(2)
"Child" and "juvenile" means any individual under the age
of eighteen years.

(((2)))
(3) "Current placement episode" means the period of time that
begins with the most recent date that the child was removed from the home of
the parent, guardian, or legal custodian for purposes of placement in
out-of-home care and continues until: (a) The child returns home((,))
; (b) an adoption decree, a permanent custody order, or guardianship
order is entered((,)); or (c) the dependency is dismissed,
whichever occurs ((soonest)) first. ((If the most recent date
of removal occurred prior to the filing of a dependency petition under this
chapter or after filing but prior to entry of a disposition order, such time
periods shall be included when calculating the length of a child's current
placement episode.

(3))) (4)
"Dependency guardian" means the person, nonprofit corporation, or
Indian tribe appointed by the court pursuant to ((RCW 13.34.232)) this
chapter for the limited purpose of assisting the court in the supervision
of the dependency.

(((4)))
(5) "Dependent child" means any child who:

(a)
((Who)) Has been abandoned; ((that is, where the child's
parent, guardian, or other custodian has expressed either by statement or
conduct, an intent to forego, for an extended period, parental rights or
parental responsibilities despite an ability to do so. If the court finds that
the petitioner has exercised due diligence in attempting to locate the parent,
no contact between the child and the child's parent, guardian, or other
custodian for a period of three months creates a rebuttable presumption of abandonment,
even if there is no expressed intent to abandon;))

(b)
((Who)) Is abused or neglected as defined in chapter 26.44 RCW by
a person legally responsible for the care of the child; or

(c)
((Who)) Has no parent, guardian, or custodian capable of adequately
caring for the child, such that the child is in circumstances which constitute
a danger of substantial damage to the child's psychological or physical
development.

(((5)))
(6) "Developmental disability" means a disability attributable to
mental retardation, cerebral palsy, epilepsy, autism, or another neurological
or other condition of an individual found by the secretary to be closely
related to mental retardation or to require treatment similar to that required
for individuals with mental retardation, which disability originates before the
individual attains age eighteen, which has continued or can be expected to
continue indefinitely, and which constitutes a substantial handicap to the
individual.

(7)
"Guardian" means the person or agency that: (a) Has been appointed
as the guardian of a child in a legal proceeding other than a proceeding under
this chapter; and (b) has the legal right to custody of the child pursuant to
such appointment. The term "guardian" shall not include a
"dependency guardian" appointed pursuant to a proceeding under this
chapter.

(((6)))
(8) "Guardian ad litem" means a person, appointed by the court
to represent the best interests of a child in a proceeding under this
chapter, or in any matter which may be consolidated with a proceeding under
this chapter. A "court-appointed special advocate" appointed by the
court to be the guardian ad litem for the child, or to perform substantially
the same duties and functions as a guardian ad litem, shall be deemed to be
guardian ad litem for all purposes and uses of this chapter.

(((7)))
(9) "Guardian ad litem program" means a court-authorized
volunteer program, which is or may be established by the superior court of the
county in which such proceeding is filed, to manage all aspects of volunteer
guardian ad litem representation for children alleged or found to be
dependent. Such management shall include but is not limited to: Recruitment,
screening, training, supervision, assignment, and discharge of volunteers.

(((8)))
(10) "Indigent" means a person who, at any stage of a court
proceeding, is:

(a)
Receiving one of the following types of public assistance: Temporary
assistance for needy families, general assistance, poverty-related veterans'
benefits, food stamps or food stamp benefits transferred electronically,
refugee resettlement benefits, medicaid, or supplemental security income; or

(b)
Involuntarily committed to a public mental health facility; or

(c)
Receiving an annual income, after taxes, of one hundred twenty-five percent or
less of the federally established poverty level; or

(d)
Unable to pay the anticipated cost of counsel for the matter before the court
because his or her available funds are insufficient to pay any amount for the
retention of counsel.

(11)
"Out-of-home care" means placement in a foster family home or group
care facility licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW or placement in a home,
other than that of the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian, not
required to be licensed pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW.

(((9)))
(12) "Preventive services" means preservation services, as
defined in chapter 74.14C RCW, and other reasonably available services,
including housing services, capable of preventing the need for out-of-home
placement while protecting the child. Housing services may include, but are
not limited to, referrals to federal, state, local, or private agencies or
organizations, assistance with forms and applications, or financial subsidies
for housing.

(13)
"Shelter care" means temporary physical care in a facility licensed
pursuant to RCW 74.15.030 or in a home not required to be licensed pursuant to
RCW 74.15.030.

(14)
"Social study" means a written evaluation of matters relevant to the
disposition of the case and shall contain the following information:

(a)
A statement of the specific harm or harms to the child that intervention is
designed to alleviate;

(b)
A description of the specific services and activities, for both the parents and
child, that are needed in order to prevent serious harm to the child; the
reasons why such services and activities are likely to be useful; the
availability of any proposed services; and the agency's overall plan for
ensuring that the services will be delivered. The description shall identify
the services chosen and approved by the parent;

(c)
If removal is recommended, a full description of the reasons why the child
cannot be protected adequately in the home, including a description of any
previous efforts to work with the parents and the child in the home; the
in-home treatment programs that have been considered and rejected; the
preventive services that have been offered or provided and have failed to
prevent the need for out-of-home placement, unless the health, safety, and
welfare of the child cannot be protected adequately in the home; and the
parents' attitude toward placement of the child;

(d)
A statement of the likely harms the child will suffer as a result of removal;

(e)
A description of the steps that will be taken to minimize the harm to the child
that may result if separation occurs; and

(f)
Behavior that will be expected before determination that supervision of the
family or placement is no longer necessary.

Sec.
2. RCW
13.34.040 and 1977 ex.s. c 291 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any person may file with the clerk of the superior court a petition showing
that there is within the county, or residing within the county, a dependent
child and ((praying)) requesting that the superior court deal
with such child as provided in this chapter((: PROVIDED, That)).
There shall be no fee for filing such petitions.

(2)
In counties having paid probation officers, ((such)) these
officers shall, ((as far as)) to the extent possible, first
determine if ((such)) a petition is reasonably justifiable. ((Such))
Each petition shall be verified and ((shall)) contain a statement
of facts constituting ((such)) a dependency, ((as defined in
this chapter,)) and the names and residence, if known to the petitioner, of
the parents, guardian, or custodian of ((such)) the alleged
dependent child. ((There shall be no fee for filing such petitions.))

Sec.
3. RCW
13.34.050 and 1998 c 328 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The court may enter an order directing a law enforcement officer, probation
counselor, or child protective services official to take a child into custody
if: (a) A petition is filed with the juvenile court alleging that the child is
dependent and that the child's health, safety, and welfare will be seriously
endangered if not taken into custody; (b) an affidavit or declaration is filed
by the department in support of the petition setting forth specific factual
information evidencing reasonable grounds that the child's health, safety, and
welfare will be seriously endangered if not taken into custody and at least one
of the grounds set forth demonstrates a risk of imminent harm to the child.
"Imminent harm" for purposes of this section shall include, but not
be limited to, circumstances of sexual abuse, or sexual exploitation as defined
in RCW 26.44.020; and (c) the court finds reasonable grounds to believe the
child is dependent and that the child's health, safety, and welfare will be
seriously endangered if not taken into custody.

(2)
Any petition that does not have the necessary affidavit or declaration demonstrating
a risk of imminent harm requires that the parents are provided notice
and an opportunity to be heard ((by the parents)) before the order
may be entered.

(3) The petition and supporting documentation must be served on the
parent, and ((the entity with whom)) if the child is in
custody at the time the child is removed, on the entity with custody other
than the parent. Failure to effect service does not invalidate the
petition if service was attempted and the parent could not be found.

Sec.
4. RCW
13.34.060 and 1999 c 17 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A child taken into custody pursuant to RCW 13.34.050 or 26.44.050 shall be
immediately placed in shelter care. A child taken by a relative of the child
in violation of RCW 9A.40.060 or 9A.40.070 shall be placed in shelter care only
when permitted under RCW 13.34.055. (("Shelter care" means
temporary physical care in a facility licensed pursuant to RCW 74.15.030 or in
a home not required to be licensed pursuant to that section.))

(a)
Unless there is reasonable cause to believe that the health, safety,
or welfare of the child would be jeopardized or that the efforts to reunite the
parent and child will be hindered, priority placement for a child in shelter
care shall be with any person described in RCW 74.15.020(2)(a). The person
must be willing and available to care for the child and be able to meet any
special needs of the child. If a child is not initially placed with a relative
pursuant to this section, the supervising agency shall make an effort within
available resources to place the child with a relative on the next business day
after the child is taken into custody. The supervising agency shall
document its effort to place the child with a relative pursuant to this
section. Nothing within this subsection (1)(a) establishes an entitlement to
services or a right to a particular placement.

(b)
Whenever a child is taken into ((such)) custody pursuant to this
section, the supervising agency may authorize evaluations of the child's
physical or emotional condition, routine medical and dental examination and
care, and all necessary emergency care. In no case may a child who is taken
into custody pursuant to RCW 13.34.055, 13.34.050, or 26.44.050 be detained in
a secure detention facility. No child may be held longer than seventy-two
hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and holidays, after such child is taken
into custody unless a court order has been entered for continued shelter care.
The child and his or her parent, guardian, or custodian shall be informed that
they have a right to a shelter care hearing. The court shall hold a shelter
care hearing within seventy-two hours after the child is taken into custody,
excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. If a parent, guardian, or legal
custodian desires to waive the shelter care hearing, the court shall determine,
on the record and with the parties present, ((that)) whether such
waiver is knowing and voluntary.

(2)
Whenever a child is taken into custody by child protective services pursuant to
a court order issued under RCW 13.34.050 or when child protective services is
notified that a child has been taken into custody pursuant to RCW 26.44.050 or
26.44.056, child protective services shall make reasonable efforts to inform
the parents, guardian, or legal custodian of the fact that the child has been
taken into custody, the reasons why the child was taken into custody, and their
legal rights under this title as soon as possible and in no event ((longer))
shall notice be provided more than twenty-four hours after the child has
been taken into custody or twenty-four hours after child protective services
has been notified that the child has been taken into custody. The notice of
custody and rights may be given by any means reasonably certain of notifying
the parents including, but not limited to, written, telephone, or in person
oral notification. If the initial notification is provided by a means other
than writing, child protective services shall make reasonable efforts to also
provide written notification.

((The
written notice of custody and rights shall be in substantially the following
form:

"NOTICE

Your
child has been placed in temporary custody under the supervision of Child
Protective Services (or other person or agency). You have important legal
rights and you must take steps to protect your interests.

1.
A court hearing will be held before a judge within 72 hours of the time your
child is taken into custody. You should call the court at (insert
appropriate phone number here)
for specific information about the date, time, and location of the court
hearing.

2.
You have the right to have a lawyer represent you at the hearing. You have the
right to records the department intends to rely upon. A lawyer can look at the
files in your case, talk to child protective services and other agencies, tell
you about the law, help you understand your rights, and help you at hearings.
If you cannot afford a lawyer, the court will appoint one to represent you. To
get a court-appointed lawyer you must contact: (explain
local procedure) .

3.
At the hearing, you have the right to speak on your own behalf, to introduce
evidence, to examine witnesses, and to receive a decision based solely on the
evidence presented to the judge.

4.
If your hearing occurs before a court commissioner, you have the right to have
the decision of the court commissioner reviewed by a superior court judge. To
obtain that review, you must, within ten days after the entry of the decision
of the court commissioner, file with the court a motion for revision of the
decision, as provided in RCW 2.24.050.

You
should be present at this hearing. If you do not come, the judge will not hear
what you have to say.

You
may call the Child Protective Services' caseworker for more information about
your child. The caseworker's name and telephone number are: (insert
name and telephone number) ."

Upon
receipt of the written notice, the parent, guardian, or legal custodian shall
acknowledge such notice by signing a receipt prepared by child protective
services. If the parent, guardian, or legal custodian does not sign the
receipt, the reason for lack of a signature shall be written on the receipt.
The receipt shall be made a part of the court's file in the dependency action.

If
after making reasonable efforts to provide notification, child protective
services is unable to determine the whereabouts of the parents, guardian, or
legal custodian, the notice shall be delivered or sent to the last known
address of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian.

(3)
If child protective services is not required to give notice under subsection
(2) of this section, the juvenile court counselor assigned to the matter shall
make all reasonable efforts to advise the parents, guardian, or legal custodian
of the time and place of any shelter care hearing, request that they be
present, and inform them of their basic rights as provided in RCW 13.34.090.

(4)
Reasonable efforts to advise and to give notice, as required in subsections (2)
and (3) of this section, shall include, at a minimum, investigation of the
whereabouts of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian. If such reasonable
efforts are not successful, or the parent, guardian, or legal custodian does
not appear at the shelter care hearing, the juvenile court counselor or
caseworker shall testify at the hearing or state in a declaration:

(a)
The efforts made to investigate the whereabouts of, and to advise, the parent,
guardian, or legal custodian; and

(b)
Whether actual advice of rights was made, to whom it was made, and how it was
made, including the substance of any oral communication or copies of written
materials used.

(5)
At the commencement of the shelter care hearing the court shall advise the
parties of their basic rights as provided in RCW 13.34.090 and shall appoint
counsel pursuant to RCW 13.34.090 if counsel has not been retained by the
parent or guardian and if the parent or guardian is indigent, unless the court
finds that the right to counsel has been expressly and voluntarily waived in
court.

(6)
The court shall hear evidence regarding notice given to, and efforts to notify,
the parent, guardian, or legal custodian and shall examine the need for shelter
care. The court shall hear evidence regarding the efforts made to place the
child with a relative. The court shall make an express finding as to whether
the notice required under subsections (2) and (3) of this section was given to
the parent, guardian, or legal custodian. All parties have the right to
present testimony to the court regarding the need or lack of need for shelter
care. Hearsay evidence before the court regarding the need or lack of need for
shelter care must be supported by sworn testimony, affidavit, or declaration of
the person offering such evidence.

(7)
The juvenile court probation counselor shall submit a recommendation to the
court as to the further need for shelter care, except that such recommendation
shall be submitted by the department of social and health services in cases
where the petition alleging dependency has been filed by the department of
social and health services, unless otherwise ordered by the court.

(8)
The court shall release a child alleged to be dependent to the care, custody,
and control of the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian unless the
court finds there is reasonable cause to believe that:

(a)
After consideration of the specific services that have been provided,
reasonable efforts have been made to prevent or eliminate the need for removal
of the child from the child's home and to make it possible for the child to
return home; and

(b)(i)
The child has no parent, guardian, or legal custodian to provide supervision
and care for such child; or

(ii)
The release of such child would present a serious threat of substantial harm to
such child; or

(iii)
The parent, guardian, or custodian to whom the child could be released is
alleged to have violated RCW 9A.40.060 or 9A.40.070.

If
the court does not release the child to his or her parent, guardian, or legal
custodian, and the child was initially placed with a relative pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section, the court shall order continued placement with
a relative, unless there is reasonable cause to believe the safety or welfare
of the child would be jeopardized. If the child was not initially placed with
a relative, and the court does not release the child to his or her parent,
guardian, or legal custodian, the supervising agency shall make reasonable
efforts to locate a relative pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. If a
relative is not available, the court shall order continued shelter care or
order placement with another suitable person, and the court shall set forth its
reasons for the order. The court shall enter a finding as to whether
subsections (2) and (3) of this section have been complied with. If actual
notice was not given to the parent, guardian, or legal custodian and the
whereabouts of such person is known or can be ascertained, the court shall
order the supervising agency or the department of social and health services to
make reasonable efforts to advise the parent, guardian, or legal custodian of
the status of the case, including the date and time of any subsequent hearings,
and their rights under RCW 13.34.090.

(9)
An order releasing the child on any conditions specified in this section may at
any time be amended, with notice and hearing thereon, so as to return the child
to shelter care for failure of the parties to conform to the conditions
originally imposed.

The
court shall consider whether nonconformance with any conditions resulted from
circumstances beyond the control of the parent and give weight to that fact
before ordering return of the child to shelter care.

(10)
A shelter care order issued pursuant to this section may be amended at any time
with notice and hearing thereon. The shelter care decision of placement shall
be modified only upon a showing of change in circumstances. No child may be
detained for longer than thirty days without an order, signed by the judge,
authorizing continued shelter care.

(11)
Any parent, guardian, or legal custodian who for good cause is unable to attend
the initial shelter care hearing may request that a subsequent shelter care
hearing be scheduled. The request shall be made to the clerk of the court
where the petition is filed prior to the initial shelter care hearing. The
hearing shall be held within seventy-two hours of the request, excluding
Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. The clerk shall notify all other parties of
the hearing by any reasonable means.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The written notice of custody and rights required by RCW 13.34.060 shall be in
substantially the following form:

"NOTICE

Your
child has been placed in temporary custody under the supervision of Child
Protective Services (or other person or agency). You have important legal
rights and you must take steps to protect your interests.

1.
A court hearing will be held before a judge within 72 hours of the time your
child is taken into custody excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays. You
should call the court at (insert
appropriate phone number here) for
specific information about the date, time, and location of the court hearing.

2.
You have the right to have a lawyer represent you at the hearing. You have the
right to records the department intends to rely upon. A lawyer can look at the
files in your case, talk to child protective services and other agencies, tell
you about the law, help you understand your rights, and help you at hearings.
If you cannot afford a lawyer, the court will appoint one to represent you. To
get a court-appointed lawyer you must contact: (explain
local procedure) .

3.
At the hearing, you have the right to speak on your own behalf, to introduce
evidence, to examine witnesses, and to receive a decision based solely on the
evidence presented to the judge.

4.
If your hearing occurs before a court commissioner, you have the right to have
the decision of the court commissioner reviewed by a superior court judge. To
obtain that review, you must, within ten days after the entry of the decision
of the court commissioner, file with the court a motion for revision of the
decision, as provided in RCW 2.24.050.

You
should be present at any shelter care hearing. If you do not come, the judge
will not hear what you have to say.

You
may call the Child Protective Services' caseworker for more information about
your child. The caseworker's name and telephone number are: (insert
name and telephone number) ."

Upon
receipt of the written notice, the parent, guardian, or legal custodian shall
acknowledge such notice by signing a receipt prepared by child protective
services. If the parent, guardian, or legal custodian does not sign the
receipt, the reason for lack of a signature shall be written on the receipt.
The receipt shall be made a part of the court's file in the dependency action.

If
after making reasonable efforts to provide notification, child protective
services is unable to determine the whereabouts of the parents, guardian, or
legal custodian, the notice shall be delivered or sent to the last known
address of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian.

(2)
If child protective services is not required to give notice under RCW
13.34.060(2) and subsection (1) of this section, the juvenile court counselor
assigned to the matter shall make all reasonable efforts to advise the parents,
guardian, or legal custodian of the time and place of any shelter care hearing,
request that they be present, and inform them of their basic rights as provided
in RCW 13.34.090.

(3)
Reasonable efforts to advise and to give notice, as required in RCW
13.34.060(2) and subsections (1) and (2) of this section, shall include, at a
minimum, investigation of the whereabouts of the parent, guardian, or legal
custodian. If such reasonable efforts are not successful, or the parent,
guardian, or legal custodian does not appear at the shelter care hearing, the
petitioner shall testify at the hearing or state in a declaration:

(a)
The efforts made to investigate the whereabouts of, and to advise, the parent,
guardian, or legal custodian; and

(b)
Whether actual advice of rights was made, to whom it was made, and how it was
made, including the substance of any oral communication or copies of written
materials used.

(4)
The court shall hear evidence regarding notice given to, and efforts to notify,
the parent, guardian, or legal custodian and shall examine the need for shelter
care. The court shall hear evidence regarding the efforts made to place the
child with a relative. The court shall make an express finding as to whether
the notice required under RCW 13.34.060(2) and subsections (1) and (2) of this
section was given to the parent, guardian, or legal custodian. All parties
have the right to present testimony to the court regarding the need or lack of
need for shelter care. Hearsay evidence before the court regarding the need or
lack of need for shelter care must be supported by sworn testimony, affidavit,
or declaration of the person offering such evidence.

(5)
A shelter care order issued pursuant to section 7 of this act may be amended at
any time with notice and hearing thereon. The shelter care decision of
placement shall be modified only upon a showing of change in circumstances. No
child may be placed in shelter care for longer than thirty days without an
order, signed by the judge, authorizing continued shelter care.

(6)
Any parent, guardian, or legal custodian who for good cause is unable to attend
the initial shelter care hearing may request that a subsequent shelter care
hearing be scheduled. The request shall be made to the clerk of the court
where the petition is filed prior to the initial shelter care hearing. Upon
the request of the parent, the court shall schedule the hearing within
seventy-two hours of the request, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays.
The clerk shall notify all other parties of the hearing by any reasonable
means.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

At
the commencement of the shelter care hearing the court shall advise the parties
of basic rights as provided in RCW 13.34.090 and appoint counsel pursuant to
RCW 13.34.090 if the parent or guardian is indigent unless counsel has been
retained by the parent or guardian or the court finds that the right to counsel
has been expressly and voluntarily waived in court.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The juvenile court probation counselor shall submit a recommendation to the
court as to the further need for shelter care unless the petition has been
filed by the department, in which case the recommendation shall be submitted by
the department.

(2)
The court shall release a child alleged to be dependent to the care, custody,
and control of the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian unless the
court finds there is reasonable cause to believe that:

(a)
After consideration of the specific services that have been provided,
reasonable efforts have been made to prevent or eliminate the need for removal
of the child from the child's home and to make it possible for the child to
return home; and

(b)(i)
The child has no parent, guardian, or legal custodian to provide supervision
and care for such child; or

(ii)
The release of such child would present a serious threat of substantial harm to
such child; or

(iii)
The parent, guardian, or custodian to whom the child could be released has been
charged with violating RCW 9A.40.060 or 9A.40.070.

If
the court does not release the child to his or her parent, guardian, or legal
custodian, and the child was initially placed with a relative pursuant to RCW
13.34.060(1), the court shall order continued placement with a relative, unless
there is reasonable cause to believe the health, safety, or welfare of the
child would be jeopardized. If the child was not initially placed with a
relative, and the court does not release the child to his or her parent,
guardian, or legal custodian, the supervising agency shall make reasonable
efforts to locate a relative pursuant to RCW 13.34.060(1). If a relative is
not available, the court shall order continued shelter care or order placement
with another suitable person, and the court shall set forth its reasons for the
order. The court shall enter a finding as to whether RCW 13.34.060(2) and
subsections (1) and (2) of this section have been complied with. If actual
notice was not given to the parent, guardian, or legal custodian and the
whereabouts of such person is known or can be ascertained, the court shall
order the supervising agency or the department of social and health services to
make reasonable efforts to advise the parent, guardian, or legal custodian of
the status of the case, including the date and time of any subsequent hearings,
and their rights under RCW 13.34.090.

(3)
An order releasing the child on any conditions specified in this section may at
any time be amended, with notice and hearing thereon, so as to return the child
to shelter care for failure of the parties to conform to the conditions
originally imposed.

The
court shall consider whether nonconformance with any conditions resulted from
circumstances beyond the control of the parent and give weight to that fact
before ordering return of the child to shelter care.

Sec.
8. RCW
13.34.070 and 1993 c 358 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Upon the filing of the petition, the clerk of the court shall issue a summons,
one directed to the child, if the child is twelve or more years of age, and
another to the parents, guardian, or custodian, and such other persons as
appear to the court to be proper or necessary parties to the proceedings,
requiring them to appear personally before the court at the time fixed to hear
the petition. If the child is developmentally disabled and not living at home,
the notice shall be given to the child's custodian as well as to the child's
parent. The developmentally disabled child shall not be required to appear
unless requested by the court. ((Where)) When the custodian is
summoned, the parent or guardian or both shall also be served with a summons.
The fact-finding hearing on the petition shall be held no later than
seventy-five days after the filing of the petition, unless exceptional reasons
for a continuance are found. The party requesting the continuance shall have
the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that exceptional
circumstances ((do)) exist. To ensure that the hearing on the petition
occurs within the seventy-five day time limit, the court shall schedule and
hear the matter on an expedited basis.

(2)
A copy of the petition shall be attached to each summons.

(3)
The summons shall advise the parties of the right to counsel. The summons
shall also inform the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian of his or (([her]))
her right to appointed counsel, if indigent, and of the procedure to use
to secure appointed counsel.

(4)
The summons shall advise the parents that they may be held responsible for the
support of the child if the child is placed in out-of-home care.

(5)
The judge may endorse upon the summons an order directing any parent, guardian,
or custodian having the custody or control of the child to bring the child to
the hearing.

(6)
If it appears from affidavit or sworn statement presented to the judge that
there is probable cause for the issuance of a warrant of arrest or that the
child needs to be taken into custody pursuant to RCW 13.34.050, the judge may
endorse upon the summons an order that an officer serving the summons shall at
once take the child into custody and take him or her to the place of
shelter designated by the court.

(7)
If the person summoned as provided in this section is subject to an order of
the court pursuant to subsection (5) or (6) of this section, and if the person
fails to abide by the order, he or she may be proceeded against as for
contempt of court. The order endorsed upon the summons shall conspicuously
display the following legend:

NOTICE:

VIOLATION OF THIS ORDER

IS SUBJECT TO PROCEEDING

FOR CONTEMPT OF COURT

PURSUANT
TO RCW 13.34.070.

(8)
If a party to be served with a summons can be found within the state, the
summons shall be served upon the party personally as soon as possible following
the filing of the petition, but in no case later than fifteen court days before
the fact-finding hearing, or such time as set by the court. If the party is
within the state and cannot be personally served, but the party's address is
known or can with reasonable diligence be ascertained, the summons may be
served upon the party by mailing a copy ((thereof)) by certified mail as
soon as possible following the filing of the petition, but in no case later
than fifteen court days before the hearing, or such time as set by the court.
If a party other than the child is without the state but can be found or the
address is known, or can with reasonable diligence be ascertained, service of
the summons may be made either by delivering a copy ((thereof)) to the
party personally or by mailing a copy thereof to the party by certified mail at
least ten court days before the fact-finding hearing, or such time as set by
the court.

(9)
Service of summons may be made under the direction of the court by any person
eighteen years of age or older who is not a party to the proceedings or by any
law enforcement officer, probation counselor, or department ((of social and
health services social worker)) employee.

(10)
In any proceeding brought under this chapter where the court knows or has
reason to know that the child involved is a member or is eligible to be a
member of an Indian tribe, notice of the pendency of the proceeding shall
also be sent by registered mail, return receipt requested, to the child's
tribe. If the identity or location of the tribe cannot be determined, such
notice shall be transmitted to the secretary of the interior of the United States.

Sec.
9. RCW
13.34.080 and 1990 c 246 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

((In
a dependency case where it appears by the petition or verified statement, that
the person standing in the position of natural or legal guardian of the person
of any child, is a nonresident of this state, or that the name or place of
residence or whereabouts of such person is unknown, as well as in all cases
where, after due diligence, the officer has been unable to make service of the
summons or notice provided for in RCW 13.34.070, and a copy of the notice has
been deposited in the post office, postage prepaid, directed to such person at
his last known place of residence,)) (1) The court shall direct the
clerk to publish notice in a legal newspaper printed in the county, qualified
to publish summons, once a week for three consecutive weeks, with the first
publication of the notice to be at least twenty-five days prior to the date
fixed for the hearing when it appears by the petition or verified statement
that:

(a)(i)
The parent or guardian is a nonresident of this state; or

(ii)
The name or place of residence or whereabouts of the parent or guardian is
unknown; and

(b)
After due diligence, the person attempting service of the summons or notice
provided for in RCW 13.34.070 has been unable to make service, and a copy of
the notice has been deposited in the post office, postage prepaid, directed to
such person at his or her last known place of residence. If the parent,
guardian, or legal custodian is believed to be a resident of another state or a
county other than the county in which the petition has been filed, notice also
shall be published in the county in which the parent, guardian, or legal
custodian is believed to reside.

((Additionally,))
(2) Publication may proceed simultaneously with efforts to provide ((personal))
service in person or ((service)) by mail ((for good cause
shown)), when the court determines there is reason to believe that
((personal)) service in person or ((service)) by mail will
not be successful. ((Such)) Notice shall be directed to the
parent, parents, or other person claiming the right to the custody of the
child, if their names are known((, or)). If their names are
unknown, the phrase "To whom it may concern" shall be used ((and)),
apply to, and be binding upon, ((any such)) those persons whose
names are unknown. The name of the court, the name of the child (or children
if of one family), the date of the filing of the petition, the date of hearing,
and the object of the proceeding in general terms shall be set forth((, and
the whole shall be subscribed by the clerk)). There shall be filed with
the clerk an affidavit showing due publication of the notice((, and)).
The cost of publication shall be paid by the county at a rate not ((to
exceed)) greater than the rate paid ((by the county)) for
other legal notices. The publication of notice shall be deemed equivalent to
personal service upon all persons, known or unknown, who have been designated
as provided in this section.

Sec.
10. RCW
13.34.090 and 1998 c 328 s 3 and 1998 c 141 s 1 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
Any party has a right to be represented by an attorney in all proceedings under
this chapter, to introduce evidence, to be heard in his or her own behalf, to
examine witnesses, to receive a decision based solely on the evidence adduced
at the hearing, and to an unbiased fact-finder.

(2)
At all stages of a proceeding in which a child is alleged to be dependent ((as
defined in RCW 13.34.030(4))), the child's parent, guardian, or legal
custodian has the right to be represented by counsel, and if indigent, to have
counsel appointed for him or her by the court. Unless waived in court, counsel
shall be provided to the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian, if such
person (a) has appeared in the proceeding or requested the court to appoint
counsel and (b) is financially unable to obtain counsel because of indigency ((as
defined in chapter 10.101 RCW)).

(3)
If a party to an action under this chapter is represented by counsel, no order
shall be provided to that party for his or her signature without prior notice
and provision of the order to counsel.

(4)
Copies of department of social and health services or supervising agency
records to which parents have legal access pursuant to chapter 13.50 RCW shall
be given to the child's parent, guardian, legal custodian, or his or her legal
counsel, prior to any shelter care hearing and within fifteen days after the
department or supervising agency receives a written request for such records
from the parent, guardian, legal custodian, or his or her legal counsel. These
records shall be provided to the child's parents, guardian, legal custodian, or
legal counsel a reasonable period of time prior to the shelter care hearing in
order to allow an opportunity to review the records prior to the hearing.
These records shall be legible and shall be provided at no expense to the
parents, guardian, legal custodian, or his or her counsel. When the records
are served on legal counsel, legal counsel shall have the opportunity to review
the records with the parents and shall review the records with the parents
prior to the shelter care hearing.

Sec.
11. RCW
13.34.110 and 1995 c 313 s 1 and 1995 c 311 s 27 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

The
court shall hold a fact-finding hearing on the petition and, unless the court
dismisses the petition, shall make written findings of fact, stating the
reasons therefor((, and after it has announced its findings of fact shall
hold a hearing to consider disposition of the case immediately following the
fact-finding hearing or at a continued hearing within fourteen days or longer
for good cause shown)). Immediately after the entry of the findings of
fact, the court shall hold a disposition hearing, unless there is good cause
for continuing the matter. If good cause is shown, the case may be continued.
Notice of the time and place of the continued hearing may be given in open
court. If notice in open court is not given to a party, that party shall be
notified by certified mail of the time and place of any continued hearing.
Unless there is reasonable cause to believe the health, safety,
or welfare of the child would be jeopardized or efforts to reunite the parent
and child would be hindered, the court shall direct the department to notify
those adult persons who: (1) Are related by blood or marriage to the child in
the following degrees: Parent, grandparent, brother, sister, stepparent,
stepbrother, stepsister, uncle, or aunt; (2) are known to the department as
having been in contact with the family or child within the past twelve months;
and (3) would be an appropriate placement for the child. Reasonable cause
to dispense with notification to a parent under this section must be proved by
clear, cogent, and convincing evidence.

The
parties need not appear at the fact-finding or dispositional hearing if the
parties, their attorneys, the guardian ad litem, and court-appointed special
advocates, if any, are all in agreement. The court shall receive and review a
social study before entering an order based on agreement. No social file or
social study may be considered by the court in connection with the fact-finding
hearing or prior to factual determination, except as otherwise admissible under
the rules of evidence. ((Notice of the time and place of the continued
hearing may be given in open court. If notice in open court is not given to a
party, that party shall be notified by mail of the time and place of any
continued hearing.

All
hearings may be conducted at any time or place within the limits of the county,
and such cases may not be heard in conjunction with other business of any other
division of the superior court. The general public shall be excluded, and only
such persons may be admitted who are found by the judge to have a direct interest
in the case or in the work of the court. Unless the court states on the record
the reasons to disallow attendance, the court shall allow a child's relatives
and, if a child resides in foster care, the child's foster parent, to attend
all hearings and proceedings pertaining to the child for the sole purpose of
providing oral and written information about the child and the child's welfare
to the court.

Stenographic
notes or any device which accurately records the proceedings may be required as
provided in other civil cases pursuant to RCW 2.32.200.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. A
new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

All
hearings may be conducted at any time or place within the limits of the county,
and such cases may not be heard in conjunction with other business of any other
division of the superior court. The public shall be excluded, and only such
persons may be admitted who are found by the judge to have a direct interest in
the case or in the work of the court. Unless the court states on the record
the reasons to disallow attendance, the court shall allow a child's relatives
and, if a child resides in foster care, the child's foster parent, to attend
all hearings and proceedings pertaining to the child for the sole purpose of
providing oral and written information about the child and the child's welfare
to the court.

Stenographic
notes or any device which accurately records the proceedings may be required as
provided in other civil cases pursuant to RCW 2.32.200.

Sec.
13. RCW
13.34.120 and 1998 c 328 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(((1)))
To aid the court in its decision on disposition, a social study((,
consisting of a written evaluation of matters relevant to the disposition of
the case,)) shall be made by the person or agency filing the petition. A
parent may submit a counselor's or health care provider's evaluation of the
parent, which shall either be included in the social study or considered in
conjunction with the social study. The study shall include all social ((records))
files and may also include facts relating to the child's cultural
heritage, and shall be made available to the court. The court shall consider
the social file, social study, guardian ad litem report, the court-appointed
special advocate's report, if any, and any reports filed by a party at the
disposition hearing in addition to evidence produced at the fact-finding
hearing. At least ten working days before the disposition hearing, the
department shall mail to the parent and his or her attorney a copy of the
agency's social study and proposed service plan, which shall be in writing or
in a form understandable to the parents or custodians. In addition, the
department shall provide an opportunity for parents to review and comment on
the plan at the ((community service)) local office closest to
the parents' residence. If the parents disagree with the agency's plan or
any part thereof, the parents shall submit to the court at least twenty-four
hours before the hearing, in writing, or signed oral statement, an alternative
plan to correct the problems which led to the finding of dependency. This section
shall not interfere with the right of the parents or custodians to submit oral
arguments regarding the disposition plan at the hearing.

(((2)
In addition to the requirements set forth in subsection (1) of this section, a
predisposition study to the court in cases of dependency alleged pursuant to
RCW 13.34.030(4) (b) or (c) shall contain the following information:

(a)
A statement of the specific harm or harms to the child that intervention is
designed to alleviate;

(b)
A description of the specific programs, for both the parents and child, that
are needed in order to prevent serious harm to the child; the reasons why such
programs are likely to be useful; the availability of any proposed services;
and the agency's overall plan for ensuring that the services will be
delivered. The description shall identify services chosen and approved by the
parent;

(c)
If removal is recommended, a full description of the reasons why the child
cannot be protected adequately in the home, including a description of any previous
efforts to work with the parents and the child in the home; the in-home
treatment programs which have been considered and rejected; the preventive
services that have been offered or provided and have failed to prevent the need
for out-of-home placement, unless the health, safety, and welfare of the child
cannot be protected adequately in the home; and the parents' attitude toward
placement of the child;

(d)
A statement of the likely harms the child will suffer as a result of removal.
This section should include an exploration of the nature of the parent-child
attachment and the meaning of separation and loss to both the parents and the
child;

(e)
A description of the steps that will be taken to minimize harm to the child
that may result if separation occurs; and

(f)
Behavior that will be expected before determination that supervision of the
family or placement is no longer necessary.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. A
new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

If
the most recent date that a child was removed from the home of the parent,
guardian, or legal custodian for purposes of placement in out-of-home care
occurred prior to the filing of a dependency petition or after filing but prior
to entry of a disposition order, such time periods shall be included when
calculating the length of the child's current placement episode.

Sec.
15. RCW
13.34.130 and 1999 c 267 s 16, 1999 c 267 s 9, and 1999 c 173 s 3 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:

If,
after a fact-finding hearing pursuant to RCW 13.34.110, it has been proven by a
preponderance of the evidence that the child is dependent within the meaning of
RCW 13.34.030((;)) after consideration of the ((predisposition report))
social study prepared pursuant to RCW 13.34.110 and after a disposition
hearing has been held pursuant to RCW 13.34.110, the court shall enter an order
of disposition pursuant to this section.

(1)
The court shall order one of the following dispositions of the case:

(a)
Order a disposition other than removal of the child from his or her home, which
shall provide a program designed to alleviate the immediate danger to the
child, to mitigate or cure any damage the child has already suffered, and to
aid the parents so that the child will not be endangered in the future. In ((selecting
a program)) determining the disposition, the court should choose
those services, including housing assistance, that least interfere with family
autonomy((, provided that the services)) and are adequate to
protect the child.

(b)
Order ((that)) the child to be removed from his or her home and
((ordered)) into the custody, control, and care of a relative or the
department ((of social and health services)) or a licensed child placing
agency for placement in a foster family home or group care facility licensed
pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW or in a home not required to be licensed pursuant
to chapter 74.15 RCW. Unless there is reasonable cause to believe that the health,
safety, or welfare of the child would be jeopardized or that efforts to
reunite the parent and child will be hindered, such child shall be placed with
a person who is: (i) Related to the child as defined in RCW
74.15.020(2)(a) ((and)) with whom the child has a relationship and is
comfortable((,)); and ((who is)) (ii) willing and
available to care for the child.

(2)
Placement of the child with a relative under this subsection shall be given
preference by the court. An order for out-of-home placement may be made only
if the court finds that reasonable efforts have been made to prevent or
eliminate the need for removal of the child from the child's home and to make it
possible for the child to return home, specifying the services that have been
provided to the child and the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian, and
that preventive services have been offered or provided and have failed to
prevent the need for out-of-home placement, unless the health, safety, and
welfare of the child cannot be protected adequately in the home, and that:

(((i)))
(a) There is no parent or guardian available to care for such child;

(((ii)))
(b) The parent, guardian, or legal custodian is not willing to take
custody of the child; or

(((iii)))
(c) The court finds, by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence, a
manifest danger exists that the child will suffer serious abuse or neglect if
the child is not removed from the home and an order under RCW 26.44.063 would
not protect the child from danger((; or

(iv)
The extent of the child's disability is such that the parent, guardian, or
legal custodian is unable to provide the necessary care for the child and the
parent, guardian, or legal custodian has determined that the child would
benefit from placement outside of the home)).

(((2)))
(3) If the court has ordered a child removed from his or her home
pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section, the court may order that a
petition seeking termination of the parent and child relationship be filed if
the ((court finds: (a) Termination is recommended by the supervising
agency; (b) termination is in the best interests of the child; and (c) that
because of the existence of aggravated circumstances, reasonable efforts to
unify the family are not required. Notwithstanding the existence of aggravated
circumstances, reasonable efforts may be required if the court or department
determines it is in the best interest of the child. In determining whether
aggravated circumstances exist by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence, the
court shall consider one or more of the following:

(i)
Conviction of the parent of rape of the child in the first, second, or third
degree as defined in RCW 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, and 9A.44.079;

(ii)
Conviction of the parent of criminal mistreatment of the child in the first or
second degree as defined in RCW 9A.42.020 and 9A.42.030;

(iii)
Conviction of the parent of one of the following assault crimes, when the child
is the victim: Assault in the first or second degree as defined in RCW
9A.36.011 and 9A.36.021 or assault of a child in the first or second degree as
defined in RCW 9A.36.120 or 9A.36.130;

(iv)
Conviction of the parent of murder, manslaughter, or homicide by abuse of the
child's other parent, sibling, or another child;

(v)
Conviction of the parent of attempting, soliciting, or conspiracy to commit a
crime listed in (c)(i), (ii), (iii), or (iv) of this subsection;

(vi)
A finding by a court that a parent is a sexually violent predator as defined in
RCW 71.09.020;

(vii)
Failure of the parent to complete available treatment ordered under this
chapter or the equivalent laws of another state, where such failure has
resulted in a prior termination of parental rights to another child and the
parent has failed to effect significant change in the interim. In the case of
a parent of an Indian child, as defined in the Indian Child Welfare Act, P.L.
95-608 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1903), the court shall also consider tribal efforts to
assist the parent in completing treatment and make it possible for the child to
return home;

(viii)
An infant under three years of age has been abandoned as defined in RCW
13.34.030(4)(a);

(ix)
The mother has given birth to three or more drug-affected infants, resulting in
the department filing a petition under section 23, chapter 314, Laws of 1998;

(x)
Conviction of the parent of a sex offense under chapter 9A.44 RCW or incest
under RCW 9A.64.020 when the child is born of the offense.

(3)
If reasonable efforts are not ordered under subsection (2) of this section a
permanency planning hearing shall be held within thirty days. Reasonable
efforts shall be made to place the child in a timely manner in accordance with
the permanency plan, and to complete whatever steps are necessary to finalize
the permanent placement of the child.

(4)
Whenever a child is ordered removed from the child's home, the agency charged
with his or her care shall provide the court with:

(a)
A permanency plan of care that shall identify one of the following outcomes as
a primary goal and may identify additional outcomes as alternative goals:
Return of the child to the home of the child's parent, guardian, or legal
custodian; adoption; guardianship; permanent legal custody; long-term relative
or foster care, until the child is age eighteen, with a written agreement
between the parties and the care provider; and independent living, if
appropriate and if the child is age sixteen or older; or a responsible living
skills program. Whenever a permanency plan identifies independent living as a
goal, the plan shall also specifically identify the services that will be
provided to assist the child to make a successful transition from foster care
to independent living. Before the court approves independent living as a
permanency plan of care, the court shall make a finding that the provision of
services to assist the child in making a transition from foster care to
independent living will allow the child to manage his or her financial affairs
and to manage his or her personal, social, educational, and nonfinancial
affairs. The department shall not discharge a child to an independent living
situation before the child is eighteen years of age unless the child becomes
emancipated pursuant to chapter 13.64 RCW.

(b)
Unless the court has ordered, pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, that
a termination petition be filed, a specific plan as to where the child will be
placed, what steps will be taken to return the child home, and what actions the
agency will take to maintain parent-child ties. All aspects of the plan shall
include the goal of achieving permanence for the child.

(i)
The agency plan shall specify what services the parents will be offered in
order to enable them to resume custody, what requirements the parents must meet
in order to resume custody, and a time limit for each service plan and parental
requirement.

(ii)
The agency shall be required to encourage the maximum parent-child contact possible,
including regular visitation and participation by the parents in the care of
the child while the child is in placement. Visitation may be limited or denied
only if the court determines that such limitation or denial is necessary to
protect the child's health, safety, or welfare.

(iii)
A child shall be placed as close to the child's home as possible, preferably in
the child's own neighborhood, unless the court finds that placement at a
greater distance is necessary to promote the child's or parents' well-being.

(iv)
The agency charged with supervising a child in placement shall provide all
reasonable services that are available within the agency, or within the
community, or those services which the department of social and health services
has existing contracts to purchase. It shall report to the court if it is
unable to provide such services.

(c)
If the court has ordered, pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, that a
termination petition be filed, a specific plan as to where the child will be
placed, what steps will be taken to achieve permanency for the child, services
to be offered or provided to the child, and, if visitation would be in the best
interests of the child, a recommendation to the court regarding visitation
between parent and child pending a fact-finding hearing on the termination
petition. The agency shall not be required to develop a plan of services for
the parents or provide services to the parents.

(5)
If the court determines that the continuation of reasonable efforts to prevent
or eliminate the need to remove the child from his or her home or to safely
return the child home should not be part of the permanency plan of care for the
child, reasonable efforts shall be made to place the child in a timely manner
and to complete whatever steps are necessary to finalize the permanent
placement of the child.

(6))) requirements
of section 16 of this act are met.

(4)
If there is insufficient information at the time of the disposition hearing
upon which to base a determination regarding the suitability of a proposed
placement with a relative, the child shall remain in foster care and the court
shall direct the supervising agency to conduct necessary background
investigations as provided in chapter 74.15 RCW and report the results of such
investigation to the court within thirty days. However, if such relative
appears otherwise suitable and competent to provide care and treatment, the
criminal history background check need not be completed before placement, but
as soon as possible after placement. Any placements with relatives, pursuant
to this section, shall be contingent upon cooperation by the relative with the
agency case plan and compliance with court orders related to the care and
supervision of the child including, but not limited to, court orders regarding
parent-child contacts and any other conditions imposed by the court.
Noncompliance with the case plan or court order shall be grounds for removal of
the child from the relative's home, subject to review by the court.

(((7)
Except for children whose cases are reviewed by a citizen review board under
chapter 13.70 RCW, the status of all children found to be dependent shall be
reviewed by the court at least every six months from the beginning date of the
placement episode or the date dependency is established, whichever is first, at
a hearing in which it shall be determined whether court supervision should
continue. The review shall include findings regarding the agency and parental
completion of disposition plan requirements, and if necessary, revised
permanency time limits. The supervising agency shall provide a foster parent,
preadoptive parent, or relative with notice of, and their right to an
opportunity to be heard in, a review hearing pertaining to the child, but only
if that person is currently providing care to that child at the time of the
hearing. This section shall not be construed to grant party status to any
person who has been provided an opportunity to be heard.

(a)
A child shall not be returned home at the review hearing unless the court finds
that a reason for removal as set forth in this section no longer exists. The
parents, guardian, or legal custodian shall report to the court the efforts
they have made to correct the conditions which led to removal. If a child is
returned, casework supervision shall continue for a period of six months, at
which time there shall be a hearing on the need for continued intervention.

(b)
If the child is not returned home, the court shall establish in writing:

(i)
Whether reasonable services have been provided to or offered to the parties to
facilitate reunion, specifying the services provided or offered;

(ii)
Whether the child has been placed in the least-restrictive setting appropriate
to the child's needs, including whether consideration and preference has been
given to placement with the child's relatives;

(iii)
Whether there is a continuing need for placement and whether the placement is
appropriate;

(iv)
Whether there has been compliance with the case plan by the child, the child's
parents, and the agency supervising the placement;

(v)
Whether progress has been made toward correcting the problems that necessitated
the child's placement in out-of-home care;

(vi)
Whether the parents have visited the child and any reasons why visitation has
not occurred or has been infrequent;

(vii)
Whether additional services, including housing assistance, are needed to
facilitate the return of the child to the child's parents; if so, the court
shall order that reasonable services be offered specifying such services; and

(viii)
The projected date by which the child will be returned home or other permanent
plan of care will be implemented.

(c)
The court at the review hearing may order that a petition seeking termination
of the parent and child relationship be filed.

(8)
The court's ability to order housing assistance under this section is: (a)
Limited to cases in which homelessness or the lack of adequate and safe housing
is the primary reason for an out-of-home placement; and (b) subject to the
availability of funds appropriated for this specific purpose.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. A
new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

A
court may order that a petition seeking termination of the parent and child
relationship be filed if the following requirements are met:

(1)
The court has removed the child from his or her home pursuant to RCW 13.34.130;

(2)
Termination is recommended by the supervising agency;

(3)
Termination is in the best interests of the child; and

(4)
Because of the existence of aggravated circumstances, reasonable efforts to
unify the family are not required. Notwithstanding the existence of aggravated
circumstances, reasonable efforts may be required if the court or department
determines it is in the best interests of the child. In determining whether
aggravated circumstances exist by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence, the
court shall consider one or more of the following:

(a)
Conviction of the parent of rape of the child in the first, second, or third
degree as defined in RCW 9A.44.073, 9A.44.076, and 9A.44.079;

(b)
Conviction of the parent of criminal mistreatment of the child in the first or
second degree as defined in RCW 9A.42.020 and 9A.42.030;

(c)
Conviction of the parent of one of the following assault crimes, when the child
is the victim: Assault in the first or second degree as defined in RCW
9A.36.011 and 9A.36.021 or assault of a child in the first or second degree as
defined in RCW 9A.36.120 or 9A.36.130;

(d)
Conviction of the parent of murder, manslaughter, or homicide by abuse of the
child's other parent, sibling, or another child;

(e)
Conviction of the parent of attempting, soliciting, or conspiring to commit a
crime listed in (a), (b), (c), or (d) of this subsection;

(f)
A finding by a court that a parent is a sexually violent predator as defined in
RCW 71.09.020;

(g)
Failure of the parent to complete available treatment ordered under this
chapter or the equivalent laws of another state, where such failure has
resulted in a prior termination of parental rights to another child and the
parent has failed to effect significant change in the interim. In the case of
a parent of an Indian child, as defined in the Indian Child Welfare Act, P.L.
95-608 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1903), the court shall also consider tribal efforts to
assist the parent in completing treatment and make it possible for the child to
return home;

(h)
An infant under three years of age has been abandoned;

(i)
Conviction of the parent, when a child has been born of the offense, of: (A) A
sex offense under chapter 9A.44 RCW; or (B) incest under RCW 9A.64.020.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17. A
new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

If
reasonable efforts are not ordered under section 16 of this act, a permanency
planning hearing shall be held within thirty days of the court order to file a
petition to terminate parental rights. Reasonable efforts shall be made to
place the child in a timely manner in accordance with the permanency plan, and
to complete whatever steps are necessary to finalize the permanent placement of
the child.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. A
new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever a child is ordered removed from the child's home, the agency charged
with his or her care shall provide the court with:

(a)
A permanency plan of care that shall identify one of the following outcomes as
a primary goal and may identify additional outcomes as alternative goals:
Return of the child to the home of the child's parent, guardian, or legal
custodian; adoption; guardianship; permanent legal custody; long-term relative
or foster care, until the child is age eighteen, with a written agreement
between the parties and the care provider; successful completion of a
responsible living skills program; or independent living, if appropriate and if
the child is age sixteen or older. The department shall not discharge a child
to an independent living situation before the child is eighteen years of age
unless the child becomes emancipated pursuant to chapter 13.64 RCW;

(b)
Unless the court has ordered, pursuant to RCW 13.34.130(3), that a termination
petition be filed, a specific plan as to where the child will be placed, what
steps will be taken to return the child home, and what actions the agency will
take to maintain parent-child ties. All aspects of the plan shall include the
goal of achieving permanence for the child.

(i)
The agency plan shall specify what services the parents will be offered to
enable them to resume custody, what requirements the parents must meet to
resume custody, and a time limit for each service plan and parental
requirement.

(ii)
The agency shall encourage the maximum parent-child contact possible, including
regular visitation and participation by the parents in the care of the child
while the child is in placement. Visitation may be limited or denied only if
the court determines that such limitation or denial is necessary to protect the
child's health, safety, or welfare.

(iii)
A child shall be placed as close to the child's home as possible, preferably in
the child's own neighborhood, unless the court finds that placement at a
greater distance is necessary to promote the child's or parents' well-being.

(iv)
The agency charged with supervising a child in placement shall provide all
reasonable services that are available within the agency, or within the
community, or those services which the department has existing contracts to
purchase. It shall report to the court if it is unable to provide such
services; and

(c)
If the court has ordered, pursuant to RCW 13.34.130(3), that a termination
petition be filed, a specific plan as to where the child will be placed, what
steps will be taken to achieve permanency for the child, services to be offered
or provided to the child, and, if visitation would be in the best interests of
the child, a recommendation to the court regarding visitation between parent
and child pending a fact-finding hearing on the termination petition. The
agency shall not be required to develop a plan of services for the parents or
provide services to the parents if the court orders a termination petition be
filed.

(2)
If the court determines that the continuation of reasonable efforts to prevent
or eliminate the need to remove the child from his or her home or to safely return
the child home should not be part of the permanency plan of care for the child,
reasonable efforts shall be made to place the child in a timely manner and to
complete whatever steps are necessary to finalize the permanent placement of
the child.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19. A
new section is added to chapter 13.34 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Except for children whose cases are reviewed by a citizen review board under
chapter 13.70 RCW, the status of all children found to be dependent shall be
reviewed by the court at least every six months from the beginning date of the
placement episode or the date dependency is established, whichever is first, at
a hearing in which it shall be determined whether court supervision should
continue. The review shall include findings regarding the agency and parental
completion of disposition plan requirements, and if necessary, revised
permanency time limits. The supervising agency shall provide a foster parent,
preadoptive parent, or relative with notice of, and their right to an
opportunity to be heard in, a review hearing pertaining to the child, but only
if that person is currently providing care to that child at the time of the
hearing. This section shall not be construed to grant party status to any
person who has been provided an opportunity to be heard.

(a)
A child shall not be returned home at the review hearing unless the court finds
that a reason for removal as set forth in RCW 13.34.130 no longer exists. The
parents, guardian, or legal custodian shall report to the court the efforts
they have made to correct the conditions which led to removal. If a child is
returned, casework supervision shall continue for a period of six months, at
which time there shall be a hearing on the need for continued intervention.

(b)
If the child is not returned home, the court shall establish in writing:

(i)
Whether reasonable services have been provided to or offered to the parties to
facilitate reunion, specifying the services provided or offered;

(ii)
Whether the child has been placed in the least-restrictive setting appropriate
to the child's needs, including whether consideration and preference has been
given to placement with the child's relatives;

(iii)
Whether there is a continuing need for placement and whether the placement is
appropriate;

(iv)
Whether there has been compliance with the case plan by the child, the child's
parents, and the agency supervising the placement;

(v)
Whether progress has been made toward correcting the problems that necessitated
the child's placement in out-of-home care;

(vi)
Whether the parents have visited the child and any reasons why visitation has
not occurred or has been infrequent;

(vii)
Whether additional services, including housing assistance, are needed to
facilitate the return of the child to the child's parents; if so, the court
shall order that reasonable services be offered specifying such services; and

(viii)
The projected date by which the child will be returned home or other permanent
plan of care will be implemented.

(c)
The court at the review hearing may order that a petition seeking termination
of the parent and child relationship be filed.

(2)
The court's ability to order housing assistance under RCW 13.34.130 and this
section is: (a) Limited to cases in which homelessness or the lack of adequate
and safe housing is the primary reason for an out-of-home placement; and (b)
subject to the availability of funds appropriated for this specific purpose.

Sec.
20. RCW 13.34.145
and 1999 c 267 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A permanency plan shall be developed no later than sixty days from the time the
supervising agency assumes responsibility for providing services, including
placing the child, or at the time of a hearing under RCW 13.34.130, whichever
occurs first. The permanency planning process continues until a permanency
planning goal is achieved or dependency is dismissed. The planning process
shall include reasonable efforts to return the child to the parent's home.

(a)
Whenever a child is placed in out-of-home care pursuant to RCW 13.34.130, the
agency that has custody of the child shall provide the court with a written
permanency plan of care directed towards securing a safe, stable, and permanent
home for the child as soon as possible. The plan shall identify one of the
following outcomes as the primary goal and may also identify additional
outcomes as alternative goals: Return of the child to the home of the child's
parent, guardian, or legal custodian; adoption; guardianship; permanent legal
custody; long-term relative or foster care, until the child is age eighteen,
with a written agreement between the parties and the care provider; a
responsible living skills program; and independent living, if appropriate and
if the child is age sixteen or older and the provisions of subsection (2) of
this section are met.

(b)
The identified outcomes and goals of the permanency plan may change over time
based upon the circumstances of the particular case.

(c)
Permanency planning goals should be achieved at the earliest possible date,
preferably before the child has been in out-of-home care for fifteen months.
In cases where parental rights have been terminated, the child is legally free
for adoption, and adoption has been identified as the primary permanency
planning goal, it shall be a goal to complete the adoption within six months
following entry of the termination order.

(d)
For purposes related to permanency planning:

(i)
"Guardianship" means a dependency guardianship ((pursuant to this
chapter)), a legal guardianship pursuant to chapter 11.88 RCW, or
equivalent laws of another state or a federally recognized Indian tribe.

(ii)
"Permanent custody order" means a custody order entered pursuant to
chapter 26.10 RCW.

(iii)
"Permanent legal custody" means legal custody pursuant to chapter
26.10 RCW or equivalent laws of another state or of a federally recognized
Indian tribe.

(2)
Whenever a permanency plan identifies independent living as a goal, the plan
shall also specifically identify the services that will be provided to assist
the child to make a successful transition from foster care to independent
living. Before the court approves independent living as a permanency plan of
care, the court shall make a finding that the provision of services to assist
the child in making a transition from foster care to independent living will
allow the child to manage his or her financial ((affairs and to manage his
or her)), personal, social, educational, and nonfinancial affairs.
The department shall not discharge a child to an independent living situation
before the child is eighteen years of age unless the child becomes emancipated
pursuant to chapter 13.64 RCW.

(3)
A permanency planning hearing shall be held in all cases where the child has
remained in out-of-home care for at least nine months and an adoption decree,
guardianship order, or permanent custody order has not previously been
entered. The hearing shall take place no later than twelve months following
commencement of the current placement episode.

(4)
Whenever a child is removed from the home of a dependency guardian or long-term
relative or foster care provider, and the child is not returned to the home of
the parent, guardian, or legal custodian but is placed in out-of-home care, a
permanency planning hearing shall take place no later than twelve months, as
provided in subsection (3) of this section, following the date of removal
unless, prior to the hearing, the child returns to the home of the dependency
guardian or long-term care provider, the child is placed in the home of the
parent, guardian, or legal custodian, an adoption decree, guardianship order,
or a permanent custody order is entered, or the dependency is dismissed.

(5)
No later than ten working days prior to the permanency planning hearing, the
agency having custody of the child shall submit a written permanency plan to
the court and shall mail a copy of the plan to all parties and their legal
counsel, if any.

(6)
At the permanency planning hearing, the court shall enter findings as required
by ((RCW 13.34.130(7))) section 19 of this act and shall review
the permanency plan prepared by the agency. If the child has resided in the
home of a foster parent or relative for more than six months prior to the
permanency planning hearing, the court shall also enter a finding regarding
whether the foster parent or relative was informed of the hearing as required
in RCW 74.13.280 and ((13.34.130(7))) section 19 of this act. If
a goal of long-term foster or relative care has been achieved prior to the
permanency planning hearing, the court shall review the child's status to
determine whether the placement and the plan for the child's care remain
appropriate. In cases where the primary permanency planning goal has not ((yet))
been achieved, the court shall inquire regarding the reasons why the primary
goal has not been achieved and determine what needs to be done to make it
possible to achieve the primary goal. In all cases, the court shall:

(a)(i)
Order the permanency plan prepared by the agency to be implemented; or

(ii)
Modify the permanency plan, and order implementation of the modified plan; and

(b)(i)
Order the child returned home only if the court finds that a reason for removal
as set forth in RCW 13.34.130 no longer exists; or

(ii)
Order the child to remain in out-of-home care for a limited specified time
period while efforts are made to implement the permanency plan.

(7)
If the court orders the child returned home, casework supervision shall
continue for at least six months, at which time a review hearing shall be held
pursuant to ((RCW 13.34.130(7))) section 19 of this act, and the
court shall determine the need for continued intervention.

(8)
Continued juvenile court jurisdiction under this chapter shall not be a barrier
to the entry of an order establishing a legal guardianship or permanent legal
custody when((,)): (a) The court has ordered
implementation of a permanency plan that includes legal guardianship or
permanent legal custody((,)); and (b) the party pursuing the
legal guardianship or permanent legal custody is the party identified in the
permanency plan as the prospective legal guardian or custodian. During the
pendency of such proceeding, ((juvenile)) the court shall conduct
review hearings and further permanency planning hearings as provided in this
chapter. At the conclusion of the legal guardianship or permanent legal
custody proceeding, a juvenile court hearing shall be held for the purpose of
determining whether dependency should be dismissed. If a guardianship or
permanent custody order has been entered, the dependency shall be dismissed.

(9)
Following the first permanency planning hearing, the court shall hold a further
permanency planning hearing in accordance with this section at least once every
twelve months until a permanency planning goal is achieved or the dependency is
dismissed, whichever occurs first.

(10)
Except as ((otherwise)) provided in RCW 13.34.235, the status of all
dependent children shall continue to be reviewed by the court at least once
every six months, in accordance with ((RCW 13.34.130(7))) section 19
of this act, until the dependency is dismissed. Prior to the second
permanency planning hearing, the agency that has custody of the child shall
consider whether to file a petition for termination of parental rights.

(11)
Nothing in this chapter may be construed to limit the ability of the agency
that has custody of the child to file a petition for termination of parental
rights or a guardianship petition at any time following the establishment of
dependency. Upon the filing of such a petition, a fact-finding hearing shall
be scheduled and held in accordance with this chapter unless the agency
requests dismissal of the petition prior to the hearing or unless the parties
enter an agreed order terminating parental rights, establishing guardianship,
or otherwise resolving the matter.

(12)
The approval of a permanency plan that does not contemplate return of the child
to the parent does not relieve the supervising agency of its obligation to
provide reasonable services, under this chapter, intended to effectuate the
return of the child to the parent, including but not limited to, visitation
rights.

(13)
Nothing in this chapter may be construed to limit the procedural due process
rights of any party in a termination or guardianship proceeding filed under
this chapter.

Sec.
21. RCW
13.34.165 and 1998 c 296 s 38 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Failure by a party to comply with an order entered under this chapter is civil
contempt of court as provided in RCW 7.21.030(2)(e).

(2)
The maximum term of ((imprisonment)) confinement that may be
imposed as a remedial sanction for contempt of court under this section is
confinement for up to seven days.

(3)
A child ((imprisoned)) held for contempt under this section shall
be confined only in a secure juvenile detention facility operated by or
pursuant to a contract with a county.

(4)
A motion for contempt may be made by a parent, juvenile court personnel, or by
any public agency, organization, or person having custody of the child under a
court order entered pursuant to this chapter.

(5)
Whenever the court finds probable cause to believe, based upon consideration of
a motion for contempt and the information set forth in a supporting
declaration, that a child has violated a placement order entered under this
chapter, the court may issue an order directing law enforcement to pick up and
take the child to detention. The order may be entered ex parte without prior
notice to the child or other parties. Following the child's admission to
detention, a detention review hearing must be held in accordance with RCW
13.32A.065.

Sec.
22. RCW
13.34.170 and 1981 c 195 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

In
any case in which ((an order or decree of)) the ((juvenile))
court ((requiring)) has ordered a parent or parents, guardian, or
other person having custody of a child to pay ((for shelter care and/or))
support ((of such child is)) under RCW 13.34.160 and the order has
not been complied with, the court may, upon such person or persons being
duly summoned or voluntarily appearing, proceed to inquire into the amount due
upon ((said)) the order ((or decree)) and enter judgment
for ((such)) that amount against the defaulting party or parties,
and ((such)) the judgment shall be docketed as are other
judgments for the payment of money.

In
such judgments, the county in which the ((same are)) order is
entered shall be ((denominated)) the judgment creditor, or the state may
be the judgment creditor where the child is in the custody of a state agency ((and
said)). Judgments may be enforced by the prosecuting attorney of ((such))
the county, or the attorney general where the state is the judgment
creditor and any moneys recovered ((thereon)) shall be paid into the
registry of the juvenile court and shall be disbursed to such person, persons,
agency, or governmental department as the court ((shall find to be)) finds
is entitled ((thereto)) to it.

Such
judgments shall remain ((as)) valid and enforceable ((judgments))
for a period of ten years ((subsequent to the)) after the date of
entry ((thereof)).

Sec.
23. RCW
13.34.174 and 1993 c 412 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The provisions of this section shall apply when a court orders a party to
undergo an alcohol or substance abuse diagnostic investigation and evaluation.

(2)
The facility conducting the investigation and evaluation shall make a written
report to the court stating its findings and recommendations including
family-based services or treatment when appropriate. If its findings and
recommendations support treatment, it shall also recommend a treatment plan
setting out:

(a)
Type of treatment;

(b)
Nature of treatment;

(c)
Length of treatment;

(d)
A treatment time schedule; and

(e)
Approximate cost of the treatment.

The
affected person shall be included in developing the appropriate ((plan of))
treatment plan. The ((plan of)) treatment plan must be
signed by (([the])) the treatment provider and the affected
person. The initial written progress report based on the treatment plan
((and response to treatment)) shall be sent to the appropriate
persons six weeks after initiation of treatment((, and)). Subsequent
progress reports shall be provided after three months, ((after)) six
months, ((after)) twelve months, and thereafter every six months if
treatment exceeds twelve months. Reports are to be filed with the court
in a timely manner. Close-out of the treatment record must include summary of
pretreatment and posttreatment, with final outcome and disposition. The report
shall also include recommendations for ongoing stability and decrease in
destructive behavior.

((The))
Each report ((with the treatment plan)) shall also be
filed with the court and a copy given to the person evaluated and the person's
counsel. A copy of the treatment plan shall also be given to the department's
caseworker and to the guardian ad litem. Any program for chemical dependency
shall meet the program requirements contained in chapter 70.96A RCW.

(3)
If the court has ordered treatment pursuant to a dependency proceeding it shall
also require the treatment program to provide, in the reports required by
subsection (2) of this section, status reports to the court, the department,
the supervising child-placing agency if any, and the person or person's counsel
regarding((: (a))) the person's cooperation with the treatment
plan proposed((;)) and (((b))) the person's progress in
treatment.

(4)
((In addition,)) If ((the party)) a person subject to
this section fails or neglects to carry out and fulfill any term or
condition of the treatment plan, the program or agency administering the
treatment shall report such breach to the court, the department, the guardian
ad litem, the supervising child-placing agency if any, and the person or
person's counsel, within twenty-four hours, together with its recommendation.
These reports shall be made as a declaration by the person who is personally
responsible for providing the treatment.

(5)
Nothing in this chapter may be construed as allowing the court to require the
department to pay for the cost of any alcohol or substance abuse evaluation or
treatment program.

Sec.
24. RCW
13.34.176 and 1993 c 412 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The court ((or the department)), upon receiving a report under RCW
13.34.174(4) or at the department's request, may schedule a show cause
hearing to determine whether the person is in violation of the treatment
conditions. All parties shall be given notice of the hearing. The court shall
hold the hearing within ten days of the request for a hearing. At the hearing,
testimony, declarations, reports, or other relevant information may be
presented on the person's alleged failure to comply with the treatment plan and
the person shall have the right to present similar information on his or her
own behalf.

(2)
If the court finds that there has been a violation of the treatment conditions
it shall modify the dependency order, as necessary, to ensure the safety of the
child. The modified order shall remain in effect until the party is in full
compliance with the treatment requirements.

Sec.
25. RCW
13.34.180 and 1998 c 314 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A petition seeking termination of a parent and child relationship may be filed
in juvenile court by any party to the dependency proceedings concerning that
child. Such petition shall conform to the requirements of RCW 13.34.040, shall
be served upon the parties as provided in RCW 13.34.070(8), and shall allege all
of the following unless subsection (2) or (3) of this section applies:

(((1)))
(a) That the child has been found to be a dependent child ((under RCW
13.34.030(4))); ((and

(2))) (b)
That the court has entered a dispositional order pursuant to RCW 13.34.130; ((and

(3))) (c)
That the child has been removed or will, at the time of the hearing, have been
removed from the custody of the parent for a period of at least six months
pursuant to a finding of dependency ((under RCW 13.34.030(4))); ((and

(4))) (d)
That the services ordered under ((RCW 13.34.130)) section 18 of this
act have been expressly and understandably offered or provided and all
necessary services, reasonably available, capable of correcting the parental
deficiencies within the foreseeable future have been expressly and
understandably offered or provided; ((and

(5))) (e)
That there is little likelihood that conditions will be remedied so that the
child can be returned to the parent in the near future. A parent's failure to
substantially improve parental deficiencies within twelve months following
entry of the dispositional order shall give rise to a rebuttable presumption
that there is little likelihood that conditions will be remedied so that the
child can be returned to the parent in the near future. The presumption shall
not arise unless the petitioner makes a showing that all necessary services
reasonably capable of correcting the parental deficiencies within the
foreseeable future have been clearly offered or provided. In determining
whether the conditions will be remedied the court may consider, but is not
limited to, the following factors:

(((a)))
(i) Use of intoxicating or controlled substances so as to render the
parent incapable of providing proper care for the child for extended periods of
time and documented unwillingness of the parent to receive and complete
treatment or documented multiple failed treatment attempts; or

(((b)))
(ii) Psychological incapacity or mental deficiency of the parent that is
so severe and chronic as to render the parent incapable of providing proper
care for the child for extended periods of time, and documented unwillingness
of the parent to receive and complete treatment or documentation that there is
no treatment that can render the parent capable of providing proper care for
the child in the near future; and

(((6)))
(f) That continuation of the parent and child relationship clearly
diminishes the child's prospects for early integration into a stable and
permanent home((; or)).

(((7)))
(2) In lieu of the allegations in subsection((s)) (1) ((through
(6))) of this section, the petition may allege that the child was found
under such circumstances that the whereabouts of the child's parent are unknown
and no person has acknowledged paternity or maternity and requested custody of
the child within two months after the child was found((; or)).

(((8)))
(3) In lieu of the allegations in subsection((s (2) through (6)))
(1)(b) through (f) of this section, the petition may allege that the
parent has been ((found by a court of competent jurisdiction)) convicted
of:

(a)
((To have committed, against another child of such parent,)) Murder
in the first degree, murder in the second degree, or homicide by abuse as
defined in chapter 9A.32 RCW against another child of the parent;

(b)
((To have committed, against another child of such parent,)) Manslaughter
in the first degree or manslaughter in the second degree, as defined in chapter
9A.32 RCW against another child of the parent;

(c)
((To have attempted, conspired, or solicited)) Attempting,
conspiring, or soliciting another to commit one or more of the crimes
listed in (a) or (b) of this subsection; or

(d)
((To have committed)) Assault in the first or second degree, as
defined in chapter 9A.36 RCW, against the surviving child or another child of
the parent.

(4)
Notice of rights shall be served upon the parent, guardian, or legal custodian
with the petition and shall be in substantially the following form:

"NOTICE

A petition for termination of parental rights has been
filed against you. You have important legal rights and you must take steps to
protect your interests. This petition could result in permanent loss of your
parental rights.

1. You have the right to a fact-finding hearing
before a judge.

2. You have the right to have a lawyer represent you
at the hearing. A lawyer can look at the files in your case, talk to the
department of social and health services and other agencies, tell you about the
law, help you understand your rights, and help you at hearings. If you cannot
afford a lawyer, the court will appoint one to represent you. To get a
court-appointed lawyer you must contact: (explain
local procedure) .

3. At the hearing, you have the right to speak on
your own behalf, to introduce evidence, to examine witnesses, and to receive a
decision based solely on the evidence presented to the judge.

You should be present at this hearing.

You may call (insert
agency) for more information about
your child. The agency's name and telephone number are (insert
name and telephone number) ."

Sec.
26. RCW
13.34.190 and 1998 c 314 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

After
hearings pursuant to RCW 13.34.110 or 13.34.130, the court may enter an
order terminating all parental rights to a child only if the court finds
that:

(1)(a)
The allegations contained in the petition as provided in RCW 13.34.180(1) ((through
(6))) are established by clear, cogent, and convincing evidence; or

(b)
((RCW 13.34.180 (3) and (4) may be waived because the allegations under))
The provisions of RCW 13.34.180 (1)((, (2), (5), and (6))) (a),
(b), (e), and (f) are established beyond a reasonable doubt and if so,
then RCW 13.34.180(1) (c) and (d) may be waived. When an infant has been
abandoned, as defined in RCW 13.34.030, and the abandonment has been
proved beyond a reasonable doubt, then RCW 13.34.180(1) (c) and (d) may be
waived; or

(c)
The allegation under RCW 13.34.180(((7))) (2) is established
beyond a reasonable doubt. In determining whether RCW 13.34.180 (((5) and
(6))) (1) (e) and (f) are established beyond a reasonable doubt, the
court shall consider whether one or more of the aggravated circumstances listed
in ((RCW 13.34.130(2))) section 16 of this act exist; or

(d)
The allegation under RCW 13.34.180(((8))) (3) is established
beyond a reasonable doubt; and

(2)
Such an order is in the best interests of the child.

Sec.
27. RCW
13.34.200 and 1977 ex.s. c 291 s 48 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Upon the termination of parental rights pursuant to RCW 13.34.180, all rights,
powers, privileges, immunities, duties, and obligations, including any rights
to custody, control, visitation, or support existing between the child and
parent shall be severed and terminated and the parent shall have no standing to
appear at any further legal proceedings concerning the child: PROVIDED, That
any support obligation existing prior to the effective date of the order
terminating parental rights shall not be severed or terminated. The rights of
one parent may be terminated without affecting the rights of the other parent
and the order shall so state.

(2)
An order terminating the parent and child relationship shall not disentitle a
child to any benefit due the child from any third person, agency, state, or the
United States, nor shall any action under this chapter be deemed to affect any
rights and benefits that ((a native American)) an Indian child
derives from the child's descent from a member of a federally recognized Indian
tribe.

Sec.
28. RCW
13.34.210 and 1991 c 127 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

If,
upon entering an order terminating the parental rights of a parent, there
remains no parent having parental rights, the court shall commit the child to
the custody of the department ((of social and health services)) or to a
licensed child-placing agency willing to accept custody for the purpose of
placing the child for adoption((, or in the absence thereof)). If an
adoptive home has not been identified, the department or agency shall place the
child in a licensed foster home, or take other suitable measures for the
care and welfare of the child. The custodian shall have authority to consent
to the adoption of the child consistent with chapter 26.33 RCW, the marriage of
the child, the enlistment of the child in the armed forces of the United
States, necessary surgical and other medical treatment for the child, and to
consent to such other matters as might normally be required of the parent of
the child.

If
a child has not been adopted within six months after the date of the order and
a ((general guardian)) guardianship of the child under RCW
13.34.231 or chapter 11.88 RCW, or a permanent custody order under chapter
26.10 RCW, has not been ((appointed)) entered by the court,
((the child shall be returned to the court for entry of further orders for
his or her care, custody, and control, and, except for children whose cases are
reviewed by a citizen review board under chapter 13.70 RCW,)) the court
shall review the case every six months ((thereafter)) until a decree of
adoption is entered except for those cases which are reviewed by a citizen
review board under chapter 13.70 RCW.

Sec.
29. RCW
13.34.231 and 1994 c 288 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

At
the hearing on a dependency guardianship petition, all parties have the right
to present evidence and cross examine witnesses. The rules of evidence apply
to the conduct of the hearing. A guardianship shall be established if the
court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that:

(1)
The child has been found to be a dependent child under RCW 13.34.030;

(2)
A dispositional order has been entered pursuant to RCW 13.34.130;

(3)
The child has been removed or will, at the time of the hearing, have been
removed from the custody of the parent for a period of at least six months
pursuant to a finding of dependency under RCW 13.34.030;

(4)
The services ordered under RCW 13.34.130 and section 18 of this act have
been offered or provided and all necessary services, reasonably available,
capable of correcting the parental deficiencies within the foreseeable future
have been offered or provided;

(5)
There is little likelihood that conditions will be remedied so that the child
can be returned to the parent in the near future; and

(6)
A guardianship, rather than termination of the parent-child relationship or
continuation of efforts to return the child to the custody of the parent, would
be in the best interest of the child.

Sec.
30. RCW
13.34.233 and 1995 c 311 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any party may request the court under RCW 13.34.150 to modify or
terminate a dependency guardianship order ((under RCW 13.34.150)).
Notice of any motion to modify or terminate the guardianship shall be served on
all other parties, including any agency that was responsible for supervising
the child's placement at the time the guardianship petition was filed. Notice
((shall)) in all cases shall be served upon the department ((of
social and health services)). If the department was not previously a party
to the guardianship proceeding, the department shall nevertheless have the
right to: (a) Initiate a proceeding to modify or terminate a
guardianship; and ((the right to)) (b) intervene at any
stage of such a proceeding.

(2)
The guardianship may be modified or terminated upon the motion of any party or
the department if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that there
has been a substantial change of circumstances subsequent to the establishment
of the guardianship and that it is in the child's best interest to modify or
terminate the guardianship. The court shall hold a hearing on the motion
before modifying or terminating a guardianship.

(3)
Upon entry of an order terminating the guardianship, the dependency guardian
shall not have any rights or responsibilities with respect to the child and
shall not have legal standing to participate as a party in further dependency
proceedings pertaining to the child. The court may allow the child's
dependency guardian to attend dependency review proceedings pertaining to the
child for the sole purpose of providing information about the child to the
court.

(4)
Upon entry of an order terminating the guardianship, the child shall remain
dependent and the court shall either return the child to the child's parent or
order the child into the custody, control, and care of the department ((of
social and health services)) or a licensed child-placing agency for
placement in a foster home or group care facility licensed pursuant to chapter
74.15 RCW or in a home not required to be licensed pursuant to such chapter.
The court shall not place a child in the custody of the child's parent unless
the court finds that ((a)) reasons for removal as set forth in
RCW 13.34.130 no longer exist((s)) and that such placement is in the
child's best interest. The court shall thereafter conduct reviews as provided
in ((RCW 13.34.130(5))) section 19 of this act and, where
applicable, shall hold a permanency planning hearing in accordance with RCW
13.34.145.

Sec.
31. RCW
13.34.235 and 1981 c 195 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

A dependency
guardianship ((established under RCW 13.34.231 and 13.34.232)) is not
subject to the review hearing requirements of ((RCW 13.34.130)) section
19 of this act unless ordered by the court under RCW 13.34.232(1)(e).

Sec.
32. RCW
13.34.260 and 1990 c 284 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

In
an attempt to minimize the inherent intrusion in the lives of families involved
in the foster care system and to maintain parental authority where appropriate,
the department, absent good cause, shall follow the wishes of the natural
parent regarding the placement of the child. Preferences such as family
constellation, ethnicity, and religion shall be ((given consideration)) considered
when matching children to foster homes. Parental authority is appropriate in
areas that are not connected with the abuse or neglect that resulted in the
dependency and ((should)) shall be integrated through the foster
care team. For purposes of this section, "foster care team" means
the foster parent currently providing care, the currently assigned social
worker, and the parent or parents.

Sec.
33. RCW
13.34.270 and 1998 c 229 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever the department ((of social and health services)) places a ((developmentally
disabled)) child with a developmental disability in out-of-home care
pursuant to RCW 74.13.350, the department shall obtain a judicial determination
within one hundred eighty days of the placement that continued placement is in
the best interests of the child. If the child's out-of-home placement ends
before one hundred eighty days have elapsed, no judicial determination is
required.

(2)
To obtain the judicial determination, the department shall file a petition
alleging that there is located or residing within the county a child who has a
developmental disability((, as defined in RCW 71A.10.020,)) and that the
child has been placed in out-of-home care pursuant to RCW 74.13.350. The
petition shall request that the court review the child's placement, make a
determination ((that)) whether continued placement is in the best
interests of the child, and take other necessary action as provided in this
section. The petition shall contain the name, date of birth, and residence of
the child and the names and residences of the child's parent or legal guardian
who has agreed to the child's placement in out-of-home care. Reasonable
attempts shall be made by the department to ascertain and set forth in the
petition the identity, location, and custodial status of any parent who is not
a party to the placement agreement and why that parent cannot assume custody of
the child.

(3)
Upon filing of the petition, the clerk of the court shall schedule the petition
for a hearing to be held no later than fourteen calendar days after the
petition has been filed. The department shall provide notification of the
time, date, and purpose of the hearing to the parent or legal guardian who has
agreed to the child's placement in out-of-home care. The department shall also
make reasonable attempts to notify any parent who is not a party to the
placement agreement, if the parent's identity and location is known.
Notification under this section may be given by the most expedient means,
including but not limited to, mail, personal service, and telephone((,
and telegraph)).

(4)
The court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for the child as provided in RCW
13.34.100, unless the court for good cause finds the appointment unnecessary.

(5)
Permanency planning hearings shall be held as provided in this ((subsection))
section. At the hearing, the court shall review whether the child's
best interests are served by continued out-of-home placement and determine the
future legal status of the child.

(a)
For children age ten and under, a permanency planning hearing shall be held in
all cases where the child has remained in out-of-home care for at least nine
months and an adoption decree or guardianship order under chapter 11.88 RCW
has not previously been entered. The hearing shall take place no later than
twelve months following commencement of the child's current placement episode.

(b)
For children over age ten, a permanency planning hearing shall be held in all
cases where the child has remained in out-of-home care for at least fifteen
months and an adoption decree or guardianship order under chapter 11.88 RCW
has not previously been entered. The hearing shall take place no later than
eighteen months following commencement of the current placement episode.

(c)
No later than ten working days before the permanency planning hearing, the
department shall submit a written permanency plan to the court and shall mail a
copy of the plan to all parties. The plan shall be directed toward securing a
safe, stable, and permanent home for the child as soon as possible. The plan
shall identify one of the following outcomes as the primary goal and may also
identify additional outcomes as alternative goals: Return of the child to the
home of the child's parent or legal guardian; adoption; guardianship; or
long-term out-of-home care, until the child is age eighteen, with a written
agreement between the parties and the child's care provider.

(d)
If a goal of long-term out-of-home care has been achieved before the permanency
planning hearing, the court shall review the child's status to determine
whether the placement and the plan for the child's care remains appropriate.
In cases where the primary permanency planning goal has not been achieved, the
court shall inquire regarding the reasons why the primary goal has not been
achieved and determine what needs to be done to make it possible to achieve the
primary goal.

(e)
Following the first permanency planning hearing, the court shall hold a further
permanency planning hearing in accordance with this section at least once every
twelve months until a permanency planning goal is achieved or the voluntary
placement agreement is terminated.

(6)
Any party to the voluntary placement agreement may terminate the agreement at
any time. Upon termination of the agreement, the child shall be returned to
the care of the child's parent or legal guardian, unless the child has been
taken into custody pursuant to RCW 13.34.050 or 26.44.050, placed in shelter
care pursuant to RCW 13.34.060, or placed in foster care pursuant to RCW
13.34.130. The department shall notify the court upon termination of the
voluntary placement agreement and return of the child to the care of the
child's parent or legal guardian. Whenever a voluntary placement agreement is
terminated, an action under this section shall be dismissed.

(7) This section does not prevent the department from filing a
dependency petition if there is reason to believe that the child is a dependent
child as defined in RCW 13.34.030. An action filed under this section shall be
dismissed upon the filing of a dependency petition regarding a child who is the
subject of the action under this section.

Sec.
34. RCW
13.34.300 and 1979 ex.s. c 201 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The legislature finds that it is the responsibility of the
custodial parent, parents or guardian to ensure that children within the
custody of such individuals attend school as provided for by law. To this end,
while a parent's failure to cause a juvenile to attend school should not alone
provide a basis for a neglect petition against the parent or guardian, when a
neglect petition is filed on the basis of other evidence, a parent or
guardian's failure to take reasonable steps to ensure that the juvenile attends
school may be ((used as evidence with respect)) relevant to the
question of the appropriate disposition of a neglect petition.

Sec.
35. RCW
13.34.340 and 1999 c 188 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

For
minors who cannot consent to the release of their records with the department
because they are not old enough to consent to treatment, or, if old enough,
lack the capacity to consent, or if the minor is receiving treatment
involuntarily with a provider the department has authorized to provide mental
health treatment under RCW 13.34.320, the department shall disclose, upon the
treating physician's request, all relevant records, including the minor's
passport as established under RCW 74.13.285, in the department's
possession that the treating physician determines contain information required
for treatment of the minor. The treating physician shall maintain all records
received from the department in a manner that distinguishes the records from
any other records in the minor's file with the treating physician and the
department records may not be disclosed by the treating physician to any other
person or entity absent a court order except that, for medical purposes
only, a treating physician may disclose the department records to another
treating physician.

Sec.
36. RCW
13.70.003 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 17 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature recognizes the importance of permanency and continuity to children
and of fairness to parents in the provision of child welfare services.

The
legislature intends to create a citizen review board system that will function
in an advisory capacity to the judiciary, the department, and the legislature.
The purpose of the citizen review board system is to:

(1)
Provide periodic review of cases involving substitute care of children in a
manner that complies with case review requirements and time lines imposed by
federal laws pertaining to child welfare services;

(2)
Improve the quality of case review provided to children in substitute care and
their families; and

(3)
Provide a means for community involvement in monitoring cases of children in
substitute care.

In
order to accomplish the foregoing purposes, the citizen review board system
shall not be subject to the procedures and standards usually applicable to
judicial and administrative hearings, except as otherwise specifically provided
in this chapter and ((RCW 13.34.130)) section 19 of this act,
13.34.145, and 26.44.115. Nothing in this chapter and ((RCW 13.34.130))
section 19 of this act, 13.34.145, and 26.44.115 shall limit the ability
of the department to utilize court review hearings and administrative reviews
to meet the periodic review requirements imposed by federal law.

Sec.
37. RCW
13.70.110 and 1991 c 127 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
This section shall apply to cases where a child has been placed in substitute
care pursuant to a proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW.

(2)
Within forty-five days following commencement of the placement episode, the
court shall assign the child's case to a board and forward to the board a copy
of the dependency petition and any shelter care or dependency disposition
orders which have been entered in the case by the court.

(3)
The board shall review the case plan for each child whose case is assigned to
the board by the court. The review shall take place at times set by the
board. The first review shall occur within ninety days following commencement
of the placement episode. The second review shall occur within six months
following commencement of the placement episode. The next review shall occur
within one year after commencement of the placement episode. Within ((eighteen))
twelve months following commencement of the placement episode, a
permanency planning hearing shall be held before the court in accordance with
RCW 13.34.145. Thereafter, the court shall assign the child's case for a board
review or a court review hearing pursuant to ((RCW 13.34.130(5))) section
17 of this act. A board review or a court review hearing shall take place
at least once every six months until the child is no longer within the
jurisdiction of the court or no longer in substitute care or until a
guardianship order or adoption decree is entered. After the permanency
planning hearing, a court review hearing must occur at least once a year as
provided in ((RCW 13.34.130)) section 19 of this act. The board
shall review any case where a petition to terminate parental rights has been
denied, and such review shall occur as soon as practical but no later than
forty-five days after the denial.

(4)
The board shall prepare written findings and recommendations with respect to:

(a)
Whether reasonable efforts were made before the placement to prevent or
eliminate the need for removal of the child from the home, including whether
consideration was given to removing the alleged offender, rather than the
child, from the home;

(b)
Whether reasonable efforts have been made subsequent to the placement to make
it possible for the child to be returned home;

(c)
Whether the child has been placed in the least-restrictive setting appropriate
to the child's needs, including whether consideration has been given to
placement with the child's relatives;

(d)
Whether there is a continuing need for placement and whether the placement is
appropriate;

(e)
Whether there has been compliance with the case plan;

(f)
Whether progress has been made toward alleviating the need for placement;

(g)
A likely date by which the child may be returned home or other permanent plan
of care may be implemented; and

(h)
Other problems, solutions, or alternatives the board determines should be
explored.

(5)
Within ten working days following the review, the board shall send a copy of
its findings and recommendations to the parents and their attorneys, the
child's custodians and their attorneys, mature children and their attorneys,
other attorneys or guardians ad litem appointed by the court to represent
children, the department and other child placement agencies directly
responsible for supervising the child's placement, and any prosecuting attorney
or attorney general actively involved in the case. If the child is an Indian
as defined in the Indian child welfare act, 25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq., a copy
of the board's findings and recommendations shall also be sent to the child's
Indian tribe.

(6)
If the department is unable or unwilling to implement the board
recommendations, the department shall submit to the board, within ten working days
after receipt of the findings and recommendations, an implementation report
setting forth the reasons why the department is unable or unwilling to
implement the board's recommendations. The report will also set forth the case
plan which the department intends to implement.

(7)
Within forty-five days following the review, the board shall either:

(a)
Schedule the case for further review by the board; or

(b)
Submit to the court the board's findings and recommendations and the
department's implementation reports, if any. If the board's recommendations
are different from the existing court-ordered case plan, the board shall also
file with the court a motion for a review hearing.

(8)
Within ten days of receipt of the board's written findings and recommendations
and the department's implementation report, if any, the court shall review the
findings and recommendations and implementation reports, if any. The court may
on its own motion schedule a review hearing.

(9)
Unless modified by subsequent court order, the court-ordered case plan and
court orders that are in effect at the time that a board reviews a case shall
remain in full force and effect. Board findings and recommendations are
advisory only and do not in any way modify existing court orders or court-ordered
case plans.

(10)
The findings and recommendations of the board and the department's
implementation report, if any, shall become part of the department's case file
and the court social file pertaining to the child.

(11)
Nothing in this section shall limit or otherwise modify the rights of any party
to a dependency proceeding to request and receive a court review hearing
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 13.34 RCW or applicable court rules.

Sec.
38. RCW
13.70.140 and 1993 c 505 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

A
permanency planning hearing shall be held before the court in accordance with
RCW 13.34.145. Thereafter, court review hearings shall occur at least once
every six months, under ((RCW 13.34.130(5))) section 19 of this act,
until the child is no longer within the jurisdiction of the court or the child
returns home or a guardianship order or adoption decree is entered. The court
may review the case more frequently upon the court's own motion or upon the
request of any party to the proceeding.

Sec.
39. RCW
26.44.115 and 1990 c 246 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

If a child is taken into custody by child protective services
pursuant to a court order issued under ((RCW 13.34.050)) section 5 of
this act, the child protective services worker shall take reasonable steps
to advise the parents immediately, regardless of the time of day, that the
child has been taken into custody, the reasons why the child was taken into
custody, and general information about the child's placement. The department
shall comply with RCW 13.34.060 when providing notice under this section.

Sec.
40. RCW
74.15.030 and 1997 c 386 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

The
secretary shall have the power and it shall be the secretary's duty:

(1)
In consultation with the children's services advisory committee, and with the
advice and assistance of persons representative of the various type agencies to
be licensed, to designate categories of facilities for which separate or
different requirements shall be developed as may be appropriate whether because
of variations in the ages, sex and other characteristics of persons served,
variations in the purposes and services offered or size or structure of the
agencies to be licensed hereunder, or because of any other factor relevant
thereto;

(2)
In consultation with the children's services advisory committee, and with the
advice and assistance of persons representative of the various type agencies to
be licensed, to adopt and publish minimum requirements for licensing applicable
to each of the various categories of agencies to be licensed.

The
minimum requirements shall be limited to:

(a)
The size and suitability of a facility and the plan of operation for carrying
out the purpose for which an applicant seeks a license;

(b)
The character, suitability and competence of an agency and other persons
associated with an agency directly responsible for the care and treatment of
children, expectant mothers or developmentally disabled persons. In
consultation with law enforcement personnel, the secretary shall investigate
the conviction record or pending charges and dependency record information
under chapter 43.43 RCW of each agency and its staff seeking licensure or
relicensure. In order to determine the suitability of applicants for an agency
license, licensees, their employees, and other persons who have unsupervised
access to children in care, and who have not resided in the state of Washington
during the three-year period before being authorized to care for children shall
be fingerprinted. The fingerprints shall be forwarded to the Washington state
patrol and federal bureau of investigation for a criminal history records
check. The fingerprint criminal history records checks will be at the expense
of the licensee except that in the case of a foster family home, if this
expense would work a hardship on the licensee, the department shall pay the
expense. The licensee may not pass this cost on to the employee or prospective
employee, unless the employee is determined to be unsuitable due to his or her
criminal history record. The secretary shall use the information solely for
the purpose of determining eligibility for a license and for determining the
character, suitability, and competence of those persons or agencies, excluding
parents, not required to be licensed who are authorized to care for children,
expectant mothers, and developmentally disabled persons. Criminal justice
agencies shall provide the secretary such information as they may have and that
the secretary may require for such purpose;

(c)
The number of qualified persons required to render the type of care and
treatment for which an agency seeks a license;

(d)
The safety, cleanliness, and general adequacy of the premises to provide for
the comfort, care and well-being of children, expectant mothers or
developmentally disabled persons;

(e)
The provision of necessary care, including food, clothing, supervision and
discipline; physical, mental and social well-being; and educational,
recreational and spiritual opportunities for those served;

(f)
The financial ability of an agency to comply with minimum requirements
established pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031; and

(g)
The maintenance of records pertaining to the admission, progress, health and
discharge of persons served;

(3)
To investigate any person, including relatives by blood or marriage except for
parents, for character, suitability, and competence in the care and treatment
of children, expectant mothers, and developmentally disabled persons prior to
authorizing that person to care for children, expectant mothers, and
developmentally disabled persons. However, if a child is placed with a
relative under ((RCW 13.34.060)) section 7 of this act or RCW
13.34.130, and if such relative appears otherwise suitable and competent to
provide care and treatment the criminal history background check required by
this section need not be completed before placement, but shall be completed as
soon as possible after placement;

(4)
On reports of alleged child abuse and neglect, to investigate agencies in
accordance with chapter 26.44 RCW, including child day-care centers and family
day-care homes, to determine whether the alleged abuse or neglect has occurred,
and whether child protective services or referral to a law enforcement agency
is appropriate;

(5)
To issue, revoke, or deny licenses to agencies pursuant to chapter 74.15 RCW
and RCW 74.13.031. Licenses shall specify the category of care which an agency
is authorized to render and the ages, sex and number of persons to be served;

(6)
To prescribe the procedures and the form and contents of reports necessary for
the administration of chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031 and to require
regular reports from each licensee;

(7)
To inspect agencies periodically to determine whether or not there is
compliance with chapter 74.15 RCW and RCW 74.13.031 and the requirements
adopted hereunder;

(8)
To review requirements adopted hereunder at least every two years and to adopt
appropriate changes after consultation with the child care coordinating
committee and other affected groups for child day-care requirements and with
the children's services advisory committee for requirements for other agencies;
and

(9)
To consult with public and private agencies in order to help them improve their
methods and facilities for the care of children, expectant mothers and
developmentally disabled persons.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 41. RCW
13.34.170 shall be recodified to appear immediately following RCW 13.34.160.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 42. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
13.34.162 (Child support schedule) and 1993 c 412 s 10 and 1988 c
275 s 15; and

(2) RCW
13.34.220 (Order terminating parent and child relationship‑-Prevailing
party to present findings, etc., to court, when) and 1979 c 155 s 50.

---
END ---