BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
89.08.210 and 1973 1st ex.s. c 184 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

The
supervisors may employ a secretary, treasurer, technical experts, and
such other officers, agents, and employees, permanent and temporary, as they
may require, and determine their qualifications, duties, and compensation. It
may call upon the attorney general for legal services, or may employ its own
counsel and legal staff. The supervisors may delegate to their chairman, to
one or more supervisors, or to one or more agents or employees such powers and
duties as it deems proper. The supervisors shall furnish to the commission,
upon request, copies of such internal rules, regulations, orders, contracts,
forms, and other documents as they shall adopt or employ, and such other
information concerning their activities as the commission may require in the
performance of its duties under this 1973 amendatory act. The supervisors
shall provide for the execution of surety bonds for officers and all employees
who shall be entrusted with funds or property.

The
supervisors shall provide for the keeping of a full and accurate record of all
proceedings, resolutions, regulations, and orders issued or adopted. The
supervisors shall provide for an annual audit of the accounts of receipts and
disbursements in accordance with procedures prescribed by regulations of the
commission.

The
board may invite the legislative body of any municipality or county near or
within the district, to designate a representative to advise and consult with
it on all questions of program and policy which may affect the property, water
supply, or other interests of such municipality or county. The governing body
of a district shall appoint such advisory committees as may be needed to assure
the availability of appropriate channels of communication to the board of
supervisors, to persons affected by district operations, and to local,
regional, state and interstate special-purpose districts and agencies
responsible for community planning, zoning, or other resource development
activities. The district shall keep such committees informed of its work, and
such advisory committees shall submit recommendations from time to time to the
board of supervisors.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 89.08 RCW to read as follows:

The
treasurer of the county in which a conservation district is located is ex
officio treasurer of the district. However, the board of supervisors by
resolution may designate some other person having experience in financial or
fiscal matters as treasurer of the conservation district. The board of
supervisors shall require a bond, with a surety company authorized to do
business in the state of Washington, in an amount and under the terms and
conditions which the board of supervisors by resolution from time to time finds
will protect the district against loss. The premium on this bond shall be paid
by the district.

All
district funds shall be paid to the treasurer and disbursed only on warrants
issued by an auditor appointed by the board of supervisors, upon orders or
vouchers approved by it. The treasurer shall establish a conservation district
fund into which shall be paid all district funds. The treasurer shall maintain
any special funds created by the board of supervisors for the placement of all
money as the board of supervisors may, by resolution, direct.

If
the treasurer of the district is the treasurer of the county all district funds
shall be deposited with the county depositaries under the same restrictions,
contracts, and security as provided for county depositaries. If the treasurer
of the district is some other person, all funds shall be deposited in a bank or
banks authorized to do business in this state as the board of supervisors, by
resolution, designates.

A district may provide and require a reasonable bond of any other
person handling moneys or securities of the district, if the district pays the
premium.

---
END ---