BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.35.240 and 1996 c 200 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Every ((establishment)) individual engaged in the fitting and
dispensing of hearing instruments shall ((file with the department)) be
covered by a surety bond ((in the sum)) of ten thousand dollars((,
running to the state of Washington)) or more, for the benefit of any
person injured or damaged as a result of any violation by the ((establishment's))
licensee, certificate or permit holder, or their employees or agents of
any of the provisions of this chapter or rules adopted by the secretary.

(2)
In lieu of the surety bond required by this section, the ((establishment may
file with the department a cash)) licensee or certificate or permit
holder may deposit cash or other negotiable security ((acceptable
to the department)) in a banking institution as defined in chapter 30.04
RCW or a credit union as defined in chapter 31.12 RCW. All obligations and
remedies relating to surety bonds shall apply to deposits and security filed in
lieu of surety bonds.

(3)
If a cash deposit or other negotiable security is filed, ((the
department shall deposit the funds. The cash or other negotiable security
deposited with the department shall be returned to the depositor)) the
licensee or certificate or permit holder shall maintain such cash or other
negotiable security for one year after ((the establishment has
discontinued)) discontinuing the fitting and dispensing of hearing
instruments ((if no legal action has been instituted against the
establishment, its agents or employees, or the cash deposit or other security.
The establishment owners shall notify the department if the establishment is
sold, changes names, or has discontinued the fitting and dispensing of hearing
instruments in order that the cash deposit or other security may be released at
the end of one year from that date.

(4)
A surety may file with the department notice of withdrawal of the bond of the
establishment. Upon filing a new bond, or upon the expiration of sixty days
after the filing of notice of withdrawal by the surety, the liability of the
former surety for all future acts of the establishment terminates.

(5)
Upon the filing with the department notice by a surety of withdrawal of the
surety on the bond of an establishment or upon the cancellation by the
department of the bond of a surety under this section, the department shall
immediately give notice to the establishment by certified or registered mail
with return receipt requested addressed to the establishment's last place of
business as filed with the department.

(6)
The department shall immediately cancel the bond given by a surety company upon
being advised that the surety company's license to transact business in this
state has been revoked)).

(((7)))
(4) Each invoice for the purchase of a hearing instrument provided to a
customer must clearly display on the first page the bond number ((of the
establishment or)) covering the licensee or certificate or permit
holder responsible for fitting/dispensing the hearing instrument.

(5)
All licensed hearing instrument fitter/dispensers, certified audiologists, and
permit holders must verify compliance with the requirement to hold a surety
bond or cash or other negotiable security by submitting a signed declaration of
compliance upon annual renewal of their license, certificate, or permit. Up to
twenty-five percent of the credential holders may be randomly audited for
surety bond compliance after the credential is renewed. It is the credential holder's
responsibility to submit a copy of the original surety bond or bonds, or
documentation that cash or other negotiable security is held in a banking
institution during the time period being audited. Failure to comply with the
audit documentation request or failure to supply acceptable documentation
within thirty days may result in disciplinary action.

Sec.
2. RCW
18.35.240 and 1998 c 142 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Every ((establishment)) individual engaged in the fitting and
dispensing of hearing instruments shall ((file with the department)) be
covered by a surety bond ((in the sum)) of ten thousand dollars((,
running to the state of Washington)) or more, for the benefit of any
person injured or damaged as a result of any violation by the ((establishment's))
licensee, certificate or permit holder, or their employees or agents of
any of the provisions of this chapter or rules adopted by the secretary.

(2)
In lieu of the surety bond required by this section, the ((establishment may
file with the department a cash)) licensee or certificate or permit
holder may deposit cash or other negotiable security ((acceptable
to the department)) in a banking institution as defined in chapter 30.04
RCW or a credit union as defined in chapter 31.12 RCW. All obligations and
remedies relating to surety bonds shall apply to deposits and security filed in
lieu of surety bonds.

(3)
If a cash deposit or other negotiable security is filed, ((the
department shall deposit the funds. The cash or other negotiable security
deposited with the department shall be returned to the depositor)) the
licensee or certificate or permit holder shall maintain such cash or other
negotiable security for one year after ((the establishment has discontinued))
discontinuing the fitting and dispensing of hearing instruments ((if
no legal action has been instituted against the establishment, its agents or
employees, or the cash deposit or other security. The establishment owners
shall notify the department if the establishment is sold, changes names, or has
discontinued the fitting and dispensing of hearing instruments in order that
the cash deposit or other security may be released at the end of one year from
that date.

(4)
A surety may file with the department notice of withdrawal of the bond of the
establishment. Upon filing a new bond, or upon the expiration of sixty days
after the filing of notice of withdrawal by the surety, the liability of the
former surety for all future acts of the establishment terminates.

(5)
Upon the filing with the department notice by a surety of withdrawal of the
surety on the bond of an establishment or upon the cancellation by the
department of the bond of a surety under this section, the department shall
immediately give notice to the establishment by certified or registered mail
with return receipt requested addressed to the establishment's last place of
business as filed with the department.

(6)
The department shall immediately cancel the bond given by a surety company upon
being advised that the surety company's license to transact business in this
state has been revoked)).

(((7)))
(4) Each invoice for the purchase of a hearing instrument provided to a
customer must clearly display on the first page the bond number ((of the
establishment or)) covering the licensee or certificate or interim
permit holder responsible for fitting/dispensing the hearing instrument.

(5)
All licensed hearing instrument fitter/dispensers, certified audiologists, and
permit holders must verify compliance with the requirement to hold a surety
bond or cash or other negotiable security by submitting a signed declaration of
compliance upon annual renewal of their license, certificate, or permit. Up to
twenty-five percent of the credential holders may be randomly audited for
surety bond compliance after the credential is renewed. It is the credential
holder's responsibility to submit a copy of the original surety bond or bonds,
or documentation that cash or other negotiable security is held in a banking
institution during the time period being audited. Failure to comply with the
audit documentation request or failure to supply acceptable documentation
within thirty days may result in disciplinary action.

Sec.
3. RCW
18.35.250 and 1996 c 200 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In addition to any other legal remedies, an action may be brought in any court
of competent jurisdiction upon the bond, cash deposit, or security in lieu of a
surety bond required by this chapter, by any person having a claim against a
licensee or certificate or permit holder, agent, or ((establishment)) employee
for any violation of this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter. The
aggregate liability of the surety, cash deposit, or other negotiable
security to all claimants shall in no event exceed the sum of the bond.
Claims shall be satisfied in the order of judgment rendered.

(2)
An action upon the bond, cash deposit, or other negotiable security
shall be commenced by serving and filing ((the)) a complaint ((within
one year from the date of the cancellation of the bond. An action upon a cash
deposit or other security shall be commenced by serving and filing the
complaint within one year from the date of notification to the department of
the change in ownership of the establishment or the discontinuation of the
fitting and dispensing of hearing instruments by that establishment. Two
copies of the complaint shall be served by registered or certified mail, return
receipt requested, upon the department at the time the suit is started. The
service constitutes service on the surety. The secretary shall transmit one
copy of the complaint to the surety within five business days after the copy
has been received.

(3)
The secretary shall maintain a record, available for public inspection, of all
suits commenced under this chapter under surety bonds, or the cash or other
security deposited in lieu of the surety bond. In the event that any final
judgment impairs the liability of the surety upon a bond so furnished or the
amount of the deposit so that there is not in effect a bond undertaking or
deposit in the full amount prescribed in this section, the department shall
suspend the license or certificate until the bond undertaking or deposit in the
required amount, unimpaired by unsatisfied judgment claims, has been furnished.

(4)
If a judgment is entered against the deposit or security required under this
chapter, the department shall, upon receipt of a certified copy of a final
judgment, pay the judgment from the amount of the deposit or security)).

Sec.
4. RCW
18.35.250 and 1998 c 142 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In addition to any other legal remedies, an action may be brought in any court
of competent jurisdiction upon the bond, cash deposit, or security in lieu of a
surety bond required by this chapter, by any person having a claim against a
licensee or certificate or interim permit holder, agent, or ((establishment))
employee for any violation of this chapter or any rule adopted under
this chapter. The aggregate liability of the surety, cash deposit, or other
negotiable security to all claimants shall in no event exceed the sum of
the bond. Claims shall be satisfied in the order of judgment rendered.

(2)
An action upon the bond, cash deposit, or other negotiable security
shall be commenced by serving and filing ((the)) a complaint ((within
one year from the date of the cancellation of the bond. An action upon a cash
deposit or other security shall be commenced by serving and filing the
complaint within one year from the date of notification to the department of
the change in ownership of the establishment or the discontinuation of the
fitting and dispensing of hearing instruments by that establishment. Two
copies of the complaint shall be served by registered or certified mail, return
receipt requested, upon the department at the time the suit is started. The
service constitutes service on the surety. The secretary shall transmit one
copy of the complaint to the surety within five business days after the copy
has been received.

(3)
The secretary shall maintain a record, available for public inspection, of all
suits commenced under this chapter under surety bonds, or the cash or other
security deposited in lieu of the surety bond. In the event that any final
judgment impairs the liability of the surety upon a bond so furnished or the
amount of the deposit so that there is not in effect a bond undertaking or
deposit in the full amount prescribed in this section, the department shall
suspend the license or certificate until the bond undertaking or deposit in the
required amount, unimpaired by unsatisfied judgment claims, has been furnished.

(4)
If a judgment is entered against the deposit or security required under this
chapter, the department shall, upon receipt of a certified copy of a final
judgment, pay the judgment from the amount of the deposit or security)).

Sec.
5. RCW
18.48.020 and 1996 c 81 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The secretary shall register adult family home providers and resident managers.

(2)
The secretary, by policy or rule, shall define terms and establish forms and
procedures for registration applications, including the payment of registration
fees pursuant to RCW 43.70.250. An application for an adult family home
resident manager or provider registration shall include at least the following
information:

(a)
Name and address; and

(b)
If the provider is a corporation, copies of its articles of incorporation and
current bylaws, together with the names and addresses of its officers and
directors.

(((3)
The secretary shall adopt policies or rules to establish the registration
periods, fees, and procedures. If the adult family home is sold or ownership
or management is transferred, the registration shall be voided and the provider
and resident manager shall apply for a new registration.))

Sec.
6. RCW
18.52.030 and 1992 c 53 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Nursing
homes operating within this state shall be under the active, overall
administrative charge and supervision of an on-site full-time administrator
licensed as provided in this chapter. No person acting in any capacity, unless
the holder of a nursing home administrator's license issued under this chapter,
shall be charged with the overall responsibility to make decisions or direct
actions involved in managing the internal operation of a nursing home, except
as specifically delegated in writing by the administrator to identify a
responsible person to act on the administrator's behalf when the administrator
is absent. The administrator shall review the decisions upon the
administrator's return and amend the decisions if necessary. The board shall
define by rule the parameters for on-site full-time administrators in nursing
homes with small resident populations and nursing homes in rural areas, or
separately licensed facilities collocated on the same campus((, as well as
provide for the administrative requirements for nursing homes that are
temporarily without administrators)).

Sec.
7. RCW
18.83.135 and 1999 c 66 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to the authority prescribed under RCW 18.130.050, the board shall have
the following authority:

(1)
To maintain records of all activities, and to publish and distribute to all
psychologists at least once each year abstracts of significant activities of
the ((committee)) board;

(2)
To obtain the written consent of the complaining client or patient or their
legal representative, or of any person who may be affected by the complaint, in
order to obtain information which otherwise might be confidential or
privileged; and

(3)
To apply the provisions of the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, to
all persons licensed as psychologists under this chapter.

Sec.
8. RCW
18.92.013 and 1993 c 78 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A veterinarian legally prescribing drugs may delegate to a registered
veterinary medication clerk or a registered ((animal)) veterinary
technician, while under the veterinarian's direct supervision, certain
nondiscretionary functions defined by the board and used in the dispensing of
legend and nonlegend drugs (except controlled substances as defined in or under
chapter 69.50 RCW) associated with the practice of veterinary medicine. Upon
final approval of the packaged prescription following a direct physical
inspection of the packaged prescription for proper formulation, packaging, and
labeling by the veterinarian, the veterinarian may delegate the delivery of the
prescription to a registered veterinary medication clerk or registered ((animal))
veterinary technician, while under the veterinarian's indirect
supervision. Dispensing of drugs by veterinarians, registered ((animal))
veterinary technicians, and registered veterinary medication clerks
shall meet the applicable requirements of chapters 18.64, 69.40, 69.41, and
69.50 RCW and is subject to inspection by the board of pharmacy investigators.

(2)
For the purposes of this section:

(a)
"Direct supervision" means the veterinarian is on the premises and is
quickly and easily available; and

(b)
"Indirect supervision" means the veterinarian is not on the premises
but has given written or oral instructions for the delegated task.

Sec.
9. RCW
18.92.015 and 1993 c 78 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

"((Animal))
Veterinary technician" means a person who has successfully
completed an examination administered by the board and who has either
successfully completed a post high school course approved by the board in the
care and treatment of animals or had five years' practical experience,
acceptable to the board, with a licensed veterinarian.

"Board"
means the Washington state veterinary board of governors.

"Department"
means the department of health.

"Secretary"
means the secretary of the department of health.

"Veterinary medication clerk" means a person who has
satisfactorily completed a board-approved training program developed in
consultation with the board of pharmacy and designed to prepare persons to
perform certain nondiscretionary functions defined by the board and used in the
dispensing of legend and nonlegend drugs (except controlled substances as
defined in or under chapter 69.50 RCW) associated with the practice of
veterinary medicine.

Sec.
10. RCW
18.92.030 and 1995 c 198 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board shall develop and administer, or approve, or both, a licensure examination
in the subjects determined by the board to be essential to the practice of
veterinary medicine, surgery, and dentistry. The board may approve an
examination prepared or administered by a private testing agency or association
of licensing authorities. The board, under chapter 34.05 RCW, may adopt rules
necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including the performance
of the duties and responsibilities of ((animal)) veterinary
technicians and veterinary medication clerks. The rules shall be adopted in
the interest of good veterinary health care delivery to the consuming public
and shall not prevent ((animal)) veterinary technicians from
inoculating an animal. The board also has the power to adopt by rule standards
prescribing requirements for veterinary medical facilities and fixing minimum
standards of continuing veterinary medical education.

The department is the official office of record.

Sec.
11. RCW
18.92.060 and 1995 c 317 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing
in this chapter applies to:

(1)
Commissioned veterinarians in the United States military services or
veterinarians employed by Washington state and federal agencies while
performing official duties;

(2)
A person practicing veterinary medicine upon his or her own animal;

(3)
A person advising with respect to or performing the castrating and dehorning of
cattle, castrating and docking of sheep, castrating of swine, caponizing of
poultry, or artificial insemination of animals;

(4)(a)
A person who is a regularly enrolled student in a veterinary school or training
course approved under RCW 18.92.015 and performing duties or actions assigned
by his or her instructors or working under the direct supervision of a licensed
veterinarian during a school vacation period or (b) a person performing
assigned duties under the supervision of a veterinarian within the established
framework of an internship program recognized by the board;

(5)
A veterinarian regularly licensed in another state consulting with a licensed
veterinarian in this state;

(6)
((An animal)) A veterinary technician or veterinary medication
clerk acting under the supervision and control of a licensed veterinarian. The
practice of ((an animal)) a veterinary technician or veterinary
medication clerk is limited to the performance of services which are authorized
by the board;

(7)
An owner being assisted in practice by his or her employees when employed in
the conduct of the owner's business;

(8)
An owner being assisted in practice by some other person gratuitously;

(9)
The implanting in their own animals of any electronic device for identifying
animals by established humane societies and animal control organizations that
provide appropriate training, as determined by the veterinary board of
governors, and/or direct or indirect supervision by a licensed veterinarian;

(10) The implanting of any electronic device by a public fish and
wildlife agency for the identification of fish or wildlife.

Sec.
12. RCW
18.92.125 and 1993 c 78 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

No veterinarian who uses the services of ((an animal)) a
veterinary technician or veterinary medication clerk shall be considered as
aiding and abetting any unlicensed person to practice veterinary medicine. A
veterinarian retains professional and personal responsibility for any act which
constitutes the practice of veterinary medicine as defined in this chapter when
performed by ((an animal)) a veterinary technician or veterinary
medication clerk in his or her employ.

Sec.
13. RCW
18.92.140 and 1996 c 191 s 79 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
person now qualified to practice veterinary medicine, surgery, and dentistry,
registered as ((an animal)) a veterinary technician, or
registered as a veterinary medication clerk in this state or who becomes
licensed or registered to engage in practice shall comply with administrative
procedures, administrative requirements, and fees determined as provided in RCW
43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

Sec.
14. RCW
18.92.145 and 1996 c 191 s 80 are each amended to read as follows:

Administrative
procedures, administrative requirements, and fees shall be established as
provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280 for the issuance, renewal, or
administration of the following licenses, certificates of registration,
permits, duplicate licenses, renewals, or examination:

(1)
For a license to practice veterinary medicine, surgery, and dentistry issued
upon an examination given by the examining board;

(2)
For a license to practice veterinary medicine, surgery, and dentistry issued
upon the basis of a license issued in another state;

(3)
For a certificate of registration as ((an animal)) a veterinary
technician;

(4)
For a certificate of registration as a veterinary medication clerk;

(5)
For a temporary permit to practice veterinary medicine, surgery, and
dentistry. The temporary permit fee shall be accompanied by the full amount of
the examination fee; and

(6)
For a license to practice specialized veterinary medicine.

Sec.
15. RCW
18.120.020 and 1997 c 334 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

The
definitions ((contained)) in this section ((shall)) apply
throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Applicant group" includes any health professional group or
organization, any individual, or any other interested party which proposes that
any health professional group not presently regulated be regulated or which
proposes to substantially increase the scope of practice of the profession.

(2)
"Certificate" and "certification" mean a voluntary process
by which a statutory regulatory entity grants recognition to an individual who
(a) has met certain prerequisite qualifications specified by that regulatory
entity, and (b) may assume or use "certified" in the title or
designation to perform prescribed health professional tasks.

(3)
"Grandfather clause" means a provision in a regulatory statute
applicable to practitioners actively engaged in the regulated health profession
prior to the effective date of the regulatory statute which exempts the
practitioners from meeting the prerequisite qualifications set forth in the
regulatory statute to perform prescribed occupational tasks.

(4)
"Health professions" means and includes the following health and
health-related licensed or regulated professions and occupations: Podiatric
medicine and surgery under chapter 18.22 RCW; chiropractic under chapter 18.25
RCW; dental hygiene under chapter 18.29 RCW; dentistry under chapter 18.32 RCW;
denturism under chapter 18.30 RCW; dispensing opticians under chapter 18.34
RCW; hearing instruments under chapter 18.35 RCW; naturopaths under chapter 18.36A
RCW; embalming and funeral directing under chapter 18.39 RCW; midwifery under
chapter 18.50 RCW; nursing home administration under chapter 18.52 RCW;
optometry under chapters 18.53 and 18.54 RCW; ocularists under chapter 18.55
RCW; osteopathic medicine and surgery under chapters 18.57 and 18.57A RCW;
pharmacy under chapters 18.64 and 18.64A RCW; medicine under chapters 18.71 and
18.71A RCW; emergency medicine under chapter 18.73 RCW; physical therapy under
chapter 18.74 RCW; practical nurses under chapter 18.79 RCW; psychologists
under chapter 18.83 RCW; registered nurses under chapter 18.79 RCW;
occupational therapists licensed under chapter 18.59 RCW; respiratory care
practitioners licensed under chapter 18.89 RCW; veterinarians and ((animal))
veterinary technicians under chapter 18.92 RCW; health care assistants
under chapter 18.135 RCW; massage practitioners under chapter 18.108 RCW;
acupuncturists licensed under chapter 18.06 RCW; persons registered or
certified under chapter 18.19 RCW; dietitians and nutritionists certified by
chapter 18.138 RCW; radiologic technicians under chapter 18.84 RCW; and nursing
assistants registered or certified under chapter 18.88A RCW.

(5)
"Inspection" means the periodic examination of practitioners by a
state agency in order to ascertain whether the practitioners' occupation is
being carried out in a fashion consistent with the public health, safety, and
welfare.

(6)
"Legislative committees of reference" means the standing legislative
committees designated by the respective rules committees of the senate and
house of representatives to consider proposed legislation to regulate health
professions not previously regulated.

(7)
"License," "licensing," and "licensure" mean
permission to engage in a health profession which would otherwise be unlawful
in the state in the absence of the permission. A license is granted to those
individuals who meet prerequisite qualifications to perform prescribed health
professional tasks and for the use of a particular title.

(8)
"Professional license" means an individual, nontransferable
authorization to carry on a health activity based on qualifications which
include: (a) Graduation from an accredited or approved program, and (b)
acceptable performance on a qualifying examination or series of examinations.

(9)
"Practitioner" means an individual who (a) has achieved knowledge and
skill by practice, and (b) is actively engaged in a specified health
profession.

(10)
"Public member" means an individual who is not, and never was, a
member of the health profession being regulated or the spouse of a member, or
an individual who does not have and never has had a material financial interest
in either the rendering of the health professional service being regulated or
an activity directly related to the profession being regulated.

(11)
"Registration" means the formal notification which, prior to
rendering services, a practitioner shall submit to a state agency setting forth
the name and address of the practitioner; the location, nature and operation of
the health activity to be practiced; and, if required by the regulatory entity,
a description of the service to be provided.

(12)
"Regulatory entity" means any board, commission, agency, division, or
other unit or subunit of state government which regulates one or more
professions, occupations, industries, businesses, or other endeavors in this
state.

(13)
"State agency" includes every state office, department, board,
commission, regulatory entity, and agency of the state, and, where provided by
law, programs and activities involving less than the full responsibility of a
state agency.

Sec.
16. RCW
18.73.030 and 1990 c 269 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
a different meaning is plainly required by the context, the following words and
phrases as used in this chapter shall have the meanings indicated.

(1)
"Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health.

(2)
"Department" means the department of health.

(3)
"Committee" means the emergency medical services licensing and
certification advisory committee.

(4)
"Ambulance" means a ground or air vehicle designed and used to
transport the ill and injured and to provide personnel, facilities, and
equipment to treat patients before and during transportation.

(5)
"Aid vehicle" means a vehicle used to carry aid equipment and
individuals trained in first aid or emergency medical procedure.

(6)
"Emergency medical technician" means a person who is authorized by
the secretary to render emergency medical care pursuant to RCW 18.73.081.

(7)
(("Ambulance operator" means a person who owns one or more
ambulances and operates them as a private business.

(8)
"Ambulance director" means a person who is a director of a service
which operates one or more ambulances provided by a volunteer organization or
governmental agency.

(9)
"Aid vehicle operator" means a person who owns one or more aid
vehicles and operates them as a private business.

(10)
"Aid director" means a person who is a director of a service which
operates one or more aid vehicles provided by a volunteer organization or
governmental agency.

(11))) "Ambulance
service" means an organization that operates one or more ambulances.

(8)
"Aid service" means an organization that operates one or more aid
vehicles.

(9)
"Emergency medical service" means medical treatment and care which
may be rendered at the scene of any medical emergency or while transporting any
patient in an ambulance to an appropriate medical facility, including ambulance
transportation between medical facilities.

(((12)))
(10) "Communications system" means a radio and landline
network which provides rapid public access, coordinated central dispatching of
services, and coordination of personnel, equipment, and facilities in an
emergency medical services and trauma care system.

(((13)))
(11) "Prehospital patient care protocols" means the written
procedure adopted by the emergency medical services medical program director
which direct the out-of-hospital emergency care of the emergency patient which
includes the trauma care patient. These procedures shall be based upon the
assessment of the patient's medical needs and what treatment will be provided
for emergency conditions. The protocols shall meet or exceed state-wide
minimum standards developed by the department in rule as authorized in chapter
70.168 RCW.

(((14)))
(12) "Patient care procedures" means written operating
guidelines adopted by the regional emergency medical services and trauma care
council, in consultation with the local emergency medical services and trauma
care councils, emergency communication centers, and the emergency medical
services medical program director, in accordance with state-wide minimum
standards. The patient care procedures shall identify the level of medical
care personnel to be dispatched to an emergency scene, procedures for triage of
patients, the level of trauma care facility to first receive the patient, and
the name and location of other trauma care facilities to receive the patient
should an interfacility transfer be necessary. Procedures on interfacility
transfer of patients shall be consistent with the transfer procedures in
chapter 70.170 RCW.

(((15)))
(13) "Emergency medical services medical program director"
means a person who is an approved medical program director as defined by RCW
18.71.205(4).

(((16)))
(14) "Council" means the local or regional emergency medical
services and trauma care council as authorized under chapter 70.168 RCW.

(((17)))
(15) "Basic life support" means noninvasive emergency medical
services requiring basic medical treatment skills as defined in chapter 18.73
RCW.

(((18)))
(16) "Advanced life support" means invasive emergency medical
services requiring advanced medical treatment skills as defined by chapter
18.71 RCW.

(((19)))
(17) "First responder" means a person who is authorized by the
secretary to render emergency medical care as defined by RCW 18.73.081.

Sec.
17. RCW
18.73.101 and 1987 c 214 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The
secretary may grant a variance from a provision of this chapter and RCW
18.71.200 through 18.71.220 if no detriment to health and safety would result
from the variance and compliance is expected to cause reduction or loss of
existing emergency medical services. Variances may be granted for a period of
no more than one year. A variance may be renewed by the secretary upon
approval of the committee.

Sec.
18. RCW
18.73.130 and 1992 c 128 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

An
ambulance ((operator, ambulance director, aid vehicle operator or aid
director)) service or aid service may not operate ((a service))
in the state of Washington without holding a license for such operation, issued
by the secretary when such operation is consistent with the state-wide and
regional emergency medical services and trauma care plans established pursuant
to chapter 70.168 RCW, indicating the general area to be served and the number
of vehicles to be used, with the following exceptions:

(1)
The United States government;

(2)
Ambulance ((operators and ambulance directors)) services
providing service in other states when bringing patients into this state;

(3)
Owners of businesses in which ambulance or aid vehicles are used exclusively on
company property but occasionally in emergencies may transport patients to
hospitals not on company property; and

(4)
Operators of vehicles pressed into service for transportation of patients in
emergencies when licensed ambulances are not available or cannot meet
overwhelming demand.

The
license shall be valid for a period of two years and shall be renewed on
request provided the holder has consistently complied with the regulations of
the department and the department of licensing and provided also that the needs
of the area served have been met satisfactorily. The license shall not be
transferable and may be revoked if the service is found in violation of
rules adopted by the department.

Sec.
19. RCW
18.73.140 and 1992 c 128 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
secretary shall issue an ambulance or aid vehicle license for each vehicle so
designated. The license shall be for a period of two years and may be reissued
on expiration if the vehicle and its equipment meet requirements in force at
the time of expiration of the license period. The license may be revoked if
the ambulance or aid vehicle is found to be operating in violation of the
regulations promulgated by the department or without required equipment. The
license shall be terminated automatically if the vehicle is sold or transferred
to the control of ((anyone)) any organization not currently
licensed as an ambulance or aid vehicle ((operator or director)) service.
The license number shall be prominently displayed on each vehicle.

Sec.
20. RCW
70.168.020 and 1990 c 269 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is hereby created an emergency medical services and trauma care steering
committee composed of representatives of individuals knowledgeable in emergency
medical services and trauma care, including emergency medical providers such as
physicians, nurses, hospital personnel, emergency medical technicians,
paramedics, ambulance ((operators)) services, a member of the
emergency medical services licensing and certification advisory committee,
local government officials, state officials, consumers, and persons affiliated
professionally with health science schools. The governor shall appoint members
of the steering committee. Members shall be appointed for a period of three
years. The department shall provide administrative support to the committee.
All appointive members of the committee, in the performance of their duties,
may be entitled to receive travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060. The governor may remove members from the committee who have three
unexcused absences from committee meetings. The governor shall fill any
vacancies of the committee in a timely manner. The terms of those members
representing the same field shall not expire at the same time.

The
committee shall elect a chair and a vice-chair whose terms of office shall be
for one year each. The chair shall be ineligible for reelection after serving
four consecutive terms.

The
committee shall meet on call by the governor, the secretary, or the chair.

(2)
The emergency medical services and trauma care steering committee shall:

(a)
Advise the department regarding emergency medical services and trauma care
needs throughout the state.

(b)
Review the regional emergency medical services and trauma care plans and
recommend changes to the department before the department adopts the plans.

(c)
Review proposed departmental rules for emergency medical services and trauma
care.

(d)
Recommend modifications in rules regarding emergency medical services and
trauma care.

Sec.
21. RCW
71.12.455 and 1977 ex.s. c 80 s 43 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, "establishment" and "institution"
mean and include every private hospital, sanitarium, home, or other place
receiving or caring for any mentally ill, ((or)) mentally incompetent
person, or ((alcoholic)) chemically dependent person.

Sec.
22. RCW
71.12.460 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 226 are each amended to read as follows:

No
person, association, or corporation, shall establish or keep, for compensation
or hire, an establishment as defined in this chapter without first having
obtained a license therefor from the department of health, complied with
rules adopted under this chapter, and ((having)) paid the license
fee provided in this chapter. Any person who carries on, conducts, or attempts
to carry on or conduct an establishment as defined in this chapter without
first having obtained a license from the department of health, as in this
chapter provided, is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction thereof shall be
punished by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months, or by a
fine not exceeding one thousand dollars, or by both such fine and
imprisonment. The managing and executive officers of any corporation violating
the provisions of this chapter shall be liable under the provisions of this
chapter in the same manner and to the same effect as a private individual
violating the same.

Sec.
23. RCW
71.12.470 and 1987 c 75 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
application for a license shall be accompanied by a plan of the premises
proposed to be occupied, describing the capacities of the buildings for the
uses intended, the extent and location of grounds appurtenant thereto, and the
number of patients proposed to be received therein, with such other
information, and in such form, as the department of health requires.
The application shall be accompanied by the proper license fee. The amount of
the license fee shall be established by the department of health under
RCW ((43.20B.110)) 43.70.110.

Sec.
24. RCW
71.12.480 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 227 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of health shall not grant any such license until it has made an
examination of all phases of the operation of the establishment necessary to
determine compliance with rules adopted under this chapter including the
premises proposed to be licensed and is satisfied that ((they)) the
premises are substantially as described, and are otherwise fit and suitable
for the purposes for which they are designed to be used, and that such license
should be granted.

Sec.
25. RCW
71.12.500 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 230 and 1989 c 175 s 137 are each reenacted
and amended to read as follows:

The
department of health may at any time examine and ascertain how far a licensed
establishment is conducted in compliance with this chapter, the rules
adopted under this chapter, and the requirements of the license therefor.
If the interests of the patients of the establishment so demand, the department
may, for just and reasonable cause, suspend, modify, or revoke any such
license. RCW ((43.20A.205)) 43.70.115 governs notice of a
license denial, revocation, suspension, or modification and provides the right
to an adjudicative proceeding.

Sec.
26. RCW
71.12.510 and 1959 c 25 s 71.12.510 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of health may at any time cause any establishment as defined
in this chapter to be visited and examined.

Sec.
27. RCW
71.12.520 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 231 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
such visit may include an inspection of every part of each establishment. The
representatives of the department of health may make an examination of all
records, methods of administration, the general and special dietary, the stores
and methods of supply, and may cause an examination and diagnosis to be made of
any person confined therein. The representatives of the department of
health may examine to determine their fitness for their duties the
officers, attendants, and other employees, and may talk with any of the
patients apart from the officers and attendants.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 28. A
new section is added to chapter 71.12 RCW to read as follows:

The
department of health shall adopt rules for the licensing, operation, and
inspections of establishments and institutions and the enforcement thereof.

Sec.
29. RCW
18.46.005 and 1951 c 168 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
purpose of this chapter is to provide for the development, establishment, and
enforcement of standards for the maintenance and operation of ((maternity
homes)) birthing centers, which, in the light of advancing
knowledge, will promote safe and adequate care and treatment of the individuals
therein.

Sec.
30. RCW
18.46.010 and 1991 c 3 s 100 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
(("Maternity home")) "Birthing center" or
"childbirth center" means any ((home, place, hospital or
institution in which facilities are maintained for the care of four or more
women, not related by blood or marriage to the operator, during pregnancy or
during or within ten days after delivery)) health facility, not part of
a hospital or in a hospital, that provides facilities and staff to support a
birth service to low-risk maternity clients: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That this
chapter shall not apply to any hospital approved by the American College of
Surgeons, American Osteopathic Association, or its successor.

(2)
(("Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation,
company, association, or joint stock association, and the legal successor
thereof.

(3)))
"Department" means the state department of health.

(3)
"Low-risk" means normal, uncomplicated prenatal course as determined
by adequate prenatal care and prospects for a normal uncomplicated birth as
defined by reasonable and generally accepted criteria of maternal and fetal
health.

(4)
"Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation,
company, association, or joint stock association, and the legal successor
thereof.

Sec.
31. RCW
18.46.020 and 1951 c 168 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

After
July 1, 1951, no person shall operate a ((maternity home)) birthing
center in this state without a license under this chapter.

Sec.
32. RCW
18.46.040 and 1987 c 75 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon
receipt of an application for a license and the license fee, the licensing
agency shall issue a license if the applicant and the ((maternity home
facilities)) birthing center meet the requirements established under
this chapter. A license, unless suspended or revoked, shall be renewable
annually. Applications for renewal shall be on forms provided by the
department and shall be filed in the department not less than ten days prior to
its expiration. Each application for renewal shall be accompanied by a license
fee as established by the department under RCW 43.20B.110. Each license shall
be issued only for the premises and persons named in the application and shall
not be transferable or assignable except with the written approval of the
department. Licenses shall be posted in a conspicuous place on the licensed
premises.

Sec.
33. RCW
18.46.060 and 1985 c 213 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department, after consultation with representatives of ((maternity home))
birthing center operators, state medical association, Washington
Osteopathic Association, state nurses association, state hospital association, state
midwives association, and any other representatives as the department may
deem necessary, shall adopt, amend, and promulgate such rules and regulations
with respect to all ((maternity homes)) birthing centers in the
promotion of safe and adequate medical and nursing care ((of inmates))
in the ((maternity home)) birthing center and the sanitary,
hygienic, and safe condition of the ((maternity home)) birthing
center in the interest of the health, safety, and welfare of the
people.

Sec.
34. RCW
18.46.070 and 1951 c 168 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
((maternity home)) birthing center which is in operation at the
time of promulgation of any applicable rules or regulations under this chapter
shall be given a reasonable time, under the particular circumstances, not to
exceed three months from the date of such promulgation, to comply with the
rules and regulations established under this chapter.

Sec.
35. RCW
18.46.080 and 1951 c 168 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department shall make or cause to be made an inspection and investigation of
all ((maternity homes)) birthing centers, and every inspection
may include an inspection of every part of the premises. The department may
make an examination of all records, methods of administration, the general and
special dietary and the stores and methods of supply. The ((board)) department
may prescribe by regulation that any licensee or applicant desiring to make
specified types of alteration or addition to its facilities or to construct new
facilities shall before commencing such alterations, addition, or new
construction submit plans and specifications therefor to the department for
preliminary inspection and approval or recommendations with respect to compliance
with regulations and standards herein authorized. Necessary conferences and
consultations may be provided.

Sec.
36. RCW
18.46.090 and 1951 c 168 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

All
information received by the department through filed reports, inspection, or as
otherwise authorized under this chapter shall not be disclosed publicly in any
manner as to identify individuals or ((maternity homes)) birthing
centers except in a proceeding involving the question of licensure.

Sec.
37. RCW
18.46.110 and 1995 c 369 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Fire
protection with respect to all ((maternity homes)) birthing centers
to be licensed hereunder, shall be the responsibility of the chief of the
Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, who shall
adopt by reference, such recognized standards as may be applicable to nursing
homes, places of refuge, and ((maternity homes)) birthing centers
for the protection of life against the cause and spread of fire and fire
hazards. The department upon receipt of an application for a license, shall
submit to the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of
fire protection, in writing, a request for an inspection, giving the
applicant's name and the location of the premises to be licensed. Upon receipt
of such a request, the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the
director of fire protection, or his or her deputy, shall make an inspection of
the ((maternity home)) birthing center to be licensed, and if it
is found that the premises do not comply with the required safety standards and
fire regulations as promulgated by the chief of the Washington state patrol,
through the director of fire protection, he or she shall promptly make a
written report to the department as to the manner in which the premises may
qualify for a license and set forth the conditions to be remedied with respect
to fire regulations. The department, applicant or licensee shall notify the
chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection,
upon completion of any requirements made by him or her, and the chief of the
Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, or his or her
deputy, shall make a reinspection of such premises. Whenever the ((maternity
home)) birthing center to be licensed meets with the approval of the
chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection,
he or she shall submit to the department, a written report approving same with
respect to fire protection before a license can be issued. The chief of the
Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, shall make or
cause to be made such inspection of such ((maternity homes)) birthing
centers as he or she deems necessary.

In
cities which have in force a comprehensive building code, the regulation of
which is equal to the minimum standards of the code for ((maternity homes))
birthing centers adopted by the chief of the Washington state patrol,
through the director of fire protection, the building inspector and the chief
of the fire department, provided the latter is a paid chief of a paid fire
department, shall make the inspection and shall approve the premises before a
license can be issued.

In cities where such building codes are in force, the chief of the
Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, may, upon
request by the chief fire official, or the local governing body, or of a
taxpayer of such city, assist in the enforcement of any such code pertaining to
((maternity homes)) birthing centers.

Sec.
38. RCW
18.46.120 and 1951 c 168 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
person operating or maintaining any ((maternity home)) birthing
center without a license under this chapter shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor. Each day of a continuing violation after conviction shall be
considered a separate offense.

Sec.
39. RCW
18.46.130 and 1951 c 168 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding the existence or use of any other remedy, the
department may in the manner provided by law, upon the advice of the attorney
general who shall represent the department in all proceedings, maintain an
action in the name of the state for an injunction or other process against any
person to restrain or prevent the operation or maintenance of a ((maternity
home)) birthing center not licensed under this chapter.

Sec.
40. RCW
18.46.140 and 1951 c 168 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing
in this chapter or the rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto shall be
construed as authorizing the supervision, regulation, or control of the
remedial and nursing care of ((residents or)) patients in any ((maternity
home)) birthing center as defined in this chapter, conducted for or
by members of a recognized religious sect, denomination, or organization which
in accordance with its creed, tenets, or principles depends for healing upon
prayer in the practice of religion, nor shall the existence of any of the above
conditions militate against the licensing of such ((home or institution))
facility.

Sec.
41. RCW
18.71A.085 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 325 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
physician assistant acupuncturist currently licensed ((by the commission))
as a physician assistant may continue to perform acupuncture under the
physician assistant license as long as he or she maintains licensure as a
physician assistant.

Sec.
42. RCW
18.84.020 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 505 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Department" means the department of health.

(2)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health.

(3)
"Licensed practitioner" means any licensed health care practitioner
performing services within the person's authorized scope of practice.

(4)
"Radiologic technologist" means an individual certified under this
chapter, other than a licensed practitioner, who practices radiologic
technology as a:

(a)
Diagnostic radiologic technologist, who is a person who actually handles x-ray
equipment in the process of applying radiation on a human being for diagnostic
purposes at the direction of a licensed practitioner; or

(b)
Therapeutic radiologic technologist, who is a person who uses
radiation-generating equipment for therapeutic purposes on human subjects at
the direction of a licensed practitioner; or

(c)
Nuclear medicine technologist, who is a person who prepares
radiopharmaceuticals and administers them to human beings for diagnostic and
therapeutic purposes and who performs in vivo and in vitro detection and
measurement of radioactivity for medical purposes at the direction of a
licensed practitioner.

(5)
"Approved school of radiologic technology" means a school of
radiologic technology approved by the council on medical education of the
American medical association or a school found to maintain the equivalent of
such a course of study as determined by the department. Such school may be
operated by a medical or educational institution, and for the purpose of
providing the requisite clinical experience, shall be affiliated with one or
more general hospitals.

(6)
"Radiologic technology" means the use of ionizing radiation upon a
human being for diagnostic or therapeutic purposes and includes minor
invasive procedures of radiologic technology when performed at the direction of
a radiologist.

(7)
"Radiologist" means a physician certified by the American board of
radiology or the American osteopathic board of radiology.

(8)
"Registered x-ray technician" means a person who is registered with
the department, and who applies ionizing radiation at the direction of a
licensed practitioner.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 43. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
18.48.040 (Multiple facility operators--Registration) and 1996 c
81 s 3;

(2) RCW
18.57A.070 (Acupuncture) and 1977 ex.s. c 233 s 1;

(3) RCW
18.83.910 (Examining board--Termination) and 1994 c 35 s 6, 1990
c 297 s 7, 1988 c 288 s 8, 1986 c 27 s 11, 1985 c 7 s 109, & 1984 c 279 s
94; and

(4) RCW
18.83.911 (Examining board--Repeal) and 1994 c 35 s 7 & 1990
c 297 s 8.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 44.
Sections 1 and 3 of this act expire January 1, 2003.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 45.
Sections 2 and 4 of this act take effect January 1, 2003.

---
END ---