BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 9.94A RCW to read as follows:

COMMUNITY
CUSTODY RANGES

Offense Type Community Custody Range

Sex
Offenses 36 to 48 months

(Not
sentenced under

RCW
9.94A.120(8))

Serious
Violent Offenses 24 to 48 months

Violent
Offenses 18 to 36 months

Crimes
Against Persons 9 to 18 months

(As
defined in RCW

9.94A.440(2))

Offenses
Under Chapter 9 to 12 months

69.50
or 69.52 RCW

(Not
sentenced under

RCW
9.94A.120(6))

The
community custody ranges specified in this section shall only be included in
sentences of more than twelve months as specified in RCW 9.94A.120(11)(a). The
community custody ranges specified in this section are not intended to affect
or limit the authority to impose exceptional community custody ranges, either
above or below the standard community custody range as authorized by RCW
9.94A.120(2) and pursuant to guidelines specified in RCW 9.94A.390. The
community custody range for offenders with multiple convictions must be based
on the offense that dictates the longest term of community custody. The
community custody range for offenders convicted of an offense that falls into
more than one of the categories of offense types listed in this section must be
based on the offense type that dictates the longest term of community custody.

Sec.
2. RCW
9.94A.120 and 1999 c 324 s 2, 1999 c 197 s 4, 1999 c 196 s 5, and 1999 c 147 s
3 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

When
a person is convicted of a felony, the court shall impose punishment as
provided in this section.

(1)
Except as authorized in subsections (2), (4), (5), (6), and (8) of this
section, the court shall impose a sentence within the sentence range for the
offense.

(2)
The court may impose a sentence outside the standard sentence range for that
offense if it finds, considering the purpose of this chapter, that there are
substantial and compelling reasons justifying an exceptional sentence.

(3)
Whenever a sentence outside the standard range is imposed, the court shall set
forth the reasons for its decision in written findings of fact and conclusions
of law. A sentence outside the standard range shall be a determinate sentence.

(4)
A persistent offender shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement for
life without the possibility of parole or, when authorized by RCW 10.95.030 for
the crime of aggravated murder in the first degree, sentenced to death,
notwithstanding the maximum sentence under any other law. An offender
convicted of the crime of murder in the first degree shall be sentenced to a
term of total confinement not less than twenty years. An offender convicted of
the crime of assault in the first degree or assault of a child in the first
degree where the offender used force or means likely to result in death or
intended to kill the victim shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement
not less than five years. An offender convicted of the crime of rape in the
first degree shall be sentenced to a term of total confinement not less than
five years. The foregoing minimum terms of total confinement are mandatory and
shall not be varied or modified as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
In addition, all offenders subject to the provisions of this subsection shall
not be eligible for community custody, earned release time, furlough, home
detention, partial confinement, work crew, work release, or any other form of
early release as defined under RCW 9.94A.150 (1), (2), (3), (((5), (7), or))
(6), (8), or (9) or any other form of authorized leave of absence
from the correctional facility while not in the direct custody of a corrections
officer or officers during such minimum terms of total confinement except: (a)
In the case of an offender in need of emergency medical treatment; (b) for the
purpose of commitment to an inpatient treatment facility in the case of an
offender convicted of the crime of rape in the first degree; or (c) for an
extraordinary medical placement when authorized under RCW 9.94A.150(4).

(5)(a)
In sentencing a first-time offender the court may waive the imposition of a
sentence within the sentence range and impose a sentence which may include up
to ninety days of confinement in a facility operated or utilized under contract
by the county and a requirement that the offender refrain from committing new
offenses. The sentence may also include a term of community supervision or
community custody as specified in (b) of this subsection, which, in addition to
crime-related prohibitions, may include requirements that the offender perform
any one or more of the following:

(i)
Devote time to a specific employment or occupation;

(ii)
Undergo available outpatient treatment for up to the period specified in (b) of
this subsection, or inpatient treatment not to exceed the standard range of
confinement for that offense;

(iii)
Pursue a prescribed, secular course of study or vocational training;

(iv)
Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the community
corrections officer prior to any change in the offender's address or
employment;

(v)
Report as directed to a community corrections officer; or

(vi)
Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations as provided in RCW 9.94A.030
and/or perform community service work.

(b)
The terms and statuses applicable to sentences under (a) of this subsection
are:

(i)
For sentences imposed on or after July 25, 1999, for crimes committed before
July 1, 2000, up to one year of community supervision. If treatment is
ordered, the period of community supervision may include up to the period of
treatment, but shall not exceed two years; and

(ii)
For crimes committed on or after July 1, 2000, up to one year of community
custody unless treatment is ordered, in which case the period of community
custody may include up to the period of treatment, but shall not exceed two years.
Any term of community custody imposed under this subsection (5) is subject to
conditions and sanctions as authorized in this subsection (5) and in subsection
(11)(b) and (c) of this section.

(c)
The department shall discharge from community supervision any offender
sentenced under this subsection (5) before July 25, 1999, who has served at
least one year of community supervision and has completed any treatment ordered
by the court.

(6)(a)
An offender is eligible for the special drug offender sentencing alternative
if:

(i)
The offender is convicted of a felony that is not a violent offense or sex
offense and the violation does not involve a sentence enhancement under RCW
9.94A.310 (3) or (4);

(ii)
The offender has no current or prior convictions for a sex offense or violent
offense in this state, another state, or the United States;

(iii)
For a violation of the uniform controlled substances act under chapter 69.50
RCW or a criminal solicitation to commit such a violation under chapter 9A.28
RCW, the offense involved only a small quantity of the particular controlled
substance as determined by the judge upon consideration of such factors as the
weight, purity, packaging, sale price, and street value of the controlled
substance; and

(iv)
The offender has not been found by the United States attorney general to be
subject to a deportation detainer or order.

(b)
If the standard range is greater than one year and the sentencing judge
determines that the offender is eligible for this option and that the offender
and the community will benefit from the use of the special drug offender
sentencing alternative, the judge may waive imposition of a sentence within the
standard range and impose a sentence that must include a period of total
confinement in a state facility for one-half of the midpoint of the standard
range. During incarceration in the state facility, offenders sentenced under
this subsection shall undergo a comprehensive substance abuse assessment and
receive, within available resources, treatment services appropriate for the
offender. The treatment services shall be designed by the division of alcohol
and substance abuse of the department of social and health services, in
cooperation with the department of corrections.

The
court shall also impose:

(i)
The remainder of the midpoint of the standard range as a term of community
custody which must include appropriate substance abuse treatment in a program
that has been approved by the division of alcohol and substance abuse of the
department of social and health services;

(ii)
Crime-related prohibitions including a condition not to use illegal controlled
substances; and

(iii)
A requirement to submit to urinalysis or other testing to monitor that status.

The
court may prohibit the offender from using alcohol or controlled substances and
may require that the monitoring for controlled substances be conducted by the
department or by a treatment alternatives to street crime program or a
comparable court or agency-referred program. The offender may be required to
pay thirty dollars per month while on community custody to offset the cost of
monitoring. In addition, the court shall impose three or more of the following
conditions:

(A)
Devote time to a specific employment or training;

(B)
Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the
community corrections officer before any change in the offender's address or
employment;

(C)
Report as directed to a community corrections officer;

(D)
Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations;

(E)
Perform community service work;

(F)
Stay out of areas designated by the sentencing judge;

(G)
Such other conditions as the court may require such as affirmative conditions.

(c)
If the offender violates any of the sentence conditions in (b) of this
subsection, a violation hearing shall be held by the department unless waived
by the offender. If the department finds that conditions have been willfully
violated, the offender may be reclassified to serve the remaining balance of
the original sentence.

(d)
The department shall determine the rules for calculating the value of a day
fine based on the offender's income and reasonable obligations which the
offender has for the support of the offender and any dependents. These rules
shall be developed in consultation with the administrator for the courts, the
office of financial management, and the commission.

(e)
An offender who fails to complete the special drug offender sentencing
alternative program or who is administratively terminated from the program
shall be reclassified to serve the unexpired term of his or her sentence as
ordered by the sentencing judge and shall be subject to all rules relating to
earned early release time. An offender who violates any conditions of
supervision as defined by the department shall be sanctioned. Sanctions may
include, but are not limited to, reclassifying the offender to serve the
unexpired term of his or her sentence as ordered by the sentencing judge. If
an offender is reclassified to serve the unexpired term of his or her sentence,
the offender shall be subject to all rules relating to earned early release
time.

(7)
If a sentence range has not been established for the defendant's crime, the
court shall impose a determinate sentence which may include not more than one
year of confinement; community service work; until July 1, 2000, a term of
community supervision not to exceed one year and on and after July 1, 2000, a
term of community custody not to exceed one year, subject to conditions and
sanctions as authorized in subsection (11)(b) and (c) of this section; and/or
other legal financial obligations. The court may impose a sentence which
provides more than one year of confinement if the court finds, considering the
purpose of this chapter, that there are substantial and compelling reasons
justifying an exceptional sentence.

(8)(a)(i)
When an offender is convicted of a sex offense other than a violation of RCW
9A.44.050 or a sex offense that is also a serious violent offense and has no
prior convictions for a sex offense or any other felony sex offenses in this or
any other state, the sentencing court, on its own motion or the motion of the
state or the defendant, may order an examination to determine whether the
defendant is amenable to treatment.

The
report of the examination shall include at a minimum the following: The
defendant's version of the facts and the official version of the facts, the
defendant's offense history, an assessment of problems in addition to alleged
deviant behaviors, the offender's social and employment situation, and other
evaluation measures used. The report shall set forth the sources of the
evaluator's information.

The
examiner shall assess and report regarding the defendant's amenability to
treatment and relative risk to the community. A proposed treatment plan shall
be provided and shall include, at a minimum:

(A)
Frequency and type of contact between offender and therapist;

(B)
Specific issues to be addressed in the treatment and description of planned
treatment modalities;

(C)
Monitoring plans, including any requirements regarding living conditions,
lifestyle requirements, and monitoring by family members and others;

(D)
Anticipated length of treatment; and

(E)
Recommended crime-related prohibitions.

The
court on its own motion may order, or on a motion by the state shall order, a
second examination regarding the offender's amenability to treatment. The
evaluator shall be selected by the party making the motion. The defendant
shall pay the cost of any second examination ordered unless the court finds the
defendant to be indigent in which case the state shall pay the cost.

(ii)
After receipt of the reports, the court shall consider whether the offender and
the community will benefit from use of this special sex offender sentencing
alternative and consider the victim's opinion whether the offender should
receive a treatment disposition under this subsection. If the court determines
that this special sex offender sentencing alternative is appropriate, the court
shall then impose a sentence within the sentence range. If this sentence is
less than eleven years of confinement, the court may suspend the execution of
the sentence and impose the following conditions of suspension:

(A)
The court shall place the defendant on community custody for the length of the
suspended sentence or three years, whichever is greater, and require the
offender to comply with any conditions imposed by the department of corrections
under subsection (15) of this section;

(B)
The court shall order treatment for any period up to three years in duration.
The court in its discretion shall order outpatient sex offender treatment or
inpatient sex offender treatment, if available. A community mental health
center may not be used for such treatment unless it has an appropriate program
designed for sex offender treatment. The offender shall not change sex offender
treatment providers or treatment conditions without first notifying the
prosecutor, the community corrections officer, and the court, and shall not
change providers without court approval after a hearing if the prosecutor or
community corrections officer object to the change. In addition, as conditions
of the suspended sentence, the court may impose other sentence conditions
including up to six months of confinement, not to exceed the sentence range of
confinement for that offense, crime-related prohibitions, and requirements that
the offender perform any one or more of the following:

(I)
Devote time to a specific employment or occupation;

(II)
Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the
community corrections officer prior to any change in the offender's address or
employment;

(III)
Report as directed to the court and a community corrections officer;

(IV)
Pay all court-ordered legal financial obligations as provided in RCW 9.94A.030,
perform community service work, or any combination thereof; or

(V)
Make recoupment to the victim for the cost of any counseling required as a
result of the offender's crime; and

(C)
Sex offenders sentenced under this special sex offender sentencing alternative
are not eligible to accrue any earned release time while serving a suspended
sentence.

(iii)
The sex offender therapist shall submit quarterly reports on the defendant's
progress in treatment to the court and the parties. The report shall reference
the treatment plan and include at a minimum the following: Dates of
attendance, defendant's compliance with requirements, treatment activities, the
defendant's relative progress in treatment, and any other material as specified
by the court at sentencing.

(iv)
At the time of sentencing, the court shall set a treatment termination hearing
for three months prior to the anticipated date for completion of treatment.
Prior to the treatment termination hearing, the treatment professional and
community corrections officer shall submit written reports to the court and
parties regarding the defendant's compliance with treatment and monitoring
requirements, and recommendations regarding termination from treatment,
including proposed community supervision conditions. Either party may request and
the court may order another evaluation regarding the advisability of
termination from treatment. The defendant shall pay the cost of any additional
evaluation ordered unless the court finds the defendant to be indigent in which
case the state shall pay the cost. At the treatment termination hearing the
court may: (A) Modify conditions of community custody, and either (B)
terminate treatment, or (C) extend treatment for up to the remaining period of
community custody.

(v)
If a violation of conditions occurs during community custody, the department
shall either impose sanctions as provided for in RCW 9.94A.205(2)(a) or refer
the violation to the court and recommend revocation of the suspended sentence
as provided for in (a)(vi) of this subsection.

(vi)
The court may revoke the suspended sentence at any time during the period of
community custody and order execution of the sentence if: (A) The defendant
violates the conditions of the suspended sentence, or (B) the court finds that
the defendant is failing to make satisfactory progress in treatment. All
confinement time served during the period of community custody shall be
credited to the offender if the suspended sentence is revoked.

(vii)
Except as provided in (a)(viii) of this subsection, after July 1, 1991,
examinations and treatment ordered pursuant to this subsection shall only be
conducted by sex offender treatment providers certified by the department of
health pursuant to chapter 18.155 RCW.

(viii)
A sex offender therapist who examines or treats a sex offender pursuant to this
subsection (8) does not have to be certified by the department of health
pursuant to chapter 18.155 RCW if the court finds that: (A) The offender has
already moved to another state or plans to move to another state for reasons
other than circumventing the certification requirements; (B) no certified
providers are available for treatment within a reasonable geographical distance
of the offender's home; and (C) the evaluation and treatment plan comply with
this subsection (8) and the rules adopted by the department of health.

(ix)
For purposes of this subsection (8), "victim" means any person who
has sustained emotional, psychological, physical, or financial injury to person
or property as a result of the crime charged. "Victim" also means a
parent or guardian of a victim who is a minor child unless the parent or
guardian is the perpetrator of the offense.

(x)
If the defendant was less than eighteen years of age when the charge was filed,
the state shall pay for the cost of initial evaluation and treatment.

(b)
When an offender commits any felony sex offense on or after July 1, 1987, and
is sentenced to a term of confinement of more than one year but less than six
years, the sentencing court may, on its own motion or on the motion of the
offender or the state, request the department of corrections to evaluate
whether the offender is amenable to treatment and the department may place the
offender in a treatment program within a correctional facility operated by the
department.

Except
for an offender who has been convicted of a violation of RCW 9A.44.040 or
9A.44.050, if the offender completes the treatment program before the
expiration of his or her term of confinement, the department of corrections may
request the court to convert the balance of confinement to community supervision
and to place conditions on the offender including crime-related prohibitions
and requirements that the offender perform any one or more of the following:

(i)
Devote time to a specific employment or occupation;

(ii)
Remain within prescribed geographical boundaries and notify the court or the
community corrections officer prior to any change in the offender's address or
employment;

(iii)
Report as directed to the court and a community corrections officer;

(iv)
Undergo available outpatient treatment.

If
the offender violates any of the terms of his or her community supervision, the
court may order the offender to serve out the balance of his or her community
supervision term in confinement in the custody of the department of
corrections.

Nothing
in this subsection (8)(b) shall confer eligibility for such programs for
offenders convicted and sentenced for a sex offense committed prior to July 1,
1987. This subsection (8)(b) does not apply to any crime committed after July
1, 1990.

(c)
Offenders convicted and sentenced for a sex offense committed prior to July 1,
1987, may, subject to available funds, request an evaluation by the department
of corrections to determine whether they are amenable to treatment. If the
offender is determined to be amenable to treatment, the offender may request
placement in a treatment program within a correctional facility operated by the
department. Placement in such treatment program is subject to available funds.

(d)
Within the funds available for this purpose, the department shall develop and
monitor transition and relapse prevention strategies, including risk assessment
and release plans, to reduce risk to the community after sex offenders' terms
of confinement in the custody of the department.

(9)(a)(i)
When a court sentences a person to a term of total confinement to the custody
of the department of corrections for an offense categorized as a sex offense or
a serious violent offense committed after July 1, 1988, but before July 1,
1990, assault in the second degree, assault of a child in the second degree,
any crime against a person where it is determined in accordance with RCW
9.94A.125 that the defendant or an accomplice was armed with a deadly weapon at
the time of commission, or any felony offense under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW
not sentenced under subsection (6) of this section, committed on or after July
1, 1988, but before July 25, 1999, the court shall in addition to the other
terms of the sentence, sentence the offender to a one-year term of community
placement beginning either upon completion of the term of confinement or at
such time as the offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of earned
release in accordance with RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2). When the court sentences
an offender under this subsection to the statutory maximum period of
confinement then the community placement portion of the sentence shall consist
entirely of such community custody to which the offender may become eligible,
in accordance with RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2). Any period of community custody
actually served shall be credited against the community placement portion of
the sentence.

(ii)
Except for persons sentenced under (b) of this subsection or subsection (10)(a)
of this section, when a court sentences a person to a term of total confinement
to the custody of the department of corrections for a violent offense, any
crime against a person under RCW 9.94A.440(2), or any felony offense under
chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW not sentenced under subsection (6) of this section, committed
on or after July 25, 1999, but before July 1, 2000, the court shall in addition
to the other terms of the sentence, sentence the offender to a one-year term of
community placement beginning either upon completion of the term of confinement
or at such time as the offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of
earned release in accordance with RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2). When the court
sentences the offender under this subsection (9)(a)(ii) to the statutory
maximum period of confinement, then the community placement portion of the
sentence shall consist entirely of such community custody to which the offender
may become eligible, in accordance with RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2). Any period
of community custody actually served shall be credited against the community
placement portion of the sentence.

(b)
When a court sentences a person to a term of total confinement to the custody
of the department of corrections for an offense categorized as a sex offense
committed on or after July 1, 1990, but before June 6, 1996, or a serious
violent offense, vehicular homicide, or vehicular assault, committed on or
after July 1, 1990, but before July 1, 2000, the court shall in addition to
other terms of the sentence, sentence the offender to community placement for
two years or up to the period of earned release awarded pursuant to RCW
9.94A.150 (1) and (2), whichever is longer. The community placement shall
begin either upon completion of the term of confinement or at such time as the
offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of earned release in
accordance with RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2). When the court sentences an
offender under this subsection to the statutory maximum period of confinement
then the community placement portion of the sentence shall consist entirely of
the community custody to which the offender may become eligible, in accordance
with RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2). Any period of community custody actually
served shall be credited against the community placement portion of the sentence.
Unless a condition is waived by the court, the terms of community placement for
offenders sentenced pursuant to this section shall include the following
conditions:

(i)
The offender shall report to and be available for contact with the assigned
community corrections officer as directed;

(ii)
The offender shall work at department of corrections-approved education,
employment, and/or community service;

(iii)
The offender shall not possess or consume controlled substances except pursuant
to lawfully issued prescriptions;

(iv)
The offender shall pay supervision fees as determined by the department of
corrections;

(v)
The residence location and living arrangements are subject to the prior
approval of the department of corrections during the period of community
placement; and

(vi)
The offender shall submit to affirmative acts necessary to monitor compliance
with the orders of the court as required by the department.

(c)
As a part of any sentence imposed under (a) or (b) of this subsection, the
court may also order any of the following special conditions:

(i)
The offender shall remain within, or outside of, a specified geographical
boundary;

(ii)
The offender shall not have direct or indirect contact with the victim of the
crime or a specified class of individuals;

(iii)
The offender shall participate in crime-related treatment or counseling
services;

(iv)
The offender shall not consume alcohol;

(v)
The offender shall comply with any crime-related prohibitions; or

(vi)
For an offender convicted of a felony sex offense against a minor victim after
June 6, 1996, the offender shall comply with any terms and conditions of
community placement imposed by the department of corrections relating to
contact between the sex offender and a minor victim or a child of similar age
or circumstance as a previous victim.

(d)
Prior to transfer to, or during, community placement, any conditions of
community placement may be removed or modified so as not to be more restrictive
by the sentencing court, upon recommendation of the department of corrections.

(10)(a)
When a court sentences a person to the custody of the department of corrections
for an offense categorized as a sex offense committed on or after June 6, 1996,
but before July 1, 2000, the court shall, in addition to other terms of the
sentence, sentence the offender to community custody for three years or up to
the period of earned release awarded pursuant to RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2),
whichever is longer. The community custody shall begin either upon completion
of the term of confinement or at such time as the offender is transferred to
community custody in lieu of earned release in accordance with RCW 9.94A.150
(1) and (2).

(b)
Unless a condition is waived by the court, the terms of community custody shall
be the same as those provided for in subsection (9)(b) of this section and may
include those provided for in subsection (9)(c) of this section. As part of
any sentence that includes a term of community custody imposed under this
subsection, the court shall also require the offender to comply with any
conditions imposed by the department of corrections under subsection (15) of
this section.

(c)
At any time prior to the completion of a sex offender's term of community
custody, if the court finds that public safety would be enhanced, the court may
impose and enforce an order extending any or all of the conditions imposed
pursuant to this section for a period up to the maximum allowable sentence for
the crime as it is classified in chapter 9A.20 RCW, regardless of the
expiration of the offender's term of community custody. If a violation of a
condition extended under this subsection occurs after the expiration of the
offender's term of community custody, it shall be deemed a violation of the
sentence for the purposes of RCW 9.94A.195 and may be punishable as contempt of
court as provided for in RCW 7.21.040.

(11)(a)
When a court sentences a person to the custody of the department of corrections
for a sex offense, a violent offense, any crime against a person under RCW
9.94A.440(2), or a felony offense under chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW not
sentenced under subsection (6) of this section, committed on or after July 1,
2000, the court shall in addition to the other terms of the sentence, sentence
the offender to community custody for the community custody range as
established in section 1 of this act or up to the period of earned release
awarded pursuant to RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2), whichever is longer. The
community custody shall begin either upon completion of the term of confinement
or at such time as the offender is transferred to community custody in lieu of
earned release in accordance with RCW 9.94A.150 (1) and (2). Community
custody is considered to be a part of the entire sentence, and a community
custody term is limited by the statutory maximum for the sentence.

(b)
Unless a condition is waived by the court, the conditions of community custody
shall include those provided for in subsection (9)(b)(i) through (vi) of this
section. The conditions may also include those provided for in subsection
(9)(c)(i) through (vi) of this section. The court may also order the offender
to participate in rehabilitative programs or otherwise perform affirmative
conduct reasonably related to the circumstances of the offense, the offender's
risk of reoffending, or the safety of the community, and the department shall
enforce such conditions pursuant to (f) of this subsection. As part of any
sentence that includes a term of community custody imposed under this
subsection, the court shall also require the offender to comply with any
conditions imposed by the department of corrections under subsection (15) of
this section. The department shall assess the offender's risk of reoffense and
may establish and modify additional conditions of the offender's community
custody based upon the risk to community safety. The department may not impose
conditions that are contrary to those ordered by the court and may not
contravene or decrease court imposed conditions. The department shall notify
the offender in writing of any such conditions or modifications. In setting,
modifying, and enforcing conditions of community custody, the department shall
be deemed to be performing a quasi-judicial function.

(c)
If an offender violates conditions imposed by the court or the department
pursuant to this subsection during community custody, the department may
transfer the offender to a more restrictive confinement status and impose other
available sanctions as provided in RCW 9.94A.205 and 9.94A.207.

(d)
Except for terms of community custody under subsection (8) of this section, the
department shall discharge the offender from community custody on a date
determined by the department, which the department may modify, based on risk
and performance of the offender, within the range or at the end of the period
of earned release, whichever is later.

(e)
At any time prior to the completion or termination of a sex offender's term of
community custody, if the court finds that public safety would be enhanced, the
court may impose and enforce an order extending any or all of the conditions
imposed pursuant to this section for a period up to the maximum allowable
sentence for the crime as it is classified in chapter 9A.20 RCW, regardless of
the expiration of the offender's term of community custody. If a violation of
a condition extended under this subsection occurs after the expiration of the
offender's term of community custody, it shall be deemed a violation of the
sentence for the purposes of RCW 9.94A.195 and may be punishable as contempt of
court as provided for in RCW 7.21.040. If the court extends a condition beyond
the expiration of the term of community custody, the department is not
responsible for supervision of the offender's compliance with the condition.

(f)
Within the funds available for community custody, the department shall
determine conditions and duration of community custody on the basis of risk to
community safety, and shall supervise offenders during community custody on the
basis of risk to community safety and conditions imposed by the court. The
secretary shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this subsection
(11)(f).

(g)
By the close of the next business day after receiving notice of a condition
imposed or modified by the department, an offender may request an
administrative review under rules adopted by the department. The condition
shall remain in effect unless the reviewing officer finds that it is not
reasonably related to any of the following: (i) The crime of conviction; (ii)
the offender's risk of reoffending; or (iii) the safety of the community.

(12)
If the court imposes a sentence requiring confinement of thirty days or less,
the court may, in its discretion, specify that the sentence be served on
consecutive or intermittent days. A sentence requiring more than thirty days
of confinement shall be served on consecutive days. Local jail administrators
may schedule court-ordered intermittent sentences as space permits.

(13)
If a sentence imposed includes payment of a legal financial obligation, the
sentence shall specify the total amount of the legal financial obligation owed,
and shall require the offender to pay a specified monthly sum toward that legal
financial obligation. Restitution to victims shall be paid prior to any other
payments of monetary obligations. Any legal financial obligation that is
imposed by the court may be collected by the department, which shall deliver
the amount paid to the county clerk for credit. The offender's compliance with
payment of legal financial obligations shall be supervised by the department
for ten years following the entry of the judgment and sentence or ten years
following the offender's release from total confinement. All monetary payments
ordered shall be paid no later than ten years after the last date of release
from confinement pursuant to a felony conviction or the date the sentence was
entered unless the superior court extends the criminal judgment an additional
ten years. If the legal financial obligations including crime victims'
assessments are not paid during the initial ten-year period, the superior court
may extend jurisdiction under the criminal judgment an additional ten years as
provided in RCW 9.94A.140, 9.94A.142, and 9.94A.145. If jurisdiction under the
criminal judgment is extended, the department is not responsible for
supervision of the offender during the subsequent period. Independent of the
department, the party or entity to whom the legal financial obligation is owed
shall have the authority to utilize any other remedies available to the party
or entity to collect the legal financial obligation. Nothing in this section
makes the department, the state, or any of its employees, agents, or other
persons acting on their behalf liable under any circumstances for the payment
of these legal financial obligations. If an order includes restitution as one
of the monetary assessments, the county clerk shall make disbursements to
victims named in the order.

(14)
Except as provided under RCW 9.94A.140(1) and 9.94A.142(1), a court may not
impose a sentence providing for a term of confinement or community supervision,
community placement, or community custody which exceeds the statutory maximum
for the crime as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(15)
All offenders sentenced to terms involving community supervision, community
service, community placement, community custody, or legal financial obligation
shall be under the supervision of the department of corrections and shall follow
explicitly the instructions and conditions of the department of corrections.
The department may require an offender to perform affirmative acts it deems
appropriate to monitor compliance with the conditions of the sentence imposed.

(a)
The instructions shall include, at a minimum, reporting as directed to a
community corrections officer, remaining within prescribed geographical
boundaries, notifying the community corrections officer of any change in the
offender's address or employment, and paying the supervision fee assessment.

(b)
For offenders sentenced to terms involving community custody for crimes
committed on or after June 6, 1996, the department may include, in addition to
the instructions in (a) of this subsection, any appropriate conditions of
supervision, including but not limited to, prohibiting the offender from having
contact with any other specified individuals or specific class of individuals.
For offenders sentenced to terms of community custody for crimes committed on
or after July 1, 2000, the department may additionally require the offender to
participate in rehabilitative programs or otherwise perform affirmative
conduct, and to obey all laws.

The
conditions authorized under this subsection (15)(b) may be imposed by the
department prior to or during an offender's community custody term. If a
violation of conditions imposed by the court or the department pursuant to
subsection (10) of this section occurs during community custody, it shall be
deemed a violation of community placement for the purposes of RCW 9.94A.207 and
shall authorize the department to transfer an offender to a more restrictive
confinement status as provided in RCW 9.94A.205. At any time prior to the
completion of an offender's term of community custody, the department may
recommend to the court that any or all of the conditions imposed by the court
or the department pursuant to subsection (10) or (11) of this section be
continued beyond the expiration of the offender's term of community custody as
authorized in subsection (10)(c) or (11)(e) of this section.

The
department may require offenders to pay for special services rendered on or
after July 25, 1993, including electronic monitoring, day reporting, and
telephone reporting, dependent upon the offender's ability to pay. The
department may pay for these services for offenders who are not able to pay.

(16)
All offenders sentenced to terms involving community supervision, community
service, community custody, or community placement under the supervision of the
department of corrections shall not own, use, or possess firearms or
ammunition. Offenders who own, use, or are found to be in actual or
constructive possession of firearms or ammunition shall be subject to the
appropriate violation process and sanctions. "Constructive
possession" as used in this subsection means the power and intent to
control the firearm or ammunition. "Firearm" as used in this
subsection means a weapon or device from which a projectile may be fired by an
explosive such as gunpowder.

(17)
The sentencing court shall give the offender credit for all confinement time
served before the sentencing if that confinement was solely in regard to the
offense for which the offender is being sentenced.

(18)
A departure from the standards in RCW 9.94A.400 (1) and (2) governing whether
sentences are to be served consecutively or concurrently is an exceptional
sentence subject to the limitations in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
and may be appealed by the defendant or the state as set forth in RCW 9.94A.210
(2) through (6).

(19)
The court shall order restitution whenever the offender is convicted of a
felony that results in injury to any person or damage to or loss of property,
whether the offender is sentenced to confinement or placed under community
supervision, unless extraordinary circumstances exist that make restitution
inappropriate in the court's judgment. The court shall set forth the
extraordinary circumstances in the record if it does not order restitution.

(20)
As a part of any sentence, the court may impose and enforce an order that
relates directly to the circumstances of the crime for which the offender has
been convicted, prohibiting the offender from having any contact with other
specified individuals or a specific class of individuals for a period not to exceed
the maximum allowable sentence for the crime, regardless of the expiration of
the offender's term of community supervision or community placement.

(21)
The court may order an offender whose sentence includes community placement or
community supervision to undergo a mental status evaluation and to participate
in available outpatient mental health treatment, if the court finds that
reasonable grounds exist to believe that the offender is a mentally ill person
as defined in RCW 71.24.025, and that this condition is likely to have
influenced the offense. An order requiring mental status evaluation or
treatment must be based on a presentence report and, if applicable, mental
status evaluations that have been filed with the court to determine the
offender's competency or eligibility for a defense of insanity. The court may
order additional evaluations at a later date if deemed appropriate.

(22)
In any sentence of partial confinement, the court may require the defendant to
serve the partial confinement in work release, in a program of home detention,
on work crew, or in a combined program of work crew and home detention.

(23)
All court-ordered legal financial obligations collected by the department and
remitted to the county clerk shall be credited and paid where restitution is
ordered. Restitution shall be paid prior to any other payments of monetary
obligations.

(24)
In sentencing an offender convicted of a crime of domestic violence, as defined
in RCW 10.99.020, if the offender has a minor child, or if the victim of the
offense for which the offender was convicted has a minor child, the court may,
as part of any term of community supervision, order the offender to participate
in a domestic violence perpetrator program approved under RCW 26.50.150.

(25)(a)
Sex offender examinations and treatment ordered as a special condition of
community placement or community custody under this section shall be conducted
only by sex offender treatment providers certified by the department of health
under chapter 18.155 RCW unless the court finds that: (i) The offender has
already moved to another state or plans to move to another state for reasons
other than circumventing the certification requirements; (ii) no certified
providers are available for treatment within a reasonable geographic distance
of the offender's home, as determined in rules adopted by the secretary; (iii)
the evaluation and treatment plan comply with the rules adopted by the
department of health; or (iv) the treatment provider is employed by the department.
A treatment provider selected by an offender who is not certified by the
department of health shall consult with a certified provider during the
offender's period of treatment to ensure compliance with the rules adopted by
the department of health. The frequency and content of the consultation shall
be based on the recommendation of the certified provider.

(b) A sex offender's failure to participate in treatment required
as a condition of community placement or community custody is a violation that
will not be excused on the basis that no treatment provider was located within
a reasonable geographic distance of the offender's home.

---
END ---