BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
50.20.080 and 1993 c 483 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
An individual is disqualified for benefits, if the commissioner finds that the
individual has failed without good cause, either to apply for available,
suitable work when so directed by the employment office or the commissioner, or
to accept suitable work when offered the individual, or to return to his or her
customary self-employment (if any) when so directed by the commissioner.

(2)
If an individual is offered suitable work contingent upon taking or passing a
qualifying test or physical examination and the individual refuses to take or
fails the test or examination, the offer of work will not be considered an
offer under this section. However, an offer of suitable work contingent upon
taking or passing a substance abuse test conducted in accordance with chapter
49.82 RCW will be considered an offer under this section.

(3)
Such disqualification shall begin with the week of the refusal and thereafter
for five calendar weeks and continue until the individual has obtained work and
earned wages therefor of not less than five times his or her suspended weekly
benefit amount.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 50.20 RCW to read as follows:

The
commissioner may adopt rules as necessary to implement this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. If
any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state or
the eligibility of employers in this state for federal unemployment tax
credits, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent
of the conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the operation
of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by
the state or the granting of federal unemployment tax credits to employers in
this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act takes effect July 2, 2000, and applies to new claims filed after July 1,
2000.

---
END ---