BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 41.35 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A one hundred fifty thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid to the member's
estate, or such person or persons, trust or organization as the member has
nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the department.
If no such designated person or persons are still living at the time of the
member's death, the member's death benefit shall be paid to the member's
surviving spouse as if in fact the spouse had been nominated by written
designation, or if there is no surviving spouse, then to the member's legal
representatives.

(2)
The benefit under this section shall be paid only where death occurs as a
result of injuries sustained in the course of employment. The determination of
eligibility for the benefit shall be made consistent with Title 51 RCW by the
department of labor and industries. The department of labor and industries
shall notify the department of retirement systems by order under RCW 51.52.050.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2.
Section 1 of this act takes effect September 1, 2000.

---
END ---