BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The departments of fish and wildlife and community, trade, and economic
development shall host a working conference on promoting wildlife viewing
tourism. The objective of the conference shall be to adopt a strategic plan
and specific implementing actions to promote wildlife viewing tourism in
Washington in a manner that both provides sustainable economic development in
the state's rural areas and supports maintaining the state's wildlife
diversity.

(2)
The departments shall work with interested local governments, state agencies,
visitor and convention bureaus, the hospitality industry, tourism development
organizations, and tour operators and wildlife conservation organizations in
preparing for and conducting the conference. The departments shall guide
preparation for the conference by surveying programs and activities in other
states and compiling information on current programs, infrastructure, and
promotional activities regarding wildlife viewing tourism in Washington. To
enhance the effectiveness of the conference and its products, the departments
shall seek to frame issues and outline options for improvement through white
papers and preliminary meetings with interest groups.

(3)
Among the topics that the departments and interest groups should address at the
conference are:

(a)
Strategies to increase revenues and benefits to Washington communities with
wildlife viewing resources that have identified tourism as part of their
economic development strategy;

(b)
Strengthening the wildlife viewing tourism elements of gateway community
partnerships among state and local transportation, economic development, and
parks and wildlife agencies;

(c)
Providing leadership and services by state agencies to assist local communities
to assess their local wildlife viewing resources and to market tourism centered
upon such resources;

(d)
Developing proposals to increase state funding to local communities to
implement local wildlife viewing tourism plans, including assessing resources,
providing infrastructure specific to wildlife viewing tourism, festival
development and marketing; and

(e)
Promoting wildlife viewing tourism as an element of tourism related to the
Lewis and Clark bicentennial commemoration.

(4)
The departments shall schedule the conference at a time sufficient to prepare a
summary of the conference proceedings and proposals for legislative funding to
be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature no later than
December 15, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. From
the amounts appropriated in this act, the department of fish and wildlife shall
provide up to three grants to support local tourism promotional events that
feature wildlife viewing. The department shall provide technical assistance to
the grantees if requested through providing information on wildlife resources
in the area and expertise on wildlife viewing activities. The department shall
compile a summary of the costs and benefits of the events that the grants
supported and provide the summary to the appropriate committees of the
legislature no later than January 1, 2001.

Sec.
3. RCW
77.12.010 and 1985 c 438 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Wildlife
is the property of the state. The department shall preserve, protect, and
perpetuate wildlife. Game animals, game birds, and game fish may be taken only
at times or places, or in manners or quantities as in the judgment of the
commission maximizes public recreational opportunities without impairing the
supply of wildlife. The department shall manage wildlife programs in a
manner that provides for public opportunities to view wildlife and supports
wildlife viewing tourism without impairing the state's wildlife resources.

The
commission shall not adopt rules that categorically prohibit fishing with bait
or artificial lures in streams, rivers, beaver ponds, and lakes except that the
commission may adopt rules and regulations restricting fishing methods upon a
determination by the director that an individual body of water or part thereof
clearly requires a fishing method prohibition to conserve or enhance the
fisheries resource or to provide selected fishing alternatives. The commission
shall attempt to maximize the public recreational fishing opportunities of all
citizens, particularly juvenile, handicapped, and senior citizens.

Nothing
contained herein shall be construed to infringe on the right of a private
property owner to control the owner's private property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. The
sum of forty-five thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the general fund to
the department of fish and wildlife for the purposes of this act.

---
END ---