BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
49.82.901 and 1996 c 127 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

Sections
1 through 14 and 16 of this act ((shall)) expire January 1, ((2001))
2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The
department of labor and industries, in full consultation with the department of
social and health services, shall conduct a cost-benefit evaluation of the
drug-free workplace program. The evaluation shall take into account both the
qualitative and quantitative benefits and costs of the program. If the
department of labor and industries contracts for the performance of any or all
of the evaluation, no more than ten percent of the contract amount may be used
to cover indirect expenses. The departments of labor and industries and social
and health services shall submit an interim report to the legislature on
September 1, 2001, and shall issue a final evaluation report on December 1,
2002.

---
END ---