BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
50.12.070 and 1997 c 54 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
Each employing unit shall keep true and accurate work records, containing such
information as the commissioner may prescribe. Such records shall be open to
inspection and be subject to being copied by the commissioner or his or her
authorized representatives at any reasonable time and as often as may be
necessary. The commissioner may require from any employing unit any sworn or
unsworn reports with respect to persons employed by it, which he or she deems
necessary for the effective administration of this title.

(b)
An employer who contracts with another person or entity for work subject to
chapter 18.27 or 19.28 RCW shall obtain and preserve a record of the unified
business identifier account number for the person or entity performing the
work. Failure to obtain or maintain the record is subject to RCW 39.06.010 and
to a penalty determined by the commissioner, but not to exceed two hundred
fifty dollars, to be collected as provided in RCW 50.24.120.

(2)(a)
Each employer shall make periodic reports at such intervals as the commissioner
may by regulation prescribe, setting forth the remuneration paid for employment
to workers in its employ, the names of all such workers, and until April 1,
1978, the number of weeks for which the worker earned the "qualifying
weekly wage", and beginning July 1, 1977, the hours worked by each worker
and such other information as the commissioner may by regulation prescribe.

(b)
If the employing unit fails or has failed to report the number of hours in a
reporting period for which a worker worked, such number will be computed by the
commissioner and given the same force and effect as if it had been reported by
the employing unit. In computing the number of such hours worked the total
wages for the reporting period, as reported by the employing unit, shall be
divided by the dollar amount of the state's minimum wage in effect for such
reporting period and the quotient, disregarding any remainder, shall be
credited to the worker: PROVIDED, That although the computation so made will
not be subject to appeal by the employing unit, monetary entitlement may be
redetermined upon request if the department is provided with credible evidence
of the actual hours worked.

(c)(i)
Effective for the quarter beginning January 1, 2001, and thereafter, every
employer with two hundred fifty or more employees, and every person or
organization that, as an agent, reports wages on a total of two hundred fifty
or more employees on behalf of one or more subject employers, shall file that
portion of the wage and contribution report that contains the name, social
security number, hours, and gross wages of each individual in employment on
magnetic media in a format prescribed by the commissioner. However, if the
internal revenue service regulations (26 C.F.R. 301.6011-2, etc.) are amended
or superseded to reduce the threshold number of employees required by this
section, this section shall remain consistent with those regulations as
amended.

(ii)
The reporting requirements established under (c)(i) of this subsection may be
waived under rules as prescribed by the commissioner.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. If
any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state or
the eligibility of employers in this state for federal unemployment tax
credits, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent
of the conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the operation
of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by
the state or the granting of federal unemployment tax credits to employers in
this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act takes effect January 1, 2001.

---
END ---