BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
65.16.020 and 1961 c 279 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

For
the purposes of this code, "newspaper" means a printed or Internet
newspaper generally circulated via mail, carrier route, or electronically, or a
combination of these, serving a city, county, or multicounty area, where the
newspaper is produced at the time of application for approval. The newspaper
shall hold a second class mailing permit, except for electronic newspapers,
which are sent by digital transmission rather than postal mails.

((The qualifications of)) A legal newspaper ((are
that such newspaper)) shall have been published or portions uploaded
regularly, and archival records updated, at least once a week, in the
English language, ((as a newspaper of general circulation, in the city or
town where the same is published at the time of application for approval, for
at least six months prior to the date of such application;)) for at
least six months prior to the date of such application. The legal newspaper
shall be compiled, either in whole or in part, in an office ((maintained
at the place of publication;)) in which printing or outsource
contracting for printing takes place, or web page creation and/or uploading
take place. The newspaper shall contain news of general interest as
contrasted with news of interest primarily to an organization, group, or
class((; and shall hold a second class mailing permit: PROVIDED, That in
case of the consolidation of)). If two or more newspapers consolidate
into one operation, and any one of them qualifies as a legal newspaper the day
it applies for status as a legal newspaper, such consolidated newspaper
shall be considered as qualified ((if either or any of the papers so
consolidated would be a qualified newspaper at the date of such legal
publication, had not such consolidation taken place: PROVIDED, That)).
This section is meant to be as inclusive as possible, and shall not
disqualify ((as a legal newspaper)) any publication ((which, prior to
June 8, 1961, was adjudged a legal newspaper, so long as it continues to meet
the requirements under which it qualified)) as a legal newspaper if same
continues to meet requirements of this section. Determination shall be
weighted heavily in favor of local elected officials, whose budgets are
directly involved, regarding whether a printed or Internet newspaper is qualified
and chosen to publish legal advertisements for their jurisdiction or
jurisdictions.

---
END ---