BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
LEGISLATIVE INTENT AND FINDINGS. The legislature finds that
the implementation of the Washington WorkFirst temporary assistance for needy
families act has resulted in a substantial reduction in single-parent and
two-parent family caseloads. The legislature also finds that many of the
WorkFirst participants who have found unsubsidized paid employment are working
in jobs that result in family incomes that are close to or below the federal
poverty line. The legislature also finds that families who are living at or
close to the federal poverty line have a higher risk of returning to public
assistance and face many challenges in helping their children succeed in school
and prepare for the jobs of the future. The legislature also finds that many
families who should be receiving supportive benefits such as medicaid, child
care, and food stamps are not receiving them.

It
is the intent of the legislature to ensure that the WorkFirst program leads to
substantial increases in hourly wages and quarterly earnings, and high levels
of job retention. The legislature acknowledges that receipt of food stamps,
medicaid, and child care benefits provide wage supports that can raise
families' standard of living and prevent families from returning to cash
assistance because they need health care, child care, or are hungry.

It
is the intent of the legislature to adopt performance measures and goals for
increases in hourly wages, quarterly earnings, job retention, and access to
benefits that support work for WorkFirst participants who have entered
unsubsidized paid employment. It is also the intent of the legislature to
direct the department of social and health services to establish and meet
customer service measures and goals for the WorkFirst program. These measures
shall be used to assess the effectiveness of the WorkFirst program in promoting
a rising standard of living, stable employment, and career advancement for
WorkFirst participants who enter unsubsidized paid employment. It is the
intent of the legislature that the program's performance in achieving these
goals shall be published and made available to the legislature and the general
public on a quarterly basis.

The
legislature recognizes that many families who are working need supportive
services such as medicaid, child care, and food stamps, and that the current
structure of service delivery often requires families to miss work in order to
get those services. Because one of the goals of the WorkFirst program is to
support working families, the legislature intends for changes to be made in
customer service and service delivery to ensure that working families can get
services without missing work or jeopardizing their employment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
REPORTS, AND PROGRAM GOALS AND PERFORMANCE MEASURES FOR EARNINGS GAINS. (1)
The department of social and health services shall report the starting wages of
all WorkFirst participants who have found unsubsidized paid employment on a
quarterly basis.

(2)
The legislature establishes the following median earnings gains goals for all
WorkFirst participants who find unsubsidized paid employment:

(a)
Five percent median earnings gain six months after employment;

(b)
Fifteen percent median earnings gain one year after employment;

(c)
Twenty percent median earnings gain two years after employment;

(d)
Twenty-five percent median earnings gain three years after employment;

(e)
Ten percent median earnings gain between the first and second year of
employment; and

(f)
Five percent median earnings gain between the second and third years of
employment.

(3)
The goals under subsection (2) of this section shall include both hourly wages
and quarterly earnings and shall be measured and reported in the following
manner:

(a)
All WorkFirst participants who have found unsubsidized paid employment shall be
included in the measurement of earnings gains. All of the wages used in these
measures shall be adjusted for inflation using the federal consumer price index
in order to ensure that the state is accurately assessing the inflation
adjusted wage and earnings gains for former WorkFirst participants. The hours
worked and quarterly earnings used to measure earnings gains and job retention
shall be based on the wage files collected and maintained by the employment
security department.

(b)(i)
The hourly wage rate at employment is defined as the quarterly earnings for the
first full calendar quarter after finding unsubsidized paid employment divided
by the number of hours worked in that quarter.

(ii)
The hourly wage rate at six months after employment is defined as the quarterly
earnings in the third full calendar quarter after finding unsubsidized paid
employment divided by the number of hours worked in that quarter.

(iii)
The hourly wage rate at one year after employment is defined as the quarterly
earnings in the fifth full calendar quarter after finding unsubsidized paid
employment divided by the number of hours worked in that quarter.

(iv)
The hourly wage rate at two years after employment is defined as the quarterly
earnings in the ninth full calendar quarter after finding unsubsidized paid
employment divided by the number of hours worked in that quarter.

(v)
The hourly wage rate at three years after employment is defined as the
quarterly earnings in the thirteenth full calendar quarter after finding
unsubsidized paid employment divided by the number of hours worked in that
quarter.

(c)(i)
The quarterly earnings at employment are defined as the quarterly earnings in
the first full calendar quarter after finding unsubsidized paid employment.

(ii)
The quarterly earnings six months after employment are defined as the quarterly
earnings in the third full calendar quarter after finding unsubsidized paid
employment.

(iii)
The quarterly earnings one year after employment are defined as the quarterly
earnings in the fifth full calendar quarter after finding unsubsidized paid
employment.

(iv)
The quarterly earnings two years after employment are defined as the quarterly
earnings in the ninth full calendar quarter after finding unsubsidized paid
employment.

(v)
The quarterly earnings three years after finding unsubsidized paid employment
are defined as the quarterly earnings in the thirteenth full calendar quarter
after finding unsubsidized paid employment.

(d)
The percentage hourly wage gains or losses shall be calculated by dividing the:

(i)
Hourly wage rate six months after employment by the hourly wage rate at
employment;

(ii)
Hourly wage rate one year after employment by the hourly wage rate at
employment;

(iii)
Hourly wage rate two years after employment by the hourly wage rate at
employment;

(iv)
Hourly wage rate three years after employment by the hourly wage rate at
employment;

(v)
Hourly wage rate two years after employment by the hourly wage rate at one year
after employment; and

(vi)
Hourly wage rate at three years after employment by the hourly wage rate two
years after employment.

(e)
The percentage quarterly wage gains or losses shall be calculated by dividing
the:

(i)
Quarterly earnings six months after employment by the quarterly earnings at
employment;

(ii)
Quarterly earnings one year after employment by the quarterly earnings at
employment;

(iii)
Quarterly earnings two years after employment by the quarterly earnings at
employment;

(iv)
Quarterly earnings three years after employment by the quarterly earnings at
employment;

(v)
Quarterly earnings two years after employment by the quarterly earnings at one
year after employment; and

(vi)
Quarterly earnings three years after employment by the quarterly earnings two
years after employment.

(f)
The median earnings gains for all hourly wages and quarterly earnings measures
are defined as the midpoint of the distribution of the percentage earnings
gains for all WorkFirst participants who found unsubsidized paid employment. This
definition applies to both hourly wages and quarterly earnings gains.

(g)
Participants for whom no earnings are reported in the third, fifth, ninth, or
thirteenth quarters shall be excluded from the measure for that particular
quarter. For example, if a participant has earnings in the first quarter but
none in the fifth quarter, they will be excluded from the measure for the fifth
quarter. The participant would still be included in the measures for
subsequent quarters, the ninth or thirteenth during which they report earnings.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
PROGRAM GOALS AND PERFORMANCE MEASURES FOR JOB RETENTION. (1) The legislature
establishes the following full-time and half-time employment and job retention
goals for all WorkFirst participants who find unsubsidized paid employment:

(a)
Sixty percent are working full-time one year after finding unsubsidized paid
employment;

(b)
Sixty-five percent are working full-time two years after finding unsubsidized
paid employment;

(c)
Seventy percent are working full-time three years after finding unsubsidized
paid employment;

(d)
Seventy percent are working at least half-time one year after finding
unsubsidized paid employment;

(e)
Seventy-five percent are working at least half-time two years after finding
unsubsidized paid employment; and

(f)
Eighty percent are working at least half-time three years after finding
unsubsidized paid employment.

(2)
It is the intent of the legislature that the reports mandated in this act shall
include all WorkFirst participants who have entered unsubsidized paid
employment since the start of the WorkFirst program in July 1997.

(a)
The employment security department shall publish on a quarterly basis a report
that details the performance of the WorkFirst program in meeting the program
goals of wage progression and job retention. These reports shall be submitted
to the appropriate legislative committees and made available to the public each
quarter. Given the legislature's goal of encouraging substantial increases in
earnings and job retention, the department shall develop reports that track the
performance of participants back to the start of the program in July 1997.
These quarterly reports shall document the performance of each group of WorkFirst
participants who enter unsubsidized paid employment based on the first quarter
that they found unsubsidized paid employment after entering the WorkFirst
program. For example, the WorkFirst participants who found employment in the
third quarter of 1997 shall have their performance tracked over a three-year
period. Each subsequent group of participants who found employment in the
following quarters shall be tracked separately. Each quarterly report shall
report separately on each group of participants who found unsubsidized paid
employment in separate quarters.

(b)
The employment security department shall submit its first report to the
legislature by September 2, 2000. This initial report shall include earnings
and job retention information on all WorkFirst participants who found
unsubsidized paid employment since the start of the program in July 1997
through December 31, 1999.

(c)
The department shall submit additional reports to the legislature on a
quarterly basis on October 1st, January 1st, April 1st, and July 1st of each
year using the methodology outlined in this act. Each report shall add new
groups of WorkFirst participants who find unsubsidized paid employment in
subsequent quarters.

(3)
Definitions of full-time and half-time work are as follows:

(a)
Working full time is defined as unsubsidized paid employment at least
thirty-five hours per week and shall be determined by dividing the number of
hours worked in the relevant calendar quarter by thirteen weeks. Working full
time is also defined as attending school for nine or more credit hours or
attending school for three or more credit hours and working part time.

(b)
For the purposes of this section, working half time is defined as unsubsidized
paid employment and/or job training at least twenty hours per week, or
attending school for three or more credit hours, and shall be determined by
dividing the number of hours worked in the relevant calendar quarter by
thirteen weeks.

(c)
Working full time or half time and working one, two, or three years after
finding unsubsidized paid employment shall be measured in the fifth, ninth, and
thirteenth full calendar quarters, respectively, after the WorkFirst
participant entered unsubsidized paid employment.

(d)
Attending school is defined only as participating in education and training
provided by state-funded community and technical colleges. Student attendance
data will be provided to the employment security department from the state
board for community and technical colleges.

(e)
All WorkFirst participants who enter unsubsidized paid employment shall be
counted in the measures of working full time and working half time.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
ACCESS TO BENEFITS THAT SUPPORT WORK. (1) For the purposes of this section, the
term "access to benefits ratio" means the number of families who
leave the temporary assistance for needy families program or participate in the
temporary assistance for needy families cash diversion program in a given
quarter who, at the end of the following quarter, are receiving a work support
benefit or are not in need of that benefit, as determined in subsection (2) of
this section, divided by the total number of families who leave temporary
assistance for needy families or participate in the temporary assistance for
needy families cash diversion program in a given quarter.

(2)
Work support benefits are defined as: Food stamps; health insurance through
medicaid or other state or federal coverage; and child care assistance. A
family shall be determined to be not in need of food stamps if they are
ineligible due to income, resources, or categorical eligibility requirements.
A family shall be determined to be not in need of health insurance through
medicaid or other state or federal coverage if they have other health
coverage. A family shall be determined to be not in need of child care
assistance if they are ineligible due to income, resources, or categorical
eligibility requirements, or if they have a plan for adequate child care
appropriate to the age of the child.

(3)
The legislature establishes the goal of a ninety-five percent access to
benefits ratio for each of the three work support benefits. The department
shall report to the legislature on a quarterly basis and make available to the
public the access to benefits ratio for each work support benefit. The first
report shall be submitted to the legislature and made available to the general
public by February 1, 2001, for families leaving assistance during the first
quarter of fiscal year 2001.

(4)
The department shall establish baseline access to benefits ratios as the
average of the access to benefits ratios for the four quarters in fiscal year
2001. In subsequent fiscal years, the department shall achieve the goal
established in subsection (3) of this section or shall achieve a ten percentage
point improvement in the average annual access to benefits ratios for the prior
fiscal year.

(5)
If the department does not achieve the requirements of subsection (4) of this
section for a fiscal year, it shall implement procedural changes within its
available resources to achieve the requirements.

(6)
If the department does not achieve the requirements of subsection (4) of this
section for two consecutive fiscal years, it shall implement an informed
consent procedure for all families leaving temporary assistance for needy
families or who participate in temporary assistance for needy families cash
diversion program. The informed consent procedure shall ensure that case files
contain documented evidence of ineligibility status for substantive reasons
that do not include the case termination code "other" or the case
file must include written documentation that the client has declined the work
support benefit.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. In
order to assess the degree to which eligible families continue to access work
support benefits more than six months after leaving temporary assistance for
needy families, the office of financial management shall update and expand the
Washington population survey to obtain information about former temporary
assistance for needy families recipients and other low-income families and
their use of state subsidized health insurance, food stamps, child care
subsidies, and the earned income tax credit. The office of financial
management shall prepare a report every two years for the legislature and
general public using information about family size and income that compares the
number of families predicted to be eligible based on gross family income for
each of these four benefits to the number of families actually using each of
the four benefits. The report shall also identify factors affecting use of
benefits such as racial categories, geographic regions, citizen status, and
immigration history.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
CUSTOMER SERVICE PERFORMANCE MEASURES. The department shall convene a working
group that includes stakeholders and recipients of public assistance to
establish basic customer service performance measures and goals. The customer
service measures and goals will seek to make support for working families a
priority. Customer service measures shall include, but are not limited to:
Hours of operation that allow working families to get services without missing
work; streamlining requirements to make it easier for working families to
begin and continue using supportive benefits; wait times; access to benefits
that support work; access to job training and education; access to
apprenticeships and preapprenticeship training programs; access to
postemployment and job retention services; access to information about the
earned income tax credit; and access to services for families with limited
literacy or English skills, and families with special needs.

The
department shall report to the legislature by January 2001 and make available
to the public the establishment of customer service measures and goals, the
process for agreeing on those measures and goals, and departmental action to
assure the goals are being met. The department shall make a written report to
the legislature on the ongoing attainment of customer service goals twice per
year.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
Captions used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 2 through 6 of this act are each added to chapter 74.08A RCW.

---
END ---