BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that, although many state agencies use automated telephone
answering for cost savings and efficiency, there are times when a person needs
to have the telephone answered by a live department employee. Washington
citizens, businesses, visitors, and legislators become frustrated in their
attempts to obtain information when they call a major agency and are trapped in
a voice mail loop. The legislature intends that major state agencies have, as
an immediate voice mail option, a minimum of two public telephone main access
lines that are staffed by live department employees who are trained to answer
basic inquiries or to otherwise direct the caller to someone who can assist
them.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.105 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Major state agencies shall make available, as an automated telephone answering
system caller option, the option of promptly reaching a live departmental
employee trained to answer basic inquiries or otherwise direct the caller to
someone appropriate to respond to their request for information. Major state
agencies shall each allocate a minimum of two telephone lines to handle their
responsibilities under this section, and shall monitor on-hold times, with the
goal of an average response time of five minutes or less.

(2)
For the purposes of this section major state agencies are:

(a)
The department of ecology;

(b)
The department of agriculture;

(c)
The office of financial management;

(d)
The department of general administration;

(e)
The department of revenue;

(f)
The department of personnel;

(g)
the department of retirement systems;

(h)
The department of financial institutions;

(i)
The Washington state patrol;

(j)
The department of licensing;

(k)
The department of social and health services;

(l)
The department of labor and industries;

(m)
The employment security department;

(n)
The department of health;

(o)
The department of corrections;

(p)
The department of veterans affairs;

(q)
The department of community, trade, and economic development; and

(r) The office of the secretary of state.

---
END ---