BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
intent of this act is to confirm the holding in State v. Edelman, Docket
Number 42812-8-I, dated August 30, 1999, that restitution under RCW 9.94A.142 must
be paid to the estate of the victim after the victim is deceased.

Sec.
2. RCW
9.94A.142 and 1997 c 121 s 4 and 1997 c 52 s 2 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
When restitution is ordered, the court shall determine the amount of
restitution due at the sentencing hearing or within one hundred eighty days
except as provided in subsection (4) of this section. The court may continue
the hearing beyond the one hundred eighty days for good cause. The court shall
then set a minimum monthly payment that the offender is required to make
towards the restitution that is ordered. If a victim dies before
restitution is paid in full, any unpaid restitution shall be paid to the
victim's estate. The court should take into consideration the total amount
of the restitution owed, the offender's present, past, and future ability to
pay, as well as any assets that the offender may have. During the period of
supervision, the community corrections officer may examine the offender to
determine if there has been a change in circumstances that warrants an
amendment of the monthly payment schedule. The community corrections officer
may recommend a change to the schedule of payment and shall inform the court of
the recommended change and the reasons for the change. The sentencing court
may then reset the monthly minimum payments based on the report from the
community corrections officer of the change in circumstances. Except as provided
in subsection (3) of this section, restitution ordered by a court pursuant to a
criminal conviction shall be based on easily ascertainable damages for injury
to or loss of property, actual expenses incurred for treatment for injury to
persons, and lost wages resulting from injury. Restitution shall not include
reimbursement for damages for mental anguish, pain and suffering, or other
intangible losses, but may include the costs of counseling reasonably related
to the offense. The amount of restitution shall not exceed double the amount
of the offender's gain or the victim's loss from the commission of the crime.
For the purposes of this section, the offender shall remain under the court's
jurisdiction for a term of ten years following the offender's release from
total confinement or ten years subsequent to the entry of the judgment and
sentence, whichever period is longer. Prior to the expiration of the initial
ten-year period, the superior court may extend jurisdiction under the criminal
judgment an additional ten years for payment of restitution. The portion of
the sentence concerning restitution may be modified as to amount, terms and
conditions during either the initial ten-year period or subsequent ten-year
period if the criminal judgment is extended, regardless of the expiration of
the offender's term of community supervision and regardless of the statutory
maximum for the crime. The court may not reduce the total amount of
restitution ordered because the offender may lack the ability to pay the total
amount. The offender's compliance with the restitution shall be supervised by
the department of corrections for ten years following the entry of the judgment
and sentence or ten years following the offender's release from total
confinement. If jurisdiction under the criminal judgment is extended, the
department is not responsible for supervision of the offender during the
subsequent period.

(2)
Restitution shall be ordered whenever the offender is convicted of an offense
which results in injury to any person or damage to or loss of property or as
provided in subsection (3) of this section unless extraordinary circumstances
exist which make restitution inappropriate in the court's judgment and the
court sets forth such circumstances in the record. In addition, restitution
shall be ordered to pay for an injury, loss, or damage if the offender pleads
guilty to a lesser offense or fewer offenses and agrees with the prosecutor's
recommendation that the offender be required to pay restitution to a victim of
an offense or offenses which are not prosecuted pursuant to a plea agreement.

(3)
Restitution for the crime of rape of a child in the first, second, or third
degree, in which the victim becomes pregnant, shall include: (a) All of the
victim's medical expenses that are associated with the rape and resulting
pregnancy; and (b) child support for any child born as a result of the rape if
child support is ordered pursuant to a civil superior court or administrative
order for support for that child. The clerk must forward any restitution
payments made on behalf of the victim's child to the Washington state child
support registry under chapter 26.23 RCW. Identifying information about the
victim and child shall not be included in the order. The defendant shall
receive a credit against any obligation owing under the administrative or
superior court order for support of the victim's child. For the purposes of
this subsection, the offender shall remain under the court's jurisdiction until
the defendant has satisfied support obligations under the superior court or
administrative order but not longer than a maximum term of twenty-five years
following the offender's release from total confinement or twenty-five years
subsequent to the entry of the judgment and sentence, whichever period is
longer. The court may not reduce the total amount of restitution ordered
because the offender may lack the ability to pay the total amount. The
department shall supervise the offender's compliance with the restitution
ordered under this subsection.

(4)
Regardless of the provisions of subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section,
the court shall order restitution in all cases where the victim is entitled to
benefits under the crime victims' compensation act, chapter 7.68 RCW. If the
court does not order restitution and the victim of the crime has been
determined to be entitled to benefits under the crime victims' compensation
act, the department of labor and industries, as administrator of the crime
victims' compensation program, may petition the court within one year of entry
of the judgment and sentence for entry of a restitution order. Upon receipt of
a petition from the department of labor and industries, the court shall hold a
restitution hearing and shall enter a restitution order.

(5)
In addition to any sentence that may be imposed, a defendant who has been found
guilty of an offense involving fraud or other deceptive practice or an
organization which has been found guilty of any such offense may be ordered by
the sentencing court to give notice of the conviction to the class of persons
or to the sector of the public affected by the conviction or financially interested
in the subject matter of the offense by mail, by advertising in designated
areas or through designated media, or by other appropriate means.

(6)
This section does not limit civil remedies or defenses available to the victim,
survivors of the victim, or defendant including support enforcement remedies
for support ordered under subsection (3) of this section for a child born as a
result of a rape of a child victim. The court shall identify in the judgment
and sentence the victim or victims entitled to restitution and what amount is
due each victim. The state or victim may enforce the court-ordered restitution
in the same manner as a judgment in a civil action. Restitution collected
through civil enforcement must be paid through the registry of the court and
must be distributed proportionately according to each victim's loss when there
is more than one victim.

(7) This section shall apply to offenses committed after July 1,
1985.

---
END ---