BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that when a juvenile is ordered to pay a penalty assessment
as part of the disposition of his or her case, the juvenile should be held to
that obligation past his or her eighteenth birthday if he or she has not yet
paid the assessment by the time court jurisdiction ends. The intent of this
act is to clarify the holding in State v. Y.I., 94 Wn. App. 919 (1999),
that juveniles be required to satisfy penalty assessments, and juvenile court
jurisdiction is extended to accomplish this.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 13.40 RCW to read as follows:

If
a respondent is ordered to pay a penalty assessment pursuant to a dispositional
order entered under this chapter, he or she shall remain under the court's
jurisdiction for a maximum term of ten years after the respondent's eighteenth
birthday. Prior to the expiration of the ten-year period, the juvenile court
may extend the judgment for the payment of a penalty assessment for an
additional ten years.

Sec.
3. RCW
13.40.300 and 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 530 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In no case may a juvenile offender be committed by the juvenile court to the
department of social and health services for placement in a juvenile
correctional institution beyond the juvenile offender's twenty-first birthday.
A juvenile may be under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court or the authority
of the department of social and health services beyond the juvenile's
eighteenth birthday only if prior to the juvenile's eighteenth birthday:

(a)
Proceedings are pending seeking the adjudication of a juvenile offense and the
court by written order setting forth its reasons extends jurisdiction of
juvenile court over the juvenile beyond his or her eighteenth birthday;

(b)
The juvenile has been found guilty after a fact finding or after a plea of
guilty and an automatic extension is necessary to allow for the imposition of
disposition; or

(c)
Disposition has been held and an automatic extension is necessary to allow for
the execution and enforcement of the court's order of disposition. If an order
of disposition imposes commitment to the department, then jurisdiction is
automatically extended to include a period of up to twelve months of parole, in
no case extending beyond the offender's twenty-first birthday.

(2)
If the juvenile court previously has extended jurisdiction beyond the juvenile
offender's eighteenth birthday and that period of extension has not expired,
the court may further extend jurisdiction by written order setting forth its
reasons.

(3)
In no event may the juvenile court have authority to extend jurisdiction over
any juvenile offender beyond the juvenile offender's twenty-first birthday
except for the purpose of enforcing an order of restitution or penalty
assessment.

(4)
Notwithstanding any extension of jurisdiction over a person pursuant to this
section, the juvenile court has no jurisdiction over any offenses alleged to
have been committed by a person eighteen years of age or older.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act applies retroactively to March 29, 1999, the date on which the decision in State
v. Y.I., 94 Wn. App. 919 (1999), was rendered.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---