BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 74.15 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that consumers of child day-care centers and family day-care
providers have a legitimate interest in receiving timely information about the
providers of day-care services to enable them to make meaningful choices
regarding facilities and the people who provide care for their children.

The
legislature further finds that parents whose children are consumers of day-care
services are often unaware of the quality of the facility or home they have
chosen. This lack of knowledge is due, in part, to the inability of parents to
obtain such information. The legislature intends to use the state's improved
ability to collect and manage information about day-care service providers by
requiring that all relevant licensing and enforcement action information be
available to parents and other appropriate persons as provided in section 2 of
this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 74.15 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall establish and maintain a toll-free telephone number for
the communication of information to the public regarding child day-care centers
and family day-care providers.

(2)
The telephone number must be published in reasonably available printed and
electronic media and must be easily identifiable as a number by which this
information can be obtained. All licensed day-care providers shall post the
telephone number in a place and manner clearly visible to consumers and the
general public. If requested, a day-care provider and the department shall
provide the requestor with the toll-free number.

(3)
For purposes of this section, "communication of information" means
callers may obtain the following information: (a) Whether a day-care center or
family day-care provider is licensed; (b) whether a day-care center or family
day-care provider is in good standing regarding licensing requirements; (c)
whether a day-care center or family day-care provider is currently being
investigated for either child abuse or neglect allegations or other licensing
violations; (d) whether a day-care center or family day-care provider has ever
been sanctioned for either child abuse or neglect findings or other licensing
violations; (e) whether a day-care center or family day-care provider is
currently or has been in the last three years on a corrective action plan as a
result of either a child abuse or neglect finding or other licensing violation;
(f) how to report suspected abuse or neglect or noncompliance with licensing
standards; and (g) how to contact the office of the family and children's
ombudsman.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act takes effect December 31, 2000.

---
END ---