BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW to read as follows:

Any person eighteen years of age or older who has possession or
control of a firearm that is left unattended and (1) was not placed in a locked
box or similar device, or (2) did not have a trigger lock attached to it, is
strictly liable in an action for damages for personal injury or death
proximately caused by the discharge from such firearm if the injury or death
was inflicted by a person under the age of eighteen.

---
END ---