BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 35.20 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The mayor of a city with a population over four hundred thousand that
prosecutes or enforces parking meter violations shall, by July 1st of each
calendar year, certify under oath or affirmation that all parking meters under
the jurisdiction of the city have been inspected within the past ninety days
and were either (a) working properly upon inspection or (b) repaired and
working properly after the inspection.

(2)
If in any year the mayor fails to make the certification required by subsection
(1) of this section, no tickets or citations for parking meter violations may
be issued after July 1st of that year.

(3) If the mayor makes the certification required in subsection (1)
of this section after July 1st of any year, no tickets or citations for parking
meter violations may be issued until fourteen days have elapsed from the time
of certification.

---
END ---