BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.04.105 and 1999 c 378 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The certificate of "certified public accountant" shall be granted by
the board to any person:

(a)
Who is of good character. Good character, for purposes of this section, means
lack of a history of dishonest or felonious acts. The board may refuse to
grant a certificate on the ground of failure to satisfy this requirement only
if there is a substantial connection between the lack of good character of the
applicant and the professional responsibilities of a certified public
accountant and if the finding by the board of lack of good character is
supported by a preponderance of evidence. When an applicant is found to be
unqualified for a certificate because of a lack of good character, the board
shall furnish the applicant a statement containing the findings of the board
and a notice of the applicant's right of appeal;

(b)
Who has met the educational standards established by rule as the board
determines to be appropriate;

The
board may, in its discretion, waive the educational requirements for any person
if it is satisfied through review of documentation of successful completion of
an equivalency examination that the person's educational qualifications are an
acceptable substitute for the requirements of (b) of this subsection; and

(c)
Who has passed a written examination.

(2)
The examination described in subsection (1)(c) of this section shall be in
writing, shall be held twice a year, and shall test the applicant's knowledge
of the subjects of accounting and auditing, and other related fields the board
may specify by rule. The time for holding the examination is fixed by the
board and may be changed from time to time. The board shall prescribe by rule
the methods of applying for and taking the examination, including methods for
grading papers and determining a passing grade required of an applicant for a
certificate. The board shall to the extent possible see to it that the grading
of the examination, and the passing grades, are uniform with those applicable
to all other states. The board may make use of all or a part of the uniform
certified public accountant examination and advisory grading service of the
American Institute of Certified Public Accountants and may contract with third
parties to perform administrative services with respect to the examination as
the board deems appropriate to assist it in performing its duties under this
chapter.

(3)
An applicant is required to pass all sections of the examination provided for
in subsection (2) of this section in order to qualify for a certificate. If at
a given sitting of the examination an applicant passes two or more but not all
sections, then the applicant shall be given credit for those sections that he
or she passed, and need not take those sections again: PROVIDED, That:

(a)
The applicant took all sections of the examination at that sitting;

(b)
The applicant attained a minimum grade of fifty on each section not passed at
that sitting;

(c)
The applicant passes the remaining sections of the examination within six
consecutive examinations given after the one at which the first sections were
passed;

(d)
At each subsequent sitting at which the applicant seeks to pass additional
sections, the applicant takes all sections not yet passed; and

(e)
In order to receive credit for passing additional sections in a subsequent
sitting, the applicant attains a minimum grade of fifty on sections written but
not passed on the sitting.

(4)
The board may waive or defer any of the requirements of subsection (3) of this
section for candidates transferring conditional CPA exam credits from other
states or for qualifying reciprocity certification applicants who met the
conditioning requirements of the state or foreign jurisdiction issuing their
original certificate.

(5)
The board shall charge each applicant an examination fee for the initial
examination under subsection (1) of this section, or for reexamination under
subsection (3) of this section for each subject in which the applicant is
reexamined. The applicable fee shall be paid by the person at the time he or
she applies for examination, reexamination, or evaluation of educational
qualifications. Fees for examination, reexamination, or evaluation of
educational qualifications shall be determined by the board under chapter 18.04
RCW. There is established in the state treasury an account to be known as the
certified public accountants' account. All fees received from candidates to
take any or all sections of the certified public accountant examination shall
be used only for costs related to the examination.

(6)
Persons who on June 30, 1986, held certified public accountant certificates
previously issued under the laws of this state shall not be required to obtain
additional certificates under this chapter, but shall otherwise be subject to
this chapter. Certificates previously issued shall, for all purposes, be
considered certificates issued under this chapter and subject to its
provisions.

(7)
A certificate of a "certified public accountant" under this chapter
is issued every three years with renewal subject to requirements of continuing
professional education and payment of fees, prescribed by the board.

(8)
The board shall adopt rules providing for continuing professional education for
certified public accountants. The rules shall:

(a)
Provide that a certified public accountant shall verify to the board that he or
she has completed at least an accumulation of one hundred twenty hours of
continuing professional education during the last three-year period to maintain
the certificate;

(b)
Establish continuing professional education requirements;

(c)
Establish when newly certificated public accountants shall verify that they
have completed the required continuing professional education;

(d)
Provide that failure to furnish verification of the completion of the
continuing professional education requirement shall make the certificate
invalid and subject to reinstatement, unless the board determines that the
failure was due to retirement, reasonable cause, or excusable neglect; and

(e)
Provide for transition from existing to new continuing professional education
requirements.

(9) The board may adopt by rule new CPE standards that differ from
those in subsection (8) of this section or RCW 18.04.215 if: (a) The
new standards are consistent with the continuing professional education
standards of other states so as to provide to the greatest extent possible,
consistent national standards; and (b) the new standards are at least as strict
as the standards set forth in subsection (8) of this section or RCW 18.04.215.

---
END ---