BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

The
tax imposed under RCW 82.08.020 shall not apply to sales of natural or manufactured
gas made from a truck to a farm for growing agricultural crops, poultry, or
livestock.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

The tax imposed under RCW 82.12.020 shall not apply to sales of
natural or manufactured gas made from a truck to a farm for growing
agricultural crops, poultry, or livestock.

---
END ---