BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
person is guilty of the crime of unlawful possession of anhydrous ammonia if
the person possesses anhydrous ammonia with the intent to use such anhydrous
ammonia in the manufacture of a controlled substance as defined in chapter
69.50 RCW. Violation of this section is a class C felony.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
person is guilty of the crime of unlawful storage of anhydrous ammonia if the
person possesses anhydrous ammonia in a container that is not approved for
storage or transportation of anhydrous ammonia by the state department of
transportation or otherwise improperly stores or transports anhydrous ammonia.
Violation of this section is a class C felony.

This
section does not apply to public employees or private contractors authorized to
clean up and dispose of hazardous wastes or toxic substances under chapter
70.105 or 70.105D RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
state department of transportation shall develop and maintain a list of
containers approved for the storage and transportation of anhydrous ammonia.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. Any
damages arising out of the unlawful possession of, storage of, or tampering
with anhydrous ammonia or anhydrous ammonia equipment shall be the sole
responsibility of the unlawful possessor, storer, or tamperer. In no case
shall liability for damages arising out of the unlawful possession of, storage
of, or tampering with anhydrous ammonia or anhydrous ammonia equipment extend
to the lawful owner, installer, maintainer, designer, manufacturer, possessor,
or seller of the anhydrous ammonia or anhydrous ammonia equipment, unless such
damages arise out of the lawful owner's, installer's, maintainer's, designer's,
manufacturer's, possessor's, or seller's acts or omissions that constitute
negligent misconduct to abide by the laws regarding anhydrous ammonia
possession and storage.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 15 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---