BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 15.28 RCW to read as follows:

The
commission may act to identify, by a voluntary system of labeling for consumer
information, soft tree fruits grown in this state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A new
section is added to chapter 15.62 RCW to read as follows:

The
commission may act to identify, by a voluntary system of labeling for consumer
information, its industry products grown in this state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A new
section is added to chapter 15.65 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Every commodity board may act to identify, by a voluntary system of labeling
for consumer information, its agricultural commodities grown in this state.

(2)
Nothing in this section shall affect any board's existing labeling activities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 15.66 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Every commodity commission may act to identify, by a voluntary system of
labeling for consumer information, its agricultural commodities grown in this
state.

(2)
Nothing in this section shall affect any commission's existing labeling
activity.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 15.85 RCW to read as follows:

The
department may act to identify, by a voluntary system of labeling for consumer
information, private sector cultured aquatic products produced in this state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 15.86 RCW to read as follows:

The
department may act to identify, by a voluntary system of labeling for consumer
information, organic food produced in this state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. Nothing
in this act shall be construed to limit the authority of any commission, board,
or department.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---