BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
15.21.010 (Declaration of purpose) and 1965 c 61 s 1;

(2) RCW
15.21.020 (Unlawful practices) and 1965 c 61 s 2;

(3) RCW
15.21.030 (Cost) and 1965 c 61 s 3;

(4) RCW
15.21.040 (Combination sales) and 1965 c 61 s 4;

(5) RCW
15.21.050 (Injunction) and 1965 c 61 s 5;

(6) RCW
15.21.060 (Penalties) and 1965 c 61 s 6;

(7) RCW
15.21.070 (Exempt sales) and 1965 c 61 s 7;

(8) RCW
15.21.900 (Chapter cumulative) and 1965 c 61 s 8;

(9) RCW
15.21.910 (Short title) and 1965 c 61 s 9; and

(10) RCW
15.21.920 (Severability--1965 c 61) and 1965 c 61 s 10.

---
END ---