BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that credit card issuers engage in vigorous marketing
campaigns on college campuses in this state that reach students who do not
fully appreciate the perils of abusing credit resources. The resulting
burdensome debt often leads to significant financial hardship on the part of
the student and their family, and sometimes causes a disruption or termination
of their academic career. These marketing campaigns often include gifts or
other incentives to obtain completed applications from students, without
providing information or counseling on the appropriate and responsible use of
credit.

The
legislature further finds that some students and their families depend on the
convenience of credit cards to ensure the timely payment of tuition and other
scholastic necessities, and to provide financial protection in the case of
emergencies.

It
is the intent of this chapter to encourage responsible credit card marketing to
students, and to make available to students and their families information and
counseling on responsible and prudent use of credit.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
Any credit card issuer that conducts a credit card marketing activity on the
campus of any institution of higher education in this state must provide to
students and their families on that campus a program of education on the
responsible use of credit. This education program must be presented at a time
immediately prior to or contemporaneous with any on-campus credit card
marketing activity.

(2)
No credit card may be issued to students enrolled in a college or university
located in this state unless the application submitted by a student includes a
certificate or other reasonable proof that the applicant has attended the
education program required by subsection (1) of this section.

(3)
Credit card issuers may not offer gifts in exchange for the completion of a
credit card application as part of a marketing program conducted on any campus
of a college or university located in this state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. For
the purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated:

(1)
"Credit card" means a card or device issued under an agreement by
which the issuer gives to a cardholder residing in this state the privilege of
obtaining credit from the issuer or other persons, in purchasing or leasing
property or services, obtaining loans, or otherwise.

(2)
"Credit card issuer" means a financial institution, a lender other
than a financial institution, or a merchant that receives applications and
issues credit cards to individuals.

(3)
"Credit card marketing activity" means any activity of an agent or
employee of the credit card issuer on a college or university campus designed
to encourage students to apply for a credit card. Credit card marketing
activity includes the act of placing a display or poster together with credit
card applications on a college or university campus, whether or not an employee
or agent of the credit card issuer attends the display.

(4)
"Institution of higher education," "college," or
"university" includes all postsecondary educational facilities,
including public and private four-year colleges and universities, graduate
programs, and community and technical colleges.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
program of education on the responsible use of credit that meets the
requirements of section 2 of this act shall include at a minimum:

(1)
A full explanation of the financial consequences of not paying off balances in
full within the time specified by the billing statement to avoid interest
charges, including how the issuer computes interest on unpaid balances;

(2)
A full explanation of the impact of a shift from an introductory or initial
interest rate to an ongoing interest rate that is higher, including the exact
time when the higher ongoing interest rate takes effect, and including a
description of acts on the part of the cardholder that will cause an immediate
shift to the higher interest rate;

(3)
A full explanation with examples of how long it would take to pay off various
illustrative balance amounts by paying the minimum monthly payment required
under the credit card agreement at the interest rate charged by the issuer;

(4)
A full explanation of credit related terms, including fixed rates, variable
rates, introductory rates, balance transfers, grace periods, annual fees, and
other fees;

(5)
A full discussion of the generally accepted prudent uses of credit, and the
perils of imprudent uses, as presented by recognized consumer credit counseling
agencies.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. It is
unlawful to issue a credit card in violation of this chapter. A violation is
punishable under chapter 7.80 RCW as a civil infraction against any officer,
employee, or agent of the credit card issuer in violation of this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
legislature finds that the practices covered by this chapter are matters
vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer
protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not
reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business and is
an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of
competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter
19.86 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:

The
sale or other transfer of lists of student names and addresses or other
identifiers by institutions of higher education to credit card issuers or
affiliates of credit card issuers is prohibited.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

---
END ---