BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. For
the purposes of this chapter:

(1)
"Credit card" means a card or device issued under an agreement by
which the issuer gives to a cardholder residing in this state the privilege of
obtaining credit from the issuer or other persons in purchasing or leasing
property or services, obtaining loans, or otherwise.

(2)
"Credit card issuer" means a financial institution, a lender other
than a financial institution, or a merchant that receives applications and
issues credit cards to individuals.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
credit card issuer may not issue a credit card to a person who is a resident of
this state and who is under twenty-one years of age at the time of application
unless:

(1)
A written application is obtained that includes a list of all approved but
unused credit available to the applicant, by amount and source, and a statement
by the applicant indicating the applicant's age; and

(2)
The applicant qualifies for credit under reasonable and prudent standards used
in the industry for extensions of similar credit.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
Except where the applicant has misrepresented his or her age on the
application, failure of the credit card issuer to comply with section 2 of this
act constitutes an affirmative defense to the collection of debt incurred by
using the card or credit issued.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
Credit card issuers may not offer gifts in exchange for the completion of a
credit card application as part of a marketing program conducted on any campus
of a college or university located in this state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:

The
sale or other transfer of lists of student names and addresses or other
identifiers by any college or university in this state to credit card issuers
or affiliates of credit card issuers is prohibited.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6.
Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

---
END ---