BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes that small, privately owned public drinking water supply
systems have limited options for disinfection and must rely on chlorination and
that large amounts of chlorine may have to be used for limited periods of time
under certain circumstances. The legislature intends to help assure that the
customers served by small, privately owned public drinking water systems
routinely receive good quality drinking water, free from the health risk,
discomfort, and inconvenience of high levels of chlorine, in all but exceptional
circumstances of brief duration.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 70.119A RCW to read as follows:

By January 1, 2001, the department of health shall develop and
report to the legislature recommendations for improving the operating
procedures of small privately owned public drinking water systems in order to
prevent excessive chlorination and reliance on chlorination in place of needed
system improvements.

---
END ---