BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
80.28.060 and 1989 c 152 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the commission otherwise orders, no change shall be made in any rate or charge
or in any form of contract or agreement or in any rule or regulation relating
to any rate, charge or service, or in any general privilege or facility which
shall have been filed and published by a gas company, electrical company or
water company in compliance with the requirements of RCW 80.28.050 except after
thirty days' notice to the commission, and in the case of water companies
only, sixty days' notice to the commission and to individual ratepayers,
and publication for thirty days, which notice shall plainly state the changes
proposed to be made in the schedule then in force and the time when the change
will go into effect and all proposed changes shall be shown by printing, filing
and publishing new schedules, or shall be plainly indicated upon the schedules
in force at the time and kept open to public inspection. Proposed changes may
be suspended by the commission within thirty days or before the stated
effective date of the proposed change, whichever is later. The commission, for
good cause shown, may allow changes without requiring the thirty days' notice
by duly filing, in such manner as it may direct, an order specifying the
changes so to be made and the time when it shall take effect. All such changes
shall be immediately indicated upon its schedules by the company affected.
When any change is made in any rate or charge, form of contract or agreement,
or any rule or regulation relating to any rate or charge or service, or in any
general privilege or facility, the effect of which is to increase any rate or
charge, then in existence, attention shall be directed on the copy filed with the
commission to such increase by some character immediately preceding or
following the item in such schedule, such character to be in form as designated
by the commission.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act does not affect any existing right acquired, or liability or obligation
incurred under the section amended in this act or under any rule or order
adopted under that section, nor does it affect any proceeding instituted under
that section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---