BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.20.035 and 1999 c 6 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department may not issue an identicard or a Washington state driver's license
that is valid for identification purposes unless the applicant meets the
identification requirements of subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section.

(1)
A driver's license or identicard applicant must provide the department with at
least one of the following pieces of valid identifying documentation that
contains the signature and a photograph of the applicant:

(a)
A valid or recently expired driver's license or instruction permit that
includes the date of birth of the applicant;

(b)
A Washington state identicard or an identification card issued by another
state;

(c)
An identification card issued by the United States, a state, or an agency of
either the United States or a state, of a kind commonly used to identify the
members or employees of the government agency;

(d)
A military identification card;

(e)
A United States passport; or

(f)
An Immigration and Naturalization Service form.

(2)
An applicant who is a minor may establish identity by providing an affidavit of
the applicant's parent or guardian. The parent or guardian must accompany the
minor and display or provide((:

(a)
At least)) one piece of documentation in subsection (1) of this
section establishing the identity of the parent or guardian((; and

(b)
Additional documentation establishing the relationship between the parent or
guardian and the applicant)).

(3)
A person unable to provide identifying documentation as specified in subsection
(1) or (2) of this section may request that the department review other
available documentation in order to ascertain identity. The department may
waive the requirement if it finds that other documentation clearly establishes
the identity of the applicant.

(4)
The form of an applicant's name, as established under this section, must be the
person's name of record for the purposes of this chapter.

(5)
If the applicant is unable to prove his or her identity under this section, the
department shall plainly label the license "not valid for identification
purposes."

Sec.
2. RCW
46.20.100 and 1999 c 274 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Application. The application of a person under the age of eighteen
years for a driver's license or a motorcycle endorsement must be signed by a
parent or guardian with custody of the minor. The department of licensing
must furnish an affidavit that allows an adult to affirm in writing that he or
she is the minor's parent or guardian with custody. The parent must also
display one piece of identifying documentation as specified in RCW 46.20.035.
No other documentation or proof of the adult's status as the minor's parent or
guardian is required. If the person under the age of eighteen has no
father, mother, or guardian, then the application must be signed by the minor's
employer.

(2)
Traffic safety education requirement. For a person under the age of
eighteen years to obtain a driver's license he or she must meet the traffic
safety education requirements of this subsection.

(a)
To meet the traffic safety education requirement for a driver's license the
applicant must satisfactorily complete a traffic safety education course as
defined in RCW 28A.220.020. The course must meet the standards established by
the office of the state superintendent of public instruction. The traffic
safety education course may be provided by:

(i)
A recognized secondary school; or

(ii)
A commercial driving enterprise that is annually approved by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.

(b)
To meet the traffic safety education requirement for a motorcycle endorsement,
the applicant must successfully complete a motorcycle safety education course
that meets the standards established by the department of licensing.

(c)
The department may waive the traffic safety education requirement for a
driver's license if the applicant demonstrates to the department's satisfaction
that:

(i)
He or she was unable to take or complete a traffic safety education course;

(ii)
A need exists for the applicant to operate a motor vehicle; and

(iii)
He or she has the ability to operate a motor vehicle in such a manner as not to
jeopardize the safety of persons or property.

The
department may adopt rules to implement this subsection (2)(c) in concert with
the supervisor of the traffic safety education section of the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.

(d) The department may waive the traffic safety education
requirement if the applicant was licensed to drive a motor vehicle or
motorcycle outside this state and provides proof that he or she has had
education equivalent to that required under this subsection.

---
END ---