BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature has recognized the need to develop a graduated licensing system in
light of the disproportionately high incidence of motor vehicle crashes
involving youthful motorists. This system will improve highway safety by
progressively developing and improving the skills of younger drivers in the
safest possible environment, thereby reducing the number of vehicle crashes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
An intermediate license authorizes the holder to drive a motor vehicle under
the conditions specified in this section. An applicant for an intermediate
license must be at least sixteen years of age and:

(a)
Have possessed a valid instruction permit for a period of not less than six
months;

(b)
Have passed a driver licensing examination administered by the department;

(c)
Have passed a course of driver's education in accordance with the standards
established in RCW 46.20.100;

(d)
Present certification by his or her parent, guardian, or employer to the
department stating (i) that the applicant has had at least fifty hours of
driving experience, ten of which were at night, during which the driver was
supervised by a person at least twenty-one years of age who has had a valid
driver's license for at least three years, and (ii) that the applicant has not
been issued a notice of traffic infraction or cited for a traffic violation
that is pending at the time of the application for the intermediate license;

(e)
Not have been convicted of or found to have committed a traffic violation
within the last six months before the application for the intermediate license;
and

(f)
Not have been adjudicated for an offense involving the use of alcohol or drugs
during the period the applicant held an instruction permit.

(2)
For the first six months after the issuance of an intermediate license or until
the holder reaches eighteen years of age, whichever occurs first, the holder of
the license may not operate a motor vehicle that is carrying any passengers
under the age of twenty who are not members of the holder's immediate family as
defined in RCW 42.17.020. For the remaining period of the intermediate
license, the holder may not operate a motor vehicle that is carrying more than three
passengers who are under the age of twenty who are not members of the holder's
immediate family.

(3)
The holder of an intermediate license may not operate a motor vehicle between
the hours of 12 a.m. and 5 a.m. except when:

(a)
The holder is accompanied by a parent, guardian, or a licensed driver who is at
least twenty-five years of age;

(b)
The holder is driving between the holder's home and place of employment;

(c)
The holder is driving between the holder's home and a public, private, or home
school event for which no other transportation is available;

(d)
The holder is driving for employment purposes; or

(e)
The holder is not an employee of a farm, but is moving a vehicle from one farm
to another, or to a farm employee.

(4)
It is a traffic infraction for the holder of an intermediate license to operate
a motor vehicle in violation of the restrictions imposed under this section.

(5)
Enforcement of this section by law enforcement officers may be accomplished
only as a secondary action when a driver of a motor vehicle has been detained
for a suspected violation of this title or an equivalent local ordinance or
some other offense.

(6)
An intermediate licensee may drive at any hour without restriction on the
number of passengers in the vehicle if required due to an emergency.

(7)
An intermediate licensee may drive at any hour without restrictions on the
number of passengers in the vehicle if required by family necessity as
evidenced by a signed statement of a parent or guardian. The note must be dated
and is effective for only one day.

(8)
An intermediate licensee may drive at any hour without restrictions on the
number of passengers in the vehicle if necessary for agricultural purposes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 46.20 RCW to read as follows:

If
a person issued an intermediate license is convicted of or found to have
committed a traffic offense described in chapter 46.61 RCW or violated
restrictions placed on an intermediate license under section 2 of this act:

(1)
On the first such conviction or finding, the department shall mail the parent
or guardian of the person a letter warning the person of the provisions of this
section;

(2)
On the second such conviction or finding, the department shall suspend the
person's intermediate driver's license for a period of six months or until the
person reaches eighteen years of age, whichever occurs first;

(3)
On the third such conviction or finding, the department shall suspend the
person's intermediate driver's license until the person reaches eighteen years
of age.

For
the purposes of this section, a single ticket for one or more traffic offenses
constitutes a single traffic offense.

Sec.
4. RCW
46.20.091 and 1999 c 6 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Application. In order to apply for a driver's license or instruction
permit the applicant must provide his or her:

(a)
Name of record, as established by documentation required under RCW 46.20.035;

(b)
Date of birth, as established by satisfactory evidence of age;

(c)
Sex;

(d)
Washington residence address;

(e)
Description;

(f)
Driving licensing history, including:

(i)
Whether the applicant has ever been licensed as a driver or chauffeur and, if
so, (A) when and by what state or country; (B) whether the license has ever
been suspended or revoked; and (C) the date of and reason for the suspension or
revocation; or

(ii)
Whether the applicant's application to another state or country for a driver's
license has ever been refused and, if so, the date of and reason for the
refusal; and

(g)
Any additional information required by the department.

(2)
Sworn statement. An application for an instruction permit or for an
original driver's license must be made upon a form provided by the department.
The form must include a section for the applicant to indicate whether he or
she has received driver training and, if so, where. The identifying
documentation verifying the name of record must be accompanied by the
applicant's written statement that it is valid. The information provided on
the form must be sworn to and signed by the applicant before a person
authorized to administer oaths. An applicant who makes a false statement on an
application for a driver's license or instruction permit is guilty of false
swearing, a gross misdemeanor, under RCW 9A.72.040.

(3)
Driving records from other jurisdictions. If a person previously
licensed in another jurisdiction applies for a Washington driver's license, the
department shall request a copy of the applicant's driver's record from the
other jurisdiction. The driving record from the other jurisdiction becomes a
part of the driver's record in this state.

(4)
Driving records to other jurisdictions. If another jurisdiction
requests a copy of a person's Washington driver's record, the department shall
provide a copy of the record. The department shall forward the record without
charge if the other jurisdiction extends the same privilege to the state of
Washington. Otherwise the department shall charge a reasonable fee for
transmittal of the record.

Sec.
5. RCW
46.20.105 and 1987 c 463 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department may provide a method to distinguish the driver's license of a
person who is under the age of twenty-one from the driver's license of a person
who is twenty-one years of age or older.

(2)
An instruction permit must be identified as an "instruction permit"
and issued in a distinctive form as determined by the department.

(3)
An intermediate license must be identified as an "intermediate
license" and issued in a distinctive form as determined by the department.

Sec.
6. RCW
46.20.161 and 1999 c 308 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department, upon receipt of a fee of twenty-five dollars, unless the driver's
license is issued for a period other than five years, in which case the fee
shall be five dollars for each year that the license is issued, which includes
the fee for the required photograph, shall issue to every qualifying applicant
a driver's license. A driver's license issued to a person under the age of
eighteen is an intermediate license, subject to the restrictions imposed under
section 2 of this act, until the person reaches the age of eighteen. The
license must include a distinguishing number assigned to the licensee, the name
of record, date of birth, Washington residence address, photograph, a brief
description of the licensee, and either a facsimile of the signature of the
licensee or a space upon which the licensee shall write his or her usual
signature with pen and ink immediately upon receipt of the license. No license
is valid until it has been so signed by the licensee.

Sec.
7. RCW
46.20.311 and 1998 c 212 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
The department shall not suspend a driver's license or privilege to drive a
motor vehicle on the public highways for a fixed period of more than one year,
except as specifically permitted under section 3 of this act, RCW
46.20.342, or other provision of law. Except for a suspension under section
3 of this act, RCW 46.20.289, 46.20.291(5), or 74.20A.320, whenever the
license or driving privilege of any person is suspended by reason of a
conviction, a finding that a traffic infraction has been committed, pursuant to
chapter 46.29 RCW, or pursuant to RCW 46.20.291 or 46.20.308, the suspension
shall remain in effect until the person gives and thereafter maintains proof of
financial responsibility for the future as provided in chapter 46.29 RCW. If
the suspension is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the
department shall determine the person's eligibility for licensing based upon
the reports provided by the alcoholism agency or probation department
designated under RCW 46.61.5056 and shall deny reinstatement until enrollment
and participation in an approved program has been established and the person is
otherwise qualified. Whenever the license or driving privilege of any person
is suspended as a result of certification of noncompliance with a child support
order under chapter 74.20A RCW or a residential or visitation order, the
suspension shall remain in effect until the person provides a release issued by
the department of social and health services stating that the person is in
compliance with the order.

(b)(i)
The department shall not issue to the person a new, duplicate, or renewal
license until the person pays a reissue fee of twenty dollars.

(ii)
If the suspension is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504,
or is the result of administrative action under RCW 46.20.308, the reissue fee
shall be one hundred fifty dollars.

(2)(a)
Any person whose license or privilege to drive a motor vehicle on the public
highways has been revoked, unless the revocation was for a cause which has been
removed, is not entitled to have the license or privilege renewed or restored
until: (i) After the expiration of one year from the date the license or
privilege to drive was revoked; (ii) after the expiration of the applicable
revocation period provided by RCW 46.20.3101 or 46.61.5055; (iii) after the
expiration of two years for persons convicted of vehicular homicide; or (iv)
after the expiration of the applicable revocation period provided by RCW
46.20.265.

(b)(i)
After the expiration of the appropriate period, the person may make application
for a new license as provided by law together with a reissue fee in the amount
of twenty dollars.

(ii)
If the revocation is the result of a violation of RCW 46.20.308, 46.61.502, or
46.61.504, the reissue fee shall be one hundred fifty dollars. If the
revocation is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the
department shall determine the person's eligibility for licensing based upon
the reports provided by the alcoholism agency or probation department
designated under RCW 46.61.5056 and shall deny reissuance of a license, permit,
or privilege to drive until enrollment and participation in an approved program
has been established and the person is otherwise qualified.

(c)
Except for a revocation under RCW 46.20.265, the department shall not then
issue a new license unless it is satisfied after investigation of the driving
ability of the person that it will be safe to grant the privilege of driving a
motor vehicle on the public highways, and until the person gives and thereafter
maintains proof of financial responsibility for the future as provided in
chapter 46.29 RCW. For a revocation under RCW 46.20.265, the department shall
not issue a new license unless it is satisfied after investigation of the
driving ability of the person that it will be safe to grant that person the
privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the public highways.

(3)(a)
Whenever the driver's license of any person is suspended pursuant to Article IV
of the nonresident violators compact or RCW 46.23.020 or 46.20.289 or
46.20.291(5), the department shall not issue to the person any new or renewal
license until the person pays a reissue fee of twenty dollars.

(b)
If the suspension is the result of a violation of the laws of this or any other
state, province, or other jurisdiction involving (i) the operation or physical
control of a motor vehicle upon the public highways while under the influence
of intoxicating liquor or drugs, or (ii) the refusal to submit to a chemical
test of the driver's blood alcohol content, the reissue fee shall be one
hundred fifty dollars.

Sec.
8. RCW
46.20.342 and 1999 c 274 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
It is unlawful for any person to drive a motor vehicle in this state while that
person is in a suspended or revoked status or when his or her privilege to
drive is suspended or revoked in this or any other state. Any person who has a
valid Washington driver's license is not guilty of a violation of this section.

(a)
A person found to be an habitual offender under chapter 46.65 RCW, who violates
this section while an order of revocation issued under chapter 46.65 RCW
prohibiting such operation is in effect, is guilty of driving while license
suspended or revoked in the first degree, a gross misdemeanor. Upon the first
such conviction, the person shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than
ten days. Upon the second conviction, the person shall be punished by
imprisonment for not less than ninety days. Upon the third or subsequent
conviction, the person shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one
hundred eighty days. If the person is also convicted of the offense defined in
RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, when both convictions arise from the same event,
the minimum sentence of confinement shall be not less than ninety days. The
minimum sentence of confinement required shall not be suspended or deferred. A
conviction under this subsection does not prevent a person from petitioning for
reinstatement as provided by RCW 46.65.080.

(b)
A person who violates this section while an order of suspension or revocation
prohibiting such operation is in effect and while the person is not eligible to
reinstate his or her driver's license or driving privilege, other than for a
suspension for the reasons described in (c) of this subsection, is guilty of
driving while license suspended or revoked in the second degree, a gross
misdemeanor. This subsection applies when a person's driver's license or
driving privilege has been suspended or revoked by reason of:

(i)
A conviction of a felony in the commission of which a motor vehicle was used;

(ii)
A previous conviction under this section;

(iii)
A notice received by the department from a court or diversion unit as provided
by RCW 46.20.265, relating to a minor who has committed, or who has entered a
diversion unit concerning an offense relating to alcohol, legend drugs,
controlled substances, or imitation controlled substances;

(iv)
A conviction of RCW 46.20.410, relating to the violation of restrictions of an
occupational driver's license;

(v)
A conviction of RCW ((46.20.420)) 46.20.345, relating to the
operation of a motor vehicle with a suspended or revoked license;

(vi)
A conviction of RCW 46.52.020, relating to duty in case of injury to or death
of a person or damage to an attended vehicle;

(vii)
A conviction of RCW 46.61.024, relating to attempting to elude pursuing police
vehicles;

(viii)
A conviction of RCW 46.61.500, relating to reckless driving;

(ix)
A conviction of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, relating to a person under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs;

(x)
A conviction of RCW 46.61.520, relating to vehicular homicide;

(xi)
A conviction of RCW 46.61.522, relating to vehicular assault;

(xii)
A conviction of RCW 46.61.527(4), relating to reckless endangerment of roadway
workers;

(xiii)
A conviction of RCW 46.61.530, relating to racing of vehicles on highways;

(xiv)
A conviction of RCW 46.61.685, relating to leaving children in an unattended
vehicle with motor running;

(xv)
A conviction of RCW 46.64.048, relating to attempting, aiding, abetting,
coercing, and committing crimes;

(xvi)
An administrative action taken by the department under chapter 46.20 RCW; or

(xvii)
A conviction of a local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution of a
political subdivision of this state, the federal government, or any other
state, of an offense substantially similar to a violation included in this
subsection.

(c)
A person who violates this section when his or her driver's license or driving
privilege is, at the time of the violation, suspended or revoked solely because
(i) the person must furnish proof of satisfactory progress in a required
alcoholism or drug treatment program, (ii) the person must furnish proof of
financial responsibility for the future as provided by chapter 46.29 RCW, (iii)
the person has failed to comply with the provisions of chapter 46.29 RCW
relating to uninsured accidents, (iv) the person has failed to respond to a
notice of traffic infraction, failed to appear at a requested hearing, violated
a written promise to appear in court, or has failed to comply with the terms of
a notice of traffic infraction or citation, as provided in RCW 46.20.289, (v)
the person has committed an offense in another state that, if committed in this
state, would not be grounds for the suspension or revocation of the person's
driver's license, ((or)) (vi) the person has been suspended or revoked
by reason of one or more of the items listed in (b) of this subsection, but was
eligible to reinstate his or her driver's license or driving privilege at the
time of the violation, or (vii) the person has received traffic citations or
notices of traffic infraction that have resulted in a suspension under section
3 of this act relating to intermediate drivers' licenses, or any
combination of (i) through (((vi))) (vii), is guilty of driving
while license suspended or revoked in the third degree, a misdemeanor.

(2)
Upon receiving a record of conviction of any person or upon receiving an order
by any juvenile court or any duly authorized court officer of the conviction of
any juvenile under this section, the department shall:

(a)
For a conviction of driving while suspended or revoked in the first degree, as
provided by subsection (1)(a) of this section, extend the period of
administrative revocation imposed under chapter 46.65 RCW for an additional
period of one year from and after the date the person would otherwise have been
entitled to apply for a new license or have his or her driving privilege
restored; or

(b)
For a conviction of driving while suspended or revoked in the second degree, as
provided by subsection (1)(b) of this section, not issue a new license or
restore the driving privilege for an additional period of one year from and
after the date the person would otherwise have been entitled to apply for a new
license or have his or her driving privilege restored; or

(c)
Not extend the period of suspension or revocation if the conviction was under
subsection (1)(c) of this section. If the conviction was under subsection (1)
(a) or (b) of this section and the court recommends against the extension and
the convicted person has obtained a valid driver's license, the period of
suspension or revocation shall not be extended.

Sec.
9. RCW
28A.220.030 and 1979 c 158 s 196 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The superintendent of public instruction is authorized to establish a section
of traffic safety education, and through such section shall: Define a
"realistic level of effort" required to provide an effective traffic
safety education course, establish a level of driving competency required of
each student to successfully complete the course, and ensure that an effective
state-wide program is implemented and sustained, administer, supervise, and
develop the traffic safety education program and shall assist local school
districts in the conduct of their traffic safety education programs. The
superintendent shall adopt necessary rules and regulations governing the
operation and scope of the traffic safety education program; and each school
district shall submit a report to the superintendent on the condition of its
traffic safety education program: PROVIDED, That the superintendent shall
monitor the quality of the program and carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(2)
The board of directors of any school district maintaining a secondary school
which includes any of the grades 10 to 12, inclusive, may establish and
maintain a traffic safety education course. If a school district elects to
offer a traffic safety education course and has within its boundaries a private
accredited secondary school which includes any of the grades 10 to 12,
inclusive, at least one class in traffic safety education shall be given at
times other than regular school hours if there is sufficient demand therefor.

(3)
The board of directors of a school district, or combination of school
districts, may contract with any drivers' school licensed under the provisions
of chapter 46.82 RCW to teach the laboratory phase of the traffic safety
education course. Instructors provided by any such contracting drivers' school
must be properly qualified teachers of traffic safety education under the joint
qualification requirements adopted by the superintendent of public instruction
and the director of licensing.

(4)
The superintendent shall establish a required minimum number of hours of
continuing traffic safety education for traffic safety education instructors.
The superintendent may phase in the requirement over not more than five years.

Sec.
10. RCW
28A.220.040 and 1984 c 258 s 331 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each school district shall be reimbursed from funds appropriated for traffic
safety education((: PROVIDED, That)).

(a)
The state superintendent shall determine the per-pupil reimbursement
amount for the traffic safety education course to be funded by the state. Each
school district offering an approved standard traffic safety education course
shall be reimbursed or granted an amount up to the level established by the
superintendent of public instruction as may be appropriated.

(b)
The state superintendent may provide per-pupil reimbursements to school
districts only where all the traffic educators have satisfied the continuing
education requirement of RCW 28A.220.030(5).

(2)
The board of directors of any school district or combination of school
districts may establish a traffic safety education fee, which fee when imposed
shall be required to be paid by any duly enrolled student in any such school
district prior to or while enrolled in a traffic safety education course.
Traffic safety education fees collected by a school district shall be deposited
with the county treasurer to the credit of such school district, to be used to
pay costs of the traffic safety education course.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. A new
section is added to chapter 28A.220 RCW to read as follows:

The
superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the department of
licensing, shall adopt rules for implementing section 2(1)(d) of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12.
Sections 1 through 10 of this act take effect July 1, 2001.

---
END ---