BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.52.030 and 1997 c 248 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Unless a report is to be made by a law enforcement officer under subsection (3)
of this section, the driver of any vehicle involved in an accident resulting in
injury to or death of any person or damage to the property of any one person to
an apparent extent equal to or greater than the minimum amount established by
rule adopted by the chief of the Washington state patrol in accordance with
subsection (5) of this section, shall, within four days after such accident,
make a written report of such accident to the chief of police of the city or
town if such accident occurred within an incorporated city or town or the
county sheriff or state patrol if such accident occurred outside incorporated
cities and towns. Nothing in this subsection prohibits accident reports from
being filed by drivers where damage to property is less than the minimum amount
or where a law enforcement officer has submitted a report.

(2)
The original of the report shall be immediately forwarded by the authority
receiving the report to the chief of the Washington state patrol at Olympia,
Washington. The Washington state patrol shall give the department of licensing
full access to the report.

(3)
Any law enforcement officer who investigates an accident for which a report is
required under subsection (1) of this section shall submit an investigator's
report as required by RCW 46.52.070.

(4)
The chief of the Washington state patrol may require any driver of any vehicle
involved in an accident, of which report must be made as provided in this
section, to file supplemental reports whenever the original report in the
chief's opinion is insufficient, and may likewise require witnesses of any such
accident to render reports. For this purpose, the chief of the Washington
state patrol shall prepare and, upon request, supply to any police department,
coroner, sheriff, and any other suitable agency or individual, sample forms of
accident reports required hereunder, which reports shall be upon a form devised
by the chief of the Washington state patrol and shall call for sufficiently
detailed information to disclose all material facts with reference to the
accident to be reported thereon, including the location, the circumstances, the
conditions then existing, the persons and vehicles involved, the insurance
information required under RCW 46.30.030, personal injury or death, if any, the
amounts of property damage claimed, the total number of vehicles involved,
whether the vehicles were legally parked, legally standing, or moving, and
whether such vehicles were occupied at the time of the accident. In the
narrative section of the report the reporting officer should indicate whether
either driver was using a mobile telephone while operating either vehicle.
Every required accident report shall be made on a form prescribed by the chief
of the Washington state patrol and each authority charged with the duty of
receiving such reports shall provide sufficient report forms in compliance with
the form devised. The report forms shall be designated so as to provide that a
copy may be retained by the reporting person.

(5) The chief of the Washington state patrol shall adopt rules
establishing the accident-reporting threshold for property damage accidents.
Beginning October 1, 1987, the accident-reporting threshold for property damage
accidents shall be five hundred dollars. The accident-reporting threshold for
property damage accidents shall be revised when necessary, but not more
frequently than every two years. The revisions shall only be for the purpose
of recognizing economic changes as reflected by an inflationary index
recommended by the office of financial management. The revisions shall be
guided by the change in the index for the time period since the last revision.

---
END ---