BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
35.67.010 and 1997 c 447 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

A
"system of sewerage" means and may include any or all of the
following:

(1)
Sanitary sewage collection, treatment, and/or disposal facilities and services,
on-site or off-site sanitary sewerage facilities, inspection services and
maintenance services for public or private on-site systems, or any other means
of sewage treatment and disposal approved by the city;

(2)
Combined sanitary sewage disposal and storm or surface water sewers;

(3)
Natural or constructed storm or surface water ((sewers)) facilities;

(4)
Outfalls for storm drainage or sanitary sewage and works, plants, and
facilities for storm drainage or sanitary sewage treatment and disposal, and
rights and interests in property relating to the system, including the
acquisition, protection, maintenance, restoration, and rehabilitation of
aquatic resources and fish habitat;

(5)
Combined water and sewerage systems;

(6)
Point and nonpoint water pollution monitoring programs that are directly
related to the sewerage facilities and programs operated by a city or town;

(7)
Public restroom and sanitary facilities; and

(8)
Any combination of or part of any or all of such facilities.

The words "public utility" when used in this chapter has
the same meaning as the words "system of sewerage."

Sec.
2. RCW
36.89.010 and 1970 ex.s. c 30 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
words "governmental agency" as used in this chapter mean the United
States of America, the state or any agency, subdivision, taxing district or
municipal or quasi municipal corporation thereof.

The
word "highways" as used in this chapter means all public roads,
streets, expressways, parkways, scenic drives, bridges and other public ways,
including without limitation, traffic control facilities, special lanes,
turnouts or structures in, upon, over or under such public ways for exclusive
or nonexclusive use by public transit vehicles, and landscaping, visual and
sound buffers between such public ways and adjacent properties.

The
words "open space, park, recreation and community facilities" as used
in this chapter mean any public facility, improvement, development, property or
right or interest therein for public park, recreational, green belt, arboretum,
multi-purpose community center (as defined in RCW 35.59.010), museum, zoo,
aquarium, auditorium, exhibition, athletic, historic, scenic, viewpoint,
aesthetic, ornamental or natural resource preservation purposes.

The
words "public health and safety facilities" as used in this chapter
mean any public facility, improvement, development, property or right or
interest therein, made, constructed or acquired for the purpose of protecting
life from disease or injury, enforcing the criminal and civil laws or
protecting property from damage caused by breach of law, including but not
limited to public hospitals, health laboratories, public health clinics or
service centers, custodial, correction or rehabilitation facilities,
courtrooms, crime laboratories, law enforcement equipment and facilities,
training facilities for specialized personnel, facilities for the collection,
storage, retrieval or communication of information, and mobile, support or
administrative facilities, all as necessary for the foregoing purpose, or any
combination of the facilities herein described.

The
words "storm water control facilities" as used in this chapter mean
any facility, natural or constructed, improvement, development, property
or interest therein, made, constructed, maintained, restored, rehabilitated,
used, or acquired for the purpose of controlling, or protecting life or
property, as well as aquatic resources and fish habitat, from, any
storm, waste, flood or surplus waters wherever located within the county, and
shall include but not be limited to the improvements and authority described in
RCW 86.12.020 and chapters 86.13 and 86.15 RCW.

The
word "county" as used in this chapter shall mean any county of the
state of Washington.

Sec.
3. RCW
36.89.030 and 1984 c 7 s 42 are each amended to read as follows:

Counties
are authorized to establish, acquire, develop, construct, maintain, protect,
restore, rehabilitate, and improve open space, park, recreation, and
community facilities, public health and safety facilities, storm water control
facilities, and highways or any of them pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter within and without the cities and towns of the county and for such
purposes have the power to acquire lands, buildings and other facilities by
gift, grant, purchase, condemnation, lease, devise, and bequest, to construct,
improve, or maintain buildings, structures, and facilities necessary for such
purposes, and to use and develop for such purposes the air rights over and the
subsurface rights under any highway. The approval of the state department of
transportation shall be first secured for such use and development of any state
highway. For visual or sound buffer purposes the county shall not acquire by
condemnation less than an owner's entire interest or right in the particular
real property to be so acquired if the owner objects to the taking of a lesser
interest or right.

Sec.
4. RCW
36.94.010 and 1997 c 447 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
A "system of sewerage" means and may include any or all of the
following:

(a)
Sanitary sewage collection, treatment, and/or disposal facilities and
services, including without limitation on-site or off-site sanitary sewerage
facilities, inspection services and maintenance services for private or public
on-site systems, or any other means of sewage treatment and disposal approved
by the county;

(b)
Combined sanitary sewage disposal and storm or surface water drains and
facilities;

(c)
Natural or constructed storm or surface water drains, channels, and
facilities;

(d)
Outfalls for storm drainage or sanitary sewage and works, plants, and
facilities for storm drainage or sanitary sewage treatment and disposal, and
rights and interests in property relating to the system;

(e)
Combined water and sewerage systems;

(f)
Point and nonpoint water pollution monitoring programs that are directly
related to the sewerage facilities and programs operated by a county;

(g)
Public restroom and sanitary facilities;

(h)
The facilities and services authorized in RCW 36.94.020; and

(i)
Any combination of or part of any or all of such facilities.

(2)
A "system of water" means and includes:

(a)
A water distribution system, including dams, reservoirs, aqueducts, aquifers
and other ground water resources, plants, pumping stations, transmission
and lateral distribution lines and other facilities for distribution of water;

(b)
A combined water and sewerage system;

(c)
Any combination of or any part of any or all of such facilities.

(3)
A "sewerage and/or water general plan" means a general plan for a
system of sewerage and/or water for the county which shall be an element of the
comprehensive plan established by the county pursuant to RCW 36.70.350(6)
and/or chapter 35.63 RCW, if there is such a comprehensive plan.

(a)
A sewerage general plan shall include the general location and description of
treatment and disposal facilities, trunk and interceptor sewers, pumping
stations, monitoring and control facilities, channels, local service areas and
a general description of the collection system to serve those areas, a
description of on-site sanitary sewerage system inspection services and
maintenance services, and other facilities and services as may be required to
provide a functional and implementable plan, including preliminary engineering
to assure feasibility. The plan may also include a description of the
regulations deemed appropriate to carrying out surface drainage plans.

(b)
A water general plan shall include the general location and description of water
resources to be utilized, wells, treatment facilities, transmission lines,
storage reservoirs, pumping stations, and monitoring and control facilities as
may be required to provide a functional and implementable plan.

(c)
Water and/or sewerage general plans shall include preliminary engineering in
adequate detail to assure technical feasibility and, to the extent then known,
shall further discuss the methods of distributing the cost and expense of the
system and shall indicate the economic feasibility of plan implementation. The
plans may also specify local or lateral facilities and services. The sewerage
and/or water general plan does not mean the final engineering construction or
financing plans for the system.

(4)
"Municipal corporation" means and includes any city, town,
metropolitan municipal corporation, any public utility district which operates
and maintains a sewer or water system, any sewer, water, diking, or drainage
district, any diking, drainage, and sewerage improvement district, and any
irrigation district.

(5)
A "private utility" means and includes all utilities, both public and
private, which provide sewerage and/or water service and which are not
municipal corporations within the definition of this chapter. The ownership of
a private utility may be in a corporation, nonprofit or for profit, in a
cooperative association, in a mutual organization, or in individuals.

(6)
"Board" means one or more boards of county commissioners and/or the
legislative authority of a home rule charter county.

Sec.
5. RCW
36.94.020 and 1997 c 447 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The
construction, operation, ((and)) maintenance, restoration, and
rehabilitation of a system of sewerage and/or water is a county purpose.
Subject to the provisions of this chapter, every county has the power,
individually or in conjunction with another county or counties to adopt,
provide for, accept, establish, condemn, purchase, construct, add to, operate,
((and)) maintain, restore, and rehabilitate a system or systems
of sanitary and storm sewers, including outfalls, interceptors, plans, and
facilities and services necessary for sewerage treatment and disposal, and/or
system or systems of water supply within all or a portion of the county.
However, counties shall not have power to condemn sewerage and/or water systems
of any municipal corporation or private utility.

Such
county or counties shall have the authority to control, regulate, operate, and
manage such system or systems and to provide funds therefor by general
obligation bonds, revenue bonds, local improvement district bonds, utility
local improvement district or local improvement district assessments, and in
any other lawful fiscal manner. Rates or charges for on-site inspection and
maintenance services may not be imposed under this chapter on the development,
construction, or reconstruction of property.

Under
this chapter, after July 1, 1998, any requirements for pumping the septic tank
of an on-site sewage system should be based, among other things, on actual
measurement of accumulation of sludge and scum by a trained inspector, trained
owner's agent, or trained owner. Training must occur in a program approved by
the state board of health or by a local health officer.

Before
adopting on-site inspection and maintenance utility services, or incorporating
residences into an on-site inspection and maintenance or sewer utility under
this chapter, notification must be provided, prior to the applicable public
hearing, to all residences within the proposed service area that have on-site
systems permitted by the local health officer. The notice must clearly state
that the residence is within the proposed service area and must provide
information on estimated rates or charges that may be imposed for the service.

A
county shall not provide on-site sewage system inspection, pumping services, or
other maintenance or repair services under this section using county employees
unless the on-site system is connected by a publicly owned collection system to
the county's sewerage system, and the on-site system represents the first step
in the sewage disposal process. Nothing in this section shall affect the
authority of a state or local health officer to carry out their
responsibilities under any other applicable law.

A
county may, as part of a system of sewerage established under this chapter,
provide for, finance, and operate any of the facilities and services and may
exercise the powers expressly authorized for county storm water, flood control,
pollution prevention, and drainage services and activities under chapters
36.89, 86.12, 86.13, and 86.15 RCW. A county also may provide for, finance,
and operate the facilities and services and may exercise any of the powers
authorized for aquifer protection areas under chapter 36.36 RCW; for lake
management districts under chapter 36.61 RCW; for diking districts, and diking,
drainage, and sewerage improvement districts under chapters 85.05, 85.08,
85.15, 85.16, and 85.18 RCW; and for shellfish protection districts under
chapter 90.72 RCW. Additionally, as part of a system of storm, surface
water, sewerage, or water facilities, a county may provide for the acquisition,
protection, maintenance, restoration, and rehabilitation of aquatic resources
and fish habitat. However, if a county by reference to any of those
statutes assumes as part of its system of sewerage any powers granted to such
areas or districts and not otherwise available to a county under this chapter,
then (1) the procedures and restrictions applicable to those areas or districts
apply to the county's exercise of those powers, and (2) the county may not
simultaneously impose rates and charges under this chapter and under the
statutes authorizing such areas or districts for substantially the same
facilities and services, but must instead impose uniform rates and charges
consistent with RCW 36.94.140. By agreement with such an area or district that
is not part of a county's system of sewerage, a county may operate that area's
or district's services or facilities, but a county may not dissolve any
existing area or district except in accordance with any applicable provisions of
the statute under which that area or district was created.

Sec.
6. RCW
85.38.180 and 1991 c 349 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

A
special district may:

(1)
Engage in flood control activities, and investigate, plan, construct, acquire,
repair, maintain, and operate improvements, works, projects, programs,
and facilities necessary to prevent inundation or flooding from rivers,
streams, tidal waters or other waters. Such natural or constructed
facilities include dikes, levees, dams, banks, revetments, channels, canals, ((and))
ditches, other ((works)) facilities and water bodies,
appliances, machinery, and equipment.

(2)
Engage in drainage control, storm water control, and surface water control
activities, and investigate, plan, construct, acquire, repair, maintain, and
operate improvements, works, projects, and facilities necessary to control,
protect, manage, and treat storm water, surface water, and flood water.
Such natural or constructed facilities include drains, ditches, canals, other
water bodies, nonsanitary sewers, pumps, and other ((works)) facilities,
appliances, machinery, and equipment.

(3)
Engage in lake or river restoration, aquatic plant control, and water quality
enhancement activities, including providing for the acquisition, protection,
maintenance, restoration, and rehabilitation of aquatic resources and fish
habitat.

(4)
Take actions necessary to protect life and property from inundation or flow of
flood waters, storm waters, or surface waters.

(5)
Acquire, purchase, condemn by power of eminent domain pursuant to chapters 8.08
and 8.25 RCW, or lease, in its own name, necessary property, property rights,
facilities, and equipment.

(6)
Sell or exchange surplus property, property rights, facilities, and equipment.

(7)
Accept funds and property by loan, grant, gift, or otherwise from the United
States, the state of Washington, or any other public or private source.

(8)
Hire staff, employees, or services, or use voluntary labor.

(9)
Sue and be sued.

(10)
Cooperate with or join the United States, the state of Washington, or any other
public or private entity or person for district purposes.

(11)
Enter into contracts.

(12)
Exercise any of the usual powers of a corporation for public purposes.

Sec.
7. RCW
86.15.010 and 1983 c 315 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The
definitions set forth in this section apply through this chapter.

(1)
"Board" means the county legislative authority.

(2)
"Flood control improvement" means any works, projects, programs,
or ((other)) facilities necessary for the control of flood waters within
the county or any zone or zones.

(3)
"Flood waters" and "storm waters" means any storm waste or
surplus waters, including surface water, wherever located within the county or
a zone or zones where such waters endanger public highways, streams and water
courses, harbors, life, or property.

(4)
"Participating zones" means two or more zones found to benefit from a
single flood control improvement or storm water control improvement.

(5)
"Storm water control improvement" means any works, projects, programs,
or ((other)) facilities, both natural or constructed, necessary
to control, protect, manage, and treat storm water within the county or
any zone or zones.

(6)
"Supervisors" means the board of supervisors, or governing body, of a
zone.

(7) "Zones" means flood control zone districts which are
quasi municipal corporations of the state of Washington created by this chapter.

Sec.
8. RCW
86.15.100 and 1983 c 315 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

The supervisors may authorize the construction, extension,
enlargement, repair, maintenance, provision, or acquisition of necessary
flood control or storm water control improvements within the zone or any
participating zones. The improvements may include, but shall not be limited to
the extension, enlargement, repair, maintenance, construction, or
acquisition of dikes and levees, drain and drainage systems, dams and
reservoirs, or other flood control or storm water control improvements;
widening, straightening, or relocating of stream or water courses; and the
acquisition, extension, enlargement, repair, maintenance, or
construction of any works necessary for the protection, restoration, and
rehabilitation of aquatic resources, fish habitat, stream and water
courses, channels, harbors, life, and property.

---
END ---