BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
35.61.010 and 1994 c 81 s 60 are each amended to read as follows:

((Cities
of five thousand or more population and such contiguous property the residents
of which may decide in favor thereof in the manner set forth in this chapter
may create)) A metropolitan park district may be created for
the management, control, improvement, maintenance, and acquisition of parks((,
parkways,)) and ((boulevards)) recreation facilities as defined
in this chapter. A metropolitan park district must include all of the
territory within a city with a population of at least five thousand, and may
include additional contiguous territory, whether unincorporated territory or
all of the territory located in one or more additional cities.

Sec.
2. RCW
35.61.020 and 1965 c 7 s 35.61.020 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A ballot proposition authorizing the creation of a metropolitan park district shall
be submitted by ordinance to the voters of the area proposed to be included in
the park district at any general election, or at any special election which
may be called for that purpose((, or at any city election held in the city
in all of the various voting precincts thereof, the city council or commission
may,)).

(a)
The ballot proposition shall be submitted if the legislative authority of the
city enacts such an ordinance after adopting a resolution proposing creation of
a metropolitan park district or ((on)) if a petition ((of))
proposing creation of a metropolitan park district is submitted to the
county auditor that has been signed by at least fifteen percent of the ((qualified
electors of the city based upon the registration for the last preceding general
city election, shall by ordinance, submit to the voters of the city the
proposition of creating a metropolitan park district, the limits of which shall
be coextensive with the limits of the city as now or hereafter established,
inclusive of territory annexed to and forming a part of)) registered
voters residing in the city.

(b)
For districts proposed to be created after January 1, 2000, the ballot
proposition shall be submitted if either: (i) A resolution proposing the
creation of the metropolitan park district is adopted by the governing body of
each city proposed to be included in the park district and the county
legislative authority of the county in which any unincorporated area proposed
to be included in the park district is located; or (ii) a petition proposing
the creation of the metropolitan park district is submitted to the county
auditor that has been signed by at least fifteen percent of the registered
voters residing in the area proposed to be included in the park district. The
petition or resolution shall describe the boundaries of the proposed
metropolitan park district and propose creating the park district.

(2)
The ballot proposition shall be approved by a majority of the voters residing
in the area in which the metropolitan park district is proposed to be created.

(3)
Once created, any territory ((by virtue of its annexation)) that
is annexed to any city ((having heretofore created a)) included
in a metropolitan park district shall be ((deemed to be within the
limits of)) added automatically to the metropolitan park district upon
the effective date of the annexation by the city and such an extension of a
park district's boundaries shall not be subject to review by a boundary review
board.

((The
city council or commission shall submit the proposition at a special election
to be called therefor when the petition so requests.))

Sec.
3. RCW
35.61.030 and 1985 c 469 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

((In
submitting the question to the voters for their approval or rejection, the city
council or commission shall pass an ordinance declaring its intention to submit
the proposition of creating a metropolitan park district to the qualified
voters of the city. The ordinance shall be published once a week for two
consecutive weeks in the official newspaper of the city, and the city council
or commission shall cause to be placed upon the ballot for the election, at the
proper place, the))

(1)
The ballot proposition authorizing creation of a metropolitan park district
that is submitted to voters for their approval or rejection shall appear on the
ballot of the next general election or at the next special election date
specified under RCW 29.13.020 occurring sixty or more days after the last
resolution proposing the creation of the park district is adopted or the date
the county auditor certifies that the petition proposing the creation of the
park district contains sufficient valid signatures, if a boundary review board
does not exist in the county.

(2)
The creation of a metropolitan park district is not subject to review by a
boundary review board if the proposed metropolitan park district only includes
one or more cities and the special election at which a ballot proposition
authorizing creation of the park district shall be held as if a boundary review
board does not exist in the county. In all other instances, notice of the
proposal to create a metropolitan park district shall be filed with the
boundary review board as provided under RCW 36.93.090 and the special election
at which a ballot proposition authorizing creation of the park district shall
be held at the next special election date specified under RCW 29.13.020 sixty
or more days after the date the boundary review board is deemed to have approved
the proposal, approves the proposal, or modifies and approves the proposal.

(3)
The legislative authority of a city placing on the ballot a proposition ((which))
authorizing the creation of a metropolitan park district shall ((be
expressed in)), in the ordinance submitting the question to the voters,
choose and describe the composition of the initial metropolitan park district
commission that is proposed under RCW 35.61.050. The proposition shall include
the following terms:

G "For the formation of a metropolitan park
district."

G "Against the formation of a metropolitan park
district."

Sec.
4. RCW
35.61.040 and 1965 c 7 s 35.61.040 are each amended to read as follows:

If
((at an election)) a majority of the voters voting ((thereon)) on
the ballot proposition authorizing the creation of the metropolitan park
district vote in favor of the formation of a metropolitan park district,
the metropolitan park district shall ((then be and become)) be
created as a municipal corporation effective immediately upon
certification of the election results that voters approved the ballot
proposition and its name shall be "Metropolitan Park District of
. . . . . . (inserting the name of the largest
city included in the park district)."

Sec.
5. RCW
35.61.050 and 1994 c 223 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Five park commissioners shall be elected at large as the initial members of the
board of park commissioners for the metropolitan park district at the same
election at which the ballot proposition is submitted to the voters as
to whether a metropolitan park district is to be formed((, five park
commissioners shall be elected)). The election of metropolitan park
commissioners shall be null and void if the metropolitan park district is not
created. Candidates shall run for specific commission positions. ((No))
A primary shall not be held to nominate candidates.

(2)
The person receiving the greatest number of votes for each position shall be
elected as a metropolitan park commissioner. The staggering of the
terms of office shall occur as follows: (((1))) (a) The two
persons who are elected receiving the two greatest numbers of votes shall be
elected to six-year terms of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered
year or five-year terms of office if the election is held in an even-numbered
year; (((2))) (b) the two persons who are elected receiving the
next two greatest numbers of votes shall be elected to four-year terms of
office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or three-year terms of
office if the election is held in an even-numbered year; and (((3))) (c)
the other person who is elected shall be elected to a two-year term of office
if the election is held in an odd-numbered year or a one-year term of office if
the election is held in an even-numbered year.

The
initial metropolitan park commissioners shall take office immediately
when they are elected and qualified, and for purposes of computing their terms
of office the terms shall be assumed to commence on the first day of January in
the year after they are elected. Thereafter, all commissioners shall be
elected to six-year terms of office at general elections held in
odd-numbered years.

All
commissioners shall serve until their respective successors are elected and
qualified and assume office in accordance with RCW 29.04.170. Vacancies shall
occur and shall be filled as provided in chapter 42.12 RCW.

Sec.
6. RCW
35.61.250 and 1985 c 416 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
territory adjoining a metropolitan park district may be annexed to and become a
part ((thereof upon)) of the metropolitan park district under a
petition and ((an)) election ((held pursuant thereto)) method
of annexation. The petition shall define the territory proposed to be
annexed and must be signed by twenty-five registered voters, resident within
the territory proposed to be annexed, unless the territory is within the limits
of another city when it must be signed by twenty percent of the registered
voters residing within the territory proposed to be annexed. The petition must
be addressed to the board of park commissioners requesting that the question be
submitted to the legal voters of the territory proposed to be annexed, whether
they will be annexed and become a part of the metropolitan park
district. If the board of park commissioners accepts the proposed
annexation, a ballot proposition authorizing the annexation shall be submitted
to voters residing in the territory at a special election date specified under
RCW 29.13.020.

Sec.
7. RCW
84.09.030 and 1996 c 230 s 1613 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as follows, the boundaries of counties, cities and all other taxing districts,
for purposes of property taxation and the levy of property taxes, shall be the
established official boundaries of such districts existing on the first day of
March of the year in which the property tax levy is made.

The
official boundaries of a newly incorporated taxing district shall be
established at a different date in the year in which the incorporation occurred
as follows:

(1)
Boundaries for a newly incorporated city shall be established on the last day
of March of the year in which the initial property tax levy is made, and the
boundaries of a road district, library district, or fire protection district or
districts, that include any portion of the area that was incorporated within
its boundaries shall be altered as of this date to exclude this area, if the
budget for the newly incorporated city is filed pursuant to RCW 84.52.020 and
the levy request of the newly incorporated city is made pursuant to RCW
84.52.070. Whenever a proposed city incorporation is on the March special
election ballot, the county auditor shall submit the legal description of the
proposed city to the department of revenue on or before the first day of March;

(2)
Boundaries for a newly incorporated port district shall be established on the
first day of October if the boundaries of the newly incorporated port district
are coterminous with the boundaries of another taxing district, as they existed
on the first day of March of that year;

(3)
Boundaries of any other newly incorporated taxing district shall be established
on the first day of June of the year in which the property tax levy is made if
the taxing district has boundaries coterminous with the boundaries of another
taxing district, as they existed on the first day of March of that year;

(4)
Boundaries for a newly incorporated water-sewer district shall be established
on the fifteenth of June of the year in which the proposition under RCW
57.04.050 authorizing a water district excess levy is approved;

(5)
Boundaries of a newly incorporated metropolitan park district shall be
established on the first day of June of the year in which the proposition under
RCW 35.61.030 authorizing creation of the park district is approved. The
boundaries of a park and recreation district or park and recreation service
area from which territory has been removed under section 8 of this act, as the
result of the creation of a new metropolitan park district, shall be
established on the first day of June of the year in which the ballot
proposition authorizing the metropolitan park district is approved.

The
boundaries of a taxing district shall be established on the first day of June
if territory has been added to, or removed from, the taxing district after the
first day of March of that year with boundaries coterminous with the boundaries
of another taxing district as they existed on the first day of March of that
year. However, the boundaries of a road district, library district, or fire
protection district or districts, that include any portion of the area that was
annexed to a city or town within its boundaries shall be altered as of this
date to exclude this area. In any case where any instrument setting forth the
official boundaries of any newly established taxing district, or setting forth
any change in such boundaries, is required by law to be filed in the office of
the county auditor or other county official, said instrument shall be filed in
triplicate. The officer with whom such instrument is filed shall transmit two
copies to the county assessor.

No
property tax levy shall be made for any taxing district whose boundaries are
not established as of the dates provided in this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
new section is added to chapter 35.61 RCW to read as follows:

Any area included within a park and recreation district or a park
and recreation service area that is also included within a newly created
metropolitan park district or is annexed by a metropolitan park district shall
be removed from the park and recreation district or the park and recreation
service area immediately upon the effective date of the creation of the new
metropolitan park district or the annexation by the metropolitan park district.

---
END ---