BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
From the effective date of this act until the conclusion of the fiscal biennium
ending June 30, 2001, state agencies of the executive branch shall not
establish new staff positions or fill vacant existing staff positions.

(2)
Exceptions to subsection (1) of this section may be granted only by the
governor and only for critical or emergent situations that threaten public
health or safety, as determined by the governor. The governor shall notify the
legislative fiscal committees within ten days of the granting of any exception
under this subsection.

(3)
It is the intent of the legislature that agencies of the legislative and
judicial branches of state government shall also observe the employment freeze
established by this section, subject to such procedures as may be provided by
the legislative and judicial branches, respectively.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act expires July 1, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---