BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.33A.020 and 1985 c 195 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is hereby created the state investment board to consist of fourteen
members to be appointed as provided in this section. Three members, as
identified under (a), (b), (c), and (j) of this subsection, shall be appointed
on a rotating basis so there is never a successive appointment from the same
retirement system when a three-year term expires.

(((1)))
(a) One member who is an active member of the public employees'
retirement system and has been an active member for at least five years. This
member shall be appointed by the governor, subject to confirmation by the
senate, from a list of nominations submitted by organizations representing
active members of the system. The initial term of appointment shall be one
year.

(((2)))
(b) One member who is an active member of the law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' retirement system and has been an active member for at least
five years. This member shall be appointed by the governor, subject to
confirmation by the senate, from a list of nominations submitted by
organizations representing active members of the system. The initial term of
appointment shall be two years.

(((3)))
(c) One member who is an active member of the teachers' retirement
system and has been an active member for at least five years. This member
shall be appointed by the superintendent of public instruction subject to
confirmation by the senate. The initial term of appointment shall be three
years.

(((4)))
(d) The state treasurer or the assistant state treasurer if designated
by the state treasurer.

(((5)))
(e) A member of the state house of representatives. This member shall
be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives.

(((6)))
(f) A member of the state senate. This member shall be appointed by the
president of the senate.

(((7)))
(g) One member who is a retired member of a state retirement system
shall be appointed by the governor, subject to confirmation by the senate. The
initial term of appointment shall be three years.

(((8)))
(h) The director of the department of labor and industries.

(((9)))
(i) The director of the department of retirement systems.

(((10)))
(j) One member who is an active member of the school employees' retirement
system and has at least five years of service credit. This member shall be
appointed by the superintendent of public instruction subject to confirmation
by the senate.

(k)
Five nonvoting members appointed by the state investment board who are
considered experienced and qualified in the field of investments.

(2)
The legislative members shall serve terms of two years. The initial
legislative members appointed to the board shall be appointed no sooner than
January 10, 1983. The position of a legislative member on the board shall
become vacant at the end of that member's term on the board or whenever the
member ceases to be a member of the senate or house of representatives from
which the member was appointed.

After
the initial term of appointment, all other members of the state investment
board, except ex officio members, shall serve terms of three years and shall
hold office until successors are appointed. Members' terms, except for ex
officio members, shall commence on January 1 of the year in which the
appointments are made.

Members
may be reappointed for additional terms, subject to the restriction on
successive appointments in subsection (1) of this section. Appointments
for vacancies shall be made for the unexpired terms in the same manner as the
original appointments. Any member may be removed from the board for cause by
the member's respective appointing authority.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act takes effect January 1, 2001.

---
END ---