BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
Pursuant to chapter 43.155 RCW, the following project loans recommended by the
public works board are authorized to be made with funds previously appropriated
from the public works assistance account:

(1)
Alderwood Water District‑-domestic water project‑-install
approximately 14,000 feet of water line along with associated valves and
fittings............................................... $1,402,800

(2)
Annapolis Water District‑-domestic water project‑-construct well
no. 21, and paint the salmonberry storage tanks.............. $744,300

(3)
Annapolis Water District‑-domestic water project‑-replace corroded
water pipes in the Harold Drive and Gilette Avenue areas. $406,800

(4)
Asotin County Public Utility District‑-domestic water project‑-rebuild/replace
wells 4 and 6. Update control systems for pumps, replace approximately 19,000
feet of water line, and paint three storage tanks....................................................... $1,620,000

(5)
City of Battle Ground‑-sanitary sewer project‑-locate and replace
sections of the sewer lines that have failed........... $1,400,000

(6)
Benton City‑-domestic water project‑-construct a zone 2 tank
capable of holding 500,000 gallons of water, and the transmission lines and
related equipment, install telemetry systems, chlorination systems, and all
necessary housing, associated equipment, and instrumentation in three wells.................................................... $652,325

(7)
Benton County‑-road project‑-construct 7.5 miles of new roadway and
realign 3 miles of existing roadway.................... $2,561,466

(8)
City of Bonney Lake‑-domestic water project‑-replace 11,000 linear
feet of inadequate mains, fire hydrants, service lines to meters, roadway
overlay, and install pressure-reducing valves and associated equipment......................................................... $723,800

(9)
City of Bremerton‑-storm sewer project‑-construct storm sewers in
the Sinclair Inlet subbasin from 1st Street to the north and along Kitsap Way,
North, and Arsenal Way subbasins....................... $4,195,800

(10)
City of Bremerton‑-storm sewer project‑-plan, design, and construct
combined sewer overflow reduction facilities for Pine Road, Tracyton Beach,
East Park, and Trenton Avenue basins............ $2,804,200

(11)
City of Brewster‑-domestic water project‑-design and construct a
new booster pump station, install associated equipment, telemetry devices, and
water main. Construct new building to house the equipment

......................................................... $137,900

(12)
City of Castle Rock‑-sanitary sewer project‑-design and construct a
new headworks/influent structure and associated equipment, install alarm and
telemetry system, a generator, and construct a new building to house new
equipment and telemetry.............................. $658,000

(13)
Chelan County Public Utility District‑-domestic water project‑-install
new water mains, pressure-reducing station, associated equipment, create new
pressure zone, install reservoir outfall piping, and a storm water overflow
retention pond............................ $363,000

(14)
Clark Public Utilities‑-domestic water project‑-replace
approximately 74,000 linear feet of water line in various parts of the service
area....................................................... $2,100,000

(15)
Clark Public Utilities‑-sanitary sewer project--design new components and
upgrades to the system, improve inlet piping, enlarge existing and construct
new aeration basins, enlarge the digestor, construct an additional clarifier,
install ultraviolet disinfection system, install mixed media filters, and
construct structures to accommodate these new facilities............................................. $1,171,944

(16)
Covington Water District‑-domestic water project‑-develop a supply
pipeline with the City of Tacoma, by purchasing water rights, constructing a
34-mile pipeline, improving the headworks diversion dam, construct an intertie
with Seattle's water system, increase the capacity of the Howard Hanson Dam,
expand the chlorination, fluoridation, and corrosion control facilities, and
handle environmental enhancements...... $7,000,000

(17)
Cowlitz County‑-sanitary sewer project‑-design and construct
improvements to the sanitary sewer plant, including the construction of two new
clarifiers, new lab/control building, and associated equipment......................................................... $680,480

(18)
Diking District No. 2 of Cowlitz County‑-storm sewer project-design and
construct a new storm water pump station with an approximate capacity of 140 cubic
feet per second........................... $2,293,200

(19)
City of East Wenatchee‑-road project‑-improve approximately 2,900
linear feet of 11th Street NE from Baker Avenue to Eastmont Avenue, by
reconstructing roadway, curb, gutter, sidewalk, bus pullouts, storm drainage,
and water mains. In addition, bicycle lanes, intersection illumination,
signage, and related improvements will be made

......................................................... $608,400

(20)
Town of Eatonville‑-sanitary sewer project‑-construct a two-cell
batch reactor treatment plant sized for approximately 500,000 gallons per day.
Ammonia treatment for a load of 100 pounds per day as required by the NPDES
permit will be included. Ultraviolet light disinfection and construction of a
force main pump station................ $750,000

(21)
City of Enumclaw‑-sanitary sewer project‑-replace over 20,000
linear feet of sewer line along with inspections of pipe, geotechnical
evaluations, design, and construction inspection of the lines

....................................................... $3,749,400

(22)
City of Goldendale‑-sanitary sewer project‑-design and construct an
ultraviolet light treatment process, and associated equipment and telemetry
instrumentation.............................. $2,124,500

(23)
City of Granite Falls‑-sanitary sewer project‑-construction of a
secondary clarifier, mixers, an ultraviolet disinfection system, and associated
equipment and telemetry....................... $440,000

(24)
Highline Water District‑-domestic water project‑-install
approximately 22,500 linear feet of pipe, hydrants, valves, and associated
equipment and material................................. $2,217,600

(25)
Highline Water District‑-domestic water project‑-construct two
wells and install associated equipment and piping............ $3,438,000

(26)
City of Kennewick‑-road project‑-improvements on three key
arterials, South Vancouver Street, W. 19th Avenue, and 27th Avenue. These
improvements will include storm drainage systems, sidewalks, bike lanes, and
street and traffic lights. Water and sewer line upgrades will be made as well................................................ $4,550,000

(27)
City of Kennewick‑-sanitary sewer project‑-install new aerators,
PVC liners, replace underwater electrical cables, and remove biosolids

....................................................... $2,450,000

(28)
King County Water District No. 49‑-domestic water project‑-replace
approximately 23,000 linear feet of water line, several hundred residential
service lines, fire hydrants, and install additional hydrants around the
Blakley Manor subdivision and the 16th Avenue area $1,401,300

(29)
King County Water District No. 90‑-domestic water project‑-replace
approximately 11,700 feet of pipe, install new fire hydrants, water services,
valves, and other appurtenances, as well as asbestos/cement overlay of the road
surfaces............................. $965,542

(30)
King County Water District No. 90‑-domestic water project‑-install
back-up generators for two pumps, install or repair existing motors and pumps
in three stations, and upgrade electrical panels in six. Vaults will be
replaced at a number of sites.................... $290,500

(31)
King County Water District No. 119‑-domestic water project‑-interconnect
the district's two water distribution systems through a 7,000-foot water line.
Install associated equipment and replace pump process with gravity feed process........................ $563,500

(32)
Kitsap County Sewer District No. 5‑-sanitary sewer project‑-install
approximately 5,500 feet of sewer main and 3,000 feet of side sewer lines....................................................... $1,116,900

(33)
Lake Stevens Sewer District‑-sanitary sewer project‑-install a new
ultraviolet light disinfection unit, redundant capacity and emergency power,
new auxiliary generator, pump at the chlorine contact tank, new screens, and
grit dumpster area roof, and replacement of headworks. The operations building
will be expanded and minor site work will be completed to repair or replace
pipes, water lines, and roadways. Sludge will be removed and disposed................................... $3,654,000

(34)
Lakehaven Utility District‑-sanitary sewer project‑-installation of
ultraviolet light disinfection systems at two plants, associated modifications
to the plants. Lakota plant will replace headworks, screens, and associated
equipment...................... $1,575,700

(35)
Lewis County Water and Sewer District No. 6‑-domestic water project‑-construct
a new water system for Lake Mayfield Village, including a 48,000-gallon, and a
60,000-gallon reservoir, a new booster pump, approximately 25,000 feet of water
line, 20 hydrants, and more than 250 service connections. The project will
also construct a new sewer collection system, new wastewater treatment plant,
and an effluent outfall, along with associated equipment and controls

......................................................... $400,000

(36)
Liberty Lake Sewer and Water District‑-sanitary sewer project‑-replace
2,600 feet of sewer line, and manholes........... $302,252

(37)
Liberty Lake Sewer and Water District‑-domestic water project‑-construct
a reservoir for the area, replace the three small pumps. Construct a
210,000-gallon storage tank, and install approximately 3,100 feet of
transmission line and 1,700 feet of overflow pipe

......................................................... $382,500

(38)
City of Long Beach‑-sanitary sewer project‑-install an ultraviolet
light disinfection system, upgrade lift station from two pumps to three, modify
headworks, and install an emergency generator

......................................................... $180,000

(39)
City of Olympia‑-bridge project‑-Replace existing 4th Avenue Bridge
with a three-lane bridge, which will include right-turn lanes both westbound
and eastbound, two bike lanes, roadway approaching bridge will be modified, and
a pedestrian link from Percival Landing to Heritage Park will be constructed.
Utilities, sidewalks, and traffic controls will be upgraded............................................... $6,721,144

(40)
Olympic View Water and Sewer District‑-domestic water project‑-replace
approximately 4,000 feet of water line. Pressure valves and associated
equipment and controls will be installed as warranted

......................................................... $364,500

(41)
Olympic View Water and Sewer District‑-sanitary sewer project‑-rehabilitate
approximately 3,225 feet of sewer line in four areas around Robin Hood Drive......................................... $459,000

(42)
Pasadena Park Irrigation District‑-domestic water project‑-construct
a 600,000-gallon reservoir along with associated piping to connect to the
transmission line. Construct a new booster pump building with three pumps
being installed and associated electronics and controls.. $344,431

(43)
City of Pasco‑-sanitary sewer project‑-install approximately 37,000
feet of sewer line to connect homes, businesses, and the Port of Pasco with the
treatment facility............................ $2,100,000

(44)
City of Port Angeles‑-road project‑-resurface approximately 9,500
feet of roadway. Bridge, expansion joints, and pile caps will be repaired or
replaced. In addition, sidewalks, traffic controls, storm drainage, and other
related improvements will be made to the Eighth Street corridor....................................................... $1,932,000

(45)
City of Port Angeles‑‑domestic water project‑-construct and
install three reservoir covers and add a disinfection system to one reservoir....................................................... $1,168,300

(46)
City of Poulsbo‑-road project‑-restore and preserve Front Street
and Lindvig Way by overlaying approximately 5,000 feet of road surface. The
project includes sidewalks, storm drainage, traffic controls, replace
approximately 3,000 feet of water main, and other related improvements....................................................... $1,527,300

(47)
City of Richland‑-domestic water project‑-replace approximately
100,000 feet of water line, hydrants, controls, side services, and other
related improvements................................... $7,000,000

(48)
Sammamish Plateau Water and Sewer District‑-domestic water project‑-construct
new well, install a pump, electronics, water treatment system, controls, and
replacement of approximately 10,000 feet of water line......................................................... $902,195

(49)
City of Seattle‑-bridge project‑-replace critical components of the
Ballard Bridge's mechanical-electrical system, install electrical controls,
lighting, traffic controls, and other related equipment

....................................................... $5,670,000

(50)
Shoreline Wastewater Management District‑-sanitary sewer project‑-repair
or replace pumps, control systems, electronics, ventilation systems, valves and
controls, and associated improvements to the lift stations................................................. $823,500

(51)
Snohomish County‑-solid waste project‑-acquire additional land and
demolish existing facility. Construct 42,000 square foot handling building.
Roadways, storm drainage, parking, controls, and related facilities/equipment
will be upgraded................. $10,000,000

(52)
Soos Creek Water and Sewer District‑-sanitary sewer project‑-construct
lift station 38, install approximately 4,500 feet of sewer pipe, associated
controls, electronics, and other equipment. Lake Wilderness Trail will be
restored as part of the project.......... $1,779,000

(53)
Southwest Suburban Sewer District‑-sanitary sewer project‑-the
Salmon Creek and Miller Creek treatment plants will be upgraded by replacing
course screening equipment, installing pump diffusers, and pumping stations.
Salmon Creek outfall lines will be repaired as warranted, controls and related
equipment and materials will be installed as needed....................................................... $1,861,300

(54)
City of Sumner‑-sanitary sewer project‑-project will upgrade the
nitrogen removal process, improve pumping, install a new headworks, add
clarifiers, centrifuge dewatering equipment, increase lab space, improve flood
protection, and install ultraviolet disinfection system. In addition,
controls, electronics, and associated equipment and materials will be installed...................................... $3,326,700

(55)
City of Tenino‑-domestic water project‑-design and install corrosion
control facility, and associated plumbing, controls, electronics, and buildings................................................. $80,500

(56)
City of Tonasket‑-sanitary sewer project‑-construct new wastewater
treatment facility, including new headworks, aeration basin, secondary
clarifier, process building, ultraviolet light disinfection system, outfall
line to the river, sludge storage, and lab facilities. In addition, associated
equipment controls, electronics, and materials necessary to operate the plant
will be installed....... $2,380,000

(57)
City of Union Gap‑-domestic water project‑-construct a new well
capable of supplying 1,500 gallons per minute, along with the construction of a
wellhouse. Install approximately 200 feet of transmission line, water
treatment equipment, and associated controls, electronics, and materials................................................ $724,129

(58)
City of University Place‑-road project‑-widen approximately 3,500
feet of roadway to provide concrete curbs, gutters, sidewalks, bike lanes, and
associated material. Improvements to storm drainage, and safety-related improvements,
including street lighting, traffic controls, and signage.................................................. $960,000

(59)
City of University Place‑-road project‑-construct approximately
7,400 feet of sidewalks, bikeways, improve storm drainage, and install any
associated materials..................................... $631,144

(60)
City of University Place‑-road project‑-construct approximately
8,000 feet of sidewalks, bike lanes, improve storm drainage, and install safety
features along roadway................................... $680,000

(61)
Woodinville Water District‑-domestic water project‑-replace
approximately 56,500 feet of water line, install valves, service lines,
hydrants, controls, and other related facilities....... $1,833,510

(62)
Yakima County‑-road project‑-design, acquire right-of-way, and
construct approximately 31.8 miles of gravel roads. Drainage facilities,
traffic controls, signage, illumination, and related equipment will be
installed.............................................. $7,000,000

(63)
City of Yakima‑-road project‑-rehabilitate approximately 19 blocks
of Yakima Avenue, including storm drainage, sidewalks, bike lanes, traffic
controls, electronics, and related equipment. Several side streets will also
be improved....................................... $1,180,000

TOTAL................................................ $123,524,762

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---