BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
36.32.480 and 1979 ex.s. c 200 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A county legislative authority may adopt an ordinance creating an emergency
medical service district in all or a portion of the unincorporated area of the
county and, pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, within the corporate
limits of any city or town. The ordinance may only be adopted after a
public hearing has been held on the creation of such a district and the county
legislative authority makes a finding that it is in the public interest to
create the district. ((The members of the county legislative authority
shall be the governing body of the emergency medical service district.))

An
emergency medical service district shall be a quasi-municipal corporation and
an independent taxing "authority" within the meaning of Article 7,
Section 1, Washington State Constitution. Emergency medical service districts
shall also be "taxing authorities" within the meaning of Article 7,
Section 2, Washington State Constitution.

An
emergency medical service district shall have the authority to provide
emergency medical services.

(2)
When any part of a proposed emergency medical service district includes an area
within the corporate limits of a city or town, the governing body of the city
or town shall approve the inclusion, and the county governing body shall
maintain a certified copy of the resolution of approval before adopting an
ordinance including the area.

(3) The members of the county legislative authority shall compose
the governing body of any emergency medical service district which is created
within the county: PROVIDED, That where an emergency medical service district
includes an area within the corporate limits of a city or town, the emergency
medical service district may be governed as provided in an interlocal agreement
adopted pursuant to chapter 39.34 RCW. The voters of an emergency medical
service district must be registered voters residing within the district.

---
END ---