BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
INTENT. It is the intent of the legislature that:

(1)
Applicants for leases and environmental permits be allowed to negotiate
voluntary cost-reimbursement agreements through which the applicants would
receive expedited environmental review from the permitting or leasing agency;

(2)
Cost-reimbursement agreements free permitting and leasing agency resources to
focus on and expedite the review of all projects;

(3)
By authorizing cost-reimbursement agreements, measures are taken by the
agencies to promote the public's trust and confidence in the underlying permit
process, including providing consolidated, effective, and easier opportunities
for members of the public to receive information and present their views about
proposed projects; and

(4)
The permit process results in transparent and impartial decision making as a
result of such agreements.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
GUIDELINES FOR COST-REIMBURSEMENT AGREEMENTS. (1) The office of financial
management, in collaboration with the departments of ecology, natural
resources, fish and wildlife, and health, and local air pollution control
authorities shall develop guidelines to ensure consistency in the agencies' use
and administration of cost-reimbursement agreements and to meet the intent of
this act. The office of financial management shall be lead agency in
developing the guidelines and by June 30, 2000, shall submit final guidelines
to the legislature.

(2)
The guidelines shall include, but are not limited to:

(a)
Measures to ensure the impartiality of agency decision making on applications
subject to review under cost-reimbursement agreements;

(b)
Strategies to promote the public's trust and confidence in permitting and
leasing processes including avoiding any conflict of interest and ensuring the
appearance of fairness;

(c)
Measures to ensure that execution of cost-reimbursement agreements will not
impede the consideration of permit or lease applications for projects for which
no cost-reimbursement agreements were made; and

(d)
Practices to ensure consistent billing and accounting.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 43.21A RCW to read as follows:

COST-REIMBURSEMENT
AGREEMENT BY THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY. (1) At the request of a permit
applicant, the department may enter into a voluntary written cost-reimbursement
agreement with the permit applicant to recover from the applicant the
reasonable costs incurred by the department in carrying out the requirements of
this chapter, as well as the requirements of other relevant laws, as they
relate to permit coordination, environmental review, application review,
technical studies, and permit processing.

(2)
Under the provisions of a cost-reimbursement agreement, the department shall
assign work to current staff in order to carry out the work covered by the
cost-reimbursement agreement. Funds from the applicant shall be used to pay
for temporary staff or technical consultants otherwise authorized to perform
functions assigned to agency staff responsible for writing the permit. The
billing process shall provide for accurate time and cost accounting and may
include a billing cycle that provides for progress payments. The department
shall comply with the guidelines required by section 2 of this act and shall
not enter into a cost-reimbursement agreement until the guidelines have been
finalized.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 43.30 RCW to read as follows:

COST-REIMBURSEMENT
AGREEMENT BY THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES. (1) At the request of a
permit or lease applicant, the department may enter into a voluntary written
cost-reimbursement agreement with the permit or lease applicant to recover from
the applicant the reasonable costs incurred by the department in carrying out
the requirements of this chapter, as well as the requirements of other relevant
laws, as they relate to permit coordination, environmental review, application
review, technical studies, and permit or lease processing.

(2)
Under the provisions of a cost-reimbursement agreement, the department shall
assign work to current staff in order to carry out the work covered by the
cost-reimbursement agreement. Funds from the applicant shall be used to pay
for temporary staff or technical consultants otherwise authorized to perform
functions assigned to agency staff responsible for writing the permit or
lease. The billing process shall provide for accurate time and cost accounting
and may include a billing cycle that provides for progress payments. The
department shall comply with the guidelines required by section 2 of this act
and shall not enter into a cost-reimbursement agreement until the guidelines
have been finalized.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:

COST-REIMBURSEMENT
AGREEMENT BY THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH. (1) At the request of a permit or lease
applicant, the department may enter into a voluntary written cost-reimbursement
agreement with the permit applicant to recover from the applicant the
reasonable costs incurred by the department in carrying out the requirements of
this chapter, as well as the requirements of other relevant laws, as they
relate to permit coordination, environmental review, application review,
technical studies, and permit processing.

(2)
Under the provisions of a cost-reimbursement agreement, the department shall
assign work to current staff in order to carry out the work covered by the
cost-reimbursement agreement. Funds from the applicant shall be used to pay
for temporary staff or technical consultants otherwise authorized to perform
functions assigned to agency staff responsible for writing the permit. The
billing process shall provide for accurate time and cost accounting and may
include a billing cycle that provides for progress payments. The department shall
comply with the guidelines required by section 2 of this act and shall not
enter into a cost-reimbursement agreement until the guidelines have been
finalized.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 43.300 RCW to read as follows:

COST-REIMBURSEMENT
AGREEMENT BY THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE. (1) At the request of a
permit applicant, the department may enter into a voluntary written
cost-reimbursement agreement with the permit applicant to recover from the
applicant the reasonable costs incurred by the department in carrying out the
requirements of this chapter, as well as the requirements of other relevant
laws, as they relate to permit coordination, environmental review, application
review, technical studies, and permit processing.

(2)
Under the provisions of a cost-reimbursement agreement, the department shall
assign work to current staff in order to carry out the work covered by the
cost-reimbursement agreement. Funds from the applicant shall be used to pay
for temporary staff or technical consultants otherwise authorized to perform
functions assigned to agency staff responsible for writing the permit. The
billing process shall provide for accurate time and cost accounting and may
include a billing cycle that provides for progress payments. The department
shall comply with the guidelines required by section 2 of this act and shall
not enter into a cost-reimbursement agreement until the guidelines have been
finalized.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 70.94 RCW to read as follows:

COST-REIMBURSEMENT
AGREEMENT BY AN AIR POLLUTION CONTROL AUTHORITY. (1) At the request of a
permit applicant, an authority may enter into a voluntary written cost-reimbursement
agreement with the permit applicant to recover from the applicant the
reasonable costs incurred by the authority in carrying out the requirements of
this chapter, as well as the requirements of other relevant laws, as they
relate to permit coordination, environmental review, application review,
technical studies, and permit processing.

(2)
Under the provisions of a cost-reimbursement agreement, the authority shall
assign work to current staff in order to carry out the work covered by the cost-reimbursement
agreement. Funds from the applicant shall be used to pay for temporary staff
or technical consultants otherwise authorized to perform functions assigned to
agency staff responsible for writing the permit. The billing process shall provide
for accurate time and cost accounting and may include a billing cycle that
provides for progress payments. The authority shall comply with the guidelines
required by section 2 of this act and shall not enter into a cost-reimbursement
agreement until the guidelines have been finalized.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 90.44 RCW to read as follows:

Any
one or more public water supply systems in counties surrounded by water with
existing or proposed ground water withdrawals from a federally designated sole
source aquifer, with applications for a new withdrawal or a change or transfer
pending before the department on or before January 1, 2000, may initiate a
cost-reimbursement agreement with the department to provide expedited review of
the applications. If a request for a cost-reimbursement agreement is made,
the department shall negotiate in good faith with the group of public water
supply system applicants to provide expedited review for the applications.
The department shall be guided by sections 1 through 3 of this act in
negotiating a cost-reimbursement agreement. The department shall render
decisions on the applications subject to the provisions of this section by June
30, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
EVALUATION OF COST-REIMBURSEMENT AGREEMENTS. (1) The joint legislative audit
and review committee shall review the use and administration of
cost-reimbursement agreements, provide annual reports to the legislature prior
to the 2001, 2002, and 2003 regular legislative sessions, and a final report to
the legislature by December 15, 2003. Topics addressed in the reports shall
include but not be limited to:

(a)
The number and nature of projects subject to cost-reimbursement agreements;

(b)
The length of time between submission of an application and the permit or lease
decision for both projects subject to cost-reimbursement agreements and those
not subject to the agreements;

(c)
How agencies have managed staffing resources under cost-reimbursement
agreements and whether reimbursed costs have covered agency expenses;

(d)
Whether applicants who choose not to negotiate cost-reimbursement agreements
have been displaced in the permit or leasing process; and

(e)
The effectiveness of the guidelines developed under section 2 of this act, in
particular relating to the avoidance of conflicts of interest and ensuring the
appearance of fairness.

(2)
The joint legislative audit and review committee shall also make
recommendations for improving cost-reimbursement agreements to achieve the
intent of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
Captions used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---