BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes that traffic safety cameras are an effective speed,
stoplight, and railroad crossing enforcement tool. While these devices are
effective at detecting traffic violations and reducing accidents, the legislature
is concerned that these devices are being used without regulation. The
purpose of this act is to regulate traffic safety cameras so they can enhance
public safety and operate in a manner that protects individual privacy.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 46.63 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The use of traffic safety cameras is subject to the following regulations:

(a)
The appropriate local legislative authority must first enact an ordinance allowing
for their use to detect one or more of the following: Speed, stoplight, or
railroad crossing violations. At a minimum, the local ordinance must contain
the restrictions described in this section. Cities and counties using traffic
safety cameras before the effective date of this act are subject to the
restrictions described in this section, but are not required to enact an
authorizing ordinance.

(b)
Traffic safety cameras may take pictures of the vehicle and vehicle license
plate only, and no identifiable occupant may appear in the photographs. If an
identifiable occupant of the vehicle does appear in the photograph, the
infraction must be dismissed and the photograph and any negatives must be
destroyed.

(c)
Notices of infractions must be mailed to the registered owner of the vehicle
within fourteen days of the infraction occurring.

(d)
A person receiving a notice of an infraction based on evidence detected by a
traffic safety camera may respond to the notice by mail.

(2)
Infractions detected through the use of traffic safety cameras are not part of
the registered owner's driving record under RCW 46.52.101 and 46.52.120.

(3)
If a notice of traffic infraction is sent to the registered owner under RCW
46.63.030(2) and the registered owner is a rental car business, the infraction
will be dismissed against the business if it mails to the issuing agency,
within fourteen days of receiving the notice, the name and known mailing
address of the individual driving or renting the vehicle when the infraction
occurred. If the business is unable to determine who was driving or renting
the vehicle at the time the infraction occurred, the business must sign an
affidavit making this declaration. The affidavit must be mailed to the issuing
agency within fourteen days of receiving the notice of traffic infraction.
Timely mailing of this affidavit to the issuing agency relieves a rental car
business of any liability under this chapter for the notice of infraction. An
affidavit form suitable for this purpose must be included with each infraction
issued, along with instructions for its completion and use.

(4)
The traffic safety commission may adopt rules regarding:

(a)
Mechanical and operational standards for traffic safety camera equipment;

(b)
The placement of signs to notify drivers that they are entering a jurisdiction
or area that uses traffic safety cameras;

(c)
Recommendations on how cities and counties will educate the public about
traffic safety cameras.

(5)
Jurisdictions using traffic safety cameras must comply with any standards
adopted under subsection (4) of this section.

Sec.
3. RCW
46.63.030 and 1995 c 219 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A law enforcement officer has the authority to issue a notice of traffic
infraction:

(a)
When the infraction is committed in the officer's presence;

(b)
When the officer is acting upon the request of a law enforcement officer in
whose presence the traffic infraction was committed; ((or))

(c)
If an officer investigating at the scene of a motor vehicle accident has
reasonable cause to believe that the driver of a motor vehicle involved in the
accident has committed a traffic infraction; or

(d)
When the infraction is mailed to the registered owner or the person renting a vehicle
as authorized under subsection (2) of this section.

(2)
When a traffic safety camera is used in compliance with section 2 of this
act, a law enforcement officer or court may issue a notice of traffic
infraction by mail to the registered owner of the vehicle, or to the person
renting the vehicle. The registered owner of the vehicle or the person renting
the vehicle is responsible for the infraction.

(3)
A court may issue a notice of traffic infraction upon receipt of a written
statement of the officer that there is reasonable cause to believe that an
infraction was committed.

(((3)))
(4) If any motor vehicle without a driver is found parked, standing, or
stopped in violation of this title or an equivalent administrative regulation
or local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution, the officer finding the
vehicle shall take its registration number and may take any other information
displayed on the vehicle which may identify its user, and shall conspicuously
affix to the vehicle a notice of traffic infraction.

(((4)))
(5) In the case of failure to redeem an abandoned vehicle under RCW
46.55.120, upon receiving a complaint by a registered tow truck operator that
has incurred costs in removing, storing, and disposing of an abandoned vehicle,
an officer of the law enforcement agency responsible for directing the removal
of the vehicle shall send a notice of infraction by certified mail to the last
known address of the registered owner of the vehicle. The officer shall append
to the notice of infraction, on a form prescribed by the department of
licensing, a notice indicating the amount of costs incurred as a result of
removing, storing, and disposing of the abandoned vehicle, less any amount
realized at auction, and a statement that monetary penalties for the infraction
will not be considered as having been paid until the monetary penalty payable
under this chapter has been paid and the court is satisfied that the person has
made restitution in the amount of the deficiency remaining after disposal of
the vehicle.

Sec.
4. RCW
46.63.140 and 1980 c 128 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In any traffic infraction case involving a violation of this title or
equivalent administrative regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or
resolution relating to the stopping, standing, or parking of a vehicle, proof
that the particular vehicle described in the notice of traffic infraction was
stopping, standing, or parking in violation of any such provision of this title
or an equivalent administrative regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation,
or resolution, together with proof that the person named in the notice of
traffic infraction was at the time of the violation the registered owner of the
vehicle, ((shall)) constitutes in evidence a prima facie
presumption that the registered owner of the vehicle was the person who parked
or placed the vehicle at the point where, and for the time during which, the
violation occurred.

(2)
The foregoing stated presumption ((shall apply)) applies only
when the procedure prescribed in RCW 46.63.030(((3))) (4) has
been followed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. By
January 1, 2001, and for four years thereafter, the Washington traffic safety
commission shall provide the chairs of the senate and house transportation
committees a report regarding the use, outcomes, and other relevant issues of
traffic safety cameras in this state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. The
legislature respectfully request the Washington state supreme court to amend
the Infraction Rules for Courts of Limited Jurisdiction to conform to this
act. Furthermore, the legislature respectfully asks the court to create a notice
of infraction that is consistent with this act.

---
END ---