BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that many people own and raise exotic pets in the state
of Washington. The legislature further finds that there are many issues
surrounding exotic pets including but not limited to the educational value of
diverse species, health and safety concerns, and environmental issues. The
legislature further finds that legislation has been enacted in other states
regulating private citizens' possession of exotic pets. Since legislation in
other states may not fit the needs of Washington's citizens, the legislature
finds that a study about the issues of owning and breeding exotic pets will
help determine the best public policy in Washington, balancing the best
interests of all of the citizens.

(2)
The department of agriculture shall appoint a task force to study the issue of
regulating exotic pets in the state of Washington. The task force shall
include but not be limited to representatives of the department of agriculture,
the department of fish and wildlife, the department of health, and local
government; owners and breeders of exotic pets; pet stores; veterinarians;
zoologists; zoo veterinarians; animal control agencies; humane societies; and
interested citizens. The task force shall look at issues surrounding exotic
pets including but not limited to: The definition of exotic pets, the safety
and health of people, domestic animals and wildlife, the protection of
agriculture, the cost of regulating exotic pets, and the issue of state-wide
uniformity versus local control. By December 1, 2001, the task force shall
submit its recommendations, including any recommended statutory or rule
changes, to the committees in the senate and the house of representatives
having jurisdiction over agricultural issues.

(3)
The following shall not be included in the study required in this section:
Llamas and alpacas; ratites including ostriches and emu; American bison reared
in captivity; and species of animals that have been designated by rule as
deleterious exotic wildlife by the department of fish and wildlife.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act expires December 1, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The
sum of forty-five thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the general fund to
the department of agriculture for the purposes of this act.

---
END ---