BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. 1999
c 309 s 117 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SECRETARY
OF STATE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 14,063,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 8,371,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 120,000

Archives
and Records Management Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,401,000

Archives
and Records Management Account‑-Private/

Local
Appropriation........................ $ 2,581,000

Department
of Personnel Service Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 681,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 31,217,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$2,355,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's share of primary and
general election costs and the costs of conducting mandatory recounts on state
measures.

(2)
$3,780,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's share of presidential
preference primary election costs.

(3)
$2,106,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $2,663,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the verification of initiative and referendum
petitions, maintenance of related voter registration records, and the
publication and distribution of the voters and candidates pamphlet.

(4)
$125,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $125,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for legal advertising of state measures under RCW
29.27.072.

(5)(a)
$1,870,350 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,907,757 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for continuing the contract with a nonprofit
organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television coverage of state government
deliberations and other events of state-wide significance during the 1999-2001
biennium.

(b)
The funding level for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount
provided in this subsection and adjusted to reflect the implicit price deflator
for the previous year. The nonprofit organization shall be required to raise
contributions or commitments to make contributions, in cash or in kind, in an
amount equal to forty percent of the state contribution. The office of the
secretary of state may make full or partial payment once all criteria in (a)
and (b) of this subsection have been satisfactorily documented.

(c)
The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent audit, an annual
financial statement, and an annual report, including benchmarks that measure
the success of the nonprofit organization in meeting the intent of the program.

(d)
No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection may be used,
directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:

(i)
Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the
legislature of the state of Washington, by any county, city, town, or other
political subdivision of the state of Washington, or by the congress, or the
adoption or rejection of any rule, standard, rate, or other legislative
enactment of any state agency;

(ii)
Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or

(iii)
Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel, lodging, meals, or
entertainment to a public officer or employee.

(6)
$867,000 of the archives and records management account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for operation of the central microfilming
bureau under RCW 40.14.020(8).

(7)
$120,000 of the general fund‑-private/local appropriation is provided
solely for the Washington quality awards council.

(8) $20,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2000 is provided solely for the operations of the task force on
archaeology and historic preservation. The task force shall develop a single
recommendation for consideration by the legislature and the governor on the
issue of the location of the office of archaeology and historic preservation
within state government. The recommended location shall maximize the office of
archaeology and historic preservation's stature, visibility, accessibility, and
delivery of service state-wide in the context of its critical role as an
important link among downtown and neighborhood revitalization efforts, the
cultural tourism movement, rural economic development initiatives, and the
preservation of the structures and sites that still remain as the legacy of
Washington's rich and diverse heritage. The task force shall consider and
include in its recommendation how best both to realize the potential of the
office of archaeology and historic preservation to generate revenue from
services it could provide in international, national, state, local, and private
venues and also how best to achieve adequate funding from all funding sources
to assure that the office of archaeology and historic preservation can provide
the best possible service to the citizens of the state. There shall be eleven
members of the task force as follows: One member shall be the state historic
preservation officer or his or her designee; two members shall be
representatives of state agencies; two members shall be representatives of
local governments; there shall be one representative each from the Washington
state historical society, the eastern Washington state historical society, the
Washington trust for historic preservation, and Indian tribes; and two members
shall be representatives of the private sector who have experience in
preservation of historic buildings or archaeological sites or who have
particular interest in the issue of preservation of historic buildings and
archaeological sites. The state historic preservation officer shall be the
chair of the task force. The task force shall report to appropriate committees
of the legislature and the governor by ((January 1, 2000)) December
31, 2000.

---
END ---