BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.52.020 and 1990 c 210 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A driver of any vehicle involved in an accident resulting in the injury to or
death of any person shall immediately stop such vehicle at the scene of such
accident or as close thereto as possible but shall then forthwith return to,
and in every event remain at, the scene of such accident until he or she
has fulfilled the requirements of subsection (3) of this section; every such
stop shall be made without obstructing traffic more than is necessary.

(2)
The driver of any vehicle involved in an accident resulting only in damage to a
vehicle which is driven or attended by any person or damage to other property
shall immediately stop such vehicle at the scene of such accident or as close
thereto as possible and shall forthwith return to, and in any event shall
remain at, the scene of such accident until he or she has fulfilled the
requirements of subsection (3) of this section; every such stop shall be made
without obstructing traffic more than is necessary.

(3)
Unless otherwise provided in subsection (7) of this section, the driver
of any vehicle involved in an accident resulting in injury to or death of any
person or damage to any vehicle which is driven or attended by any person or
damage to other property shall give his or her name, address, insurance
company, insurance policy number, and vehicle license number and shall exhibit
his or her vehicle driver's license to any person struck or injured or
the driver or any occupant of, or any person attending, any such vehicle
collided with and shall render to any person injured in such accident
reasonable assistance, including the carrying or the making of arrangements for
the carrying of such person to a physician or hospital for medical treatment if
it is apparent that such treatment is necessary or if such carrying is
requested by the injured person or on his or her behalf. Under no
circumstances shall the rendering of assistance or other compliance with the
provisions of this subsection be evidence of the liability of any driver for
such accident.

(4)(a)
Any driver covered by the provisions of subsection (1) of this section failing
to stop or comply with any of the requirements of subsection (3) of this
section ((under said circumstances)) shall be guilty of a class C felony
and, upon conviction, be punished pursuant to chapter 9A.20 RCW ((9A.20.020:
PROVIDED, That this provision shall not apply to any person injured or
incapacitated by such accident to the extent of being physically incapable of
complying herewith)).

(b)
Any driver covered by the provisions of subsection (1) of this section causing
injury to or death of any person in a roadway construction zone as defined in
RCW 46.61.527 and failing to stop or comply with any of the requirements of
subsection (3) of this section shall be guilty of a class B felony and, upon
conviction, be punished pursuant to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

(c)
(a) and (b) of this subsection shall not apply to any person injured or
incapacitated by such accident to the extent of being physically incapable of
complying.

(5)
Any driver covered by the provisions of subsection (2) of this section failing
to stop or to comply with any of the requirements of subsection (3) of this
section ((under said circumstances)) shall be guilty of a gross
misdemeanor: PROVIDED, That this provision shall not apply to any person
injured or incapacitated by such accident to the extent of being physically
incapable of complying ((herewith)).

(6)
The license or permit to drive or any nonresident privilege to drive of any
person convicted under this section or any local ordinance consisting of
substantially the same language as this section of failure to stop and give
information or render aid following an accident with any vehicle driven or
attended by any person shall be revoked by the department.

(7) If none of the persons specified are in condition to receive
the information to which they otherwise would be entitled under subsection (3)
of this section, and no police officer is present, the driver of any vehicle
involved in such accident after fulfilling all other requirements of
subsections (1) and (3) of this section insofar as possible on his or her
part to be performed, shall forthwith report such accident to the nearest office
of the duly authorized police authority and submit thereto the information
specified in subsection (3) of this section.

---
END ---