BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
47.20.755 and 1998 c 195 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of transportation shall develop((, by January 1, 1999,)) a
process for awarding competitively bid highway construction contracts for
projects ((over ten million dollars)) that may be constructed using a
design-build procedure. As used in this section, "design-build
procedure" means a method of contracting under which the department of
transportation contracts with another party for such party to both design and
build the structures, facilities, and other items specified in the contract.

The process developed by the department shall, at a minimum,
include the scope of services required under the design-build procedure,
contractor prequalification requirements, criteria for evaluating technical
information and project costs, contractor selection criteria, and an issue
resolution procedure. If a request for proposal will be used, the requirements
of RCW 39.10.050 (4), (5), and (6) apply.

Sec.
2. RCW
47.20.765 and 1998 c 195 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department may use the design-build procedure for public works projects ((over
ten million dollars)) where:

(1)
The construction activities are highly specialized and a design-build approach,
as defined in RCW 47.20.755, is critical in developing the construction
methodology; or

(2)
The projects selected provide opportunity for greater innovation and
efficiencies between the designer and the builder; or

(3) Significant savings in project delivery time would be realized.

Sec.
3. RCW
47.20.775 and 1998 c 195 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

A
demonstration program consisting of two projects must be implemented using the
design-build method of contracting, as prescribed under a process developed by
the department of transportation under RCW 47.20.755. ((The department
shall select projects valued over ten million dollars for the demonstration
program.))

The
department shall present progress reports on the demonstration projects to the
((legislative)) senate and house of representatives
transportation committees and the alternative public works oversight
committee during the course of the performance of the demonstration projects.
The department shall present a final detailed report to the ((legislative))
senate and house of representatives transportation committees
within one year of completion of the demonstration projects. The report must
detail the advantages and disadvantages of the design-build construction
process and make recommendations for possible changes in law, and in how the
process may be used for future department projects.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4.
Sections 1 through 3 of this act expire April 30, 2001.

---
END ---