BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.02.010 and 1993 c 448 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1)
"Audit" means an assessment, evaluation, determination, or
investigation of a health care provider by a person not employed by or
affiliated with the provider to determine compliance with:

(a)
Statutory, regulatory, fiscal, medical, or scientific standards;

(b)
A private or public program of payments to a health care provider; or

(c)
Requirements for licensing, accreditation, or certification.

(2)
"Directory information" means information disclosing the presence,
and for the purpose of identification, the name, residence, sex, and the
general health condition of a particular patient who is a patient in a health
care facility or who is currently receiving emergency health care in a health
care facility.

(3)
"General health condition" means the patient's health status
described in terms of "critical," "poor," "fair,"
"good," "excellent," or terms denoting similar conditions.

(4)
"Health care" means any care, service, or procedure provided by a
health care provider:

(a)
To diagnose, treat, or maintain a patient's physical or mental condition; or

(b)
That affects the structure or any function of the human body.

(5)
"Health care facility" means a hospital, clinic, nursing home,
laboratory, office, or similar place where a health care provider provides
health care to patients.

(6)
"Health care information" means any information, whether oral or
recorded in any form or medium, that identifies or can readily be associated
with the identity of a patient and directly relates to the patient's health
care. The term includes any record of disclosures of health care information.
The term includes genetic test information in a person's DNA and a person's
DNA.

(7)
"Health care provider" means a person who is licensed, certified,
registered, or otherwise authorized by the law of this state to provide health
care in the ordinary course of business or practice of a profession.

(8)
"Institutional review board" means any board, committee, or other
group formally designated by an institution, or authorized under federal or
state law, to review, approve the initiation of, or conduct periodic review of
research programs to assure the protection of the rights and welfare of human
research subjects.

(9)
"Maintain," as related to health care information, means to hold,
possess, preserve, retain, store, or control that information.

(10)
"Patient" means an individual who receives or has received health
care. The term includes a deceased individual who has received health care.

(11)
"Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate,
trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government, governmental
subdivision or agency, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(12)
"Reasonable fee" means the charges for duplicating or searching the
record, but shall not exceed sixty-five cents per page for the first thirty
pages and fifty cents per page for all other pages. In addition, a clerical
fee for searching and handling may be charged not to exceed fifteen dollars.
These amounts shall be adjusted biennially in accordance with changes in the
consumer price index, all consumers, for Seattle-Tacoma metropolitan
statistical area as determined by the secretary of health. However, where
editing of records by a health care provider is required by statute and is done
by the provider personally, the fee may be the usual and customary charge for a
basic office visit.

(13)
"Third-party payor" means an insurer regulated under Title 48 RCW
authorized to transact business in this state or other jurisdiction, including
a health care service contractor, and health maintenance organization; or an
employee welfare benefit plan; or a state or federal health benefit program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
legislature finds that:

(1)
The technology of deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) identification is of great
potential benefit to the citizens of this state in many fields, including human
services and health care, scientific research, criminal justice, and
corrections;

(2)
Technology is changing and improving at an ever-increasing rate;

(3)
DNA technology is particularly important in assisting law enforcement in
identifying and apprehending repeat criminal offenders as well as exonerating
those people convicted and incarcerated for a crime they did not commit;

(4)
There are legitimate concerns for privacy rights in the creation, collection,
maintenance, disclosure, identification, and use of DNA;

(5)
Protections of citizens' civil rights and individual privileges necessitate
policy development of protections preventing the unauthorized use of DNA and
the use of DNA for discriminatory purposes; and

(6)
There is a need to address the potential future uses of DNA that may benefit
citizens of this state, for purposes of the health, safety, and welfare of its
citizens.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A DNA
commission is established to consist of twenty-four members selected as
follows:

(1)(a)
Two members of the senate, appointed by the president of the senate, one from each
of the two largest caucuses; and

(b)
Two members of the house of representatives, appointed by the co-speakers of
the house of representatives, one from each of the two largest caucuses;

(2)
The following members shall be appointed by the governor:

(a)
Two members representing local public health;

(b)
One member representing genetic counselors;

(c)
One member representing clinical research;

(d)
One member representing epidemiological research;

(e)
One member representing the Human Genome project;

(f)
One member representing genetic ethics;

(g)
One member representing institutional review boards;

(h)
Two members representing geneticists, one clinical and one research;

(i)
One member representing research institutions;

(j)
One member representing civil rights advocates;

(k)
Two members representing criminal justice and corrections;

(l)
Two members representing privacy advocates;

(m)
One member representing citizens who have undergone genetic testing;

(n)
One member representing hospitals;

(o)
One member representing pathologists or laboratory medicine; and

(p)
One member representing biotechnologists.

The
commission shall be appointed within forty-five days from the effective date of
this act. Staffing shall be provided by the legislature. Members shall serve
without remuneration, except costs may be provided according to the provisions
of RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
DNA commission shall:

(1)
Develop a state-wide strategy for evaluating and recommending public policies
relating to the use of DNA;

(2)
Conduct a survey and produce a resource guide for citizens relating to the use
of DNA;

(3)
Evaluate methods for protecting an individual's privacy interests in his or her
DNA;

(4)
Analyze the incidence of discriminatory actions state-wide based upon genetic
information;

(5)
Develop recommendations relative to civil rights' protections as they relate to
genetic information;

(6)
Analyze available remedies to compensate individuals for the inappropriate use
of their genetic information;

(7)
Identify appropriate disincentives to improper use of DNA;

(8)
Identify incentives for further research and development in the area of DNA
that promotes public health, safety, and welfare; and

(9)
An initial report of its findings and recommendations shall be provided to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by July 1, 2001.

Sec.
5. RCW
70.83.050 and 1967 c 82 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
state board of health shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to carry out
the intent of this chapter. Rules adopted by the state board of health must
protect an individual's confidentiality of his or her genetic information
obtained under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW to read as follows:

The
DNA commission and its powers and duties shall be terminated on June 30, 2005,
as provided in section 7 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW to read as follows:

The
following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each
repealed, effective June 30, 2006.

(1)
Section 2 of this act;

(2)
Section 3 of this act; and

(3) Section 4 of this act.

---
END ---