BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
67.28.1815 and 1997 c 452 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All revenue from taxes imposed under this chapter shall be credited to a
special fund in the treasury of the municipality imposing such tax and used
solely for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of tourism
promotion, the cost of acquisition of tourism-related facilities, ((or))
the cost of operation of tourism-related facilities, or the costs,
such as salaries and equipment acquisition or maintenance, of law enforcement
activity directed towards tourism areas.

(2) Municipalities may, under chapter 39.34 RCW, agree to
the utilization of revenue from taxes imposed under this chapter for the
purposes of funding a multijurisdictional tourism-related facility.

---
END ---