BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
79.90.160 and 1989 c 213 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds and declares that, due to the extraordinary volume of
material washed down onto state-owned beds and shorelands in the Toutle river,
Coweeman river, and portions of the Cowlitz river, the dredge spoils placed
upon adjacent publicly and privately owned property in such areas, if
further disposed, will be of nominal value to the state and that it is in the
best interests of the state to allow further disposal without charge.

All dredge spoil or materials removed from the state-owned beds and
shores of the Toutle river, Coweeman river and that portion of the Cowlitz
river from two miles above the confluence of the Toutle river to its mouth
deposited on adjacent public and private lands during the years 1980
through December 31, 1995, as a result of dredging of these rivers for
navigation and flood control purposes may be sold, transferred, or otherwise
disposed of by owners of such lands without the necessity of any charge by the
department of natural resources and free and clear of any interest of the
department of natural resources of the state of Washington.

---
END ---