BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
29.21.070 and 1990 c 59 s 91 are each amended to read as follows:

The
offices of insurance commissioner, superintendent of public instruction,
justice of the supreme court, judge of the court of appeals, judge of the
superior court, and judge of the district court shall be nonpartisan and the
candidates therefor shall be nominated and elected as such.

All city, town, and special purpose district elective offices shall
be nonpartisan and the candidates therefor shall be nominated and elected as
such.

---
END ---