BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
35.13.130 and 1990 c 33 s 566 are each amended to read as follows:

A petition for annexation of an area contiguous to a city or town
may be made in writing addressed to and filed with the legislative body of the
municipality to which annexation is desired. Except where all the property
sought to be annexed is property of a school district, and the school directors
thereof file the petition for annexation as in RCW 28A.335.110 authorized, the
petition must be signed by the owners of not less than ((seventy-five)) sixty
percent in value according to the assessed valuation for general taxation of
the property for which annexation is petitioned: PROVIDED, That in cities and
towns with populations greater than one hundred sixty thousand located east of
the Cascade mountains, the owner of tax exempt property may sign an annexation
petition and have the tax exempt property annexed into the city or town, but
the value of the tax exempt property shall not be used in calculating the
sufficiency of the required property owner signatures unless only tax exempt
property is proposed to be annexed into the city or town. The petition shall
set forth a description of the property according to government legal
subdivisions or legal plats which is in compliance with RCW 35.02.170, and
shall be accompanied by a plat which outlines the boundaries of the property
sought to be annexed. If the legislative body has required the assumption of
all or of any portion of city or town indebtedness by the area annexed, and/or
the adoption of a comprehensive plan for the area to be annexed, these facts,
together with a quotation of the minute entry of such requirement or
requirements shall be set forth in the petition.

---
END ---