BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 36.93 RCW to read as follows:

The
boundary review board shall disapprove a proposed incorporation of any city or
town when the tax base for the territory of the proposed incorporation is less
than seventy percent of the state-wide tax base for all cities and towns.

For
the purposes of this section, "tax base" means the per capita value
of the taxable property, as defined by RCW 39.36.015, added to per capita sales
and use tax revenues. The boundary review board shall consult with the
department of revenue for assistance in determining the tax base for the
territory of the proposed annexation and the state-wide tax base for all cities
and towns.

Sec.
2. RCW
36.93.150 and 1994 c 216 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board, upon review of any proposed action, shall take such of the following
actions as it deems necessary to best carry out the intent of this chapter:

(1)
Approve the proposal as submitted.

(2)
Subject to RCW 35.02.170, modify the proposal by adjusting boundaries to add or
delete territory. However, any proposal for annexation of territory to a town
shall be subject to RCW 35.21.010 and the board shall not add additional
territory, the amount of which is greater than that included in the original
proposal. Any modifications shall not interfere with the authority of a city,
town, or special purpose district to require or not require preannexation
agreements, covenants, or petitions. A board shall not modify the proposed
incorporation of a city with an estimated population of seven thousand five
hundred or more by removing territory from the proposal, or adding territory to
the proposal, that constitutes ten percent or more of the total area included
within the proposal before the board. However, a board shall remove territory
in the proposed incorporation that is located outside of an urban growth area
or is annexed by a city or town, and may remove territory in the proposed
incorporation if a petition or resolution proposing the annexation is filed or
adopted that has priority over the proposed incorporation, before the area is
established that is subject to this ten percent restriction on removing or
adding territory. A board shall not modify the proposed incorporation of a
city with a population of seven thousand five hundred or more to reduce the
territory in such a manner as to reduce the population below seven thousand
five hundred.

(3)
Determine a division of assets and liabilities between two or more governmental
units where relevant.

(4)
Determine whether, or the extent to which, functions of a special purpose
district are to be assumed by an incorporated city or town, metropolitan
municipal corporation, or another existing special purpose district.

(5)
Disapprove the proposal except that the board shall not have jurisdiction: (a)
To disapprove the dissolution or disincorporation of a special purpose district
which is not providing services but shall have jurisdiction over the
determination of a division of the assets and liabilities of a dissolved or
disincorporated special purpose district; (b) over the division of assets and
liabilities of a special purpose district that is dissolved or disincorporated
pursuant to chapter 36.96 RCW; nor (c) to disapprove the incorporation of a
city with an estimated population of seven thousand five hundred or more except
when disapproval is pursuant to section 1 of this act, but the board may
recommend against the proposed incorporation of a city with such an estimated
population.

Unless
the board disapproves a proposal, it shall be presented under the appropriate
statute for approval of a public body and, if required, a vote of the people.
A proposal that has been modified shall be presented under the appropriate
statute for approval of a public body and if required, a vote of the people.
If a proposal, other than that for a city, town, or special purpose district
annexation, after modification does not contain enough signatures of persons
within the modified area, as are required by law, then the initiating party,
parties or governmental unit has thirty days after the modification decision to
secure enough signatures to satisfy the legal requirement. If the signatures
cannot be secured then the proposal may be submitted to a vote of the people,
as required by law.

The
addition or deletion of property by the board shall not invalidate a petition
which had previously satisfied the sufficiency of signature provisions of RCW
35.13.130 or 35A.14.120. When the board, after due proceedings held,
disapproves a proposed action, such proposed action shall be unavailable, the
proposing agency shall be without power to initiate the same or substantially
the same as determined by the board, and any succeeding acts intended to or
tending to effectuate that action shall be void, but such action may be
reinitiated after a period of twelve months from date of disapproval and shall
again be subject to the same consideration.

The board shall not modify or deny a proposed action unless there
is evidence on the record to support a conclusion that the action is
inconsistent with one or more of the objectives under RCW 36.93.180. Every
such determination to modify or deny a proposed action shall be made in writing
pursuant to a motion, and shall be supported by appropriate written findings
and conclusions, based on the record.

---
END ---