BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature directs that the attorney general, in conjunction with the
prosecuting attorneys from Stevens, Pend Oreille, Ferry, and Okanogan counties,
bring suit in the proper federal court of jurisdiction against the state of
Idaho over the issue of the timber supply stabilization act, Idaho Code
Sections 58-1002 through 58-1008. The suit must challenge the validity of the
timber supply stabilization act as it relates to the federal commerce clause and
the federal enabling act.

The legislature requests that this action be taken in a timely
manner to protect the interests of the citizens of the state of Washington.

---
END ---