BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that recent studies show a powerful relationship between
postsecondary education and an increase in lifetime earned income. Even just
two years of college can equate to a quarter of a million dollar increase in
lifetime income. A bachelor's degree can boost annual income seventy-three
percent, compared to a high school degree. In addition, studies indicate that
for individuals attending college, there is a correlation with improved health
status, increased civic participation, improved savings rates, less reliance on
government assistance, and improved quality of life for their children.
Additionally, this correlates to increased tax revenues and reduced crime rates
for society. The legislature finds that a relatively small number of those on
welfare would qualify for college admission and benefit from completion of
their higher education at a community, trade, or technical college, or other
institute of higher education.

In
1999, the federal government adopted final regulations for temporary assistance
for needy families, allowing expanded use of block grant and maintenance of
effort funds. There is now no reason under federal guidelines why these funds
cannot be used creatively for a variety of special approaches, to help poor families
achieve true financial independence.

The
legislature intends to provide selective access to postsecondary education for
a limited number of qualified adult recipients of temporary assistance for
needy families, while maintaining the emphasis on employment that is the
hallmark of the WorkFirst program. The legislature intends to provide
temporary assistance for needy families grants, including child care and
tuition assistance, to a limited number of college-qualified individuals, with
the goal of providing a means for highly motivated welfare recipients to
successfully complete college, exit assistance, and secure careers to benefit
themselves, their families, and society.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
department shall establish the ICAN program. The goal of the program is to
help college-qualified parents who have dependent children in need and are
eligible for temporary assistance for needy families receive up to four years
of undergraduate education or training. Annually the department shall provide
up to six hundred parents accepted into or enrolled at an institution of higher
education in Washington state with a package of student aid that includes their
temporary assistance for needy families cash grants, as well as the other
support services provided to recipients of temporary assistance for needy
families, including but not limited to medical assistance, child care, food
stamps, tuition assistance based upon actual tuition or public higher education
tuition rates, whichever is less, and other support services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section
apply throughout sections 2 through 11 of this act.

(1)
"ICAN program" means the independence through college for achievers
in need program.

(2)
"Institution of higher education" means the state research
universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, the
community colleges, the technical colleges, and private career schools,
colleges, and universities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
ICAN program shall be supported from any of the following sources or
combination of sources: (1) Funds other than those granted to the state under
Title IV-A of the federal social security act or (2) temporary assistance for
needy families block grant funds or (3) temporary assistance for needy families
caseload savings, if the state funds used for this program meet the definition of
state maintenance of effort under Title IV-A of the federal social security
act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
Families that have participated for twelve months in the temporary assistance
for needy families under this chapter may participate in the ICAN program as a
work activity of the temporary assistance for needy families program.
Eligibility for assistance, and the amount of assistance, shall be determined
under criteria used in the temporary assistance for needy families program.

(2)
The department shall assess the applicant to determine that the education and
training sought by the applicant is likely to result in employment that
provides the wages and benefits necessary for the applicant to support the
applicant's family without public assistance.

(3)
To the extent that funds are available, enrollment in the program shall be
granted if the department determines that:

(a)
The applicant does not possess the necessary skills to obtain employment that
will enable that individual to support a family at seventy-five percent of the
median family income in the state for a family of the same size as the
applicant's family;

(b)
Considering potential employment opportunities and local labor market
conditions, the undergraduate education sought by the individual is likely to
improve the ability of the family to be self-supporting; and

(c)
The applicant has the aptitude to successfully complete the proposed program at
an institution of higher education.

The
applicant shall meet the requirements for the state need grant under RCW
28B.10.800 through 28B.10.820 and qualify for acceptance at and be admitted to
an institution of higher education in the state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
department shall work with other state, local, and private entities to provide
career planning and counseling services to applicants for, and recipients of,
assistance under sections 2 through 11 of this act to assist them in choosing
an educational plan that is likely to lead to self-sufficiency, and provide to
students who have begun an educational program assistance to overcome barriers
to completing the program and becoming employed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
Students receiving assistance under sections 2 through 11 of this act shall
meet the following requirements:

(1)
They must be accepted into a postsecondary program; and

(2)
They must be enrolled full-time, with the expectation that they make
satisfactory progress toward a degree, certificate, or license in a field
likely to create a high probability of employment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. The
department shall inform all persons participating for twelve cumulative months
in the temporary assistance for needy families program of the option to apply
for the ICAN program and the criteria for acceptance. Recipients of temporary
assistance for needy families who have already partially completed their
postsecondary education will be encouraged to apply.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. To
the extent permitted by federal law, assistance received under sections 2
through 11 of this act must be disregarded as income and excluded as a resource
or asset to the same extent as assistance under the temporary assistance for
needy families program, under this chapter, for the purposes of any state,
federal, tribal, or municipal assistance program. Assistance received under
sections 2 through 11 of this act must be treated in the same manner as
assistance received under the temporary assistance for needy families program
under this chapter for all tax purposes. Furthermore, the department shall
implement the program so participants qualify for food stamps until completion
of their degree or certificate.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. (1)
The department shall contract with a public or private entity for the
performance of an outcome study of program participants. The study shall, at a
minimum:

(a)
Track degree or certificate completion by participants;

(b)
Report on wage progression of participants;

(c)
Report on the program's dropout rate, including temporary assistance for needy
families' recidivism;

(d)
Quantify the projected increase in lifetime earnings of program graduates; and

(e)
Report on self-identified enhancers and barriers to success in postsecondary
education experience by the study population.

(2)
The results of the outcome study shall be reported annually, no later than
January 15th, beginning in 2001, to the governor and to appropriate committees
of the legislature.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11.
Participation in the ICAN program shall be incorporated in the recipient's
individual personal responsibility plan, in a manner that clearly indicates
that satisfactory progress in college is the recipient's work activity and
responsibility.

Sec.
12. RCW 74.08A.250
and 1997 c 58 s 311 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, as used in this chapter, "work
activity" means:

(1)
Unsubsidized paid employment in the private or public sector;

(2)
Subsidized paid employment in the private or public sector;

(3)
Work experience, including work associated with the refurbishing of publicly
assisted housing, if sufficient paid employment is not available;

(4)
On-the-job training;

(5)
Job search and job readiness assistance;

(6)
Community service programs;

(7)
Vocational educational training, not to exceed twelve months with respect to
any individual;

(8)
Job skills training directly related to employment;

(9)
Education directly related to employment, in the case of a recipient who has
not received a high school diploma or a GED;

(10)
Satisfactory attendance at secondary school or in a course of study leading to
a GED, in the case of a recipient who has not completed secondary school or
received such a certificate;

(11)
The provision of child care services to an individual who is participating in a
community service program; ((and))

(12)
Services required by the recipient under RCW 74.08.025(3) and 74.08A.010(3) to
become employable; and

(13)
Participation in the independence through college for achievers in need program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. The
department shall adopt rules to implement sections 2 through 11 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14.
Sections 2 through 11 and 13 of this act are each added to chapter 74.08A RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 15. If
any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding
does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application
to the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by
the state.

---
END ---