BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes the valuable contributions made by students with
graduate service appointments to the quality of education provided to the
citizens of the state of Washington. The legislature further recognizes the
hard work and dedication to scholarship of these students in their many hours
of service to the teaching and research mission of the public four-year
institutions. It is the intent of the legislature to provide flexible
opportunities for students with graduate service appointments to receive
tuition and fees waivers for less than full-time appointments and for those
less than full-time appointments to be provided with the assurance that less
than full-time appointments will not have a higher work load level expected of
them than what their contract specifies.

Sec.
2. RCW
28B.15.014 and 1997 c 433 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject
to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state
universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the
community colleges may exempt the following nonresidents from paying all or a
portion of the nonresident tuition fees differential:

(1)
Any person who resides in the state of Washington and who holds a graduate
service appointment designated as such by a public institution of higher
education or is employed for an academic department in support of the
instructional or research programs involving not less than ((twenty)) ten
hours per week during the term such person shall hold such appointment.

(2)
Any faculty member, classified staff member or administratively exempt employee
holding not less than a half time appointment at an institution who resides in
the state of Washington, and the dependent children and spouse of such persons.

(3)
Active‑duty military personnel stationed in the state of Washington.

(4)
Any immigrant refugee and the spouse and dependent children of such refugee, if
the refugee (a) is on parole status, or (b) has received an immigrant visa, or
(c) has applied for United States citizenship.

(5)
Any dependent of a member of the United States congress representing the state
of Washington.

Sec.
3. RCW
28B.15.615 and 1996 c 142 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards
of the state universities and the regional universities may exempt the
following students from paying all or a portion of the resident operating fee
and the technology fee: ((Students granted a graduate service appointment,
designated as such by the institution, involving not less than twenty hours of
work per week. The exemption shall be for the term of the appointment)) Any
person who resides in the state of Washington and who holds a graduate service
appointment designated as such by a public institution of higher education or
is employed by an academic department in support of the instructional or research
programs involving not less than ten hours per week during the term the person
holds the appointment.

---
END ---