BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature intends, through its adoption of policies and appropriations,
that no minors, on the basis of ethnicity or gender, be denied access to
services which are intended to improve their lives.

(2)
The legislature intends to determine whether budgetary and administrative
policies implemented at various agencies in the executive branch have operated
in a manner designed to assure equal access by minors to certain services
without regard to arbitrary distinctions.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Equal access to services" means services are provided to recipients
regardless of ethnicity or gender.

(2)
"Human services" means those programs and services operated or funded
by a participating state agency that are designed to address one or more of the
at-risk factors set forth in RCW 70.190.130(1)(h).

(3)
"Participating state agency" has the same meaning as in chapter
70.190 RCW.

(4)
"Person" means an individual under the age of eighteen.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
Each participating state agency shall, by June 30, 2001, and annually
thereafter, prepare and present to the legislature and governor a report of
equal access to its human services, delivered directly or by contract. For
each human service delivered by a participating state agency the report shall
identify the following for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, and annually thereafter:
(a) The type of human service provided; (b) whether the service was provided by
the participating agency or delivered by contract with a vendor; (c) the number
of persons who received human services who were female and the number who were
male; and (d) the number of persons who received services, by ethnicity. The
report shall be presented to the legislature and the governor.

(2)
The report shall be sufficiently detailed to permit the recipients to examine
the programs and contractors within each human service to determine the numbers
of persons receiving services by gender and ethnicity. Each participating
state agency shall, when the data within the report indicate that equal access
is not available, provide the legislature and governor an explanation of the
reasons for the lack of equal access, and a plan for attaining equal access and
the cost of doing so. The submission of a plan under this section shall not
create an entitlement to service for any person.

(3)
For purposes of this report, the delivery of basic education shall be
considered a human service only when the basic education is provided at a
facility owned or operated by a participating state agency.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
office of financial management shall adopt rules to establish the format and
data required by this chapter. The rules shall reflect the legislative intent
that data be collected and reported on a uniform basis and that delivery of
human services data be reported on a pro rata basis by population of persons
eligible to receive the services, on an agency-by-agency basis.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5.
Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

---
END ---