BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
36.75.160 and 1963 c 4 s 36.75.160 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board of county commissioners of any county may erect and construct or acquire
by purchase, gift, or condemnation, any bridge, trestle, or any other structure
which crosses any stream, body of water, gulch, navigable water, swamp or other
topographical formation requiring such structure for the continuation or
connection of any county road if such topographical formation constitutes the
boundary of a city, town, another county or the state of Washington or another
state or a county, city or town of such other state.

The
board of such county may join with such city, town, other county, the state of
Washington, or other state, or a county, city or town of such other state in paying
for, erecting, constructing, acquiring by purchase, gift, or condemnation any
such bridge, trestle, or other structure, and the purchase or condemnation of
right of way therefor.

The
board of any county may construct, maintain, and operate any county road which
forms the boundary line between another county within the state or another
county in any other state or which through its meandering crosses ((and
recrosses)) such boundary; and acquire by purchase or condemnation any
lands or rights within this state, either within or without its county,
necessary for such boundary road; and enter into joint contracts with
authorities of adjoining counties for the construction, operation, and
maintenance of such boundary roads. The power of condemnation herein granted
may be exercised jointly by two counties in the manner provided in RCW
36.75.170 for bridges, or it may be exercised by a single county in the manner
authorized by law.

Sec.
2. RCW
36.75.210 and 1963 c 4 s 36.75.210 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever
a county road is established within any county, and such county road crosses
the boundary of the county ((and again enters the county)), the board of
the county within which the major portion of the road is located may expend the
county road fund of such county in laying out, establishing, constructing,
altering, repairing, improving, and maintaining that portion of the road lying
outside the county, in the manner provided by law for the expenditure of county
funds for the construction, alteration, repair, improvement, and maintenance of
county roads within the county.

The board of any county may construct, maintain, and operate any
county road which forms the boundary line between another county within the
state or another county in any other state or which through its meandering
crosses ((and recrosses)) such boundary; and acquire by purchase or
condemnation any lands or rights within this state, either within or without
its county, necessary for such boundary road; and enter into joint contracts
with authorities of adjoining counties for the construction, operation, and
maintenance of such boundary roads. The power of condemnation herein granted
may be exercised jointly by two counties in the manner provided for bridges, or
it may be exercised by a single county in the manner authorized by law.

---
END ---