BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.131.020 and 1977 ex.s. c 289 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
state legislature finds that state ((agencies)) entities may fail
to deliver services as effectively and efficiently as is expected by the
general public and as originally contemplated by the legislature. It further
finds that state government actions have produced a substantial increase in
numbers of ((agencies)) entities, growth of programs, and
proliferation of rules ((and regulations)), and that the entire process
has evolved without sufficient legislative and executive oversight, regulatory
accountability, or a system of checks and balances. The legislature further
finds that by establishing a system for the termination, continuation, or
modification of state ((agencies)) entities, coupled with a
system of scheduled review of such ((agencies)) entities, it will
be in a better position to: Evaluate the need for the continued
existence of existing and future state ((agencies)) entities; assess
the effectiveness and performance of agencies, boards, commissions, and
programs; and ensure public accountability. The legislature recognizes
that the executive branch shares in this duty and responsibility to assure that
state government operates in an efficient, orderly, and responsive manner.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.131.030 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 27 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter the following words and phrases shall have the following
meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
(("Committees of reference" means the standing legislative
committees designated by the senate and house of representatives to consider
termination, modification, or reestablishment of state agencies pursuant to
this chapter.)) "Entity" includes every state office,
department, board, commission, unit or subunit, and agency of the state, and
where provided by law, programs and activities involving less than the full
responsibility of a state agency. "Entity" also includes any part of
the Revised Code of Washington scheduled for repeal, expiration, or program
termination.

(2)
"Person" includes every natural person, firm, partnership,
corporation, association, or organization.

(((3)
"Regulatory entity" means any board, commission, agency, division, or
other unit or subunit of state government which licenses or regulates one or
more professions, occupations, industries, businesses, or other endeavors in
the state of Washington.

(4)
"State agency" includes every state office, department, board,
commission, regulatory entity and agency of the state, and where provided by
law, programs and activities involving less than the full responsibility of a
state agency.))

Sec.
3. RCW
43.131.040 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 27 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
state ((agency)) entity scheduled for termination by the
processes provided in this chapter may be reestablished by the legislature for
a specified period of time or indefinitely. The legislature may again review
the state ((agency)) entity in a manner consistent with the
provisions of this chapter and reestablish, modify, or consolidate such state
((agency)) entity or allow it to be terminated.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW to read as follows:

The
joint legislative audit and review committee shall conduct a program and fiscal
review of any entity scheduled for termination under this chapter. This
program and fiscal review shall be completed and a preliminary report prepared
during the calendar year prior to the date established for termination. These
reports shall be prepared in the manner set forth in RCW 44.28.071 and
44.28.075. Upon completion of its preliminary report, the joint legislative
audit and review committee shall transmit copies of the report to the office of
financial management and any affected entity. The final report shall include
the response, if any, of the affected entity and the office of financial
management in the same manner as set forth in RCW 44.28.088. The joint
legislative audit and review committee shall transmit the final report to the
legislature, to the state entity affected, to the governor, and to the state
library.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Any entity may be scheduled for sunset termination and review under this
chapter by the legislature.

(2)
An entity scheduled for sunset termination shall establish performance
measures, as required under subsection (3) of this section, and must be
evaluated, in part, in terms of the results. The entity has the burden of
proof for demonstrating compliance with the performance measures. The sunset
termination legislation shall name a lead entity, if more than one entity is
impacted by scheduled termination. The affected entity or lead entity has the
responsibility for developing a data collection plan and submitting information
to the joint legislative audit and review committee.

(3)(a)
An entity shall develop performance measures and a data collection plan and
submit them to the joint legislative audit and review committee within one year
of the effective date of the legislation establishing the sunset termination.

(b)
The joint legislative audit and review committee shall review the performance
measures and data collection plan for sufficiency and notify the entity of
approval or disapproval. If disapproved or approved conditionally, the
committee shall notify the entity, in writing, of the necessary changes.

(4)
Unless specified otherwise, sunset terminations under this chapter shall be a
minimum of seven years. The joint legislative audit and review committee
shall complete its review in the year prior to the date of termination. An
entity scheduled for termination is terminated on the date scheduled unless
legislation is enacted prior to the termination date.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 43.131 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
In conducting the review of an entity, the joint legislative audit and review
committee shall determine the scope and objectives of the review and consider,
but not be limited to, the following factors, if applicable:

(a)
The extent to which the entity has complied with legislative intent;

(b)
The extent to which the entity is operating in an efficient and economical
manner which results in optimum performance;

(c)
The extent to which the entity is operating in the public interest by
controlling costs;

(d)
The extent to which the entity duplicates the activities of other entities or
of the private sector;

(e)
The extent to which the entity is meeting the performance measures developed
under section 5 of this act; and

(f)
The possible impact of the termination or modification of the entity.

(2) After completing the review under subsection (1) of this
section, the committee shall make its recommendations to the legislature.

Sec.
7. RCW
43.131.090 and 1993 c 281 s 54 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the legislature specifies a shorter period of time, a terminated ((state
agency)) entity shall continue in existence until June 30th of the
next succeeding year for the purpose of concluding its affairs: PROVIDED, That
the powers and authority of the ((state agency)) entity shall not
be reduced or otherwise limited during this period. Unless otherwise provided:

(1)
All employees of terminated ((state agencies)) entities classified
under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, shall be transferred as
appropriate or as otherwise provided in the procedures adopted by the
Washington personnel resources board pursuant to RCW 41.06.150;

(2)
All documents and papers, equipment, or other tangible property in the
possession of the terminated ((state agency)) entity shall be
delivered to the custody of the ((agency)) entity assuming the
responsibilities of the terminated ((agency)) entity or if such
responsibilities have been eliminated, documents and papers shall be delivered
to the state archivist and equipment or other tangible property to the
department of general administration;

(3)
All funds held by, or other moneys due to, the terminated ((state agency))
entity shall revert to the fund from which they were appropriated, or if
that fund is abolished to the general fund;

(4)
Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 34.05.020, all rules made by a terminated
((state agency)) entity shall be repealed, without further action
by the ((state agency)) entity, at the end of the period provided
in this section, unless assumed and reaffirmed by the ((agency)) entity
assuming the related legal responsibilities of the terminated ((state agency))
entity;

(5) All contractual rights and duties of ((a state agency)) an
entity shall be assigned or delegated to the ((agency)) entity
assuming the responsibilities of the terminated ((state agency)) entity,
or if there is none to such ((agency)) entity as the governor
shall direct.

Sec.
8. RCW
43.131.100 and 1977 ex.s. c 289 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

This
chapter shall not affect the right to institute or prosecute any cause of
action by or against ((a state agency)) an entity terminated
pursuant to this chapter if the cause of action arose prior to the end of the
period provided in RCW 43.131.090. Such causes of action may be instituted,
prosecuted, or defended in the name of the state of Washington by the office of
the attorney general. Any hearing or other proceeding pending before ((a
state agency)) an entity to be terminated and not completed before
the end of the period provided in RCW 43.131.090, may be completed by the ((agency))
entity assuming the responsibilities of the terminated ((state agency))
entity.

Sec.
9. RCW
43.131.130 and 1977 ex.s. c 289 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing
in this chapter or RCW 43.06.010 ((as now or hereafter amended,)) shall
prevent the legislature from abolishing or modifying ((a state agency)) an
entity scheduled for termination prior to the ((agency's)) entity's
established termination date or from abolishing or modifying any other ((state
agency)) entity.

Sec.
10. RCW
43.131.150 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 27 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The
((state agencies and programs)) entities scheduled for
termination under this chapter shall be subject to all of the processes provided
in this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
43.131.050 (Joint legislative audit and review committee and
office of financial management--Duties--Reports required) and 1996 c 288 s 43,
1990 c 297 s 2, 1979 c 22 s 1, & 1977 ex.s. c 289 s 5;

(2) RCW
43.131.060 (Joint legislative audit and review committee review of
regulatory entity--Factors for consideration) and 1996 c 288 s 44, 1988 c 17 s
1, & 1977 ex.s. c 289 s 6;

(3) RCW
43.131.070 (Joint legislative audit and review committee review of
a state agency other than a regulatory entity--Factors for consideration) and
1996 c 288 s 45 & 1977 ex.s. c 289 s 7; and

(4) RCW
43.131.080 (Committees of reference--Powers and duties) and 1996 c
288 s 46, 1989 c 175 s 109, 1983 1st ex.s. c 27 s 3, & 1977 ex.s. c 289 s
8.

Sec.
12. RCW
43.131.900 and 1988 c 17 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

RCW
43.131.010 through 43.131.150 shall expire on June 30, ((2000)) 2015,
unless extended by law for an additional fixed period of time.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 13. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---