BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
79.71.060 and 1991 c 352 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The ((department)) board of natural resources shall
hold a public hearing in the county where the majority of the land in the
proposed natural resources conservation area is located prior to establishing
the boundary. An area proposed for designation must contain resources
consistent with characteristics identified in RCW 79.71.020. If the area
proposed for designation is greater than six hundred forty acres, then the
hearing shall be conducted by the board members, and a majority of the board
must participate in the hearing to satisfy the requirements of this section.

---
END ---