BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
90.64.050 and 1998 c 262 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department has the following duties:

(a)
Identify existing or substantial potential water quality problems
resulting from dairy farms through implementation of the inspection program in
RCW 90.64.023;

(b)
Inspect a dairy farm upon the request of a dairy producer;

(c)
Receive, process, and verify complaints concerning discharge of pollutants from
all dairy farms;

(d)
Determine if a dairy-related water quality problem requires immediate
corrective action under the Washington state water pollution control laws,
chapter 90.48 RCW, or the Washington state water quality standards adopted
under chapter 90.48 RCW. The department shall maintain the lead enforcement
responsibility;

(e)
Administer and enforce national pollutant discharge elimination system permits
for operators of concentrated dairy animal feeding operations, where required
by federal regulations and state laws or upon request of a dairy producer;

(f)
((Participate on the advisory and oversight committee;

(g)))
Encourage communication and cooperation between local department personnel and
the appropriate conservation district personnel;

(((h)))
(g) Require the use of dairy nutrient management plans as required under
this chapter for entities required to plan under this chapter; and

(((i)))
(h) Provide to the commission ((and the advisory and oversight
committee)) an annual report of dairy farm inspection and enforcement
activities.

(2) The department may not delegate its responsibilities in
enforcement.

---
END ---