BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
90.48.020 and 1995 c 255 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

((Whenever
the word)) The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Person" ((is used in this chapter, it shall be construed
to)) includes any political subdivision, government agency,
municipality, industry, public or private corporation, copartnership,
association, firm, individuals or any other entity whatsoever.

((Wherever
the words)) (2) "Waters of the state" ((shall be
used in this chapter, they shall be construed to)) includes lakes,
rivers, ponds, streams, inland waters, underground waters, salt waters,
and all other surface waters and watercourses within the jurisdiction of the
state of Washington.

((Whenever
the word)) (3) "Pollution" ((is used in this
chapter, it shall be construed to)) means such contamination, or
other alteration of the physical, chemical, or biological properties, of
any waters of the state, including change in temperature, taste, color,
turbidity, or odor of the waters, or such discharge of any liquid, gaseous,
solid, radioactive, or other substance into any waters of the state as will or
is likely to create a nuisance or render such waters harmful, detrimental,
or injurious to the public health, safety, or welfare, or to domestic,
commercial, industrial, agricultural, recreational, or other legitimate
beneficial uses, or to livestock, wild animals, birds, fish or other aquatic
life.

((Wherever
the word)) (4) "Department" ((is used in this
chapter it shall)) means the department of ecology.

((Whenever
the word)) (5) "Director" ((is used in this
chapter it shall)) means the director of ecology.

((Whenever
the words)) (6) "Aquatic noxious weed" ((are
used in this chapter, they have)) has the same meaning as
prescribed under RCW 17.26.020.

(7)
"Dairy farm" means any farm licensed to produce milk under chapter
15.36 RCW.

Sec.
2. RCW
90.48.390 and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 84 are each amended to read as follows:

The
coastal protection fund is established to be used by the department as a
revolving fund for carrying out the purposes of restoration of natural
resources under this chapter and chapter 90.56 RCW. To this fund there shall
be credited penalties, fees, damages, charges received pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter and chapter 90.56 RCW, compensation for damages
received under this chapter and chapter 90.56 RCW, and an amount equivalent to
one cent per gallon from each marine use refund claim under RCW 82.36.330. However,
notwithstanding any other provision of law, dairy farm-related penalties
received under the provisions of this chapter shall be credited to the dairy
waste management account as provided in RCW 90.64.150.

Moneys
in the fund not needed currently to meet the obligations of the department in
the exercise of its powers, duties, and functions under RCW 90.48.142,
90.48.366, 90.48.367, and 90.48.368 shall be deposited with the state treasurer
to the credit of the fund.

Sec.
3. RCW
90.64.150 and 1998 c 262 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

The dairy waste management account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. All receipts from monetary penalties levied pursuant to violations
of this chapter and from dairy farm-related violations of chapter 90.48 RCW
must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for the commission to provide grants to local conservation districts for
the sole purpose of assisting dairy producers to develop and fully implement
dairy nutrient management plans. Only the ((chairman)) chair of
the commission or the ((chairman's)) chair's designee may
authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for
expenditures.

---
END ---