BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that:

(1)
Complying with the laws regarding dairy nutrient management is a burdensome yet
laudable task that the dairy farmers of this state have undertaken;

(2)
The dairy nutrient management standards and specifications of the natural
resources conservation service were the most rigorous in the nation when the
dairy nutrient management act was enacted in 1998;

(3)
Those standards, as they existed in 1998, continue to be appropriate standards
for proper management of dairy nutrients, despite modification by the natural
resources conservation service since 1998;

(4)
Dairy farmers cannot comply with constantly changing requirements. The
uncertainty constant change creates is an unnecessary drain on limited
resources; and

(5)
If management standards change substantively, there should be a method for all
parties concerned with proper dairy nutrient management to consider and
implement changes without causing disruption, uncertainty, or an unnecessary
drain on resources.

Sec.
2. RCW
90.64.026 and 1998 c 262 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except for those producers who already have a certified dairy nutrient
management plan as required under the terms and conditions of an individual or
general national pollutant discharge elimination system permit, all dairy
producers licensed under chapter 15.36 RCW, regardless of size, shall prepare a
dairy nutrient management plan. If at any time a dairy nutrient management
plan fails to prevent the discharge of pollutants to waters of the state, it
shall be required to be updated.

(2)
By November 1, 1998, the conservation commission, in conjunction with the
advisory and oversight committee established under section 8 of this act shall
develop a document clearly describing the elements that a dairy nutrient
management plan must contain to gain local conservation district approval.

(3)
In developing the elements that an approved dairy nutrient management plan must
contain, the commission may authorize the use of other methods and technologies
than those developed by the natural resources conservation service when such
alternatives have been evaluated by the advisory and oversight committee.
Alternative methods and technologies shall meet the standards and specifications
of:

(a)
The natural resources conservation service, as those standards and
specifications existed on July 1, 1998, and as modified by the
geographically based standards developed under RCW 90.64.140; or

(b)
A professional engineer with expertise in the area of dairy nutrient
management.

(4)
In evaluating alternative technologies and methods, the principal objectives of
the committee's evaluation shall be determining:

(a)
Whether there is a substantial likelihood that, once implemented, the
alternative technologies and methods would not violate water quality
requirements;

(b)
Whether more cost-effective methods can be successfully implemented in some or
all categories of dairy operations; and

(c)
Whether the technologies and methods approved or provided by the natural
resources conservation service for use by confined animal feeding operations,
as those standards and specifications existed on July 1, 1998, are
necessarily required for other categories of dairy operations.

In
addition, the committee shall encourage the conservation commission and the
conservation districts to apply in dairy nutrient management plans technologies
and methods that are appropriate to the needs of the specific type of operation
and the specific farm site and to avoid imposing requirements that are not
necessary for the specific dairy producer to achieve compliance with water
quality requirements.

(5)
Such plans shall be submitted for approval to the local conservation district
where the dairy farm is located, and shall be approved by conservation
districts no later than by July 1, 2002. The conservation commission, in
conjunction with conservation districts, shall develop a state-wide schedule of
plan development and approval to ensure adequate resources are available to
have all plans approved by July 1, 2002.

(6)
If a dairy producer leases land for dairy production from an owner who has
prohibited the development of capital improvements, such as storage lagoons, on
the leased property, the dairy producer shall indicate in his or her dairy
nutrient management plan that such improvements are prohibited by the landowner
and shall describe other methods, such as land application, that will be
employed by the dairy producer to manage dairy nutrients.

(7)
Notwithstanding the timelines in this section, any dairy farm licensed after
September 1, 1998, shall have six months from the date of licensing to develop
a dairy nutrient management plan and another eighteen months to fully implement
that plan.

(8)
If a plan contains the elements identified in subsection (2) of this section, a
conservation district shall approve the plan no later than ninety days after
receiving the plan. If the plan does not contain the elements identified in
subsection (2) of this section, the local conservation district shall notify
the dairy producer in writing of modifications needed in the plan no later than
ninety days after receiving the plan. The dairy producer shall provide a
revised plan that includes the needed modifications within ninety days of the
date of the local conservation district notification. If the dairy producer
does not agree with, or otherwise takes exception to, the modifications
requested by the local conservation district, the dairy producer may initiate
the appeals process described in RCW 90.64.028 within thirty days of receiving
the letter of notification.

(9)
An approved plan shall be certified by a conservation district and a dairy
producer when the elements necessary to implement the plan have been
constructed or otherwise put in place, and are being used as designed and
intended. A certification form shall be developed by the conservation
commission for use state-wide and shall provide for a signature by both a
conservation district representative and a dairy producer. Certification forms
shall be signed by December 31, 2003, and a copy provided to the department for
recording in the data base established in RCW 90.64.130.

(10)
The ability of dairy producers to comply with the planning requirements of this
chapter depends, in many cases, on the availability of federal and state
funding to support technical assistance provided by local conservation
districts. Dairy producers shall not be held responsible for noncompliance
with the planning requirements of this chapter if conservation districts are
unable to perform their duties under this chapter because of insufficient
funding.

(11) The conservation commission may, after public hearing and
due consideration, including comment from the department of ecology, adopt
standards and specifications of the natural resources conservation service that
were not in existence on July 1, 1998. Producers affected by new standards and
specifications have five years from the date the commission adopts the new
standards and specifications to comply with the new standards and
specifications.

---
END ---