BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
In consultation with the state conservation commission and local conservation
districts, the office of financial management shall develop recommendations to
provide adequate funding for the dairy nutrient management program established
pursuant to chapter 90.64 RCW. The recommendations shall include an
identification of need, if any, for additional funding for each of the
following purposes: (a) To perform functions required by conservation
districts and the state conservation commission; (b) to provide technical
assistance for development of plans; and (c) for cost-share moneys for
implementation of the plans based on fifty percent of the eligible costs to be
derived from public sources. The recommendations shall be for the amount of
funding required each fiscal year for these purposes assuming that the
deadlines established in chapter 262, Laws of 1998 will be met. If a lower
level of funding is recommended, then the recommendation for additional funding
shall be accompanied by a recommendation that the deadlines established in RCW
90.64.030(9) be extended to a specified date.

(2) The office of financial management shall submit its written
recommendations to the co-chief clerks of the house of representatives and the
secretary of the senate before December 20, 2000.

---
END ---