BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that:

(1)
Dairy nutrient management involves the knowledge of many areas and the
possession of many skills besides engineering;

(2)
While engineering is important to a correctly designed system, it is only part
of the necessary skills, specialized knowledge, and considerations required to
create proper dairy nutrient management; and

(3)
Trained technicians, with the help of established technical manuals and
guidelines, and working in consultation with a professional engineer when
appropriate, can design and implement proper dairy nutrient management systems.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 90.64 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Work carried out by technical assistance teams in order to comply with this
chapter meets the requirements of chapter 18.43 RCW. Professional engineers
may work in conjunction with technicians and need not have direct supervision
over technicians in implementing this chapter.

(2) The provisions of this section apply to all dairy nutrient
management plans developed under this chapter, whether developed prior to or
after the effective date of this section.

---
END ---