BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
90.64.005 and 1998 c 262 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that there is a need to establish a clear and understandable
process that provides for the proper and effective management of dairy
nutrients that affect the quality of surface or ground waters in the state of
Washington. The legislature finds that there is a need for a program that will
provide a stable and predictable business climate upon which dairy farms may
base future investment decisions.

The
legislature finds that federal regulations require a permit program for dairies
with over seven hundred head of mature cows and, other specified dairy farms
that directly discharge into waters or are otherwise significant contributors
of pollution. The legislature finds that significant work has been ongoing
over a period of time and that the intent of this chapter is to take the
consensus that has been developed and place it into statutory form.

It
is also the intent of this chapter to establish an inspection and technical
assistance program for dairy farms to address the discharge of pollution to
surface and ground waters of the state that will lead to water quality
compliance by the industry. A further purpose is to create a balanced program
involving technical assistance, regulation, and enforcement ((with
coordination and oversight of the program by a committee composed of industry,
agency, and other representatives)). Furthermore, it is the objective of
this chapter to maintain the administration of the water quality program as it
relates to dairy operations at the state level.

It
is also the intent of this chapter to recognize the existing working
relationships between conservation districts, the conservation commission, and
the department of ecology in protecting water quality of the state. A further
purpose of this chapter is to provide statutory recognition of the coordination
of the functions of conservation districts, the conservation commission, and
the department of ecology pertaining to development of dairy ((waste)) nutrient
management plans for the protection of water quality.

Sec.
2. RCW
90.64.150 and 1998 c 262 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

The dairy ((waste)) nutrient management account is
created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from monetary
penalties levied pursuant to violations of this chapter must be deposited into
the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the commission
to provide grants to local conservation districts for the sole purpose of
assisting dairy producers to develop and fully implement dairy nutrient
management plans. Only the ((chairman)) chair of the commission
or the ((chairman's)) chair's designee may authorize expenditures
from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

---
END ---