BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds there has been a sizeable increase in the number of stocks
of salmonids originating in Washington waters that have recently been declared
as threatened or endangered by federal agencies under the federal endangered
species act. A number of additional stocks of salmonids also are considered as
candidates for future listings. Unlike most species that have been placed on the
federal endangered species act, salmonids continue to be allowed to be
harvested as a sport, for commercial purposes, and for tribal commercial,
ceremonial, and subsistence purposes. Such harvests occur throughout the
waters of many different governmental jurisdictions, each of whom has an
interest in maintaining its share of the catch. The legislature finds that
there is tension between preserving and restoring listed stocks and the ability
to maintain acceptable levels of harvest in a mixed stock fishery, which
results in direct and incidental harvest of these listed stocks of fish.

The
legislature finds that generally fish reared in hatcheries can sustain a higher
rate of harvest than fish that rely on natural spawning. Fish hatcheries have
been used, for nearly a century in some regions, as a way to augment the number
of salmonids available for harvest. Hatcheries have been used for increasing
production when there is insufficient escapement to natural spawning grounds
and for mitigation for loss of natural habitat. Because of the extensive use
of hatcheries by numerous entities throughout the state for decades, it is
frequently difficult to distinguish on a scientific basis between aboriginal
native stocks, current natural reproducing stocks, and hatchery stocks some of
which are native and other that have been introduced from other areas.
Information derived from fish marking programs indicate the amount of straying
and intermixing of fish from one watershed with fish in another has been
occurring for decades. The extent to which these various fish stocks may have
intermixed, as compared to remaining separate and distinct stocks, is not well
understood by the various interests that are affected by the consequences of
various recovery strategies for listed stocks.

The
legislature finds that several hundreds of millions of public and private
moneys have been spent and likely more will be expended to restore listed
stocks of anadromous salmonids. Mechanisms that assure adequate protection of
listed and candidate stocks from the impacts of harvest need to be established
to assure that restoration efforts will be productive and long lasting.
Further, that establishment of such mechanisms are needed to enhance public
confidence that these public and private expenditures will not go forward
without close monitoring and periodic reporting of verifiable progress.

The
purpose of this act is to establish policies and strategies necessary to assure
that stocks that have been listed or are candidates for listing under the
federal endangered species act will be protected from overharvest and restored,
while maintaining to the extent possible, the continued harvest of stocks from
watersheds with abundant populations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 75.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Each year the department shall identify each anadromous salmonid stock that has
been listed as threatened or endangered under the federal endangered species
act and also identify those stocks of anadromous salmonids that are candidates
for such listing. For each of these identified stocks, the department shall
report the best available estimates of the following:

(a)
The run size of adult fish available for harvest within the stock's migratory
range and for spawning escapement;

(b)
The rate of harvest-induced mortality in the waters of each state and province
through which the fish migrate and a delineation of the rate by sports,
nontribal commercial, and tribal harvest. Harvest induced mortality shall
include such sources as by-catch and hook mortality;

(c)
The total cumulative rate and number of harvest-induced mortality for each
listed and candidate stock;

(d)
The minimum escapement goal that would be necessary to remove the stock from
its endangered or threatened status;

(e)
The optimal escapement goal that would provide sufficient spawners to use the
available spawning and rearing habitat fully; and

(f)
The number of fish that escaped harvest and continue to migrate through state
waterways for spawning.

(2)
By December 1st of each year, the report shall be compiled. Reports for
ensuing years shall have a consistent and well-summarized format to allow for
comparability between years to determine the rate of change and whether success
is being attained. The report shall be transmitted to the governor, the
secretary of the senate, and to the chief clerk of the house of
representatives. Copies of the report shall be available to the public upon
request at no charge.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 75.08 RCW to read as follows:

All
fish reared in state-funded hatcheries and fish reared in mitigation hatcheries
approved by the department under RCW 75.20.090, surplus of the operational
needs of the hatchery, shall be allowed to continue to spawn under natural
conditions and the eggs and sperm from those fish shall not be destroyed
pursuant to orders or other requirements of the federal government unless:

(1)
The order from the federal agency is in writing and is signed by the
appropriate federal official;

(2)
The order has provided clear directions to assure that stocks of fish listed as
threatened or endangered will not be accidentally or intentionally directed to
be killed and that execution of such order will not constitute a violation of
the prohibition on take included in the federal endangered species act;

(3)
The federal agency order cites the specific federal regulation that contains
criteria as to how various stocks of fish are to be distinguished from one
another and that surplus hatchery fish, including their eggs and sperm must be
destroyed;

(4)
The basis for the order is genetic testing of scales or other parts of fish
that allows accurate placement of stocks of fish into distinct categories;

(5)
Surplus hatchery-reared fish have been verified to be genetically different
than the naturally spawning fish;

(6)
The stock differentiation is based on sound science and has been subjected to
peer review that includes at least three scientists with a high degree of
expertise in fish genetics chosen by the department chairs of two state
universities' fishery programs. The peer review panel shall write a written
report of the findings and conclusions;

(7)
The number of fish in the population is of an adequate number to adequately
restore the run without hatchery augmentation;

(8)
The evaluation of fish stocks includes an estimate of the extent that various
stocks have strayed and the number of years that said stocks have strayed; and

(9)
The extent that indigenous stocks have intermixed with other indigenous stocks
or with other hatchery stocks.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1) A
study shall be conducted on ways to increase the returns of stocks of
anadromous fish listed as threatened or endangered under the federal endangered
species act. The goal of the study is to better manage fish harvesting
activities and to improve the selectivity of fishing methods to increase
returns of stocks with low numbers while allowing the continued harvest of
abundant stocks. The study shall consider all the various methods of allowing
improved harvest management and selective harvest strategies and associated
harvest gear that can serve as an alternative to a full conservation closure
that would restrict all fishing activity, including those that have a very
small impact on listed stocks.

(2)
In conducting the study, the department of fish and wildlife may form an
advisory committee that includes representatives of major fishing groups and
entities with expertise in the topics.

(3)
The results of the study shall be included in a report to the governor and the
legislature by December 1, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
state fish and wildlife commission shall establish escapement goals for each
stock of anadromous salmonids that has been listed as threatened or endangered
under the federal endangered species act and those stocks that have been
determined to be candidates for such listing. For each stock there shall be
two types of escapement goals: A minimum escapement goal that when reached
would qualify the particular stock of fish for removal from the federal
listing; and a optimal escapement goal that would allow sufficient fish to
fully use the habitat that is currently available.

For
each stock of fish that does not meet the minimum escapement goal, the
commission shall provide for the management of the harvest so that spawning
escapement levels are increased by equal amounts in each of the subsequent two
life cycles so that the minimum escapement goals are fully achieved and
maintained. Progress toward reaching these milestones shall be included in the
report required under section 2 of this act.

Sec.
6. RCW
75.08.012 and 1983 1st ex.s. c 46 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department shall preserve, protect, perpetuate and manage the food fish and
shellfish in state waters and offshore waters.

The
department shall conserve the food fish and shellfish resources in a manner
that does not impair the resource. In a manner consistent with this goal, the
department shall seek to maintain the economic well-being and stability of the
fishing industry in the state. In carrying out this policy, the department
shall take action to assure that sufficient escapement of stocks of anadromous
salmonids listed under the federal endangered species act is achieved
consistent with section 5 of this act. The department shall promote
orderly fisheries and shall enhance and improve recreational and commercial
fishing in this state.

Sec.
7. RCW
77.04.055 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In establishing policies to preserve, protect, and perpetuate wildlife, fish,
and wildlife and fish habitat, the commission shall meet annually with the
governor to:

(a)
Review and prescribe basic goals and objectives related to those policies; and

(b)
Review the performance of the department in implementing fish and wildlife
policies.

The
commission shall maximize fishing, hunting, and outdoor recreational
opportunities compatible with healthy and diverse fish and wildlife
populations. In carrying out this policy, the commission shall take action
to assure that sufficient escapement of stocks of anadromous salmonids listed
under the federal endangered species act is achieved consistent with section 5
of this act.

(2)
The commission shall establish hunting, trapping, and fishing seasons and
prescribe the time, place, manner, and methods that may be used to harvest or
enjoy game fish and wildlife.

(3)
The commission shall establish provisions regulating food fish and shellfish as
provided in RCW 75.08.080.

(4)
The commission shall have final approval authority for tribal, interstate,
international, and any other department agreements relating to fish and
wildlife.

(5)
The commission shall adopt rules to implement the state's fish and wildlife
laws.

(6)
The commission shall have final approval authority for the department's budget
proposals.

(7)
The commission shall select its own staff and shall appoint the director of the
department. The director and commission staff shall serve at the pleasure of
the commission.

Sec.
8. RCW
77.12.010 and 1985 c 438 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Wildlife
is the property of the state. The department shall preserve, protect, and
perpetuate wildlife. Game animals, game birds, and game fish may be taken only
at times or places, or in manners or quantities as in the judgment of the
commission maximizes public recreational opportunities without impairing the
supply of wildlife. In carrying out this policy, the department shall take
action to assure that sufficient escapement of stocks of anadromous salmonids
listed under the federal endangered species act is achieved consistent with
section 5 of this act.

The
commission shall not adopt rules that categorically prohibit fishing with bait
or artificial lures in streams, rivers, beaver ponds, and lakes except that the
commission may adopt rules and regulations restricting fishing methods upon a
determination by the director that an individual body of water or part thereof
clearly requires a fishing method prohibition to conserve or enhance the
fisheries resource or to provide selected fishing alternatives. The commission
shall attempt to maximize the public recreational fishing opportunities of all
citizens, particularly juvenile, handicapped, and senior citizens.

Nothing
contained herein shall be construed to infringe on the right of a private
property owner to control the owner's private property.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---