BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS. The legislature finds that
part-time, temporary, leased, and other contingent workers are increasing in
numbers. Under state laws and employer policies, these contingent workers are
less likely than other workers to receive employment-based benefits.
Consequently, employers may terminate employees, misclassify employees, limit
contract terms, or take other action to avoid providing or continuing to
provide employment-based benefits.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
LEGISLATIVE INTENT. The legislature intends that the purpose of this act is to
prohibit employers from terminating employees, misclassifying employees,
limiting their contracts, or taking other action to avoid providing or continuing
to provide employment-based benefits to which employees are entitled under
state law or employer policies. It is not the intent of the legislature that
this act relate to or affect employment-based benefits subject to the federal
employee retirement income security act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 49.44 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
It is an unfair practice for any employer to:

(a)
Terminate any employee to avoid providing or continuing to provide
employment-based benefits to which the employee would become or is entitled
under any state law or any employer policy;

(b)
Misclassify any employee to avoid providing or continuing to provide
employment-based benefits to which the employee would become or is entitled
under any state law or any employer policy;

(c)
Limit the term of a contract with an employee to avoid providing
employment-based benefits to which the employee would become entitled under any
state law or any employer policy;

(d)
Include any other language in a contract with an employee that requires the
employee to forego employment-based benefits to which the employee would become
or is entitled under any state law or any employer policy; or

(e)
Terminate or in any manner discriminate against an employee because the
employee has filed or communicated to the employer an intent to file an action
alleging a violation of this subsection.

(2)
The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.

(a)
"Employee" means a person who is providing services for compensation
to an employer, unless the person is free from the employer's direction and
control over the performance of work. This definition shall be interpreted
consistent with common law.

(b)
"Employer" means: (i) Any person, firm, corporation, partnership,
business trust, legal representative, or other business entity which engages in
any business, industry, profession, or activity; (ii) any unit of local
government including, but not limited to, a county, city, town, municipal
corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or political subdivision; and (iii)
the state, state institutions, and state agencies. This definition also shall
be interpreted consistent with common law.

(c)
"Employment-based benefits" means any benefits to which an employee
may become or is entitled under any state law or any employer policy.

(3)
Any employee deeming himself or herself terminated or otherwise harmed in
violation of subsection (1) of this section may bring a civil action in a court
of competent jurisdiction. If the employee prevails, he or she shall be
awarded:

(a)
Either six months' wages or treble the actual damages sustained by the employee
as a result of being terminated or otherwise harmed in violation of subsection
(1) of this section, whichever is greater;

(b)
Costs of suit or arbitration; and

(c)
Reasonable attorneys' fees.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act shall be construed liberally for the accomplishment of the purposes
thereof.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. This
act may be known and cited as the employee benefits fairness act of 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7.
Captions used in this act are not any part of the law.

---
END ---