BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT. The legislature finds that,
over the past twenty years, the "contingent work force" has grown in
Washington state. The contingent work force consists of short-term temporary
workers, long-term temporary workers, part-time workers, on-call workers, leased
workers, day laborers, independent contract workers, and others. The
legislature also finds that there has been no comprehensive study of
Washington's contingent work force to learn about its impact on workers,
families, businesses, social services, local economies, and the state economy.
Thus, the legislature intends to establish a joint select committee to study
and make findings and recommendations related to the contingent work force.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. JOINT
SELECT COMMITTEE. A joint select committee on the contingent work force is
established. The joint select committee shall consist of four voting members:
One member from each caucus of the senate, each member being a member of the
senate labor and workforce development committee, appointed by the president of
the senate; and one member from each caucus of the house of representatives,
each member being a member of the house of representatives commerce and labor
committee, appointed by the co-speakers of the house of representatives.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
ADVISORY COMMITTEE. An advisory committee on the contingent work force is also
established. The advisory committee shall consist of nine nonvoting members:
Two members representing labor, appointed jointly by the president of the
senate and the co-speakers of the house of representatives, from a list of
names recommended by a state-wide organization representing a cross-section and
majority of organized labor in the state; two members representing business,
appointed jointly by the president of the senate and the co-speakers of the
house of representatives, from a list of names recommended by a state-wide
organization of employers representing a majority of employers of the state;
one representative of the employment security department; one representative of
the department of labor and industries; one representative of the work force
training and education coordinating board; one representative of the department
of social and health services; and one representative of the office of
financial management.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
STAFF. The joint select committee shall have access to and the assistance of
the labor market and economic analysis branch of the employment security
department and other state agencies as necessary to perform studies, develop
recommendations, and report to the legislature concerning issues related to the
contingent work force. The joint select committee may hire additional staff
with specific technical expertise if such expertise is necessary to carry out
the mandates of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. SCOPE
OF WORK. The joint select committee, in consultation with the advisory
committee, shall study and make findings and recommendations related to the
following aspects of Washington's contingent work force:

(1)
The number of workers, in both the private and the public sectors, that are
part of the contingent work force;

(2)
The demographic profile of the contingent work force;

(3)
The wage and benefit profile of the contingent work force;

(4)
The industrial profile of the contingent work force;

(5)
The geographic profile of the contingent work force;

(6)
The growth rate of the contingent work force;

(7)
The explanations for the growth of the contingent work force;

(8)
The preference for contingent work compared to the preference for noncontingent
work;

(9)
The duration of contingent work compared to the duration of noncontingent work;

(10)
State and federal laws, if any, that provide for a different level of employee
benefits based on the number of hours per week a person works or on the
permanence of his or her employment;

(11)
The extent to which employment-based benefits are based on the number of hours
per week a person works or on the permanence of his or her employment;

(12)
The impact of the growth of the contingent work force on workers, families,
businesses, social services, local economies, and the state economy;

(13)
Legislative proposals, at either the federal or state level, related to the
contingent work force; and

(14)
Other issues identified by the joint select committee.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
FINDINGS AND RECOMMENDATIONS. The joint select committee shall report its
findings and recommendations to the labor and workforce development committee
of the senate and the commerce and labor committee of the house of
representatives by December 1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
EXPIRATION. The joint select committee and the advisory committee expire July
1, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
APPROPRIATION. The sum of . . . . . . dollars, or as
much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the general fund to the
employment security department for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, to
carry out the purposes of this act. Any sum that remains unexpended as of June
30, 2001, is reappropriated from the general fund to the employment security
department for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2002, to carry out the purposes
of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9.
CAPTIONS. Captions used in this act are not any part of the law.

---
END ---