BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 51.32 RCW to read as follows:

The legislature finds that timely decisions on industrial insurance
claims is of the utmost importance in order to avoid hardship on claimants.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, any recoupment for industrial
insurance overpayments to a claimant shall be limited to two months'
overpayment.

---
END ---