BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 48.01 RCW to read as follows:

A person's deoxyribonucleic acid shall not be screened in any
insurance transaction. For purposes of this section, "screened"
means obtaining a person's deoxyribonucleic acid and identifying the sequence
of chemical base pairs. This section must not be interpreted to deny
third-party payment for deoxyribonucleic acid testing.

---
END ---