BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 49.60 RCW to read as follows:

Information obtained from interpreting the sequence of chemical
base pairs in a person's deoxyribonucleic acid by itself shall not be used to
violate the rights of the person afforded in this chapter.

---
END ---