BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that school employees are increasingly being asked to play an
expanding role in protecting children's health. School employees are
increasingly required to administer potent oral medications to students in
schools. Some of these medications are potentially dangerous if improperly
administered. The legislature finds that training in the administration of
oral medications is imperative for any school employee who administers oral
medications to students during the school day.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.210 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Beginning with the 2000-01 school year, and continuing thereafter, any school
employee who is in a position to administer oral medications, or who may be
needed to do so at any time during the school year, and has had no specific
training on the administration of oral medications, must complete a basic core
training prior to administering oral medications.

(2)
The nursing care quality assurance commission shall adopt rules providing for
ongoing training for school employees who administer oral medications.

(3)
Beginning in the 2000-01 school year, each school shall designate at least two
school employees, other than the school nurse, who are responsible for the
administration of oral medications to students. This subsection does not
preclude additional staff being available to provide oral medications, however
no employee may administer oral medications unless properly trained under this
section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---