BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.400 RCW to read as follows:

A one hundred fifty thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid as
a sundry claim to a school employee's estate if the employee is killed in the
course of employment. For the purposes of this section, a school employee is
any classified, certificated, or administrative staff member employed by a
school or school district. The determination of eligibility for the benefit
shall be made consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and
industries. The department of labor and industries shall notify the director
of the department of general administration if a school employee's estate is
determined to be eligible for payment under this section.

---
END ---