BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
79.01.244 and 1979 ex.s. c 109 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

All
state lands hereafter leased for grazing or agricultural purposes shall be open
and available to the public for purposes of hunting and fishing, and for
nonconsumptive wildlife activities, as defined by the department of fish and
wildlife by rule, unless closed to public entry because of fire hazard or
unless the department of natural resources gives prior written approval and the
area is lawfully posted by lessee to prohibit hunting and fishing, and
nonconsumptive wildlife activities, as defined by the department of fish and
wildlife by rule, thereon in order to prevent damage to crops or other land
cover, to improvements on the land, to livestock, to the lessee, or to the general
public, or closure is necessary to avoid undue interference with carrying
forward a departmental or agency program. In the event any such lands are so
posted it shall be unlawful for any person to hunt or fish, or pursue
nonconsumptive wildlife activities, as defined by the department of fish and
wildlife by rule, on any such posted lands.

The
department of natural resources shall insert the provisions of this section in
all grazing and agricultural leases hereafter issued.

Sec.
2. RCW
79.68.050 and 1971 ex.s. c 234 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Multiple
uses additional to and compatible with those basic activities necessary to
fulfill the financial obligations of trust management may include but are not
limited to:

(1)
Recreational areas;

(2)
Recreational trails for both vehicular and nonvehicular uses;

(3)
Special educational or scientific studies;

(4)
Experimental programs by the various public agencies;

(5)
Special events;

(6)
Hunting and fishing and other sports activities;

(7)
Nonconsumptive wildlife activities as defined by the board of natural
resources;

(8)
Maintenance of scenic areas;

(((8)))
(9) Maintenance of historical sites;

(((9)))
(10) Municipal or other public watershed protection;

(((10)))
(11) Greenbelt areas;

(((11)))
(12) Public rights of way;

(((12)))
(13) Other uses or activities by public agencies;

If such additional uses are not compatible with the financial
obligations in the management of trust land they may be permitted only if there
is compensation from such uses satisfying the financial obligations.

---
END ---