BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.24.084 and 1999 c 391 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any person aggrieved by a violation of this chapter shall have a right of
action in superior court and may recover for each violation:

(a)
Against any person who negligently violates a provision of this chapter, one
thousand dollars, or actual damages, whichever is greater, for each violation.

(b)
Against any person who intentionally or recklessly violates a provision of this
chapter, ten thousand dollars, or actual damages, whichever is greater, for
each violation.

(c)
Reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.

(d)
Such other relief, including an injunction, as the court may deem appropriate.

(2)
Any action under this chapter is barred unless the action is commenced within
three years after the cause of action accrues.

(3)
Nothing in this chapter limits the rights of the subject of a test for a
sexually transmitted disease to recover damages or other relief under any other
applicable law.

(4)
Nothing in this chapter may be construed to impose civil liability or criminal
sanction for disclosure of a test result for a sexually transmitted disease in
accordance with any reporting requirement for a diagnosed case of sexually
transmitted disease by the department or the centers for disease control of the
United States public health service.

(5) It is a negligent violation of this chapter to cause an
unauthorized communication of confidential sexually transmitted disease
information by facsimile transmission or otherwise communicating the
information to an unauthorized recipient when the sender knew or had reason to
know the facsimile transmission telephone number or other transmittal
information was incorrect or outdated.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.02.150 and 1991 c 335 s 701 are each amended to read as follows:

A
health care provider shall effect reasonable safeguards for the security of all
health care information it maintains.

Reasonable safeguards shall include affirmative action to delete
outdated and incorrect facsimile transmission or other telephone transmittal
numbers from computer, facsimile, or other data bases. Reasonable safeguards
shall include affirmative actions to assure that health care information
transmitted by computer, facsimile transmission, or other means is properly
received by the authorized recipient.

---
END ---