BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.49.030 and 1991 sp.s. c 16 s 925 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The excise tax imposed under this chapter is due and payable to the department
of licensing or its agents at the time of registration of a vessel. The
department of licensing shall not issue or renew a registration for a vessel
until the tax is paid in full.

(2)
The excise tax collected under this chapter shall be deposited in the general
fund and the local boating law enforcement account. Seventy-five percent
shall be deposited in the general fund. Twenty-five percent shall be deposited
into the local boating law enforcement account, not to exceed two million
dollars in any fiscal year, with any in excess of two million dollars to be
deposited into the general fund.

(((3)
For the 1993‑95 fiscal biennium, the watercraft excise tax revenues
exceeding five million dollars in each fiscal year, but not exceeding six
million dollars, may, subject to appropriation by the legislature, be used for
the purposes specified in RCW 88.12.450.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.49 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The local boating law enforcement account is created in the state treasury.
Into this account shall be placed a portion of all watercraft excise tax
receipts as provided in RCW 82.49.030. On the first day of the months of
January, April, July, and October of each year, the state treasurer shall
distribute the funds in the local boating law enforcement account to each county
based on the number of registered vessels by county of moorage.

(2)
Funds distributed from the local boating law enforcement account shall be
expended by the counties to support the county's boating law enforcement
programs. These funds shall not supplant existing local funds used for boating
safety programs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---