BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 66.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
There shall be a liquor agencies advisory committee created within the board.
The liquor agencies advisory committee consists of two members of the
Washington state liquor control board, two representatives of the liquor
agencies nominated by the Washington association of retail liquor agencies, and
two members from each of the senate and house of representatives commerce
committees. The liquor agencies advisory committee shall elect a chair from
among its members. The committee shall meet at least twice a year, and may
meet as often as is necessary.

(2)
The liquor agencies advisory committee's purpose is to foster communication
between the legislature, the Washington state liquor control board and the
liquor agencies. The liquor agencies advisory committee shall make
recommendations when requested by the legislative commerce committees, or on
its own initiative, about revisions to fee and commission structures.

(3)
The liquor agencies advisory committee shall prepare an annual comprehensive
analysis and evaluation of the liquor agencies fees and commissions. The
liquor agencies advisory committee shall make recommendations for fee and
commission revisions to the legislative commerce committees by December 1st of
every second year beginning in 2000. Fee and commission revision
recommendations may be made more frequently when justified by the annual
analysis and evaluation, and requested by the liquor agencies advisory
committee.

(4) The annual comprehensive analysis and evaluation in subsection
(3) of this section must consider at a minimum unique and significant
financial, legislative, or other relevant developments that may impact fees and
commissions.

---
END ---