BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.46.0233 and 1987 c 4 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
"Fund raising event," as used in this chapter, means a fund raising
event conducted during any seventy-two consecutive hours but exceeding
twenty-four consecutive hours and not more than once in any calendar year or a
fund raising event conducted not more than twice each calendar year for not
more than twenty-four consecutive hours each time by a bona fide charitable or
nonprofit organization as defined in RCW 9.46.0209 other than any agricultural
fair referred to thereunder, upon authorization therefor by the commission,
which the legislature hereby authorizes to issue a license therefor, with or
without fee, permitting the following activities, or any of them, during such
event: Bingo, amusement games, contests of chance, lotteries, and
raffles((: PROVIDED, That)). However: (a) Gross wagers
and bets or revenue generated from participants under subsection (2) of this
section received by the organization less the amount of money paid by the
organization as winnings, or as payment for services or equipment rental
under subsection (2) of this section, and for the purchase cost of prizes
given as winnings do not exceed ten thousand dollars during the total calendar
days of such fund raising event in the calendar year; (b) such activities shall
not include any mechanical gambling or lottery device activated by the
insertion of a coin or by the insertion of any object purchased by any person
taking a chance by gambling in respect to the device; (c) only bona fide
members of the organization who are not paid for such service or persons
licensed or approved by the commission under subsection (2) of this section
shall participate in the management or operation of the activities, and all
income therefrom, after deducting the cost of prizes and other expenses, shall
be devoted solely to the lawful purposes of the organization; and (d) such
organization shall notify the appropriate local law enforcement agency of the
time and place where such activities shall be conducted. The commission shall
require an annual information report setting forth in detail the expenses
incurred and the revenue received relative to the activities permitted.

(2)
Bona fide charitable or nonprofit organizations may hire a person or vendor,
who is licensed or approved by the commission, to organize and conduct a fund
raising event on behalf of the sponsoring organization subject to the following
restrictions:

(a)
The person or vendor may not provide the facility for the event;

(b)
The person or vendor may use paid personnel and may be compensated by a fixed
fee determined prior to the event, but may not share in the proceeds of the
event;

(c)
All wagers must be made with scrip or chips having no cash value. At the end
of the event, participants may be given the opportunity to purchase or
otherwise redeem their scrip or chips for merchandise prizes;

(d)
The value of all purchased prizes must not exceed ten percent of the gross
revenue from the event; and

(e)
Only members and guests of the sponsoring organization may participate in the
event.

(3)
Bona fide charitable or nonprofit organizations holding a license to conduct a
fund raising event may join together to jointly conduct a fund raising event
if:

(a)
Approval to do so is received from the commission; and

(b)
The method of dividing the income and expenditures and the method of recording
and handling of funds are disclosed to the commission in the application for
approval of the joint fund raising event and are approved by the commission.

The
gross wagers and bets or revenue generated from participants under
subsection (2) of this section received by the organizations less the
amount of money paid by the organizations as winnings, or as payment for
services or equipment rental under subsection (2) of this section, and for
the purchase costs of prizes given as winnings may not exceed ten thousand
dollars during the total calendar days of such event. The net receipts each
organization receives shall count against the organization's annual limit
stated in this subsection.

A
joint fund raising event shall count against only the lead organization or
organizations receiving fifty percent or more of the net receipts for the
purposes of the number of such events an organization may conduct each year.

The commission may issue a joint license for a joint fund raising
event and charge a license fee for such license according to a schedule of fees
adopted by the commission which reflects the added cost to the commission of licensing
more than one licensee for the event.

---
END ---