BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. Any
person or entity that either obtains or conveys an individual's
deoxyribonucleic acid for genetic testing purposes that is individually
identifiable or discloses any computerized interpretation of a person's
deoxyribonucleic acid that is individually identifiable without the
individual's written authorization or pursuant to specific federal or state
authority is liable in a civil action and shall pay reasonable attorneys' fees
and costs.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2.
Section 1 of this act constitutes a new chapter in Title 7 RCW.

---
END ---