BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 47.60 RCW to read as follows:

To
prevent potential injury, a safety zone is established around each state ferry
dock. No unauthorized person may enter the area above or below the water
within one hundred fifty feet of a state ferry terminal. The department may
increase the size of this safety zone by rule if required by federal
regulation. A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---