BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the purpose of this chapter to promote cooperative efforts between employees
and the boards of regents or boards of trustees of the four-year institutions
of higher education in the state of Washington by prescribing certain rights
and obligations of the employees and by establishing orderly procedures
governing the relationship between the employees and their employers which
procedures are designed to meet the special requirements and needs of public
employment in higher education.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section
apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Collective bargaining" and "bargaining" means the
performance of the mutual obligation of the representatives of the employer and
the exclusive bargaining representative to meet at reasonable times to bargain
in good faith, subject to section 9 of this act, in an effort to reach
agreement with respect to wages, hours, and other terms and conditions of
employment.

(2)
"Commission" means the public employment relations commission
established under RCW 41.58.010.

(3)
"Confidential employee" means: (a) A person who participates
directly on behalf of an employer in the formulation of labor relations policy,
the preparation for or conduct of collective bargaining, or the administration
of collective bargaining agreements, if the role of the person is not merely
routine or clerical in nature but calls for the consistent exercise of
independent judgment; and (b) a person who assists and acts in a confidential
capacity to a person in (a) of this subsection.

(4)
"Employee" means any employee of an employer, except the chief
executive or administrative officers of the institution of higher education,
confidential employees, supervisors, and employees subject to chapter 41.06 or
41.56 RCW. An individual is not excluded from the coverage of this chapter
solely because the person is both a student within the institution of higher
education and an employee.

(5)
"Employee organization" means any organization, union, association,
agency, committee, council, or group of any kind in which employees participate
and that exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of collective bargaining
with employers.

(6)
"Employer" means the board of regents or board of trustees of each
institution of higher education and includes any officer, board, commission,
council, or other person or body acting on behalf of an employer.

(7)
"Exclusive bargaining representative" means any employee organization
that has been certified or recognized under this chapter as the representative
of the employees in an appropriate collective bargaining unit.

(8)
"Institution of higher education" means the University of Washington,
Washington State University, Western Washington University, Central Washington
University, Eastern Washington University, The Evergreen State College, and any
other public four-year degree-granting institution.

(9)
"Person" means one or more individuals, labor organizations,
partnerships, associations, corporations, employers, or legal representatives.

(10)
"Supervisor" means any employee having authority, in the interest of
an employer, to hire, assign, promote, transfer, lay off, recall, suspend,
discipline, or discharge peers, or to recommend effectively such action, if the
exercise of the authority is not merely routine or clerical in nature but calls
for the consistent exercise of independent judgment. An employee is not
includable as a supervisor solely by reason of his or her membership on a
faculty tenure or other governance committee or body or because of being a
department chair or head. The term "supervisor" includes only those
persons who perform a preponderance of the acts of authority specified in this
subsection.

(11)
"Unfair labor practice" means an unfair labor practice listed in
section 11 of this act.

(12)
"Union security provision" means a provision in a collective
bargaining agreement under which some or all employees in the bargaining unit
may be required, as a condition of continued employment on or after the
thirtieth day following the beginning of such employment or the effective date
of the provision, whichever is later, to become a member of the exclusive
bargaining representative or pay an agency fee established by the exclusive
bargaining representative at an amount not greater than the periodic dues and
initiation fees uniformly required as condition of acquiring or retaining
membership in the exclusive bargaining representative.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
boards of regents and boards of trustees of the institutions of higher
education as defined in section 2 of this act may engage in collective
bargaining with the exclusive bargaining representatives of their employees, as
provided in this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
Employees have the right to self-organization, to form, join, or assist
employee organizations, to bargain collectively through representatives of
their own choosing, and also have the right to refrain from any or all of these
activities except to the extent that employees may be required to make payments
to an exclusive bargaining representative or charitable organization under a
union security provision authorized in this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
Upon the voluntary written authorization of a bargaining unit employee, the
employer shall deduct from the pay of the employee the periodic dues and
initiation fees uniformly required as a condition of acquiring or retaining
membership in the exclusive bargaining representative. The employee
authorization may be irrevocable for up to one year. Such dues and fees shall
be transmitted monthly by the employer to the exclusive bargaining
representative or to the depository designated by the exclusive bargaining
representative.

(2)
A collective bargaining agreement may include union security provisions, but
not a closed shop. The employer shall enforce any union security provision by
monthly deductions from the pay of all bargaining unit employees affected by
the collective bargaining agreement and shall transmit the funds to the
exclusive bargaining representative or to the depository designated by the
exclusive bargaining representative.

(3)
An employee who is covered by a union security provision and who asserts a
right of nonassociation based on bona fide religious tenets or teachings of a church
or religious body of which the employee is a member shall, as a condition of
employment, make alternative payments to a nonreligious charity designated by
agreement of the employee and the exclusive bargaining representative. The
amount of the alternative payment shall be equal to the periodic dues and
initiation fees uniformly required as a condition of acquiring or retaining
membership in the exclusive bargaining representative. The employee shall
furnish written proof that the payments have been made. If the employee and
the exclusive bargaining representative do not reach agreement on the matter,
the dispute shall be submitted to the commission for determination.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. In
any dispute concerning the unit appropriate for collective bargaining or the
allocation of employees or positions to bargaining units, the commission, after
a hearing or hearings, shall determine the dispute, taking into consideration
the duties, skills, and working conditions of the employees, the extent of
organization among the employees, the community of interest among the
employees, the desire of the employees, and the overall management structure of
the employer including the interrelationships of divisions within the
institution. Unnecessary fragmentation shall be avoided.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. (1)
The employee organization that has been designated by the majority of the
employees in an appropriate bargaining unit as their representative for the
purposes of collective bargaining shall be the exclusive bargaining
representative of, and shall be required to represent, all the employees within
the bargaining unit without regard to membership in that employee organization:
PROVIDED, That any employee may at any time present his or her complaints or
concerns to the employer and have such complaints or concerns adjusted without
intervention of the exclusive bargaining representative, as long as the
exclusive bargaining representative has been given an opportunity to be present
at that adjustment and to make its views known, and as long as the adjustment
is not inconsistent with the terms of a collective bargaining agreement then in
effect.

(2)
The commission shall resolve any dispute concerning selection of a bargaining
representative in accordance with the procedures specified in this section.

(a)
No question concerning representation may be raised within one year following a
certification or attempted certification.

(b)
No question concerning representation may be raised within one year following
an election or cross-check in which the employees failed to designate an
exclusive bargaining representative.

(c)
If there is a valid collective bargaining agreement in effect, no question
concerning representation may be raised except during the period not more than
ninety nor less than sixty days before the expiration date of the agreement.
If a valid collective bargaining agreement, together with any renewals or
extensions thereof, has been or will be in existence for more than three years,
then a question concerning representation may be raised not more than ninety
nor less than sixty days before the third anniversary date or any subsequent
anniversary date of the agreement; if the exclusive bargaining representative
is removed as the result of the procedure, the collective bargaining agreement
shall be deemed to be terminated as of the date of the certification or the
anniversary date following the filing of the petition, whichever is later.

(d)
An employee organization seeking certification as exclusive bargaining
representative of a bargaining unit of employees, or bargaining unit employees
seeking decertification of an exclusive bargaining representative, shall make a
confidential showing to the commission of credible evidence demonstrating that
at least thirty percent of the employees in the bargaining unit are in support
of the petition. The petition shall indicate the name, address, and telephone
number of any employee organization known to claim an interest in the
bargaining unit.

(e)
A petition filed by an employer shall be supported by credible evidence
demonstrating the basis on which the employer claims the existence of a
question concerning the representation of its employees.

(f)
Any employee organization that makes a confidential showing to the commission
of credible evidence demonstrating that it has the support of at least ten
percent of the employees in the bargaining unit involved may intervene in
proceedings under this section and have its name listed as a choice on the
ballot in an election conducted by the commission.

(g)
The commission shall determine any question concerning representation by
conducting a secret ballot election among the employees in the bargaining
unit. However, if the commission determines that a serious unfair labor
practice has been committed that interfered with the election process and
precludes the holding of a fair election, the commission may determine the
question concerning representation by conducting a cross-check comparing the
employee organization's membership records or bargaining authorization cards
against the employment records of the employer.

(h)
The representation election ballot shall contain a choice for each employee
organization qualifying under (d) or (f) of this subsection, together with a
choice for no representation. The representation election shall be determined
by the majority of the valid ballots cast. If there are three or more choices
on the ballot and none of the choices receives a majority of the valid ballots
cast, a run-off election shall be conducted between the two choices receiving
the highest and second highest numbers of votes.

(i)
Representation that exists on the effective date of this section shall not be
disturbed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. In
determining whether a person is acting as an agent of another person so as to
make such other person responsible for his or her acts, the question of whether
the specific acts performed were actually authorized or subsequently ratified
shall not be controlling.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. (1)
The commission shall broadly construe the scope of bargaining.

(2)
Services and activities fees as defined in RCW 28B.15.041 shall not be a
subject for bargaining.

(3)
A written contract incorporating any agreements reached shall be executed if
requested by either party.

(4)
The obligation to bargain does not compel either party to agree to a proposal
or to make a concession.

(5)
In the event of a dispute between an employer and an exclusive bargaining
representative over the matters that are terms and conditions of employment,
the commission shall decide which items are mandatory subjects for bargaining.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. (1)
The commission shall adopt rules as necessary and appropriate to administer
this chapter, consistent with the best standards of labor-management relations.

(2)
The rules, precedents, and practices of the national labor relations board, if
consistent with this chapter, shall be considered by the commission in its
interpretation of this chapter, and before the adoption of any commission
rules.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. (1)
It is an unfair labor practice for an employer:

(a)
To interfere with, restrain, or coerce employees in the exercise of the rights
guaranteed by this chapter;

(b)
To dominate or interfere with the formation or administration of any employee
organization or contribute financial or other support to it. An employer may
permit employees to confer with it or its representatives or agents during
working hours without loss of time or pay;

(c)
To encourage or discourage membership in any employee organization by
discrimination in regard to hire, tenure of employment, or any term or
condition of employment, but this subsection does not prevent an employer from
requiring, as a condition of continued employment, payment of the periodic dues
and initiation fees uniformly required to an exclusive bargaining
representative under section 5 of this act;

(d)
To discharge or discriminate otherwise against an employee because the employee
has filed charges or given testimony under this chapter; or

(e)
To refuse to bargain collectively with the exclusive bargaining representative
of its employees.

(2)
It is an unfair labor practice for an employee organization or its agents:

(a)
To restrain or coerce: (i) Employees in the exercise of the rights guaranteed
in section 4 of this act, but this does not impair the right of an employee
organization to prescribe its own rules for the acquisition or retention of
membership in the organization; or (ii) an employer in the selection of its
representatives for the purposes of collective bargaining or the adjustment of
grievances;

(b)
To cause or attempt to cause an employer to discriminate against an employee in
violation of subsection (1)(c) of this section or to discriminate against an
employee with respect to whom membership in such organization has been denied
or terminated on some ground other than the failure of the employee to tender
the periodic dues and initiation fees uniformly required as a condition of
acquiring or retaining membership;

(c)
To discriminate against an employee because that employee has filed charges or
given testimony under this chapter; or

(d)
To refuse to bargain collectively with the employer of employees for whom it is
the exclusive bargaining representative.

(3)
The expression of any views, argument, or opinion, or the dissemination of
those views, argument, or opinion to the public, whether in written, printed,
graphic, or visual form, shall not constitute or be evidence of an unfair labor
practice under this chapter, if the expression contains no threat of reprisal
or force or promise of benefit.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. (1)
The commission may prevent any person from engaging in any unfair labor
practice. This power shall not be affected by any other means of adjustment or
prevention that has been or may be established by agreement, law, equity, or
otherwise.

(2)
A complaint charging unfair labor practices shall be filed within six months
following the act or event complained of or discovery of such act or event complained
of, whichever is later.

(3)
The person or persons named as respondent in a complaint charging unfair labor
practices may file an answer to the complaint and appear in person or otherwise
give testimony at the place and time set by the commission for hearing.

(4)
If the commission determines that a person has engaged in or is engaging in any
unfair labor practice, then the commission shall issue and cause to be served
upon the person an order requiring the person to cease and desist from the
unfair labor practice and to take such affirmative action as will effectuate
the purposes and policy of this chapter, including the reinstatement of
employees with back pay.

(5)
The commission may petition the superior court of the county in which the main
office of the employer is located or where the person who has engaged or is
engaging in the unfair labor practice resides or transacts business, for the
enforcement of its order and for appropriate temporary relief.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. If
any provision of any collective bargaining agreement between the employer and
the exclusive bargaining representative requires legislative implementation or
an appropriation, the employer and the exclusive bargaining representative
shall seek the appropriate legislative action actively and in good faith.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14.
Whenever a collective bargaining agreement between an employer and an exclusive
bargaining representative is concluded after the termination date of the
previous collective bargaining agreement between the employer and an employee
organization representing the same employees, the effective date of the
collective bargaining agreement may be the day after the termination date of
the previous collective bargaining agreement, and all benefits included in the
new collective bargaining agreement, including wage or salary increases, may
accrue beginning with the effective date as established by this subsection.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. (1)
The commission, through the executive director, may offer its mediation
services in any labor dispute involving an employer and an exclusive bargaining
representative, either upon its own motion or upon the request of one or more
of the parties to the dispute, if in its judgment the dispute threatens to
cause a substantial disruption to the public welfare.

(2)
A person designated as a mediator in a labor dispute under this section shall
meet with the representatives of the parties, either jointly or separately, and
shall take other steps as he or she deems appropriate to persuade the parties
to resolve their differences. A mediator does not have power of compulsion.

The
services of the mediator, including any per diem expenses, shall be provided by
the commission without cost to the parties. This section shall not be
construed to prohibit an employer and an exclusive bargaining representative
from agreeing to substitute at their own expense some other mediator or
mediation procedure.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. An
employer and an exclusive bargaining representative who enter into a collective
bargaining agreement shall include in the agreement procedures for binding
arbitration of the disputes arising about the interpretation or application of
the agreement.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17.
Except as otherwise expressly provided in this chapter, nothing in this chapter
may be construed to annul, modify, or preclude the renewal or continuation of
any lawful agreement entered into before the effective date of this section
between an employer and an employee organization covering wages, hours, and
terms and conditions of employment. If there is a conflict between any
collective bargaining agreement and any resolution, rule, policy, or regulation
of the employer or its agents, the terms of the collective bargaining agreement
shall prevail.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18.
Except as otherwise expressly provided in this chapter, this chapter does not
deny or otherwise abridge any rights, privileges, or benefits granted by law to
employees.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19. This
chapter does not interfere with the responsibilities and rights of the employer
as specified by federal and state law, including the employer's
responsibilities to students, the public, and other constituent elements of the
institution of higher education.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 20.
Sections 1 through 19 and 22 of this act shall constitute a new chapter in
Title 41 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 21. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22. This
act takes effect October 1, 2000. The public employment relations commission
may immediately take such steps as are necessary to insure that this act is
implemented on its effective date.

---
END ---