BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
purpose of this act is to establish a common small works roster procedure that
state agencies and local governments may use to award contracts for
construction, building, renovation, remodeling, alteration, repair, or
improvement of real property.

PART I - COMMON
SMALL WORKS ROSTER PROCEDURE

Sec.
101. RCW
39.04.155 and 1998 c 278 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
This section provides ((a)) uniform ((process)) small works
roster provisions to award contracts for ((public works projects by
those municipalities that are authorized to use a small works roster in lieu of
the requirements for formal sealed bidding. The state statutes governing a
specific type of municipality shall establish the maximum dollar thresholds of
the contracts that can be awarded under this process, and may include other
matters concerning the small works roster process, for the municipality)) construction,
building, renovation, remodeling, alteration, repair, or improvement of real
property that may be used by state agencies and by any local government that is
expressly authorized to use these provisions. These provisions may be used in
lieu of other procedures to award contracts for such work with an estimated
cost of two hundred thousand dollars or less.

(2)
((Such municipalities)) A state agency or authorized local government
may create a single general small works roster, or may create a small works
roster for different specialties or categories of anticipated work. Where
applicable, small works rosters may make distinctions between contractors based
upon different geographic areas served by the contractor. The small works
roster or rosters shall consist of all responsible contractors who have
requested to be on the list, and where required by law are properly licensed or
registered to perform such work in this state. A state agency or local
government establishing a small works roster or rosters may require eligible
contractors desiring to be placed on a roster or rosters to keep current
records of any applicable licenses, certifications, registrations, bonding,
insurance, or other appropriate matters on file with the state agency or local
government as a condition of being placed on a roster or rosters. At least
((twice)) once a year, the ((municipality)) state
agency or local government shall publish in a newspaper of general
circulation within the jurisdiction a notice of the existence of the roster or
rosters and solicit the names of contractors for such roster or rosters. In
addition, responsible contractors shall be added to an appropriate roster or
rosters at any time they submit a written request and necessary records.
Master contracts may be required to be signed that become effective when a
specific award is made using a small works roster.

((The
governing body of the municipality shall establish a)) (3) A state
agency establishing a small works roster or rosters shall adopt rules
implementing this section. A local government establishing a small works
roster or rosters shall adopt an ordinance or resolution implementing this
section. Procedures included in rules adopted by the department of general
administration in implementing this section must be included in any rules
providing for a small works roster or rosters that is adopted by another state
agency, if the authority for that state agency to engage in these activities
has been delegated to it by the department of general administration under
chapter 43.19 RCW. An interlocal contract or agreement between two or more
state agencies or local governments establishing a small works roster or
rosters to be used by the parties to the agreement or contract must clearly
identify the lead entity that is responsible for implementing the provisions of
this section.

(4)
Procedures shall be established for securing telephone ((or)),
written, or electronic quotations from ((the)) contractors on the
((general)) appropriate small works roster((, or a specific
small works roster for the appropriate category of work,)) to assure that a
competitive price is established and to award contracts to the lowest
responsible bidder, as defined in RCW 43.19.1911. ((Such)) Invitations
for quotations shall include an estimate of the scope and nature of the work to
be performed as well as materials and equipment to be furnished. However,
detailed plans and specifications need not be included in the invitation. This
section does not eliminate other requirements for architectural or engineering
approvals as to quality and compliance with building codes. ((Whenever
possible at least five contractors shall be invited to submit bids. Once a
contractor has been afforded an opportunity to submit a proposal, that
contractor shall not be offered another opportunity until all other appropriate
contractors on the small works roster have been afforded an opportunity to
submit a proposal on a contract. Proposals)) Quotations may be
invited from all appropriate contractors on the appropriate small works
roster. As an alternative, quotations may be invited from at least five
contractors on the appropriate small works roster who have indicated the
capability of performing the kind of work being contracted, in a manner that
will equitably distribute the opportunity among the contractors on the
appropriate roster. However, if the estimated cost of the work is from one
hundred thousand dollars to two hundred thousand dollars, a state agency or
local government, other than a port district, that chooses to solicit bids from
less than all the appropriate contractors on the appropriate small works roster
must also notify the remaining contractors on the appropriate small works
roster that quotations on the work are being sought. The government has the
sole option of determining whether this notice to the remaining contractors is
made by: (a) Publishing notice in a legal newspaper in general circulation in
the area where the work is to be done; (b) mailing a notice to these
contractors; or (c) sending a notice to these contractors by facsimile or other
electronic means. For purposes of this subsection, "equitably
distribute" means that a state agency or local government soliciting bids may
not favor certain contractors on the appropriate small works roster over other
contractors on the appropriate small works roster who perform similar services.

(5)
A contract awarded from a small works roster under this section need not be
advertised.

(6)
Immediately after an award is made, the bid quotations obtained shall be
recorded, open to public inspection, and available by telephone inquiry.

(7)
The breaking of any project into units or accomplishing any projects by phases
is prohibited if it is done for the purpose of avoiding the maximum dollar
amount of a contract that may be let using the small works roster process.

(8)
As used in this section, "state agency" means the department of
general administration, the state parks and recreation commission, the
department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife, the
department of transportation, any institution of higher education as defined
under RCW 28B.10.016, and any other state agency delegated authority by the
department of general administration to engage in construction, building,
renovation, remodeling, alteration, improvement, or repair activities.

Sec.
102. RCW
39.04.010 and 1997 c 220 s 402 are each amended to read as follows:

The
term state shall include the state of Washington and all departments,
supervisors, commissioners and agencies thereof.

The
term municipality shall include every city, county, town, district or other
public agency thereof which is authorized by law to require the execution of
public work, except drainage districts, diking districts, diking and drainage
improvement districts, drainage improvement districts, diking improvement
districts, consolidated diking and drainage improvement districts, consolidated
drainage improvement districts, consolidated diking improvement districts,
irrigation districts or any such other districts as shall from time to time be
authorized by law for the reclamation or development of waste or undeveloped
lands.

The
term public work shall include all work, construction, alteration, repair, or
improvement other than ordinary maintenance, executed at the cost of the state
or of any municipality, or which is by law a lien or charge on any property
therein. All public works, including maintenance when performed by contract
shall comply with the provisions of RCW 39.12.020. The term does not include
work, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement performed under
contracts entered into under RCW 36.102.060(4) or under development agreements
entered into under RCW 36.102.060(7) or leases entered into under RCW
36.102.060(8).

The
term contract shall mean a contract in writing for the execution of public work
for a fixed or determinable amount duly awarded after advertisement and
competitive bid. However, a contract which is awarded from a small works
roster ((under the authority of RCW 39.04.150, 35.22.620, 28B.10.355,
35.82.075, and 57.08.050)) need not be advertised.

Sec.
103. RCW
39.04.200 and 1993 c 198 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
((municipality that utilizes the small works roster process established in
RCW 39.04.155 to award contracts for public works projects, or)) local
government using the uniform process established in RCW 39.04.190 to award
contracts for purchases((,)) must post a list of the contracts awarded
under ((RCW 39.04.155 and 39.04.190)) that process at least once
every two months. Any state agency or local government using the small
works roster process established in RCW 39.04.155 to award contracts for
construction, building, renovation, remodeling, alteration, repair, or
improvement of real property must make available a list of the contracts
awarded under that process at least once every year. The list shall
contain the name of the contractor or vendor awarded the contract, the amount
of the contract, a brief description of the type of work performed or items
purchased under the contract, and the date it was awarded. The list shall also
state the location where the bid quotations for these contracts are available
for public inspection.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 104. A
new section is added to chapter 39.04 RCW to read as follows:

The
department of community, trade, and economic development, in cooperation with
the municipal research and services center, shall prepare a small works roster
manual and periodically notify the different types of local government
authorized to use a small works roster process about this authority.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 105. A
new section is added to chapter 39.04 RCW to read as follows:

The
department of community development, in cooperation with the municipal research
and services center, shall prepare a small works roster manual and periodically
notify the different types of local government authorized to use a small works
roster process about this authority.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 106. A
report on the use of the small works roster shall be made to the independent
oversight committee established under RCW 39.10.110 prior to the 2003
legislative session.

PART II - REFERENCES
TO SMALL WORKS ROSTER PROCEDURE

Sec.
201. RCW
28A.335.190 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 10 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
When, in the opinion of the board of directors of any school district, the cost
of any furniture, supplies, equipment, building, improvements, or repairs, or
other work or purchases, except books, will equal or exceed the sum of fifty
thousand dollars, complete plans and specifications for such work or purchases
shall be prepared and notice by publication given in at least one newspaper of
general circulation within the district, once each week for two consecutive
weeks, of the intention to receive bids therefor and that specifications and
other information may be examined at the office of the board or any other
officially designated location: PROVIDED, That the board without giving such
notice may make improvements or repairs to the property of the district through
the shop and repair department of such district when the total of such
improvements or repair does not exceed the sum of (a) fifteen thousand dollars,
for districts with fifteen thousand five hundred or more full-time equivalent
students; or (b) for districts with fewer than fifteen thousand five hundred
full-time equivalent students, fifteen thousand dollars if more than one craft
or trade is involved with the school district improvement or repair, or ten
thousand dollars if a single craft or trade is involved with the school
district improvement or repair. The cost of any public work, improvement or
repair for the purposes of this section shall be the aggregate of all amounts
to be paid for labor, material, and equipment on one continuous or interrelated
project where work is to be performed simultaneously or in close sequence. The
bids shall be in writing and shall be opened and read in public on the date and
in the place named in the notice and after being opened shall be filed for
public inspection.

(2)
Every purchase of furniture, equipment or supplies, except books, the cost of
which is estimated to be in excess of fifteen thousand dollars, shall be on a
competitive basis. The board of directors shall establish a procedure for
securing telephone and/or written quotations for such purchases. Whenever the
estimated cost is from fifteen thousand dollars up to fifty thousand dollars,
the procedure shall require quotations from at least three different sources to
be obtained in writing or by telephone, and recorded for public perusal.
Whenever the estimated cost is in excess of fifty thousand dollars, the public
bidding process provided in subsection (1) of this section shall be followed.

(3)
Every building, improvement, repair or other public works project, the cost of
which is estimated to be in excess of (a) fifteen thousand dollars, for
districts with fifteen thousand five hundred or more full-time equivalent
students; or (b) for districts with fewer than fifteen thousand five hundred
full-time equivalent students, fifteen thousand dollars if more than one craft
or trade is involved with the school district improvement or repair, or ten
thousand dollars if a single craft or trade is involved with the school
district improvement or repair, shall be on a competitive bid process. ((All
such projects estimated to be less than fifty thousand dollars may be awarded
to a contractor on the small works roster. The small works roster shall be
comprised of all responsible contractors who have requested to be on the list.
The board of directors shall establish a procedure for securing telephone
and/or written quotations from the contractors on the small works roster to
assure establishment of a competitive price and for awarding contracts to the
lowest responsible bidder. Such procedure shall require that a good faith
effort be made to request quotations from all contractors on the small works
roster who have indicated the capability of performing the kind of public works
being contracted. Immediately after an award is made, the bid quotations
obtained shall be recorded, open to public inspection, and available by
telephone inquiry. The small works roster shall be revised at least once each
year by publishing notice of such opportunity in at least one newspaper of
general circulation in the district. Responsible contractors shall be added to
the list at any time they submit a written request.)) Whenever the estimated
cost of a public works project is fifty thousand dollars or more, the public
bidding process provided in subsection (1) of this section shall be followed unless
the contract is let using the small works roster process in RCW 39.04.155 or
under any other procedure authorized for school districts. One or more school
districts may authorize an educational service district to establish and
operate a small works roster for the school district under the provisions of
RCW 39.04.155.

(4)
The contract for the work or purchase shall be awarded to the lowest
responsible bidder as defined in RCW 43.19.1911 but the board may by resolution
reject any and all bids and make further calls for bids in the same manner as
the original call. On any work or purchase the board shall provide bidding
information to any qualified bidder or the bidder's agent, requesting it in
person.

(5)
In the event of any emergency when the public interest or property of the
district would suffer material injury or damage by delay, upon resolution of
the board declaring the existence of such an emergency and reciting the facts
constituting the same, the board may waive the requirements of this section
with reference to any purchase or contract: PROVIDED, That an
"emergency", for the purposes of this section, means a condition
likely to result in immediate physical injury to persons or to property of the
school district in the absence of prompt remedial action.

(6)
This section does not apply to the direct purchase of school buses by school districts
and educational services in accordance with RCW 28A.160.195.

Sec.
202. RCW
28B.10.350 and 1993 c 379 s 109 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
When the cost to The Evergreen State College, any regional university, or state
university, of any building, construction, renovation, remodeling, or
demolition other than maintenance or repairs will equal or exceed the sum of
twenty-five thousand dollars, complete plans and specifications for such work
shall be prepared and such work shall be put out for public bids and the
contract shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder if in accordance
with the bid specifications: PROVIDED, That when the estimated cost of such
building, construction, renovation, remodeling, or demolition equals or exceeds
the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars, such project shall be deemed a public
works and "the prevailing rate of wage," under chapter 39.12 RCW
shall be applicable thereto: PROVIDED FURTHER, That when such building,
construction, renovation, remodeling, or demolition involves one trade or craft
area and the estimated cost exceeds ten thousand dollars, complete plans and
specifications for such work shall be prepared and such work shall be put out
for public bids, and the contract shall be awarded to the lowest responsible
bidder if in accordance with the bid specifications. This subsection shall not
apply when a contract is awarded by the small works roster procedure
authorized in RCW ((28B.10.355)) 39.04.155 or under any other
procedure authorized for an institution of higher education.

(2)
The Evergreen State College, any regional university, or state university may
require a project to be put to public bid even when it is not required to do so
under subsection (1) of this section.

(3)
Where the estimated cost to The Evergreen State College, any regional
university, or state university of any building, construction, renovation,
remodeling, or demolition is less than twenty-five thousand dollars or the
contract is awarded by the small works roster procedure authorized in
RCW ((28B.10.355)) 39.04.155, the publication requirements of RCW
39.04.020 shall be inapplicable.

(4)
In the event of any emergency when the public interest or property of The
Evergreen State College, regional university, or state university would suffer
material injury or damage by delay, the president of such college or university
may declare the existence of such an emergency and reciting the facts
constituting the same may waive the requirements of this section with reference
to any contract in order to correct the condition causing the emergency:
PROVIDED, That an "emergency," for the purposes of this section,
means a condition likely to result in immediate physical injury to persons or
to property of such college or university in the absence of prompt remedial
action or a condition which immediately impairs the institution's ability to
perform its educational obligations.

Sec.
203. RCW
35.22.620 and 1998 c 278 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
As used in this section, the term "public works" means as defined in
RCW 39.04.010.

(2)
A first class city may have public works performed by contract pursuant to
public notice and call for competitive bids. As limited by subsection (3) of
this section, a first class city may have public works performed by city
employees in any annual or biennial budget period equal to a dollar value not
exceeding ten percent of the public works construction budget, including any
amount in a supplemental public works construction budget, over the budget
period. The amount of public works that a first class city has a county
perform for it under RCW 35.77.020 shall be included within this ten percent
limitation.

If
a first class city has public works performed by public employees in any budget
period that are in excess of this ten percent limitation, the amount in excess
of the permitted amount shall be reduced from the otherwise permitted amount of
public works that may be performed by public employees for that city in its
next budget period. Twenty percent of the motor vehicle fuel tax distributions
to that city shall be withheld if two years after the year in which the excess
amount of work occurred, the city has failed to so reduce the amount of public
works that it has performed by public employees. The amount so withheld shall
be distributed to the city when it has demonstrated in its reports to the state
auditor that the amount of public works it has performed by public employees has
been so reduced.

Whenever
a first class city has had public works performed in any budget period up to
the maximum permitted amount for that budget period, all remaining public works
within that budget period shall be done by contract pursuant to public notice
and call for competitive bids.

The
state auditor shall report to the state treasurer any first class city that
exceeds this amount and the extent to which the city has or has not reduced the
amount of public works it has performed by public employees in subsequent
years.

(3)
In addition to the percentage limitation provided in subsection (2) of this
section, a first class city with a population in excess of one hundred fifty
thousand shall not have public employees perform a public works project in
excess of fifty thousand dollars if more than a single craft or trade is
involved with the public works project, or a public works project in excess of
twenty-five thousand dollars if only a single craft or trade is involved with
the public works project or the public works project is street signalization or
street lighting. In addition to the percentage limitation provided in
subsection (2) of this section, a first class city with a population of one
hundred fifty thousand or less shall not have public employees perform a public
works project in excess of thirty-five thousand dollars if more than one craft
or trade is involved with the public works project, or a public works project
in excess of twenty thousand dollars if only a single craft or trade is
involved with the public works project or the public works project is street
signalization or street lighting. A public works project means a complete
project. The restrictions in this subsection do not permit the division of the
project into units of work or classes of work to avoid the restriction on work
that may be performed by day labor on a single project.

(4)
In addition to the accounting and record-keeping requirements contained in RCW
39.04.070, every first class city annually shall prepare a report for the state
auditor indicating the total public works construction budget and supplemental
public works construction budget for that year, the total construction costs of
public works performed by public employees for that year, and the amount of
public works that is performed by public employees above or below ten percent
of the total construction budget. However, if a city budgets on a biennial
basis, this annual report shall indicate the amount of public works that is
performed by public employees within the current biennial period that is above
or below ten percent of the total biennial construction budget.

((After
September 1, 1987,)) Each first class city with a population of one
hundred fifty thousand or less shall use the form required by RCW 43.09.205 to
account and record costs of public works in excess of five thousand dollars
that are not let by contract.

(5)
The cost of a separate public works project shall be the costs of materials,
supplies, equipment, and labor on the construction of that project. The value
of the public works budget shall be the value of all the separate public works
projects within the budget.

(6)
The competitive bidding requirements of this section may be waived by the city
legislative authority pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption contained
within that section applies to the work or contract.

(7)
In lieu of the procedures of subsections (2) and (6) of this section, a first
class city may ((use)) let contracts using the small works roster
process in RCW 39.04.155 ((to award contracts for public works projects with
an estimated value of one hundred thousand dollars or less)).

Whenever
possible, the city shall invite at least one proposal from a minority or woman
contractor who shall otherwise qualify under this section.

(8)
The allocation of public works projects to be performed by city employees shall
not be subject to a collective bargaining agreement.

(9)
This section does not apply to performance-based contracts, as defined in RCW
39.35A.020(3), that are negotiated under chapter 39.35A RCW.

(10)
Nothing in this section shall prohibit any first class city from allowing for
preferential purchase of products made from recycled materials or products that
may be recycled or reused.

Sec.
204. RCW
35.23.352 and 1998 c 278 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any second class city or any town may construct any public works, as defined in
RCW 39.04.010, by contract or day labor without calling for bids therefor
whenever the estimated cost of the work or improvement, including cost of
materials, supplies and equipment will not exceed the sum of thirty thousand
dollars if more than one craft or trade is involved with the public works, or
twenty thousand dollars if a single craft or trade is involved with the public
works or the public works project is street signalization or street lighting.
A public works project means a complete project. The restrictions in this
subsection do not permit the division of the project into units of work or
classes of work to avoid the restriction on work that may be performed by day
labor on a single project.

Whenever
the cost of the public work or improvement, including materials, supplies and
equipment, will exceed these figures, the same shall be done by contract. All
such contracts shall be let at public bidding upon publication of notice
calling for sealed bids upon the work. The notice shall be published in the
official newspaper, or a newspaper of general circulation most likely to bring
responsive bids, at least thirteen days prior to the last date upon which bids
will be received. The notice shall generally state the nature of the work to
be done that plans and specifications therefor shall then be on file in the
city or town hall for public inspections, and require that bids be sealed and
filed with the council or commission within the time specified therein. Each
bid shall be accompanied by a bid proposal deposit in the form of a cashier's
check, postal money order, or surety bond to the council or commission for a
sum of not less than five percent of the amount of the bid, and no bid shall be
considered unless accompanied by such bid proposal deposit. The council or
commission of the city or town shall let the contract to the lowest responsible
bidder or shall have power by resolution to reject any or all bids and to make
further calls for bids in the same manner as the original call.

When
the contract is let then all bid proposal deposits shall be returned to the
bidders except that of the successful bidder which shall be retained until a
contract is entered into and a bond to perform the work furnished, with surety
satisfactory to the council or commission, in accordance with RCW 39.08.030.
If the bidder fails to enter into the contract in accordance with his or her
bid and furnish a bond within ten days from the date at which he or she is
notified that he or she is the successful bidder, the check or postal money
order and the amount thereof shall be forfeited to the council or commission or
the council or commission shall recover the amount of the surety bond. A low
bidder who claims error and fails to enter into a contract is prohibited from
bidding on the same project if a second or subsequent call for bids is made for
the project.

If
no bid is received on the first call the council or commission may readvertise
and make a second call, or may enter into a contract without any further call
or may purchase the supplies, material or equipment and perform the work or
improvement by day labor.

(2)
The allocation of public works projects to be performed by city or town
employees shall not be subject to a collective bargaining agreement.

(3)
In lieu of the procedures of subsection (1) of this section, a second class
city or a town may ((use)) let contracts using the small works
roster process provided in RCW 39.04.155 ((to award public works contracts
with an estimated value of one hundred thousand dollars or less)).

Whenever
possible, the city or town shall invite at least one proposal from a minority
or woman contractor who shall otherwise qualify under this section.

(4)
The form required by RCW 43.09.205 shall be to account and record costs of
public works in excess of five thousand dollars that are not let by contract.

(5)
The cost of a separate public works project shall be the costs of the
materials, equipment, supplies, and labor on that construction project.

(6)
Any purchase of supplies, material, or equipment, except for public work or
improvement, where the cost thereof exceeds seven thousand five hundred dollars
shall be made upon call for bids.

(7)
Bids shall be called annually and at a time and in the manner prescribed by
ordinance for the publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the city
or town of all notices or newspaper publications required by law. The contract
shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder.

(8)
For advertisement and formal sealed bidding to be dispensed with as to
purchases with an estimated value of fifteen thousand dollars or less, the
council or commission must authorize by resolution, use of the uniform
procedure provided in RCW 39.04.190.

(9)
The city or town legislative authority may waive the competitive bidding
requirements of this section pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption
contained within that section applies to the purchase or public work.

(10)
This section does not apply to performance-based contracts, as defined in RCW
39.35A.020(3), that are negotiated under chapter 39.35A RCW.

(11)
Nothing in this section shall prohibit any second class city or any town from
allowing for preferential purchase of products made from recycled materials or
products that may be recycled or reused.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 205. A
new section is added to chapter 35.82 RCW to read as follows:

A
housing authority may establish and use a small works roster for awarding
contracts under RCW 39.04.155.

Sec.
206. RCW
36.32.235 and 1997 c 220 s 401 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In each county with a population of one million or more which by resolution
establishes a county purchasing department, the purchasing department shall
enter into leases of personal property on a competitive basis and purchase all
supplies, materials, and equipment on a competitive basis, for all departments
of the county, as provided in this chapter and chapter 39.04 RCW, except that
the county purchasing department is not required to make purchases that are
paid from the county road fund or equipment rental and revolving fund.

(2)
As used in this section, "public works" has the same definition as in
RCW 39.04.010.

(3)
Except as otherwise specified in this chapter or in chapter 36.77 RCW, all
counties subject to these provisions shall contract on a competitive basis for
all public works after bids have been submitted to the county upon
specifications therefor. Such specifications shall be in writing and shall be
filed with the clerk of the county legislative authority for public inspection.

(4)
An advertisement shall be published in the county official newspaper stating
the time and place where bids will be opened, the time after which bids will
not be received, the character of the work to be done, the materials and
equipment to be furnished, and that specifications therefor may be seen at the
office of the clerk of the county legislative authority. An advertisement
shall also be published in a legal newspaper of general circulation in or as
near as possible to that part of the county in which such work is to be done.
If the county official newspaper is a newspaper of general circulation covering
at least forty percent of the residences in that part of the county in which
such public works are to be done, then the publication of an advertisement of
the applicable specifications in the county official newspaper is sufficient.
Such advertisements shall be published at least once at least thirteen days
prior to the last date upon which bids will be received.

(5)
The bids shall be in writing, shall be filed with the clerk, shall be opened
and read in public at the time and place named therefor in the advertisements,
and after being opened, shall be filed for public inspection. No bid may be
considered for public work unless it is accompanied by a bid deposit in the
form of a surety bond, postal money order, cash, cashier's check, or certified
check in an amount equal to five percent of the amount of the bid proposed.

(6)
The contract for the public work shall be awarded to the lowest responsible
bidder. Any or all bids may be rejected for good cause. The county
legislative authority shall require from the successful bidder for such public
work a contractor's bond in the amount and with the conditions imposed by law.

(7)
If the bidder to whom the contract is awarded fails to enter into the contract
and furnish the contractor's bond as required within ten days after notice of
the award, exclusive of the day of notice, the amount of the bid deposit shall
be forfeited to the county and the contract awarded to the next lowest and best
bidder. The bid deposit of all unsuccessful bidders shall be returned after
the contract is awarded and the required contractor's bond given by the
successful bidder is accepted by the county legislative authority. Immediately
after the award is made, the bid quotations obtained shall be recorded and open
to public inspection and shall be available by telephone inquiry.

(8)
As limited by subsection (10) of this section, a county subject to these
provisions may have public works performed by county employees in any annual or
biennial budget period equal to a dollar value not exceeding ten percent of the
public works construction budget, including any amount in a supplemental public
works construction budget, over the budget period.

Whenever
a county subject to these provisions has had public works performed in any
budget period up to the maximum permitted amount for that budget period, all
remaining public works except emergency work under subsection (12) of this
section within that budget period shall be done by contract pursuant to public
notice and call for competitive bids as specified in subsection (3) of this
section. The state auditor shall report to the state treasurer any county
subject to these provisions that exceeds this amount and the extent to which
the county has or has not reduced the amount of public works it has performed
by public employees in subsequent years.

(9)
If a county subject to these provisions has public works performed by public
employees in any budget period that are in excess of this ten percent
limitation, the amount in excess of the permitted amount shall be reduced from
the otherwise permitted amount of public works that may be performed by public
employees for that county in its next budget period. Ten percent of the motor
vehicle fuel tax distributions to that county shall be withheld if two years
after the year in which the excess amount of work occurred, the county has
failed to so reduce the amount of public works that it has performed by public
employees. The amount withheld shall be distributed to the county when it has
demonstrated in its reports to the state auditor that the amount of public
works it has performed by public employees has been reduced as required.

(10)
In addition to the percentage limitation provided in subsection (8) of this
section, counties subject to these provisions containing a population of one
million or more shall not have public employees perform a public works project
in excess of seventy thousand dollars if more than a single craft or trade is
involved with the public works project, or a public works project in excess of
twenty-five thousand dollars if only a single craft or trade is involved with
the public works project. A public works project means a complete project.
The restrictions in this subsection do not permit the division of the project
into units of work or classes of work to avoid the restriction on work that may
be performed by public employees on a single project.

The
cost of a separate public works project shall be the costs of materials,
supplies, equipment, and labor on the construction of that project. The value
of the public works budget shall be the value of all the separate public works
projects within the budget.

(11)
In addition to the accounting and recordkeeping requirements contained in
chapter 39.04 RCW, any county which uses public employees to perform public
works projects under RCW 36.32.240(1) shall prepare a year-end report to be
submitted to the state auditor indicating the total dollar amount of the county's
public works construction budget and the total dollar amount for public works
projects performed by public employees for that year.

The
year-end report submitted pursuant to this subsection to the state auditor
shall be in accordance with the standard form required by RCW 43.09.205.

(12)
Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, counties may use public
employees without any limitation for emergency work performed under an
emergency declared pursuant to RCW 36.32.270, and any such emergency work shall
not be subject to the limitations of this section. Publication of the
description and estimate of costs relating to correcting the emergency may be
made within seven days after the commencement of the work. Within two weeks of
the finding that such an emergency existed, the county legislative authority
shall adopt a resolution certifying the damage to public facilities and costs
incurred or anticipated relating to correcting the emergency. Additionally
this section shall not apply to architectural and engineering or other
technical or professional services performed by public employees in connection
with a public works project.

(13)
In lieu of the procedures of subsections (3) through (11) of this section, a
county may ((use a)) let contracts using the small works roster
process ((and award contracts for public works projects with an estimated
value of ten thousand dollars up to one hundred thousand dollars as))
provided in RCW 39.04.155.

Whenever
possible, the county shall invite at least one proposal from a minority or
woman contractor who shall otherwise qualify under this section.

(14)
The allocation of public works projects to be performed by county employees
shall not be subject to a collective bargaining agreement.

(15)
This section does not apply to performance-based contracts, as defined in RCW
39.35A.020(3), that are negotiated under chapter 39.35A RCW.

(16)
Nothing in this section prohibits any county from allowing for preferential
purchase of products made from recycled materials or products that may be
recycled or reused.

(17)
This section does not apply to contracts between the public stadium authority
and a team affiliate under RCW 36.102.060(4), or development agreements between
the public stadium authority and a team affiliate under RCW 36.102.060(7) or
leases entered into under RCW 36.102.060(8).

Sec.
207. RCW
36.32.250 and 1996 c 18 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

No
contract for public works may be entered into by the county legislative
authority or by any elected or appointed officer of the county until after bids
have been submitted to the county upon specifications therefor. Such
specifications shall be in writing and shall be filed with the clerk of the
county legislative authority for public inspection. An advertisement shall be
published in the county official newspaper stating the time and place where
bids will be opened, the time after which bids will not be received, the character
of the work to be done, the materials and equipment to be furnished, and that
specifications therefor may be seen at the office of the clerk of the county
legislative authority. An advertisement shall also be published in a legal
newspaper of general circulation in or as near as possible to that part of the
county in which such work is to be done. If the county official newspaper is a
newspaper of general circulation covering at least forty percent of the
residences in that part of the county in which such public works are to be
done, then the publication of an advertisement of the applicable specifications
in the county official newspaper shall be sufficient. Such advertisements
shall be published at least once at least thirteen days prior to the last date
upon which bids will be received. The bids shall be in writing, shall be filed
with the clerk, shall be opened and read in public at the time and place named
therefor in the advertisements, and after being opened, shall be filed for
public inspection. No bid may be considered for public work unless it is
accompanied by a bid deposit in the form of a surety bond, postal money order,
cash, cashier's check, or certified check in an amount equal to five percent of
the amount of the bid proposed. The contract for the public work shall be
awarded to the lowest responsible bidder. Any or all bids may be rejected for
good cause. The county legislative authority shall require from the successful
bidder for such public work a contractor's bond in the amount and with the
conditions imposed by law. If the bidder to whom the contract is awarded fails
to enter into the contract and furnish the contractor's bond as required within
ten days after notice of the award, exclusive of the day of notice, the amount
of the bid deposit shall be forfeited to the county and the contract awarded to
the next lowest and best bidder. A low bidder who claims error and fails to
enter into a contract is prohibited from bidding on the same project if a
second or subsequent call for bids is made for the project. The bid deposit of
all unsuccessful bidders shall be returned after the contract is awarded and
the required contractor's bond given by the successful bidder is accepted by
the county legislative authority. In the letting of any contract for public
works involving less than ten thousand dollars, advertisement and competitive
bidding may be dispensed with on order of the county legislative authority.
Immediately after the award is made, the bid quotations obtained shall be
recorded and open to public inspection and shall be available by telephone
inquiry.

((For
advertisement and competitive bidding to be dispensed with as to public works
projects with an estimated value of ten thousand dollars up to one hundred
thousand dollars, a county must use a small works roster process as provided in
RCW 39.04.155.))

As
an alternative to requirements under this section, a county may let contracts
using the small works roster process under RCW 39.04.155.

This
section does not apply to performance‑based contracts, as defined in RCW
39.35A.020(3), that are negotiated under chapter 39.35A RCW.

Sec.
208. RCW
36.77.075 and 1991 c 363 s 81 are each amended to read as follows:

In
lieu of the procedure for awarding contracts that is provided in RCW 36.77.020
through 36.77.040, a county may award contracts for public works projects on
county roads ((with an estimated value of one hundred thousand dollars or
less using a small works roster process as provided in)) using the small
works roster process under RCW 39.04.155.

Sec.
209. RCW
52.14.110 and 1998 c 278 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Insofar
as practicable, purchases and any public works by the district shall be based
on competitive bids. A formal sealed bid procedure shall be used as standard
procedure for purchases and contracts for purchases executed by the board of
commissioners. Formal sealed bidding shall not be required for:

(1)
The purchase of any materials, supplies, or equipment if the cost will not
exceed the sum of four thousand five hundred dollars. However, whenever the
estimated cost does not exceed ten thousand dollars, the commissioners may by
resolution use the process provided in RCW 39.04.190 to award contracts;

(2)
Contracting for work to be done involving the construction or improvement of a
fire station or other buildings where the estimated cost will not exceed the
sum of two thousand five hundred dollars, which includes the costs of labor,
material, and equipment((. However, whenever the estimated cost does not
exceed ten thousand dollars, the commissioner may by resolution use the small
works roster process provided in));

(3)
Contracts using the small works roster process under RCW 39.04.155; and

(((3)))
(4) Any contract for purchases or public work pursuant to RCW 39.04.280
if an exemption contained within that section applies to the purchase or public
work.

Sec.
210. RCW
53.08.120 and 1999 c 29 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

All
material required by a port district may be procured in the open market or by
contract and all work ordered may be done by contract or day labor. All such
contracts for work, the estimated cost of which exceeds two hundred thousand
dollars, shall be let at public bidding upon notice published in a newspaper of
general circulation in the district at least thirteen days before the last date
upon which bids will be received, calling for sealed bids upon the work, plans
and specifications for which shall then be on file in the office of the
commission for public inspection. The same notice may call for bids on such
work or material based upon plans and specifications submitted by the bidder.
The competitive bidding requirements for purchases or public works may be
waived pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption contained within that section
applies to the purchase or public work.

((Each
port district shall maintain a small works roster, as provided in)) However,
a port district may let contracts using the small works roster process under
RCW 39.04.155((, and may use the small works roster process to award
contracts)) in lieu of calling for sealed bids ((whenever work is done
by contract, the estimated cost of which is two hundred thousand dollars or
less)). Whenever possible, the managing official shall invite at least one
proposal from a minority contractor who shall otherwise qualify under this
section.

When
awarding such a contract for work, when utilizing proposals from the small
works roster, the managing official shall give weight to the contractor
submitting the lowest and best proposal, and whenever it would not violate the
public interest, such contracts shall be distributed equally among contractors,
including minority contractors, on the small works roster.

((A
report on the effectiveness of the change in the bid limit will be made to the
alternative works construction methods oversight committee prior to the 2003
legislative session.))

Sec.
211. RCW
54.04.070 and 1998 c 278 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
item, or items of the same kind of materials, equipment, or supplies purchased,
the estimated cost of which is in excess of five thousand dollars, exclusive of
sales tax shall be by contract: PROVIDED, That a district may make purchases
of the same kind of items of materials, equipment and supplies not exceeding
five thousand dollars in any calendar month without a contract, purchasing any
excess thereof over five thousand dollars by contract. Any work ordered by a
district commission, the estimated cost of which is in excess of ten thousand
dollars exclusive of sales tax, shall be by contract, except that a district
commission may have its own regularly employed personnel perform work which is
an accepted industry practice under prudent utility management without a
contract. Prudent utility management means performing work with regularly
employed personnel utilizing material of a worth not exceeding fifty thousand
dollars in value without a contract: PROVIDED, That such limit on the value of
material being utilized in work being performed by regularly employed personnel
shall not include the value of individual items of equipment purchased or
acquired and used as one unit of a project. Before awarding such a contract,
the commission shall publish a notice once or more in a newspaper of general
circulation in the district at least thirteen days before the last date upon
which bids will be received, inviting sealed proposals for the work or
materials; plans and specifications of which shall at the time of the
publication be on file at the office of the district subject to public
inspection. Any published notice ordering work to be performed for the
district shall be mailed at the time of publication to any established trade
association which files a written request with the district to receive such
notices. The commission may at the same time and as part of the same notice,
invite tenders for the work or materials upon plans and specifications to be
submitted by the bidders.

((Notwithstanding
any other provisions herein, all contract projects, the estimated cost of which
is less than one hundred thousand dollars, may be awarded to a contractor using
the small works roster process provided in RCW 39.04.155.)) All contract
projects equal to or in excess of one hundred thousand dollars shall be let by
competitive bidding unless the public utility district lets contracts using
the small works roster process under RCW 39.04.155.

Whenever
equipment or materials required by a district are held by a governmental agency
and are available for sale but such agency is unwilling to submit a proposal,
the commission may ascertain the price of such items and file a statement of
such price supported by the sworn affidavit of one member of the commission and
may consider such price as a bid without a deposit or bond.

The commission may waive the competitive bidding requirements of
this section pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption contained within that
section applies to the purchase or public work.

Sec.
212. RCW
57.08.050 and 1999 c 153 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All work ordered, the estimated cost of which is in excess of five thousand
dollars, shall be let by contract((. All contract projects, the
estimated cost of which is in excess of five thousand dollars and less than
fifty thousand dollars, may be awarded to a contractor using the small works
roster process provided in RCW 39.04.155. The board of commissioners may set
up uniform procedures to prequalify contractors for inclusion on the small
works roster. All contract projects equal to or in excess of fifty thousand
dollars shall be let by)) and competitive bidding. Before awarding
any such contract the board of commissioners shall publish a notice in a
newspaper of general circulation where the district is located at least once
thirteen days before the last date upon which bids will be received, inviting
sealed proposals for such work, plans and specifications which must at the time
of publication of such notice be on file in the office of the board of
commissioners subject to the public inspection. The notice shall state
generally the work to be done and shall call for proposals for doing the same
to be sealed and filed with the board of commissioners on or before the day and
hour named therein.

Each
bid shall be accompanied by a certified or cashier's check or postal money
order payable to the order of the county treasurer for a sum not less than five
percent of the amount of the bid, or accompanied by a bid bond in an amount not
less than five percent of the bid with a corporate surety licensed to do
business in the state, conditioned that the bidder will pay the district as
liquidated damages the amount specified in the bond, unless the bidder enters
into a contract in accordance with the bidder's bid, and no bid shall be
considered unless accompanied by such check, cash or bid bond. At the time and
place named such bids shall be publicly opened and read and the board of
commissioners shall proceed to canvass the bids and may let such contract to
the lowest responsible bidder upon plans and specifications on file or to the
best bidder submitting the bidder's own plans and specifications. The board of
commissioners may reject all bids for good cause and readvertise and in such
case all checks, cash or bid bonds shall be returned to the bidders. If the
contract is let, then all checks, cash, or bid bonds shall be returned to the
bidders, except that of the successful bidder, which shall be retained until a
contract shall be entered into for doing the work, and a bond to perform such
work furnished with sureties satisfactory to the board of commissioners in the
full amount of the contract price between the bidder and the commission in
accordance with the bid. If the bidder fails to enter into the contract in accordance
with the bid and furnish the bond within ten days from the date at which the
bidder is notified that the bidder is the successful bidder, the check, cash,
or bid bonds and the amount thereof shall be forfeited to the district. If the
bidder fails to enter into a contract in accordance with the bidder's bid, and
the board of commissioners deems it necessary to take legal action to collect
on any bid bond required by this section, then the district shall be entitled
to collect from the bidder any legal expenses, including reasonable attorneys'
fees occasioned thereby. A low bidder who claims error and fails to enter into
a contract is prohibited from bidding on the same project if a second or
subsequent call for bids is made for the project.

(2)
As an alternative to requirements under subsection (1) of this section, a
water-sewer district may let contracts using the small works roster process
under RCW 39.04.155.

(3)
Any purchase of materials, supplies, or equipment, with an estimated cost in
excess of ten thousand dollars, shall be by contract. Any purchase of
materials, supplies, or equipment, with an estimated cost of less than fifty
thousand dollars shall be made using the process provided in RCW 39.04.190.
Any purchase of materials, supplies, or equipment with an estimated cost of
fifty thousand dollars or more shall be made by competitive bidding following
the procedure for letting contracts for projects under subsection (1) of this
section.

(((3)))
(4) The board may waive the competitive bidding requirements of this
section pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption contained within that section
applies to the purchase or public work.

Sec.
213. RCW
70.44.140 and 1999 c 99 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All materials purchased and work ordered, the estimated cost of which is in
excess of five thousand dollars, shall be by contract. Before awarding any
such contract, the commission shall publish a notice at least thirteen days
before the last date upon which bids will be received, inviting sealed
proposals for such work. The plans and specifications must at the time of the
publication of such notice be on file at the office of the public hospital
district, subject to public inspection: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the commission
may at the same time, and as part of the same notice, invite tenders for the
work or materials upon plans and specifications to be submitted by bidders.
The notice shall state generally the work to be done, and shall call for proposals
for doing the same, to be sealed and filed with the commission on or before the
day and hour named therein. Each bid shall be accompanied by bid proposal
security in the form of a certified check, cashier's check, postal money order,
or surety bond made payable to the order of the commission, for a sum not less
than five percent of the amount of the bid, and no bid shall be considered
unless accompanied by such bid proposal security. At the time and place named,
such bids shall be publicly opened and read, and the commission shall proceed
to canvass the bids, and may let such contract to the lowest responsible bidder
upon plans and specifications on file, or to the best bidder submitting his or
her own plans and specifications: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That no contract shall be
let in excess of the estimated cost of the materials or work, or if, in the
opinion of the commission, all bids are unsatisfactory, they may reject all of
them and readvertise, and in such case all bid proposal security shall be returned
to the bidders. If the contract is let, then all bid proposal security shall
be returned to the bidders, except that of the successful bidder, which is
retained until a contract shall be entered into for the purchase of such
materials for doing such work, and a bond to perform such work furnished, with
sureties satisfactory to the commission, in an amount to be fixed by the
commission, not less than twenty-five percent of contract price in any case,
between the bidder and commission, in accordance with the bid. If such bidder
fails to enter into the contract in accordance with the bid and furnish such
bond within ten days from the date at which the bidder is notified that he or
she is the successful bidder, the bid proposal security and the amount thereof
shall be forfeited to the public hospital district. A low bidder who claims
error and fails to enter into a contract is prohibited from bidding on the same
project if a second or subsequent call for bids is made for the project.

(2)
((In lieu of the procedures of subsection (1) of this section, a public
hospital district may use the contracting processes provided in RCW 39.04.155;
however, public hospital districts may only use the small works roster process
for projects estimated to cost less than fifty thousand dollars)) As an
alternative to the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, a public
hospital district may let contracts using the small works roster process under
RCW 39.04.155.

(3)
Any purchases with an estimated cost of up to fifteen thousand dollars may be
made using the process provided in RCW 39.04.190.

(4)
The commission may waive the competitive bidding requirements of this section
pursuant to RCW 39.04.280 if an exemption contained within that section applies
to the purchase or public work.

PART III
- MISCELLANEOUS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 301. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
28B.10.355 (Public works projects--Small works
roster--Rules--Procedures--Revisions) and 1993 c 379 s 110 & 1985 c 152 s
2;

(2) RCW
35.82.075 (Small works roster) and 1989 c 363 s 6; and

(3) RCW
39.04.150 (State agencies authorized to establish small works
roster--Procedure for securing quotations--Rules) and 1998 c 278 s 11.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 302. Part
headings used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 303. (1)
Section 104 of this act is null and void if Substitute Senate Bill No. 6396 or
Substitute House Bill No. 2382 is enacted into law by June 30, 2000.

(2) Section 105 of this act takes effect only if Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6396 or Substitute House Bill No. 2382 is enacted into law by June 30,
2000.

---
END ---