BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
80.50.120 and 1977 ex.s. c 371 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to the conditions set forth therein any certification shall bind the
state and each of its departments, agencies, divisions, bureaus, commissions,
boards, and political subdivisions, whether a member of the council or not, as
to the approval of the site and the construction and operation of the proposed
energy facility.

(2)
The certification shall authorize the person named therein to construct and
operate the proposed energy facility subject only to the conditions set forth
in such certification.

(3)
The issuance of a certification shall be in lieu of any permit, certificate or
similar document required by any department, agency, division, bureau,
commission, board, or political subdivision of this state, whether a member of
the council or not.

(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the
council shall not certify an energy facility on lands managed by the parks and
recreation commission unless the council first requests and obtains the
commission's approval.

---
END ---