BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 51.28 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
An occupational disease claim is presumed to arise naturally and proximately
out of employment and the employer has the burden of proving that an unsafe or
unhealthy condition, practice, or other hazard at a workplace did not
contribute to the claimed occupational disease if the following occur:

(a)
A worker notifies the employer of an unsafe or unhealthy condition, practice,
or other hazard that might result in an occupational disease;

(b)
A worker files an occupational disease claim alleging that an occupational
disease resulted from the unsafe or unhealthy condition, practice, or other
hazard after it was reported to the employer and before the employer
investigated and corrected the condition, practice, or other hazard; and

(c)
A physician has certified that the claimant has an occupational disease that,
more likely than not, arose from the type of unsafe or unhealthy condition,
practice, or other hazard reported to the employer.

(2)
If a worker notifies an employer of an unsafe or unhealthy condition, practice,
or other hazard that might result in an occupational disease, the employer
shall investigate and correct the condition, practice, or other hazard.
Failure to respond within a reasonable time to the notice subjects an employer
to a penalty determined by the director, but not to exceed two thousand five
hundred dollars for each offense.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A new
section is added to chapter 51.28 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall adopt rules to implement section 1 of this act.

(2) In making rules to determine a reasonable response time for
purposes of section 1(2) of this act, the department shall consider: (a) The
potential for harm from the condition, practice, or other hazard; and (b) the
ease of correcting the condition, practice, or other hazard.

---
END ---