BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
36.04.170 and 1 H.C. s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

King county shall consist of the territory bounded as follows, to
wit: Beginning at the point of intersection of the center of East Passage
(also known as Admiralty Inlet) on Puget Sound and the northerly line of the
Puyallup Indian Reservation (projected northwesterly); thence southeasterly in
a straight line along said northerly line of Puyallup Indian Reservation and
same extended to a point on the east line of section thirty-one, township
twenty-one, north, range four east, Willamette Meridian; thence south along
said east line of section thirty-one, township twenty-one, range four east, Willamette
Meridian, to the township line between township twenty north and township
twenty-one north (being the fifth standard parallel north); thence east along
said township line between township twenty north and township twenty-one north
to the middle of the main channel of White river, near the northeast corner of
section three, township twenty north, range five east, Willamette Meridian;
thence upstream along the middle of the main channel of White river to the
forks of White river and Greenwater river; thence upstream along the middle of
the main channel of the Greenwater river to the forks of the Greenwater river
and Meadow creek; thence upstream along the middle of the main channel of
Meadow creek to the summit of the Cascade mountains, at a point known as Naches
Pass, said point lying in the southwest quarter of section thirty-five,
township nineteen north, range eleven east, Willamette Meridian; thence
northerly along the summit of the Cascade mountains to a point on the township
line between township twenty-six north and township twenty-seven north, said
point lying near the north quarter-corner of section three, township twenty-six
north, range thirteen east, Willamette Meridian; thence west along said
township line between township twenty-six north and twenty-seven north to the
middle of the channel known as Admiralty Inlet on Puget Sound; thence southerly
along said middle of channel known as Admiralty Inlet through Colvo's Passage
(West Passage) on the west side of Vashon Island to a point due north of Point
Defiance; thence southeasterly along middle of channel between Vashon Island
and Point Defiance (Dalcos Passage) to a point due south of Quartermaster
Harbor; thence northeasterly along middle of channel known as Admiralty Inlet
to point of beginning. King county was named in honor of William Rufus de
Vane King (1786-1853), vice-president of the United States under Franklin
Pierce in 1853, and is now "renamed" in honor of the Reverend Doctor
Martin Luther King, Jr.

---
END ---