BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
90.84.050 and 1998 c 248 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Prior
to authorizing use of credits from a bank as a means of mitigation under a
permit issued or approved by the department or a local government, the
department must assure that all appropriate and practicable steps have been
undertaken to first avoid and then minimize adverse impacts to wetlands. In
determining appropriate steps to avoid and minimize adverse impacts to
wetlands, the department shall take into consideration the functions and values
of the wetland, including fish habitat, ground and surface water
quality, and protection of adjacent properties. The department may approve use
of credits from a bank only when:

(1)
The credits represent the creation, restoration, or enhancement of wetlands of
like kind and in close proximity ((when estuarine wetlands are being
mitigated));

(2)
There is no practicable opportunity for on-site compensation; ((or)) and

(3) Use of credits from a bank is environmentally preferable to on-site
compensation.

---
END ---