BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.400.285 and 1997 c 267 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
When a school district or educational service district enters into a contract
for services that had been previously performed by classified school employees,
the contract shall contain a specific clause requiring the contractor to
provide for persons performing such services under the contract, health
benefits that are similar to those provided for school employees who would
otherwise perform the work, but in no case are such health benefits required to
be greater than the benefits provided for basic health care services under
chapter 70.47 RCW. The school district shall provide the office of the
superintendent of public instruction with the same employee information on
contracted employees under this section that a school district or educational
service district is required to provide on school district and educational
service district employees.

(2)
Decisions to enter into contracts for services by a school district or educational
service district may only be made: (a) After the affected district has
conducted a feasibility study determining the potential costs and benefits,
including the impact on district employees who would otherwise perform the
work, that would result from contracting for the services; (b) after the
decision to contract for the services has been reviewed and approved by the
superintendent of public instruction; and (c) subject to any applicable
requirements for collective bargaining. The factors to be considered in the
feasibility study shall be developed in consultation with representatives of
the affected employees and may include both long-term and short-term effects of
the proposal to contract for services.

(3)
This section applies only if a contract is for services performed by classified
school employees on or after July 25, 1993.

(4)
This section does not apply to:

(a)
Temporary, nonongoing, or nonrecurring service contracts; or

(b)
Contracts for services previously performed by employees in director/supervisor,
professional, and technical positions.

(5)
For the purposes of subsection (4) of this section:

(a)
"Director/supervisor position" means a position in which an employee
directs staff members and manages a function, a program, or a support service.

(b)
"Professional position" means a position for which an employee is
required to have a high degree of knowledge and skills acquired through a
baccalaureate degree or its equivalent.

(c) "Technical position" means a position for which an
employee is required to have a combination of knowledge and skills that can be
obtained through approximately two years of posthigh school education, such as
from a community or technical college, or by on-the-job training.

---
END ---