BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
36.70A.320 and 1997 c 429 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, comprehensive plans and
development regulations, and amendments thereto, adopted under this chapter are
presumed valid upon adoption.

(2)
Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, the burden is
on the petitioner to demonstrate that any action taken by a state agency,
county, or city under this chapter is not in compliance with the requirements
of this chapter.

(3)
In any petition under this chapter, the board, after full consideration of the
petition, shall determine whether there is compliance with the requirements of
this chapter. In making its determination, the board shall consider the
criteria adopted by the department under RCW 36.70A.190(4). The board shall
find compliance unless it ((determines that the action by the state agency,
county, or city is clearly erroneous in view of the entire record before the
board and in light of the goals and requirements of)) finds by a
preponderance of the evidence that the state agency, county, or city
erroneously interpreted or applied this chapter.

(4)
A county or city subject to a determination of invalidity made under RCW
36.70A.300 or 36.70A.302 has the burden of demonstrating that the ordinance or
resolution it has enacted in response to the determination of invalidity will
no longer substantially interfere with the fulfillment of the goals of this
chapter under the standard in RCW 36.70A.302(1).

(5) The shoreline element of a comprehensive plan and the
applicable development regulations adopted by a county or city shall take
effect as provided in chapter 90.58 RCW.

---
END ---