BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.110 RCW to read as follows:

The
city and town research services account is created in the state treasury.
Moneys in the account shall consist of amounts transferred under RCW
66.08.190(2) and any other transfers or appropriations to the account. Moneys
in the account may be spent only after an appropriation. Expenditures from the
account may be used only for city and town research.

Unobligated
moneys remaining in the account at the end of the fiscal biennium shall be
distributed by the treasurer to the incorporated cities and towns of the state
under RCW 66.08.190(1)(b). The treasurer may disburse amounts appropriated
to the municipal research council from the city and town research services
account by warrant or check to the contracting parties on invoices or vouchers
certified by the chair of the municipal research council or his or her designee.
Payments to public agencies may be made in advance of actual work contracted
for, at the discretion of the council.

Sec.
2. RCW
66.08.190 and 1995 c 159 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
When excess funds are distributed, all moneys subject to distribution shall be
disbursed as follows:

(((1)))
(a) Three-tenths of one percent to border areas under RCW 66.08.195; and

(((2)))
(b) From the amount remaining after distribution under (a) of this
subsection (((1) of this section)), fifty percent to the general fund of
the state, ten percent to the counties of the state, and forty percent to the
incorporated cities and towns of the state.

(2)
During the months of July, October, January, and April of each year, prior to
disbursing the distribution to incorporated cities and towns under subsection
(1)(b) of this section, the treasurer shall deduct from that distribution an
amount that, when combined with any cash balance in the city and town research
services account, will fund that quarter's allotments under RCW 43.88.110 from
any legislative appropriation from the city and town research services
account. The treasurer shall deposit the amount deducted into the city and
town research services account.

(3)
The governor may notify and direct the state treasurer to withhold the revenues
to which the counties and cities are entitled under this section if the
counties or cities are found to be in noncompliance pursuant to RCW 36.70A.340.

Sec.
3. RCW
43.110.030 and 1997 c 437 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
municipal research council shall contract for the provision of municipal
research and services to cities, towns, and counties. Contracts for municipal
research and services shall be made with state agencies, educational
institutions, or private consulting firms, that in the judgment of council
members are qualified to provide such research and services. Contracts for
staff support may be made with state agencies, educational institutions, or
private consulting firms that in the judgment of the council members are
qualified to provide such support.

Municipal
research and services shall consist of: (1) Studying and researching city,
town, and county government and issues relating to city, town, and county
government; (2) acquiring, preparing, and distributing publications related to
city, town, and county government and issues relating to city, town, and county
government; (3) providing educational conferences relating to city, town, and
county government and issues relating to city, town, and county government; and
(4) furnishing legal, technical, consultative, and field services to cities,
towns, and counties concerning planning, public health, utility services, fire
protection, law enforcement, public works, and other issues relating to city,
town, and county government. Requests for legal services by county officials
shall be sent to the office of the county prosecuting attorney. Responses by the
municipal research council to county requests for legal services shall be
provided to the requesting official and the county prosecuting attorney.

The
activities, programs, and services of the municipal research council shall be
carried on((, and all expenditures shall be made,)) in cooperation with
((the cities and towns of the state acting through the board of directors of))
the association of Washington cities((, which is recognized as their
official agency or instrumentality,)) and ((in cooperation with counties
of the state acting through)) the Washington state association of
counties. Services to cities and towns shall be based upon the moneys
appropriated to the municipal research council ((under RCW 82.44.160)) from
the city and town research services account under section 1 of this act.
Services to counties shall be based upon the moneys appropriated to the
municipal research council from the county research services account under RCW
43.110.050.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. RCW
43.88.114 (Appropriations to municipal research council from
motor vehicle excise taxes not subject to allotment) and 1997 c 437 s 5 &
1983 c 22 s 2 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---