BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
26.50.160 and 1995 c 246 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
To prevent the issuance of competing protection orders in different courts and
to give courts needed information for issuance of orders, the judicial
information system shall be available in each district, municipal, and superior
court by July 1, 1997, and shall include a data base containing the following
information:

(((1)))
(a) The names of the parties and the cause number for every order of
protection issued under this title, every criminal no-contact order issued
under chapter 10.99 RCW, every antiharassment order issued under chapter 10.14
RCW, every dissolution action under chapter 26.09 RCW, every third-party
custody action under chapter 26.10 RCW, and every parentage action under
chapter 26.10 RCW;

(((2)))
(b) A criminal history of the parties; ((and

(3)
Other relevant information necessary to assist courts in issuing orders under
this chapter as determined by the judicial information system committee)) (c)
The date of birth of the parties; and

(d)
The contact addresses of the parties. When collecting this information, each
party must be given notice that the contact address becomes a public record and
that the party may use an address other than the party's personal residence.
Addresses assigned through the state's address confidentiality program under
chapter 40.24 RCW may be used for this purpose.

(2) In no case shall any other personally identifying
information be entered into the data base.

---
END ---