BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.140.155 and 1993 c 30 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A real estate appraiser from another state who is licensed or certified by
another state may apply for registration to receive temporary licensing or
certification in Washington by paying a fee and filing a notarized application
with the department on a form provided by the department.

(2)
The director is authorized to adopt by rule the term or duration of the licensing
and certification privileges granted under the provisions of this section ((shall
expire ninety days from issuance)). Licensing or certification shall not
be renewed((, nor shall an applicant receive more than two registrations
within any twelve-month period)). However, an applicant may receive an
extension of a temporary practice permit to complete an assignment, provided
that a written request is received by the department prior to the expiration
date, stating the reason for the extension.

(3)
A temporary practice permit issued under this section allows an appraiser to
perform independent appraisal services required by a contract for appraisal
services. A copy of the contract for appraisal services must be submitted to
the department with the application for a temporary practice permit.

(4)
Persons granted temporary licensing or certification privileges under this
section shall not advertise or otherwise hold themselves out as being licensed
or certified by the state of Washington.

(((4))) (5) Persons granted temporary licensure or
certification are subject to all provisions under this chapter.

---
END ---