BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
74.13.325 and 1997 c 272 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Within available resources, the department shall increase the number of
adoptive and foster families available to accept children through an intensive
recruitment and retention program. The department shall contract with a
private agency to coordinate foster care and adoptive home recruitment
activities for the department and private agencies.

(2) Within the department, the division of licensed resources,
children's administration, shall have primary responsibility for the
recruitment of new foster homes.

Sec.
2. RCW
74.13.290 and 1990 c 284 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
To provide stability to children in out-of-home care, placement selection shall
be made with a view toward the fewest possible placements for each child. If
possible, the initial placement shall be viewed as the only placement for the
child. The use of short-term interim placements of thirty days or less to
protect the child's health or safety while the placement of choice is being
arranged is not a violation of this principle.

(2) In any situation in which there has been a founded
allegation of abuse or neglect against a licensed provider, whether or not the
child placed with that provider remains is the decision of the division of
children and family services. In making the decision whether to remove the
child from the home of the provider, the department shall consider whether the
health and safety of the child would be jeopardized if he or she remained in
the provider's home and whether it is in the child's best interests to be
removed from the provider's home.

---
END ---