BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
74.08A.250 and 1997 c 58 s 311 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, as used in this chapter, "work
activity" means:

(1)
Unsubsidized paid employment in the private or public sector;

(2)
Subsidized paid employment in the private or public sector;

(3)
Work experience, including work associated with the refurbishing of publicly
assisted housing, if sufficient paid employment is not available;

(4)
On-the-job training;

(5)
Job search and job readiness assistance;

(6)
Community service programs;

(7)
Vocational educational training, not to exceed twelve months with respect to
any individual;

(8)
Job skills training directly related to employment;

(9)
Enrollment in a preapprenticeship training program, which shall be
considered preemployment training in the WorkFirst priogram provided that the
training is no more than twenty weeks in duration;

(10)
Education directly related to employment, in the case of a recipient who has
not received a high school diploma or a GED;

(((10)))
(11) Satisfactory attendance at secondary school or in a course of study
leading to a GED, in the case of a recipient who has not completed secondary
school or received such a certificate;

(((11)))
(12) The provision of child care services to an individual who is
participating in a community service program; and

(((12))) (13) Services required by the recipient
under RCW 74.08.025(3) and 74.08A.010(3) to become employable.

---
END ---