BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 74.08A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The employment security department shall appoint a WorkFirst apprenticeship
coordinator, whose duties shall be to:

(a)
Develop and sustain relationships between the employment security department,
the department of social and health services, the business community, and the
supervisor of apprenticeship or the supervisor's designee in order to
facilitate the creation of apprenticeship opportunities for WorkFirst clients;

(b)
Work with the business community and the supervisor of apprenticeship to develop
preapprenticeship training opportunities which meet the WorkFirst requirements
for preemployment training;

(c)
Ensure that sufficient support services are available for WorkFirst clients who
choose to participate in apprenticeship and preapprenticeship training
programs;

(d)
Work with staff of the employment security department and the department of
social and health services to integrate information about apprenticeship and
preapprenticeship training programs into introductory training for new caseworkers
and ongoing training for currently employed caseworkers;

(e)
Work with staff of the employment security department and the department of
social and health services to integrate information about apprenticeship and
preapprenticeship training programs into initial WorkFirst client orientation;

(f)
Work with staff of the employment security department and the department of
social and health services to create and disseminate written materials
regarding apprenticeship and preapprenticeship training opportunities to be
distributed to WorkFirst clients; and

(g)
Ensure that department staff are meeting the requirements set forth in
subsection (2) of this section.

(2)
Department of social and health services caseworkers and employment security
job service specialists providing direct service to WorkFirst clients are
required to:

(a)
Inform WorkFirst clients that apprenticeships qualify as work experience and
preapprenticeship training programs qualify as preemployment training;

(b)
Inform female WorkFirst clients of apprenticeship and preapprenticeship
training opportunities in nontraditional fields; and

(c)
Encourage WorkFirst clients to pursue apprenticeship and preapprenticeship
opportunities, as well as other preemployment training opportunities.

(3)
The department shall provide information about apprenticeship and
preapprenticeship training opportunities:

(a)
At introductory training for new caseworkers and ongoing training for currently
employed caseworkers;

(b)
At initial WorkFirst client orientation; and

(c) In written materials to be distributed to WorkFirst clients.

---
END ---