BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.04.050 and 1961 c 189 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

It shall be unlawful for any person to publish, disseminate or
display, or cause directly or indirectly, to be published, disseminated or
displayed in any manner or by any means, including solicitation or
dissemination by mail, telephone, electronic communication, or
door-to-door contacts, any false, deceptive or misleading advertising, with
knowledge of the facts which render the advertising false, deceptive or
misleading, for any business, trade or commercial purpose or for the purpose of
inducing, or which is likely to induce, directly or indirectly, the public to
purchase, consume, lease, dispose of, utilize or sell any property or service,
or to enter into any obligation or transaction relating thereto: PROVIDED,
That nothing in this section shall apply to any radio or television
broadcasting station which broadcasts, or to any publisher, printer or
distributor of any newspaper, magazine, billboard or other advertising medium
who publishes, prints or distributes, such advertising in good faith without
knowledge of its false, deceptive or misleading character.

---
END ---