BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
50.20.120 and 1993 c 483 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
Subject to the other provisions of this title, benefits shall be payable to any
eligible individual during the individual's benefit year in a maximum amount
equal to the lesser of thirty times the weekly benefit amount (determined
hereinafter) or one-third of the individual's base year wages under this
title((: PROVIDED, That as to)). However, maximum benefits may
exceed this amount if the eligible individual's unemployment is due to a
lockout by his or her employer, in which case benefits shall be payable in a
maximum amount equal to sixty times the weekly benefit amount or until the
lockout is terminated, whichever occurs first.

(b)
For any week beginning on and after March 31, 1981, which falls in an
extended benefit period as defined in RCW 50.22.010(1), ((as now or
hereafter amended,)) an individual's eligibility for maximum benefits in
excess of twenty-six times his or her weekly benefit amount will be subject to
the terms and conditions set forth in RCW 50.22.020((, as now or hereafter
amended)).

(2)
An individual's weekly benefit amount shall be an amount equal to one
twenty-fifth of the average quarterly wages of the individual's total wages
during the two quarters of the individual's base year in which such total wages
were highest. The maximum and minimum amounts payable weekly shall be
determined as of each June 30th to apply to benefit years beginning in the
twelve-month period immediately following such June 30th. The maximum amount
payable weekly shall be seventy percent of the "average weekly wage"
for the calendar year preceding such June 30th. The minimum amount payable
weekly shall be fifteen percent of the "average weekly wage" for the
calendar year preceding such June 30th. If any weekly benefit, maximum
benefit, or minimum benefit amount computed herein is not a multiple of one
dollar, it shall be reduced to the next lower multiple of one dollar.

Sec.
2. RCW
50.04.030 and 1991 c 117 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
"Benefit year" with respect to each individual, means the fifty-two
consecutive week period beginning with the first day of the calendar week in
which the individual files an application for an initial determination and
thereafter the fifty-two consecutive week period beginning with the first day
of the calendar week in which the individual next files an application for an
initial determination after the expiration of the individual's last preceding
benefit year: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That the foregoing limitation shall not be
deemed to preclude the establishment of a new benefit year under the laws of
another state pursuant to any agreement providing for the interstate combining
of employment and wages and the interstate payment of benefits nor shall this
limitation be deemed to preclude the commissioner from backdating an initial
application at the request of the claimant either for the convenience of the
department of employment security or for any other reason deemed by the
commissioner to be good cause.

(2)
An individual's benefit year shall be extended to:

(a)
Be fifty-three weeks when at the expiration of fifty-two weeks the
establishment of a new benefit year would result in the use of a quarter of
wages in the new base year that had been included in the individual's prior base
year; or

(b)
The termination of the lockout or until benefits in a maximum amount of sixty
times the weekly benefit amount are paid, whichever occurs first, if, at the
expiration of the fifty-two weeks, the individual's benefits continue to be
payable under RCW 50.20.120(1)(a) due to a lockout.

(3)(a) No
benefit year will be established unless it is determined that the individual
earned wages in "employment" in not less than six hundred eighty
hours of the individual's base year: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That a benefit year
cannot be established if the base year wages include wages earned prior to the
establishment of a prior benefit year unless the individual worked and earned
wages since the last separation from employment immediately before the
application for initial determination in the previous benefit year if the
applicant was an unemployed individual at the time of application, or since the
initial separation in the previous benefit year if the applicant was not an
unemployed individual at the time of filing an application for initial
determination for the previous benefit year, of not less than six times the
weekly benefit amount computed for the individual's new benefit year.

(b)
If an individual's prior benefit year was based on the last four completed
calendar quarters, a new benefit year shall not be established until the new
base year does not include any hours used in the establishment of the prior
benefit year.

(4)
If the wages of an individual are not based upon a fixed duration of time or if
the individual's wages are paid at irregular intervals or in such manner as not
to extend regularly over the period of employment, the wages for any week shall
be determined in such manner as the commissioner may by regulation prescribe.
Such regulation shall, so far as possible, secure results reasonably similar to
those which would prevail if the individual were paid his or her wages at
regular intervals.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A new
section is added to chapter 50.29 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Beginning with rate year 2000, if unemployment benefits are paid to claimants
in any calendar quarter that exceed the maximum benefit amount under RCW
50.20.120(1)(a) due to a lockout by the employer, and the employer is assigned
the contribution rate of rate class 20 under RCW 50.29.025, or is assigned the
contribution rate under RCW 50.29.025(6)(a), for the rate year that includes
that calendar quarter, the employer's contributions for that calendar quarter
under RCW 50.24.010 shall equal the total of the following:

(a)
The amount of contributions determined under RCW 50.29.025;

(b)
An amount equal to the full amount of benefits paid in the calendar quarter to
the locked out claimants less the amount paid under (a) of this subsection; and

(c)
The amount of the costs related to administering the benefits paid to the
locked out claimants not otherwise paid or payable from federal funds.

(2)
At the end of each calendar quarter, the commissioner shall notify employers
subject to this section, and shall include in each employer's contribution
notice for the calendar quarter a billing for the amount determined under this
section. Contributions shall become due and be paid as prescribed by the
commissioner for contributions under RCW 50.24.010.

(3)
RCW 50.29.062 shall not apply to employers subject to this section. For
purposes of RCW 50.24.010, the contribution rate of a successor employer to an
employer subject to this section shall be the contribution rate of the rate
class assigned to the predecessor employer at the time of the transfer for the
remainder of that rate year. Any experience relating to the assignment of that
rate class attributable to the predecessor is transferred to the successor.
Beginning on the January 1 following the transfer, the successor's assigned
contribution rate for purposes of RCW 50.24.010 shall be based on the
transferred experience of the acquired business and the successor's experience
after the transfer.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. If
any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state or
the eligibility of employers in this state for federal unemployment tax
credits, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent
of the conflict, and the finding or determination does not affect the operation
of the remainder of this act. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by
the state or the granting of federal unemployment tax credits to employers in
this state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. This
act applies to weeks of unemployment beginning on or after January 2, 2000, of
claimants who were locked out by their employers after January 13, 1999. A
claimant who exhausted benefits before the effective date of this section has
the option of remaining on the original claim or filing a new claim.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---