BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that:

(1)
All animals, including livestock, should be humanely treated;

(2)
Injured livestock animals deserve to be restored to health or have their
suffering ended;

(3)
Dragging, pushing, prodding, and improperly moving nonambulatory animals can
cause severe, and unnecessary, pain and suffering;

(4)
Abusive handling of nonambulatory, or downed, livestock is needless and cruel;

(5)
Animals so diseased or injured that they are nonambulatory should be humanely
dealt with; and

(6)
Injured livestock feel pain and deserve protection from cruelty.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 16.50 RCW to read as follows:

Except to provide appropriate restorative veterinary care or to
protect human life, no person shall move nonambulatory livestock unless the
livestock's life has been terminated. No person shall terminate the life of
nonambulatory livestock except by a humane method.

---
END ---