BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 41.32 RCW under the subchapter heading
"provisions applicable to plan 1, plan 2, and plan 3" to read as
follows:

(1)
A one hundred fifty thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid to the member's
estate, or such person or persons, trust, or organization as the member shall
have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the
department. If there be no such designated person or persons still living at
the time of the member's death, such member's death benefit shall be paid to
the member's surviving spouse as if in fact such spouse had been nominated by
written designation, or if there be no such surviving spouse, then to such
member's legal representatives.

(2)
The benefit under this section shall be paid only where death occurs as a
result of injuries sustained in the course of employment. The determination of
eligibility for the benefit shall be made consistent with Title 51 RCW by the
department of labor and industries. The department of labor and industries
shall notify the department of retirement systems by order under RCW 51.52.050.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 41.35 RCW under the subchapter heading
"provisions applicable to plan 2 and plan 3" to read as follows:

(1)
A one hundred fifty thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid to the member's
estate, or such person or persons, trust, or organization as the member shall
have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the
department. If there be no such designated person or persons still living at
the time of the member's death, such member's death benefit shall be paid to
the member's surviving spouse as if in fact such spouse had been nominated by
written designation, or if there be no such surviving spouse, then to such
member's legal representatives.

(2)
The benefit under this section shall be paid only where death occurs as a result
of injuries sustained in the course of employment. The determination of
eligibility for the benefit shall be made consistent with Title 51 RCW by the
department of labor and industries. The department of labor and industries
shall notify the department of retirement systems by order under RCW 51.52.050.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 41.40 RCW under the subchapter heading
"provisions applicable to plan 1 and plan 2" to read as follows:

(1)
A one hundred fifty thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid to the member's
estate if the member is an employee of a school district or educational service
district, or such person or persons, trust, or organization as the member shall
have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the
department. If there be no such designated person or persons still living at
the time of the member's death, such member's death benefit shall be paid to
the member's surviving spouse as if in fact such spouse had been nominated by
written designation, or if there be no such surviving spouse, then to such
member's legal representatives.

(2)
The benefit under this section shall be paid only where death occurs as a
result of injuries sustained in the course of employment. The determination of
eligibility for the benefit shall be made consistent with Title 51 RCW by the
department of labor and industries.

The
department of labor and industries shall notify the department of retirement
systems by order under RCW 51.52.050.

(3)
This section only applies to members who were employees of school districts or
educational service districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. 1999
c 309 s 718 (uncodified) is repealed.

---
END ---