BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
10.77.060 and 1998 c 297 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
Whenever a defendant has pleaded not guilty by reason of insanity, or there is
reason to doubt his or her competency, the court on its own motion or on the
motion of any party shall either appoint or request the secretary to designate
at least two qualified experts or professional persons, one of whom shall be
approved by the prosecuting attorney, to examine and report upon the mental
condition of the defendant. At least one of the experts or professional
persons appointed shall be a developmental disabilities professional if the
court is advised by any party that the defendant may be developmentally
disabled. For purposes of the examination, the court may order the defendant
committed to a hospital or other suitably secure public or private mental
health facility for a period of time necessary to complete the examination, but
not to exceed fifteen days from the time of admission to the facility.

(b)
When a defendant is ordered to be committed for inpatient examination under
this subsection (1), the court may delay granting bail until the defendant has
been evaluated for competency or sanity and appears before the court.
Following the evaluation, in determining bail the court shall consider: (i)
Recommendations of the expert or professional persons regarding the defendant's
competency, sanity, or diminished capacity; (ii) whether the defendant has a
recent history of one or more violent acts; (iii) whether the defendant has
previously been acquitted by reason of insanity or found incompetent; (iv)
whether it is reasonably likely the defendant will fail to appear for a future
court hearing; and (v) whether the defendant is a threat to public safety.

(2)
The court may direct that a qualified expert or professional person retained by
or appointed for the defendant be permitted to witness the examination
authorized by subsection (1) of this section, and that the defendant shall have
access to all information obtained by the court appointed experts or professional
persons. The defendant's expert or professional person shall have the right to
file his or her own report following the guidelines of subsection (3) of this
section. If the defendant is indigent, the court shall upon the request of the
defendant assist him or her in obtaining an expert or professional person.

(3)
The report of the examination shall include the following:

(a)
A description of the nature of the examination;

(b)
A diagnosis of the mental condition of the defendant;

(c)
If the defendant suffers from a mental disease or defect, or is developmentally
disabled, an opinion as to competency;

(d)
If the defendant has indicated his or her intention to rely on the defense of
insanity pursuant to RCW 10.77.030, an opinion as to the defendant's sanity at
the time of the act;

(e)
When directed by the court, an opinion as to the capacity of the defendant to
have a particular state of mind which is an element of the offense charged;

(f)
An opinion as to whether the defendant should be evaluated by a county
designated mental health professional under chapter 71.05 RCW, and an
opinion as to whether the defendant is a substantial danger to other persons,
or presents a substantial likelihood of committing criminal acts jeopardizing
public safety or security, unless kept under further control by the court or
other persons or institutions.

(4)
The secretary may execute such agreements as appropriate and necessary to
implement this section.

Sec.
2. RCW
10.77.065 and 1998 c 297 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
((Whenever a defendant is evaluated under this chapter, a copy of the order
requiring the evaluation shall be transmitted to the county designated mental
health professional of the county in which the defendant was charged.

(2)(a)
When a defendant is evaluated under RCW 10.77.060, the professional person
shall make a recommendation to the court whether the defendant should be
examined by a county designated mental health professional for purposes of
filing a petition under chapter 71.05 RCW whenever the court determines, and
enters a finding that, the defendant is charged with: (i) A felony; or (ii) a
nonfelony crime and: (A) Is charged with, or has a history of, one or more
violent acts; (B) is a threat to public safety; (C) has previously been
acquitted by reason of insanity; or (D) has previously been found incompetent
pursuant to this chapter.

(b)))(a)(i)
The facility conducting the evaluation shall provide its report and
recommendation to the court in which the criminal proceeding is pending. A
copy of the report and recommendation shall be provided to the county
designated mental health professional, the prosecuting attorney, the defense
attorney, and the professional person at the local correctional facility where
the defendant is being held, or if there is no professional person, to the
person designated under (a)(ii) of this subsection. Upon request, the
facility shall also provide copies of any source documents relevant to the
evaluation to the county designated mental health professional. The report and
recommendation shall be provided not less than twenty-four hours preceding the
transfer of the defendant to the correctional facility in the county in which
the criminal proceeding is pending.

(((c)))(ii)
If there is no professional person at the local correctional facility, the
local correctional facility shall designate a professional person as defined in
RCW 71.05.020 or, in cooperation with the regional support network, a
professional person at the regional support network to receive the report and
recommendation.

(iii)
When a defendant is transferred to the facility conducting the evaluation, or
upon commencement of a defendant's evaluation in the local correctional
facility, the local correctional facility must notify the evaluator or the facility
conducting the evaluation of the name of the professional person, or person
designated under (a)(ii) of this subsection to receive the report and
recommendation.

(b)
If the facility concludes, under RCW 10.77.060(3)(f), the person should be kept
under further control, an evaluation shall be conducted of such person under
chapter 71.05 RCW. The court shall order an evaluation be conducted by the
appropriate county designated mental health professional: (i) Prior to release
from confinement for such person who is convicted, if sentenced to confinement
for twenty-four months or less; (ii) for any person who is acquitted; or (iii)
for any person: (A) Whose charges are dismissed pursuant to RCW
10.77.090(4); or (B) whose nonfelony charges are dismissed.

(((3)))
(2) The county designated mental health professional shall provide
written notification within twenty-four hours of the results of the
determination whether to commence proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW. The
notification shall be provided to the persons identified in subsection (((2)(b)))
(1)(a) of this section.

(((4)))
(3) The prosecuting attorney shall provide a copy of the results of any
proceedings commenced by the county designated mental health professional under
subsection (((3))) (2) of this section to the facility conducting
the evaluation under this chapter.

(4)
The fact of admission and all information and records compiled, obtained, or
maintained in the course of providing services under this chapter may also be
disclosed to the courts solely to prevent the entry of any evaluation or
treatment order that is inconsistent with any order entered under chapter 71.05
RCW.

Sec.
3. RCW
10.77.090 and 1998 c 297 s 38 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
If at any time during the pendency of an action and prior to judgment the court
finds, following a report as provided in RCW 10.77.060, a defendant is
incompetent the court shall order the proceedings against the defendant be
stayed except as provided in subsection (7) of this section.

(b)
If the defendant is charged with a felony and determined to be incompetent, the
court shall commit the defendant to the custody of the secretary, who shall
place such defendant in an appropriate facility of the department for evaluation
and treatment, or the court may alternatively order the defendant to undergo
evaluation and treatment at some other facility as determined by the
department, or under the guidance and control of a professional person, until
he or she has regained the competency necessary to understand the proceedings
against him or her and assist in his or her own defense, but in any event, for
no longer than a period of ninety days.

(c)
A defendant found incompetent shall be evaluated at the direction of the
secretary and a determination made whether the defendant is developmentally
disabled. Such evaluation and determination shall be accomplished as soon as
possible following the court's placement of the defendant in the custody of the
secretary. When appropriate, and subject to available funds, if the defendant
is determined to be developmentally disabled, he or she may be placed in a
program specifically reserved for the treatment and training of persons with
developmental disabilities where the defendant shall have the right to
habilitation according to an individualized service plan specifically developed
for the particular needs of the defendant. The program shall be separate from
programs serving persons involved in any other treatment or habilitation
program. The program shall be appropriately secure under the circumstances and
shall be administered by developmental disabilities professionals who shall
direct the habilitation efforts. The program shall provide an environment
affording security appropriate with the charged criminal behavior and necessary
to protect the public safety. The department may limit admissions of such
persons to this specialized program in order to ensure that expenditures for
services do not exceed amounts appropriated by the legislature and allocated by
the department for such services. The department may establish admission
priorities in the event that the number of eligible persons exceeds the limits
set by the department. A copy of the report shall be sent to the facility.

(d)(i)
If the defendant is:

(A)
Charged with a nonfelony crime and has: (I) A history of one or more violent
acts, or a pending charge of one or more violent acts; or (II) been previously
acquitted by reason of insanity or been previously found incompetent under this
chapter or any equivalent federal or out-of-state statute with regard to
an alleged offense involving actual, threatened, or attempted physical harm to
a person; and

(B)
Found by the court to be not competent; then

(C)
The court shall order the secretary to place the defendant: (I) At a secure
mental health facility in the custody of the department or an agency designated
by the department for mental health treatment and restoration of competency.
The placement shall not exceed fourteen days in addition to any unused time of
the evaluation under RCW 10.77.060. The court shall compute this total
period and include its computation in the order. The fourteen-day period plus
any unused time of the evaluation under RCW 10.77.060 shall be considered
to include only the time the defendant is actually at the facility and shall be
in addition to reasonable time for transport to or from the facility; (II) on
conditional release for up to ninety days for mental health treatment and
restoration of competency; or (III) any combination of (d)(i)(C)(I) and (II) of
this subsection.

(ii)
At the end of the mental health treatment and restoration period in (d)(i) of
this subsection, or at any time a professional person determines competency has
been, or is unlikely to be, restored the defendant shall be returned to court
for a hearing. If, after notice and hearing, competency has been restored, the
stay entered under (a) of this subsection shall be lifted. If competency has
not been restored, the proceedings shall be dismissed. If the court concludes
that competency has not been restored, but that further treatment within the
time limits established by (d)(i) of this subsection is likely to restore
competency, the court may order that treatment for purposes of competency
restoration be continued. Such treatment may not extend beyond the combination
of time provided for in (d)(i)(C)(I) and (II) of this subsection.

(iii)(A)
If the proceedings are dismissed under (d)(ii) of this subsection and the
defendant was on conditional release at the time of dismissal, the court shall
order the county designated mental health professional within that county to
evaluate the defendant pursuant to chapter 71.05 RCW. The evaluation may be
conducted in any location chosen by the professional.

(B)
If the defendant was in custody and not on conditional release at the time of
dismissal, the defendant shall be detained and sent to an evaluation and
treatment facility for up to seventy-two hours excluding Saturdays, Sundays,
and holidays for evaluation for purposes of filing a petition under chapter
71.05 RCW. The seventy-two hour period shall commence upon the next
nonholiday weekday following the court order, and shall run to the end of the
last nonholiday weekday within the seventy-two hour period.

(iv)
If at any time during the proceeding the court finds, following notice and
hearing, a defendant is not likely to regain competency, the proceedings shall
be dismissed and the defendant shall be evaluated as provided in (d)(iii) of
this subsection.

(e)
If the defendant is charged with a crime that is not a felony and the defendant
does not meet the criteria under (d) of this subsection, the court may stay or
dismiss proceedings and detain the defendant for sufficient time to allow the
county designated mental health professional to evaluate the defendant and
consider initial detention proceedings under chapter 71.05 RCW. The court must
give notice to all parties at least twenty-four hours before the dismissal of
any proceeding under this subsection (1)(e), and provide an opportunity for a
hearing on whether to dismiss the proceedings.

(2)
On or before expiration of the initial ninety-day period of commitment under
subsection (1)(b) of this section the court shall conduct a hearing, at which
it shall determine whether or not the defendant is incompetent.

(3)
If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that a defendant charged
with a felony is incompetent, the court shall have the option of extending the
order of commitment or alternative treatment for an additional ninety-day
period, but it must at the time of extension set a date for a prompt hearing to
determine the defendant's competency before the expiration of the second
ninety-day period. The defendant, the defendant's attorney, or the prosecutor
shall have the right to demand that the hearing be before a jury. No extension
shall be ordered for a second ninety-day period, nor for any subsequent period
as provided in subsection (4) of this section if the defendant's incompetence
has been determined by the secretary to be solely the result of a developmental
disability which is such that competence is not reasonably likely to be
regained during an extension.

(4)
For persons charged with a felony, at the hearing upon the expiration of the
second ninety-day period or at the end of the first ninety-day period, in the
case of a developmentally disabled defendant, if the jury or court finds that
the defendant is incompetent, the charges shall be dismissed without prejudice,
and either civil commitment proceedings shall be instituted or the court shall
order the release of the defendant: PROVIDED, That the criminal charges shall
not be dismissed if the court or jury finds that: (a) The defendant (i) is a
substantial danger to other persons; or (ii) presents a substantial likelihood
of committing criminal acts jeopardizing public safety or security; and (b)
there is a substantial probability that the defendant will regain competency
within a reasonable period of time. In the event that the court or jury makes
such a finding, the court may extend the period of commitment for an additional
six months. At the end of the six-month period, if the defendant remains
incompetent, the charges shall be dismissed without prejudice and either civil
commitment proceedings shall be instituted or the court shall order release of
the defendant.

(5)
If the defendant is referred to the county designated mental health
professional for consideration of initial detention proceedings under chapter
71.05 RCW pursuant to this chapter, the county designated mental health
professional shall provide prompt written notification of the results of the
determination whether to commence initial detention proceedings under chapter
71.05 RCW, and whether the person was detained. The notification shall be
provided to the court in which the criminal action was pending, the prosecutor,
the defense attorney in the criminal action, and the facility that evaluated
the defendant for competency.

(6)
The fact that the defendant is unfit to proceed does not preclude any pretrial
proceedings which do not require the personal participation of the defendant.

(7)
A defendant receiving medication for either physical or mental problems shall
not be prohibited from standing trial, if the medication either enables the
defendant to understand the proceedings against him or her and to assist in his
or her own defense, or does not disable him or her from so understanding and
assisting in his or her own defense.

(8)
At or before the conclusion of any commitment period provided for by this
section, the facility providing evaluation and treatment shall provide to the
court a written report of examination which meets the requirements of RCW
10.77.060(3).

Sec.
4. RCW
10.77.097 and 1998 c 297 s 47 are each amended to read as follows:

A
copy of relevant records and reports as defined by the department, in
consultation with the department of corrections, made pursuant to this chapter,
and including relevant information necessary to meet the requirements of RCW
10.77.065(((2))) (1) and 10.77.090, shall accompany the defendant
upon transfer to a mental health facility or a correctional institution or
facility.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 10.77 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
In determining whether a defendant has committed a violent act the court must:

(a)
Presume that a past conviction, guilty plea, or finding of not guilty by reason
of insanity establishes the elements necessary for the crime charged;

(b)
Consider that the elements of a crime may not be sufficient in themselves to
establish that the defendant committed a violent act; and

(c)
Presume that the facts underlying the elements, if unrebutted, are sufficient
to establish that the defendant committed a violent act.

(2)
The presumptions in subsection (1) of this section are rebuttable.

(3)
In determining the facts underlying the elements of any crime under subsection
(1) of this section, the court may consider information including, but not
limited to, the following material relating to the crime:

(a)
Affidavits or declarations made under penalty of perjury;

(b)
Criminal history record information, as defined in chapter 10.97 RCW; and

(c)
Its own or certified copies of another court's records such as criminal
complaints, certifications of probable cause to detain, dockets, and orders on
judgment and sentencing.

Sec.
6. RCW
71.05.235 and 1999 c 11 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If an individual is referred to a county designated mental health professional
under RCW 10.77.090(1)(d)(iii)(A), the county designated mental health
professional shall examine the individual within forty-eight hours. If the
county designated mental health professional determines it is not appropriate
to detain the individual or petition for a ninety-day less restrictive
alternative under RCW 71.05.230(4), that decision shall be immediately
presented to the superior court for hearing. The court shall hold a hearing to
consider the decision of the county designated mental health professional not
later than the next judicial day. At the hearing the superior court shall
review the determination of the county designated mental health professional
and determine whether an order should be entered requiring the person to be
evaluated at an evaluation and treatment facility. No person referred to an
evaluation and treatment facility may be held at the facility longer than
seventy-two hours.

(2)
If an individual is placed in an evaluation and treatment facility under RCW
10.77.090(1)(d)(iii)(B), a professional person shall evaluate the individual
for purposes of determining whether to file a ninety-day inpatient or
outpatient petition under chapter 71.05 RCW. ((Immediately following
completion of the evaluation)) Before expiration of the seventy-two hour
evaluation period authorized under RCW 10.77.090(1)(d)(iii)(B), the
professional person shall file a petition or, if the recommendation of the
professional person is to release the individual, present his or her
recommendation to the superior court of the county in which the
criminal charge was dismissed. The superior court shall review the
recommendation not later than ((the next judicial day)) forty-eight
hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, after the recommendation is
presented. If the court rejects the recommendation to unconditionally
release the individual, the court may order the individual detained at a
designated evaluation and treatment facility for not more than a seventy-two
hour evaluation and treatment period and direct the individual to appear at a
surety hearing before that court within seventy-two hours, or the court may
release the individual but direct the individual to appear at a surety hearing
set before that court within eleven days, at which time the prosecutor may file
a petition under this chapter for ninety-day inpatient or outpatient
treatment. If a petition is filed by the prosecutor, the court may order that
the person named in the petition be detained at the evaluation and treatment
facility that performed the evaluation under this subsection or order the
respondent to be in outpatient treatment. If a petition is filed but the individual
fails to appear in court for the surety hearing, the court shall order that a
mental health professional or peace officer shall take such person or cause
such person to be taken into custody and placed in an evaluation and treatment
facility to be brought before the court the next judicial day after detention.
Upon the individual's first appearance in court after a petition has been
filed, proceedings under RCW 71.05.310 and 71.05.320 shall commence. For an
individual subject to this subsection, the prosecutor or professional person
may directly file a petition for ninety-day inpatient or outpatient treatment
and no petition for initial detention or fourteen-day detention is required
before such a petition may be filed.

The
court shall conduct the hearing on the petition filed under this subsection
within five judicial days of the date the petition is filed. The court may
continue the hearing upon the written request of the person named in the
petition or the person's attorney, for good cause shown, which continuance
shall not exceed five additional judicial days. If the person named in the
petition requests a jury trial, the trial shall commence within ten judicial
days of the date of the filing of the petition. The burden of proof shall be by
clear, cogent, and convincing evidence and shall be upon the petitioner. The
person shall be present at such proceeding, which shall in all respects accord
with the constitutional guarantees of due process of law and the rules of
evidence pursuant to RCW 71.05.250.

During
the proceeding the person named in the petition shall continue to be detained
and treated until released by order of the court. If no order has been made
within thirty days after the filing of the petition, not including any
extensions of time requested by the detained person or his or her attorney, the
detained person shall be released.

(3)
If a county designated mental health professional or the professional person
and prosecuting attorney for the county in which the criminal charge was
dismissed or attorney general, as appropriate, stipulate that the
individual does not present a likelihood of serious harm or is not gravely
disabled, the hearing under this section is not required and the individual, if
in custody, shall be released.

(4)
The individual shall have the rights specified in RCW 71.05.250.

Sec.
7. RCW
71.05.390 and 1999 c 12 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as provided in this section, the fact of admission and all information and
records compiled, obtained, or maintained in the course of providing services
to either voluntary or involuntary recipients of services at public or private
agencies shall be confidential.

Information
and records may be disclosed only:

(1)
In communications between qualified professional persons to meet the
requirements of this chapter, in the provision of services or appropriate
referrals, or in the course of guardianship proceedings. The consent of the patient,
or his or her guardian, shall be obtained before information or records may be
disclosed by a professional person employed by a facility unless provided to a
professional person: (a) Employed by the facility; (b) who has medical
responsibility for the patient's care; (c) who is a county designated mental
health professional; (d) who is providing services under chapter 71.24 RCW; (e)
who is employed by a state or local correctional facility where the person is
confined; or (f) who is providing evaluation, treatment, or follow-up services
under chapter 10.77 RCW.

(2)
When the communications regard the special needs of a patient and the necessary
circumstances giving rise to such needs and the disclosure is made by a
facility providing outpatient services to the operator of a care facility in
which the patient resides.

(3)
When the person receiving services, or his or her guardian, designates persons
to whom information or records may be released, or if the person is a minor,
when his or her parents make such designation.

(4)
To the extent necessary for a recipient to make a claim, or for a claim to be
made on behalf of a recipient for aid, insurance, or medical assistance to
which he or she may be entitled.

(5)
For either program evaluation or research, or both: PROVIDED, That the
secretary adopts rules for the conduct of the evaluation or research, or both.
Such rules shall include, but need not be limited to, the requirement that all
evaluators and researchers must sign an oath of confidentiality substantially
as follows:

"As
a condition of conducting evaluation or research concerning persons who have
received services from (fill in the facility, agency, or person) I,
. . . . . . . . ., agree not to
divulge, publish, or otherwise make known to unauthorized persons or the public
any information obtained in the course of such evaluation or research regarding
persons who have received services such that the person who received such
services is identifiable.

I
recognize that unauthorized release of confidential information may subject me
to civil liability under the provisions of state law.

/s/............................... "

(6)
To the courts as necessary to the administration of this chapter or to a
court ordering an evaluation or treatment under chapter 10.77 RCW solely for
the purpose of preventing the entry of any evaluation or treatment order that
is inconsistent with any order entered under this chapter.

(7)
To law enforcement officers, public health officers, or personnel of the
department of corrections or the indeterminate sentence review board for
persons who are the subject of the records and who are committed to the custody
of the department of corrections or indeterminate sentence review board which
information or records are necessary to carry out the responsibilities of their
office. Except for dissemination of information released pursuant to RCW
71.05.425 and 4.24.550, regarding persons committed under this chapter under
RCW 71.05.280(3) and 71.05.320(2)(c) after dismissal of a sex offense as
defined in RCW 9.94A.030, the extent of information that may be released is
limited as follows:

(a)
Only the fact, place, and date of involuntary admission, the fact and date of
discharge, and the last known address shall be disclosed upon request; and

(b)
The law enforcement and public health officers or personnel of the department
of corrections or indeterminate sentence review board shall be obligated to
keep such information confidential in accordance with this chapter; and

(c)
Additional information shall be disclosed only after giving notice to said
person and his or her counsel and upon a showing of clear, cogent and
convincing evidence that such information is necessary and that appropriate
safeguards for strict confidentiality are and will be maintained. However, in
the event the said person has escaped from custody, said notice prior to
disclosure is not necessary and that the facility from which the person escaped
shall include an evaluation as to whether the person is of danger to persons or
property and has a propensity toward violence.

(8)
To the attorney of the detained person.

(9)
To the prosecuting attorney as necessary to carry out the responsibilities of
the office under RCW 71.05.330(2) and 71.05.340(1)(b) and 71.05.335. The
prosecutor shall be provided access to records regarding the committed person's
treatment and prognosis, medication, behavior problems, and other records
relevant to the issue of whether treatment less restrictive than inpatient
treatment is in the best interest of the committed person or others.
Information shall be disclosed only after giving notice to the committed person
and the person's counsel.

(10)
To appropriate law enforcement agencies and to a person, when the identity of
the person is known to the public or private agency, whose health and safety
has been threatened, or who is known to have been repeatedly harassed, by the
patient. The person may designate a representative to receive the disclosure.
The disclosure shall be made by the professional person in charge of the public
or private agency or his or her designee and shall include the dates of
admission, discharge, authorized or unauthorized absence from the agency's
facility, and only such other information that is pertinent to the threat or
harassment. The decision to disclose or not shall not result in civil
liability for the agency or its employees so long as the decision was reached
in good faith and without gross negligence.

(11)
To the persons designated in RCW 71.05.425 for the purposes described in that
section.

(12)
Civil liability and immunity for the release of information about a particular
person who is committed to the department under RCW 71.05.280(3) and 71.05.320(2)(c)
after dismissal of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, is governed by
RCW 4.24.550.

(13)
To a patient's next of kin, guardian, or conservator, if any, in the event of
death, as provided in RCW 71.05.400.

(14)
To the department of health of the purposes of determining compliance with
state or federal licensure, certification, or registration rules or laws.
However, the information and records obtained under this subsection are exempt
from public inspection and copying pursuant to chapter 42.17 RCW.

The
fact of admission, as well as all records, files, evidence, findings, or orders
made, prepared, collected, or maintained pursuant to this chapter shall not be
admissible as evidence in any legal proceeding outside this chapter without the
written consent of the person who was the subject of the proceeding except in a
subsequent criminal prosecution of a person committed pursuant to RCW
71.05.280(3) or 71.05.320(2)(c) on charges that were dismissed pursuant to
chapter 10.77 RCW due to incompetency to stand trial or in a civil commitment
proceeding pursuant to chapter 71.09 RCW. The records and files maintained in
any court proceeding pursuant to this chapter shall be confidential and
available subsequent to such proceedings only to the person who was the subject
of the proceeding or his or her attorney. In addition, the court may order the
subsequent release or use of such records or files only upon good cause shown
if the court finds that appropriate safeguards for strict confidentiality are and
will be maintained.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---