BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. By
this act, the legislature intends to provide injunctive relief to private
persons who have sustained damage to their own property.

Sec.
2. RCW
90.58.230 and 1971 ex.s. c 286 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

Any person subject to the regulatory program of this chapter who
violates any provision of this chapter or permit issued pursuant thereto shall
be liable for all damage to public or private property arising from such
violation, including the cost of restoring the affected area to its condition
prior to violation. The attorney general or local government attorney shall
bring suit for damages under this section on behalf of the state or local
governments. Private persons shall have the right to bring suit for damages and
for injunctive relief under this section on their own behalf and on the
behalf of all persons similarly situated. If liability has been established
for the cost of restoring an area affected by a violation the court shall make
provision to assure that restoration will be accomplished within a reasonable
time at the expense of the violator. In addition to such relief, including
money damages, the court in its discretion may award attorney's fees and costs
of the suit to the prevailing party.

---
END ---