BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW to read as follows:

The operation of a vessel by the Washington State Ferries or a
municipality, as defined in RCW 35.58.272, that provide services along
established state highway routes is not an action requiring environmental
review under this chapter. The purpose of this section is to clarify the scope
of the application of this chapter to the activities of the Washington State
Ferries and municipalities, and it is the legislature's intent that this
section be given retroactive effect.

---
END ---