BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
38.52.530 and 1997 c 49 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The enhanced 911 advisory committee is created to advise and assist
the state enhanced 911 coordinator in coordinating and facilitating the
implementation and operation of enhanced 911 throughout the state. The
director shall appoint members of the committee who represent diverse
geographical areas of the state and include state residents who are members of
the national emergency number association, the associated public communications
officers Washington chapter, the Washington state fire chiefs association, the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, the Washington state council
of fire fighters, the Washington state council of police officers, the
Washington ambulance association, the state fire protection policy board, the
Washington fire commissioners association, the Washington state patrol, the
association of Washington cities, the Washington state association of counties,
the utilities and transportation commission or commission staff, and
representatives of large and small local exchange telephone companies. This
section ((shall)) expires December 31, ((2000)) 2006.

---
END ---