BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
4.84.340 and 1995 c 403 s 902 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout RCW 4.84.340 through 4.84.360.

(1)
"Administrative tribunal" means an independent agency that
conducts adjudicative proceedings, as defined in RCW 34.05.010, as its sole or
principal duty to: (a) Review decisions of another agency or governmental
unit; or (b) resolve disputes in which the tribunal is not a party.

(2)
"Agency" means any state board, commission, department, institution
of higher education, or officer, authorized by law to make rules or to conduct
adjudicative proceedings, except those in the legislative or judicial branches,
the governor, or the attorney general except to the extent otherwise required
by law.

(((2)))
(3) "Agency action" means agency action as defined by chapter
34.05 RCW.

(((3)))
(4) "Fees and other expenses" includes the reasonable expenses
of expert witnesses, the reasonable cost of a study, analysis, engineering
report, test, or project that is found by the court to be necessary for the
preparation of the party's case, and reasonable attorneys' fees. Reasonable
attorneys' fees shall be based on the prevailing market rates for the kind and
quality of services furnished, except that (a) no expert witness shall be
compensated at a rate in excess of the highest rates of compensation for expert
witnesses paid by the state of Washington, and (b) attorneys' fees shall not be
awarded in excess of one hundred fifty dollars per hour unless the court
determines that an increase in the cost of living or a special factor, such as
the limited availability of qualified attorneys for the proceedings involved,
justifies a higher fee.

(((4)))
(5) "Judicial review" means a judicial review as defined by
chapter 34.05 RCW.

(((5)))
(6) "Qualified party" means (a) an individual whose net worth
did not exceed one million dollars at the time the initial petition for
judicial review was filed or (b) a sole owner of an unincorporated business, or
a partnership, corporation, association, or organization whose net worth did
not exceed five million dollars at the time the initial petition for judicial
review was filed, except that an organization described in section 501(c)(3) of
the federal internal revenue code of 1954 as exempt from taxation under section
501(a) of the code and a cooperative association as defined in section 15(a) of
the agricultural marketing act (12 U.S.C. 1141J(a)), may be a party regardless
of the net worth of such organization or cooperative association.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 4.84 RCW to read as follows:

Notwithstanding the provisions of RCW 4.84.350, no fees or other
expenses shall be awarded against an administrative tribunal for actions taken
solely as an adjudicative body.

---
END ---