BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 41.56 RCW to read as follows:

In addition to the classes of employees listed in RCW 41.56.030(7),
the provisions of RCW 41.56.430 through 41.56.490 are also applicable to
operating and maintenance employees of an agency that, on the effective date of
this act, is operating a commercial nuclear power plant under a site
certificate issued under chapter 80.50 RCW.

---
END ---