BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
49.78.005 and 1997 c 16 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the department shall
cease to administer and enforce this chapter beginning on July 27, 1997, and
until the earlier of the following dates:

(a)
The effective date of the repeal of the federal family and medical leave act of
1993 (Act Feb. 5, 1993, P.L. 103-3, 107 Stat. 6); or

(b)
July 1st of the year following the year in which amendments to the federal
family and medical leave act of 1993 (Act Feb. 5, 1993, P.L. 103-3, 107 Stat.
6) take effect ((that provide less family leave than is provided under RCW
49.78.030)). In determining whether the federal law provides the same or
more leave, the department shall only consider whether (i) the total period of
leave allowed under the amended federal law is twelve or more workweeks in a
twenty-four month period, and (ii) the types of leave authorized under the
amended federal law are similar to the types authorized in this chapter.

(2)
An employee's right under ((RCW 49.78.070(1)(b))) section
10(1)(a)(ii) of this act to be returned to a workplace within twenty miles
of the employee's workplace when leave commenced shall remain in effect. The
family leave required by U.S.C. 29.2612(a)(1)(A) and (B) of the federal family
and medical leave act of 1993 (Act Feb. 5, 1993, P.L. 103-3, 107 Stat. 6) shall
be in addition to any leave for sickness or temporary disability because of
pregnancy or childbirth. The department shall enforce this subsection under ((RCW
49.78.140 through 49.78.190, except that an initial notice of infraction shall
state that)) section 15 of this act, except that the department shall
initially notify the employer that it has thirty days in which to
take corrective action. No ((infraction or penalty may be assessed)) action
under section 15 of this act shall be taken if the employer complies with
the requirements of the department's initial notice ((of infraction)).

Sec.
2. RCW
49.78.010 and 1989 1st ex.s. c 11 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that the demands of the workplace and of families need to be
balanced to promote family stability and economic security. Changes in
workplace leave policies are desirable to accommodate changes in the work force
such as rising numbers of dual-career couples and working single parents. In
addition, given the mobility of American society, many people no longer have
available community or family support networks and therefore need additional
flexibility in the workplace. The legislature declares it to be in the public
interest to provide reasonable ((family leave upon the birth or adoption of
a child and to care for a child under eighteen years old with a terminal health
condition)) leave for medical reasons, for the birth or placement of a
child, and for the care of a family member who has a serious health condition.

Sec.
3. RCW
49.78.020 and 1996 c 178 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Child" means a biological ((or)), adopted, or
foster child, ((or)) a stepchild, ((living with the employee))
a legal ward, or a child of a person standing in loco parentis, who is: (a)
Under eighteen years of age; or (b) eighteen years of age or older and
incapable of self‑care because of a mental or physical disability.

(2)
"Department" means the department of labor and industries.

(3)
"Director" means the director of the department.

(4)
"Employee" means a person other than an independent contractor
employed ((by an employer on a continuous basis for the previous fifty-two
weeks for at least thirty-five hours per week)): (a) For at least
twelve months by the employer with respect to whom leave is requested under
section 4 of this act; and (b) for at least one thousand two hundred fifty
hours of service with such employer during the previous twelve-month period.
"Employee" does not mean a person other than an independent
contractor who is employed at a worksite at which the employer employs less
than fifty employees if the total number of employees employed by that employer
within seventy-five miles of that worksite is less than fifty.

(((4)))
(5) "Employer" means: (a) Any person, firm, corporation,
partnership, business trust, legal representative, or other business entity
which engages in any business, industry, profession, or activity in this state
and includes any unit of local government including, but not limited to, a
county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or
political subdivision, which (((i) employed a daily average of one hundred
or more employees during the last calendar quarter at the place where the
employee requesting leave reports for work, or (ii) employed a daily average of
one hundred or more employees during the last calendar quarter within a twenty
mile radius of the place where the employee requesting leave reports for work,
where the employer maintains a central hiring location and customarily
transfers employees among workplaces)) employs fifty or more employees
for each working day during each of twenty or more calendar workweeks in the
current or preceding calendar year; and (b) the state, state institutions,
and state agencies.

(((5)
"Family leave" means leave from employment to care for a newborn or
newly adopted child under the age of six or a child under eighteen years old
with a terminal health condition, as provided in RCW 49.78.030.))

(6)
"Employment benefits" means all benefits provided or made
available to employees by an employer, including group life insurance, health
insurance, disability insurance, sick leave, annual leave, educational benefits,
and pensions regardless of whether such benefits are provided by a practice or
written policy of an employer or through an employee benefit plan as defined in
29 U.S.C. Sec. 1002(3).

(7)
"Family member" means a child, parent, or spouse of an employee.

(8)
"Health care provider" means: (a) A person licensed as a
physician under chapter 18.71 RCW or an osteopathic physician and surgeon under
chapter 18.57 RCW; or (b) any other person determined by the director to be
capable of providing health care services.

(((7)))
(9) "Parent" means ((a biological or adoptive parent, or a
stepparent)) the biological or adoptive parent of an employee or an
individual who stood in loco parentis to an employee when the employee was a
child.

(((8)))
(10) "Reduced leave schedule" means ((leave scheduled for
fewer than an employee's usual number of hours or days per workweek)) a
leave schedule that reduces that usual number of hours per workweek, or hours
per workday, of an employee.

(((9)
"Terminal health condition" means a condition caused by injury,
disease, or illness, that, within reasonable medical judgment, is incurable and
will produce death within the period of leave to which the employee is
entitled.))

(11)
"Serious health condition" means an illness, injury, impairment, or
physical or mental condition that involves: (a) Inpatient care in a hospital,
hospice, or residential medical care facility; or (b) continuing treatment by a
health care provider.

(12)
"Spouse" means a husband or wife, as the case may be.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

ENTITLEMENT
TO LEAVE. (1) Subject to section 9 of this act, an employee shall be entitled
to a total of twelve workweeks of leave during any twelve‑month period
for one or more of the following:

(a)
Because of the birth of a child of the employee and in order to care for such
child;

(b)
Because of the placement of a child with the employee for adoption or foster
care;

(c)
In order to care for a family member of the employee, if such family member has
a serious health condition; or

(d)
Because of a serious health condition that makes the employee unable to perform
the functions of the position of such employee.

(2)
The entitlement to leave for the birth or placement of a child shall expire at
the end of the twelve‑month period beginning on the date of such birth or
placement.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

LEAVE
TAKEN INTERMITTENTLY OR ON REDUCED LEAVE SCHEDULE. (1) Leave for the birth or
placement of a child shall not be taken by an employee intermittently or on a
reduced leave schedule unless the employee and the employer of the employee
agree otherwise. Subject to section 7(2) of this act and section 9(2)(e) of
this act, leave for a family member's serious health condition or the
employee's serious health condition may be taken intermittently or on a reduced
leave schedule when medically necessary. The taking of leave intermittently or
on a reduced leave schedule pursuant to this section shall not result in a
reduction in the total amount of leave to which the employee is entitled under
section 4 of this act beyond the amount of leave actually taken.

(2)
If an employee requests intermittent leave, or leave on a reduced leave
schedule, for a family member's serious health condition or the employee's
serious health condition, that is foreseeable based on planned medical treatment,
the employer may require such employee to transfer temporarily to an available
alternative position offered by the employer for which the employee is
qualified and that:

(a)
Has equivalent pay and benefits; and

(b)
Better accommodates recurring periods of leave than the regular employment
position of the employee.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

UNPAID
LEAVE PERMITTED--RELATIONSHIP TO PAID LEAVE. (1) Except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section, leave granted under section 4 of this act may
consist of unpaid leave.

(2)(a)
If an employer provides paid leave for fewer than twelve workweeks, the
additional weeks of leave necessary to attain the twelve workweeks of leave
required under this act may be provided without compensation.

(b)
An employee may elect, or an employer may require the employee: (i) To
substitute any of the accrued paid vacation leave, personal leave, or family
leave of the employee for leave for the birth or placement of a child or for a
family member's serious health condition for any part of the twelve‑week
period of such leave; or (ii) to substitute any of the accrued paid vacation
leave, personal leave, or medical or sick leave of the employee for leave
provided for a family member's serious health condition or the employee's
serious health condition for any part of the twelve‑week period of such
leave, except that nothing in this act shall require an employer to provide
paid sick leave or paid medical leave in any situation in which such employer
would not normally provide any such paid leave.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

FORESEEABLE
LEAVE. (1) In any case in which the necessity for leave for the birth or
placement of a child is foreseeable based on an expected birth or placement,
the employee shall provide the employer with not less than thirty days' notice,
before the date the leave is to begin, of the employee's intention to take
leave for the birth or placement of a child, except that if the date of the
birth or placement requires leave to begin in less than thirty days, the
employee shall provide such notice as is practicable.

(2)
In any case in which the necessity for leave for a family member's serious
health condition or the employee's serious health condition is foreseeable
based on planned medical treatment, the employee:

(a)
Shall make a reasonable effort to schedule the treatment so as not to disrupt
unduly the operations of the employer, subject to the approval of the health
care provider of the employee or the health care provider of the family member,
as appropriate; and

(b)
Shall provide the employer with not less than thirty days' notice, before the
date the leave is to begin, of the employee's intention to take leave for a
family member's serious health condition or the employee's serious health
condition, except that if the date of the treatment requires leave to begin in
less than thirty days, the employee shall provide such notice as is
practicable.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
new section is added to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

SPOUSES
EMPLOYED BY SAME EMPLOYER. In any case in which a husband and wife entitled to
leave under this act are employed by the same employer, the aggregate number of
workweeks of leave to which both may be entitled may be limited to twelve
workweeks during any twelve‑month period, if such leave is taken: (1)
For the birth or placement of a child; or (2) for a parent's serious health
condition.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. A
new section is added to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

CERTIFICATION.
(1) An employer may require that a request for leave for a family member's
serious health condition or the employee's serious health condition be
supported by a certification issued by the health care provider of the employee
or of the family member, as appropriate. The employee shall provide, in a
timely manner, a copy of such certification to the employer.

(2)
Certification provided under subsection (1) of this section shall be sufficient
if it states:

(a)
The date on which the serious health condition commenced;

(b)
The probable duration of the condition;

(c)
The appropriate medical facts within the knowledge of the health care provider
regarding the condition;

(d)(i)
For purposes of leave for a family member's serious health condition, a
statement that the employee is needed to care for the family member and an
estimate of the amount of time that such employee is needed to care for the
family member; and

(ii)
For purposes of leave for the employee's serious health condition, a statement
that the employee is unable to perform the functions of the position of the
employee;

(e)
In the case of certification for intermittent leave, or leave on a reduced
leave schedule, for planned medical treatment, the dates on which such
treatment is expected to be given and the duration of such treatment;

(f)
In the case of certification for intermittent leave, or leave on a reduced
leave schedule, for the employee's serious health condition, a statement of the
medical necessity for the intermittent leave or leave on a reduced leave
schedule, and the expected duration of the intermittent leave or reduced leave
schedule; and

(g)
In the case of certification for intermittent leave, or leave on a reduced
leave schedule, for a family member's serious health condition, a statement that
the employee's intermittent leave or leave on a reduced leave schedule is
necessary for the care of the family member who has a serious health condition,
or will assist in their recovery, and the expected duration and schedule of the
intermittent leave or reduced leave schedule.

(3)
In any case in which the employer has reason to doubt the validity of the
certification provided under subsection (1) of this section for leave for a
family member's serious health condition or the employee's serious health condition,
the employer may require, at the expense of the employer, that the employee
obtain the opinion of a second health care provider designated or approved by
the employer concerning any information certified under subsection (2) of this
section for such leave. The second health care provider shall not be employed
on a regular basis by the employer.

(4)
In any case in which the second opinion described in subsection (3) of this
section differs from the opinion in the original certification provided under
subsection (1) of this section, the employer may require, at the expense of the
employer, that the employee obtain the opinion of a third health care provider
designated or approved jointly by the employer and the employee concerning the
information certified under subsection (2) of this section. The opinion of the
third health care provider concerning the information certified under
subsection (2) of this section shall be considered to be final and shall be
binding on the employer and the employee.

(5)
The employer may require that the employee obtain subsequent recertifications
on a reasonable basis.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. A
new section is added to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

EMPLOYMENT
PROTECTION. (1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, any employee
who takes leave under section 4 of this act for the intended purpose of the
leave shall be entitled, on return from such leave:

(i)
To be restored by the employer to the position of employment held by the
employee when the leave commenced; or

(ii)
To be restored to an equivalent position with equivalent employment benefits,
pay, and other terms and conditions of employment at a workplace within twenty
miles of the employee's workplace when leave commenced.

(b)
The taking of leave under section 4 of this act shall not result in the loss of
any employment benefits accrued prior to the date on which the leave commenced.

(c)
Nothing in this section shall be construed to entitle any restored employee to:

(i)
The accrual of any seniority or employment benefits during any period of leave;
or

(ii)
Any right, benefit, or position of employment other than any right, benefit, or
position to which the employee would have been entitled had the employee not taken
the leave.

(d)
As a condition of restoration under (a) of this subsection for an employee who
has taken leave for the employee's serious health condition, the employer may
have a uniformly applied practice or policy that requires each such employee to
receive certification from the health care provider of the employee that the
employee is able to resume work, except that nothing in this subsection (1)(d)
shall supersede a valid local law or a collective bargaining agreement that
governs the return to work of such employees.

(e)
Nothing in this subsection (1) shall be construed to prohibit an employer from
requiring an employee on leave to report periodically to the employer on the
status and intention of the employee to return to work.

(2)
An employer may deny restoration under subsection (1) of this section to any
salaried employee who is among the highest paid ten percent of the employees
employed by the employer within seventy-five miles of the facility at which the
employee is employed if:

(a)
Such denial is necessary to prevent substantial and grievous economic injury to
the operations of the employer;

(b)
The employer notifies the employee of the intent of the employer to deny
restoration on such basis at the time the employer determines that such injury
would occur; and

(c)
In any case in which the leave has commenced, the employee elects not to return
to employment after receiving such notice.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. A
new section is added to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

BENEFITS
PROTECTION. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, during
any period that an employee takes leave under section 4 of this act the
employer shall maintain coverage under any group health plan as defined in 26
U.S.C. Sec. 5000(b)(1) for the duration of such leave at the level and under
the conditions coverage would have been provided if the employee had continued
in employment continuously for the duration of such leave.

(2)
The employer may recover the premium that the employer paid for maintaining
coverage for the employee under such group health plan during any period of
unpaid leave under section 4 of this act, if:

(a)
The employee fails to return from leave under section 4 of this act, after the
period of leave to which the employee is entitled has expired; and

(b)
The employee fails to return to work for a reason other than:

(i)
The continuation, recurrence, or onset of a serious health condition that entitles
the employee to leave for a family member's serious health condition or the
employee's serious health condition; or

(ii)
Other circumstances beyond the control of the employee.

(3)
In the case of an employee unable to return to work because of a family
member's serious health condition, an employer may require that a claim that an
employee is unable to return to work because of the continuation, recurrence,
or onset of the serious health condition described in subsection (2)(b)(i) of
this section be supported by a certification issued by the health care provider
of the family member. The certification described in this subsection shall be
sufficient if the certification states that the employee is needed to care for
the family member who has a serious health condition on the date that the leave
of the employee expired.

(4)
In the case of an employee unable to return to work because of the employee's
serious health condition, an employer may require that a claim that an employee
is unable to return to work because of the continuation, recurrence, or onset
of the serious health condition described in subsection (2)(b)(i) of this
section be supported by a certification issued by the health care provider of
the employee. The certification described in this subsection shall be
sufficient if the certification states that a serious health condition
prevented the employee from being able to perform the functions of the position
of the employee on the date that the leave of the employee expired.

(5)
The employee shall provide, in a timely manner, a copy of the certification
required by either subsection (3) of this section or subsection (4) of this
section to the employer.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. A
new section is added to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

PROHIBITED
ACTS. (1) It shall be unlawful for any employer:

(a)
To interfere with, restrain, or deny the exercise of, or the attempt to
exercise, any right provided under this act; or

(b)
To discharge or in any other manner discriminate against any individual for
opposing any practice made unlawful by this act.

(2)
It shall be unlawful for any person to discharge or in any other manner
discriminate against any individual because such individual:

(a)
Has filed any charge, or has instituted or caused to be instituted any
proceeding, under or related to this act;

(b)
Has given, or is about to give, any information in connection with any inquiry
or proceeding relating to any right provided under this act; or

(c)
Has testified, or is about to testify, in any inquiry or proceeding relating to
any right provided under this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. A
new section is added to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

INVESTIGATIVE
AUTHORITY. (1) To ensure compliance with the provisions of this act, or any
regulation or order issued under this act, the director shall have, subject to
subsection (3) of this section, the investigative authority provided under RCW
49.46.040(1).

(2)
Any employer shall make, keep, and preserve records pertaining to compliance
with this act in accordance with RCW 49.46.040(3) and in accordance with rules
adopted by the director.

(3)
The director shall not under the authority of this section require any employer
or any plan, fund, or program to submit to the director any books or records
more than once during any twelve‑month period, unless the director has
reasonable cause to believe there may exist a violation of this act or any
regulation or order issued pursuant to this act, or is investigating a
complaint pursuant to section 15 of this act.

(4)
For the purposes of any investigation provided for in this section, the
director shall have the authority to issue subpoenas to compel the attendance
of witnesses or parties and the production of books, papers, or records.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. A
new section is added to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

CIVIL
ACTION BY EMPLOYEES. (1) Any employer who violates section 12 of this act
shall be liable:

(a)
For damages equal to:

(i)
The amount of:

(A)
Any wages, salary, employment benefits, or other compensation denied or lost to
such employee by reason of the violation; or

(B)
In a case in which wages, salary, employment benefits, or other compensation
have not been denied or lost to the employee, any actual monetary losses
sustained by the employee as a direct result of the violation, such as the cost
of providing care, up to a sum equal to twelve weeks of wages or salary for the
employee;

(ii)
The interest on the amount described in (a)(i) of this subsection calculated at
the prevailing rate; and

(iii)
An additional amount as liquidated damages equal to the sum of the amount
described in (a)(i) of this subsection and the interest described in (a)(ii) of
this subsection, except that if an employer who has violated section 12 of this
act proves to the satisfaction of the court that the act or omission which
violated section 12 of this act was in good faith and that the employer had
reasonable grounds for believing that the act or omission was not a violation
of section 12 of this act, such court may, in the discretion of the court,
reduce the amount of the liability to the amount and interest determined under
(a)(i) and (ii) of this subsection, respectively; and

(b)
For such equitable relief as may be appropriate, including employment,
reinstatement, and promotion.

(2)
An action to recover the damages or equitable relief prescribed in subsection
(1) of this section may be maintained against any employer in any court of
competent jurisdiction by any one or more employees for and in behalf of:

(a)
The employees; or

(b)
The employees and other employees similarly situated.

(3)
The court in such an action shall, in addition to any judgment awarded to the
plaintiff, allow reasonable attorneys' fees, reasonable expert witness fees,
and other costs of the action to be paid by the defendant.

(4)
Unless the action described in (a) or (b) of this subsection is dismissed
without prejudice on motion of the director, the right provided by subsection
(2) of this section to bring an action by or on behalf of any employee shall
terminate:

(a)
On the filing of a complaint by the director in an action under section 15 of
this act in which restraint is sought of any further delay in the payment of
the amount described in subsection (1)(a) of this section to such employee by
an employer responsible under subsection (1) of this section for the payment;
or

(b)
On the filing of a complaint by the director in an action under section 15 of
this act in which a recovery is sought of the damages described in subsection
(1)(a) of this section owing to an employee by an employer liable under
subsection (1) of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 15. A
new section is added to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

AGENCY
ACTION. (1) The director shall receive, investigate, and attempt to resolve
complaints of violations of section 12 of this act in the same manner that the
director receives, investigates, and attempts to resolve complaints of
violations of RCW 49.46.020 and 49.46.130. The director may bring an action in
superior court to recover the damages described in section 14 of this act.

(2)
Except as provided in this subsection, an action may be brought under this
section by two years after the date of the last event constituting the alleged
violation for which the action is brought. In the case of such action brought
for a willful violation of section 12 of this act, such action may be brought
within three years of the date of the last event constituting the alleged
violation for which such action is brought. In determining when an action is
commenced by the director under this section for the purposes of this
subsection, it shall be considered to be commenced on the date when the
complaint is filed.

(3)
The director also may bring an action in superior court:

(a)
To restrain violations of section 12 of this act, including the restraint of
any withholding of payment of wages, salary, employment benefits, or other
compensation, plus interest, found by the court to be due to eligible
employees; or

(b)
To award such other equitable relief as may be appropriate, including
employment, reinstatement, and promotion.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 16. A
new section is added to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

NOTICE.
Each employer shall post and keep posted, in conspicuous places on the premises
of the employer where notices to employees and applicants for employment are
customarily posted, a notice, to be prepared or approved by the director,
setting forth excerpts from, or summaries of, the pertinent provisions of this
act and information pertaining to the filing of a charge. Any employer that
willfully violates this section may be subject to a civil penalty of not more
than one hundred dollars for each separate offense.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17. A
new section is added to Title 49 RCW to read as follows:

FAMILY
AND MEDICAL LEAVE ENFORCEMENT ACCOUNT. The family and medical leave
enforcement account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. Any sums
recovered by the director pursuant to section 15 of this act shall be deposited
into the account and shall be paid to each employee affected. Any such sums
not paid to an employee because of inability to do so within a period of three
years shall be used only for the purposes of administering and enforcing this
act. Any penalties collected under section 16 of this act shall be deposited
into the account and shall be used only for the purposes of administering and
enforcing this act. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures
under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. A
new section is added to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

EFFECT
ON OTHER LAWS. Nothing in this act shall be construed: (1) To modify or
affect any state or local law prohibiting discrimination on the basis of race,
religion, color, national origin, sex, age, or disability; or (2) to supersede
any provision of any local law that provides greater family or medical leave
rights than the rights established under this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19. A
new section is added to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

EFFECT
ON EXISTING EMPLOYMENT BENEFITS. Nothing in this act shall be construed to
diminish the obligation of an employer to comply with any collective bargaining
agreement or any employment benefit program or plan that provides greater
family or medical leave rights to employees than the rights established under
this act. The rights established for employees under this act shall not be
diminished by any collective bargaining agreement or any employment benefit program
or plan.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 20. A
new section is added to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

ENCOURAGEMENT
OF MORE GENEROUS LEAVE POLICIES. Nothing in this act shall be construed to
discourage employers from adopting or retaining leave policies more generous
than any policies that comply with the requirements under this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 21. A
new section is added to chapter 49.78 RCW to read as follows:

RULE-MAKING
AUTHORITY. The director shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this act
by ninety days after suspension of chapter 49.78 RCW under RCW 49.78.005 is
lifted.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 22. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
49.78.030 (Requirements--Limitation) and 1989 1st ex.s. c 11 s 3;

(2) RCW
49.78.040 (Notice to employer) and 1989 1st ex.s. c 11 s 4;

(3) RCW
49.78.050 (Requirements for confirmation--Second opinion) and
1989 1st ex.s. c 11 s 5;

(4) RCW
49.78.060 (Both parents with same employer) and 1989 1st ex.s. c
11 s 6;

(5) RCW
49.78.070 (Employee employment rights--Limitations) and 1989 1st
ex.s. c 11 s 7;

(6) RCW
49.78.080 (Employee benefits) and 1989 1st ex.s. c 11 s 8;

(7) RCW
49.78.100 (Additional rights--Remedies) and 1989 1st ex.s. c 11 s
10;

(8) RCW
49.78.110 (Collective bargaining agreements--Obligations and
rights not diminished) and 1989 1st ex.s. c 11 s 11;

(9) RCW
49.78.120 (Collective bargaining agreements--Application of
chapter--Grievance procedures) and 1989 1st ex.s. c 11 s 12;

(10) RCW
49.78.130 (Discrimination prohibited) and 1989 1st ex.s. c 11 s
13;

(11) RCW
49.78.140 (Complaint--Contents--Notice--Investigation) and 1989
1st ex.s. c 11 s 14;

(12) RCW
49.78.150 (Notice of infraction--Contents) and 1989 1st ex.s. c
11 s 15;

(13) RCW
49.78.160 (Notice of infraction--Service) and 1989 1st ex.s. c 11
s 16;

(14) RCW
49.78.170 (Notice of infraction--State agencies) and 1989 1st
ex.s. c 11 s 17;

(15) RCW
49.78.180 (Appeal--Hearings--Decisions--Review--Appeal of final decision)
and 1989 1st ex.s. c 11 s 18;

(16) RCW
49.78.190 (Penalties) and 1989 1st ex.s. c 11 s 19; and

(17) RCW
49.78.200 (Poster required) and 1989 1st ex.s. c 11 s 20.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 23. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 24.
Captions used in this act are not any part of the law.

---
END ---