BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
41.40.189 and 1999 c 362 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A retiree or beneficiary who receives state-funded long-term care
services on or after June 1, 1998, is not eligible for the increase provided by
section 8, chapter 340, Laws of 1998, nor for an increase under RCW
41.31.010 or 41.40.197, if the increase would make the retiree or
beneficiary ineligible for state-funded long-term care services. For the
purposes of this section "state-funded long-term care services" means
a state-funded adult family home, adult residential care, assisted living,
enhanced adult residential care, in-home care, or nursing home service, as
defined in RCW 74.39A.009, for which the retiree or beneficiary is
required to contribute all income other than a specified amount reserved for
the ((retiree's)) person's personal maintenance needs. Retirees or
beneficiaries who are subject to this section shall notify the department
in writing. The department has no affirmative duty to identify retirees or
beneficiaries who are subject to this subsection.

(2)
This section applies to all payments under section 8, chapter 340, Laws of 1998
and RCW 41.31.010 and 41.40.197, made on or after May 17, 1999,
regardless of the date of retirement.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 41.32 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A retiree or beneficiary who receives state-funded long-term care services on
or after June 1, 1998, is not eligible for the increase provided by section 7,
chapter 340, Laws of 1998, nor for an increase under RCW 41.31.010 or
41.32.489, if the increase would make the retiree or beneficiary ineligible for
state-funded long-term care services. For the purposes of this section
"state-funded long-term care services" means a state-funded adult
family home, adult residential care, assisted living, enhanced adult
residential care, in-home care, or nursing home service, as defined in RCW
74.39A.009, for which the retiree or beneficiary is required to contribute all income
other than a specified amount reserved for the person's personal maintenance
needs. Retirees or beneficiaries who are subject to this section shall notify
the department in writing. The department has no affirmative duty to identify
retirees or beneficiaries who are subject to this subsection.

(2)
This section applies to all payments under section 7, chapter 340, Laws of 1998
and RCW 41.31.010 and 41.32.489, made on or after May 17, 1999, regardless of
the date of retirement.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---