BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
Marine aquatic farming locations in Washington state have accidentally released
Atlantic salmon into Puget Sound. Similar accidents in Canada have resulted in
the successful spawning of Atlantic salmon in Pacific Northwest habitat. These
events raise concern about the effect of escaped nonnative species on native
runs of Pacific salmon declared threatened or endangered under the federal
endangered species act. It is necessary to minimize the impact of escapes
through the implementation of state-wide prevention measures. The legislature
finds that it is prudent to prohibit establishment of additional Atlantic
salmon marine aquatic farming locations in marine waters until the prevention
programs called for in this chapter are implemented. The legislature further finds
that failure of state agencies to approve the use of antifoulants on nets has
resulted in excessive accumulations of marine organisms whose weight has
contributed to equipment failures that have resulted in escapes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definition in this section applies throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

"Marine
aquatic farming location" means a complete complex that may be composed of
various marine enclosures, net pens, or other rearing vessels, food handling
facilities, or other facilities related to the rearing of Atlantic salmon or
other finfish in marine water. A marine aquatic farming location is
distinguished from the individual facilities that collectively compose the location.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
director, in consultation with persons engaged in Atlantic salmon marine
aquatic farming, shall develop, implement, administer, and enforce rules that
include the following elements:

(1)
Provisions for the prevention of the escape of Atlantic salmon from marine
enclosures, net pens, or other rearing vessels;

(2)
Provisions for the development and implementation of management plans to
facilitate the most rapid recapture of Atlantic salmon that have escaped from
marine enclosures, net pens, or other rearing vessels, and to prevent the
spread or permanent escape of Atlantic salmon. The director shall take all
actions necessary to coordinate these provisions with local tribal fishing managers
and with the north of Falcon process, if necessary;

(3)
Provisions for the eradication of those Atlantic salmon that have escaped from
marine enclosures, net pens, or other rearing vessels found spawning in state
waters. The director shall take all actions necessary to coordinate these
provisions with local tribal fishing managers and with the north of Falcon
process, if necessary;

(4)
Provisions for the development of management practices based on the most
current, accurate, and complete scientific and technical information available,
including the use of antifoulants approved under section 4 of this act, that
are applicable to Atlantic salmon marine aquatic farming;

(5)
Provisions for the development of an Atlantic salmon watch program similar to the
one in operation in British Columbia, Canada. The program must provide for the
monitoring of escapes of Atlantic salmon from marine aquatic farming locations,
monitor the occurrence of naturally produced Atlantic salmon, determine the
impact of Atlantic salmon on naturally produced and cultured finfish stocks,
provide a focal point for consolidation of scientific information, and provide
a forum for interaction and education of the public; and

(6)
The director shall report to the legislature by December 1, 2000, on procedures
and proposed funding methods for observers and unannounced inspections of
Atlantic salmon marine aquatic locations on a regular basis to determine
conformity with law and the rules of the department relating to the operation
of such locations. The director shall include in this report the most current,
accurate, and complete scientific and technical information available on the
use of triploid or female stocks in rearing Atlantic salmon.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
Within sixty days of the effective date of this section, the director, and the
director of the department of ecology, in cooperation with persons engaged in
Atlantic salmon marine aquatic farming, shall approve an antifoulant for use on
nets to prevent the buildup of marine organisms on net pens.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
Within sixty days of the effective date of this section, persons engaged in
Atlantic salmon marine aquatic farming shall develop and implement:

(1)
Written plans for the prevention of Atlantic salmon escapes from marine
enclosures, net pens, or other rearing vessels;

(2)
Written plans and agreements with local fishers to facilitate the most rapid
recapture of Atlantic salmon that have escaped from marine enclosures, net
pens, or other rearing vessels, and to prevent the spread or permanent escape
of Atlantic salmon. Persons engaged in Atlantic salmon marine aquatic farming
shall take all actions necessary to coordinate these provisions with the
department and local tribal fishing managers; and

(3)
Atlantic salmon marine aquatic farming management practices based on the most
current, accurate, and complete scientific and technical information available,
including the use of antifoulants approved under section 4 of this act, that is
applicable to Atlantic salmon marine aquatic farming.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 75 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---