BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
76.48.085 and 1995 c 366 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of natural resources is authorized to adopt by rule a single
form containing at least the following information:

(a)
Information concerning sellers of specialized forest products. The
authorization, sales invoice, or bill of lading required by RCW 76.48.070 that
shall specify (i) the date of its execution; (ii) the number and type of
products sold or being transported; (iii) the name and address of the owner,
vendor, or donor of the specialized forest products; (iv) the name and address
of the vendee, donee, or receiver of the specialized forest products; and (v)
the location of origin of the specialized forest products.

(b)
Information concerning buyers who purchase specialized forest products ((are
required to)). At a minimum, the form must require the buyer to
record (((1))) (i) the permit number; (((2))) (ii)
the type of forest product purchased; (((3))) (iii) the permit
holder's name; ((and (4))) (iv) the amount of forest product
purchased; and (v) the date of purchase.

(2)
The buyer shall keep a record of ((this)) the information required
under subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section for a period of one year
from the date of purchase and make the records available for inspection by
authorized enforcement officials.

(3)
The buyer of specialized forest products must record the license plate number
of the vehicle transporting the forest products on the bill of sale, the
amount paid for the specialized forest products on the bill of sale, as
well as the seller's permit number on the bill of sale. This section shall not
apply to transactions involving Christmas trees.

((The
[This])) (4) This section shall not apply to buyers of specialized
forest products at the retail sales level.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 76.48 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
All law enforcement officers may seize without warrant boats, airplanes,
vehicles, gear, appliances, or other articles they have probable cause to
believe have been used in violation of this chapter. However, law enforcement
officers may not seize any item or article, other than for evidence, if under
the circumstances, it is reasonable to conclude that the violation was
inadvertent. The property seized is subject to forfeiture to the state under
this section regardless of ownership. Property seized may be recovered by its
owner by depositing into court a cash bond equal to the value of the seized
property but not more than twenty‑five thousand dollars. Such cash bond
is subject to forfeiture in lieu of the property. Forfeiture of property
seized under this section is a civil forfeiture against property intended to be
a remedial civil sanction.

(2)
In the event of a seizure of property under this section, jurisdiction to begin
the forfeiture proceedings shall commence upon seizure. Within fifteen days
following the seizure, the seizing authority shall serve a written notice of
intent to forfeit property on the owner of the property seized and on any
person having any known right or interest in the property seized. Notice may
be served by any method authorized by law or court rule, including service by
certified mail with return receipt requested. Service by mail is deemed
complete upon mailing within the fifteen‑day period following the
seizure.

(3)
Persons claiming a right of ownership or right to possession of property are
entitled to a hearing to contest forfeiture. Such a claim shall specify the
claim of ownership or possession and shall be made in writing and served on the
administrative head of the agency that seized the property within forty‑five
days of the seizure. If the seizing authority has complied with notice
requirements and there is no claim made within forty-five days, then the
property shall be forfeited to the state.

(4)
If any person timely serves the administrative head of the agency that seized
the property with a claim to the property, the person shall be afforded an
opportunity to be heard as to the person's claim or right. The hearing shall
be before an administrative law judge appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW, except
that a person asserting a claim or right may remove the matter to a court of
competent jurisdiction if the aggregate value of the property seized is more
than five thousand dollars.

(5)
The hearing to contest forfeiture and any subsequent appeal shall be as
provided for in Title 34 RCW. The seizing authority has the burden to
demonstrate that it had reason to believe the property was held with intent to
violate or was used in violation of this chapter or rule adopted under this
chapter. The person contesting forfeiture has the burden of production and
proof by a preponderance of evidence that the person owns or has a right to
possess the property and:

(a)
That the property was not held with intent to violate or used in violation of
this chapter; or

(b)
If the property is a boat, airplane, or vehicle, that the illegal use or
planned illegal use of the boat, airplane, or vehicle occurred without the
owner's knowledge or consent, and that the owner acted reasonably to prevent
illegal uses of such boat, airplane, or vehicle.

(6)
A forfeiture of a conveyance encumbered by a perfected security interest is
subject to the interest of the secured party if the secured party neither had
knowledge of nor consented to the act or omission. No security interest in
seized property may be perfected after seizure.

(7)
If seized property is forfeited under this section, the agency that seized the
property may retain it for official use unless the property is required to be
destroyed, or upon application by any law enforcement agency of the state,
release such property to the agency for the use of enforcing criminal laws, or
sell the property, and retain the net proceeds for the benefit of the seizing
agency. Money retained under this section may not be used to supplant
preexisting funding sources.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 76.48 RCW to read as follows:

A
person who harvests, or causes to be harvested, any specialized forest products
in violation of this chapter is liable to the property owner for treble the
value of the specialized forest products, plus attorneys' fees. The treble
damages may be recovered in a civil action, and the person forfeits to the
property owner all interest in the specialized forest products.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. RCW
76.48.080 (Contents of authorization, sales invoice, or bill of
lading) and 1979 ex.s. c 94 s 7 & 1967 ex.s. c 47 s 9 are each repealed.

---
END ---