BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
2.70.020 and 1996 c 221 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director, under the supervision and direction of the advisory committee, shall:

(1)
Administer all criminal appellate indigent defense services;

(2)
Submit a biennial budget for all costs related to state appellate indigent
defense;

(3)
Establish administrative procedures, standards, and guidelines for the program
including a cost-efficient system that provides for recovery of costs;

(4)
Recommend criteria and standards for determining and verifying indigency. In
recommending criteria for determining indigency, the director shall compile and
review the indigency standards used by other state agencies and shall
periodically submit the compilation and report to the legislature on the
appropriateness and consistency of such standards;

(5)
Collect information regarding indigency cases funded by the state and report
annually to the legislature and the supreme court;

(6)
Coordinate with the supreme court and the judges of each division of the court
of appeals to determine how attorney services should be provided;

(7)
Within the funds appropriated for this purpose, administer and distribute funds
to improve the legal representation of indigent parents and children in
dependency, state-initiated paternity, and termination cases.

The office of public defense shall not provide direct
representation of clients.

---
END ---