BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
19.28.200 and 1998 c 98 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No license under the provision of this chapter shall be required from any
utility or any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity employed
by a utility because of work in connection with the installation, repair, or
maintenance of lines, wires, apparatus, or equipment owned by or under the
control of a utility and used for transmission or distribution of electricity
from the source of supply to the point of contact at the premises and/or
property to be supplied and service connections and meters and other apparatus
or appliances used in the measurement of the consumption of electricity by the
customer.

(2)
No license under the provisions of this chapter shall be required from any
utility because of work in connection with the installation, repair, or
maintenance of the following:

(a)
Lines, wires, apparatus, or equipment used in the lighting of streets, alleys,
ways, or public areas or squares;

(b)
Lines, wires, apparatus, or equipment owned by a commercial, industrial, or
public institution customer that are an integral part of a transmission or
distribution system, either overhead or underground, providing service to such
customer and located outside the building or structure: PROVIDED, That a
utility does not initiate the sale of services to perform such work;

(c)
Lines and wires, together with ancillary apparatus, and equipment, owned by a
customer that is an independent power producer who has entered into an
agreement for the sale of electricity to a utility and that are used in
transmitting electricity from an electrical generating unit located on premises
used by such customer to the point of interconnection with the utility's
system.

(3)
Any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity licensed under RCW
19.28.120 may enter into a contract with a utility for the performance of work
under subsection (2) of this section.

(4)
No license under the provisions of this chapter shall be required from any
person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity because of the work of
installing and repairing ignition or lighting systems for motor vehicles.

(5)
No license under the provisions of this chapter shall be required from any person,
firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity because of work in connection
with the installation, repair, or maintenance of wires and equipment, and
installations thereof, exempted in RCW 19.28.010.

(6)
The department may by rule exempt from licensing requirements under this
chapter work performed on premanufactured electric power generation equipment
assemblies and control gear involving the testing, repair, modification,
maintenance, or installation of components internal to the power generation
equipment, the control gear, or the transfer switch.

(7)
No license under the provision of this chapter is required from the state of
Washington department of transportation, any county, city, or town because of
work performed within the rights of way of any public highway, road, or street
in connection with the installation, repair, or maintenance of lines, wires,
apparatus, or equipment owned by or under the control of the department of
transportation, any county, city, or town and used for the operation of traffic
control or roadway illumination.

Sec.
2. RCW
19.28.360 and 1986 c 156 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The
provisions of RCW 19.28.210 shall not apply:

(1)
Within the corporate limits of any incorporated city or town which has
heretofore adopted and enforced or subsequently adopts and enforces an
ordinance requiring an equal, higher or better standard of construction and of
materials, devices, appliances and equipment than is required by this chapter.

(2)
Within the service area of an electricity supply agency owned and operated by a
city or town which is supplying electricity and enforcing a standard of
construction and materials outside its corporate limits at the time this act
takes effect: PROVIDED, That such city, town or agency shall henceforth
enforce by inspection within its service area outside its corporate limits the
same standards of construction and of materials, devices, appliances and
equipment as is enforced by the department of labor and industries under the
authority of this chapter: PROVIDED FURTHER, That fees charged henceforth in
connection with such enforcement shall not exceed those established in RCW
19.28.210.

(3)
Within the rights of way of state highways, provided the state department of
transportation maintains and enforces an equal, higher or better standard of
construction and of materials, devices, appliances and equipment than is
required by RCW 19.28.010 through 19.28.360.

(4) Within the rights of way of county roads, provided the
subject county road department maintains and enforces an equal, higher, or
better standard of construction and of materials, devices, appliances, and
equipment than is required by RCW 19.28.010 through 19.28.360, except that for
the inspection of any electrical traffic control device or roadway illumination
system, the electrical inspection may be performed by an inspector with a
current international municipal signal association traffic signal level 2
certification, or equivalent, and four years' experience in the electrical
construction trade installing and maintaining traffic signal and illumination
system electrical wiring and equipment.

---
END ---