BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 36.28A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
No later than December 31, 2001, the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs shall implement and operate an electronic state-wide city and
county jail booking and reporting system. The system shall serve as a central
repository and instant information source for offender information and jail
statistical data. The system shall be placed on the Washington state justice
information network and be capable of communicating electronically with every
Washington state city and county jail and with all other Washington state
criminal justice agencies as defined in RCW 10.97.030.

(2)
After the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs has implemented
an electronic jail booking system as described in subsection (1) of this
section, if a city or county jail or law enforcement agency receives state or
federal funding to cover the entire cost of implementing or reconfiguring an
electronic jail booking system, the city or county jail or law enforcement
agency shall implement or reconfigure an electronic jail booking system that is
in compliance with the jail booking system standards developed pursuant to
subsection (3)(b) of this section.

(3)
After the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs has implemented
an electronic jail booking system as described in subsection (1) of this
section, city or county jails, or law enforcement agencies that operate
electronic jail booking systems, but choose not to accept state or federal
money to implement or reconfigure electronic jail booking systems, shall
electronically forward jail booking information to the Washington association
of sheriffs and police chiefs. At a minimum the information forwarded shall
include the name of the offender, vital statistics, the date the offender was
arrested, the offenses arrested for, and if available, the mug shot. The
electronic format in which the information is sent shall be at the discretion
of the city or county jail, or law enforcement agency forwarding the
information. City and county jails or law enforcement agencies that forward
jail booking information under this subsection are not required to comply with
the standards developed under subsection (4)(b) of this section.

(4)
The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall appoint, convene,
and manage a state-wide jail booking and reporting system standards committee.
The committee shall include representatives from the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs correction committee, the information service
board's justice information committee, at least two individuals who serve as
jailers in a city or county jail, and other individuals that the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs places on the committee. The
committee shall have the authority to:

(a)
Develop and amend as needed standards for the state-wide jail booking and
reporting system and for the information that must be contained within the
system. At a minimum, the system shall contain:

(i)
The offenses the individual has been charged with;

(ii)
Descriptive and personal information about each offender booked into a city or
county jail. At a minimum, this information shall contain the offender's name,
vital statistics, address, and mugshot;

(iii)
Information about the offender while in jail, which could be used to protect
criminal justice officials that have future contact with the offender, such as
medical conditions, acts of violence, and other behavior problems;

(iv)
Statistical data indicating the current capacity of each jail and the quantity
and category of offenses charged; and

(v)
The ability to communicate directly and immediately with the city and county
jails and other criminal justice entities;

(b)
Develop and amend as needed operational standards for city and county jail
booking systems, which at a minimum shall include the type of information
collected and transmitted, and the technical requirements needed for the city
and county jail booking system to communicate with the state-wide jail booking
and reporting system;

(c)
Develop and amend as needed standards for allocating grants to city and county
jails or law enforcement agencies that will be implementing or reconfiguring
electronic jail booking systems.

(5)
By January 1, 2001, the standards committee shall complete the initial standards
described in subsection (4) of this section, and the standards shall be placed
into a report and provided to all Washington state city and county jails, all
other criminal justice agencies as defined in RCW 10.97.030, the chair of the
Washington state senate human services and corrections committee, and the chair
of the Washington state house of representatives criminal justice and
corrections committee.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 36.28A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall establish and
manage a local jail booking system grant fund. All federal or state money
collected to offset the costs associated with section 1(2) of this act shall be
processed through the grant fund established by this section. The state-wide
jail booking and reporting system standards committee established under section
1(3) of this act shall distribute the grants in accordance with any standards
it develops.

(2)
The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall pursue federal
funding to be placed into the local jail booking system grant fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall pursue federal
funding to pay for the costs of implementing the central site of the state-wide
jail booking and reporting system.

---
END ---