BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature declares that promoting and maintaining a financially viable health
care system in all parts of the state is a paramount interest. The legislature
finds that, especially in rural communities, demographics and economic
conditions may result in a large number of people relying on public programs to
pay for their health care. In cases where providers serve a disproportionately
large number of low-income clients, the reimbursement rates from public
programs to primary health care providers may prove insufficient to maintain
their medical practices. The legislature further finds that determining where
providers serve a disproportionately large number of low-income clients and
developing strategies to provide additional compensation will help stabilize
the current health care system, especially in rural areas.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The primary health care provider study is authorized.

(2)
The medical assistance administration and the health care authority shall
jointly conduct a state-wide study to determine payment sources for primary
health care providers performing outpatient primary care services and primary
care in hospital emergency rooms for the state's medical assistance programs,
including healthy options and the basic health plan. The purpose of the study
is to determine which providers serve a relatively high number of low-income
clients, and how that affects their medical practice. The agencies are
directed to use this data to develop proposals to support these providers'
medical practices.

(3)
The medical assistance administration and the health care authority shall
conduct a study of individual primary care providers who perform outpatient
primary care services. This includes primary care providers such as
pediatricians, family practitioners, general practitioners, internists,
physician assistants, or advanced registered nurse practitioners. The agencies
will determine which regions of the state to include in the study, based on
factors they determine will provide the most representative data state-wide.
The agencies shall also consult with interested parties, including any
organization or agency affected by this act. Interested and affected
organizations and agencies include, but are not limited to, representatives of
the medical society, representatives of hospitals employing primary care
physicians, representatives of hospitals providing medical residency programs,
representatives of health maintenance organizations employing primary care physicians,
and representatives of the Washington rural health association. When
consulting with interested and affected organizations and agencies, the medical
assistance administration and the health care authority shall seek the input of
these organizations and agencies concerning how best to construct the
methodology or methodologies that are needed to successfully complete the
primary health care provider study, including, but not limited to, how to
calculate provider cost relative to a regional consumer price index, patient
mix, and organizational variables. As the study develops, the medical
assistance administration and the health care authority shall continue to
consult with the affected organizations and agencies in order to produce final
study methodologies that accurately reflect the impact of the issues on the
affected organizations and agencies. To conduct the study, the agencies may
seek information in relation to such factors as:

(a)
The rates paid to primary care providers for their medical assistance programs,
including healthy options, and basic health plan contracts;

(b)
How these rates compare with nonpublic pay clients for the same services; and

(c)
The payment sources for the providers examined in the study, the size of their
medical practices, and other factors determined by the agencies that may be
important in developing payment methods for such providers.

The
agencies are authorized to attain this information from health plans or
providers. The agencies will maintain the confidentiality of data collected
for the purpose of the study.

(4)
The medical assistance administration and the health care authority shall
determine what constitutes a relatively high percentage of low-income clients
for individual providers who contract for healthy options and the basic health
plan, and recommend whether and at what point this disproportionately high
percentage should result in additional compensation to the primary care
provider.

(5)
The medical assistance administration and the health care authority will
recommend a method to calculate a payment adjustment designed to help support
medical practices, according to the study's findings.

(6) The medical assistance administration and the health care
authority shall report to the legislature by December 1, 2000, with the results
of the primary health care provider study. The report will include
recommendations on: (a) What constitutes a disproportionately high percentage
of low-income clients; (b) possible payment adjustments for these providers;
(c) methods to implement such a rate adjustment; and (d) what such a payment
adjusted program will cost.

---
END ---