BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that people who attend the state patrol academy become
highly trained, important members of our law enforcement system. Washington
state patrol officers are trained at a significant cost to the taxpayer, and
while most cadets at the state patrol academy become state patrol officers with
many years of service to the state, some state patrol officers choose jobs
elsewhere, causing the state to lose its investment in the state patrol
officer.

(2)
The legislature intends to recoup the costs of training Washington state patrol
officers, while ensuring public safety, and balancing the need of the
Washington state patrol officer to move freely and determine his or her future
career.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Washington state patrol officers who are trained at the state patrol academy
must serve in the Washington state patrol for four years upon graduation from
the academy.

(2)
This section does not limit the powers of the chief of the Washington state
patrol to discharge, demote, or suspend a state patrol officer under this
chapter.

(3) Cadets wishing to terminate training and voluntarily leave the
academy after fifty percent of their training is completed must repay the cost
of that portion of their training.

---
END ---