BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Any entity that obtains human fetal tissue, or any biological products as a
result of a human abortion or expulsion of a fetus shall have the informed
consent of the biological parents of the fetus.

(2)
Informed consent shall be in writing and disclose the purpose for which the
entity is obtaining tissue or products and clearly identify the parties to the
consent.

(3)
Failure to obtain necessary informed consent shall constitute a misdemeanor
punishable under RCW 9.92.030. A person may pursue a civil cause of action and
recover their attorneys' fees and costs upon prevailing under this section.

(4) Fetal tissue or any biological products may be donated for
medical research purposes with the consent of the biological parents of the
fetus. If the biological parents do not consent, the fetal tissue or
biological products must be destroyed. Compensation must not be paid to
acquire fetal tissue or any biological products.

---
END ---