BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 90.74 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The standards of this section apply to any state agency approval of a project
that impacts wetlands. Nothing in this section creates any new authority for
regulating wetlands beyond what is specifically provided for in this section.
Nothing in this section creates any requirements for local government
regulation of projects that impact wetlands.

(2)
A state agency shall not approve off-site compensatory mitigation unless it is
to be conducted in the same watershed as the project causing wetland impacts.

(3)
In addition to the limitation of subsection (2) of this section, a state agency
shall not approve off-site compensatory mitigation of the wetland impacts of a
project located within an incorporated area or within a designated urban growth
area, unless the mitigation is to be conducted within five miles of the project
site.

(4)
For purposes of this section:

(a)
"Approval" of a project that impacts wetlands includes the issuance
by any state agency of any regulatory permit, water quality certification, or
other regulatory action approving or conditioning the project.

(b)
"Compensatory mitigation" means the restoration, creation, or
enhancement of wetlands for the purpose of compensating for unavoidable adverse
impacts that remain after all appropriate and practicable avoidance and
minimization has been achieved.

(c)
"Off-site compensatory mitigation" and "off-site
mitigation" means compensatory mitigation undertaken at a location other
than the project site.

(d)
"Project site" means all contiguous real property used or proposed to
be used for the project and compensatory mitigation of wetland or other
impacts.

(e)
"Watershed" means an area identified as a water resource inventory
area under WAC 173-500-040 as it exists on the effective date of this section.
This subsection (3) applies only within counties having a population of greater
than five hundred thousand on the effective date of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 90.74 RCW to read as follows:

The
departments of ecology and fish and wildlife shall implement this chapter
consistent with section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3.
Section 1 of this act applies to any state agency approval of a project that
impacts wetlands where the approval is made on or after January 1, 2000.

---
END ---