BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
department of community, trade, and economic development was created in 1993 by
dissolving the prior department of community development and the prior
department of trade and economic development and transferring their
responsibilities and authorities to that newly created department.

The
purpose of this act is to effectively organize state efforts to address the
community and economic development needs of the citizens of the state of
Washington by restructuring the department of community, trade, and economic
development into two separate agencies, the department of community development
and the department of trade and economic development. The department of trade
and economic development will consist of the existing divisions of economic
development, energy policy, and international trade. The department of
community development will consist of the existing divisions of housing,
community services, and local government.

It
is the intent of the legislature that the restructuring will allow each agency
to: (1) Identify and develop a focused mission; (2) organize and deliver
services in a manner that is responsive to current and future needs; and (3)
effectively target resources to meet the identified mission and needs of the
citizens of the state of Washington in the most efficient and effective manner.

PART
I

DEPARTMENT OF
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT

Sec.
101. RCW
43.330.020 and 1993 c 280 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

((A))
The department of community((, trade, and economic)) development
is created. Except as provided in chapter . . ., Laws of 2000
(this act), the department shall be vested with all powers and duties ((established
or transferred to it under this chapter)) formerly exercised by the
prior department of community development, before its merger with the prior
department of trade and economic development into the department of community,
trade, and economic development by chapter 280, Laws of 1993, and such
other powers and duties as may be authorized by law. ((Unless otherwise
specifically provided in chapter 280, Laws of 1993, the existing
responsibilities and functions of the agency programs will continue to be
administered in accordance with their implementing legislation.))

Sec.
102. RCW
43.63A.021 and 1997 c 367 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Department" means the department of community development.

(2)
"Director" means the director of community development.

(3)
"Dislocated forest products worker" means a forest products worker
who: (a)(i) Has been terminated or received notice of termination from
employment and is unlikely to return to employment in the individual's
principal occupation or previous industry because of a diminishing demand for
his or her skills in that occupation or industry; or (ii) is self-employed and
has been displaced from his or her business because of the diminishing demand
for the business's services or goods; and (b) at the time of last separation
from employment, resided in or was employed in a rural natural resources impact
area.

(((2)))
(4) "Forest products worker" means a worker in the forest
products industries affected by the reduction of forest fiber enhancement,
transportation, or production. The workers included within this definition
shall be determined by the employment security department, but shall include
workers employed in the industries assigned the major group standard industrial
classification codes "24" and "26" and the industries
involved in the harvesting and management of logs, transportation of logs and
wood products, processing of wood products, and the manufacturing and
distribution of wood processing and logging equipment. The commissioner may
adopt rules further interpreting these definitions. For the purposes of this
subsection, "standard industrial classification code" means the code
identified in RCW 50.29.025(6)(c).

(((3)))
(5) "Dislocated salmon fishing worker" means a finfish
products worker who: (a)(i) Has been terminated or received notice of
termination from employment and is unlikely to return to employment in the
individual's principal occupation or previous industry because of a diminishing
demand for his or her skills in that occupation or industry; or (ii) is
self-employed and has been displaced from his or her business because of the
diminishing demand for the business's services or goods; and (b) at the time of
last separation from employment, resided in or was employed in a rural natural
resources impact area.

(((4)))
(6) "Salmon fishing worker" means a worker in the finfish
industry affected by 1994 or future salmon disasters. The workers included
within this definition shall be determined by the employment security
department, but shall include workers employed in the industries involved in
the commercial and recreational harvesting of finfish including buying and
processing finfish. The commissioner may adopt rules further interpreting
these definitions.

Sec.
103. RCW
43.330.040 and 1993 c 280 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The director shall supervise and administer the activities of the department
and shall advise the governor and the legislature with respect to community ((and
economic)) development matters affecting the state.

(2)
In addition to other powers and duties granted to the director, the director
shall have the following powers and duties:

(a)
Enter into contracts on behalf of the state to carry out the purposes of this
chapter;

(b)
Act for the state in the initiation of or participation in any
multigovernmental program relative to the purpose of this chapter;

(c)
Accept and expend gifts and grants, whether such grants be of federal or other
funds;

(d)
To appoint ((such)) a deputy director((s,)) and
assistant directors, and ((up to seven special assistants)) other
positions as may be needed to administer the department. These employees
are exempt from the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW;

(e)
Prepare and submit budgets for the department for executive and legislative
action;

(f)
Submit recommendations for legislative actions as are deemed necessary to
further the purposes of this chapter;

(g)
Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW and perform all other
functions necessary and proper to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(h)
Delegate powers, duties, and functions as the director deems necessary for
efficient administration, but the director shall be responsible for the
official acts of the officers and employees of the department; and

(i)
Perform other duties as are necessary and consistent with law.

(3)
When federal or other funds are received by the department, they shall be
promptly transferred to the state treasurer and thereafter expended only upon
the approval of the director.

(4)
The director may request information and assistance from all other agencies,
departments, and officials of the state, and may reimburse such agencies,
departments, or officials if such a request imposes any additional expenses
upon any such agency, department, or official.

(5)
The director shall, in carrying out the responsibilities of office, consult
with governmental officials, private groups, and individuals and with officials
of other states. All state agencies and their officials and the officials of
any political subdivision of the state shall cooperate with and give such
assistance to the department, including the submission of requested
information, to allow the department to carry out its purposes under this
chapter.

(6)
The director may establish additional advisory or coordinating groups with the
legislature, within state government, with state and other governmental units,
with the private sector and nonprofit entities or in specialized subject areas
as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(7)
The internal affairs of the department shall be under the control of the
director in order that the director may manage the department in a flexible and
intelligent manner as dictated by changing contemporary circumstances. Unless
specifically limited by law, the director shall have complete charge and
supervisory powers over the department. The director may create such
administrative structures as the director deems appropriate, except as
otherwise specified by law, and the director may employ such personnel as may
be necessary in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW, except as otherwise provided
by law.

Sec.
104. RCW
43.330.050 and 1993 c 280 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department shall be responsible for promoting community ((and economic))
development within the state by assisting the state's communities to increase
the quality of life of their citizens and their economic vitality, ((and by
assisting the state's businesses to maintain and increase their economic
competitiveness,)) while maintaining a healthy environment. Community ((and
economic)) development efforts ((shall)) include((: Efforts to
increase economic opportunity;)), but are not limited to: Assisting
local planning to manage growth((;)), service and advocacy for crime
victims, the promotion and provision of affordable housing and
housing-related services((;)), providing public infrastructure((;
business and trade development; assisting firms and industrial sectors to
increase their competitiveness; fostering the development of minority and
women-owned businesses; facilitating technology development, transfer, and
diffusion;)), providing support and assistance for early childhood
education, providing community services and advocacy for low-income
persons((;)), and public safety efforts. The department shall
have the following general functions and responsibilities:

(1)
Provide advisory assistance to the governor, other state agencies, and the
legislature on community ((and economic)) development matters and
issues;

(2)
Assist the governor in coordinating the activities of state agencies that have
an impact on local government and communities;

(3)
Cooperate with the legislature and the governor in the development and
implementation of strategic plans for the state's community ((and economic))
development efforts;

(4)
Solicit private and federal grants for ((economic and)) community
development programs and administer such programs in conjunction with other
programs assigned to the department by the governor or the legislature;

(5)
Cooperate with and provide technical and financial assistance to local
governments((, businesses,)) and community-based organizations serving
the communities of the state for the purpose of aiding and encouraging orderly,
productive, and coordinated community development of the state, and,
unless stipulated otherwise, give additional consideration to local communities
and ((individuals)) community‑based organizations with the
greatest relative need and the fewest resources;

(6)
Participate with other states or subdivisions thereof in interstate programs
and assist cities, towns, counties, municipal corporations, governmental
conferences or councils, and regional planning commissions to participate with
other states and provinces or their subdivisions;

(7)
Hold public hearings and meetings to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(8)
Conduct research and analysis in furtherance of the state's ((economic and))
community development efforts including maintenance of current information on
((market, demographic, and economic trends as they affect different
industrial sectors,)) geographic regions((,)) and communities with
special economic and social problems in the state; and

(9)
Develop a schedule of fees for services where appropriate.

Sec.
105. RCW
43.330.070 and 1993 c 280 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall work closely with local communities to increase their
capacity to respond to economic, environmental, and social problems and
challenges. The department shall coordinate the delivery of ((development
services and)) related technical assistance to local communities or
regional areas((. It shall promote partnerships between the public and
private sectors and between state and local officials to encourage appropriate
economic growth and opportunity in communities throughout the state. The
department)) and shall promote appropriate ((local)) community
development by: ((Supporting the ability of communities to develop and
implement strategic development plans; assisting businesses to start up,
maintain, or expand their operations;)) Encouraging public
infrastructure investment and private and public capital investment in local
communities((;)), supporting efforts to manage growth and provide
affordable housing and housing services((;)), and providing for
the identification and preservation of the state's historical and cultural
resources((; and expanding employment opportunities)).

(2)
The department shall define a set of services including related training
and technical assistance that it will make available to local communities,
community-based nonprofit organizations, and regional areas((, or
businesses)). The department shall simplify access to these programs by
providing more centralized and user-friendly information and referral. The
department shall coordinate community ((and economic)) development
efforts to minimize program redundancy and maximize accessibility. The
department shall develop a set of criteria for targeting services to local
communities.

(3)
The department shall develop a coordinated and systematic approach to providing
related training to community-based nonprofit organizations, local
communities, and ((businesses)) regional areas. The approach
shall be designed to increase the ((economic and)) community development
skills available in local communities by providing training and funding for
training for local citizens((,)) and nonprofit organizations((,
and businesses)). The department shall emphasize providing training in
those communities most in need of state assistance.

Sec.
106. RCW
43.330.125 and 1995 c 347 s 430 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department ((of community, trade, and economic development)) shall
provide training and technical assistance to counties and cities to assist them
in fulfilling the requirements of chapter 36.70B RCW.

Sec.
107. RCW
43.330.135 and 1995 c 13 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department ((of community, trade, and economic development)) shall
distribute such funds as are appropriated for the state-wide technical support,
development, and enhancement of court-appointed special advocate programs.

(2)
In order to receive money under subsection (1) of this section, an organization
providing state-wide technical support, development, and enhancement of
court-appointed special advocate programs must meet all of the following requirements:

(a)
The organization must provide state-wide support, development, and enhancement
of court-appointed special advocate programs that offer guardian ad litem
services as provided in RCW 26.12.175, 26.44.053, and 13.34.100;

(b)
All guardians ad litem working under court-appointed special advocate programs
supported, developed, or enhanced by the organization must be volunteers and
may not receive payment for services rendered pursuant to the program. The
organization may include paid positions that are exclusively administrative in
nature, in keeping with the scope and purpose of this section; and

(c)
The organization providing state-wide technical support, development, and
enhancement of court-appointed special advocate programs must be a public benefit
nonprofit corporation as defined in RCW 24.03.490.

(3)
If more than one organization is eligible to receive money under this section,
the department shall develop criteria for allocation of appropriated money
among the eligible organizations.

Sec.
108. RCW
43.63A.066 and 1993 c 280 s 58 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department ((of community, trade, and economic development)) shall have
primary responsibility for providing child abuse and neglect prevention
training to preschool age children participating in the federal head start
program or the early childhood education and assistance program established
under RCW 28A.215.010 through 28A.215.200 and 28A.215.900 through 28A.215.908.

Sec.
109. RCW
43.63A.115 and 1993 c 280 s 60 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The community action agency network, established initially under the federal
economic opportunity act of 1964 and subsequently under the federal community
services block grant program of 1981, as amended, shall be a delivery system
for federal and state anti-poverty programs in this state, including but not
limited to the community services block grant program, the low-income energy
assistance program, and the federal department of energy weatherization
program.

(2)
Local community action agencies comprise the community action agency network.
The community action agency network shall serve low-income persons in the
counties. Each community action agency and its service area shall be
designated in the state federal community service block grant plan as prepared
by the department ((of community, trade, and economic development)).

(3)
Funds for anti-poverty programs may be distributed to the community action
agencies by the department ((of community, trade, and economic development))
and other state agencies in consultation with the authorized representatives of
community action agency networks.

Sec.
110. RCW
43.63A.155 and 1993 c 280 s 61 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department ((of community, trade, and economic development)) shall
retain the bond information it receives under RCW 39.44.210 and 39.44.230 and
shall publish summaries of local government bond issues at least once a year.

The
department ((of community, trade, and economic development)) shall adopt
rules under chapter 34.05 RCW to implement RCW 39.44.210 and 39.44.230.

Sec.
111. RCW
43.63A.275 and 1993 c 280 s 67 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each biennium the department ((of community, trade, and economic development))
shall distribute such funds as are appropriated for retired senior volunteer
programs (RSVP) as follows:

(a)
At least sixty-five percent of the moneys may be distributed according to
formulae and criteria to be determined by the department ((of community,
trade, and economic development)) in consultation with the RSVP directors
association.

(b)
Up to twenty percent of the moneys may be distributed by competitive grant
process to develop RSVP projects in counties not presently being served, or to
expand existing RSVP services into counties not presently served.

(c)
Ten percent of the moneys may be used by the department ((of community,
trade, and economic development)) for administration, monitoring of the
grants, and providing technical assistance to the RSVP projects.

(d)
Up to five percent of the moneys may be used to support projects that will benefit
RSVPs state-wide.

(2)
Grants under subsection (1) of this section shall give priority to programs in
the areas of education, tutoring, English as a second language, combating of
and education on drug abuse, housing and homeless, and respite care, and shall
be distributed in accordance with the following:

(a)
None of the grant moneys may be used to displace any paid employee in the area
being served.

(b)
Grants shall be made for programs that focus on:

(i)
Developing new roles for senior volunteers in nonprofit and public
organizations with special emphasis on areas targeted in section 1, chapter 65,
Laws of 1992. The roles shall reflect the diversity of the local senior
population and shall respect their life experiences;

(ii)
Increasing the expertise of volunteer managers and RSVP managers in the areas
of communication, recruitment, motivation, and retention of today's over-sixty
population;

(iii)
Increasing the number of senior citizens recruited, referred, and placed with
nonprofit and public organizations; and

(iv)
Providing volunteer support such as: Mileage to and from the volunteer
assignment, recognition, and volunteer insurance.

Sec.
112. RCW
43.63A.400 and 1993 c 280 s 72 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department ((of community, trade, and economic development)) shall
distribute grants to eligible public radio and television broadcast stations
under RCW 43.63A.410 and 43.63A.420 (as recodified by this act) to
assist with programming, operations, and capital needs.

Sec.
113. RCW
43.63A.410 and 1993 c 280 s 73 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Eligibility for grants under this section shall be limited to broadcast
stations which are:

(a)
Licensed to Washington state organizations, nonprofit corporations, or other
entities under section 73.621 of the regulations of the federal communications
commission; and

(b)
Qualified to receive community service grants from the federally chartered
corporation for public broadcasting. Eligibility shall be established as of
February 28th of each year.

(2)
The formula in this subsection shall be used to compute the amount of each
eligible station's grant under this section.

(a)
Appropriations under this section shall be divided into a radio fund, which
shall be twenty-five percent of the total appropriation under this section, and
a television fund, which shall be seventy-five percent of the total
appropriation under this section. Each of the two funds shall be divided into
a base grant pool, which shall be fifty percent of the fund, and an incentive
grant pool, which shall be the remaining fifty percent of the fund.

(b)
Each eligible participating public radio station shall receive an equal share
of the radio base grant pool, plus a share of the radio incentive grant pool
equal to the proportion its nonfederal financial support bears to the sum of
all participating radio stations' nonfederal financial support as most recently
reported to the corporation for public broadcasting.

(c)
Each eligible participating public television station shall receive an equal
share of the television base grant pool, plus a share of the television
incentive grant pool equal to the proportion its nonfederal financial support
bears to the sum of all participating television stations' nonfederal financial
support as most recently reported to the corporation for public broadcasting.

(3)
Annual financial reports to the corporation for public broadcasting by eligible
stations shall also be submitted by the stations to the department ((of
community, trade, and economic development)).

Sec.
114. RCW
43.63A.440 and 1997 c 367 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department ((of community, trade, and economic development)) shall
provide technical and financial assistance to communities adversely impacted by
reductions in timber harvested from federal, state, and private lands and
reduction of salmon fishing caused by efforts to maintain the long-term
viability of salmon stocks. The department shall use existing technical and
financial assistance resources to aid communities in planning, implementing,
and assembling financing for high priority community economic development
projects.

Sec.
115. RCW
43.63A.460 and 1993 c 280 s 76 are each amended to read as follows:

((Beginning
on July 1, 1991,)) The department ((of community, trade, and
economic development)) shall be responsible for performing all the consumer
complaint and related functions of the state administrative agency that are
required for purposes of complying with the regulations established by the
federal department of housing and urban development for manufactured housing,
including the preparation and submission of the state administrative plan.

The
department ((of community, trade, and economic development)) may enter
into state or local interagency agreements to coordinate site inspection
activities with record monitoring and complaint handling. The interagency
agreement may also provide for the reimbursement for cost of work that an
agency performs. The department may include other related areas in any
interagency agreements which are necessary for the efficient provision of
services.

((The
department of labor and industries shall transfer all records, files, books,
and documents necessary for the department of community, trade, and economic
development to assume these new functions.

The
directors of community, trade, and economic development and the department of labor
and industries shall immediately take such steps as are necessary to ensure
that this act is implemented on June 7, 1990.))

Sec.
116. RCW
43.63A.600 and 1995 c 226 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department ((of community, trade, and economic development)), as a
member of the agency rural community assistance task force shall establish and
administer the emergency mortgage and rental assistance program. The
department shall identify the communities most adversely affected by reductions
in timber and salmon harvest levels and shall prioritize assistance under this
program to these communities. The department shall work with the department of
social and health services and the rural community assistance ((recovery))
coordinator to develop the program in rural natural resources impact areas.
Organizations eligible to receive grant funds for distribution under the
program are those organizations that are eligible to receive assistance through
the Washington housing trust fund. The department shall disburse the funds to
eligible local organizations as grants. The local organizations shall use the
funds to make grants or loans as specified in RCW 43.63A.600 through 43.63A.640
(as recodified by this act). If funds are disbursed as loans, the local
organization shall establish a revolving grant and loan fund with funds
received as loan repayments and shall continue to make grants or loans or both
grants and loans from funds received as loan repayments to dislocated forest
products and dislocated salmon fishing workers eligible under the provisions of
RCW 43.63A.600 through 43.63A.640 (as recodified by this act) and to
other persons residing in rural natural resources impact areas who meet the
requirements of RCW 43.63A.600 through 43.63A.640 (as recodified by this
act).

(2)
The goals of the program are to:

(a)
Provide temporary emergency mortgage loans or rental assistance grants or loans
on behalf of dislocated forest products and dislocated salmon fishing workers
in rural natural resources impact areas who are unable to make mortgage,
property tax, or rental payments on their permanent residences and are subject
to immediate eviction for nonpayment of mortgage installments, property taxes,
or nonpayment of rent;

(b)
Prevent the dislocation of individuals and families from their permanent
residences and their communities; and

(c)
Maintain economic and social stability in rural natural resources impact areas.

Sec.
117. RCW
43.330.152 and 1994 c 284 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

In
order to extend its services and programs, the department may charge reasonable
fees for services and products provided in the areas of financial assistance,
housing, ((international trade,)) community assistance, ((economic
development,)) and other service delivery areas, except as otherwise
provided. These fees are not intended to exceed the costs of providing the
service or preparing and distributing the product.

Sec.
118. RCW
43.330.155 and 1994 c 284 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
community ((and economic)) development fee account is created in the
state treasury. The department may create subaccounts as necessary. The
account consists of all receipts from fees charged by the department under RCW
43.330.150((,)) and 43.330.152((, and 43.210.110)) (as
recodified by this act). Expenditures from the account may be used only
for the purposes of this chapter. Only the director or the director's designee
may authorize expenditures from the account. Expenditures from the account may
be spent only after appropriation.

Sec.
119. RCW
43.330.156 and 1994 c 284 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The
fees authorized under RCW 43.330.150((,)) and 43.330.152((,
70.95H.040, and 43.210.110)) (as recodified by this act) shall be
adopted by rule pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec.
120. RCW
43.330.904 and 1996 c 186 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All powers, duties, and functions of the state energy office relating to ((energy
resource policy and planning and)) energy facility siting are transferred
to the department ((of community, trade, and economic development)).
All references to the director or the state energy office in the Revised Code
of Washington shall be construed to mean the director or the department ((of
community, trade, and economic development)) when referring to the
functions transferred in this section.

((The
director shall appoint an assistant director for energy policy, and energy
policy staff shall have no additional responsibilities beyond activities
concerning energy policy.))

(2)(a)
All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written
material in the possession of the state energy office pertaining to the powers,
functions, and duties transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the
department ((of community, trade, and economic development)). All
cabinets, furniture, office equipment, software, data base, motor vehicles, and
other tangible property employed by the state energy office in carrying out the
powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be made available to the
department ((of community, trade, and economic development)).

(b)
Any appropriations made to the state energy office for carrying out the powers,
functions, and duties transferred ((shall, on July 1, 1996, be)) are
transferred and credited to the department ((of community, trade, and
economic development)).

(c)
Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any funds, books, documents,
records, papers, files, software, data base, equipment, or other tangible
property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the
duties and functions transferred, the director of financial management shall
make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the
state agencies concerned.

(3)
((All employees of the state energy office engaged in performing the powers,
functions, and duties pertaining to the energy facility site evaluation council
are transferred to the jurisdiction of the department of community, trade, and
economic development. All employees engaged in energy facility site evaluation
council duties classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law,
are assigned to the department of community, trade, and economic development to
perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of
rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance
with the laws and rules governing state civil service.

(4))) All
rules and all pending business before the state energy office pertaining to the
powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be continued and acted upon by
the department ((of community, trade, and economic development)). All
existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be
performed by the department ((of community, trade, and economic development)).

(((5)))
(4) The transfer of the powers, duties, and functions of the state
energy office does not affect the validity of any act performed before July 1,
((1996)) 2000.

(((6)))
(5) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the
transfers directed by this section, the director of the office of financial
management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state
auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate
transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation.

(((7)
The department of community, trade, and economic development shall direct the
closure of the financial records of the state energy office.

(8)
Responsibility for implementing energy education, applied research, and
technology transfer programs rests with Washington State University. The
department of community, trade, and economic development shall provide
Washington State University available existing and future oil overcharge
restitution and federal energy block funding for a minimum period of five years
to carry out energy programs under an interagency agreement with the department
of community, trade, and economic development. The interagency agreement shall
also outline the working relationship between the department of community,
trade, and economic development and Washington State University as it pertains
to the relationship between energy policy development and public outreach. Nothing
in chapter 186, Laws of 1996 prohibits Washington State University from seeking
grant, contract, or fee-for-service funding for energy or related programs
directly from other entities.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 121. A
new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
All powers, duties, and functions of the department of community, trade, and
economic development pertaining to community development are transferred to the
department of community development. All references to the director or the
department of community, trade, and economic development in the Revised Code of
Washington shall be construed to mean the director or the department of
community development when referring to the functions transferred in this
section.

(2)(a)
All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written
material in the possession of the department of community, trade, and economic
development pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall
be delivered to the custody of the department of community development. All
cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible
property employed by the department of community, trade, and economic
development in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall
be made available to the department of community development. All funds,
credits, or other assets held in connection with the powers, functions, and
duties transferred shall be assigned to the department of community
development.

(b)
Any appropriations made to the department of community, trade, and economic
development for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall, on the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to
the department of community development.

(c)
Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books,
documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used
or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and
functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a
determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state
agencies concerned.

(3)
All employees of the department of community, trade, and economic development
engaged in performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred are
transferred to the jurisdiction of the department of community development.
All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law,
are assigned to the department of community development to perform their usual
duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to
any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and
rules governing state civil service.

(4)
All rules and all pending business before the department of community, trade,
and economic development pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the department of community
development. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force
and shall be performed by the department of community development.

(5)
The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the department
of community, trade, and economic development shall not affect the validity of
any act performed before the effective date of this section.

(6)
If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers
directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify
the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state
treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments
in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with
the certification.

(7)
Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any existing
collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing collective
bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or until the bargaining
unit has been modified by action of the personnel board as provided by law.

Sec.
122. RCW
41.06.072 and 1995 c 399 s 59 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to the exemptions set forth in this chapter, this chapter shall not
apply within the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development to the director, one confidential secretary, the deputy directors,
all assistant directors, and the state historic preservation officer((,
and up to two professional staff members within the emergency management
program)).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 123. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
43.330.005 (Intent) and 1993 c 280 s 1;

(2) RCW 43.330.007
(Management responsibility) and 1993 c 280 s 2;

(3) RCW
43.330.010 (Definitions) and 1993 c 280 s 3; and

(4) RCW
43.330.900 (References to director and department) and 1993 c 280
s 79.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 124. The
following sections are each recodified as new sections in chapter 43.330 RCW:

RCW
43.63A.021

RCW
43.63A.066

RCW
43.63A.067

RCW
43.63A.075

RCW
43.63A.105

RCW
43.63A.115

RCW
43.63A.125

RCW
43.63A.150

RCW
43.63A.155

RCW
43.63A.190

RCW
43.63A.215

RCW
43.63A.240

RCW
43.63A.245

RCW
43.63A.247

RCW
43.63A.249

RCW
43.63A.265

RCW
43.63A.270

RCW
43.63A.275

RCW
43.63A.400

RCW
43.63A.410

RCW
43.63A.420

RCW
43.63A.440

RCW
43.63A.460

RCW
43.63A.465

RCW
43.63A.4651

RCW
43.63A.470

RCW
43.63A.475

RCW
43.63A.480

RCW
43.63A.485

RCW
43.63A.490

RCW
43.63A.500

RCW
43.63A.510

RCW
43.63A.550

RCW
43.63A.600

RCW
43.63A.610

RCW
43.63A.620

RCW
43.63A.630

RCW
43.63A.640

RCW
43.63A.650

RCW
43.63A.660

RCW
43.63A.670

RCW
43.63A.680

RCW
43.63A.720

RCW
43.63A.725

RCW
43.63A.730

RCW
43.63A.735

RCW
43.63A.740

RCW
43.63A.900

RCW
43.63A.901

RCW
43.63A.902

RCW
43.63A.903

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 125. The
following sections are recodified in chapter 43.330 RCW near the end of the
chapter:

RCW
43.330.150

RCW
43.330.152

RCW
43.330.155

RCW
43.330.156

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 126. The
code reviser may recodify the following sections in chapter 43.330 RCW:

RCW
43.330.190

RCW
43.330.200

RCW
43.330.210

RCW
43.330.220

RCW
43.330.230

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 127. The
code reviser shall insert notes following all sections containing references to
the department of community, trade, and economic development indicating that
this agency is now referred to as the department of community development.

PART
II

DEPARTMENT OF
TRADE AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 201. The
department of trade and economic development is created. Except as provided in
this act, the department shall be vested with all powers and duties formerly
exercised by the prior department of trade and economic development, before its
merger with the prior department of community development into the department
of community, trade, and economic development by chapter 280, Laws of 1993, and
such other powers and duties as may be authorized by law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 202.
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section
apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Associate development organization" means a local economic
development nonprofit corporation that is broadly representative of community
interests.

(2)
"Department" means the department of trade and economic development.

(3)
"Director" means the director of trade and economic development.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 203. (1)
The director shall supervise and administer the activities of the department
and shall advise the governor and the legislature with respect to economic
development matters affecting the state.

(2)
In addition to other powers and duties granted to the director, the director
shall have the following powers and duties:

(a)
To enter into contracts on behalf of the state to carry out the purposes of
this chapter;

(b)
To act for the state in the initiation of or participation in any
multigovernmental program relative to the purpose of this chapter;

(c)
To accept and expend gifts and grants, whether such grants be of federal or
other funds;

(d)
To appoint a deputy director, assistant directors, and other positions as may
be needed to administer the department. These employees are exempt from the
provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW;

(e)
To prepare and submit budgets for the department for executive and legislative
action;

(f)
To submit recommendations for legislative actions as are deemed necessary to
further the purposes of this chapter;

(g)
To adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW and perform all other
functions necessary and proper to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(h)
To delegate powers, duties, and functions as the director deems necessary for
efficient administration, but the director shall be responsible for the
official acts of the officers and employees of the department; and

(i)
To perform other duties as are necessary and consistent with law.

(3)
When federal or other funds are received by the department, they shall be
promptly transferred to the state treasurer and thereafter expended only upon
the approval of the director.

(4)
The director may request information and assistance from all other agencies,
departments, and officials of the state, and may reimburse such agencies,
departments, or officials if such a request imposes any additional expenses
upon any such agency, department, or official.

(5)
The director shall, in carrying out the responsibilities of office, consult
with governmental officials, private groups, and individuals and with officials
of other states. All state agencies and their officials and the officials of
any political subdivision of the state shall cooperate with and give such
assistance to the department, including the submission of requested
information, to allow the department to carry out its purposes under this
chapter.

(6)
The director may establish additional advisory or coordinating groups with the
legislature, within state government, with state and other governmental units,
with the private sector and nonprofit entities or in specialized subject areas
as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(7)
The internal affairs of the department shall be under the control of the
director in order that the director may manage the department in a flexible and
intelligent manner as dictated by changing contemporary circumstances. Unless
specifically limited by law, the director shall have complete charge and
supervisory powers over the department. The director may create such
administrative structures as the director deems appropriate, except as
otherwise specified by law, and the director may employ such personnel as may
be necessary in accordance with chapter 41.06 RCW, except as otherwise provided
by law.

(8)
The director may enter into an interagency agreement with the department of
community development to appoint an employee of that agency as the director's designee
to the forest practices board under RCW 76.09.030(1)(b) if it is in the best
interests of the department to do so. Any interagency agreement entered into
under this subsection, shall expire on June 30, 2001. The department may not
enter into an interagency agreement under this subsection after June 30, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 204. The
department shall be responsible for promoting economic development within the
state by assisting the state's communities to increase the quality of life and
their economic vitality, while maintaining a quality environment. Economic
development efforts include, but are not limited to, efforts to increase
economic opportunities, business and trade development, work force development,
assisting firms and industrial sectors to increase their competitiveness,
fostering the development of minority and women-owned businesses, and
facilitating the development, transfer, and diffusion of technology.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 205. (1)
The department shall work closely with local communities to increase their
capacity to respond to economic problems and challenges. The department shall
coordinate the delivery of development services and related technical
assistance to local communities or regional areas. It shall promote
partnerships between the public and private sectors and between state and local
officials to encourage and manage appropriate economic growth and opportunity
in communities throughout the state and shall promote appropriate local
economic development by supporting the ability of communities to develop and
implement strategic development plans, assisting businesses to start up,
maintain, or expand their operations, and expanding employment opportunities.

(2)
The department shall define a set of services including related training and
technical assistance that it will make available to local communities,
community-based nonprofit organizations, regional areas, or businesses. The
department shall simplify access to these programs by providing more
centralized and user-friendly information and referral. The department shall
coordinate economic development efforts to minimize program redundancy and
maximize accessibility. The department shall develop a set of criteria for
targeting services to local communities.

(3)
The department shall develop a coordinated and systematic approach to providing
related training to community-based nonprofit organizations, local communities,
and businesses. The approach shall be designed to increase the economic
development skills available in local communities by providing training and
funding for training for local citizens, nonprofit organizations, and
businesses. The department shall emphasize providing training in those communities
most in need of state assistance.

Sec.
206. RCW
43.63A.230 and 1993 c 280 s 63 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department ((of community, trade, and economic development)) shall
integrate an employee ownership program within its existing technical
assistance programs. The employee ownership program shall provide technical
assistance to cooperatives authorized under chapter 23.78 RCW and conduct
educational programs on employee ownership and self-management. The department
shall include information on the option of employee ownership wherever
appropriate in its various programs.

(2)
The department shall maintain a list of firms and individuals with expertise in
the field of employee ownership and utilize such firms and individuals, as
appropriate, in delivering and coordinating the delivery of technical,
managerial, and educational services. In addition, the department shall work
with and rely on the services of the department of community development,
the employment security department, and state institutions of higher
education to promote employee ownership.

(3)
The department shall report to the governor, the appropriate economic
development committees of the senate and the house of representatives, and the
ways and means committees of each house by December 1st of ((1988,
and)) each year ((thereafter,)) on the accomplishments of the
employee-ownership program. Such reports shall include the number and types of
firms assisted, the number of jobs created by such firms, the types of
services, the number of workshops presented, the number of employees trained,
and the results of client satisfaction surveys distributed to those using the
services of the program.

(4)
For purposes of this section, an employee stock ownership plan qualifies as a
cooperative if at least fifty percent, plus one share, of its voting shares of
stock are voted on a one-person-one-vote basis.

Sec.
207. RCW
43.330.065 and 1996 c 253 s 303 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department ((of community, trade, and economic development)), in
consultation with the office of protocol, the office of the secretary of state,
the department of agriculture, and the employment security department shall
identify up to fifteen countries that are of strategic importance to the
development of Washington's international trade relations.

Sec.
208. RCW
43.330.080 and 1997 c 60 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall contract with associate development organizations or other
local organizations to increase the support for and coordination of ((community
and)) economic development services in communities or regional areas. The
organizations contracted with in each community or regional area shall be
broadly representative of community and economic interests. The organization
shall be capable of identifying key economic ((and community))
development problems, developing appropriate solutions, and mobilizing broad
support for recommended initiatives. The contracting organization shall work
with and include local governments, local chambers of commerce, private
industry councils, port districts, labor groups, institutions of higher
education, community action programs, and other appropriate private, public, or
nonprofit ((community and)) economic development groups. The department
shall be responsible for determining the scope of services delivered under
these contracts.

(2)
Associate development organizations or other local development organizations
contracted with shall promote and coordinate, through local service agreements
with local governments, small business development centers, port districts,
community and technical colleges, private industry councils, and other
development organizations, for the efficient delivery of ((community and))
economic development services in their areas.

(3)
The department shall consult with associate development organizations, port
districts, local governments, and other local development organizations in the
establishment of service delivery regions throughout the state. The
legislature encourages local associate development organizations to form
partnerships with other associate development organizations in their region to
combine resources for better access to available services, to encourage
regional delivery of state services, and to build the local capacity of
communities in the region more effectively.

(4)
The department shall contract on a regional basis for surveys of key sectors of
the regional economy and the coordination of technical assistance to businesses
and employees within the key sectors. The department's selection of contracting
organizations or consortiums shall be based on the sufficiency of the
organization's or consortium's proposal to examine key sectors of the local
economy within its region adequately and its ability to coordinate the delivery
of services required by businesses within the targeted sectors. Organizations
contracting with the department shall work closely with the department to
examine the local economy and to develop strategies to focus on developing key
sectors that show potential for long-term sustainable growth. The contracting
organization shall survey businesses and employees in targeted sectors on a
periodic basis to gather information on the sector's business needs, expansion
plans, relocation decisions, training needs, potential layoffs, financing
needs, availability of financing, and other appropriate information about
economic trends and specific employer and employee needs in the region.

(5)
The contracting organization shall participate with the work force training and
education coordinating board as created in chapter 28C.18 RCW, and any regional
entities designated by that board, in providing for the coordination of job
skills training within its region.

Sec.
209. RCW
43.31.057 and 1993 c 280 s 39 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department ((of community, trade, and economic development)) is directed
to develop and promote means to stimulate the expansion of the market for
Washington products and shall have the following powers and duties:

(1)
To develop a pamphlet for state-wide circulation which will encourage the
purchase of items produced in the state of Washington;

(2)
To include in the pamphlet a listing of products of Washington companies which
individuals can examine when making purchases so they may have the opportunity
to select one of those products in support of this program;

(3)
To distribute the pamphlets on the broadest possible basis through local
offices of state agencies, business organizations, chambers of commerce, or any
other means the department deems appropriate;

(4)
In carrying out these powers and duties the department shall cooperate and
coordinate with other agencies of government and the private sector.

Sec.
210. RCW
43.31.093 and 1995 c 399 s 71 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department ((of community, trade, and economic development)) shall
contract with public and private agencies, institutions, and organizations to
conduct entrepreneurial training courses for minority and women-owned small
businesses. The instruction shall be intensive, practical training courses in
financing, marketing, managing, accounting, and recordkeeping for a small
business, with an emphasis on federal, state, local, or private programs
available to assist small businesses. The ((business assistance center))
department may recommend professional instructors, with practical
knowledge and experience on how to start and operate a business, to teach the
courses. Instruction shall be offered in major population centers throughout
the state at times and locations which are convenient for minority and women
small business owners and entrepreneurs.

Sec.
211. RCW
43.31.205 and 1993 c 280 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

In
an effort to enhance the economy of the Tri-Cities area, the department ((of
community, trade, and economic development)) is directed to promote the
existence of the lease between the state of Washington and the federal
government executed September 10, 1964, covering one thousand acres of land
lying within the Hanford reservation near Richland, Washington, and the
opportunity of subleasing the land to entities for nuclear-related industry, in
agreement with the terms of the lease. When promoting the existence of the
lease, the department shall work in cooperation with any associate development
organization located in or near the Tri-Cities area.

Sec.
212. RCW
43.31.409 and 1993 c 280 s 42 are each amended to read as follows:

((There
is created in the business assistance center of the department of community,
trade, and economic development)) The Washington investment
opportunities office is created in the department.

Sec.
213. RCW
43.31.422 and 1998 c 76 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
Hanford area economic investment fund is established in the custody of the
state treasurer. Moneys in the fund shall only be used for reasonable
assistant attorney general costs in support of the committee or pursuant to the
recommendations of the committee created in RCW 43.31.425 and the approval of
the director ((of community, trade, and economic development)) for
Hanford area revolving loan funds, Hanford area infrastructure projects, or
other Hanford area economic development and diversification projects, but may
not be used for government or nonprofit organization operating expenses. Up to
five percent of moneys in the fund may be used for program administration. For
the purpose of this chapter "Hanford area" means Benton and Franklin
counties. Disbursements from the fund shall be on the authorization of the
director ((of community, trade, and economic development)) or the
director's designee after an affirmative vote of at least six members of the
committee created in RCW 43.31.425 on any recommendations by the committee
created in RCW 43.31.425. The fund is subject to the allotment procedures
under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for disbursements.
The legislature intends to establish similar economic investment funds for
areas that develop low-level radioactive waste disposal facilities.

Sec.
214. RCW
43.31.504 and 1993 c 280 s 45 are each amended to read as follows:

The
child care facility fund committee is established within the ((business
assistance center of the)) department ((of community, trade, and
economic development)). The committee shall administer the child care
facility fund, with review by the director ((of community, trade, and
economic development)).

(1)
The committee shall have five members. The director ((of community, trade,
and economic development)) shall appoint the members, who shall include:

(a)
Two persons experienced in investment finance and having skills in providing
capital to new businesses, in starting and operating businesses, and providing
professional services to small or expanding businesses;

(b)
One person representing a philanthropic organization with experience in
evaluating funding requests;

(c)
One child care services expert; and

(d)
One early childhood development expert.

In
making these appointments, the director shall give careful consideration to
ensure that the various geographic regions of the state are represented and
that members will be available for meetings and are committed to working
cooperatively to address child care needs in Washington state.

(2)
The committee shall elect officers from among its membership and shall adopt
policies and procedures specifying the lengths of terms, methods for filling
vacancies, and other matters necessary to the ongoing functioning of the
committee.

(3)
Committee members shall serve without compensation, but may request
reimbursement for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(4)
Committee members shall not be liable to the state, to the child care facility
fund, or to any other person as a result of their activities, whether
ministerial or discretionary, as members except for willful dishonesty or
intentional violation of the law. The department ((of community, trade, and
economic development)) may purchase liability insurance for members and may
indemnify these persons against the claims of others.

Sec.
215. RCW
43.31.522 and 1993 c 280 s 46 are each amended to read as follows:

((Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout)) As used in RCW 43.31.524 and 43.31.526((:

(1)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(2)
"Center" means the business assistance center established under RCW
43.31.083.

(3)
"Director" means the director of community, trade, and economic
development.

(4)))
"local nonprofit organization" means a local nonprofit
organization organized to provide economic development or community development
services, including but not limited to associate development organizations,
economic development councils, and community development corporations.

Sec.
216. RCW
43.31.524 and 1993 c 280 s 47 are each amended to read as follows:

There
is established a Washington marketplace program within the ((business
assistance center established under RCW 43.31.083)) department. The
program shall assist businesses to competitively meet their needs for goods and
services within Washington state by providing information relating to the
replacement of imports or the fulfillment of new requirements with Washington
products produced in Washington state. The program shall place special
emphasis on strengthening rural economies in economically distressed areas of
the state meeting the criteria of an "eligible area" as defined in
RCW 82.60.020(3).

Sec.
217. RCW
43.31.641 and 1997 c 367 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department ((of community, trade, and economic development)), as a
member of the agency rural community assistance task force, shall:

(1)
Administer available federal grant funds to support strategic diversification
needs and opportunities of timber-dependent communities, value-added forest
products firms, and the value-added forest products industry in Washington
state.

(2)
Provide value-added wood products companies with building products export
development assistance.

Sec.
218. RCW
43.31.830 and 1993 c 280 s 53 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
It shall be the duty of the director ((of community, trade, and economic
development)) to certify, from the applications received, the state
international trade fair or fairs qualified and entitled to receive funds under
RCW 67.16.100, and under rules established by the director.

(2)
The director shall make annual allotments to state international trade fairs
determined qualified to be entitled to participate in the state trade fair fund
and shall fix times for the division of and payment from the state trade fair
fund: PROVIDED, That total payment to any one state international trade fair
shall not exceed sixty thousand dollars in any one year, where participation or
presentation occurs within the United States, and eighty thousand dollars in
any one year, where participation or presentation occurs outside the United
States: PROVIDED FURTHER, That a state international trade fair may qualify
for the full allotment of funds under either category. Upon certification of
the allotment and division of fair funds by the director the treasurer shall
proceed to pay the same to carry out the purposes of RCW 67.16.100.

Sec.
219. RCW
43.31.840 and 1993 c 280 s 54 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director ((of community, trade, and economic development)) shall at the
end of each year for which an annual allotment has been made, conduct a post
audit of all of the books and records of each state international trade fair
participating in the state trade fair fund. The purpose of such post audit
shall be to determine how and to what extent each participating state
international trade fair has expended all of its funds.

The
audit required by this section shall be a condition to future allotments of
money from the state international trade fair fund, and the director shall make
a report of the findings of each post audit and shall use such report as a
consideration in an application for any future allocations.

Sec.
220. RCW
43.31.960 and 1995 c 399 s 72 are each amended to read as follows:

The
principal proceeds from the sale of the bonds authorized in RCW 43.31.956 shall
be administered by the director ((of community, trade, and economic
development)).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 221. In
order to extend its services and programs the department may charge reasonable
fees for services, products, and conferences provided in the areas of financial
assistance, international trade, economic development, and other service
delivery areas, except as otherwise provided. These fees are not intended to
exceed the costs of providing the service or preparing and distributing the
product.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 222. The
economic development fee account is created in the state treasury. The
department may create subaccounts as necessary. The account consists of all
receipts from fees charged by the department under section 221 of this act.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the purposes of this
chapter. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize
expenditures from the account. Expenditures from the account may be spent only
after appropriation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 223. The
fees authorized under RCW 70.95H.040 shall be adopted by rule pursuant to
chapter 34.05 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 224. (1)
All powers, duties, and functions of the state energy office relating to energy
resource policy and planning are transferred to the department. All references
to the director or the state energy office in the Revised Code of Washington
shall be construed to mean the director or the department when referring to the
functions transferred in this section.

The
director shall appoint an assistant director for energy policy, and energy
policy staff shall have no additional responsibilities beyond activities
concerning energy policy.

(2)(a)
All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written
material in the possession of the state energy office pertaining to the powers,
functions, and duties transferred shall be delivered to the custody of the
department. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, software, data base,
motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the state energy office
in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be made
available to the department.

(b)
Any appropriations made to the state energy office for carrying out the powers,
functions, and duties transferred are transferred and credited to the
department.

(c)
Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any funds, books, documents,
records, papers, files, software, data base, equipment, or other tangible
property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the
duties and functions transferred, the director of financial management shall
make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the
state agencies concerned.

(3)
All rules and all pending business before the state energy office pertaining to
the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be continued and acted upon
by the department. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full
force and shall be performed by the department.

(4)
The transfer of the powers, duties, and functions of the state energy office
does not affect the validity of any act performed before July 1, 2000.

(5)
If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers
directed by this section, the director of the office of financial management
shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor,
and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and
adjustments in funds and appropriation.

(6)
The department shall direct the closure of the financial records of the state
energy office.

(7)
Responsibility for implementing energy education, applied research, and
technology transfer programs rests with Washington State University. The
department shall provide Washington State University available existing and
future oil overcharge restitution and federal energy block funding for a
minimum period of five years to carry out energy programs under an interagency
agreement with the department. The interagency agreement shall also outline
the working relationship between the department and Washington State University
as it pertains to the relationship between energy policy development and public
outreach. Nothing in chapter 186, Laws of 1996 prohibits Washington State
University from seeking grant, contract, or fee-for-service funding for energy
or related programs directly from other entities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 225. (1)
All powers, duties, and functions of the department of community, trade, and
economic development pertaining to trade and economic development are
transferred to the department of trade and economic development. All
references to the director or the department of community, trade, and economic
development in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the
director or the department of trade and economic development when referring to
the functions transferred in this section.

(2)(a)
All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written
material in the possession of the department of community, trade, and economic
development pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall
be delivered to the custody of the department of trade and economic
development. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and
other tangible property employed by the department of community, trade, and
economic development in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be made available to the department of trade and economic
development. All funds, credits, or other assets held in connection with the
powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be assigned to the department
of trade and economic development.

(b)
Any appropriations made to the department of community, trade, and economic
development for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred
shall, on the effective date of this section, be transferred and credited to
the department of trade and economic development.

(c)
Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books,
documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used
or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and
functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a
determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state
agencies concerned.

(3)
All employees of the department of community, trade, and economic development
engaged in performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred are
transferred to the jurisdiction of the department of trade and economic
development. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil
service law, are assigned to the department of trade and economic development
to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss
of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in
accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.

(4)
All rules and all pending business before the department of community, trade,
and economic development pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be continued and acted upon by the department of trade and
economic development. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in
full force and shall be performed by the department of trade and economic
development.

(5)
The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the department
of community, trade, and economic development shall not affect the validity of
any act performed before the effective date of this section.

(6)
If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers
directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify
the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state
treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments
in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the
certification.

(7)
Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any existing
collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing collective
bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or until the bargaining
unit has been modified by action of the personnel board as provided by law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 226. A
new section is added to chapter 41.06 RCW to read as follows:

In
addition to the exemptions in this chapter, this chapter shall not apply within
the department of trade and economic development to the director, one
confidential secretary, the deputy directors, all assistant directors, and
other positions as may be necessary to administer the department.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 227. RCW
43.31.800 (State international trade fairs--"Director"
defined) and 1993 c 280 s 52, 1987 c 195 s 4, & 1965 c 148 s 2 are each
repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 228. The
following sections are each recodified as new sections in chapter 43.31 RCW:

RCW
43.63A.230

RCW
43.63A.700

RCW
43.63A.710

RCW
43.63A.715

RCW
43.330.060

RCW
43.330.065

RCW
43.330.080

RCW
43.330.090

RCW
43.330.092

RCW
43.330.094

RCW
43.330.095

RCW
43.330.096

RCW
43.63A.690

RCW
43.330.180

PART
III

REFERENCES
TO DEPARTMENT OF

TRADE
AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Sec.
301. RCW
43.17.065 and 1995 c 226 s 24 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Where power is vested in a department to issue permits, licenses,
certifications, contracts, grants, or otherwise authorize action on the part of
individuals, businesses, local governments, or public or private organizations,
such power shall be exercised in an expeditious manner. All departments with
such power shall cooperate with officials of the ((business assistance
center of the)) department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and
economic development, and any other state officials, when such officials request
timely action on the part of the issuing department.

(2)
((After August 1, 1991,)) Any agency to which subsection (1) of
this section applies shall, with regard to any permits or other actions that
are necessary for economic development in rural natural resources impact areas,
as defined in RCW 43.31.601, respond to any completed application within
forty-five days of its receipt; any response, at a minimum, shall include:

(a)
The specific steps that the applicant needs to take in order to have the
application approved; and

(b)
The assistance that will be made available to the applicant by the agency to
expedite the application process.

(3)
The agency rural community assistance task force established in RCW 43.31.621
shall oversee implementation of this section.

(4)
Each agency shall define what constitutes a completed application and make this
definition available to applicants.

Sec.
302. RCW
28A.515.320 and 1996 c 186 s 503 are each amended to read as follows:

The
common school construction fund is to be used exclusively for the purpose of
financing the construction of facilities for the common schools. The sources
of said fund shall be: (1) Those proceeds derived from sale or appropriation
of timber and other crops from school and state land other than those granted
for specific purposes; (2) the interest accruing on the permanent common school
fund less the allocations to the state treasurer's service ((account [fund]))
fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190 and the state investment board expense
account pursuant to RCW 43.33A.160 together with all rentals and other revenue
derived therefrom and from land and other property devoted to the permanent
common school fund; (3) all moneys received by the state from the United States
under the provisions of section 191, Title 30, United States Code, Annotated,
and under section 810, chapter 12, Title 16, (Conservation), United States
Code, Annotated, except moneys received before June 30, 2001, and when thirty
megawatts of geothermal power is certified as commercially available by the
receiving utilities and the department of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development, eighty percent of such moneys, under the Geothermal
Steam Act of 1970 pursuant to RCW 43.140.030; and (4) such other sources as the
legislature may direct. That portion of the common school construction fund
derived from interest on the permanent common school fund may be used to retire
such bonds as may be authorized by law for the purpose of financing the
construction of facilities for the common schools.

The
interest accruing on the permanent common school fund less the allocations to
the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190 and the state
investment board expense account pursuant to RCW 43.33A.160 together with all
rentals and other revenues accruing thereto pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section prior to July 1, 1967, shall be exclusively applied to the current use
of the common schools.

To
the extent that the moneys in the common school construction fund are in excess
of the amount necessary to allow fulfillment of the purpose of said fund, the
excess shall be available for deposit to the credit of the permanent common
school fund or available for the current use of the common schools, as the
legislature may direct. Any money from the common school construction fund which
is made available for the current use of the common schools shall be restored
to the fund by appropriation, including interest income foregone, before the
end of the next fiscal biennium following such use.

Sec.
303. RCW
24.46.010 and 1995 c 399 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

It
is the finding of the legislature that foreign trade zones serve an important
public purpose by the creation of employment opportunities within the state and
that the establishment of zones designed to accomplish this purpose is to be
encouraged. It is the further intent of the legislature that the department of
((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development provide
assistance to entities planning to apply to the United States for permission to
establish such zones.

Sec.
304. RCW
28B.20.283 and 1995 c 399 s 25 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that the development and commercialization of new technology
is a vital part of economic development.

The
legislature also finds that it is in the interests of the state of Washington
to provide a mechanism to transfer and apply research and technology developed
at the institutions of higher education to the private sector in order to
create new products and technologies which provide job opportunities in
advanced technology for the citizens of this state.

It
is the intent of the legislature that the University of Washington, the
Washington State University, and the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development work cooperatively with the private
sector in the development and implementation of a world class technology
transfer program.

Sec.
305. RCW
28B.20.289 and 1995 c 399 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The technology center shall be administered by the board of directors of the
technology center.

(2)
The board shall consist of the following members: Fourteen members from among
individuals who are associated with or employed by technology-based industries
and have broad business experience and an understanding of high technology;
eight members from the state's universities with graduate science and
engineering programs; the executive director of the Spokane Intercollegiate
Research and Technology Institute or his or her designated representative; the
provost of the University of Washington or his or her designated representative;
the provost of the Washington State University or his or her designated
representative; and the director of the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development or his or her designated
representative. The term of office for each board member, excluding the
executive director of the Spokane Intercollegiate Research and Technology
Institute, the provost of the University of Washington, the provost of the
Washington State University, and the director of the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development, shall be three years. The
executive director of the technology center shall be an ex officio, nonvoting
member of the board. The board shall meet at least quarterly. Board members
shall be appointed by the governor based on the recommendations of the existing
board of the technology center, and the research universities. The governor
shall stagger the terms of the first group of appointees to ensure the long
term continuity of the board.

(3)
The duties of the board include:

(a)
Developing the general operating policies for the technology center;

(b)
Appointing the executive director of the technology center;

(c)
Approving the annual operating budget of the technology center;

(d)
Establishing priorities for the selection and funding of research projects that
guarantee the greatest potential return on the state's investment;

(e)
Approving and allocating funding for research projects conducted by the
technology center, based on the recommendations of the advisory committees for
each of the research centers;

(f)
In cooperation with the department of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development, developing a biennial work plan and five-year
strategic plan for the technology center that are consistent with the
state-wide technology development and commercialization goals;

(g)
Coordinating with the University of Washington, Washington State University,
and other participating institutions of higher education in the development of
training, research, and development programs to be conducted at the technology
center that shall be targeted to meet industrial needs;

(h)
Assisting the department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and
economic development in the department's efforts to develop state science and
technology public policies and coordinate publicly funded programs;

(i)
Reviewing annual progress reports on funded research projects that are prepared
by the advisory committees for each of the research centers;

(j)
Providing an annual report to the governor and the legislature detailing the
activities and performance of the technology center; and

(k)
Submitting annually to the department of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development an updated strategic plan and a statement of
performance measured against the mission, roles, and contractual obligations of
the technology center.

Sec.
306. RCW
28B.20.293 and 1995 c 399 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development
shall contract with the University of Washington for the expenditure of
state-appropriated funds for the operation of the Washington technology
center. The department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic
development shall provide guidance to the technology center regarding
expenditure of state-appropriated funds and the development of the center's
strategic plan. The director of the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development shall not withhold funds
appropriated for the technology center if the technology center complies with
the provisions of its contract with the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development. The department shall be
responsible to the legislature for the contractual performance of the center.

Sec.
307. RCW
28B.30.537 and 1998 c 245 s 20 are each amended to read as follows:

The
IMPACT center shall:

(1)
Coordinate the teaching, research, and extension expertise of the college of
agriculture and home economics at Washington State University to assist in:

(a)
The design and development of information and strategies to expand the
long-term international markets for Washington agricultural products; and

(b)
The dissemination of such information and strategies to Washington exporters,
overseas users, and public and private trade organizations;

(2)
Research and identify current impediments to increased exports of Washington
agricultural products, and determine methods of surmounting those impediments
and opportunities for exporting new agricultural products and commodities to
foreign markets;

(3)
Prepare curricula to present and distribute information concerning
international trade in agricultural commodities and products to students,
exporters, international traders, and the public;

(4)
Provide high-quality research and graduate education and professional nondegree
training in international trade in agricultural commodities in cooperation with
other existing programs;

(5)
Ensure that activities of the center adequately reflect the objectives for the
state's agricultural market development programs established by the department
of agriculture as the lead state agency for such programs under chapter 43.23
RCW; and

(6)
Link itself through cooperative agreements with the center for international
trade in forest products at the University of Washington, the state department
of agriculture, the department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and
economic development, Washington's agriculture businesses and associations, and
other state agency data collection, processing, and dissemination efforts.

Sec.
308. RCW
28B.30.900 and 1996 c 186 s 201 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All powers, duties, and functions of the state energy office under RCW
43.21F.045 relating to implementing energy education, applied research, and
technology transfer programs shall be transferred to Washington State
University.

(2)
The specific programs transferred to Washington State University shall include
but not be limited to the following: Renewable energy, energy software,
industrial energy efficiency, education and information, energy ideas
clearinghouse, and telecommunications.

(3)(a)
All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written
material in the possession of the state energy office pertaining to the powers,
functions, and duties transferred shall be delivered to the custody of
Washington State University. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment,
software, data base, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by
the state energy office in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be made available to Washington State University.

(b)
Any appropriations made to, any other funds provided to, or any grants made to
or contracts with the state energy office for carrying out the powers,
functions, and duties transferred shall, on July 1, 1996, be transferred and
credited to Washington State University.

(c)
Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any funds, books, documents,
records, papers, files, software, data base, equipment, or other tangible
property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the
duties and functions transferred, an arbitrator mutually agreed upon by the
parties in dispute shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and
certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(d)
All rules and all pending business before the state energy office pertaining to
the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be continued and acted upon
by Washington State University. All existing contracts, grants, and obligations,
excluding personnel contracts and obligations, shall remain in full force and
shall be assigned to and performed by Washington State University.

(e)
The transfer of the powers, duties, and functions of the state energy office
does not affect the validity of any act performed before July 1, 1996.

(f)
If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers
directed by this section, the director of the office of financial management
shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor,
and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and
adjustments in funds and appropriation.

(4)
Washington State University shall enter into an interagency agreement with the
department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development
regarding the relationship between policy development and public outreach. The
department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development
shall provide Washington State University available existing and future oil
overcharge restitution and federal energy block funding for a minimum period of
five years to carry out energy programs. Nothing in chapter 186, Laws of 1996
prohibits Washington State University from seeking grant funding for
energy-related programs directly from other entities.

(5) Washington State University shall select and appoint existing
state energy office employees to positions to perform the duties and functions
transferred. Employees appointed by Washington State University are exempt from
the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW unless otherwise designated by the
institution. Any future vacant or new positions will be filled using
Washington State University's standard hiring procedures.

Sec.
309. RCW
28B.50.262 and 1995 c 226 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

The
state board for community and technical colleges shall develop, in conjunction
with the center for international trade in forest products, the Washington
State University wood materials and engineering laboratory, and the department
of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development, a
competency-based technical degree program in wood product manufacturing and
wood technology and make it available in every college district that serves a
rural natural resources impact area.

Sec.
310. RCW
28B.65.040 and 1995 c 399 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The Washington high-technology coordinating board is hereby created.

(2)
The board shall be composed of eighteen members as follows:

(a)
Eleven shall be citizen members appointed by the governor, with the consent of
the senate, for four-year terms. In making the appointments the governor shall
ensure that a balanced geographic representation of the state is achieved and
shall attempt to choose persons experienced in high-technology fields,
including at least one representative of labor. Any person appointed to fill a
vacancy occurring before a term expires shall be appointed only for the remainder
of that term; and

(b)
Seven of the members shall be as follows: One representative from each of the
state's two research universities, one representative of the state college and
regional universities, the director for the state system of community and
technical colleges or the director's designee, the superintendent of public
instruction or the superintendent's designee, a representative of the higher
education coordinating board, and the director of the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development or the director's designee.

(3)
Members of the board shall not receive any salary for their services, but shall
be reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 for each
day actually spent in attending to duties as a member of the board.

(4) A citizen member of the board shall not be, during the term of
office, a member of the governing board of any public or private educational
institution, or an employee of any state or local agency.

Sec.
311. RCW
28B.65.050 and 1998 c 245 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The board shall oversee, coordinate, and evaluate the high-technology programs.

(2)
The board shall:

(a)
Determine the specific high-technology occupational fields in which technical
training is needed and advise the institutions of higher education and the
higher education coordinating board on their findings;

(b)
Identify economic areas and high-technology industries in need of technical
training and research and development critical to economic development and
advise the institutions of higher education and the higher education
coordinating board on their findings;

(c)
Oversee and coordinate the Washington high-technology education and training
program to ensure high standards, efficiency, and effectiveness;

(d)
Work cooperatively with the superintendent of public instruction to identify
the skills prerequisite to the high-technology programs in the institutions of
higher education;

(e)
Work cooperatively with and provide any information or advice which may be
requested by the higher education coordinating board during the board's review
of new baccalaureate degree program proposals which are submitted under this
chapter. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as altering or superseding
the powers or prerogatives of the higher education coordinating board over the
review of new degree programs as established in ((section 6(2) of this 1985
act)) RCW 28B.80.340;

(f)
Work cooperatively with the department of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development to identify the high-technology education and training
needs of existing Washington businesses and businesses with the potential to
locate in Washington;

(g)
Work towards increasing private sector participation and contributions in
Washington high-technology programs;

(h)
Identify and evaluate the effectiveness of state sponsored research related to
high technology; and

(i)
Establish and maintain a plan, including priorities, to guide high-technology
program development in public institutions of higher education, which plan
shall include an assessment of current high-technology programs, steps to
increase existing programs, new initiatives and programs necessary to promote
high technology, and methods to coordinate and target high-technology programs
to changing market opportunities in business and industry.

(3)
The board may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as it deems necessary to
carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(4)
The board shall cease to exist on June 30, 1987, unless extended by law for an
additional fixed period of time.

Sec.
312. RCW
28B.65.060 and 1995 c 399 s 31 are each amended to read as follows:

Staff
support for the high-technology coordinating board shall be provided by the
department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development.

Sec.
313. RCW
28B.109.020 and 1996 c 253 s 402 are each amended to read as follows:

The
Washington international exchange scholarship program is created subject to
funding under RCW 28B.109.060. The program shall be administered by the
board. In administering the program, the board may:

(1)
Convene an advisory committee that may include but need not be limited to
representatives of the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the
department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development,
the secretary of state, private business, and institutions of higher education;

(2)
Select students to receive the scholarship with the assistance of a screening
committee composed of leaders in business, international trade, and education;

(3)
Adopt necessary rules and guidelines including rules for disbursing scholarship
funds to participants;

(4)
Publicize the program;

(5)
Solicit and accept grants and donations from public and private sources for the
program;

(6)
Establish and notify participants of service obligations; and

(7)
Establish a formula for selecting the countries from which participants may be
selected in consultation with the department of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development.

Sec.
314. RCW
28C.18.060 and 1996 c 99 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board, in cooperation with the operating agencies of the state training system
and private career schools and colleges shall:

(1)
Concentrate its major efforts on planning, coordination evaluation, policy
analysis, and recommending improvements to the state's training system.

(2)
Advocate for the state training system and for meeting the needs of employers
and the work force for work force education and training.

(3)
Establish and maintain an inventory of the programs of the state training
system, and related state programs, and perform a biennial assessment of the
vocational education, training, and adult basic education and literacy needs of
the state; identify ongoing and strategic education needs; and assess the
extent to which employment, training, vocational and basic education,
rehabilitation services, and public assistance services represent a consistent,
integrated approach to meet such needs.

(4)
Develop and maintain a state comprehensive plan for work force training and
education, including but not limited to, goals, objectives, and priorities for
the state training system, and review the state training system for consistency
with the state comprehensive plan. In developing the state comprehensive plan
for work force training and education, the board shall use, but shall not be
limited to: Economic, labor market, and populations trends reports in office
of financial management forecasts; joint office of financial management and
employment security department labor force, industry employment, and
occupational forecasts; the results of scientifically based outcome, net-impact
and cost-benefit evaluations; the needs of employers as evidenced in formal
employer surveys and other employer input; and the needs of program
participants and workers as evidenced in formal surveys and other input from
program participants and the labor community.

(5)
In consultation with the higher education coordinating board, review and make
recommendations to the office of financial management and the legislature on
operating and capital facilities budget requests for operating agencies of the
state training system for purposes of consistency with the state comprehensive
plan for work force training and education.

(6)
Provide for coordination among the different operating agencies and components
of the state training system at the state level and at the regional level.

(7)
Develop a consistent and reliable data base on vocational education
enrollments, costs, program activities, and job placements from publicly funded
vocational education programs in this state.

(8)
Establish standards for data collection and maintenance for the operating agencies
of the state training system in a format that is accessible to use by the
board. The board shall require a minimum of common core data to be collected
by each operating agency of the state training system.

The
board shall develop requirements for minimum common core data in consultation
with the office of financial management and the operating agencies of the
training system.

(9)
Establish minimum standards for program evaluation for the operating agencies
of the state training system, including, but not limited to, the use of common
survey instruments and procedures for measuring perceptions of program
participants and employers of program participants, and monitor such program
evaluation.

(10)
Every two years administer scientifically based outcome evaluations of the
state training system, including, but not limited to, surveys of program
participants, surveys of employers of program participants, and matches with
employment security department payroll and wage files. Every five years
administer scientifically based net-impact and cost-benefit evaluations of the
state training system.

(11)
In cooperation with the employment security department, provide for the
improvement and maintenance of quality and utility in occupational information
and forecasts for use in training system planning and evaluation. Improvements
shall include, but not be limited to, development of state-based occupational
change factors involving input by employers and employees, and delineation of
skill and training requirements by education level associated with current and
forecasted occupations.

(12)
Provide for the development of common course description formats, common
reporting requirements, and common definitions for operating agencies of the
training system.

(13)
Provide for effectiveness and efficiency reviews of the state training system.

(14)
In cooperation with the higher education coordinating board, facilitate
transfer of credit policies and agreements between institutions of the state
training system, and encourage articulation agreements for programs
encompassing two years of secondary work force education and two years of
postsecondary work force education.

(15)
In cooperation with the higher education coordinating board, facilitate
transfer of credit policies and agreements between private training
institutions and institutions of the state training system.

(16)
Participate in the development of coordination criteria for activities under
the job training partnership act with related programs and services provided by
state and local education and training agencies.

(17)
Make recommendations to the commission of student assessment, the state board
of education, and the superintendent of public instruction, concerning basic
skill competencies and essential core competencies for K‑12 education.
Basic skills for this purpose shall be reading, writing, computation, speaking,
and critical thinking, essential core competencies for this purpose shall be
English, math, science/technology, history, geography, and critical thinking.
The board shall monitor the development of and provide advice concerning
secondary curriculum which integrates vocational and academic education.

(18)
Establish and administer programs for marketing and outreach to businesses and
potential program participants.

(19)
Facilitate the location of support services, including but not limited to,
child care, financial aid, career counseling, and job placement services, for
students and trainees at institutions in the state training system, and advocate
for support services for trainees and students in the state training system.

(20)
Facilitate private sector assistance for the state training system, including
but not limited to: Financial assistance, rotation of private and public
personnel, and vocational counseling.

(21)
Facilitate programs for school-to-work transition that combine classroom
education and on-the-job training in industries and occupations without a
significant number of apprenticeship programs.

(22)
Encourage and assess progress for the equitable representation of racial and
ethnic minorities, women, and people with disabilities among the students,
teachers, and administrators of the state training system. Equitable, for this
purpose, shall mean substantially proportional to their percentage of the state
population in the geographic area served. This function of the board shall in
no way lessen more stringent state or federal requirements for representation
of racial and ethnic minorities, women, and people with disabilities.

(23)
Participate in the planning and policy development of governor set-aside grants
under P.L. 97‑300, as amended.

(24)
Administer veterans' programs, licensure of private vocational schools, the job
skills program, and the Washington award for vocational excellence.

(25)
Allocate funding from the state job training trust fund.

(26)
Work with the director of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic
development to ensure coordination between work force training priorities and
that department's economic development efforts.

(27)
Adopt rules as necessary to implement this chapter.

The
board may delegate to the director any of the functions of this section.

Sec.
315. RCW
36.01.120 and 1995 c 399 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

It
is the finding of the legislature that foreign trade zones serve an important
public purpose by the creation of employment opportunities within the state and
that the establishment of zones designed to accomplish this purpose is to be
encouraged. It is the further intent of the legislature that the department of
((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development provide
assistance to entities planning to apply to the United States for permission to
establish such zones.

Sec.
316. RCW
36.110.030 and 1995 c 399 s 45 are each amended to read as follows:

A
state-wide jail industries board of directors is established. The board shall
consist of the following members:

(1)
One sheriff and one police chief, to be selected by the Washington association
of sheriffs and police chiefs;

(2)
One county commissioner or one county councilmember to be selected by the
Washington state association of counties;

(3)
One city official to be selected by the association of Washington cities;

(4)
Two jail administrators to be selected by the Washington state jail
association, one of whom shall be from a county or a city with an established
jail industries program;

(5)
One prosecuting attorney to be selected by the Washington association of
prosecuting attorneys;

(6)
One administrator from a city or county corrections department to be selected
by the Washington correctional association;

(7)
One county clerk to be selected by the Washington association of county clerks;

(8)
Three representatives from labor to be selected by the governor. The
representatives may be chosen from a list of nominations provided by state-wide
labor organizations representing a cross-section of trade organizations;

(9)
Three representatives from business to be selected by the governor. The
representatives may be chosen from a list of nominations provided by state-wide
business organizations representing a cross-section of businesses, industries,
and all sizes of employers;

(10)
The governor's representative from the employment security department;

(11)
One member representing crime victims, to be selected by the governor;

(12)
One member representing on-line law enforcement officers, to be selected by the
governor;

(13)
One member from the department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and
economic development to be selected by the governor;

(14)
One member representing higher education, vocational education, or adult basic
education to be selected by the governor; and

(15)
The governor's representative from the correctional industries division of the
state department of corrections shall be an ex officio member for the purpose
of coordination and cooperation between prison and jail industries and to
further a positive relationship between state and local government offender
programs.

Sec.
317. RCW
39.86.110 and 1995 c 399 s 57 are each amended to read as follows:

The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Agency" means the department of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development.

(2)
"Board" means the community economic revitalization board established
under chapter 43.160 RCW.

(3)
"Bonds" means bonds, notes, or other obligations of an issuer.

(4)
"Bond use category" means any of the following categories of bonds
which are subject to the state ceiling: (a) Housing, (b) student loans, (c)
small issue, (d) exempt facility, (e) redevelopment, (f) public utility; and
(g) remainder.

(5)
"Carryforward" is an allocation or reallocation of the state ceiling
which is carried from one calendar year to a later year, in accordance with the
code.

(6)
"Code" means the federal internal revenue code of 1986 as it exists
on May 8, 1987. It also means the code as amended after May 8, 1987, but only
if the amendments are approved by the agency under RCW 39.86.180.

(7)
"Director" means the director of the agency or the director's
designee.

(8)
"Exempt facility" means the bond use category which includes all
bonds which are exempt facility bonds as described in the code, except those
for qualified residential rental projects.

(9)
"Firm and convincing evidence" means documentation that satisfies the
director that the issuer is committed to the prompt financing of, and will
issue tax exempt bonds for, the project or program for which it requests an
allocation from the state ceiling.

(10)
"Housing" means the bond use category which includes: (a) Mortgage
revenue bonds and mortgage credit certificates as described in the code; and
(b) exempt facility bonds for qualified residential rental projects as
described in the code.

(11)
"Initial allocation" means the portion or dollar value of the state
ceiling which initially in each calendar year is allocated to a bond use
category for the issuance of private activity bonds, in accordance with RCW
39.86.120.

(12)
"Issuer" means the state, any agency or instrumentality of the state,
any political subdivision, or any other entity authorized to issue private
activity bonds under state law.

(13)
"Private activity bonds" means obligations that are private activity
bonds as defined in the code or bonds for purposes described in section
1317(25) of the tax reform act of 1986.

(14)
"Program" means the activities for which housing bonds or student
loan bonds may be issued.

(15)
"Public utility" means the bond use category which includes those
bonds described in section 1317(25) of the tax reform act of 1986.

(16)
"Redevelopment" means the bond use category which includes qualified
redevelopment bonds as described in the code.

(17)
"Remainder" means that portion of the state ceiling remaining after
initial allocations are made under RCW 39.86.120 for any other bond use
category.

(18)
"Small issue" means the bond use category which includes all
industrial development bonds that constitute qualified small issue bonds, as
described in the code.

(19)
"State" means the state of Washington.

(20)
"State ceiling" means the volume limitation for each calendar year on
tax-exempt private activity bonds, as imposed by the code.

(21)
"Student loans" means the bond use category which includes qualified
student loan bonds as described in the code.

Sec.
318. RCW
43.07.360 and 1996 c 253 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature finds that knowledge of international exchange students who
have studied in Washington state institutions of higher education, especially
those from key trading partner countries, and knowledge of Washington state
students, interns, and citizens working and studying abroad, is critical to the
ability of Washington businesses and citizens to establish contacts and
networks in the competitive world market.

(2)
The legislature also finds that knowledge of worldwide business contacts,
government contacts, cultural contacts, and international friends is critical
to building a solid network of opportunities for developing trade relations for
our state.

(3)
The secretary of state may develop and maintain a data base, to be known as the
international contact data base, listing, in addition to any other
information: (a) Washington students, interns, and citizens working and
studying overseas; (b) international students who have studied at Washington
educational institutions; (c) exchange opportunities for Washington residents
wishing to participate in education, internships, or technical assistance
programs in the areas of agriculture, hydroelectric power, aerospace, computers
and technology, academics, medicine, and communications; (d) international
business contacts of those people interested in doing business with Washington
business; and (e) international government contacts, particularly with our key
trading partners.

The
data base may be designed to be used as a resource for Washington citizens,
businesses, and other entities seeking contacts in international trade markets
overseas.

(4)
The department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic
development, the department of agriculture, and the governor's office of
protocol may assist the secretary of state in designing and developing the data
base and in obtaining data for inclusion in the data base. Four-year
educational institutions and their alumni associations are encouraged to
maintain data concerning students studying or working abroad, international
students attending their institutions, and exchange opportunities available to
their students and other citizens, and to make such data freely available to
the secretary of state for inclusion in the data base.

(5)
The information contained in the data base may be made available on request for
inspection or copying for free or at cost. The secretary of state shall not
distinguish among persons requesting information from the data base, though the
secretary of state may request information from requesters for purposes of
monitoring trade contacts and evaluating the uses and effectiveness of the data
base.

(6)
Any person listed in the data base may request in writing that his or her name,
address, telephone number, or other identifying information be omitted from the
data base. Nothing in this section prohibits the secretary of state from
refusing to disclose information exempt from disclosure under RCW 42.17.310.

Sec.
319. RCW
43.21A.510 and 1995 c 399 s 66 are each amended to read as follows:

In
order to assist the department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and
economic development in providing information to businesses interested in locating
in Washington state, the department shall develop an environmental profile of
the state. This profile shall identify the state's natural resources and
describe how these assets are valuable to industry. Examples of information to
be included are water resources and quality, air quality, and recreational
opportunities related to natural resources.

Sec.
320. RCW
43.21A.515 and 1995 c 399 s 67 are each amended to read as follows:

In
order to emphasize the importance of the state's environmental laws and
regulations and to facilitate compliance with them, the department of ecology
shall provide assistance to businesses interested in locating in Washington
state. When the department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and
economic development receives a query from an interested business through its
industrial marketing activities, it shall arrange for the department of ecology
to provide information on the state's environmental laws and regulations and
methods of compliance. This section shall facilitate compliance with state
environmental laws and regulations and shall not weaken their application or
effectiveness.

Sec.
321. RCW
43.21F.025 and 1996 c 186 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
"Energy" means petroleum or other liquid fuels; natural or synthetic
fuel gas; solid carbonaceous fuels; fissionable nuclear material; electricity;
solar radiation; geothermal resources; hydropower; organic waste products;
wind; tidal activity; any other substance or process used to produce heat,
light, or motion; or the savings from nongeneration technologies, including
conservation or improved efficiency in the usage of any of the sources
described in this subsection;

(2)
"Person" means an individual, partnership, joint venture, private or
public corporation, association, firm, public service company, political
subdivision, municipal corporation, government agency, public utility district,
joint operating agency, or any other entity, public or private, however
organized;

(3)
"Director" means the director of the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development;

(4)
"Assistant director" means the assistant director of the department
of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development responsible
for energy policy activities;

(5)
"Department" means the department of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development;

(6)
"Distributor" means any person, private corporation, partnership,
individual proprietorship, utility, including investor-owned utilities,
municipal utility, public utility district, joint operating agency, or
cooperative, which engages in or is authorized to engage in the activity of
generating, transmitting, or distributing energy in this state; and

(7)
"State energy strategy" means the document and energy policy
direction developed under section 1, chapter 201, Laws of 1991 including any
related appendices.

Sec.
322. RCW
43.21F.090 and 1996 c 186 s 106 are each amended to read as follows:

With
the guidance of an advisory committee, the department shall review the
state energy strategy as originally developed under section 1, chapter
201, Laws of 1991, ((periodically with the guidance of an advisory committee))
and subsequently revised. ((For each review,)) An
advisory committee shall be established with a membership resembling ((as
closely as possible)) but not limited by the composition of the
original energy strategy advisory committee specified under section 1, chapter
201, Laws of 1991. Upon completion of ((a)) one or more public
hearings regarding the advisory committee's advice and recommendations
for revisions to the energy strategy, a written report shall be conveyed by the
department to the governor and the appropriate legislative committees. Any
advisory committee established under this section shall be ((dissolved
within three months after their written report is conveyed)) the
advisory committee for the energy division.

Sec.
323. RCW
43.21G.010 and 1996 c 186 s 507 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that energy in various forms is increasingly subject to
possible shortages and supply disruptions, to the point that there may be
foreseen an emergency situation, and that without the ability to institute
appropriate emergency measures to regulate the production, distribution, and
use of energy, a severe impact on the public health, safety, and general
welfare of our state's citizens may occur. The prevention or mitigation of such
energy shortages or disruptions and their effects is necessary for preservation
of the public health, safety, and general welfare of the citizens of this
state.

It
is the intent of this chapter to:

(1)
Establish necessary emergency powers for the governor and define the situations
under which such powers are to be exercised;

(2)
Provide penalties for violations of this chapter.

It
is further the intent of the legislature that in developing proposed orders
under the powers granted in RCW 43.21G.040 as now or hereafter amended the
governor may utilize, on a temporary or ad hoc basis, the knowledge and
expertise of persons experienced in the technical aspects of energy supply,
distribution, or use. Such utilization shall be in addition to support received
by the governor from the department of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development under RCW 43.21F.045 ((and 43.21F.065)) and
from other state agencies.

Sec.
324. RCW
43.23.035 and 1995 c 399 s 70 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of agriculture is hereby designated as the agency of state
government for the administration and implementation of state agricultural
market development programs and activities, both domestic and foreign, and
shall, in addition to the powers and duties otherwise imposed by law, have the
following powers and duties:

(1)
To study the potential marketability of various agricultural commodities of
this state in foreign and domestic trade;

(2)
To collect, prepare, and analyze foreign and domestic market data;

(3)
To establish a program to promote and assist in the marketing of
Washington-bred horses: PROVIDED, That the department shall present a proposal
to the legislature no later than December 1, 1986, that provides for the elimination
of all state funding for the program after June 30, 1989;

(4)
To encourage and promote the sale of Washington's agricultural commodities and
products at the site of their production through the development and
dissemination of referral maps and other means;

(5)
To encourage and promote those agricultural industries, such as the wine
industry, which attract visitors to rural areas in which other agricultural
commodities and products are produced and are, or could be, made available for
sale;

(6)
To encourage and promote the establishment and use of public markets in this
state for the sale of Washington's agricultural products;

(7)
To maintain close contact with foreign firms and governmental agencies and to
act as an effective intermediary between foreign nations and Washington
traders;

(8)
To publish and disseminate to interested citizens and others information which
will aid in carrying out the purposes of chapters 43.23, 15.64, 15.65, and
15.66 RCW;

(9)
To encourage and promote the movement of foreign and domestic agricultural
goods through the ports of Washington;

(10)
To conduct an active program by sending representatives to, or engaging
representatives in, foreign countries to promote the state's agricultural
commodities and products;

(11)
To assist and to make Washington agricultural concerns more aware of the
potentials of foreign trade and to encourage production of those commodities
that will have high export potential and appeal;

(12)
To coordinate the trade promotional activities of appropriate federal, state,
and local public agencies, as well as civic organizations; and

(13)
To develop a coordinated marketing program with the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development, utilizing existing trade offices and
participating in mutual trade missions and activities.

As
used in this section, "agricultural commodities" includes products of
both terrestrial and aquatic farming.

Sec.
325. RCW
43.31.504 and 1993 c 280 s 45 are each amended to read as follows:

The
child care facility fund committee is established within the ((business
assistance center of the)) department of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development. The committee shall administer the child care
facility fund, with review by the director of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development.

(1)
The committee shall have five members. The director of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development shall appoint the members, who shall
include:

(a)
Two persons experienced in investment finance and having skills in providing
capital to new businesses, in starting and operating businesses, and providing
professional services to small or expanding businesses;

(b)
One person representing a philanthropic organization with experience in
evaluating funding requests;

(c)
One child care services expert; and

(d)
One early childhood development expert.

In
making these appointments, the director shall give careful consideration to
ensure that the various geographic regions of the state are represented and
that members will be available for meetings and are committed to working
cooperatively to address child care needs in Washington state.

(2)
The committee shall elect officers from among its membership and shall adopt
policies and procedures specifying the lengths of terms, methods for filling
vacancies, and other matters necessary to the ongoing functioning of the
committee.

(3)
Committee members shall serve without compensation, but may request
reimbursement for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(4)
Committee members shall not be liable to the state, to the child care facility
fund, or to any other person as a result of their activities, whether
ministerial or discretionary, as members except for willful dishonesty or
intentional violation of the law. The department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development may purchase liability insurance for
members and may indemnify these persons against the claims of others.

Sec.
326. RCW
43.88.093 and 1998 c 299 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
When developing a biennial budget for the tourism development division of the
department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development,
the request for funding submitted to the office of financial management shall
be calculated according to the formula in RCW 43.88.094. The request shall be
a specific designated amount in the budget request for the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development.

(2)
This section expires June 30, 2008.

Sec.
327. RCW
43.88.094 and 1998 c 299 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The budget amount designated in RCW 43.88.093(1) is the sum of the base amount
and the growth component as calculated under subsection (2) of this section.

(2)
The director of the department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and
economic development shall calculate the tourism development division budget in
consultation with the appropriate agencies in the following manner:

(a)
The base amount, beginning in the budget for the biennium ending June 30, 2001,
and for each subsequent biennium thereafter, equals the previous biennial
budget, including any supplemental allocations and any growth component amounts
from previous biennia.

(b)
For the growth component, beginning in the budget for the biennium ending June
30, 2001: (i) Compute the state retail sales tax revenues for the target
business categories for the calendar year two years prior to the beginning of
the biennium for which the budget request will be made; (ii) compute the state
retail sales tax revenues for the target business categories for the calendar
year four years prior to the beginning of the biennium for which the budget
request will be made; (iii) calculate the percentage change in these two sales
tax revenue amounts; (iv) if the percentage exceeds eight percent growth,
calculate the amount of sales tax revenue that represents the excess in revenue
growth greater than six percent; and (v) calculate the growth component by
dividing the excess revenue growth by two. The amount of the growth component
for any biennium shall not exceed two million dollars per fiscal year for the biennium.

(3)
As used in this section:

(a)
"Target business categories" means businesses in standard industrial
classification codes 58 (eating and drinking), 70 (lodging), 7514 (auto
rental), and 79 (recreation). If at any time the United States office of
management and budget or a successor agency should change or replace the
present standard industrial classification code system, the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development shall use the code system issued by
the office of management and budget or its successor agency to determine codes
corresponding to those listed in this definition.

(b)
"Retail sales" means the gross sales subject to the tax imposed in
chapter 82.08 RCW received by businesses identified in department of revenue
records by standard industrial classification codes 58, 70, 7514, and 79.

(4)
This section expires June 30, 2008.

Sec.
328. RCW
43.160.020 and 1999 c 164 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Board" means the community economic revitalization board.

(2)
"Bond" means any bond, note, debenture, interim certificate, or other
evidence of financial indebtedness issued by the board pursuant to this
chapter.

(3)
"Department" means the department of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development.

(4)
"Financial institution" means any bank, savings and loan association,
credit union, development credit corporation, insurance company, investment
company, trust company, savings institution, or other financial institution
approved by the board and maintaining an office in the state.

(5)
"Industrial development facilities" means "industrial development
facilities" as defined in RCW 39.84.020.

(6)
"Industrial development revenue bonds" means tax-exempt revenue bonds
used to fund industrial development facilities.

(7)
"Local government" or "political subdivision" means any
port district, county, city, town, special purpose district, and any other
municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations in the state providing
for public facilities under this chapter.

(8)
"Sponsor" means any of the following entities which customarily
provide service or otherwise aid in industrial or other financing and are
approved as a sponsor by the board: A bank, trust company, savings bank,
investment bank, national banking association, savings and loan association,
building and loan association, credit union, insurance company, or any other
financial institution, governmental agency, or holding company of any entity
specified in this subsection.

(9)
"Umbrella bonds" means industrial development revenue bonds from
which the proceeds are loaned, transferred, or otherwise made available to two
or more users under this chapter.

(10)
"User" means one or more persons acting as lessee, purchaser,
mortgagor, or borrower under a financing document and receiving or applying to
receive revenues from bonds issued under this chapter.

(11)
"Public facilities" means a project of a local government for the
planning, acquisition, construction, repair, reconstruction, replacement,
rehabilitation, or improvement of bridges, roads, domestic and industrial
water, earth stabilization, sanitary sewer, storm sewer, railroad, electricity,
telecommunications, transportation, natural gas, buildings or structures, and
port facilities, all for the purpose of job creation, job retention, or job
expansion.

(12)
"Rural county" means a county with a population density of fewer than
one hundred persons per square mile as determined by the office of financial
management.

(13)
"Rural natural resources impact area" means:

(a)
A nonmetropolitan county, as defined by the 1990 decennial census, that meets
three of the five criteria set forth in subsection (14) of this section;

(b)
A nonmetropolitan county with a population of less than forty thousand in the
1990 decennial census, that meets two of the five criteria as set forth in
subsection (14) of this section; or

(c)
A nonurbanized area, as defined by the 1990 decennial census, that is located
in a metropolitan county that meets three of the five criteria set forth in
subsection (14) of this section.

(14)
For the purposes of designating rural natural resources impact areas, the
following criteria shall be considered:

(a)
A lumber and wood products employment location quotient at or above the state
average;

(b)
A commercial salmon fishing employment location quotient at or above the state
average;

(c)
Projected or actual direct lumber and wood products job losses of one hundred
positions or more;

(d)
Projected or actual direct commercial salmon fishing job losses of one hundred
positions or more; and

(e)
An unemployment rate twenty percent or more above the state average. The
counties that meet these criteria shall be determined by the employment
security department for the most recent year for which data is available. For
the purposes of administration of programs under this chapter, the United
States post office five-digit zip code delivery areas will be used to determine
residence status for eligibility purposes. For the purpose of this definition,
a zip code delivery area of which any part is ten miles or more from an
urbanized area is considered nonurbanized. A zip code totally surrounded by
zip codes qualifying as nonurbanized under this definition is also considered
nonurbanized. The office of financial management shall make available a zip code
listing of the areas to all agencies and organizations providing services under
this chapter.

Sec.
329. RCW
43.160.115 and 1995 c 399 s 87 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to its powers and duties under this chapter, the community economic
revitalization board shall cooperate with the ((Washington state development
loan fund committee)) department in order to provide for
coordination of their very similar programs. Under this chapter, it is the
duty of the department ((of community, trade, and economic development and
the board)) to financially assist the committee to the extent required by
law. ((Funds appropriated to the board or the department of community,
trade, and economic development for the use of the board shall be transferred
to the department of community, trade, and economic development to the extent
required by law.))

Sec.
330. RCW
43.160.180 and 1995 c 399 s 88 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is hereby created the private activity bond subcommittee of the board.

(2)
The subcommittee shall be primarily responsible for reviewing and making
recommendations to the board on requests for certification and allocation
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 39.86 RCW and as authorized by rules
adopted by the board.

(3)
The subcommittee shall consist of the following members: Six members of the
board including: (a) The chair; (b) the county official; (c) the city
official; (d) the port district official; (e) a legislator, appointed by the
chair; and (f) the representative of the public. The members' terms shall
coincide with their terms of appointment to the board.

(4)
Staff support to the subcommittee shall be provided by the department ((of
community, trade, and economic development)).

(5)
Members of the subcommittee shall receive no compensation but shall be
reimbursed for travel expenses under RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(6)
If a vacancy on the subcommittee occurs by death, resignation, failure to hold
the office from which the member was appointed, or otherwise, the vacancy shall
be filled through the procedures specified for filling the corresponding
vacancy on the board.

Sec.
331. RCW
43.163.020 and 1995 c 399 s 89 are each amended to read as follows:

The
Washington economic development finance authority is established as a public
body corporate and politic, with perpetual corporate succession, constituting
an instrumentality of the state of Washington exercising essential governmental
functions. The authority is a public body within the meaning of RCW 39.53.010.

The
authority shall consist of eighteen (([seventeen])) members as follows:
The director of the department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and
economic development, the director of the department of community
development, the director of the department of agriculture, the state
treasurer, one member from each caucus in the house of representatives
appointed by the speaker of the house, one member from each caucus in the
senate appointed by the president of the senate, and ten public members with
one representative of women-owned businesses and one representative of
minority-owned businesses and with at least three of the members residing east
of the Cascades. The public members shall be residents of the state appointed
by the governor on the basis of their interest or expertise in trade,
agriculture or business finance or jobs creation and development. One of the
public members shall be appointed by the governor as chair of the authority and
shall serve as chair of the authority at the pleasure of the governor. The
authority may select from its membership such other officers as it deems
appropriate.

The
term of the persons appointed by the governor as public members of the
authority, including the public member appointed as chair, shall be four years
from the date of appointment, except that the term of three of the initial
appointees shall be for two years from the date of appointment and the term of
four of the initial appointees shall be for three years from the date of
appointment. The governor shall designate the appointees who will serve the
two-year and three-year terms.

In
the event of a vacancy on the authority due to death, resignation or removal of
one of the public members, or upon the expiration of the term of one of the
public members, the governor shall appoint a successor for the remainder of the
unexpired term. If either of the state offices is abolished, the resulting
vacancy on the authority shall be filled by the state officer who shall succeed
substantially to the power and duties of the abolished office.

Any
public member of the authority may be removed by the governor for misfeasance,
malfeasance or willful neglect of duty after notice and a public hearing,
unless such notice and hearing shall be expressly waived in writing by the
affected public member.

The
state officials serving in ex officio capacity may each designate an employee
of their respective departments to act on their behalf in all respects with
regard to any matter to come before the authority. Such designations shall be
made in writing in such manner as is specified by the rules of the authority.

The
members of the authority shall serve without compensation but shall be entitled
to reimbursement, solely from the funds of the authority, for expenses incurred
in the discharge of their duties under this chapter. The authority may borrow
funds from the department for the purpose of reimbursing members for expenses;
however, the authority shall repay the department as soon as practicable.

A
majority of the authority shall constitute a quorum.

Sec.
332. RCW
43.163.120 and 1998 c 245 s 51 are each amended to read as follows:

The
authority shall receive no appropriation of state funds. The department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development shall provide staff to the
authority, to the extent permitted by law, to enable the authority to
accomplish its purposes; the staff from the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development may assist the authority in
organizing itself and in designing programs, but shall not be involved in the
issuance of bonds or in making credit decisions regarding financing provided to
borrowers by the authority.

Sec.
333. RCW
43.170.020 and 1995 c 399 s 93 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Department" means the department of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development.

(2)
"Director" means the director of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development.

(3)
"Program" means the small business innovators' opportunity program.

(4)
"Inventor" or "innovator" means one who thinks of,
imagines, or creates something new which may result in a device, contrivance,
or process for the first time, through the use of the imagination or ingenious
thinking and experimentation.

(5)
"Proposal" means a plan provided by an inventor or innovator on an
idea for an invention or an improvement.

(6)
"Higher education" means any university, college, community college,
or technical institute in this state.

Sec.
334. RCW
43.172.011 and 1995 c 399 s 96 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout RCW 43.172.020 through 43.172.110.

(1)
"Approved surety company" means a surety company approved by the
department for participation in providing direct bonding assistance to
qualified contractors.

(2)
"Bond" means any bond or security required for bid, payment, or
performance of contracts.

(3)
"Department" means the department of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development.

(4)
"Program" means the Washington state small business bonding
assistance program provided for in this chapter.

(5)
"Qualified contractor" means any resident minority business
enterprise or women's business enterprise, as determined by the department to
be consistent with the requirements of chapter 39.19 RCW and engaged in the
contracting business, which has obtained a certificate of accreditation from
the Washington state small business bonding assistance program.

Sec.
335. RCW
43.210.030 and 1998 c 109 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The small business export finance assistance center and its
branches shall be governed and managed by a board of seven directors appointed
by the governor, with the advice of the board, and confirmed by the senate.
The directors shall serve terms of four years following the terms of service
established by the initial appointments after June 11, 1998. Three appointees,
including directors on June 11, 1998, who are reappointed, must serve initial
terms of two years and, if a director is reappointed that director may serve a
consecutive four-year term. Four appointees, including directors on June 11,
1998, who are reappointed, must serve initial terms of four years and, if a
director is reappointed that director may serve a consecutive four-year term.
After the initial appointments, directors may serve two consecutive terms. The
directors may provide for the payment of their expenses. The directors shall
include the director of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic
development or the director's designee; representatives of a large financial
institution engaged in financing export transactions in the state of
Washington; a small financial institution engaged in financing export
transactions in the state of Washington; a large exporting company domiciled in
the state of Washington; a small exporting company in the state of Washington;
organized labor in a trade involved in international commerce; and a
representative at large. To the extent possible, appointments to the board
shall reflect geographical balance and the diversity of the state population.
Any vacancies on the board due to the expiration of a term or for any other
reason shall be filled by appointment by the governor for the unexpired term.

Sec.
336. RCW
43.210.050 and 1998 c 245 s 84 are each amended to read as follows:

The
small business export finance assistance center formed under RCW 43.210.020 and
43.210.030 shall enter into a contract under this chapter with the department
of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development or its
statutory successor. The contract shall require the center to provide export
assistance services, consistent with RCW 43.210.070 and 43.210.100 through
43.210.120, shall have a duration of two years, and shall require the center to
aggressively seek to fund its continued operation from nonstate funds. The
contract shall also require the center to report annually to the department on
its success in obtaining nonstate funding. Upon expiration of the contract,
any provisions within the contract applicable to the Pacific Northwest export
assistance project shall be automatically renewed without change provided the
legislature appropriates funds for administration of the small business export
assistance center and the Pacific Northwest export assistance project. The
provisions of the contract related to the Pacific Northwest export assistance
project may be changed at any time if the director of the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development or the president of the small
business export finance assistance center present compelling reasons supporting
the need for a contract change to the board of directors and a majority of the
board of directors agrees to the changes. The department of agriculture shall
be included in the contracting negotiations with the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development and the small business export
finance assistance center when the Pacific Northwest export assistance project
provides export services to industrial sectors within the administrative domain
of the Washington state department of agriculture.

Sec.
337. RCW
43.210.060 and 1995 c 399 s 108 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development
or its statutory successor shall adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as
necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

Sec.
338. RCW
43.330.092 and 1997 c 220 s 222 are each amended to read as follows:

The
film and video promotion account is created in the state treasury. All
receipts from RCW 36.102.060(14) must be deposited into the account. Moneys in
the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the
account may be used by the department ((of community, trade, and economic
development)) only for the purposes of promotion of the film and video
production industry in the state of Washington.

Sec.
339. RCW
43.330.094 and 1997 c 220 s 223 are each amended to read as follows:

The tourism development and promotion account is created in the
state treasury. All receipts from RCW 36.102.060(10) must be deposited into
the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used by the department ((of community,
trade, and economic development)) only for the purposes of promotion of the
tourism industry in the state of Washington.

Sec.
340. RCW
50.67.030 and 1994 sp.s. c 3 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to its duties under this chapter, the Washington state job training
coordinating council shall advise the employment security department and the
department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development
on the development and implementation of the Washington youthbuild program
created under chapter 50.72 RCW.

Sec.
341. RCW
50.72.030 and 1994 sp.s. c 3 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
Washington youthbuild program is established within the department. The
commissioner, in cooperation and consultation with the director of the
department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development,
shall:

(1)
Make grants, up to the lesser of three hundred thousand dollars or twenty-five
percent of the total costs of the youthbuild activities, to applicants eligible
to provide education and employment training under federal or state employment
training programs, for the purpose of carrying out a wide range of
multidisciplinary activities and services to assist economically disadvantaged
youth under the federal opportunities for youth: Youthbuild program (106 Stat.
3723; 42 U.S.C. Sec. 8011), or locally developed youthbuild-type programs for economically
disadvantaged youth; and

(2)
Coordinate youth employment and training efforts under the department's
jurisdiction and cooperate with other agencies and departments providing youth
services to ensure that funds appropriated for the purposes of this chapter
will be used to supplement funding from federal, state, local, or private
sources.

Sec.
342. RCW
70.95H.007 and 1995 c 399 s 192 are each amended to read as follows:

There
is created the clean Washington center within the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development. As used in this chapter,
"center" means the clean Washington center.

Sec.
343. RCW
70.95H.050 and 1995 c 399 s 194 are each amended to read as follows:

The center shall solicit financial contributions and support from
manufacturing industries and other private sector sources, foundations, and
grants from governmental sources to assist in conducting its activities. It
may also use separately appropriated funds of the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development for the center's activities.

Sec.
344. RCW
74.13.090 and 1995 c 399 s 204 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is established a child care coordinating committee to provide
coordination and communication between state agencies responsible for child
care and early childhood education services. The child care coordinating
committee shall be composed of not less than seventeen nor more than
thirty-three members who shall include:

(a)
One representative each from the department of social and health services, the
department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development,
the office of the superintendent of public instruction, and any other agency
having responsibility for regulation, provision, or funding of child care
services in the state;

(b)
One representative from the department of labor and industries;

(c)
One representative from the department of revenue;

(d)
One representative from the employment security department;

(e)
One representative from the department of personnel;

(f)
One representative from the department of health;

(g)
At least one representative of family home child care providers and one representative
of center care providers;

(h)
At least one representative of early childhood development experts;

(i)
At least one representative of school districts and teachers involved in the
provision of child care and preschool programs;

(j)
At least one parent education specialist;

(k)
At least one representative of resource and referral programs;

(l)
One pediatric or other health professional;

(m)
At least one representative of college or university child care providers;

(n)
At least one representative of a citizen group concerned with child care;

(o)
At least one representative of a labor organization;

(p)
At least one representative of a head start - early childhood education
assistance program agency;

(q)
At least one employer who provides child care assistance to employees;

(r)
Parents of children receiving, or in need of, child care, half of whom shall be
parents needing or receiving subsidized child care and half of whom shall be
parents who are able to pay for child care.

The
named state agencies shall select their representative to the child care
coordinating committee. The department of social and health services shall
select the remaining members, considering recommendations from lists submitted
by professional associations and other interest groups until such time as the
committee adopts a member selection process. The department shall use any
federal funds which may become available to accomplish the purposes of RCW
74.13.085 through 74.13.095.

The
committee shall elect officers from among its membership and shall adopt
policies and procedures specifying the lengths of terms, methods for filling
vacancies, and other matters necessary to the ongoing functioning of the
committee. The secretary of social and health services shall appoint a
temporary chair until the committee has adopted policies and elected a chair
accordingly. Child care coordinating committee members shall be reimbursed for
travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(2)
To the extent possible within available funds, the child care coordinating
committee shall:

(a)
Serve as an advisory coordinator for all state agencies responsible for early
childhood or child care programs for the purpose of improving communication and
interagency coordination;

(b)
Annually review state programs and make recommendations to the agencies and the
legislature which will maximize funding and promote furtherance of the policies
set forth in RCW 74.13.085. Reports shall be provided to all appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1 of each year. At a minimum the
committee shall:

(i)
Review and propose changes to the child care subsidy system in its December
1989 report;

(ii)
Review alternative models for child care service systems, in the context of the
policies set forth in RCW 74.13.085, and recommend to the legislature a new
child care service structure; and

(iii)
Review options and make recommendations on the feasibility of establishing an
allocation for day care facilities when constructing state buildings;

(c)
Review department of social and health services administration of the child
care expansion grant program described in RCW 74.13.095;

(d)
Review rules regarding child care facilities and services for the purpose of
identifying those which unnecessarily obstruct the availability and
affordability of child care in the state;

(e)
Advise and assist the office of child care policy in implementing his or her
duties under RCW 74.13.0903;

(f)
Perform other functions to improve the quantity and quality of child care in
the state, including compliance with existing and future prerequisites for
federal funding; and

(g)
Advise and assist the department of personnel in its responsibility for
establishing policies and procedures that provide for the development of
quality child care programs for state employees.

Sec.
345. RCW
76.09.030 and 1999 1st sp.s. c 4 s 1001 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is hereby created the forest practices board of the state of Washington
as an agency of state government consisting of members as follows:

(a)
The commissioner of public lands or the commissioner's designee;

(b)
The director of the department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and
economic development or the director's designee;

(c)
The director of the department of agriculture or the director's designee;

(d)
The director of the department of ecology or the director's designee;

(e)
The director of the department of fish and wildlife or the director's designee;

(f)
An elected member of a county legislative authority appointed by the governor:
PROVIDED, That such member's service on the board shall be conditioned on the
member's continued service as an elected county official; and

(g)
Six members of the general public appointed by the governor, one of whom shall
be an owner of not more than five hundred acres of forest land, and one of whom
shall be an independent logging contractor.

(2)
The director of the department of fish and wildlife's service on the board may
be terminated two years after August 18, 1999, if the legislature finds that
after two years the department has not made substantial progress toward
integrating the laws, rules, and programs governing forest practices, chapter
76.09 RCW, and the laws, rules, and programs governing hydraulic projects,
chapter 75.20 RCW. Such a finding shall be based solely on whether the
department of fish and wildlife makes substantial progress as defined in this
subsection, and will not be based on other actions taken as a member of the
board. Substantial progress shall include recommendations to the legislature
for closer integration of the existing rule-making authorities of the board and
the department of fish and wildlife, and closer integration of the forest practices
and hydraulics permitting processes, including exploring the potential for a
consolidated permitting process. These recommendations shall be designed to
resolve problems currently associated with the existing dual regulatory and
permitting processes.

(3)
The members of the initial board appointed by the governor shall be appointed
so that the term of one member shall expire December 31, 1975, the term of one
member shall expire December 31, 1976, the term of one member shall expire
December 31, 1977, the terms of two members shall expire December 31, 1978, and
the terms of two members shall expire December 31, 1979. Thereafter, each
member shall be appointed for a term of four years. Vacancies on the board
shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments. Each member
of the board shall continue in office until his or her successor is appointed
and qualified. The commissioner of public lands or the commissioner's designee
shall be the chairman of the board.

(4)
The board shall meet at such times and places as shall be designated by the
chairman or upon the written request of the majority of the board. The
principal office of the board shall be at the state capital.

(5)
Members of the board, except public employees and elected officials, shall be
compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.250. Each member shall be entitled to
reimbursement for travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties
as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(6)
The board may employ such clerical help and staff pursuant to chapter 41.06 RCW
as is necessary to carry out its duties.

Sec.
346. RCW
76.56.020 and 1994 c 282 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
center shall:

(1)
Coordinate the University of Washington's college of forest resources' faculty
and staff expertise to assist in:

(a)
The development of research and analysis for developing policies and strategies
which will expand forest-based international trade, including a major focus on
secondary manufacturing;

(b)
The development of technology or commercialization support for manufactured
products that will meet the evolving needs of international customers;

(c)
The development of research and analysis on other factors critical to
forest-based trade, including the quality and availability of raw wood
resources; and

(d)
The coordination, development, and dissemination of market and technical
information relevant to international trade in forest products, including a
major focus on secondary manufacturing;

(2)
Further develop and maintain computer data bases on world-wide forest products
production and trade in order to monitor and report on trends significant to
the Northwest forest products industry and support the center's research
functions; and coordinate this system with state, federal, and private sector
efforts to insure a cost-effective information resource that will avoid
unnecessary duplication;

(3)
Monitor international forest products markets and assess the status of the
state's forest products industry, including the competitiveness of small and
medium-sized secondary manufacturing firms in the forest products industry,
which for the purposes of this chapter shall be firms with annual revenues of
twenty-five million or less, and including the increased exports of
Washington-produced products of small and medium-sized secondary manufacturing
firms;

(4)
Provide high-quality research and graduate education and professional nondegree
training in international trade in forest products in cooperation with the
University of Washington's graduate school of business administration, the
school of law, the Jackson school of international studies, the Northwest
policy center of the graduate school of public administration, and other
supporting academic units;

(5)
Develop cooperative linkages with the international marketing program for
agricultural commodities and trade at Washington State University, the
international trade project of the United States forest service, the department
of natural resources, the department of ((community,)) trade((,))
and economic development, the small business export finance assistance center,
and other state and federal agencies to avoid duplication of effort and
programs;

(6)
Cooperate with personnel from the state's community and technical colleges in
their development of wood products manufacturing and wood technology curriculum
and offer periodic workshops on wood products manufacturing, wood technology,
and trade opportunities to community colleges and private educators and
trainers;

(7)
Provide for public dissemination of research, analysis, and results of the
center's programs to all groups, including direct assistance groups, through
technical workshops, short courses, international and national symposia,
cooperation with private sector networks and marketing associations, or other
means, including appropriate publications;

(8)
Establish an executive policy board, including representatives of small and
medium-sized businesses, with at least fifty percent of its business members
representing small businesses with one hundred or fewer employees and
medium-sized businesses with one hundred to five hundred employees. The
executive policy board shall also include a representative of the community and
technical colleges, representatives of state and federal agencies, and a
representative of a wood products manufacturing network or trade association of
small and medium-sized wood product manufacturers. The executive policy board
shall provide advice on: Overall policy direction and program priorities,
state and federal budget requests, securing additional research funds,
identifying priority areas of focus for research efforts, selection of projects
for research, and dissemination of results of research efforts; and

(9)
Establish advisory or technical committees for each research program area, to
advise on research program area priorities, consistent with the international
trade opportunities achievable by the forest products sector of the state and
region, to help ensure projects are relevant to industry needs, and to advise
on and support effective dissemination of research results. Each advisory or
technical committee shall include representatives of forest products industries
that might benefit from this research.

Service
on the committees and the executive policy board established in subsections (8)
and (9) of this section shall be without compensation but actual travel
expenses incurred in connection with service to the center may be reimbursed
from appropriated funds in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

Sec.
347. RCW
77.12.710 and 1998 c 245 s 159 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature hereby directs the department to determine the feasibility and cost
of doubling the state-wide game fish production by the year 2000. The
department shall seek to equalize the effort and investment expended on
anadromous and resident game fish programs. The department shall provide the
legislature with a specific plan for legislative approval that will outline the
feasibility of increasing game fish production by one hundred percent over current
levels by the year 2000. The plan shall contain specific provisions to
increase both hatchery and naturally spawning game fish to a level that will
support the production goal established in this section consistent with
department policies. Steelhead trout, searun cutthroat trout, resident trout,
and warmwater fish producing areas of the state shall be included in the plan.

The
plan shall include the following critical elements:

(1)
Methods of determining current catch and production, and catch and production
in the year 2000;

(2)
Methods of involving fishing groups, including Indian tribes, in a cooperative
manner;

(3)
Methods for using low capital cost projects to produce game fish as
inexpensively as possible;

(4)
Methods for renovating and modernizing all existing hatcheries and rearing
ponds to maximize production capability;

(5)
Methods for increasing the productivity of natural spawning game fish;

(6)
Application of new technology to increase hatchery and natural productivity;

(7)
Analysis of the potential for private contractors to produce game fish for
public fisheries;

(8)
Methods to optimize public volunteer efforts and cooperative projects for
maximum efficiency;

(9)
Methods for development of trophy game fish fisheries;

(10)
Elements of coordination with the Pacific Northwest Power Council programs to
ensure maximum Columbia river benefits;

(11)
The role that should be played by private consulting companies in developing
and implementing the plan;

(12)
Coordination with federal fish and wildlife agencies, Indian tribes, and
department fish production programs;

(13)
Future needs for game fish predator control measures;

(14)
Development of disease control measures;

(15)
Methods for obtaining access to waters currently not available to anglers; and

(16)
Development of research programs to support game fish management and
enhancement programs.

The
department, in cooperation with the department of revenue, shall assess various
funding mechanisms and make recommendations to the legislature in the plan.
The department, in cooperation with the department of ((community,))
trade((,)) and economic development, shall prepare an analysis of the
economic benefits to the state that will occur when the game fish production is
increased by one hundred percent in the year 2000.

Sec.
348. RCW
79A.60.480 and 1997 c 391 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of licensing shall issue a whitewater river outfitter's license
to an applicant who submits a completed application, pays the required fee, and
complies with the requirements of this section.

(2)
An applicant for a whitewater river outfitter's license shall make application
upon a form provided by the department of licensing. The form must be
submitted annually and include the following information:

(a)
The name, residence address, and residence telephone number, and the business
name, address, and telephone number of the applicant;

(b)
Certification that all employees, subcontractors, or independent contractors
hired as guides meet training standards under RCW ((88.12.245(2))) 79A.60.430
before carrying any passengers for hire;

(c)
Proof that the applicant has liability insurance for a minimum of three hundred
thousand dollars per claim for occurrences by the applicant and the applicant's
employees that result in bodily injury or property damage. All guides must be
covered by the applicant's insurance policy;

(d)
Certification that the applicant will maintain the insurance for a period of
not less than one year from the date of issuance of the license; and

(e)
Certification by the applicant that for a period of not less than twenty-four
months immediately preceding the application the applicant:

(i)
Has not had a license, permit, or certificate to carry passengers for hire on a
river revoked by another state or by an agency of the government of the United
States due to a conviction for a violation of safety or insurance coverage
requirements no more stringent than the requirements of this chapter; and

(ii)
Has not been denied the right to apply for a license, permit, or certificate to
carry passengers for hire on a river by another state.

(3)
The department of licensing shall charge a fee for each application, to be set
in accordance with RCW 43.24.086.

(4)
Any person advertising or representing himself or herself as a whitewater river
outfitter who is not currently licensed is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(5)
The department of licensing shall submit annually a list of licensed persons
and companies to the department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and
economic development, tourism promotion division.

(6)
If an insurance company cancels or refuses to renew insurance for a licensee,
the insurance company shall notify the department of licensing in writing of
the termination of coverage and its effective date not less than thirty days
before the effective date of termination.

(a)
Upon receipt of an insurance company termination notice, the department of licensing
shall send written notice to the licensee that on the effective date of
termination the department of licensing will suspend the license unless proof
of insurance as required by this section is filed with the department of
licensing before the effective date of the termination.

(b)
If an insurance company fails to give notice of coverage termination, this
failure shall not have the effect of continuing the coverage.

(c)
The department of licensing may suspend a license under this section if the
licensee fails to maintain in full force and effect the insurance required by
this section.

(7)
The state of Washington shall be immune from any civil action arising from the
issuance of a license under this section.

Sec.
349. RCW
81.80.450 and 1998 c 245 s 167 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic
development, in conjunction with the utilities and transportation commission
and the department of ecology, shall evaluate the effect of exempting motor
vehicles transporting recovered materials from rate regulation as provided
under RCW 81.80.440. The evaluation shall, at a minimum, describe the effect
of such exemption on:

(a)
The cost and timeliness of transporting recovered materials within the state;

(b)
The volume of recovered materials transported within the state;

(c)
The number of safety violations and traffic accidents related to transporting
recovered materials within the state; and

(d)
The availability of service related to transporting recovered materials from
rural areas of the state.

(2)
The commission shall adopt rules requiring persons transporting recovered
materials to submit information required under RCW 70.95.280. In adopting such
rules, the commission shall include procedures to ensure the confidentiality of
proprietary information.

Sec.
350. RCW
82.35.080 and 1999 c 358 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the department shall
revoke any certificate issued under this chapter if it finds that any of the
following have occurred with respect to the certificate:

(a)
The certificate was obtained by fraud or deliberate misrepresentation;

(b)
The certificate was obtained through the use of inaccurate data but without any
intention to commit fraud or misrepresentation;

(c)
The facility was constructed or operated in violation of any provision of this
chapter or provision imposed by the department as a condition of certification;
or

(d)
The cogeneration facility is no longer capable of being operated for the
primary purpose of cogeneration.

(2)
If the department finds that there are few inaccuracies under subsection (1)(b)
of this section and that cumulatively they are insignificant in terms of the
cost or operation of the facility or that the inaccurate data is not
attributable to carelessness or negligence and its inclusion was reasonable
under the circumstances, then the department may provide for the continuance of
the certificate and whatever modification it considers in the public interest.

(3)
Any person, firm, corporation, or organization that obtains a certificate
revoked under this section shall be liable for the total amount of money saved
by claiming the credits and exemptions provided under this chapter. The total
amount of the credits shall be collected as delinquent business and occupation
taxes, and the total of the exemptions shall be collected and distributed as
delinquent property taxes. Interest shall accrue on the amounts of the credits
and exemptions from the date the taxes were otherwise due.

(4)
The department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic
development shall provide technical assistance to the department in carrying
out its responsibilities under this section.

PART
IV

REFERENCES
TO DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT

AND DEPARTMENT OF
TRADE AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 401. The
department of community development and the department of trade and economic
development shall continue to strengthen their existing working relationships.
The existing partnerships are especially notable in rural economic development,
and in infrastructure financing but there should be no limitation placed on, or
barriers raised to continuing efforts to find new areas of collaboration. To
increase the efficiency of service delivery by both departments, new ways of
collaborating in the delivery of services should not be limited only to the two
departments but should be sought and implemented with other departments of
state government and with local and federal governments.

Sec.
402. RCW
41.06.070 and 1998 c 245 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:

(a)
The members of the legislature or to any employee of, or position in, the
legislative branch of the state government including members, officers, and
employees of the legislative council, joint legislative audit and review
committee, statute law committee, and any interim committee of the legislature;

(b)
The justices of the supreme court, judges of the court of appeals, judges of
the superior courts or of the inferior courts, or to any employee of, or
position in the judicial branch of state government;

(c)
Officers, academic personnel, and employees of technical colleges;

(d)
The officers of the Washington state patrol;

(e)
Elective officers of the state;

(f)
The chief executive officer of each agency;

(g)
In the departments of employment security and social and health services, the
director and the director's confidential secretary; in all other departments,
the executive head of which is an individual appointed by the governor, the
director, his or her confidential secretary, and his or her statutory assistant
directors;

(h)
In the case of a multimember board, commission, or committee, whether the
members thereof are elected, appointed by the governor or other authority,
serve ex officio, or are otherwise chosen:

(i)
All members of such boards, commissions, or committees;

(ii)
If the members of the board, commission, or committee serve on a part-time
basis and there is a statutory executive officer: The secretary of the board,
commission, or committee; the chief executive officer of the board, commission,
or committee; and the confidential secretary of the chief executive officer of
the board, commission, or committee;

(iii)
If the members of the board, commission, or committee serve on a full-time
basis: The chief executive officer or administrative officer as designated by
the board, commission, or committee; and a confidential secretary to the chair
of the board, commission, or committee;

(iv)
If all members of the board, commission, or committee serve ex officio: The
chief executive officer; and the confidential secretary of such chief executive
officer;

(i)
The confidential secretaries and administrative assistants in the immediate
offices of the elective officers of the state;

(j)
Assistant attorneys general;

(k)
Commissioned and enlisted personnel in the military service of the state;

(l)
Inmate, student, part-time, or temporary employees, and part-time professional
consultants, as defined by the Washington personnel resources board;

(m)
The public printer or to any employees of or positions in the state printing
plant;

(n)
Officers and employees of the Washington state fruit commission;

(o)
Officers and employees of the Washington state apple advertising commission;

(p)
Officers and employees of the Washington state dairy products commission;

(q)
Officers and employees of the Washington tree fruit research commission;

(r)
Officers and employees of the Washington state beef commission;

(s)
Officers and employees of any commission formed under chapter 15.66 RCW;

(t)
((Officers and employees of the state wheat commission formed under chapter
15.63 RCW;

(u)))
Officers and employees of agricultural commissions formed under chapter 15.65
RCW;

(((v)))
(u) Officers and employees of the nonprofit corporation formed under
chapter 67.40 RCW;

(((w)))
(v) Executive assistants for personnel administration and labor
relations in all state agencies employing such executive assistants including
but not limited to all departments, offices, commissions, committees, boards,
or other bodies subject to the provisions of this chapter and this subsection
shall prevail over any provision of law inconsistent herewith unless specific
exception is made in such law;

(((x)))
(w) In each agency with fifty or more employees: Deputy agency heads,
assistant directors or division directors, and not more than three principal
policy assistants who report directly to the agency head or deputy agency
heads;

(((y)))
(x) All employees of the marine employees' commission;

(((z)
Up to a total of five senior staff positions of the western library network
under chapter 27.26 RCW responsible for formulating policy or for directing
program management of a major administrative unit. This subsection (1)(z)
shall expire on June 30, 1997;

(aa))) (y)
Staff employed by the departments of community((, trade, and economic))
development and trade and economic development to administer energy
policy functions and manage energy site evaluation council activities under RCW
43.21F.045(2)(m);

(((bb)))
(z) Staff employed by Washington State University to administer energy
education, applied research, and technology transfer programs under RCW
43.21F.045 as provided in RCW 28B.30.900(5).

(2)
The following classifications, positions, and employees of institutions of
higher education and related boards are hereby exempted from coverage of this
chapter:

(a)
Members of the governing board of each institution of higher education and
related boards, all presidents, vice-presidents, and their confidential
secretaries, administrative, and personal assistants; deans, directors, and
chairs; academic personnel; and executive heads of major administrative or
academic divisions employed by institutions of higher education; principal
assistants to executive heads of major administrative or academic divisions;
other managerial or professional employees in an institution or related board
having substantial responsibility for directing or controlling program
operations and accountable for allocation of resources and program results, or
for the formulation of institutional policy, or for carrying out personnel
administration or labor relations functions, legislative relations, public
information, development, senior computer systems and network programming, or
internal audits and investigations; and any employee of a community college
district whose place of work is one which is physically located outside the
state of Washington and who is employed pursuant to RCW 28B.50.092 and assigned
to an educational program operating outside of the state of Washington;

(b)
Student, part-time, or temporary employees, and part-time professional
consultants, as defined by the Washington personnel resources board, employed
by institutions of higher education and related boards;

(c)
The governing board of each institution, and related boards, may also exempt
from this chapter classifications involving research activities, counseling of
students, extension or continuing education activities, graphic arts or
publications activities requiring prescribed academic preparation or special
training as determined by the board: PROVIDED, That no nonacademic employee
engaged in office, clerical, maintenance, or food and trade services may be
exempted by the board under this provision;

(d)
Printing craft employees in the department of printing at the University of
Washington.

(3)
In addition to the exemptions specifically provided by this chapter, the
Washington personnel resources board may provide for further exemptions
pursuant to the following procedures. The governor or other appropriate
elected official may submit requests for exemption to the Washington personnel
resources board stating the reasons for requesting such exemptions. The
Washington personnel resources board shall hold a public hearing, after proper
notice, on requests submitted pursuant to this subsection. If the board
determines that the position for which exemption is requested is one involving
substantial responsibility for the formulation of basic agency or executive
policy or one involving directing and controlling program operations of an agency
or a major administrative division thereof, the Washington personnel resources
board shall grant the request and such determination shall be final as to any
decision made before July 1, 1993. The total number of additional exemptions
permitted under this subsection shall not exceed one percent of the number of
employees in the classified service not including employees of institutions of
higher education and related boards for those agencies not directly under the
authority of any elected public official other than the governor, and shall not
exceed a total of twenty-five for all agencies under the authority of elected
public officials other than the governor.

The
salary and fringe benefits of all positions presently or hereafter exempted
except for the chief executive officer of each agency, full-time members of
boards and commissions, administrative assistants and confidential secretaries
in the immediate office of an elected state official, and the personnel listed
in subsections (1)(j) through (((v), (y), (z),)) (u) and (x) and
(2) of this section, shall be determined by the Washington personnel resources
board. However, beginning with changes proposed for the 1997-99 fiscal
biennium, changes to the classification plan affecting exempt salaries must
meet the same provisions for classified salary increases resulting from
adjustments to the classification plan as outlined in RCW 41.06.152.

Any
person holding a classified position subject to the provisions of this chapter
shall, when and if such position is subsequently exempted from the application
of this chapter, be afforded the following rights: If such person previously
held permanent status in another classified position, such person shall have a
right of reversion to the highest class of position previously held, or to a
position of similar nature and salary.

Any
classified employee having civil service status in a classified position who
accepts an appointment in an exempt position shall have the right of reversion
to the highest class of position previously held, or to a position of similar
nature and salary.

A
person occupying an exempt position who is terminated from the position for
gross misconduct or malfeasance does not have the right of reversion to a
classified position as provided for in this section.

Sec.
403. RCW
41.06.072 and 1995 c 399 s 59 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to the exemptions set forth in this chapter, this chapter shall not
apply within the departments of community((, trade, and economic))
development and trade and economic development to the director((,))
and one confidential secretary for each department, the deputy
directors, all assistant directors, and the state historic preservation
officer((, and up to two professional staff members within the emergency
management program)).

Sec.
404. RCW
43.06.115 and 1998 c 245 s 47 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The governor may, by executive order, after consultation with or notification
of the executive-legislative committee on economic development created by
chapter . . . (Senate Bill No. 5300), Laws of 1993, declare a
community to be a "military impacted area." A "military
impacted area" means a community or communities, as identified in the
executive order, that experience serious social and economic hardships because
of a change in defense spending by the federal government in that community or
communities.

(2)
If the governor executes an order under subsection (1) of this section, the
governor shall establish a response team to coordinate state efforts to assist
the military impacted community. The response team may include, but not be
limited to, one member from each of the following agencies: (a) The department
of community((, trade, and economic)) development; (b) the department
of trade and economic development; (c) the department of social and health
services; (((c))) (d) the employment security department; (((d)))
(e) the state board for community and technical colleges; (((e)))
(f) the higher education coordinating board; and (((f))) (g)
the department of transportation. The governor may appoint a response team
coordinator. The governor shall seek to actively involve the impacted
community or communities in planning and implementing a response to the
crisis. The governor may seek input or assistance from the community
diversification advisory committee, and the governor may establish task forces
in the community or communities to assist in the coordination and delivery of
services to the local community. The state and community response shall
consider economic development, human service, and training needs of the
community or communities impacted.

Sec.
405. RCW
43.17.010 and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 16, 1993 c 472 s 17, and 1993 c 280 s 18 are
each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

There
shall be departments of the state government which shall be known as (1) the
department of social and health services, (2) the department of ecology, (3)
the department of labor and industries, (4) the department of agriculture, (5)
the department of fish and wildlife, (6) the department of transportation, (7)
the department of licensing, (8) the department of general administration, (9)
the department of community((, trade, and economic)) development, (10)
the department of veterans affairs, (11) the department of revenue, (12) the
department of retirement systems, (13) the department of corrections, ((and))
(14) the department of health, ((and)) (15) the department of financial
institutions, and (16) the department of trade and economic development,
which shall be charged with the execution, enforcement, and administration of
such laws, and invested with such powers and required to perform such duties,
as the legislature may provide.

Sec.
406. RCW 43.17.020
and 1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

There
shall be a chief executive officer of each department to be known as: (1) The
secretary of social and health services, (2) the director of ecology, (3) the
director of labor and industries, (4) the director of agriculture, (5) the
director of fish and wildlife, (6) the secretary of transportation, (7) the
director of licensing, (8) the director of general administration, (9) the
director of community((, trade, and economic)) development, (10) the
director of veterans affairs, (11) the director of revenue, (12) the director
of retirement systems, (13) the secretary of corrections, ((and)) (14)
the secretary of health, ((and)) (15) the director of financial
institutions, and (16) the director of trade and economic development.

Such
officers, except the secretary of transportation and the director of fish and
wildlife, shall be appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate,
and hold office at the pleasure of the governor. The secretary of
transportation shall be appointed by the transportation commission as
prescribed by RCW 47.01.041. The director of fish and wildlife shall be
appointed by the fish and wildlife commission as prescribed by RCW 77.04.055.

Sec.
407. RCW
19.02.050 and 1997 c 391 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature hereby directs the full participation by the following agencies in
the implementation of this chapter:

(1)
Department of agriculture;

(2)
Secretary of state;

(3)
Department of social and health services;

(4)
Department of revenue;

(5)
Department of fish and wildlife;

(6)
Department of employment security;

(7)
Department of labor and industries;

(8)
Department of ((community,)) trade((,)) and economic development;

(9)
Department of community development;

(10)
Liquor control board;

(((10)))
(11) Department of health;

(((11)))
(12) Department of licensing;

(((12)))
(13) Parks and recreation commission;

(((13)))
(14) Utilities and transportation commission; and

(((14)))
(15) Other agencies as determined by the governor.

Sec.
408. RCW
43.160.030 and 1996 c 51 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The community economic revitalization board is hereby created to exercise the
powers granted under this chapter.

(2)
The board shall consist of the chairman of and one minority member appointed by
the speaker of the house of representatives from the committee of the house of
representatives that deals with issues of economic development, the chairman of
and one minority member appointed by the president of the senate from the
committee of the senate that deals with issues of economic development, and the
following members appointed by the governor: A recognized private or public
sector economist; one port district official; one county official; one city
official; one representative of the public; one representative of small
businesses each from: (a) The area west of Puget Sound, (b) the area east of
Puget Sound and west of the Cascade range, (c) the area east of the Cascade
range and west of the Columbia river, and (d) the area east of the Columbia
river; one executive from large businesses each from the area west of the
Cascades and the area east of the Cascades. The appointive members shall
initially be appointed to terms as follows: Three members for one-year terms,
three members for two-year terms, and three members for three-year terms which
shall include the chair. Thereafter each succeeding term shall be for three
years. The chair of the board shall be selected by the governor. The members
of the board shall elect one of their members to serve as vice-chair. The
director of community((, trade, and economic)) development, the
director of trade and economic development, the director of revenue, the
commissioner of employment security, and the secretary of transportation shall
serve as nonvoting advisory members of the board.

(3)
Management services, including fiscal and contract services, shall be provided
by the department to assist the board in implementing this chapter and the
allocation of private activity bonds.

(4)
Members of the board shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(5)
If a vacancy occurs by death, resignation, or otherwise of appointive members
of the board, the governor shall fill the same for the unexpired term. Members
of the board may be removed for malfeasance or misfeasance in office, upon
specific written charges by the governor, under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(6)
A member appointed by the governor may not be absent from more than fifty
percent of the regularly scheduled meetings in any one calendar year. Any
member who exceeds this absence limitation is deemed to have withdrawn from the
office and may be replaced by the governor.

Sec.
409. RCW
43.163.060 and 1995 c 399 s 90 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The authority is authorized to participate fully in federal and other
governmental economic development finance programs and to take such actions as
are necessary and consistent with this chapter to secure to itself and the
people of the state the benefits of those programs and to meet their
requirements.

(2)
The authority shall coordinate its programs with those contributing to a common
purpose found elsewhere in the departments of community((, trade, and
economic)) development, trade and economic development, agriculture
or employment security, or any other department or organization of, or
affiliated with, the state or federal government, and shall avoid any
duplication of such activities or programs provided elsewhere. The departments
of community((, trade, and economic)) development, trade and economic
development, agriculture, employment security and other relevant state
agencies shall provide to the authority all reports prepared in the course of
their ongoing activities which may assist in the identification of unmet
capital financing needs by small-sized and medium-sized businesses in the
state.

Sec.
410. RCW
47.39.090 and 1995 c 399 s 123 are each amended to read as follows:

In
developing the scenic and recreational highways program, the department shall
consult with the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development, the department of trade and economic development, the
department of natural resources, the parks and recreation commission, affected
cities, towns, and counties, regional transportation planning organizations,
state-wide bicycling organizations, and other interested parties. The scenic
and recreational highways program may identify entire highway loops or similar
tourist routes that could be developed to promote tourist activity and provide
concurrent economic growth while protecting the scenic and recreational quality
surrounding state highways.

Sec.
411. RCW
47.76.230 and 1995 c 380 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of transportation shall continue its responsibility for the
development and implementation of the state rail plan and programs, and the
utilities and transportation commission shall continue its responsibility for
intrastate rates, service, and safety issues.

(2)
The department of transportation shall maintain an enhanced data file on the
rail system. Proprietary annual station traffic data from each railroad and
the modal use of major shippers shall be obtained to the extent that such information
is available.

(3)
The department of transportation shall provide technical assistance, upon
request, to state agencies and local interests. Technical assistance includes,
but is not limited to, the following:

(a)
Rail project cost-benefit analyses conducted in accordance with methodologies
recommended by the Federal Railroad Administration;

(b)
Assistance in the formation of county rail districts and port districts; and

(c)
Feasibility studies for rail service continuation and/or rail service
assistance.

(4) With funding authorized by the legislature, the department of
transportation, in collaboration with the department of community((, trade,
and economic)) development, the department of trade and economic
development, and local economic development agencies, and other interested
public and private organizations, shall develop a cooperative process to
conduct community and business information programs and to regularly
disseminate information on rail matters.

Sec.
412. RCW
48.50.040 and 1995 c 285 s 23 and 1995 c 369 s 37 are each reenacted to read as
follows:

(1)
When an insurer has reason to believe that a fire loss reported to the insurer
may be of other than accidental cause, the insurer shall notify the chief of
the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, in the
manner prescribed under RCW 48.05.320 concerning the circumstances of the fire
loss, including any and all relevant material developed from the insurer's
inquiry into the fire loss.

(2)
Notification of the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director
of fire protection, under subsection (1) of this section does not relieve the
insurer of the duty to respond to a request for information from any other
authorized agency and does not bar an insurer from other reporting under RCW
48.50.030(2).

Sec.
413. RCW
50.38.030 and 1995 c 399 s 142 are each amended to read as follows:

The
employment security department shall consult with the following agencies prior
to the issuance of the state occupational forecast:

(1)
Office of financial management;

(2)
Department of community((, trade, and economic)) development;

(3)
Department of labor and industries;

(4)
State board for community and technical colleges;

(5)
Superintendent of public instruction;

(6)
Department of social and health services;

(7)
Department of trade and economic development;

(8)
Work force training and education coordinating board; and

(((8)))
(9) Other state and local agencies as deemed appropriate by the
commissioner of the employment security department.

These
agencies shall cooperate with the employment security department, submitting
information relevant to the generation of occupational forecasts.

Sec.
414. RCW
80.50.030 and 1996 c 186 s 108 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is created and established the energy facility site evaluation council.

(2)(a)
The chairman of the council shall be appointed by the governor with the advice
and consent of the senate, shall have a vote on matters before the council,
shall serve for a term coextensive with the term of the governor, and is
removable for cause. The chairman may designate a member of the council to
serve as acting chairman in the event of the chairman's absence. The chairman
is a "state employee" for the purposes of chapter 42.52 RCW. As
applicable, when attending meetings of the council, members may receive
reimbursement for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060, and are eligible for compensation under RCW 43.03.250.

(b)
The chairman or a designee shall execute all official documents, contracts, and
other materials on behalf of the council. The ((Washington state))
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development shall
provide all administrative and staff support for the council. The director of
the department of community((, trade, and economic)) development has
supervisory authority over the staff of the council and shall employ such
personnel as are necessary to implement this chapter. Not more than three such
employees may be exempt from chapter 41.06 RCW.

(3)
The council shall consist of the directors, administrators, or their designees,
of the following departments, agencies, commissions, and committees or their
statutory successors:

(a)
Department of ecology;

(b)
Department of fish and wildlife;

(c)
Department of health;

(d)
Military department;

(e)
Department of community((, trade, and economic)) development;

(f)
Utilities and transportation commission;

(g)
Department of natural resources;

(h)
Department of agriculture;

(i)
Department of trade and economic development; and

(j)
Department of transportation.

(4)
The appropriate county legislative authority of every county wherein an
application for a proposed site is filed shall appoint a member or designee as
a voting member to the council. The member or designee so appointed shall sit
with the council only at such times as the council considers the proposed site
for the county which he or she represents, and such member or designee shall
serve until there has been a final acceptance or rejection of the proposed
site.

(5)
The city legislative authority of every city within whose corporate limits an
energy plant is proposed to be located shall appoint a member or designee as a
voting member to the council. The member or designee so appointed shall sit
with the council only at such times as the council considers the proposed site
for the city which he or she represents, and such member or designee shall
serve until there has been a final acceptance or rejection of the proposed
site.

(6)
For any port district wherein an application for a proposed port facility is
filed subject to this chapter, the port district shall appoint a member or
designee as a nonvoting member to the council. The member or designee so
appointed shall sit with the council only at such times as the council
considers the proposed site for the port district which he or she represents,
and such member or designee shall serve until there has been a final acceptance
or rejection of the proposed site. The provisions of this subsection shall not
apply if the port district is the applicant, either singly or in partnership or
association with any other person.

PART
V

REFERENCES TO
DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT

Sec.
501. RCW
19.27.070 and 1995 c 399 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

There
is hereby established a state building code council to be appointed by the
governor.

(1)
The state building code council shall consist of fifteen members, two of whom
shall be county elected legislative body members or elected executives and two
of whom shall be city elected legislative body members or mayors. One of the
members shall be a local government building code enforcement official and one
of the members shall be a local government fire service official. Of the
remaining nine members, one member shall represent general construction,
specializing in commercial and industrial building construction; one member
shall represent general construction, specializing in residential and
multifamily building construction; one member shall represent the architectural
design profession; one member shall represent the structural engineering
profession; one member shall represent the mechanical engineering profession;
one member shall represent the construction building trades; one member shall
represent manufacturers, installers, or suppliers of building materials and
components; one member shall be a person with a physical disability and shall
represent the disability community; and one member shall represent the general
public. At least six of these fifteen members shall reside east of the crest
of the Cascade mountains. The council shall include: Two members of the house
of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house, one from each caucus;
two members of the senate appointed by the president of the senate, one from each
caucus; and an employee of the electrical division of the department of labor
and industries, as ex officio, nonvoting members with all other privileges and
rights of membership. Terms of office shall be for three years. The council
shall elect a member to serve as chair of the council for one-year terms of
office. Any member who is appointed by virtue of being an elected official or
holding public employment shall be removed from the council if he or she ceases
being such an elected official or holding such public employment. Before
making any appointments to the building code council, the governor shall seek
nominations from recognized organizations which represent the entities or
interests listed in this subsection. Members serving on the council on July
28, 1985, may complete their terms of office. Any vacancy shall be filled by
alternating appointments from governmental and nongovernmental entities or
interests until the council is constituted as required by this subsection.

(2)
Members shall not be compensated but shall receive reimbursement for travel
expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(3)
The department of community((, trade, and economic)) development shall
provide administrative and clerical assistance to the building code council.

Sec.
502. RCW
27.34.020 and 1995 c 399 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter:

(1)
"Advisory council" means the advisory council on historic
preservation.

(2)
"Department" means the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development.

(3)
"Director" means the director of community((, trade, and economic))
development.

(4)
"Federal act" means the national historic preservation act of 1966
(Public Law 89-655; 80 Stat. 915).

(5)
"Heritage council" means the Washington state heritage council.

(6)
"Historic preservation" includes the protection, rehabilitation,
restoration, identification, scientific excavation, and reconstruction of
districts, sites, buildings, structures, and objects significant in American
and Washington state history, architecture, archaeology, or culture.

(7)
"Office" means the office of archaeology and historic preservation
within the department.

(8)
"Preservation officer" means the state historic preservation officer
as provided for in RCW 27.34.210.

(9)
"Project" means programs leading to the preservation for public
benefit of historical properties, whether by state and local governments or
other public bodies, or private organizations or individuals, including the
acquisition of title or interests in, and the development of, any district,
site, building, structure, or object that is significant in American and
Washington state history, architecture, archaeology, or culture, and property
used in connection therewith, or for its development.

(10)
"State historical agencies" means the state historical societies and
the office of archaeology and historic preservation within the department.

(11)
"State historical societies" means the Washington state historical
society and the eastern Washington state historical society.

(12)
"Cultural resource management plan" means a comprehensive plan which
identifies and organizes information on the state of Washington's historic,
archaeological, and architectural resources into a set of management criteria,
and which is to be used for producing reliable decisions, recommendations, and
advice relative to the identification, evaluation, and protection of these
resources.

Sec.
503. RCW
27.53.030 and 1995 c 399 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions contained in this
section shall apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Archaeology" means systematic, scientific study of man's past
through material remains.

(2)
"Archaeological object" means an object that comprises the physical
evidence of an indigenous and subsequent culture including material remains of
past human life including monuments, symbols, tools, facilities, and
technological by-products.

(3)
"Archaeological site" means a geographic locality in Washington,
including but not limited to, submerged and submersible lands and the bed of
the sea within the state's jurisdiction, that contains archaeological objects.

(4)
"Department" means the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development.

(5)
"Director" means the director of community((, trade, and economic))
development or the director's designee.

(6)
"Historic" means peoples and cultures who are known through written
documents in their own or other languages. As applied to underwater
archaeological resources, the term historic shall include only those properties
which are listed in or eligible for listing in the Washington State Register of
Historic Places (RCW 27.34.220) or the National Register of Historic Places as
defined in the National Historic Preservation Act of 1966 (Title 1, Sec. 101,
Public Law 89-665; 80 Stat. 915; 16 U.S.C. Sec. 470) as now or hereafter
amended.

(7)
"Prehistoric" means peoples and cultures who are unknown through
contemporaneous written documents in any language.

(8)
"Professional archaeologist" means a person who has met the
educational, training, and experience requirements of the ((society)) register
of professional archaeologists.

(9)
"Qualified archaeologist" means a person who has had formal training
and/or experience in archaeology over a period of at least three years, and has
been certified in writing to be a qualified archaeologist by two professional
archaeologists.

(10)
"Amateur society" means any organization composed primarily of
persons who are not professional archaeologists, whose primary interest is in
the archaeological resources of the state, and which has been certified in
writing by two professional archaeologists.

(11)
"Historic archaeological resources" means those properties which are
listed in or eligible for listing in the Washington State Register of Historic
Places (RCW 27.34.220) or the National Register of Historic Places as defined
in the National Historic Preservation Act of 1966 (Title 1, Sec. 101, Public
Law 89-665; 80 Stat. 915; 16 U.S.C. Sec. 470) as now or hereafter amended.

Sec.
504. RCW
28A.215.110 and 1999 c 350 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout RCW 28A.215.100 through 28A.215.200 and 28A.215.900 through
28A.215.908.

(1)
"Advisory committee" means the advisory committee under RCW
28A.215.140.

(2)
"Department" means the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development.

(3)
"Eligible child" means a child not eligible for kindergarten whose
family income is at or below one hundred ten percent of the federal poverty
level, as published annually by the federal department of health and human
services, and includes a child whose family is eligible for public assistance,
and who is not a participant in a federal or state program providing
comprehensive services and may include children who are eligible under rules
adopted by the department if the number of such children equals not more than
ten percent of the total enrollment in the early childhood program. Priority
for enrollment shall be given to children from families with the lowest income
or to eligible children from families with multiple needs.

(4)
"Approved programs" means those state-supported education and special
assistance programs which are recognized by the department of community((,
trade, and economic)) development as meeting the minimum program rules
adopted by the department to qualify under RCW 28A.215.100 through 28A.215.200
and 28A.215.900 through 28A.215.908 and are designated as eligible for funding
by the department under RCW 28A.215.160 and 28A.215.180.

(5)
"Comprehensive" means an assistance program that focuses on the needs
of the child and includes education, health, and family support services.

(6)
"Family support services" means providing opportunities for parents
to:

(a)
Actively participate in their child's early childhood program;

(b)
Increase their knowledge of child development and parenting skills;

(c)
Further their education and training;

(d)
Increase their ability to use needed services in the community;

(e)
Increase their self-reliance.

Sec.
505. RCW
28A.215.120 and 1994 c 166 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development shall
administer a state-supported early childhood education and assistance program
to assist eligible children with educational, social, health, nutritional, and
cultural development to enhance their opportunity for success in the common
school system. Eligible children shall be admitted to approved early childhood
programs to the extent that the legislature provides funds, and additional
eligible children may be admitted to the extent that grants and contributions
from community sources provide sufficient funds for a program equivalent to
that supported by state funds.

Sec.
506. RCW
36.27.100 and 1995 c 399 s 41 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature recognizes that, due to the magnitude or volume of offenses in a
given area of the state, there is a recurring need for supplemental assistance
in the prosecuting of drug and drug-related offenses that can be directed to
the area of the state with the greatest need for short-term assistance. A
state-wide drug prosecution assistance program is created within the department
of community((, trade, and economic)) development to assist county
prosecuting attorneys in the prosecution of drug and drug-related offenses.

Sec.
507. RCW
36.70A.030 and 1997 c 429 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Adopt a comprehensive land use plan" means to enact a new
comprehensive land use plan or to update an existing comprehensive land use
plan.

(2)
"Agricultural land" means land primarily devoted to the commercial
production of horticultural, viticultural, floricultural, dairy, apiary,
vegetable, or animal products or of berries, grain, hay, straw, turf, seed,
Christmas trees not subject to the excise tax imposed by RCW 84.33.100 through
84.33.140, finfish in upland hatcheries, or livestock, and that has long-term
commercial significance for agricultural production.

(3)
"City" means any city or town, including a code city.

(4)
"Comprehensive land use plan," "comprehensive plan," or
"plan" means a generalized coordinated land use policy statement of
the governing body of a county or city that is adopted pursuant to this
chapter.

(5)
"Critical areas" include the following areas and ecosystems: (a)
Wetlands; (b) areas with a critical recharging effect on aquifers used for
potable water; (c) fish and wildlife habitat conservation areas; (d) frequently
flooded areas; and (e) geologically hazardous areas.

(6)
"Department" means the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development.

(7)
"Development regulations" or "regulation" means the
controls placed on development or land use activities by a county or city,
including, but not limited to, zoning ordinances, critical areas ordinances,
shoreline master programs, official controls, planned unit development
ordinances, subdivision ordinances, and binding site plan ordinances together
with any amendments thereto. A development regulation does not include a
decision to approve a project permit application, as defined in RCW 36.70B.020,
even though the decision may be expressed in a resolution or ordinance of the
legislative body of the county or city.

(8)
"Forest land" means land primarily devoted to growing trees for
long-term commercial timber production on land that can be economically and
practically managed for such production, including Christmas trees subject to
the excise tax imposed under RCW 84.33.100 through 84.33.140, and that has
long-term commercial significance. In determining whether forest land is
primarily devoted to growing trees for long-term commercial timber production
on land that can be economically and practically managed for such production,
the following factors shall be considered: (a) The proximity of the land to
urban, suburban, and rural settlements; (b) surrounding parcel size and the
compatibility and intensity of adjacent and nearby land uses; (c) long-term
local economic conditions that affect the ability to manage for timber
production; and (d) the availability of public facilities and services
conducive to conversion of forest land to other uses.

(9)
"Geologically hazardous areas" means areas that because of their
susceptibility to erosion, sliding, earthquake, or other geological events, are
not suited to the siting of commercial, residential, or industrial development
consistent with public health or safety concerns.

(10)
"Long-term commercial significance" includes the growing capacity, productivity,
and soil composition of the land for long-term commercial production, in
consideration with the land's proximity to population areas, and the
possibility of more intense uses of the land.

(11)
"Minerals" include gravel, sand, and valuable metallic substances.

(12)
"Public facilities" include streets, roads, highways, sidewalks,
street and road lighting systems, traffic signals, domestic water systems,
storm and sanitary sewer systems, parks and recreational facilities, and
schools.

(13)
"Public services" include fire protection and suppression, law
enforcement, public health, education, recreation, environmental protection,
and other governmental services.

(14)
"Rural character" refers to the patterns of land use and development
established by a county in the rural element of its comprehensive plan:

(a)
In which open space, the natural landscape, and vegetation predominate over the
built environment;

(b)
That foster traditional rural lifestyles, rural-based economies, and
opportunities to both live and work in rural areas;

(c)
That provide visual landscapes that are traditionally found in rural areas and
communities;

(d)
That are compatible with the use of the land by wildlife and for fish and
wildlife habitat;

(e)
That reduce the inappropriate conversion of undeveloped land into sprawling,
low‑density development;

(f)
That generally do not require the extension of urban governmental services; and

(g)
That are consistent with the protection of natural surface water flows and
ground water and surface water recharge and discharge areas.

(15)
"Rural development" refers to development outside the urban growth
area and outside agricultural, forest, and mineral resource lands designated
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. Rural development can consist of a variety of uses
and residential densities, including clustered residential development, at
levels that are consistent with the preservation of rural character and the
requirements of the rural element. Rural development does not refer to agriculture
or forestry activities that may be conducted in rural areas.

(16)
"Rural governmental services" or "rural services" include
those public services and public facilities historically and typically
delivered at an intensity usually found in rural areas, and may include
domestic water systems, fire and police protection services, transportation and
public transit services, and other public utilities associated with rural
development and normally not associated with urban areas. Rural services do
not include storm or sanitary sewers, except as otherwise authorized by RCW
36.70A.110(4).

(17)
"Urban growth" refers to growth that makes intensive use of land for
the location of buildings, structures, and impermeable surfaces to such a
degree as to be incompatible with the primary use of land for the production of
food, other agricultural products, or fiber, or the extraction of mineral
resources, rural uses, rural development, and natural resource lands designated
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170. A pattern of more intensive rural development, as
provided in RCW 36.70A.070(5)(d), is not urban growth. When allowed to spread
over wide areas, urban growth typically requires urban governmental services.
"Characterized by urban growth" refers to land having urban growth
located on it, or to land located in relationship to an area with urban growth
on it as to be appropriate for urban growth.

(18)
"Urban growth areas" means those areas designated by a county
pursuant to RCW 36.70A.110.

(19)
"Urban governmental services" or "urban services" include
those public services and public facilities at an intensity historically and
typically provided in cities, specifically including storm and sanitary sewer
systems, domestic water systems, street cleaning services, fire and police
protection services, public transit services, and other public utilities
associated with urban areas and normally not associated with rural areas.

(20)
"Wetland" or "wetlands" means areas that are inundated or
saturated by surface water or ground water at a frequency and duration
sufficient to support, and that under normal circumstances do support, a
prevalence of vegetation typically adapted for life in saturated soil
conditions. Wetlands generally include swamps, marshes, bogs, and similar
areas. Wetlands do not include those artificial wetlands intentionally created
from nonwetland sites, including, but not limited to, irrigation and drainage
ditches, grass-lined swales, canals, detention facilities, wastewater treatment
facilities, farm ponds, and landscape amenities, or those wetlands created
after July 1, 1990, that were unintentionally created as a result of the
construction of a road, street, or highway. Wetlands may include those
artificial wetlands intentionally created from nonwetland areas created to
mitigate conversion of wetlands.

Sec.
508. RCW
36.70A.040 and 1998 c 171 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each county that has both a population of fifty thousand or more and, until May
16, 1995, has had its population increase by more than ten percent in the
previous ten years or, on or after May 16, 1995, has had its population
increase by more than seventeen percent in the previous ten years, and the
cities located within such county, and any other county regardless of its
population that has had its population increase by more than twenty percent in
the previous ten years, and the cities located within such county, shall
conform with all of the requirements of this chapter. However, the county
legislative authority of such a county with a population of less than fifty
thousand population may adopt a resolution removing the county, and the cities
located within the county, from the requirements of adopting comprehensive land
use plans and development regulations under this chapter if this resolution is
adopted and filed with the department by December 31, 1990, for counties
initially meeting this set of criteria, or within sixty days of the date the
office of financial management certifies that a county meets this set of
criteria under subsection (5) of this section.

Once
a county meets either of these sets of criteria, the requirement to conform
with all of the requirements of this chapter remains in effect, even if the
county no longer meets one of these sets of criteria.

(2)
The county legislative authority of any county that does not meet either of the
sets of criteria established under subsection (1) of this section may adopt a
resolution indicating its intention to have subsection (1) of this section
apply to the county. Each city, located in a county that chooses to plan under
this subsection, shall conform with all of the requirements of this chapter.
Once such a resolution has been adopted, the county and the cities located
within the county remain subject to all of the requirements of this chapter.

(3)
Any county or city that is initially required to conform with all of the
requirements of this chapter under subsection (1) of this section shall take
actions under this chapter as follows: (a) The county legislative authority
shall adopt a county-wide planning policy under RCW 36.70A.210; (b) the county
and each city located within the county shall designate critical areas,
agricultural lands, forest lands, and mineral resource lands, and adopt
development regulations conserving these designated agricultural lands, forest
lands, and mineral resource lands and protecting these designated critical areas,
under RCW 36.70A.170 and 36.70A.060; (c) the county shall designate and take
other actions related to urban growth areas under RCW 36.70A.110; (d) if the
county has a population of fifty thousand or more, the county and each city
located within the county shall adopt a comprehensive plan under this chapter
and development regulations that are consistent with and implement the
comprehensive plan on or before July 1, 1994, and if the county has a
population of less than fifty thousand, the county and each city located within
the county shall adopt a comprehensive plan under this chapter and development
regulations that are consistent with and implement the comprehensive plan by
January 1, 1995, but if the governor makes written findings that a county with
a population of less than fifty thousand or a city located within such a county
is not making reasonable progress toward adopting a comprehensive plan and
development regulations the governor may reduce this deadline for such actions
to be taken by no more than one hundred eighty days. Any county or city
subject to this subsection may obtain an additional six months before it is
required to have adopted its development regulations by submitting a letter
notifying the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development of its need prior to the deadline for adopting both a comprehensive
plan and development regulations.

(4)
Any county or city that is required to conform with all the requirements of
this chapter, as a result of the county legislative authority adopting its
resolution of intention under subsection (2) of this section, shall take
actions under this chapter as follows: (a) The county legislative authority
shall adopt a county-wide planning policy under RCW 36.70A.210; (b) the county
and each city that is located within the county shall adopt development
regulations conserving agricultural lands, forest lands, and mineral resource
lands it designated under RCW 36.70A.060 within one year of the date the county
legislative authority adopts its resolution of intention; (c) the county shall
designate and take other actions related to urban growth areas under RCW
36.70A.110; and (d) the county and each city that is located within the county
shall adopt a comprehensive plan and development regulations that are
consistent with and implement the comprehensive plan not later than four years
from the date the county legislative authority adopts its resolution of
intention, but a county or city may obtain an additional six months before it
is required to have adopted its development regulations by submitting a letter
notifying the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development of its need prior to the deadline for adopting both a comprehensive
plan and development regulations.

(5)
If the office of financial management certifies that the population of a county
that previously had not been required to plan under subsection (1) or (2) of
this section has changed sufficiently to meet either of the sets of criteria
specified under subsection (1) of this section, and where applicable, the
county legislative authority has not adopted a resolution removing the county
from these requirements as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the
county and each city within such county shall take actions under this chapter
as follows: (a) The county legislative authority shall adopt a county-wide
planning policy under RCW 36.70A.210; (b) the county and each city located
within the county shall adopt development regulations under RCW 36.70A.060
conserving agricultural lands, forest lands, and mineral resource lands it
designated within one year of the certification by the office of financial
management; (c) the county shall designate and take other actions related to
urban growth areas under RCW 36.70A.110; and (d) the county and each city
located within the county shall adopt a comprehensive land use plan and
development regulations that are consistent with and implement the
comprehensive plan within four years of the certification by the office of financial
management, but a county or city may obtain an additional six months before it
is required to have adopted its development regulations by submitting a letter
notifying the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development of its need prior to the deadline for adopting both a comprehensive
plan and development regulations.

(6)
A copy of each document that is required under this section shall be submitted
to the department at the time of its adoption.

(7)
Cities and counties planning under this chapter must amend the transportation
element of the comprehensive plan to be in compliance with this chapter and
chapter 47.80 RCW no later than December 31, 2000.

Sec.
509. RCW
36.70A.131 and 1998 c 286 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

As
part of the review required by RCW 36.70A.130(1), a county or city shall review
its mineral resource lands designations adopted pursuant to RCW 36.70A.170 and
mineral resource lands development regulations adopted pursuant to RCW
36.70A.040 and 36.70A.060. In its review, the county or city shall take into
consideration:

(1)
New information made available since the adoption or last review of its
designations or development regulations, including data available from the
department of natural resources relating to mineral resource deposits; and

(2) New or modified model development regulations for mineral
resource lands prepared by the department of natural resources, the department
of community((, trade, and economic)) development, or the Washington
state association of counties.

Sec.
510. RCW
39.84.090 and 1998 c 245 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Prior to issuance of any revenue bonds, each public corporation shall submit a
copy of its enabling ordinance and charter, a description of any industrial
development facility proposed to be undertaken, and the basis for its
qualification as an industrial development facility to the department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development.

(2)
If the industrial development facility is not eligible under this chapter, the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development shall give
notice to the public corporation, in writing and by certified mail, within twelve
working days of receipt of the description.

(3)
The department of community((, trade, and economic)) development shall
provide such advice and assistance to public corporations and municipalities
which have created or may wish to create public corporations as the public
corporations or municipalities request and the department of community((,
trade, and economic)) development considers appropriate.

Sec.
511. RCW
43.08.260 and 1997 c 319 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
The legislature recognizes the ethical obligation of attorneys to represent
clients without interference by third parties in the discharge of professional
obligations to clients. However, to ensure the most beneficial use of state
resources, the legislature finds that it is within the authority of the
legislature to specify the categories of legal cases in which qualified legal
aid programs may provide civil representation with state moneys. Accordingly,
moneys appropriated for civil legal representation pursuant to this section
shall not be used for legal representation that is either outside the scope of
this section or prohibited by this section.

(b)
Nothing in this section is intended to limit the authority of existing
entities, including but not limited to the Washington state bar association,
the public disclosure commission, the state auditor, and the federal legal
services corporation to resolve issues within their respective jurisdictions.

(2)
Any money appropriated by the legislature from the public safety and education
account pursuant to RCW 43.08.250 or from any other state fund or account for
civil representation of indigent persons shall be used solely for the purpose
of contracting with qualified legal aid programs for legal representation of
indigent persons in matters relating to: (a) Domestic relations and family law
matters, (b) public assistance and health care, (c) housing and utilities, (d)
social security, (e) mortgage foreclosures, (f) home protection bankruptcies, (g)
consumer fraud and unfair sales practices, (h) rights of residents of long-term
care facilities, (i) wills, estates, and living wills, (j) elder abuse, and (k)
guardianship.

(3)
For purposes of this section, a "qualified legal aid program" means a
not-for-profit corporation incorporated and operating exclusively in Washington
which has received basic field funding for the provision of civil legal
services to indigents from the federal legal services corporation or that has
received funding for civil legal services for indigents under this section
before July 1, 1997.

(4)
The department of community((, trade, and economic)) development shall
establish a distribution formula based on the distribution by county of
individuals with incomes below the official federal poverty level guidelines.
When entering into a contract with a qualified legal services provider under
this section, the department shall require the provider to provide legal
services in a manner that maximizes geographic access in accordance with the
formula established in this subsection (4).

(5)
Funds distributed to qualified legal aid programs under this section may not be
used directly or indirectly for:

(a)
Lobbying.

(i)
For purposes of this section, "lobbying" means any personal service,
advertisement, telegram, telephone communication, letter, printed or written
matter, or other device directly or indirectly intended to influence any member
of congress or any other federal, state, or local nonjudicial official, whether
elected or appointed:

(A)
In connection with any act, bill, resolution, or similar legislation by the
congress of the United States or by any state or local legislative body, or any
administrative rule, rule-making activity, standard, rate, or other enactment
by any federal, state, or local administrative agency;

(B)
In connection with any referendum, initiative, constitutional amendment, or any
similar procedure of the congress, any state legislature, any local council, or
any similar governing body acting in a legislative capacity; or

(C)
In connection with inclusion of any provision in a legislative measure
appropriating funds to, or defining or limiting the functions or authority of,
the recipient of funds under this section.

(ii)
"Lobbying" does not include the response of an employee of a legal
aid program to a written request from a governmental agency, an elected or
appointed official, or committee on a specific matter. This exception does not
authorize communication with anyone other than the requesting party, or agent
or employee of such agency, official, or committee.

(b)
Grass roots lobbying. For purposes of this section, "grass roots
lobbying" means preparation, production, or dissemination of information
the purpose of which is to encourage the public at large, or any definable
segment thereof, to contact legislators or their staff in support of or in
opposition to pending or proposed legislation; or contribute to or participate
in a demonstration, march, rally, lobbying campaign, or letter writing or telephone
campaign for the purpose of influencing the course of pending or proposed
legislation.

(c)
Class action lawsuits.

(d)
Participating in or identifying the program with prohibited political
activities. For purposes of this section, "prohibited political
activities" means (i) any activity directed toward the success or failure
of a political party, a candidate for partisan or nonpartisan office, a
partisan political group, or a ballot measure; (ii) advertising or contributing
or soliciting financial support for or against any candidate, political group,
or ballot measure; or (iii) voter registration or transportation activities.

(e)
Representation in fee-generating cases. For purposes of this section,
"fee-generating" means a case that might reasonably be expected to
result in a fee for legal services if undertaken by a private attorney. The
charging of a fee pursuant to subsection (6) of this section does not establish
the fee-generating nature of a case.

A
fee-generating case may be accepted when: (i) The case has been rejected by
the local lawyer referral services or by two private attorneys; (ii) neither
the referral service nor two private attorneys will consider the case without
payment of a consultation fee; (iii) after consultation with the appropriate
representatives of the private bar, the program has determined that the type of
case is one that private attorneys do not ordinarily accept, or do not accept
without prepayment of a fee; or (iv) the director of the program or the
director's designee has determined that referral of the case to the private bar
is not possible because documented attempts to refer similar cases in the past
have been futile, or because emergency circumstances compel immediate action
before referral can be made, but the client is advised that, if appropriate and
consistent with professional responsibility, referral will be attempted at a
later time.

(f)
Organizing any association, union, or federation, or representing a labor
union. However, nothing in this subsection (5)(f) prohibits the provision of
legal services to clients as otherwise permitted by this section.

(g)
Representation of undocumented aliens.

(h)
Picketing, demonstrations, strikes, or boycotts.

(i)
Engaging in inappropriate solicitation. For purposes of this section,
"inappropriate solicitation" means promoting the assertion of
specific legal claims among persons who know of their rights to make a claim
and who decline to do so. Nothing in this subsection precludes a legal
services program or its employees from providing information regarding legal
rights and responsibilities or providing information regarding the program's
services and intake procedures through community legal education activities,
responding to an individual's specific question about whether the individual
should consult with an attorney or take legal action, or responding to an
individual's specific request for information about the individual's legal
rights or request for assistance in connection with a specific legal problem.

(j)
Conducting training programs that: (i) Advocate particular public policies;
(ii) encourage or facilitate political activities, labor or antilabor
activities, boycotts, picketing, strikes, or demonstrations; or (iii) attempt
to influence legislation or rule making. Nothing in this subsection (5)(j)
precludes representation of clients as otherwise permitted by this section.

(6)
The department may establish requirements for client participation in the
provision of civil legal services under this section, including but not limited
to copayments and sliding fee scales.

(7)(a)
Contracts entered into by the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development with qualified legal services programs under this section must
specify that the program's expenditures of moneys distributed under this
section:

(i)
Must be audited annually by an independent outside auditor. These audit
results must be provided to the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development; and

(ii)
Are subject to audit by the state auditor.

(b)(i)
Any entity auditing a legal services program under this section shall have
access to all records of the legal services program to the full extent
necessary to determine compliance with this section, with the exception of confidential
information protected by the United States Constitution, the state
Constitution, the attorney-client privilege, and applicable rules of attorney
conduct.

(ii)
The legal services program shall have a system allowing for production of
case-specific information, including client eligibility and case type, to
demonstrate compliance with this section, with the exception of confidential
information protected by the United States Constitution, the state
Constitution, the attorney-client privilege, and applicable rules of attorney
conduct. Such information shall be available to any entity that audits the
program.

(8)
The department of community((, trade, and economic)) development must
recover or withhold amounts determined by an audit to have been used in
violation of this section.

(9)
The department of community((, trade, and economic)) development may
adopt rules to implement this section.

Sec.
512. RCW
43.21A.612 and 1995 c 399 s 68 are each amended to read as follows:

Before
the director shall construct said steam generating facility within the state,
or make application for any permit, license or other right necessary thereto,
the director shall give notice thereof by publishing once a week for four
consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or
counties in which such project is located a statement of intention setting
forth the general nature, extent and location of the project. If any public
utility in the state or any operating agency desires to construct such
facility, such utility or operating agency shall notify the director thereof
within ten days after the last date of publication of such notice. If the
director determines that it is in the best public interest that the director
proceed with such construction rather than the public utility or operating
agency, the director shall so notify the director of community((, trade, and
economic)) development, who shall set a date for hearing thereon. If after
considering the evidence introduced the director of community((, trade, and
economic)) development finds that the public utility or operating agency
making the request intends to immediately proceed with such construction and is
financially capable of carrying out such construction and further finds that
the plan of such utility or operating agency is equally well adapted to serve
the public interest, the director shall enter an order so finding and such
order shall divest the director of authority to proceed further with such
construction or acquisition until such time as the other public utility or
agency voluntarily causes an assignment of its right or interest in the project
to the director or fails to procure any further required governmental permit,
license or authority or having procured such, has the same revoked or
withdrawn, in accordance with the laws and regulations of such governmental
entity, in which event the director shall have the same authority to proceed as
though the director had originally entered an order so authorizing the director
to proceed. If, after considering the evidence introduced, the director of
community((, trade, and economic)) development finds that the public
utility or agency making the request does not intend to immediately proceed
with such construction or acquisition or is not financially capable of carrying
out such construction or acquisition, or finds that the plan of such utility or
operating agency is not equally well adapted to serve the public interest, the
director shall then enter an order so finding and authorizing the director to
proceed with the construction or acquisition of the facility.

Sec.
513. RCW
43.21C.110 and 1997 c 429 s 47 are each amended to read as follows:

It
shall be the duty and function of the department of ecology:

(1)
To adopt and amend thereafter rules of interpretation and implementation of
this chapter, subject to the requirements of chapter 34.05 RCW, for the purpose
of providing uniform rules and guidelines to all branches of government
including state agencies, political subdivisions, public and municipal
corporations, and counties. The proposed rules shall be subject to full public
hearings requirements associated with rule promulgation. Suggestions for modifications
of the proposed rules shall be considered on their merits, and the department
shall have the authority and responsibility for full and appropriate
independent promulgation and adoption of rules, assuring consistency with this
chapter as amended and with the preservation of protections afforded by this
chapter. The rule-making powers authorized in this section shall include, but
shall not be limited to, the following phases of interpretation and
implementation of this chapter:

(a)
Categories of governmental actions which are not to be considered as potential
major actions significantly affecting the quality of the environment, including
categories pertaining to applications for water right permits pursuant to
chapters 90.03 and 90.44 RCW. The types of actions included as categorical
exemptions in the rules shall be limited to those types which are not major
actions significantly affecting the quality of the environment. The rules
shall provide for certain circumstances where actions which potentially are
categorically exempt require environmental review. An action that is
categorically exempt under the rules adopted by the department may not be
conditioned or denied under this chapter.

(b)
Rules for criteria and procedures applicable to the determination of when an
act of a branch of government is a major action significantly affecting the
quality of the environment for which a detailed statement is required to be
prepared pursuant to RCW 43.21C.030.

(c)
Rules and procedures applicable to the preparation of detailed statements and
other environmental documents, including but not limited to rules for timing of
environmental review, obtaining comments, data and other information, and
providing for and determining areas of public participation which shall include
the scope and review of draft environmental impact statements.

(d)
Scope of coverage and contents of detailed statements assuring that such
statements are simple, uniform, and as short as practicable; statements are
required to analyze only reasonable alternatives and probable adverse
environmental impacts which are significant, and may analyze beneficial
impacts.

(e)
Rules and procedures for public notification of actions taken and documents
prepared.

(f)
Definition of terms relevant to the implementation of this chapter including
the establishment of a list of elements of the environment. Analysis of
environmental considerations under RCW 43.21C.030(2) may be required only for
those subjects listed as elements of the environment (or portions thereof).
The list of elements of the environment shall consist of the
"natural" and "built" environment. The elements of the
built environment shall consist of public services and utilities (such as
water, sewer, schools, fire and police protection), transportation,
environmental health (such as explosive materials and toxic waste), and land
and shoreline use (including housing, and a description of the relationships
with land use and shoreline plans and designations, including population).

(g)
Rules for determining the obligations and powers under this chapter of two or
more branches of government involved in the same project significantly
affecting the quality of the environment.

(h)
Methods to assure adequate public awareness of the preparation and issuance of
detailed statements required by RCW 43.21C.030(2)(c).

(i)
To prepare rules for projects setting forth the time limits within which the
governmental entity responsible for the action shall comply with the provisions
of this chapter.

(j)
Rules for utilization of a detailed statement for more than one action and
rules improving environmental analysis of nonproject proposals and encouraging
better interagency coordination and integration between this chapter and other
environmental laws.

(k)
Rules relating to actions which shall be exempt from the provisions of this
chapter in situations of emergency.

(l)
Rules relating to the use of environmental documents in planning and decision
making and the implementation of the substantive policies and requirements of
this chapter, including procedures for appeals under this chapter.

(m)
Rules and procedures that provide for the integration of environmental review
with project review as provided in RCW 43.21C.240. The rules and procedures
shall be jointly developed with the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development and shall be applicable to the preparation of
environmental documents for actions in counties, cities, and towns planning
under RCW 36.70A.040. The rules and procedures shall also include procedures
and criteria to analyze planned actions under RCW 43.21C.031(2) and revisions
to the rules adopted under this section to ensure that they are compatible with
the requirements and authorizations of chapter 347, Laws of 1995, as amended by
chapter 429, Laws of 1997. Ordinances or procedures adopted by a county, city,
or town to implement the provisions of chapter 347, Laws of 1995 prior to the
effective date of rules adopted under this subsection (1)(m) shall continue to be
effective until the adoption of any new or revised ordinances or procedures
that may be required. If any revisions are required as a result of rules
adopted under this subsection (1)(m), those revisions shall be made within the
time limits specified in RCW 43.21C.120.

(2)
In exercising its powers, functions, and duties under this section, the
department may:

(a)
Consult with the state agencies and with representatives of science, industry,
agriculture, labor, conservation organizations, state and local governments,
and other groups, as it deems advisable; and

(b)
Utilize, to the fullest extent possible, the services, facilities, and
information (including statistical information) of public and private agencies,
organizations, and individuals, in order to avoid duplication of effort and
expense, overlap, or conflict with similar activities authorized by law and
performed by established agencies.

(3)
Rules adopted pursuant to this section shall be subject to the review
procedures of chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec.
514. RCW
43.63B.010 and 1998 c 124 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Authorized representative" means an employee of a state agency,
city, or county acting on behalf of the department.

(2)
"Certified manufactured home installer" means a person who is in the
business of installing mobile or manufactured homes and who has been issued a
certificate by the department as provided in this chapter.

(3)
"Department" means the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development.

(4)
"Director" means the director of community((, trade, and economic))
development.

(5)
"Manufactured home" means a single-family dwelling built in
accordance with the department of housing and urban development manufactured
home construction and safety standards act, which is a national, preemptive
building code.

(6)
"Mobile or manufactured home installation" means all on-site work
necessary for the installation of a manufactured home, including:

(a)
Construction of the foundation system;

(b)
Installation of the support piers and earthquake resistant bracing system;

(c)
Required connection to foundation system and support piers;

(d)
Skirting;

(e)
Connections to the on-site water and sewer systems that are necessary for the
normal operation of the home; and

(f)
Extension of the pressure relief valve for the water heater.

(7)
"Manufactured home standards" means the manufactured home
construction and safety standards as promulgated by the United States
department of housing and urban development (HUD).

(8)
"Mobile home" means a factory-built dwelling built prior to June 15,
1976, to standards other than the HUD code, and acceptable under applicable
state codes in effect at the time of construction or introduction of the home
into the state. Mobile homes have not been built since introduction of the HUD
manufactured home construction and safety standards act.

(9)
"Training course" means the education program administered by the
department, or the education course administered by an approved educational
provider, as a prerequisite to taking the examination for certification.

(10)
"Approved educational provider" means an organization approved by the
department to provide education and training of manufactured home installers
and local inspectors.

Sec.
515. RCW
43.132.030 and 1995 c 399 s 80 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director of financial management is hereby empowered to designate the director
of community((, trade, and economic)) development as the official
responsible for the preparation of fiscal notes authorized and required by this
chapter. It is the intent of the legislature that when necessary the resources
of other state agencies, appropriate legislative staffs, and the various
associations of local government may be employed in the development of such
fiscal notes.

Sec.
516. RCW
43.155.020 and 1996 c 168 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section shall
apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Board" means the public works board created in RCW 43.155.030.

(2)
"Department" means the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development.

(3)
"Financing guarantees" means the pledge of money in the public works
assistance account, or money to be received by the public works assistance
account, to the repayment of all or a portion of the principal of or interest
on obligations issued by local governments to finance public works projects.

(4)
"Local governments" means cities, towns, counties, special purpose
districts, and any other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations
in the state excluding school districts and port districts.

(5)
"Public works project" means a project of a local government for the
planning, acquisition, construction, repair, reconstruction, replacement,
rehabilitation, or improvement of streets and roads, bridges, water systems, or
storm and sanitary sewage systems and solid waste facilities, including
recycling facilities.

(6)
"Solid waste or recycling project" means remedial actions necessary
to bring abandoned or closed landfills into compliance with regulatory
requirements and the repair, restoration, and replacement of existing solid
waste transfer, recycling facilities, and landfill projects limited to the
opening of landfill cells that are in existing and permitted landfills.

(7)
"Technical assistance" means training and other services provided to
local governments to: (a) Help such local governments plan, apply, and qualify
for loans and financing guarantees from the board, and (b) help local
governments improve their ability to plan for, finance, acquire, construct,
repair, replace, rehabilitate, and maintain public facilities.

Sec.
517. RCW
43.168.020 and 1999 c 164 s 502 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Department" means the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development.

(2)
"Director" means the director of community((, trade, and economic))
development.

(3)
"Distressed area" means: (a) A rural county; (b) a county which has
an unemployment rate which is twenty percent above the state average for the
immediately previous three years; (c) a county that has a median household
income that is less than seventy-five percent of the state median household
income for the previous three years; (d) a metropolitan statistical area, as
defined by the office of federal statistical policy and standards, United
States department of commerce, in which the average level of unemployment for
the calendar year immediately preceding the year in which an application is
filed under this chapter exceeds the average state unemployment for such
calendar year by twenty percent; (e) an area within a county, which area: (i)
Is composed of contiguous census tracts; (ii) has a minimum population of five
thousand persons; (iii) has at least seventy percent of its families and
unrelated individuals with incomes below eighty percent of the county's median
income for families and unrelated individuals; and (iv) has an unemployment
rate which is at least forty percent higher than the county's unemployment
rate; or (f) a county designated as a rural natural resources impact area under
RCW 43.31.601 if an application is filed by July 1, 1997. For purposes of this
definition, "families and unrelated individuals" has the same meaning
that is ascribed to that term by the federal department of housing and urban
development in its regulations authorizing action grants for economic development
and neighborhood revitalization projects.

(4)
"Fund" means the rural Washington loan fund.

(5)
"Local development organization" means a nonprofit organization which
is organized to operate within an area, demonstrates a commitment to a
long-standing effort for an economic development program, and makes a
demonstrable effort to assist in the employment of unemployed or underemployed
residents in an area.

(6)
"Project" means the establishment of a new or expanded business in an
area which when completed will provide employment opportunities.
"Project" also means the retention of an existing business in an area
which when completed will provide employment opportunities.

(7)
"Rural county" means a county with a population density of fewer that
one hundred persons per square mile as determined by the office of financial
management.

Sec.
518. RCW
43.168.031 and 1995 c 399 s 92 are each amended to read as follows:

The
Washington state development loan fund committee shall be terminated on June
30, 1994, and its powers and duties transferred to the director of the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development.

Sec.
519. RCW
43.168.040 and 1987 c 461 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Subject
to the restrictions contained in this chapter, the ((committee)) director
is authorized to approve applications of local governments for federal
community development block grant funds which the local governments would use
to make loans to finance business projects within their jurisdictions.
Applications approved by the ((committee)) director under this
chapter shall conform to applicable federal requirements and shall be
approved based upon the recommendations of the director of the department of
trade and economic development.

Sec.
520. RCW
43.168.050 and 1993 c 512 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The ((committee)) director may only approve an application
providing a loan for a project which the ((committee)) director
finds:

(a)
Will result in the creation of employment opportunities, the maintenance of
threatened employment, or development or expansion of business ownership by
minorities and women;

(b)
Has been approved by the director as conforming to federal rules and
regulations governing the spending of federal community development block grant
funds;

(c)
Will be of public benefit and for a public purpose, and that the benefits,
including increased or maintained employment, improved standard of living, the
employment of disadvantaged workers, and development or expansion of business
ownership by minorities and women, will primarily accrue to residents of the
area;

(d)
Will probably be successful;

(e)
Would probably not be completed without the loan because other capital or
financing at feasible terms is unavailable or the return on investment is
inadequate.

(2)
The ((committee)) director shall, subject to federal block grant
criteria, give higher priority to economic development projects that contain
provisions for child care.

(3)
The ((committee)) director may not approve an application if it
fails to provide for adequate reporting or disclosure of financial data to the
((committee)) director. The ((committee)) director
may require an annual or other periodic audit of the project books.

(4)
The ((committee)) director may require that the project be
managed in whole or in part by a local development organization and may
prescribe a management fee to be paid to such organization by the recipient of
the loan or grant.

(5)(a)
Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the ((committee)) director
shall not approve any application which would result in a loan or grant in
excess of three hundred fifty thousand dollars.

(b)
The ((committee)) director may approve an application which
results in a loan or grant of up to seven hundred thousand dollars if the
application has been approved by the director.

(6)
The ((committee)) director shall fix the terms and rates pertaining
to its loans.

(7)
Should there be more demand for loans than funds available for lending, the ((committee))
director shall provide loans for those projects which will lead to the
greatest amount of employment or benefit to a community. In determining the
"greatest amount of employment or benefit" the ((committee)) director
shall also consider the employment which would be saved by its loan and the
benefit relative to the community, not just the total number of new jobs or
jobs saved.

(8)
To the extent permitted under federal law the ((committee)) director
shall require applicants to provide for the transfer of all payments of
principal and interest on loans to the rural Washington ((state
development)) loan fund created under this chapter. Under circumstances
where the federal law does not permit the ((committee)) director
to require such transfer, the ((committee)) director shall give
priority to applications where the applicants on their own volition make
commitments to provide for the transfer.

(9)
The ((committee)) director shall not approve any application to
finance or help finance a shopping mall.

(10)
For loans not made to minority and women-owned businesses, the ((committee))
director shall make at least eighty percent of the appropriated funds
available to projects located in distressed areas, and may make up to twenty
percent available to projects located in areas not designated as distressed.
For loans not made to minority and women-owned businesses, the ((committee))
director shall not make funds available to projects located in areas not
designated as distressed if the fund's net worth is less than seven million one
hundred thousand dollars.

(11)
If an objection is raised to a project on the basis of unfair business
competition, the ((committee)) director shall evaluate the
potential impact of a project on similar businesses located in the local market
area. A grant may be denied by the ((committee)) director if a
project is not likely to result in a net increase in employment within a local
market area.

(12)
For loans to minority and women-owned businesses who do not meet the credit
criteria, the ((committee)) director may consider nontraditional
credit standards to offset past discrimination that has precluded full
participation of minority or women-owned businesses in the economy. For
applicants with high potential who do not meet the credit criteria, the ((committee))
director shall consider developing alternative borrowing methods. For
applicants denied loans due to credit problems, the ((committee)) director
shall provide financial counseling within available resources and provide
referrals to credit rehabilitation services. In circumstances of competing
applications, priority shall be given to members of eligible groups which
previously have been least served by this fund.

Sec.
521. RCW
43.180.040 and 1995 c 399 s 98 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There is hereby established a public body corporate and politic, with perpetual
corporate succession, to be known as the Washington state housing finance
commission. The commission is an instrumentality of the state exercising
essential government functions and, for purposes of the code, acts as a
constituted authority on behalf of the state when it issues bonds pursuant to
this chapter. The commission is a "public body" within the meaning
of RCW 39.53.010.

(2)
The commission shall consist of the following voting members:

(a)
The state treasurer, ex officio;

(b)
The director of community((, trade, and economic)) development, ex
officio;

(c)
An elected local government official, ex officio, with experience in local
housing programs, who shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of
the senate;

(d)
A representative of housing consumer interests, appointed by the governor with
the consent of the senate;

(e)
A representative of labor interests, appointed by the governor, with the
consent of the senate, after consultation with representatives of organized
labor;

(f)
A representative of low-income persons, appointed by the governor with the
consent of the senate;

(g)
Five members of the public appointed by the governor, with the consent of the
senate, on the basis of geographic distribution and their expertise in housing,
real estate, finance, energy efficiency, or construction, one of whom shall be
appointed by the governor as chair of the commission and who shall serve on the
commission and as chair of the commission at the pleasure of the governor.

The
term of the persons appointed by the governor, other than the chair, shall be
four years from the date of their appointment, except that the terms of three
of the initial appointees shall be for two years from the date of their
appointment. The governor shall designate the appointees who will serve the
two-year terms. An appointee may be removed by the governor for cause pursuant
to RCW 43.06.070 and 43.06.080. The governor shall fill any vacancy in an
appointed position by appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term. If
the department of community development is abolished, the resulting vacancy
shall be filled by a state official who shall be appointed to the commission by
the governor. If this official occupies an office or position for which senate
confirmation is not required, then his or her appointment to the commission
shall be subject to the consent of the senate. The members of the commission
shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and may be reimbursed,
solely from the funds of the commission, for expenses incurred in the discharge
of their duties under this chapter, subject to the provisions of RCW 43.03.050
and 43.03.060. A majority of the commission constitutes a quorum. Designees
shall be appointed in such manner and shall exercise such powers as are
specified by the rules of the commission.

(3)
The commission may adopt an official seal and may select from its membership a
vice chair, a secretary, and a treasurer. The commission shall establish rules
concerning its exercise of the powers authorized by this chapter. The rules
shall be adopted in conformance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

Sec.
522. RCW
43.180.200 and 1995 c 399 s 99 are each amended to read as follows:

For
purposes of the code:

(1)
The legislature reserves the right at any time to alter or change the
structure, organization, programs, or activities of the commission and to
terminate the commission, so long as the action does not impair any outstanding
contracts entered into by the commission;

(2)
Any net earnings of the commission beyond that necessary to retire its bonds
and to carry out the purposes of this chapter shall not inure to the benefit of
any person other than the state;

(3)
Upon dissolution of the commission, title to all of its remaining property
shall vest in the state;

(4)
The commission constitutes the only housing finance agency of the state of
Washington; and

(5)
In order to take advantage of the maximum amount of tax exempt bonds for
housing financing available pursuant to the code, any state ceiling with
respect to housing shall be allocated in accordance with the following formula:

(a)
Eighty percent of the state ceiling shall be allocated to the commission and
twenty percent shall be allocated to the other issuing authorities in the
state.

(b)
The allocation to the issuing authorities other than the commission shall be
distributed to such issuing authorities in amounts as determined following
public notice by the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development pursuant to rules promulgated by it. The distribution shall be in
response to applications received from such issuing authorities and shall be
based on the following factors: (i) The amount of housing to be made available
by such applicant; (ii) the population within the jurisdiction of the
applicant; (iii) coordination with other applicable federal and state housing
programs; (iv) the likelihood of implementing the proposed financing during
that year; and (v) consistency with the plan of the commission. On or before
February 1st of each year, the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development shall distribute the state ceiling allocation among
such issuing authorities and any unused portion shall be added to the
allocation of the commission. Each issuing authority other than the commission
shall confirm its allocation distribution by providing to the department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development no later than June 1st
a copy of an executed bond purchase contract or alternative documentation
deemed sufficient by the commission to evidence the reasonable likelihood of
the allocation distribution being fully used. Any portion of such allocation
not so confirmed shall be added to the allocation of the commission on July 1st.
Prior to July 1st, the commission shall provide written notice of the
allocation decrease to the affected issuing authority. The reallocation shall
not limit the authority of the commission to assign a portion of its allocation
pursuant to subsection (5)(c) of this section.

(c)
The commission may assign a portion of its allocation to another issuing agency.

Sec.
523. RCW
43.180.220 and 1994 c 235 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
commission, in cooperation with the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development, and the state investment board, shall develop and
implement a housing finance program that:

(1)
Provides subsidized or unsubsidized mortgage financing for single-family home
ownership, including a single condominium unit, located in the state of
Washington;

(2)
Requests the state investment board to make investments, within its policies
and investment guidelines, in mortgage-backed securities that are
collateralized by loans made within the state of Washington; and

(3)
Provides flexible loan underwriting guidelines, including but not limited to
provisions that will allow reduced downpayment requirements for the purchaser.

Sec.
524. RCW
43.185.020 and 1995 c 399 s 101 are each amended to read as follows:

"Department"
means the department of community((, trade, and economic)) development.
"Director" means the director of the department of community((,
trade, and economic)) development.

Sec.
525. RCW
43.185A.010 and 1995 c 399 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Affordable housing" means residential housing for rental or private
individual ownership which, as long as the same is occupied by low-income
households, requires payment of monthly housing costs, including utilities
other than telephone, of no more than thirty percent of the family's income.

(2)
"Department" means the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development.

(3)
"Director" means the director of the department of community((,
trade, and economic)) development.

(4)
"First-time home buyer" means an individual or his or her spouse who
have not owned a home during the three-year period prior to purchase of a home.

(5)
"Low-income household" means a single person, family or unrelated
persons living together whose adjusted income is less than eighty percent of
the median family income, adjusted for household size, for the county where the
project is located.

Sec.
526. RCW
43.185B.010 and 1995 c 399 s 104 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Affordable housing" means residential housing that is rented or
owned by a person or household whose monthly housing costs, including utilities
other than telephone, do not exceed thirty percent of the household's monthly
income.

(2)
"Department" means the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development.

(3)
"Director" means the director of community((, trade, and economic))
development.

(4)
"Nonprofit organization" means any public or private nonprofit
organization that: (a) Is organized under federal, state, or local laws; (b)
has no part of its net earnings inuring to the benefit of any member, founder,
contributor, or individual; and (c) has among its purposes significant
activities related to the provision of decent housing that is affordable to
very low-income, low-income, or moderate-income households and special needs
populations.

(5)
"Regulatory barriers to affordable housing" and "regulatory
barriers" mean any public policies (including those embodied in statutes,
ordinances, regulations, or administrative procedures or processes) required to
be identified by the state or local government in connection with its strategy
under section 105(b)(4) of the Cranston-Gonzalez national affordable housing
act (42 U.S.C. 12701 et seq.).

(6)
"Tenant-based organization" means a nonprofit organization whose
governing body includes a majority of members who reside in the housing
development and are considered low-income households.

Sec.
527. RCW
43.190.030 and 1997 c 194 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

There
is created the office of the state long-term care ombudsman. The department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development shall contract with a
private nonprofit organization to provide long-term care ombudsman services as
specified under, and consistent with, the federal older Americans act as
amended, federal mandates, the goals of the state, and the needs of its
citizens. The department of community((, trade, and economic))
development shall ensure that all program and staff support necessary to enable
the ombudsman to effectively protect the interests of residents, patients, and
clients of all long-term care facilities is provided by the nonprofit
organization that contracts to provide long-term care ombudsman services. The
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development shall adopt
rules to carry out this chapter and the long-term care ombudsman provisions of
the federal older Americans act, as amended, and applicable federal regulations.
The long-term care ombudsman program shall have the following powers and
duties:

(1)
To provide services for coordinating the activities of long-term care ombudsmen
throughout the state;

(2)
Carry out such other activities as the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development deems appropriate;

(3)
Establish procedures consistent with RCW 43.190.110 for appropriate access by
long-term care ombudsmen to long-term care facilities and patients' records,
including procedures to protect the confidentiality of the records and ensure
that the identity of any complainant or resident will not be disclosed without
the written consent of the complainant or resident, or upon court order;

(4)
Establish a state-wide uniform reporting system to collect and analyze data
relating to complaints and conditions in long-term care facilities for the
purpose of identifying and resolving significant problems, with provision for
submission of such data to the department of social and health services and to
the federal department of health and human services, or its successor agency,
on a regular basis; and

(5)
Establish procedures to assure that any files maintained by ombudsman programs
shall be disclosed only at the discretion of the ombudsman having authority
over the disposition of such files, except that the identity of any complainant
or resident of a long-term care facility shall not be disclosed by such
ombudsman unless:

(a)
Such complainant or resident, or the complainant's or resident's legal representative,
consents in writing to such disclosure; or

(b)
Such disclosure is required by court order.

Sec.
528. RCW
43.280.020 and 1996 c 123 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

There
is established in the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development a grant program to enhance the funding for treating the victims of
sex offenders. Activities that can be funded through this grant program are
limited to those that:

(1)
Provide effective treatment to victims of sex offenders;

(2)
Increase access to and availability of treatment for victims of sex offenders,
particularly if from underserved populations; and

(3)
Create or build on efforts by existing community programs, coordinate those
efforts, or develop cooperative efforts or other initiatives to make the most
effective use of resources to provide treatment services to these victims.

Funding shall be given to those applicants that emphasize providing
stable, victim-focused sexual abuse services and possess the qualifications to
provide core services, as defined in RCW 70.125.030. Funds for specialized
services, as defined in RCW 70.125.030, shall be disbursed through the request
for proposal or request for qualifications process.

Sec.
529. RCW
43.280.060 and 1996 c 123 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to funds appropriated by the legislature, the department of community((,
trade, and economic)) development shall make awards under the grant program
established by RCW 43.280.020.

(2)
To aid the department of community((, trade, and economic)) development
in making its funding determinations, the department shall form a peer review
committee comprised of individuals who are knowledgeable or experienced in the
management or delivery of treatment services to victims of sex offenders. The
peer review committee shall advise the department on the extent to which each
eligible applicant meets the treatment and management standards, as developed
by the department. The department shall consider this advice in making awards.

(3) Activities funded under this section may be considered for
funding in future years, but shall be considered under the same terms and
criteria as new activities. Funding under this chapter shall not constitute an
obligation by the state of Washington to provide ongoing funding.

Sec.
530. RCW
43.280.080 and 1995 c 241 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
office of crime victims advocacy is established in the department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development. The office shall assist
communities in planning and implementing services for crime victims, advocate
on behalf of crime victims in obtaining needed services and resources, and
advise local and state governments on practices, policies, and priorities that
impact crime victims. In addition, the office shall administer grant programs
for sexual assault treatment and prevention services, as authorized in this
chapter.

Sec.
531. RCW
43.280.090 and 1995 c 269 s 2102 are each amended to read as follows:

The
director of the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development may establish ad hoc advisory committees, as necessary, to obtain
advice and guidance regarding the office of crime victims advocacy program.

Sec.
532. RCW
43.330.110 and 1993 c 280 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of community development shall maintain an active effort
to help communities, families, and individuals build and maintain capacity to
meet housing needs in Washington state. The department shall facilitate
partnerships among the many entities related to housing issues and leverage a
variety of resources and services to produce comprehensive, cost-effective, and
innovative housing solutions.

(2)
The department shall assist in the production, development, rehabilitation, and
operation of owner-occupied or rental housing for very low, low, and
moderate-income persons; operate programs to assist home ownership, offer
housing services, and provide emergency, transitional, and special needs
housing services; and qualify as a participating state agency for all programs
of the federal department of housing and urban development or its successor.
The department shall develop or assist local governments in developing housing
plans required by the state or federal government.

(3)
The department shall coordinate and administer energy assistance and
residential energy conservation and rehabilitation programs of the federal and
state government through nonprofit organizations, local governments, and
housing authorities.

Sec.
533. RCW
43.330.130 and 1993 c 280 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of community development shall coordinate services to
communities that are directed to the poor and disadvantaged through private and
public nonprofit organizations and units of general purpose local governments.
The department shall coordinate these programs using, to the extent possible,
integrated case management methods, with other community and economic
development efforts that promote self-sufficiency.

(2)
These services may include, but not be limited to, comprehensive education
services to preschool children from low-income families, providing for human
service needs and advocacy, promoting volunteerism and citizen service as a
means for accomplishing local community and economic development goals,
coordinating and providing emergency food assistance to distribution centers
and needy individuals, and providing for human service needs through
community-based organizations.

(3)
The department shall provide local communities and at-risk individuals with
programs that provide community protection and assist in developing strategies
to reduce substance abuse. The department shall administer programs that
develop collaborative approaches to prevention, intervention, and interdiction
programs. The department shall administer programs that support crime victims,
address youth and domestic violence problems, provide indigent defense for
low-income persons, border town disputes, and administer family services and
programs to promote the state's policy as provided in RCW 74.14A.025.

(((4)
The department shall provide fire protection and emergency management services
to support and strengthen local capacity for controlling risk to life,
property, and community vitality that may result from fires, emergencies, and
disasters.))

Sec.
534. RCW
43.330.210 and 1999 c 384 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The
developmental disabilities endowment governing board is established to design
and administer the developmental disabilities endowment. To the extent funds
are appropriated for this purpose, the director of the department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development shall provide staff and
administrative support to the governing board.

(1)
The governing board shall consist of seven members as follows:

(a)
Three of the members, who shall be appointed by the governor, shall be persons
who have demonstrated expertise and leadership in areas such as finance,
actuarial science, management, business, or public policy.

(b)
Three members of the board, who shall be appointed by the governor, shall be persons
who have demonstrated expertise and leadership in areas such as business,
developmental disabilities service design, management, or public policy, and
shall be family members of persons with developmental disabilities.

(c)
The seventh member of the board, who shall serve as chair of the board, shall
be appointed by the remaining six members of the board.

(2)
Members of the board shall serve terms of four years and may be appointed for
successive terms of four years at the discretion of the appointing authority.
However, the governor may stagger the terms of the initial six members of the
board so that approximately one-fourth of the members' terms expire each year.

(3)
Members of the board shall be compensated for their service under RCW 43.03.240
and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060.

(4)
The board shall meet periodically as specified by the call of the chair, or a
majority of the board.

Sec.
535. RCW
46.12.295 and 1995 c 399 s 117 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of ((licensing)) community, trade, and economic
development shall transfer all titling functions pertaining to mobile homes
to the housing division of the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development by July 1, ((1991)) 2000. The
department of ((licensing)) community, trade, and economic
development shall transfer all books, records, files, and documents
pertaining to mobile home titling to the department of community((, trade,
and economic)) development. The directors of the departments may
immediately take such steps as are necessary to ensure that ((chapter 176,
Laws of 1990)) this section is implemented ((on June 7, 1990))
July 1, 2000.

Sec.
536. RCW
54.16.285 and 1995 c 399 s 144 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A district providing utility service for residential space heating shall not
terminate such utility service between November 15th through March 15th
if the customer:

(a)
Notifies the utility of the inability to pay the bill, including a security
deposit. This notice should be provided within five business days of receiving
a payment overdue notice unless there are extenuating circumstances. If the
customer fails to notify the utility within five business days and service is
terminated, the customer can, by paying reconnection charges, if any, and
fulfilling the requirements of this section, receive the protections of this
chapter;

(b)
Provides self-certification of household income for the prior twelve months to
a grantee of the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development which administers federally funded energy assistance programs. The
grantee shall determine that the household income does not exceed the maximum
allowed for eligibility under the state's plan for low-income energy assistance
under 42 U.S.C. 8624 and shall provide a dollar figure that is seven percent of
household income. The grantee may verify information provided in the
self-certification;

(c)
Has applied for home heating assistance from applicable government and private
sector organizations and certifies that any assistance received will be applied
to the current bill and future utility bills;

(d)
Has applied for low-income weatherization assistance to the utility or other
appropriate agency if such assistance is available for the dwelling;

(e)
Agrees to a payment plan and agrees to maintain the payment plan. The plan
will be designed both to pay the past due bill by the following October 15th
and to pay for continued utility service. If the past due bill is not paid by
the following October 15th, the customer shall not be eligible for
protections under this chapter until the past due bill is paid. The plan shall
not require monthly payments in excess of seven percent of the customer's
monthly income plus one-twelfth of any arrearage accrued from the date
application is made and thereafter during November 15th through March 15th.
A customer may agree to pay a higher percentage during this period, but shall
not be in default unless payment during this period is less than seven percent
of monthly income plus one-twelfth of any arrearage accrued from the date
application is made and thereafter. If assistance payments are received by the
customer subsequent to implementation of the plan, the customer shall contact
the utility to reformulate the plan; and

(f)
Agrees to pay the moneys owed even if he or she moves.

(2)
The utility shall:

(a)
Include in any notice that an account is delinquent and that service may be
subject to termination, a description of the customer's duties in this section;

(b)
Assist the customer in fulfilling the requirements under this section;

(c)
Be authorized to transfer an account to a new residence when a customer who has
established a plan under this section moves from one residence to another
within the same utility service area;

(d)
Be permitted to disconnect service if the customer fails to honor the payment
program. Utilities may continue to disconnect service for those practices
authorized by law other than for nonpayment as provided for in this section.
Customers who qualify for payment plans under this section who default on their
payment plans and are disconnected can be reconnected and maintain the
protections afforded under this chapter by paying reconnection charges, if any,
and by paying all amounts that would have been due and owing under the terms of
the applicable payment plan, absent default, on the date on which service is
reconnected; and

(e)
Advise the customer in writing at the time it disconnects service that it will
restore service if the customer contacts the utility and fulfills the other
requirements of this section.

(3)
All districts providing utility service for residential space heating shall
offer residential customers the option of a budget billing or equal payment
plan. The budget billing or equal payment plan shall be offered low-income
customers eligible under the state's plan for low-income energy assistance
prepared in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 8624(C)(1) without limiting availability
to certain months of the year, without regard to the length of time the
customer has occupied the premises, and without regard to whether the customer
is the tenant or owner of the premises occupied.

(4) An agreement between the customer and the utility, whether oral
or written, shall not waive the protections afforded under this chapter.

Sec.
537. RCW
54.52.010 and 1995 c 399 s 145 are each amended to read as follows:

A
public utility district may include along with, or as part of its regular
customer billings, a request for voluntary contributions to assist qualified
low-income residential customers of the district in paying their electricity
bills. All funds received by the district in response to such requests shall
be transmitted to the grantee of the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development which administers federally funded energy assistance
programs for the state in the district's service area or to a charitable
organization within the district's service area. All such funds shall be used
solely to supplement assistance to low-income residential customers of the
district in paying their electricity bills. The grantee or charitable
organization shall be responsible to determine which of the district's
customers are qualified for low-income assistance and the amount of assistance
to be provided to those who are qualified.

Sec.
538. RCW 54.52.020
and 1995 c 399 s 146 are each amended to read as follows:

All
assistance provided under this chapter shall be disbursed by the grantee or
charitable organization. Where possible the public utility district will be
paid on behalf of the customer by the grantee or the charitable organization.
When direct vendor payment is not feasible, a check will be issued jointly
payable to the customer and the public utility district. The availability of
funds for assistance to a district's low-income customers as a result of
voluntary contributions shall not reduce the amount of assistance for which the
district's customers are eligible under the federally funded energy assistance
programs administered by the grantee of the department of community((,
trade, and economic)) development within the district's service area. The
grantee or charitable organization shall provide the district with a quarterly
report on January 15th, April 15th, July 15th, and October 15th which includes
information concerning the total amount of funds received from the district,
the names of all recipients of assistance from these funds, the amount received
by each recipient, and the amount of funds received from the district currently
on hand and available for future low-income assistance.

Sec.
539. RCW
57.46.010 and 1996 c 230 s 1401 are each amended to read as follows:

A
district may include along with, or as part of its regular customer billings, a
request for voluntary contributions to assist qualified low-income residential
customers of the district in paying their district bills. All funds received
by the district in response to such requests shall be transmitted to the
grantee of the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development which administers federally funded energy assistance programs for
the state in the district's service area or to a charitable organization within
the district's service area. All such funds shall be used solely to supplement
assistance to low-income residential customers of the district in paying their
district bills. The grantee or charitable organization shall be responsible to
determine which of the district's customers are qualified for low-income
assistance and the amount of assistance to be provided to those who are
qualified.

Sec.
540. RCW
57.46.020 and 1996 c 230 s 1402 are each amended to read as follows:

All
assistance provided under this chapter shall be disbursed by the grantee or
charitable organization. Where possible the district shall be paid on behalf
of the customer by the grantee or the charitable organization. When direct vendor
payment is not feasible, a check shall be issued jointly payable to the
customer and the district. The availability of funds for assistance to a
district's low-income customers as a result of voluntary contributions shall
not reduce the amount of assistance for which the district's customers are
eligible under the federally funded energy assistance programs administered by
the grantee of the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development within the district's service area. The grantee or charitable
organization shall provide the district with a quarterly report on January
15th, April 15th, July 15th, and October 15th which includes information
concerning the total amount of funds received from the district, the names of
all recipients of assistance from these funds, the amount received by each
recipient, and the amount of funds received from the district currently on hand
and available for future low-income assistance.

Sec.
541. RCW
59.18.440 and 1997 c 452 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any city, town, county, or municipal corporation that is required to develop a
comprehensive plan under RCW 36.70A.040(1) is authorized to require, after
reasonable notice to the public and a public hearing, property owners to
provide their portion of reasonable relocation assistance to low-income tenants
upon the demolition, substantial rehabilitation whether due to code enforcement
or any other reason, or change of use of residential property, or upon the removal
of use restrictions in an assisted-housing development. No city, town, county,
or municipal corporation may require property owners to provide relocation
assistance to low-income tenants, as defined in this chapter, upon the
demolition, substantial rehabilitation, upon the change of use of residential
property, or upon the removal of use restrictions in an assisted-housing
development, except as expressly authorized herein or when authorized or
required by state or federal law. As used in this section, "assisted
housing development" means a multifamily rental housing development that
either receives government assistance and is defined as federally assisted
housing in RCW 59.28.020, or that receives other federal, state, or local
government assistance and is subject to use restrictions.

(2)
As used in this section, "low-income tenants" means tenants whose
combined total income per dwelling unit is at or below fifty percent of the
median income, adjusted for family size, in the county where the tenants reside.

The
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development shall adopt
rules defining county median income in accordance with the definitions
promulgated by the federal department of housing and urban development.

(3)
A requirement that property owners provide relocation assistance shall include
the amounts of such assistance to be provided to low-income tenants. In
determining such amounts, the jurisdiction imposing the requirement shall
evaluate, and receive public testimony on, what relocation expenses displaced
tenants would reasonably incur in that jurisdiction including:

(a)
Actual physical moving costs and expenses;

(b)
Advance payments required for moving into a new residence such as the cost of
first and last month's rent and security and damage deposits;

(c)
Utility connection fees and deposits; and

(d)
Anticipated additional rent and utility costs in the residence for one year
after relocation.

(4)(a)
Relocation assistance provided to low-income tenants under this section shall
not exceed two thousand dollars for each dwelling unit displaced by actions of
the property owner under subsection (1) of this section. A city, town, county,
or municipal corporation may make future annual adjustments to the maximum
amount of relocation assistance required under this subsection in order to
reflect any changes in the housing component of the consumer price index as
published by the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics.

(b)
The property owner's portion of any relocation assistance provided to
low-income tenants under this section shall not exceed one-half of the required
relocation assistance under (a) of this subsection in cash or services.

(c)
The portion of relocation assistance not covered by the property owner under
(b) of this subsection shall be paid by the city, town, county, or municipal
corporation authorized to require relocation assistance under subsection (1) of
this section. The relocation assistance may be paid from proceeds collected
from the excise tax imposed under RCW 82.46.010.

(5)
A city, town, county, or municipal corporation requiring the provision of
relocation assistance under this section shall adopt policies, procedures, or
regulations to implement such requirement. Such policies, procedures, or
regulations shall include provisions for administrative hearings to resolve
disputes between tenants and property owners relating to relocation assistance
or unlawful detainer actions during relocation, and shall require a decision
within thirty days of a request for a hearing by either a tenant or property
owner.

Judicial
review of an administrative hearing decision relating to relocation assistance
may be had by filing a petition, within ten days of the decision, in the
superior court in the county where the residential property is located.
Judicial review shall be confined to the record of the administrative hearing
and the court may reverse the decision only if the administrative findings,
inferences, conclusions, or decision is:

(a)
In violation of constitutional provisions;

(b)
In excess of the authority or jurisdiction of the administrative hearing
officer;

(c)
Made upon unlawful procedure or otherwise is contrary to law; or

(d)
Arbitrary and capricious.

(6)
Any city, town, county, or municipal corporation may require relocation
assistance, under the terms of this section, for otherwise eligible tenants
whose living arrangements are exempted from the provisions of this chapter
under RCW 59.18.040(3) and if the living arrangement is considered to be a
rental or lease not defined as a retail sale under RCW 82.04.050.

(7)(a)
Persons who move from a dwelling unit prior to the application by the owner of
the dwelling unit for any governmental permit necessary for the demolition,
substantial rehabilitation, or change of use of residential property or prior
to any notification or filing required for condominium conversion shall not be
entitled to the assistance authorized by this section.

(b)
Persons who move into a dwelling unit after the application for any necessary
governmental permit or after any required condominium conversion notification
or filing shall not be entitled to the assistance authorized by this section if
such persons receive written notice from the property owner prior to taking
possession of the dwelling unit that specifically describes the activity or condition
that may result in their temporary or permanent displacement and advises them
of their ineligibility for relocation assistance.

Sec.
542. RCW
59.21.010 and 1998 c 124 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Director" means the director of the department of community((,
trade, and economic)) development.

(2)
"Department" means the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development.

(3)
"Fund" means the mobile home park relocation fund established under
RCW 59.21.050.

(4)
"Mobile home park" or "park" means real property that is
rented or held out for rent to others for the placement of two or more mobile
homes for the primary purpose of production of income, except where the real
property is rented or held out for rent for seasonal recreational purpose only
and is not intended for year-round occupancy.

(5)
"Landlord" or "park-owner" means the owner of the mobile
home park that is being closed at the time relocation assistance is provided.

(6)
"Relocate" means to remove the mobile home from the mobile home park
being closed.

(7)
"Relocation assistance" means the monetary assistance provided under
this chapter.

Sec.
543. RCW
59.22.020 and 1995 c 399 s 155 are each amended to read as follows:

The
following definitions shall apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise:

(1)
"Account" means the mobile home affairs account created under RCW
59.22.070.

(2)
"Affordable" means that, where feasible, low-income residents should
not pay more than thirty percent of their monthly income for housing costs.

(3)
"Conversion costs" includes the cost of acquiring the mobile home
park, the costs of planning and processing the conversion, the costs of any
needed repairs or rehabilitation, and any expenditures required by a government
agency or lender for the project.

(4)
"Department" means the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development.

(5)
"Fee" means the mobile home title transfer fee imposed under RCW
59.22.080.

(6)
"Fund" or "park purchase account" means the mobile home
park purchase account created pursuant to RCW 59.22.030.

(7)
"Housing costs" means the total cost of owning, occupying, and
maintaining a mobile home and a lot or space in a mobile home park.

(8)
"Individual interest in a mobile home park" means any interest which
is fee ownership or a lesser interest which entitles the holder to occupy a lot
or space in a mobile home park for a period of not less than either fifteen
years or the life of the holder. Individual interests in a mobile home park
include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a)
Ownership of a lot or space in a mobile home park or subdivision;

(b)
A membership or shares in a stock cooperative, or a limited equity housing
cooperative; or

(c)
Membership in a nonprofit mutual benefit corporation which owns, operates, or
owns and operates the mobile home park.

(9)
"Low-income resident" means an individual or household who resided in
the mobile home park prior to application for a loan pursuant to this chapter
and with an annual income at or below eighty percent of the median income for
the county of standard metropolitan statistical area of residence. Net worth
shall be considered in the calculation of income with the exception of the resident's
mobile/manufactured home which is used as their primary residence.

(10)
"Low-income spaces" means those spaces in a mobile home park operated
by a resident organization which are occupied by low-income residents.

(11)
"Mobile home park" means a mobile home park, as defined in RCW
59.20.030(((4))), or a manufactured home park subdivision as defined by
RCW 59.20.030(((6))) created by the conversion to resident ownership of
a mobile home park.

(12)
"Resident organization" means a group of mobile home park residents
who have formed a nonprofit corporation, cooperative corporation, or other
entity or organization for the purpose of acquiring the mobile home park in
which they reside and converting the mobile home park to resident ownership.
The membership of a resident organization shall include at least two-thirds of
the households residing in the mobile home park at the time of application for
assistance from the department.

(13)
"Resident ownership" means, depending on the context, either the
ownership, by a resident organization, as defined in this section, of an
interest in a mobile home park which entitles the resident organization to
control the operations of the mobile home park for a term of no less than
fifteen years, or the ownership of individual interests in a mobile home park,
or both.

(14)
"Landlord" shall have the same meaning as it does in RCW 59.20.030.

(15)
"Manufactured housing" means residences constructed on one or more
chassis for transportation, and which bear an insignia issued by a state or
federal regulatory agency indication compliance with all applicable
construction standards of the United States department of housing and urban
development.

(16)
"Mobile home" shall have the same meaning as it does in RCW
46.04.302.

(17)
"Mobile home lot" shall have the same meaning as it does in RCW
59.20.030.

(18)
"Tenant" means a person who rents a mobile home lot for a term of one
month or longer and owns the mobile home on the lot.

Sec.
544. RCW
59.22.090 and 1998 c 245 s 105 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A manufactured housing task force is established to study and make
recommendations concerning the structure state government should use to
regulate manufactured housing in this state. In conducting this study, the
task force shall review the structures used in other states, including those
states with a commission structure. The task force shall consider the report
prepared by the department of licensing, the department of labor and
industries, and the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development on consolidating mobile home-related functions in conducting its
study. The task force may not consider any form of mobile home rent control,
but shall consider mobile home park siting and density regulatory issues.

(2)
The task force shall terminate on December 31, 1992.

(3)
The task force shall consist of the following members:

(a)
Two members of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the
house of representatives, from different political caucuses;

(b)
Two members of the senate appointed by the president of the senate, from
different political caucuses;

(c)
Two members who represent mobile home park owners, appointed by the governor;

(d)
Two members who represent mobile home owners, appointed by the governor;

(e)
One member who represents mobile home manufacturers, appointed by the governor;

(f)
One member who represents mobile home dealers, appointed by the governor;

(g)
One member who represents mobile home transporters, appointed by the governor;

(h)
One member who represents local building officials, appointed by the governor;

(i)
One member who is either an elected or appointed government official of a
county with a population of one hundred thousand or more persons, appointed by
the governor;

(j)
One member who is either an elected or appointed government official of a
county with a population of less than one hundred thousand persons, appointed
by the governor;

(k)
One member who is either an elected or appointed government official of a city
with a population of thirty-five thousand persons, appointed by the governor;

(l)
One member who is either an elected or appointed government official of a city
with a population of less than thirty-five thousand persons, appointed by the
governor;

(m)
One member who represents local health officials, appointed by the governor;
and

(n)
The director, or the director's designee from the department of community((,
trade, and economic)) development, the department of licensing, the
department of labor and industries, and the attorney general's office. The
designees shall be nonvoting, ex officio members of the task force.

(4)
The members of the task force shall select the chair or co-chairs of the task
force.

(5)
Staff assistance for the task force will be provided by legislative staff and
staff from the agencies or offices listed in subsection (3)(n) of this section.

Sec.
545. RCW
59.28.040 and 1995 c 399 s 160 are each amended to read as follows:

All
owners of federally assisted housing shall, at least twelve months before the
expiration of the rental assistance contract or prepayment of a mortgage or
loan, serve a written notice of the anticipated expiration or prepayment date
on each tenant household residing in the housing, on the clerk of the city, or
county if in an unincorporated area, in which the property is located, and on
the department of community((, trade, and economic)) development, by
regular and certified mail.

Sec.
546. RCW
59.28.050 and 1995 c 399 s 161 are each amended to read as follows:

This
chapter shall not in any way prohibit an owner of federally assisted housing
from terminating a rental assistance contract or prepaying a mortgage or loan.
The requirement in this chapter for notice shall not be construed as conferring
any new or additional regulatory power upon the city or county clerk or upon
the department of community((, trade, and economic)) development.

Sec.
547. RCW
59.28.060 and 1995 c 399 s 162 are each amended to read as follows:

The
notice to tenants required by RCW 59.28.040 shall state the date of expiration
or prepayment and the effect, if any, that the expiration or prepayment will
have upon the tenants' rent and other terms of their rental agreement.

The
notice to the city or county clerk and to the department of community((,
trade, and economic)) development required by RCW 59.28.040 shall state:
(1) The name, location, and project number of the federally assisted housing and
the type of assistance received from the federal government; (2) the number and
size of units; (3) the age, race, family size, and estimated incomes of the
tenants who will be affected by the prepayment of the loan or mortgage or
expiration of the federal assistance contract; (4) the projected rent increases
for each affected tenant; and (5) the anticipated date of prepayment of the
loan or mortgage or expiration of the federal assistance contract.

Sec.
548. RCW
70.94.537 and 1997 c 250 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A twenty-eight member state commute trip reduction task force is established as
follows:

(a)
The secretary of the department of transportation or the secretary's designee
who shall serve as chair;

(b)
The director of the department of ecology or the director's designee;

(c)
The director of the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development or the director's designee;

(d)
The director of the department of general administration or the director's
designee;

(e)
Three representatives from counties appointed by the governor from a list of at
least six recommended by the Washington state association of counties;

(f)
Three representatives from cities and towns appointed by the governor from a
list of at least six recommended by the association of Washington cities;

(g)
Three representatives from transit agencies appointed by the governor from a
list of at least six recommended by the Washington state transit association;

(h)
Twelve representatives of employers at or owners of major worksites in
Washington appointed by the governor from a list recommended by the association
of Washington business or other state-wide business associations representing
major employers, provided that every affected county shall have at least one
representative; and

(i)
Three citizens appointed by the governor.

Members
of the commute trip reduction task force shall serve without compensation but
shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and
43.03.060. Members appointed by the governor shall be compensated in
accordance with RCW 43.03.220. The task force has all powers necessary to
carry out its duties as prescribed by this chapter. The task force shall be
dissolved on July 1, 2006.

(2)
By March 1, 1992, the commute trip reduction task force shall establish
guidelines for commute trip reduction plans. The guidelines are intended to
ensure consistency in commute trip reduction plans and goals among
jurisdictions while fairly taking into account differences in employment and
housing density, employer size, existing and anticipated levels of transit
service, special employer circumstances, and other factors the task force
determines to be relevant. The guidelines shall include:

(a)
Criteria for establishing commute trip reduction zones;

(b)
Methods and information requirements for determining base year values of the
proportion of single-occupant vehicle commute trips and the commute trip
vehicle miles traveled per employee and progress toward meeting commute trip
reduction plan goals;

(c)
Model commute trip reduction ordinances;

(d)
Methods for assuring consistency in the treatment of employers who have worksites
subject to the requirements of this chapter in more than one jurisdiction;

(e)
An appeals process by which major employers, who as a result of special
characteristics of their business or its locations would be unable to meet the
requirements of a commute trip reduction plan, may obtain a waiver or
modification of those requirements and criteria for determining eligibility for
waiver or modification;

(f)
Methods to ensure that employers shall receive full credit for the results of
transportation demand management efforts and commute trip reduction programs
which have been implemented by major employers prior to the base year;

(g)
Alternative commute trip reduction goals for major employers which cannot meet
the goals of this chapter because of the unique nature of their business;

(h)
Alternative commute trip reduction goals for major employers whose worksites
change and who contribute substantially to traffic congestion in a trip
reduction zone; and

(i)
Methods to insure that employers receive credit for scheduling changes enacted
pursuant to the criteria identified in RCW 70.94.527(11).

(3)
The task force shall work with jurisdictions, major employers, and other
parties to develop and implement a public awareness campaign designed to
increase the effectiveness of local commute trip reduction programs and support
achievement of the objectives identified in this chapter.

(4)
The task force shall assess the commute trip reduction options available to
employers other than major employers and make recommendations to the
legislature by October 1, 1992. The recommendations shall include the minimum
size of employer who shall be required to implement trip reduction programs and
the appropriate methods those employers can use to accomplish trip reduction goals.

(5)
The task force shall review progress toward implementing commute trip reduction
plans and programs and the costs and benefits of commute trip reduction plans
and programs and shall make recommendations to the legislature by December 1,
1995, December 1, 1999, December 1, 2001, December 1, 2003, and December 1,
2005. In assessing the costs and benefits, the task force shall consider the
costs of not having implemented commute trip reduction plans and programs. The
task force shall examine other transportation demand management programs
nationally and incorporate its findings into its recommendations to the
legislature. The recommendations shall address the need for continuation,
modification, or termination or any or all requirements of this chapter. The
recommendations made December 1, 1995, shall include recommendations regarding
extension of the requirements of this chapter to employers with fifty or more
full-time employees at a single worksite who begin their regular work day
between 6:00 a.m. and 9:00 a.m. on weekdays for more than twelve continuous
months.

Sec.
549. RCW
70.114A.070 and 1995 c 220 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development shall contract
with private, nonprofit corporations to provide technical assistance to any
private individual or nonprofit organization wishing to construct temporary or
permanent worker housing. The assistance may include information on state and
local application and approval procedures, information or assistance in
applying for federal, state, or local financial assistance, including tax
incentives, information on cost-effective housing designs, or any other
assistance the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development may deem helpful in obtaining the active participation of private
individuals or groups in constructing or operating temporary or permanent
worker housing.

Sec.
550. RCW
70.119A.170 and 1997 c 218 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A drinking water assistance account is created in the state treasury. Such
subaccounts as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter are
permitted to be established within the account. The purpose of the account is
to allow the state to use any federal funds that become available to states
from congress to fund a state revolving loan fund program as part of the
reauthorization of the federal safe drinking water act. Expenditures from the
account may only be made by the secretary, the public works board, or the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development, after
appropriation. Moneys in the account may only be used, consistent with federal
law, to assist water systems to provide safe drinking water through a program
administered through the department of health, the public works board, and the
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development and for
other activities authorized under federal law. Money may be placed in the account
from the proceeds of bonds when authorized by the legislature, transfers from
other state funds or accounts, federal capitalization grants or other financial
assistance, all repayments of moneys borrowed from the account, all interest
payments made by borrowers from the account or otherwise earned on the account,
or any other lawful source. All interest earned on moneys deposited in the
account, including repayments, shall remain in the account and may be used for
any eligible purpose. Moneys in the account may only be used to assist local
governments and water systems to provide safe and reliable drinking water, for
other services and assistance authorized by federal law to be funded from these
federal funds, and to administer the program.

(2)
The department and the public works board shall establish and maintain a
program to use the moneys in the drinking water assistance account as provided
by the federal government under the safe drinking water act. The department
and the public works board, in consultation with purveyors, local governments,
local health jurisdictions, financial institutions, commercial construction
interests, other state agencies, and other affected and interested parties,
shall by January 1, 1999, adopt final joint rules and requirements for the
provision of financial assistance to public water systems as authorized under
federal law. Prior to the effective date of the final rules, the department
and the public works board may establish and utilize guidelines for the sole
purpose of ensuring the timely procurement of financial assistance from the
federal government under the safe drinking water act, but such guidelines shall
be converted to rules by January 1, 1999. The department and the public works
board shall make every reasonable effort to ensure the state's receipt and
disbursement of federal funds to eligible public water systems as quickly as
possible after the federal government has made them available. By December 15,
1997, the department and the public works board shall provide a report to the
appropriate committees of the legislature reflecting the input from the
affected interests and parties on the status of the program. The report shall
include significant issues and concerns, the status of rule making and guidelines,
and a plan for the adoption of final rules.

(3)
If the department, public works board, or any other department, agency, board,
or commission of state government participates in providing service under this
section, the administering entity shall endeavor to provide cost-effective and
timely services. Mechanisms to provide cost-effective and timely services
include: (a) Adopting federal guidelines by reference into administrative
rules; (b) using existing management mechanisms rather than creating new
administrative structures; (c) investigating the use of service contracts,
either with other governmental entities or with nongovernmental service
providers; (d) the use of joint or combined financial assistance applications;
and (e) any other method or practice designed to streamline and expedite the
delivery of services and financial assistance.

(4)
The department shall have the authority to establish assistance priorities and
carry out oversight and related activities, other than financial
administration, with respect to assistance provided with federal funds. The
department, the public works board, and the department of community((,
trade, and economic)) development shall jointly develop, with the
assistance of water purveyors and other affected and interested parties, a
memorandum of understanding setting forth responsibilities and duties for each
of the parties. The memorandum of understanding at a minimum, shall include:

(a)
Responsibility for developing guidelines for providing assistance to public
water systems and related oversight prioritization and oversight
responsibilities including requirements for prioritization of loans or other
financial assistance to public water systems;

(b)
Department submittal of preapplication information to the public works board
for review and comment;

(c)
Department submittal of a prioritized list of projects to the public works
board for determination of:

(i)
Financial capability of the applicant; and

(ii)
Readiness to proceed, or the ability of the applicant to promptly commence the
project;

(d)
A process for determining consistency with existing water resource planning and
management, including coordinated water supply plans, regional water resource
plans, and comprehensive plans under the growth management act, chapter 36.70A
RCW;

(e)
A determination of:

(i)
Least-cost solutions, including consolidation and restructuring of small
systems, where appropriate, into more economical units;

(ii)
The provision of regional facilities;

(iii)
Projects and activities that facilitate compliance with the federal safe
drinking water act; and

(iv)
Projects and activities that are intended to achieve the public health
objectives of federal and state drinking water laws;

(f)
Implementation of water conservation and other demand management measures
consistent with state guidelines for water utilities;

(g)
Assistance for the necessary planning and engineering to assure that
consistency, coordination, and proper professional review are incorporated into
projects or activities proposed for funding;

(h)
Minimum standards for water system capacity, financial viability, and water
system planning;

(i)
Testing and evaluation of the water quality of the state's public water system
to assure that priority for financial assistance is provided to systems and
areas with threats to public health from contaminated supplies and reduce in
appropriate cases the substantial increases in costs and rates that customers
of small systems would otherwise incur under the monitoring and testing
requirements of the federal safe drinking water act;

(j)
Coordination, to the maximum extent possible, with other state programs that
provide financial assistance to public water systems and state programs that
address existing or potential water quality or drinking contamination problems;

(k)
Definitions of "affordability" and "disadvantaged community"
that are consistent with these and similar terms in use by other state or
federal assistance programs;

(l)
Criteria for the financial assistance program for public water systems, which
shall include, but are not limited to:

(i)
Determining projects addressing the most serious risk to human health;

(ii)
Determining the capacity of the system to effectively manage its resources,
including meeting state financial viability criteria; and

(iii)
Determining the relative benefit to the community served; and

(m)
Ensure that each agency fulfills the audit, accounting, and reporting
requirements under federal law for its portion of the administration of this
program.

(5)
The department and the public works board shall begin the process to disburse
funds no later than October 1, 1997, and shall adopt such rules as are
necessary under chapter 34.05 RCW to administer the program by January 1, 1999.

Sec.
551. RCW
70.125.030 and 1999 c 45 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter and unless the context indicates otherwise:

(1)
"Core services" means treatment services for victims of sexual
assault including information and referral, crisis intervention, medical
advocacy, legal advocacy, support, and system coordination.

(2)
"Department" means the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development.

(3)
"Law enforcement agencies" means police and sheriff's departments of
this state.

(4)
"Personal representative" means a friend, relative, attorney, or
employee or volunteer from a community sexual assault program or specialized
treatment service provider.

(5)
"Rape crisis center" means a community-based social service agency
which provides services to victims of sexual assault.

(6)
"Community sexual assault program" means a community-based social
service agency that is qualified to provide and provides core services to
victims of sexual assault.

(7)
"Sexual assault" means one or more of the following:

(a)
Rape or rape of a child;

(b)
Assault with intent to commit rape or rape of a child;

(c)
Incest or indecent liberties;

(d)
Child molestation;

(e)
Sexual misconduct with a minor;

(f)
Custodial sexual misconduct;

(g)
Crimes with a sexual motivation; or

(h)
An attempt to commit any of the aforementioned offenses.

(8)
"Specialized services" means treatment services for victims of sexual
assault including support groups, therapy, specialized sexual assault medical
examination, and prevention education to potential victims of sexual assault.

(9)
"Victim" means any person who suffers physical and/or mental anguish
as a proximate result of a sexual assault.

Sec.
552. RCW
70.164.020 and 1995 c 399 s 199 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Department" means the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development.

(2)
"Energy assessment" means an analysis of a dwelling unit to determine
the need for cost-effective energy conservation measures as determined by the
department.

(3)
"Household" means an individual or group of individuals living in a
dwelling unit as defined by the department.

(4)
"Low income" means household income that is at or below one hundred
twenty-five percent of the federally established poverty level.

(5)
"Nonutility sponsor" means any sponsor other than a public service
company, municipality, public utility district, mutual or cooperative,
furnishing gas or electricity used to heat low-income residences.

(6)
"Residence" means a dwelling unit as defined by the department.

(7)
"Sponsor" means any entity that submits a proposal under RCW
70.164.040, including but not limited to any local community action agency,
community service agency, or any other participating agency or any public
service company, municipality, public utility district, mutual or cooperative,
or any combination of such entities that jointly submits a proposal.

(8)
"Sponsor match" means the share, if any, of the cost of
weatherization to be paid by the sponsor.

(9)
"Weatherization" means materials or measures, and their installation,
that are used to improve the thermal efficiency of a residence.

(10)
"Weatherizing agency" means any approved department grantee or any
public service company, municipality, public utility district, mutual or
cooperative, or other entity that bears the responsibility for ensuring the
performance of weatherization of residences under this chapter and has been
approved by the department.

Sec.
553. RCW
70.190.010 and 1996 c 132 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Administrative costs" means the costs associated with procurement;
payroll processing; personnel functions; management; maintenance and operation
of space and property; data processing and computer services; accounting;
budgeting; auditing; indirect costs; and organizational planning, consultation,
coordination, and training.

(2)
"Assessment" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 43.70.010.

(3)
"At-risk" children are children who engage in or are victims of
at-risk behaviors.

(4)
"At-risk behaviors" means violent delinquent acts, teen substance
abuse, teen pregnancy and male parentage, teen suicide attempts, dropping out
of school, child abuse or neglect, and domestic violence.

(5)
"Community public health and safety networks" or "networks"
means the organizations authorized under RCW 70.190.060.

(6)
"Comprehensive plan" means a two-year plan that examines available
resources and unmet needs for a county or multicounty area, barriers that limit
the effective use of resources, and a plan to address these issues that is
broadly supported by local residents.

(7)
"Participating state agencies" means the office of the superintendent
of public instruction, the department of social and health services, the
department of health, the employment security department, the department of
community((, trade, and economic)) development, and such other
departments as may be specifically designated by the governor.

(8)
"Family policy council" or "council" means the
superintendent of public instruction, the secretary of social and health
services, the secretary of health, the commissioner of the employment security
department, and the director of the department of community((, trade, and
economic)) development or their designees, one legislator from each caucus
of the senate and house of representatives, and one representative of the
governor.

(9)
"Fiduciary interest" means (a) the right to compensation from a
health, educational, social service, or justice system organization that
receives public funds, or (b) budgetary or policy-making authority for an
organization listed in (a) of this subsection. A person who acts solely in an
advisory capacity and receives no compensation from a health, educational,
social service, or justice system organization, and who has no budgetary or
policy-making authority is deemed to have no fiduciary interest in the
organization.

(10)
"Outcome" or "outcome based" means defined and measurable
outcomes used to evaluate progress in reducing the rate of at-risk children and
youth through reducing risk factors and increasing protective factors.

(11)
"Matching funds" means an amount no less than twenty-five percent of
the amount budgeted for a network. The network's matching funds may be in-kind
goods and services. Funding sources allowable for match include appropriate
federal or local levy funds, private charitable funding, and other charitable
giving. Basic education funds shall not be used as a match. State general
funds shall not be used as a match for violence reduction and drug enforcement
account funds created under RCW 69.50.520.

(12)
"Policy development" has the same meaning as provided in RCW
43.70.010.

(13)
"Protective factors" means those factors determined by the department
of health to be empirically associated with behaviors that contribute to
socially acceptable and healthy nonviolent behaviors. Protective factors
include promulgation, identification, and acceptance of community norms
regarding appropriate behaviors in the area of delinquency, early sexual
activity, alcohol and substance abuse, educational opportunities, employment
opportunities, and absence of crime.

(14)
"Risk factors" means those factors determined by the department of
health to be empirically associated with at-risk behaviors that contribute to
violence.

Sec.
554. RCW
80.28.010 and 1995 c 399 s 211 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All charges made, demanded or received by any gas company, electrical company
or water company for gas, electricity or water, or for any service rendered or
to be rendered in connection therewith, shall be just, fair, reasonable and
sufficient.

(2)
Every gas company, electrical company and water company shall furnish and
supply such service, instrumentalities and facilities as shall be safe,
adequate and efficient, and in all respects just and reasonable.

(3)
All rules and regulations issued by any gas company, electrical company or
water company, affecting or pertaining to the sale or distribution of its
product, shall be just and reasonable.

(4)
Utility service for residential space heating shall not be terminated between
November 15th through March 15th if the customer:

(a)
Notifies the utility of the inability to pay the bill, including a security
deposit. This notice should be provided within five business days of receiving
a payment overdue notice unless there are extenuating circumstances. If the
customer fails to notify the utility within five business days and service is
terminated, the customer can, by paying reconnection charges, if any, and
fulfilling the requirements of this section, receive the protections of this
chapter;

(b)
Provides self-certification of household income for the prior twelve months to
a grantee of the department of community((, trade, and economic))
development which administers federally funded energy assistance programs. The
grantee shall determine that the household income does not exceed the maximum
allowed for eligibility under the state's plan for low-income energy assistance
under 42 U.S.C. 8624 and shall provide a dollar figure that is seven percent of
household income. The grantee may verify information provided in the self-certification;

(c)
Has applied for home heating assistance from applicable government and private
sector organizations and certifies that any assistance received will be applied
to the current bill and future utility bills;

(d)
Has applied for low-income weatherization assistance to the utility or other
appropriate agency if such assistance is available for the dwelling;

(e)
Agrees to a payment plan and agrees to maintain the payment plan. The plan
will be designed both to pay the past due bill by the following October 15th
and to pay for continued utility service. If the past due bill is not paid by
the following October 15th, the customer shall not be eligible for
protections under this chapter until the past due bill is paid. The plan shall
not require monthly payments in excess of seven percent of the customer's
monthly income plus one-twelfth of any arrearage accrued from the date
application is made and thereafter during November 15th through March 15th.
A customer may agree to pay a higher percentage during this period, but shall
not be in default unless payment during this period is less than seven percent
of monthly income plus one-twelfth of any arrearage accrued from the date
application is made and thereafter. If assistance payments are received by the
customer subsequent to implementation of the plan, the customer shall contact
the utility to reformulate the plan; and

(f)
Agrees to pay the moneys owed even if he or she moves.

(5)
The utility shall:

(a)
Include in any notice that an account is delinquent and that service may be
subject to termination, a description of the customer's duties in this section;

(b)
Assist the customer in fulfilling the requirements under this section;

(c)
Be authorized to transfer an account to a new residence when a customer who has
established a plan under this section moves from one residence to another
within the same utility service area;

(d)
Be permitted to disconnect service if the customer fails to honor the payment
program. Utilities may continue to disconnect service for those practices
authorized by law other than for nonpayment as provided for in this
subsection. Customers who qualify for payment plans under this section who
default on their payment plans and are disconnected can be reconnected and maintain
the protections afforded under this chapter by paying reconnection charges, if
any, and by paying all amounts that would have been due and owing under the
terms of the applicable payment plan, absent default, on the date on which
service is reconnected; and

(e)
Advise the customer in writing at the time it disconnects service that it will
restore service if the customer contacts the utility and fulfills the other
requirements of this section.

(6)
A payment plan implemented under this section is consistent with RCW 80.28.080.

(7)
Every gas company and electrical company shall offer residential customers the
option of a budget billing or equal payment plan. The budget billing or equal
payment plan shall be offered low-income customers eligible under the state's
plan for low-income energy assistance prepared in accordance with 42 U.S.C.
8624(C)(1) without limiting availability to certain months of the year, without
regard to the length of time the customer has occupied the premises, and
without regard to whether the customer is the tenant or owner of the premises
occupied.

(8)
Every gas company, electrical company and water company shall construct and
maintain such facilities in connection with the manufacture and distribution of
its product as will be efficient and safe to its employees and the public.

(9)
An agreement between the customer and the utility, whether oral or written,
shall not waive the protections afforded under this chapter.

(10)
In establishing rates or charges for water service, water companies as defined
in RCW 80.04.010 may consider the achievement of water conservation goals and
the discouragement of wasteful water use practices.

Sec.
555. RCW
82.14.330 and 1998 c 321 s 13 (Referendum Bill No. 49) are each amended to read
as follows:

(1)
Beginning in fiscal year 2000, the state treasurer shall transfer into the
municipal criminal justice assistance account for distribution under this
section from the general fund the sum of four million six hundred thousand
dollars divided into four equal deposits occurring on July 1st, October
1st, January 1st, and April 1st. For each fiscal year
thereafter, the state treasurer shall increase the total transfer by the fiscal
growth factor, as defined in RCW 43.135.025, forecast for that fiscal year by
the office of financial management in November of the preceding year. The
moneys deposited in the municipal criminal justice assistance account for
distribution under this section, less any moneys appropriated for purposes
under subsection (4) of this section, shall be distributed to the cities of the
state as follows:

(a)
Twenty percent appropriated for distribution shall be distributed to cities
with a three-year average violent crime rate for each one thousand in
population in excess of one hundred fifty percent of the state-wide three-year
average violent crime rate for each one thousand in population. The three-year
average violent crime rate shall be calculated using the violent crime rates
for each of the preceding three years from the annual reports on crime in
Washington state as published by the Washington association of sheriffs and
police chiefs. Moneys shall be distributed under this subsection (1)(a)
ratably based on population as last determined by the office of financial
management, but no city may receive more than one dollar per capita. Moneys
remaining undistributed under this subsection at the end of each calendar year
shall be distributed to the criminal justice training commission to reimburse
participating city law enforcement agencies with ten or fewer full-time
commissioned patrol officers the cost of temporary replacement of each officer
who is enrolled in basic law enforcement training, as provided in RCW
43.101.200.

(b)
Sixteen percent shall be distributed to cities ratably based on population as
last determined by the office of financial management, but no city may receive
less than one thousand dollars.

The
moneys deposited in the municipal criminal justice assistance account for
distribution under this subsection shall be distributed at such times as distributions
are made under RCW 82.44.150.

Moneys
distributed under this subsection shall be expended exclusively for criminal
justice purposes and shall not be used to replace or supplant existing
funding. Criminal justice purposes are defined as activities that
substantially assist the criminal justice system, which may include
circumstances where ancillary benefit to the civil justice system occurs, and
which includes domestic violence services such as those provided by domestic
violence programs, community advocates, and legal advocates, as defined in RCW
70.123.020. Existing funding for purposes of this subsection is defined as
calendar year 1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal justice
purposes. Calendar year 1989 actual operating expenditures for criminal
justice purposes exclude the following: Expenditures for extraordinary events
not likely to reoccur, changes in contract provisions for criminal justice
services, beyond the control of the local jurisdiction receiving the services,
and major nonrecurring capital expenditures.

(2)
In addition to the distributions under subsection (1) of this section:

(a)
Fourteen percent shall be distributed to cities that have initiated innovative
law enforcement strategies, including alternative sentencing and crime
prevention programs. No city may receive more than one dollar per capita under
this subsection (2)(a).

(b)
Twenty percent shall be distributed to cities that have initiated programs to
help at-risk children or child abuse victim response programs. No city may
receive more than fifty cents per capita under this subsection (2)(b).

(c)
Twenty percent shall be distributed to cities that have initiated programs
designed to reduce the level of domestic violence within their jurisdictions or
to provide counseling for domestic violence victims. No city may receive more
than fifty cents per capita under this subsection (2)(c).

(d)
Ten percent shall be distributed to cities that contract with another
governmental agency for a majority of the city's law enforcement services.

Moneys
distributed under this subsection shall be distributed to those cities that
submit funding requests under this subsection to the department of community((,
trade, and economic)) development based on criteria developed under RCW
82.14.335. Allocation of funds shall be in proportion to the population of
qualified jurisdictions, but the distribution to a city shall not exceed the
amount of funds requested. Cities shall submit requests for program funding to
the department of community((, trade, and economic)) development by
November 1st of each year for funding the following year. The
department shall certify to the state treasurer the cities eligible for funding
under this subsection and the amount of each allocation.

The
moneys deposited in the municipal criminal justice assistance account for
distribution under this subsection, less any moneys appropriated for purposes
under subsection (4) of this section, shall be distributed at the times as
distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150. Moneys remaining undistributed
under this subsection at the end of each calendar year shall be distributed to
the criminal justice training commission to reimburse participating city law
enforcement agencies with ten or fewer full-time commissioned patrol officers
the cost of temporary replacement of each officer who is enrolled in basic law
enforcement training, as provided in RCW 43.101.200.

If
a city is found by the state auditor to have expended funds received under this
subsection in a manner that does not comply with the criteria under which the
moneys were received, the city shall be ineligible to receive future
distributions under this subsection until the use of the moneys are justified
to the satisfaction of the director or are repaid to the state general fund.
The director may allow noncomplying use of moneys received under this
subsection upon a showing of hardship or other emergent need.

(3)
Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, the distributions to any city
that substantially decriminalizes or repeals its criminal code after July 1,
1990, and that does not reimburse the county for costs associated with criminal
cases under RCW 3.50.800 or 3.50.805(2), shall be made to the county in which
the city is located.

(4)
Not more than five percent of the funds deposited to the municipal criminal
justice assistance account shall be available for appropriations for
enhancements to the state patrol crime laboratory system and the continuing
costs related to these enhancements. Funds appropriated from this account for
such enhancements shall not supplant existing funds from the state general
fund.

Sec.
556. RCW
82.14.335 and 1995 c 399 s 213 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of community((, trade, and economic)) development shall adopt
criteria to be used in making grants to cities under RCW 82.14.330(2). In
developing the criteria, the department shall create a temporary advisory
committee consisting of the director of community((, trade, and economic))
development, two representatives nominated by the association of Washington
cities, and two representatives nominated by the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs.

Sec.
557. RCW
90.71.020 and 1998 c 246 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The Puget Sound action team is created. The action team shall consist of: The
directors of the departments of ecology; agriculture; natural resources; fish
and wildlife; and community((, trade, and economic)) development; the
secretaries of the departments of health and transportation; the director of
the parks and recreation commission; the director of the interagency committee
for outdoor recreation; the administrative officer of the conservation
commission designated in RCW 89.08.050; one person representing cities,
appointed by the governor; one person representing counties, appointed by the
governor; one person representing federally recognized tribes, appointed by the
governor; and the chair of the action team. The action team shall also include
the following ex officio nonvoting members: The regional director of the
United States environmental protection agency; the regional administrator of
the national marine fisheries service; and the regional supervisor of the
United States fish and wildlife service. The members representing cities and
counties shall each be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW
43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(2)
The action team shall:

(a)
Prepare a Puget Sound work plan and budget for inclusion in the governor's
biennial budget;

(b)
Coordinate monitoring and research programs as provided in RCW 90.71.060;

(c)
Work under the direction of the action team chair as provided in RCW 90.71.040;

(d)
Coordinate permitting requirements as necessary to expedite permit issuance for
any local watershed plan developed pursuant to rules adopted under this
chapter;

(e)
Identify and resolve any policy or rule conflicts that may exist between one or
more agencies represented on the action team;

(f)
Periodically amend the Puget Sound management plan;

(g)
Enter into, amend, and terminate contracts with individuals, corporations, or
research institutions for the purposes of this chapter;

(h)
Receive such gifts, grants, and endowments, in trust or otherwise, for the use
and benefit of the purposes of the action team. The action team may expend the
same or any income therefrom according to the terms of the gifts, grants, or
endowments;

(i)
Promote extensive public participation, and otherwise seek to broadly
disseminate information concerning Puget Sound;

(j)
Receive and expend funding from other public agencies;

(k)
To reduce costs and improve efficiency, review by December 1, 1996, all
requirements for reports and documentation from state agencies and local
governments specified in the plan for the purpose of eliminating and
consolidating reporting requirements; and

(l)
Beginning in December 1998, and every two years thereafter, submit a report to
the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature that describes
and evaluates the successes and shortcomings of the current work plan relative
to the priority problems identified for each geographic area of Puget Sound.

(3)
By July 1, 1996, the action team shall begin developing its initial work plan,
which shall include the coordination of necessary support staff.

(4)
The action team shall incorporate, to the maximum extent possible, the
recommendations of the council regarding amendments to the Puget Sound
management plan and the work plan.

(5)
All proceedings of the action team are subject to the open public meetings act
under chapter 42.30 RCW.

PART
VI

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 601. Part
headings used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 602.
Sections 201 through 205 and 221 through 225 of this act are each added to
chapter 43.31 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 603.
Section 318 of this act expires December 31, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604.
Sections 101 through 126, 201 through 228, 301 through 350, 401 through 414,
501 through 557, and 601 of this act take effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---