BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. 1999
c 379 s 106 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE OFFICE OF THE
SECRETARY OF STATE

Eastern
Branch Archives Building: Design (98-2-001)

The
reappropriation in this section is provided solely for completion of the design
phase for the eastern regional archives facility to be sited on the south
campus of the Riverpoint higher education park in Spokane.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ ((48,645))

295,482

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ ((530,972))

284,135

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 5,135,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,714,617

Sec.
2. 1999
c 379 s 107 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Community
Economic Revitalization (86-1-001) (00-2-001)

The
reappropriation in this section from the public facilities construction loan
revolving account is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)
The department shall ensure that all funds transferred from the public works
assistance account into the public facilities construction loan revolving
account during the 1997-99 biennium are used only for loans to local
governments.

(2)
The department shall also ensure that all principal and interest payments from
these loans are paid into the public works assistance account.

(3)
The new appropriation from the public facility construction loan revolving
account shall be used solely to provide loans to eligible local governments and
grants to the extent permitted by law. The department shall ensure that all
principal and interest payments from loans made on moneys from this account are
paid into this account.

Reappropriation:

Public
Works Assistance Account‑-State..... $ 1,539,515

Public
Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account‑-State...................... $ 9,500,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation............. $ 11,539,515

Appropriation:

Public
Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account‑-State...................... $ ((13,000,000))

8,750,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 559,003

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 36,000,000

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ ((60,598,518))

56,348,518

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to 1999 c 379 to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Special
Commitment Center: Phase I (01-2-001)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

(2)
This appropriation takes effect July 1, 2000.

(3)
In accordance with section 909, chapter 379, Laws of 1999, the department of
corrections is responsible for project management.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 14,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 50,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 64,000,000

Sec.
4. 1999
c 379 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western
State Hospital: Ward renovation phase 6 (94-1-316)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ ((768,458))

82,800

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ ((5,400,765))

12,088,480

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ ((6,169,223))

12,171,280

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to 1999 c 379 to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Security
Improvements at Western State Hospital (99-1-001)

The
reappropriation in this section is provided solely for facility improvements
that are required as a result of the passage of Senate Bill No. 6214.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 538,815

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 115,185

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 654,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to 1999 c 379 to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Office
Building Planning (01-2-001)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 400,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)....... ............ $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 400,000

Sec.
7. 1999
c 379 s 252 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking
Water Assistance Program (97-2-001)

The
reappropriation in this section is provided solely for an interagency agreement
with the department of community, trade, and economic development to make, in
cooperation with the public works board, loans to local governments and public
water systems for projects and activities to protect and improve the state's
drinking water facilities and resources.

Reappropriation:

Drinking
Water Assistance Account‑-Federal. $ 16,133,576

Appropriation:

Drinking
Water Assistance Account‑-Federal. $ 16,985,921

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 17,739,874

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 34,000,000

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ ((67,873,450))

84,859,371

Sec.
8. 1999
c 379 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Referendum
39 Waste Disposal Facilities (82-2-005)

The
reappropriation in this section is provided solely for projects under contracts
on or before June 30, 1999. Reappropriated funds not associated with
contracted projects shall lapse on June 30, 1999. The office of financial
management may grant waivers from this lapse requirement for specific projects
upon findings of exceptional circumstances after notification of the chairs of
the house of representatives capital budget committee and senate ways and means
committee. The department shall submit a report to the office of financial
management and the house of representatives capital budget committee and senate
ways and means committee by December 1, 1999, listing all projects funded from
this section.

Reappropriation:

State
and Local Improvements Revolving Account

(Waste
Facilities 1980)‑-State...... $ ((6,113,126))

6,871,420

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ ((12,293,785))

11,535,491

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 0

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ 18,406,911

Sec.
9. 1999
c 379 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Local
Toxics Control Account (88-2-008)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for projects under
contract on or before June 30, 1999. Reappropriated funds not associated with
contracted projects shall lapse on June 30, 1999. The office of financial
management may grant waivers from this lapse requirement for specific projects
upon findings of exceptional circumstances after notification of the chairs of
the house of representatives capital budget committee and senate ways and means
committee. The department shall submit a report to the office of financial
management and the house of representatives capital budget committee and senate
ways and means committee by December 1, 1999, listing all projects funded from
this section.

(2)
Up to $3,000,000 of the local toxics control account appropriation is provided
to the department for cleanup actions at the Everett smelter cleanup site in
the city of Everett. The department shall seek recovery of the funds expended
for this purpose from the liable parties by way of a settlement agreement or
court action under the authority of chapter 70.105D RCW, the model toxics
control act. Any recovery of cleanup costs funded by this appropriation that
might occur shall be deposited into the local toxics control account.

Reappropriation:

Local
Toxics Control Account‑-State........ $ 25,833,809

Appropriation:

Local
Toxics Control Account‑-State........ $ 42,479,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 65,202,174

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 180,000,000

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ 313,514,983

Sec.
10. 1999
c 379 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water
Pollution Control Revolving Fund (90-2-002)

Reappropriation:

Water
Pollution Control Revolving Account‑-

State............................... $ ((55,640,931))

28,810,479

Water
Pollution Control Revolving Account‑-

Federal............................. $ ((34,914,688))

38,704,192

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation............. $ ((90,555,619))

67,514,671

Appropriation:

Water
Pollution Control Revolving Account‑-

State............................... $ ((32,375,833))

52,854,981

Water
Pollution Control Revolving Account‑-

Federal............................. $ ((46,830,366))

48,147,552

-------------

Subtotal Appropriation.............. $ ((79,206,199))

101,002,533

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 120,971,790

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 320,207,299

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ ((610,940,907))

609,696,293

Sec.
11. 1999
c 379 s 331 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Washington
Wildlife and Recreation Program (98-2-003)

The
appropriations in this section for the wildlife and recreation program under
chapter 43.98A RCW and RCW 43.98A.040 are subject to the following condition
and limitation:

(1)
The new appropriations in this section are provided for the approved list of projects
included in LEAP capital document No. 99-1, as developed on April 8, 1999,
and the interagency approved list of local park projects, resolution 99-24,
dated September 23, 1999.

(2)
Any funding provided in this section for the Mt. Spokane - Quartz Mountain
acquisition by the state parks and recreation commission shall not exceed fair
market value as determined by an evaluation of three independent appraisals.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 6,475,416

Outdoor
Recreation Account‑-State............... $ 23,733,311

Habitat
Conservation Account‑-State............. $ 25,872,718

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 56,081,445

Appropriation:

Outdoor
Recreation Account‑-State............... $ 23,000,000

Habitat
Conservation Account‑-State............. $ 25,000,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 48,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 213,018,555

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 190,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 507,100,000

Sec.
12. 1999
c 379 s 335 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE
CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Conservation
Reserve Enhancement Program (00-2-004)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State. $ 5,000,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State. $ ((5,000,000))

2,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ ((10,000,000))

12,500,000

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ 20,000,000

Sec.
13. 1999
c 379 s 361 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Warm
Water Game Fish Access Facilities (98-2-006)

Reappropriation:

Warm
Water Game Fish Account‑-State............. $ 210,000

Appropriation:

Warm
Water Game Fish Account‑-State............. $ ((600,000))

300,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 2,080,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ ((2,890,000))

2,590,000

Sec.
14. 1999
c 379 s 383 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Administrative
Site Preservation (00-1-018)

Appropriation:

Agricultural
College Trust Management

Account‑-State........................... $ 51,400

Forest
Development Account‑-State............... $ 203,580

Resources
Management Cost Account‑-State........ $ ((565,500))

514,100

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 361,920

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 1,131,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 938,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 5,118,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,187,000

Sec.
15. 1999
c 379 s 388 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Right-of-Way
Acquisition (00-2-005)

Appropriation:

Agricultural
College Trust Management

Account‑-State........................... $ 6,000

Forest
Development Account‑-State............... $ 387,000

Resources
Management Cost Account‑-State........ $ ((650,000))

644,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 1,037,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,392,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 6,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,429,000

Sec.
16. 1999
c 379 s 390 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Minor
Works: Program (00-2-011)

The
appropriations in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

Agricultural
College Trust Management

Account‑-State........................... $ 35,000

Forest
Development Account‑-State............... $ 136,600

Resources
Management Cost Account‑-State........ $ ((379,500))

344,500

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 242,900

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 759,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 609,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 5,580,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,948,000

Sec.
17. 1999
c 379 s 931 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Grants (00-2-014)

The
appropriation in this section is provided for a list of projects in LEAP
capital document No. 1999-A1, as developed on April 23, 1999.

The
department shall submit a list of recommended projects to be funded from the
aquatic lands enhancement account in the 2001-03 capital budget. The list
shall result from a competitive grants program developed by the department
based upon, at a minimum: A uniform criteria for the selection of projects and
awarding of grants for up to fifty percent of the total project cost; local
community support for the project; and a state-wide geographic distribution of
projects. The list of projects shall be submitted to the office of financial
management by September 15, 2000.

Reappropriation:

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account‑-State... $ 2,340,000

Appropriation:

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account‑-State... $ ((5,550,000))

4,738,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 9,716,817

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 24,000,000

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ ((41,606,817))

40,794,817

Sec.
18. 1999
c 379 s 373 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Small
Timber Landowner Program (00-5-001)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(((1)))
This appropriation is provided solely to purchase or lease riparian and other
sensitive aquatic areas from willing owners of small parcels of forest land.

(((2)
If federal grants for salmon recovery efforts are equal to or less than
$50,000,000 during the 1999-2001 fiscal biennium, then $5,000,000 of the
appropriation in this section may be expended. If federal grants for salmon
recovery efforts during the 1999-2001 biennium exceed $50,000,000, then the
entire appropriation in this section may be expended.))

Appropriation:

((General
Fund‑-Federal)) State Building

Construction
Account................ $ ((10,000,000))

2,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 0

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ ((10,000,000))

2,500,000

Sec.
19. 1999
c 379 s 502 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

Seattle
Crime Laboratory (00-2-008)

The
appropriation in this section shall not be expended until the documents
described in the capital project review requirements process and procedures
prescribed by the office of financial management have been complied with under
sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State. $ 900,000

Appropriation:

County
Criminal Justice Assistance

Account‑-State...................... $ 650,000

Death
Investigations Account‑-State........ $ 2,500,000

Municipal
Criminal Justice Assistance

Account‑-State...................... $ 250,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State. $ 9,100,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation.............. $ ((10,000,000))

12,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 200,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 0

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ ((11,100,000))

12,700,000

Sec.
20. 1999
c 379 s 603 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE
BOARD OF EDUCATION

Common
School Construction: Quality and value improvements (00-2-002)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$9,800,000 of this appropriation is provided to implement chapter
. . . (House Bill No. 1831), Laws of 1999. ((If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 1999, this appropriation shall lapse.))

(2)
$200,000 from this appropriation is provided to fund two FTEs in the office of
state fire marshal to exclusively review K-12 construction documents for fire
and life safety in accordance with the state building code. It is the intent
of this appropriation to provide these services only to those districts that
are located in counties without qualified review capabilities.

(3)
On an annual basis, the state board shall report to the fiscal committees of
the legislature and the office of financial management with a summary of the
results of the value engineering studies and constructability reviews, and an
evaluation of the use of building commissioning construction management
services and fire marshal reviews.

Appropriation:

Common
School Construction Account‑-State........ $ 10,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 40,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 50,000,000

Sec.
21. 1999
c 379 s 604 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION

Public
School Building Construction (98-2-001)(00-2-001)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)(a)
Up to $6,491,519 of the new appropriation provided in this section may be
provided for emergency repairs.

(((a)))
(b) Prior to the distribution of funds authorized by this subsection,
the state board shall develop rules for school district eligibility to receive
emergency grants and requirements for repayment of recovered costs. It is
intended that these funds be provided to school districts only for emergency
repairs due to accidents, natural disasters, fire, floods, vandalism, or
similar events and only after all avenues of local funding have been exhausted.

(((b)))
(2) The state board shall report to the fiscal committees of the
legislature and the office of financial management the amount and purpose of
each grant provided to school districts.

(((c)))
(3) Any recoveries by the districts from insurance, litigation, or other
sources for repairs and improvements funded from this appropriation shall be
returned to the state in proportion to the state assistance as a share of total
project cost.

(((2)
Total cash disbursed from the common school construction account may not exceed
the available cash balance.))

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State. $ 1,993,556

Common
School Construction Account‑-State... $ 112,424,633

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation............. $ 114,418,189

Appropriation:

Common
School Construction Account‑-State... $ ((315,081,000))

353,649,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 607,956,559

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 1,390,582,000

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ ((2,428,037,748))

2,466,605,748

Sec.
22. 1999
c 379 s 605 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT
OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Program
Management (98-1-001)

Funding
is provided for up to five FTE regional coordinators. The coordinators
shall have direct construction or architectural training and experience and be
strategically located across the state. The coordinators shall assist local
school districts with: State board of education rules relating to school
construction and modernization projects, building condition analysis,
development of state studies and surveys, architect/engineer and construction
manager selection, value engineering, and constructability reviews during
design, building commissioning, construction administration, maintenance
issues, and data verification to allow equitable administration of the state
board priority system.

Appropriation:

Common
School Construction Account‑-State........ $ 1,619,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 7,644,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,263,000

Sec.
23. 1999
c 379 s 634 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Minor
Works: Safety (98-1-001)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

((State
Building Construction Account‑-State.... $ 2,500,000))

University
of Washington Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 2,671,684

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ ((1,200,000))

1,028,316

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,700,000

Sec.
24. 1999
c 379 s 641 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Nuclear
Reactor: Decommissioning (99-2-009)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ ((750,000))

1,149,696

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ ((450,000))

50,304

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,200,000

Sec.
25. 1999
c 379 s 642 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Tacoma
Branch Campus: Phase III predesign (00-2-021)

The
appropriation in this section is to conduct a predesign of the project
described in this section in accordance with the predesign manual published by
the office of financial management. Future appropriations for this project are
subject to the submittal of completed predesign requirements on or before July
1, 2000.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 55,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 55,500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 26. A
new section is added to 1999 c 379 to read as follows:

FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

Power
System Upgrade (01-1-001)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment procedures
under sections 902 and 903, chapter 379, Laws of 1999.

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑-State (Fiscal Year 2000)..... $ 3,600,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 0

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ 3,600,000

Sec.
27. 1999
c 379 s 686 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

WSU
Spokane - Health Sciences Building (98-2-903)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 through 904 of this act.

(2)
No money from the reappropriation may be expended in a manner that is
inconsistent with the recommendations of the higher education coordinating
board and the project design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of
financial management.

(3)
Design and construction of this building shall accommodate at least 240
additional full-time equivalent students on the Riverpoint campus.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,871,010

Appropriation:

((Higher
Education Construction Account‑-State))

State
Higher Education Construction Account‑-

State.................................... $ 36,300,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 814,365

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 38,985,375

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 28. A
new section is added to 1999 c 379 to read as follows:

FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Columbia
Basin College: Roofs (01-1-001)

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑-State (Fiscal Year 2001)..... $ 1,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.... ........................... $ 1,000,000

Sec.
29. 1999
c 379 s 794 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Everett
Community College - Instructional Technology Center: Construction (96-2-652)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State. $ ((1,600,000))

1,873,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ ((15,017,483))

14,744,483

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 0

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ 16,617,483

Sec.
30. 1999
c 379 s 905 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

ACQUISITION
OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS. The
following agencies may enter into financial contracts, paid for from operating
revenues, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts
indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section, agencies shall use the
most economical financial contract option available, including long-term
leases, lease-purchase agreements, lease-development with option to purchase
agreements or financial contracts using certificates of participation. The
director of general administration shall ensure that the clustering of state
facilities and the collocation and consolidation of state agencies take place
where such configurations are economical and consistent with agency space
needs. Agencies shall assist the department of general administration with
facility collocation and consolidation efforts.

State
agencies may enter into agreements with the department of general
administration and the state treasurer's office to develop requests to the
legislature for acquisition of properties and facilities through financial
contracts. The agreements may include charges for services rendered.

(1)
Department of general administration:

(a)
Enter into a financing contract in the amount of $9,435,000 plus financing
expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW, to purchase an
existing office building and associated land in Yakima for use by state agencies.

(b)
Enter into a financing contract in the amount of $4,621,000 plus financing
expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW, to purchase an
existing office building and associated land in Kelso for use by the department
of social and health services and the employment security department.

(2)
Department of corrections: Enter into a financing contract on behalf of the
department of corrections in the amount of $2,300,000 plus financing expenses
and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase or construct a
correctional industries transportation services warehouse.

(3)
State parks and recreation: It is the intent of the legislature that the
operating revenues of the department provide the primary source of funds necessary
to meet financing contract obligations for the projects financed under this
authority. In addition, state parks and recreation is authorized to pledge to
make payments from appropriated funds pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW:

(a)
Enter into financing contracts on behalf of state parks and recreation in the
((amount of $500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW to construct cabins at Cama beach.

(b)
Enter into financing contracts on behalf of state parks and recreation in the
amount of $250,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to complete improvements at the interpretive center/store at
Deception Pass.

(c)
Enter into financing contracts on behalf of state parks and recreation in the
amount of $1,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase and install additional yurts and cabins
state-wide.

(d)
Enter into financing contracts on behalf of state parks and recreation in the
amount of $500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a day use shelter at Lake Sammamish.

(e)
Enter into financing contracts on behalf of state parks and recreation in the
amount of $500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to improve campsite electrification state-wide.

(f)
Enter into financing contracts on behalf of state parks and recreation in the
amount of $750,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to develop additional campsites state-wide)) aggregate
amount of $3,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to make capital improvements in state parks. Projects to be
funded will be chosen from a list maintained by the office of financial
management. The state parks and recreation commission may determine to do some
or all of these projects and may adjust the amounts for individual projects
within the total authorization of $3,500,000.

(4)
Community and technical colleges:

(a)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Green River Community College in
the amount of $1,526,150 plus financing expenses and reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for remodel of the Lindbloom student center building.

(b)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Highline Community College in the
amount of $2,070,613 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for the purchase of the Federal Way Center, currently being
leased by the college.

(c)
Enter into a financial contract on behalf of Green River Community College in
the amount of $100,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase approximately 1.5 acres of land adjacent to
the westside parking lot.

(d)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Grays Harbor Community College in
the amount of $600,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW for the purchase and remodeling of the Riverview School
and 2.83 acres of property, currently being leased by the college.

(e)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Everett Community College in the
amount of $1,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for the remodeling of the fitness center.

(f)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Tacoma Community College in the
amount of $1,697,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for a 10,000 gross square foot addition to the existing
student center.

(g)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Spokane Community College in the
amount of $3,840,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for a 20,000 gross square foot addition and remodeling to the
existing Lair student service building costing $6,000,000. The balance of
project cost will be cash from student and activity fees and enterprise funds.

(h)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Big Bend Community College in the
amount of $150,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for the exchange of 10 acres of land with Grant county.

(i)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Green River Community College in
the amount of $7,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW for purchase and development of property in the downtown
Kent area.

(j)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Columbia Basin Community College
in the amount of (($1,000,000)) $1,500,000 plus financing
expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for a 10,000
gross square foot student services auditorium.

(k)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Yakima Valley Community College in
the amount of $375,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW for a 2,700 gross square foot addition and remodeling to
the existing student union building costing $1,400,000. Prior to commencing,
the college shall prepare and present a business plan describing the financing
of the complete project to the state board for community and technical
colleges, the office of financial management, and the legislative fiscal
committees.

(l)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Peninsula Community College in the
amount of $2,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for a 10,000 gross square foot addition to the student union
building.

(m)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Whatcom Community College in the
amount of (($2,500,000)) $3,000,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for a 20,000 gross square foot
addition and remodeling to the existing extended learning/work force facility
costing $4,388,000. Prior to commencing, the college shall prepare and present
a business plan describing the financing of the complete project to the state
board for community and technical colleges, the office of financial management,
and the legislative fiscal committees.

(n)
Enter into a financial contract on behalf of Green River Community College in
the amount of $350,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase Lea Hill park from King county.

(o)
Enter into a financial contract on behalf of Bellevue Community College in the
amount of $4,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for replacement of the Robinswood school. This authority is
provided in addition to the appropriation in section 761 of this act.

(p)
Enter into a financial contract on behalf of Wenatchee Valley College in the
amount of $500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase two buildings and property contiguous to the
college campus.

(q)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Whatcom Community College in the
amount of $1,918,483 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for the purchase of 10.71 acres of property for the
completion of the Whatcom Community College campus.

(r)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Edmonds Community College in the
amount of (($3,700,000)) $4,150,000 plus financing expenses and
required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to develop a music building on
the college campus.

(s)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Olympic College in the amount of
$900,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW for development of off-street student parking.

(t)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Bates Technical College in the
amount of $5,300,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for the purchase of a 9.41 acre site with an approximately
46,125 square foot broadcasting facility situated on 19th Street in Tacoma.

(u)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Renton Technical College in the
amount $1,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for the purchase of approximately 10 acres within the
district boundary to support a future relocation of apprenticeship programs off
the main campus.

(5)
Central Washington University: Enter into a financing contract on behalf of
Central Washington University in the amount of $5,700,000 plus financing
expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the Central
Washington University/Edmonds Community College center.

(6)
University of Washington:

(a)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of the University of Washington in
the amount of $7,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW to finance real property improvements to the Sand Point
building.

(b)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of the University of Washington in
the amount of $7,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW to finance primate center tenant improvements.

(c)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of the University of Washington in
the amount of $4,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW for renovation of Sand Point building 29 as office and
storage space.

(d)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of the University of Washington in
the amount of $12,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for renovation of Husky Den, the food service in
the Husky Union building, and the renovation of the McMahon Hall food service.

(e)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of the University of Washington in
the amount of $5,700,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW for installation of Ethernet wiring and electrical
upgrades in Lander Hall and McCarty Hall.

(7)
Washington state convention and trade center: Enter into one or more financing
contracts not exceeding an aggregate total amount of (($27,500,000)) $32,100,000
plus financing expenses and reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW, for funding
unanticipated costs in excess of the $111,700,000 principal amount of the
financing contract authorized in section 802(10)(b), chapter 16, Laws of 1995
2nd sp. sess., for the construction of the expansion of the Washington state
convention and trade center as authorized under chapter 386, Laws of 1995. The
balance of the expansion project funds shall be provided from interest earnings
and public or private funds. The financing contract or contracts representing
all or part of the amount authorized by this section shall not be executed
without prior written approval of the office of financial management based upon
its determination that such financing contract or contracts are reasonably
necessary for the expansion project.

(8)
Department of health: Provides for authority to request the department of
general administration to procure a replacement leased facility with an option
to purchase for the department of health's Thurston county offices. The
development of the facility shall comply with the department of general
administration's specifications for lease to own facilities for state office
buildings.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 31. A
new section is added to 1999 c 379 to read as follows:

The
director of the office of financial management is authorized to transfer up to
$65,000,000 from the public works assistance account‑-state to the state
building construction account‑-state, when, in his or her judgment there
is a need to offset currently planned bond sales levels to maintain a positive
statutory debt capacity. In the event that this transfer is not completed in
full by October 1, 2000, the public works board is authorized to prepare a list
of additional projects for this biennium. This list shall not exceed
$15,000,000 in expenditures from the public works assistance account‑-state.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 32. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---