BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART
I

GENERAL GOVERNMENT

Sec.
101. 1999
c 309 s 101 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE HOUSE
OF REPRESENTATIVES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((24,853,000))

24,841,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((26,061,000))

25,902,000

Department
of Retirement Systems Expense Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((25,000))

30,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((50,939,000))

50,773,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$25,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation ((for fiscal year
2000)) is provided solely for allocation to Project Citizen, a program of
the national conference of state legislatures to promote student civic
involvement.

(2)
$394,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided to support
the legislature's participation in the redistricting process in conjunction
with the redistricting commission.

Sec.
102. 1999
c 309 s 102 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SENATE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((19,749,000))

19,736,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((21,525,000))

21,527,000

Department
of Retirement Systems Expense Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((25,000))

30,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((41,299,000))

41,293,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$50,000 from the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
is provided to contract for a study of policies and practices for setting information
services rates paid by state agencies. The study shall include an analysis of
the effect of current and alternative depreciation policies and schedules on
rates and revolving fund balances.

(2)
$25,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation ((for fiscal year
2000)) is provided solely for allocation to Project Citizen, a program of
the national conference of state legislatures to promote student civic
involvement.

(3)
$394,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided to support
the legislature's participation in the redistricting process in conjunction
with the redistricting commission.

(4)
$150,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is provided for
expert consultation on legal and policy issues related to options for caring
for persons with developmental disabilities who need involuntary commitment.
The 1999-2001 biennial appropriations act provides more than $14,000,000 to the
department of social and health services to improve services in this program.

(5)
The task force on funding of fairs and youth shows is created. The task force
shall be composed of the following members:

(a)
One member of the office of financial management appointed by the governor;

(b)
Two members of the house of representatives, one from each major caucus,
appointed by the co-speakers of the house of representatives;

(c)
Two members of the senate, one from each major caucus, appointed by the
president of the senate;

(d)
One representative of the department of agriculture, appointed by the director;

(e)
One representative of the horse racing commission, appointed by the chair of
the horse racing commission;

(f)
Three representatives of fairs, appointed by the president of the state fairs
association, representing community fairs, large county and area fairs, and
small county and area fairs;

(g)
Two representatives of youth shows, one representing 4-H youth programs
appointed by the dean of the college of agriculture at Washington State
University; the other representing future farmers of america programs appointed
by the agricultural teachers association;

(h)
One representative of the horse racing industry appointed by agreement of the
co-speakers of the house of representatives and president of the senate; and

(i)
One representative of county governments, appointed by the Washington
association of counties.

Members
shall be appointed by May 1, 2000. Staff support for the task force shall be
provided by the legislative committee staff. The task force shall develop
recommendations on the amount and source or sources of funding needed to
encourage fairs and youth shows and any legislative proposals needed to
implement the task force recommendations. The task force shall provide these
recommendations to the appropriate fiscal committees of the legislature by
November 15, 2000.

Sec.
103. 1999
c 309 s 103 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE JOINT
LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND REVIEW COMMITTEE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((1,604,000))

1,634,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((1,661,000))

1,876,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((3,265,000))

3,510,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$280,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for
conducting a study of the mental health system. The study shall include, but
not be limited to:

(((1)))
(a) An analysis of the roles and responsibilities of the division of
mental health in the department of social and health services, with regard to
regional support networks (RSNs) and community mental health providers;

(((2)))
(b) An analysis of the funding of the RSNs through contracts let by the
division of mental health, including the basis for per capita payment rates
paid to the regional support networks and any federal requirements related to
the federal medicaid waiver under which the current mental health system
operates;

(((3)))
(c) An analysis of actual and contractual service levels, outcomes, and
costs for RSNs, including the types and hours of services provided, costs of
services provided, trends in per client service expenditures, and client
outcomes;

(((4)))
(d) An analysis of RSN and subcontractor service and administrative
costs, fund balances, contracting practices, client demographics, and outcomes
over time;

(((5)))
(e) An analysis of contracts between RSNs and community mental health
providers, with emphasis on costs, services, performance, and client outcomes,
including any accountability standards, performance measures, data
requirements, and sanctions and incentives currently in the contract between
the regional support networks and the mental health division; and

(((6)))
(f) Recommendations for modifying the basis on which RSNs and community
mental health providers are funded, including a funding formula that will
result in a greater relationship of the funding distribution formula to the
prevalence of mental illness in each RSN service area, to efficiency as
demonstrated by performance measures and to effectiveness as demonstrated by
patient outcome.

The
joint legislative audit and review committee may contract for consulting
services in conducting the study.

The
study shall be submitted to the fiscal committees of the legislature by
December 1, 2000.

(2)
$110,000 of the general fund appropriation is provided solely for a study of
the K-12 special education program. The study shall focus on the following
issues: A review of the findings of the special education program audit
summary reports prepared by the state auditor in 1999 and 2000; the adequacy of
the excess cost definition for the special education program adopted by the
superintendent of public instruction; the ability to determine individual
school districts' safety net funding need in light of differing accounting
methods in use by school districts; the ability to uniformly determine
individual school districts' safety net funding need in light of differing
service delivery practices. The final report shall be submitted to the
legislature no later than June 30, 2002. Interim findings shall be submitted
by November 20, 2000, and November 20, 2001.

(3)
$135,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 is provided solely for a study of bilingual education.

(a)
The committee shall require the office of the superintendent of public
instruction to prepare a follow‑up report on how it has implemented the
recommendations contained in the legislative budget committee report number 92‑3,
"K‑12 transitional bilingual instruction program." This follow‑up
report shall also include updated information on the length of stay in
bilingual programs, testing methods for entry into and exit from the program,
descriptions of program variations, and the relationship between length of stay
and student achievement. The committee shall review and assess the
superintendent's report and present its findings to the fiscal committees of
the house of representatives and the senate by December 15, 2000.

(b)
In addition, the committee shall review and, if appropriate, make
recommendations for changes to the funding allocation methods for transitional
bilingual programs, and present its findings to the fiscal committees of the
house of representatives and senate by December 14, 2001.

Sec.
104. 1999
c 309 s 108 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPREME
COURT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((4,837,000))

4,980,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((5,027,000))

5,114,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((9,864,000))

10,094,000

Sec.
105. 1999
c 309 s 110 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE COURT
OF APPEALS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((10,946,000))

11,088,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((11,415,000))

11,691,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((22,361,000))

22,779,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$338,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5037 (Pierce county
court of appeals). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2)
$150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for providing compensation adjustments to nonjudicial
staff of the court of appeals. Within the funds provided in this subsection,
the court of appeals shall determine the specific positions to receive
compensation adjustments based on recruitment and retention difficulties, new
duties or responsibilities assigned, and salary inversion or compression within
the court of appeals.

Sec.
106. 1999
c 309 s 112 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE ADMINISTRATOR
FOR THE COURTS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((12,114,000))

13,208,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((12,280,000))

14,638,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((24,981,000))

25,146,000

Judicial
Information Systems Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((17,617,000))

18,250,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((66,992,000))

71,242,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Funding provided in the judicial information systems account appropriation shall
be used for the operations and maintenance of technology systems that improve
services provided by the supreme court, the court of appeals, the office of
public defense, and the administrator for the courts.

(2)
No moneys appropriated in this section may be expended by the administrator for
the courts for payments in excess of fifty percent of the employer contribution
on behalf of superior court judges for insurance and health care plans and
federal social security and medicare and medical aid benefits. Consistent with
Article IV, section 13 of the state Constitution and 1996 Attorney General's
Opinion No. 2, it is the intent of the legislature that the costs of these
employer contributions shall be shared equally between the state and county or
counties in which the judges serve. The administrator for the courts shall
continue to implement procedures for the collection and disbursement of these
employer contributions.

(3)
$223,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for the gender and justice commission.

(4)
$308,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for the minority and justice commission.

(5)
$278,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$285,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $263,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation are
provided solely for the workload associated with tax warrants and other state
cases filed in Thurston county.

(6)
$200,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for a unified family court pilot program. Of this amount, $150,000 is
provided for the costs of establishing the program and $50,000 is provided for
costs associated with evaluating the efficacy of the program. The pilot
program grant is limited to the 1999-01 biennium. After this time, it is
assumed that funding for continuation of the unified family court or expansion
to other counties would be provided by local jurisdictions based on the results
of the evaluation of the program.

(7)
$130,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $130,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
are provided solely for the new judicial positions authorized by Engrossed
Senate Bill No. 5036 (superior court judges).

(8)
$91,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for the office of the administrator for the courts to convene a task
force to review issues related to death penalty cases. The issues to be
addressed in the review include, but are to limited to, the following: The
adequacy of the counsel and resources provided defendants in capitol offense cases;
the uniformity of decision-making by prosecuting attorneys in terms of charging
defendants with aggravated first degree murder and the criteria in such
decisions; the impact of race, ethnicity, gender, and economic status on the
likelihood of a defendant being charged with aggravated first degree murder;
and whether there are revisions to existing statutes and court rules which, if
implemented, would decrease the likelihood of an inappropriate imposition of
the death penalty.

(9)
$750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided solely to increase the number of children served by court-appointed
special advocates in dependency matters. The office of the administrator for
the courts, after consulting with the Washington association of juvenile court
administrators and the Washington association of court-appointed special
advocate/guardian ad litem programs, shall distribute the funds to volunteer
court-appointed special advocate/guardian ad litem programs. The distribution
of funding shall be based on the number of children who need volunteer
court-appointed special advocate representation and shall be equally accessible
to all volunteer court-appointed special advocate/guardian ad litem programs.
The administrator for the courts shall not retain more than six percent of
total funding to cover administrative or any other agency costs.

(10)
Amounts provided in this section are sufficient to implement Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5074 (mail theft).

Sec.
107. 1999
c 309 s 113 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE OFFICE
OF PUBLIC DEFENSE

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((12,440,000))

12,490,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$558,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely to increase the reimbursement for private attorneys providing
constitutionally mandated indigent defense in nondeath penalty cases.

(2)
$51,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of House Bill No. 1599 (court funding). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

(3)
$50,000 of the public safety and education account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House
Bill No. 2491 (DNA testing of offenders). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 2000, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4)
Amounts provided in this section include funding for investigative services in
death penalty personal restraint petitions.

Sec.
108. 1999
c 309 s 114 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE OFFICE
OF THE GOVERNOR

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 5,762,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((5,720,000))

5,723,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((674,000))

209,000

Water
Quality Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 700,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((12,856,000))

12,394,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$1,612,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$1,588,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
$700,000 of the water quality account appropriation, and $209,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action items PSAT-01
through PSAT-05.

(2)
(($465,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation and))
$200,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation ((are)) is
provided solely for the salmon recovery office to meet its responsibilities
for the state-wide salmon recovery strategy. ((Of this amount: (a)
$200,000 of)) The general fund‑-state appropriation is
provided for the operation of the independent science panel((; and (b)
$465,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided for the
salmon recovery office staff to support local salmon recovery planning efforts.
$232,500 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation in this subsection
may be expended in each fiscal year of the biennium only if the state receives
greater than $25,000,000 from the federal government for salmon recovery
activities in that fiscal year. Funds authorized for expenditure in fiscal
year 2000 may be expended in fiscal year 2001)).

(3)
$62,000 of the fiscal year 2000 general fund‑-state appropriation and
$63,000 of the fiscal year 2001 general fund‑-state appropriation are
provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5595 or
Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2079, establishing the salmon recovery
funding board in the office of the governor. If legislation establishing the
board is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

(4)
$3,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5408 (state medal of valor).

Sec.
109. 1999
c 309 s 115 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE LIEUTENANT
GOVERNOR

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((333,000))

338,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((332,000))

348,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $ 160,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((825,000))

846,000

Sec.
110. 1999
c 309 s 116 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE PUBLIC
DISCLOSURE COMMISSION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((1,724,000))

1,947,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((1,496,000))

2,118,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((3,220,000))

4,065,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: $328,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2000 and $86,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5931 (electronic filing and public access). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided shall lapse.

Sec.
111. 1999
c 309 s 117 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SECRETARY
OF STATE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((14,063,000))

14,043,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((8,371,000))

8,399,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 120,000

Archives
and Records Management Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((5,401,000))

5,489,000

Archives
and Records Management Account‑-Private/

Local
Appropriation........................ $ ((2,581,000))

4,123,000

Department
of Personnel Service Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 681,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((31,217,000))

32,855,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$2,355,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's share of primary and
general election costs and the costs of conducting mandatory recounts on state
measures.

(2)
$3,780,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
is provided solely to reimburse counties for the state's share of presidential
preference primary election costs.

(3)
$2,106,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $2,663,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the verification of initiative and referendum
petitions, maintenance of related voter registration records, and the
publication and distribution of the voters and candidates pamphlet.

(4)
$125,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $125,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for legal advertising of state measures under RCW
29.27.072.

(5)(a)
$1,870,350 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,907,757 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for continuing the contract with a nonprofit
organization to produce gavel-to-gavel television coverage of state government
deliberations and other events of state-wide significance during the 1999-2001
biennium.

(b)
The funding level for each year of the contract shall be based on the amount
provided in this subsection and adjusted to reflect the implicit price deflator
for the previous year. The nonprofit organization shall be required to raise
contributions or commitments to make contributions, in cash or in kind, in an
amount equal to forty percent of the state contribution. The office of the
secretary of state may make full or partial payment once all criteria in (a)
and (b) of this subsection have been satisfactorily documented.

(c)
The nonprofit organization shall prepare an annual independent audit, an annual
financial statement, and an annual report, including benchmarks that measure
the success of the nonprofit organization in meeting the intent of the program.

(d)
No portion of any amounts disbursed pursuant to this subsection may be used,
directly or indirectly, for any of the following purposes:

(i)
Attempting to influence the passage or defeat of any legislation by the
legislature of the state of Washington, by any county, city, town, or other
political subdivision of the state of Washington, or by the congress, or the
adoption or rejection of any rule, standard, rate, or other legislative
enactment of any state agency;

(ii)
Making contributions reportable under chapter 42.17 RCW; or

(iii)
Providing any: (A) Gift; (B) honoraria; or (C) travel, lodging, meals, or
entertainment to a public officer or employee.

(6)
$867,000 of the archives and records management account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for operation of the central microfilming
bureau under RCW 40.14.020(8).

(7)
$120,000 of the general fund‑-private/local appropriation is provided
solely for the Washington quality awards council.

(8)
$20,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year ((2000))
2001 is provided solely for the operations of the task force on
archaeology and historic preservation. The task force shall develop a single
recommendation for consideration by the legislature and the governor on the
issue of the location of the office of archaeology and historic preservation
within state government. The recommended location shall maximize the office of
archaeology and historic preservation's stature, visibility, accessibility, and
delivery of service state-wide in the context of its critical role as an
important link among downtown and neighborhood revitalization efforts, the
cultural tourism movement, rural economic development initiatives, and the
preservation of the structures and sites that still remain as the legacy of
Washington's rich and diverse heritage. The task force shall consider and
include in its recommendation how best both to realize the potential of the
office of archaeology and historic preservation to generate revenue from
services it could provide in international, national, state, local, and private
venues and also how best to achieve adequate funding from all funding sources
to assure that the office of archaeology and historic preservation can provide
the best possible service to the citizens of the state. There shall be eleven
members of the task force as follows: One member shall be the state historic
preservation officer or his or her designee; two members shall be
representatives of state agencies; two members shall be representatives of
local governments; there shall be one representative each from the Washington
state historical society, the eastern Washington state historical society, the
Washington trust for historic preservation, and Indian tribes; and two members
shall be representatives of the private sector who have experience in
preservation of historic buildings or archaeological sites or who have
particular interest in the issue of preservation of historic buildings and
archaeological sites. The state historic preservation officer shall be the
chair of the task force. The task force shall report to appropriate committees
of the legislature and the governor by ((January 1)) December 31,
2000.

(9)
$8,000 of the fiscal year 2001 general fund‑-state appropriation is
provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5408 (state medal of valor).

Sec.
112. 1999
c 309 s 120 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE
TREASURER

State
Treasurer's Service Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((13,487,000))

14,244,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section includes funds for the purpose of continuing
to operate the linked deposit program under RCW 43.63A.690 and 43.86A.060, and
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5243, through June 30, 2001, pursuant to the
authority of the state treasurer under RCW 43.131.090 as amended by Substitute
House Bill No. 2441.

(2)
$757,000 is provided solely for the management of state debt and to contract
for a review of the state treasurer's debt management program's compliance with
the federal internal revenue code. The state finance committee shall define
the scope of the compliance review and oversee the contract.

Sec.
113. 1999
c 309 s 123 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE CITIZENS'
COMMISSION ON SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((32,000))

67,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((118,000))

128,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((150,000))

195,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and are sufficient for the commission to: (1) Carry out
statutorily required public hearings; (2) enter into an agreement with the
department of personnel to provide data sharing, research support, and training
for commission members and staff; (3) employ part-time staff in fiscal year
2000 to respond to requests for information; and (4) begin full-time staffing
in September 2000 to allow for orientation and training for commission members
prior to the next salary setting cycle. ((The commission shall work with
the department of general administration to reduce its operating costs by
colocating with another state agency, and shall report back to the fiscal
committees of the legislature by December 15, 1999.)) $4,000 of the
general fund--state appropriation is provided solely for lease costs prior to
June 30, 2001. Funding for lease costs will end no later than August 31, 2001,
except for any funding necessary to reimburse a state agency with which the
commission is colocated. The agency shall not renew its current lease and
shall colocate with another agency by September 1, 2001.

Sec.
114. 1999
c 309 s 124 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((3,906,000))

4,079,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((3,889,000))

4,557,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((2,291,000))

2,526,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,338,000

New
Motor Vehicle Arbitration Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,109,000

Legal
Services Revolving Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((117,287,000))

118,530,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((129,820,000))

132,139,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The attorney general shall report each fiscal year on actual legal services
expenditures and actual attorney staffing levels for each agency receiving
legal services. The report shall be submitted to the office of financial
management and the fiscal committees of the senate and house of representatives
no later than ninety days after the end of each fiscal year.

(2)
The attorney general and the office of financial management shall modify the
attorney general billing system to meet the needs of user agencies for greater
predictability, timeliness, and explanation of how legal services are being
used by the agency. The attorney general shall provide the following
information each month to agencies receiving legal services: (a) The full-time
equivalent attorney services provided for the month; (b) the full-time
equivalent investigator services provided for the month; (c) the full-time
equivalent paralegal services provided for the month; and (d) direct legal
costs, such as filing and docket fees, charged to the agency for the month.

(3)
$154,000 of the fiscal year 2000 general fund‑-state appropriation and
$308,000 of the fiscal year 2001 general fund‑-state appropriation are
provided solely for the costs associated with the legal defense of Initiative Measure
No. 695.

(4)
$200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided solely for costs associated with enforcing state authority on taxation
of liquor with respect to Resolution T-022-00 adopted by the Confederated
Tribes and Bands of the Yakama Nation.

Sec.
115. 1999
c 309 s 125 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE CASELOAD
FORECAST COUNCIL

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((406,000))

431,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((404,000))

479,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((810,000))

910,000

Sec.
116. 1999
c 309 s 127 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((72,469,000))

73,462,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((71,387,000))

76,253,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((153,575,000))

171,275,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 6,918,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((8,793,000))

9,093,000

Public
Works Assistance Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,344,000

Building
Code Council Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((1,375,000))

1,325,000

Administrative
Contingency Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,776,000

Low-Income
Weatherization Assistance Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,289,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 6,051,000

Manufactured
Home Installation Training Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 252,000

Washington
Housing Trust Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,685,000

Public
Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 522,000

Film
and Video Promotion Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 40,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((333,436,000))

357,285,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
It is the intent of the legislature that the department of community, trade,
and economic development receive separate programmatic appropriations for the
community development program and the trade and economic development program
for fiscal year 2001 and thereafter.

(a)
$53,171,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided for the community development program.

(b)
$17,794,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided for the trade and economic development program.

(c)
$422,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided for administration of the department and shall be allocated to the
community development program and the trade and economic development program
subject to allotment approval by the office of financial management.

(d)
The remaining general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 and the
fiscal year 2001 allotments for all other budgeted funds within the department
of community, trade, and economic development shall be allocated to the
community development program and the trade and economic development program
subject to allotment approval by the office of financial management.

(2)
$2,962,500 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $3,602,500 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for a contract with the Washington technology center.
For work essential to the mission of the Washington technology center and
conducted in partnership with universities, the center shall not pay any
increased indirect rate nor increases in other indirect charges above the
absolute amount paid during the 1995-97 biennium.

(((2)))
(3) $61,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2000 and $62,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2001 are provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work
plan and agency action item DCTED-01.

(((3)))
(4) $11,893,320 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is
provided solely for the drug control and system improvement formula grant
program, to be distributed in state fiscal year 2000 as follows:

(a)
$3,603,250 to local units of government to continue multijurisdictional
narcotics task forces;

(b)
$620,000 to the department to continue the drug prosecution assistance program
in support of multijurisdictional narcotics task forces;

(c)
$1,552,800 to the Washington state patrol for coordination, investigative, and
supervisory support to the multijurisdictional narcotics task forces and for
methamphetamine education and response;

(d)
$240,000 to the department for grants to support tribal law enforcement needs;

(e)
$991,000 to the department of social and health services, division of alcohol
and substance abuse, for drug courts in eastern and western Washington for the
implementation of sections 7 through 10 of Engrossed Second Substitute House
Bill No. 1006 (drug offender sentencing);

(f)
$312,551 to the department for training and technical assistance of public
defenders representing clients with special needs;

(g)
$200,000 to the department to continue a substance-abuse treatment in jails
program, to test the effect of treatment on future criminal behavior;

(h)
$667,075 to the department to continue domestic violence legal advocacy;

(i)
$903,000 to the department of social and health services, juvenile
rehabilitation administration, to continue youth violence prevention and
intervention projects;

(j)
$91,000 to the department to continue the governor's council on substance
abuse;

(k)
$99,000 to the department to continue evaluation of Byrne formula grant
programs;

(l)
$1,519,244 to the office of financial management for criminal history records
improvement;

(m)
$804,400 to the department for required grant administration, monitoring, and
reporting on Byrne formula grant programs;

(n)
$290,000 to the Washington state patrol solely for costs associated with the
supervision, coordination, and reimbursement for local law enforcement
officers' participation in the task force on missing and exploited children
established by Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5108 (missing/exploited
children). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

These
amounts represent the maximum Byrne grant expenditure authority for each
program. No program may expend Byrne grant funds in excess of the amounts
provided in this subsection. If moneys in excess of those appropriated in this
subsection become available, whether from prior or current fiscal year Byrne
grant distributions, the department shall hold these moneys in reserve and may
not expend them without specific appropriation. These moneys shall be carried
forward and applied to the pool of moneys available for appropriation for
programs and projects in the succeeding fiscal year. As part of its budget
request for the succeeding year, the department shall estimate and request
authority to spend any funds remaining in reserve as a result of this
subsection.

(((4)))
(5) $11,120,816 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided
solely for the drug control and system improvement formula grant program, to be
distributed in state fiscal year 2001 as follows:

(a)
$3,603,250 to local units of government to continue multijurisdictional
narcotics task forces;

(b)
$620,000 to the department to continue the drug prosecution assistance program
in support of multijurisdictional narcotics task forces;

(c)
$1,363,000 to the Washington state patrol for coordination, investigative, and
supervisory support to the multijurisdictional narcotics task forces and for
methamphetamine education and response;

(d)
$240,000 to the department for grants to support tribal law enforcement needs;

(e)
$991,000 to the department of social and health services, division of alcohol
and substance abuse, for drug courts in eastern and western Washington;

(f)
$302,551 to the department for training and technical assistance of public
defenders representing clients with special needs;

(g)
$200,000 to the department to continue a substance-abuse treatment in jails
program, to test the effect of treatment on future criminal behavior;

(h)
$667,094 to the department to continue domestic violence legal advocacy;

(i)
$903,000 to the department of social and health services, juvenile
rehabilitation administration, to continue youth violence prevention and
intervention projects;

(j)
$90,000 to the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to complete
the state and local components of the national incident based reporting system;

(k)
$30,000 to the department to expand integrated domestic violence training of
law enforcement, prosecutors, and domestic violence advocates;

(l)
$17,559 to the department to initiate the planning for a state-wide drug and
violent crime threat assessment to be conducted in conjunction with the
Northwest high intensity drug trafficking area and the department of social and
health services, division of alcohol and substance abuse;

(m)
$91,000 to the department to continue the governor's council on substance
abuse;

(n)
$99,000 to the department to continue evaluation of Byrne formula grant
programs;

(o)
$1,014,419 to the office of financial management for criminal history records
improvement; and

(p)
$825,100 to the department for required grant administration, monitoring, and
reporting on Byrne formula grant programs.

(q)
$45,000 to the department to expand the number of prosecutors participating in
the drug prosecution assistance program in support of multijurisdictional
narcotics task forces;

(r)
$18,862 to the department to develop a domestic violence legal advocacy process
and training manual;

These
amounts represent the maximum Byrne grant expenditure authority for each
program. No program may expend Byrne grant funds in excess of the amounts
provided in this subsection. If moneys in excess of those appropriated in this
subsection become available, whether from prior or current fiscal year Byrne
grant distributions, the department shall hold these moneys in reserve and may
not expend them without specific appropriation. These moneys shall be carried
forward and applied to the pool of moneys available for appropriation for
programs and projects in the succeeding fiscal year. As part of its budget
request for the succeeding year, the department shall estimate and request
authority to spend any funds remaining in reserve as a result of this
subsection.

(6)
$500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the tourism office to increase rural tourism
development, consumer marketing, and international marketing.

(((5)))
(7) $500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2000 and $500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for a grant program to help communities
design and carry out rural economic development projects.

(((6)))
(8) $1,250,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2000, and $1,250,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for grants to operate, repair, and staff
shelters for homeless families with children.

(((7)))
(9) $2,500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2000 and $2,500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for grants to operate transitional housing
for homeless families with children. The grants may also be used to make
partial payments for rental assistance.

(((8)))
(10) $1,250,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2000 and $1,250,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation
for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for consolidated emergency assistance
to homeless families with children.

(((9)))
(11) $50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2000 is provided solely to develop a plan for a system for collecting
reliable and accurate data on homeless persons. The plan shall provide at
least two approaches based on a range of possible budgets. The plan shall be
provided to the governor's office and the legislative fiscal committees no
later than November 1, 1999.

(((10)))
(12) $50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2000 and $50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2001 are provided to the department solely for providing technical
assistance to developers of housing for farmworkers.

(((11)))
(13) $160,000 of the public works assistance account appropriation is
solely for providing technical assistance to local communities that are
developing the infrastructure needed to support the development of housing for
farmworkers.

(((12)))
(14) $205,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2000 and $205,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for grants to Washington Columbia river
gorge counties to implement their responsibilities under the national scenic
area management plan. Of this amount, $390,000 is provided for Skamania
county, and $20,000 is provided for Clark county.

(((13)))
(15) $500,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2000
appropriation and $500,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2001
appropriation are provided solely for grants to Grays Harbor county as lead
agency to support local coastal erosion activities and partnership with state
and federal agencies in the southwest Washington coastal erosion study.

(((14)))
(16) $1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2000 and $1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation
for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for grants to food banks and food
distribution centers. At least $65,000 of the amount provided in each fiscal
year shall be utilized for a contract with a food distribution program for
communities in the southwestern portion of the state and for workers impacted
by timber and salmon fishing closures and reductions. The department may not
charge administrative overhead or expenses to the funds provided in this
subsection.

(((15)))
(17) $50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2000 and $50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2001 are provided solely for the establishment of state trade office
activity in South Korea.

(((16)))
(18) $698,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2000, $698,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2001, and $1,101,000 of the administrative contingency account
appropriation are provided solely for contracting with associate development
organizations.

(((17)
$220,000)) (19) $185,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and (($90,000)) $409,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5693 (developmental
disabilities endowment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((18)))
(20) $970,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2000 is provided solely as a grant to the Washington council on
international trade as partial support for the 1999 world trade organization
meeting.

(((19)))
(21) $500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2000 is provided solely for a grant to Pierce county to construct a joint
state/county recreation facility on state property in the South Hill area near
Puyallup. The grant provided in this subsection is contingent upon an
agreement that the county will assume full maintenance and operation of the
facility.

(((20)))
(22) $22,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2000 and $22,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the department's role in implementing Engrossed
Second Substitute House Bill No. 1493 (homeless children and families). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

(((21)))
(23) $250,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2000 is provided solely to support the spirit 2000 millennium celebration
project.

(((22)))
(24) $20,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2000 is provided solely to assist the Tri-Cities cultural arts center to
develop a plan to bring the arts to eastern Washington.

(((23)))
(25) $125,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2000 and $125,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2001 are provided solely to increase the number of trained
volunteer long-term care ombudsmen available to serve elderly or disabled
residents living in licensed boarding homes and adult family homes.

(((24)))
(26) $150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2000 is provided solely as a grant to preserve the Mukai farm and garden.

(((25)))
(27) $21,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2000 is provided solely as a matching grant to support the Washington
state senior games. State funding shall be matched with at least an equal
amount of private or local government funds.

(((26)))
(28) $500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2000 ((and $500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2001 are)) is provided solely to increase the number of
children served by a court-appointed special volunteer advocate guardian ad
litem in dependency proceedings. The funds shall be distributed by the
department to local and state court-appointed special advocate programs based
on the number of children without volunteer court-appointed special advocate
representation. $200,000 of the general fund--state fiscal year 2001
appropriation is provided solely to contract with a private nonprofit
corporation to provide state-wide technical support, development, and
enhancement of court-appointed special advocate programs.

(((27)))
(29) $1,125,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2000 and $1,125,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation
for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for King county for the purpose of
local public health. The amounts in this subsection shall be deposited into
the county public health account.

(((28)))
(30) $1,157,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2000 and (($1,723,000)) $2,148,000 of the general
fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for
the Spokane intercollegiate research and technology institute.

(31)
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided solely as pass-through funding to currently licensed overnight youth
shelters.

(32)
$4,000,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided solely for the reimbursement of the implementation costs of Senate
Joint Resolution No. 8212 (property tax credit). Allowable expenses for
reimbursement include printing, mailing and mailing supplies, costs associated
with temporary employees, computer programming, and report costs. The
department shall confer with the Washington association of county officials and
the Washington state association of counties in developing standardized
allowable reimbursements within the available appropriation for groups of
counties according to population.

(33)
$25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided solely for the department of community, trade, and economic
development to provide administrative and professional support, including the
hiring of an independent facilitator, to a joint legislative task force charged
with reviewing current energy siting statutes and reporting its recommendations
to the legislature and the governor by December 1, 2000. The task force, which
shall consist of eight voting legislative members and eight nonvoting members
representing interested stakeholder groups, shall review and make
recommendations regarding the following issues: (a) Jurisdiction and
membership of the state siting authority; (b) its procedures; (c) the scope of
preemption of proprietary and regulatory functions of local governments and
other state agencies; (d) local government participation; (e) the standards and
processes for determining the need for proposed projects; (f) the role of a
counsel for the environment; (g) funding and related costs of participating in
the state siting process; (h) monitoring and oversight of certified facilities;
and (i) the siting of facilities on public lands.

(34)
$112,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided solely for the office of archeology and historic preservation. The
office is to remain in current leased space pending the results of the study
regarding the future organizational status of the office.

(35)
$75,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided solely as a grant to the Southwest Seattle Historical Society for
support of the loghouse museum.

(36)
$50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided solely for pilot projects that provide voice mail services to homeless
families and individuals for the purposes of employment and housing searches.

(37)
$953,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 is
provided solely for deposit into the state building construction account for
the purpose of expanding grants to currently approved and prioritized projects
in the community services facilities grant program.

(38)
$250,000 of the general fund‑‑state fiscal year 2001 appropriation
is provided to support development of a proposal to site a spaceport facility
in the Moses Lake area for the Lockheed Martin venture star project. In the
event that Lockheed Martin does not proceed with a request-for-proposal process
for the venture star project, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(39)
$5,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 is provided solely for the Washington state millennium project as
designated by the national endowment for the arts.

(40)
$62,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 2460 (community
empowerment zones). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2000, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(41)
$50,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 is provided solely to implement an industry cluster-based approach to
economic development as outlined in Substitute Senate Bill No. 6618.

(42)
$10,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 is provided solely to support an economic development advisory group
appointed by the lieutenant governor. The purpose of the advisory group is to
assist the legislative committee on economic development in creating a
state-wide strategic plan for economic development. The advisory group shall
consist of no more than twelve members and shall be comprised of
representatives of business, labor, and other interests.

(43)
The department shall, within existing resources, provide program development
and service delivery to the eastern region of the state.

Sec.
117. 1999
c 309 s 129 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE OFFICE
OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((12,791,000))

12,781,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((11,855,000))

13,164,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 23,340,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 500,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((48,486,000))

49,785,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 is
provided solely to evaluate and promote the use by state and local agencies of
the training facilities at the Hanford reservation.

(2)
Funding in this section provides for a feasibility study to collect Washington
enrollment data on distance learning programs sponsored by in-state and
out-of-state private institutions in cooperation with the higher education
coordinating board and the state board for community and technical colleges.
Findings shall be submitted to the appropriate committees of the legislature by
January 2000.

(3)
$75,000 of the fiscal year 2000 general fund‑-state appropriation and
$75,000 of the fiscal year 2001 general fund‑-state appropriation are
provided solely to track and administer state and federal funding for salmon
recovery allocated by the salmon recovery funding board established under
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5595 or Engrossed Substitute House Bill No.
2079.

(4)
The office of financial management, in collaboration with the institutions of
higher education, the higher education coordinating board, and the state board
for community and technical colleges, shall modify state information systems in
order to provide consistent data on students engaged in distance learning. Higher
education institutions shall provide enrollment information in support of this
effort. Reporting on the numbers and categories of students enrolled in
distance learning by class level and institutions shall begin by fall term,
2000. Washington independent institutions of higher education are encouraged
to participate in this process and to provide distance learner enrollment data.

(5)
$1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation and $500,000 of the
general fund‑-private/local appropriation are provided solely for the
commission on early learning. One-half of the amount provided from the general
fund‑-state shall not be expended unless matched by an equal amount from
private sources.

(6)
$1,069,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely
for information systems improvements at the department of fish and wildlife,
including a network upgrade, purchase of personal computers, and support for
agency information systems.

(7)
$795,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation is provided
solely for improvements in the basic business practices at the department of
fish and wildlife, including budget monitoring, cost accounting, time
accounting and payroll systems, and license revenue forecasting.

(8)
$75,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided solely for the task force on health care reinsurance established by
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6067 (health insurance coverage). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 2000, the amount provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

(9)
$285,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided solely for the office of financial management to adopt and publish
uniform guidelines for the effective and efficient management of personal
service contracts and client service contracts by all state agencies, conduct
training on these guidelines for agency personnel, and conduct risk-based
audits of personal service and client service contracts.

(a)
The guidelines shall, at a minimum, include: (i) Accounting methods, systems,
measures, and principles to be used by agencies and contractors; (ii)
precontract procedures for selecting potential contractors based on their
qualifications and ability to perform; (iii) incorporation of performance
measures and measurable benchmarks in contracts, and the use of performance
audits; (iv) uniform contract terms to ensure contract performance and
compliance with state and federal standards; (v) proper payment and
reimbursement methods to ensure that the state receives full value for taxpayer
moneys, including cost settlements and cost allowance; (vi) post-contract
procedures, including methods for recovering improperly spent or overspent
moneys for disallowance and adjustment; (vii) adequate contract remedies and
sanctions to ensure compliance; (viii) monitoring, fund tracking, risk
assessment, and auditing procedures and requirements; (ix) financial reporting,
record retention, and record access procedures and requirements; (x) procedures
and criteria for terminating contracts for cause or otherwise; and (xi) other
subjects related to effective and efficient contract management.

(b)
The office of financial management shall provide a training course for agency
personnel responsible for executing and managing personal service contracts and
client service contracts. The course must contain training on effective and
efficient contract management under the guidelines established under this
subsection.

(c)
The office of financial management shall conduct risk-based audits of the
contracting practices associated with individual personal service and client
service contracts from multiple state agencies to ensure compliance with the
guidelines established in this subsection. The office of financial management
shall forward the results of the audits conducted under this subsection to the
governor, the appropriate standing committees of the legislature, and the joint
legislative audit and review committee.

(10)
$329,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 is provided solely to develop a centralized database of social service
contract information as recommended by the task force on agency contracting
services.

Sec.
118. 1999
c 309 s 131 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF PERSONNEL

Department
of Personnel Service Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 16,999,000

Higher
Education Personnel Services Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,640,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 18,639,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The department shall reduce its charge for personnel services to the lowest
rate possible.

(2)
The department of personnel service account appropriation contains sufficient
funds to continue the employee exchange program with the Hyogo prefecture in Japan.

(3)
$515,000 of the department of personnel service account appropriation is
provided solely for the development and implementation of a new employment
application processing system to: Provide for electronic applications via the
internet, provide continuous application acceptance, provide increased public
access to job openings, allow for single applications for multiple jobs, and
provide for scanning of larger applicant databases as job openings arise.

(4)
$190,000 of the department of personnel service account appropriation is
provided solely for the expansion of the executive fellowship program.

(5)
$108,000 of the department of personnel service account appropriation is
provided solely for increased funding of the administrative expenses of the
combined fund drive.

(6)
$52,000 of the department of personnel service account appropriation is
provided solely to implement House Bill No. 5432 (retiree charitable
deductions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided
in this subsection shall lapse.

(7)
The department of personnel has the authority to charge agencies for expenses
associated with converting its payroll/personnel computer system to accommodate
the year 2000 date change. Funding to cover these expenses shall be realized
from the agency FICA savings associated with the pretax benefits contributions
plan.

(8)
The department shall prepare a plan, in cooperation with the citizens'
commission on salaries for elected officials, for providing office space for
the commission in a department office building pursuant to an interagency
agreement. The plan: (a) Shall provide for a separate, secured office for the
2001-03 biennium; (b) may provide for support services upon the mutual
agreement of the department and commission; and (c) shall reflect both the
commission's independent status and the need to provide for the most
cost-effective structure for commission operations. The plan shall be
submitted to the office of financial management and the appropriate fiscal committees
of the house of representatives and senate by November 1, 2000.

Sec.
119. 1999
c 309 s 136 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS‑-OPERATIONS

Dependent
Care Administrative Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 361,000

Department
of Retirement Systems Expense Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((41,182,000))

45,187,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((41,543,000))

45,548,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$92,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account appropriation
is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5030 (Washington
state patrol surviving spouse retirement). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 1999, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2)
$259,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account appropriation
is provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1024 (retirement
system option). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3)
$55,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account appropriation
is provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 6012 (investment
board fund values). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4)
$22,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account appropriation
is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5432 (PERS retiree charitable
deductions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided
in this subsection shall lapse.

(5)
$50,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account appropriation
is provided solely for the department to prepare and distribute to state employees
information about options under the federal tax code for tax-advantaged
retirement savings.

(6)
$3,731,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely for the information systems project known as
the electronic document image management system. Authority to expend this
amount is conditioned on compliance with section 902 of this act.

(7)
The department shall adjust the retirement systems administrative rate during
the 1999-2001 biennium as necessary to provide for law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' retirement system employer funding for a study of LEOFF plan
1 medical liabilities by the office of the state actuary.

(8)
$480,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account appropriation
is provided solely for increased charges for services provided by the
department of information systems. The two departments shall submit a report
on the causes of the increased charges to the office of financial management no
later than July 1, 2000.

(9)
$2,749,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely to implement Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6530 (creation of PERS plan 3). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2000, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10)
$1,002,000 of the department of retirement systems expense account
appropriation is provided solely to implement the following legislation:

(a)
$293,000 for Substitute House Bill No. 2604 (survivor beneficiary options);

(b)
$709,000 for Senate Bill No. 6829 (optional SERS 3).

Sec.
120. 1999
c 309 s 137 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE
INVESTMENT BOARD

State
Investment Board Expense Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((10,519,000))

11,137,000

Sec.
121. 1999
c 309 s 140 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE MUNICIPAL
RESEARCH COUNCIL

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 1,766,000

((General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)... $........................................... 1,822,000))

County
Research Services Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 681,000

City
and Towns Research Account‑‑State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,692,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((4,269,000))

4,139,000

Sec.
122. 1999
c 309 s 142 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 279,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((279,000))

622,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 2,116,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 417,000

State
Capitol Vehicle Parking Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 92,000

Air
Pollution Control Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((379,000))

95,000

General
Administration Services Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((43,976,000))

46,003,000

Energy
Efficiency Services Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((199,000))

431,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((47,645,000))

50,055,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The department shall develop an allocation method for tort defense costs with
the office of the attorney general and selected agency representatives. A
report shall be submitted to the office of financial management and the fiscal
committees of the house of representatives and the senate by June 30, 2000, on
how the agencies will be billed for their tort defense services from the
liability account. If Substitute House Bill No. 2111 (consolidates tort
activities) is not enacted by June 30, 1999, this subsection shall lapse.

(2)
$92,000 of the state capitol vehicle parking account‑-state appropriation
and $27,000 of the general administration services account‑-state
appropriation are provided solely for the continued operation of the state-wide
commute trip reduction program.

(3)
$342,000 of the fiscal year 2001 general fund‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for the costs of the state capitol tour program.

Sec.
123. 1999
c 309 s 143 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF INFORMATION SERVICES

Data
Processing Revolving Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,605,000

K-20
Technology Account‑-State Appropriation... $ ((7,400,000))

4,040,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((11,005,000))

7,645,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: (($7,400,000)) $4,040,000 of the K-20 technology
account appropriation is provided solely for the completion of the K-20 network
development plan through phase 2.

Sec.
124. 1999
c 309 s 144 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE INSURANCE
COMMISSIONER

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $ 304,000

Insurance
Commissioners Regulatory Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((24,738,000))

25,684,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((25,042,000))

25,988,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$500,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account appropriation is
provided solely for funding agreements with insurance companies, to counsel
policyholders and administer the liquidation of insurance companies.

(2)
$730,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account appropriation is
provided solely for performing market conduct exams on life and annuity
policies.

(3)
$306,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account appropriation is
provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5509 (Holocaust
insurance enforcement). Expenditures from this amount shall not exceed
regulatory revenues received under the bill. If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(4)
$318,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account appropriation is
provided solely to fund compensation adjustments for insurance examiners. The
compensation adjustments are contingent upon review and approval by the
personnel resources board pursuant to RCW 41.06.152(1)(a), and upon approval by
the office of financial management that the annual cost of the increases
proposed for approval do not exceed $318,000. Increases shall be effective
July 1, 2000.

(5)
$167,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account appropriation is
provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6199 (patient
bill of rights). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2000, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6)
$181,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account appropriation is
provided solely to implement section 1 of Engrossed Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6067 (individual health insurance coverage). If section 1 of
Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6067 is not enacted by June 30,
2000, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7)
$139,000 of the insurance commissioner's regulatory account appropriation is
provided solely to implement Engrossed Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6067
(individual health insurance coverage). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2000, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec.
125. 1999
c 309 s 145 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE BOARD
OF ACCOUNTANCY

Certified
Public Accountants' Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((1,119,000))

1,254,000

Sec.
126. 1999
c 309 s 148 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE LIQUOR
CONTROL BOARD

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 1,293,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 1,284,000

Liquor
Control Board Construction and Maintenance

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ ((8,013,000))

9,998,000

Liquor
Revolving Account‑-State Appropriation... $........................................... ((129,361,000))

129,414,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((139,951,000))

141,989,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$2,804,000 of the liquor revolving account appropriation is provided solely for
the agency information technology upgrade. This amount provided in this
subsection is conditioned upon satisfying the requirements of section 902 of
this act.

(2)
$105,000 of the liquor revolving account appropriation is provided solely for
the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5712 (motel liquor
licenses). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

(3)
$300,000 of the liquor revolving account appropriation is provided solely for
the board to develop a business plan. The board shall provide copies of the
plan to the office of financial management and the fiscal committees of the
legislature by September 30, 1999.

(4)
$1,985,000 of the liquor control board construction and maintenance account
appropriation is provided solely for the operation of the temporary
distribution center.

(5)
$53,000 of the liquor revolving account appropriation is provided solely to
train new enforcement agents. The criminal justice training commission shall
establish a training curriculum that is appropriate for liquor enforcement
officers. Nothing in this subsection makes liquor officers eligible for
membership in the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement
systems.

Sec.
127. 1999
c 309 s 149 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE UTILITIES
AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 368,000

Public
Service Revolving Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 25,966,000

Public
Service Revolving Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 652,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((26,618,000))

26,986,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$48,000 of the public service revolving account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for a study of costs incurred by electric, natural gas,
telecommunications, and water utilities and railroads, except railroads owned
and operated by the state and municipal corporations, for the placement of new
and existing utilities facilities within railroad rights-of-way. The
commission shall: (1) Identify all expenses that are directly incurred by
railroads to permit the safe construction and maintenance of utility facilities
within the railroad right-of-way, including costs related to administering the
issuance of a permit, inspecting construction, and flagging construction for
safety; (2) identify any extraordinary expenses which may be incurred by
utilities and railroads as a result of utility facilities being located within
the railroad right-of-way, including costs related to emergency response; (3)
examine the amount and scope of insurance that may be necessary for utilities
and railroads to cover risks associated with railroad property and utility
facilities located within the railroad right-of-way; (4) compare and analyze
different methods used or that could be used, for the purposes of determining
compensation paid by utilities, to value railroad right-of-way property on
which utility facilities are located; (5) compare and analyze how terms,
conditions, and fees imposed by railroads upon utilities for placing utility
facilities within the railroad right-of-way have changed over time; and (6)
make any recommendations it deems pertinent based upon its findings. The
commission shall consult with the chairs and ranking minority members of the
senate energy, technology, and telecommunications committee and the house or
representatives technology, telecommunications, and energy committee throughout
the course of study and shall submit its report to the legislature and the
governor by December 1, 1999.

(2)
$368,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 6441 or House Bill No. 2420
(pipeline safety). If neither bill is enacted by June 30, 2000, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec.
128. 1999
c 309 s 151 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE MILITARY
DEPARTMENT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((18,568,000))

11,773,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((8,264,000))

8,344,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 22,148,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 238,000

Enhanced
911 Account‑-State Appropriation...... $ ((16,491,000))

19,507,000

Disaster
Response Account‑-State Appropriation. $ ((18,970,000))

11,041,000

Disaster
Response Account‑-Federal Appropriation $ ((94,733,000))

51,589,000

Worker
and Community Right to Know Fund‑‑State

Appropriation.............................. $ 285,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((179,697,000))

124,925,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
(($10,174,000)) $3,354,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2000 is provided solely for deposit in the
disaster response account to cover costs pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section.

(2)
(($18,970,000)) $10,716,000 of the disaster response account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for the state share of response and recovery
costs associated with federal emergency management agency (FEMA) disaster 1079
(November/December 1995 storms), FEMA disaster 1100 (February 1996 floods),
FEMA disaster 1152 (November 1996 ice storm), FEMA disaster 1159 (December 1996
holiday storm), FEMA disaster 1172 (March 1997 floods), FEMA disaster 1252
(1998 northeast counties floods), and FEMA disaster 1255 (Kelso landslide). The
military department may, upon approval of the director of the office of
financial management, use portions of the disaster response account‑-state
appropriation to offset costs of new disasters occurring before June 30, 2001.
The military department is to submit a report quarterly to the office of
financial management and the fiscal committees of the house of representatives
and senate detailing disaster costs, including: (a) Estimates of total costs;
(b) incremental changes from the previous estimate; (c) actual expenditures;
(d) estimates of total remaining costs to be paid; and (d) estimates of future
payments by biennium. This information is to be displayed by individual
disaster, by fund, and by type of assistance.

(3)
(($75,000)) $100,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year
2000 appropriation and (($75,000)) $100,000 of the general fund‑-state
fiscal year 2001 appropriation are provided solely for implementation of the
conditional scholarship program pursuant to chapter 28B.103 RCW.

(4)
$35,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2000 appropriation and
$35,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2001 appropriation are
provided solely for the north county emergency medical service.

(5)
$325,000 of the disaster response account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for the costs of activating the national guard during the world
trade organization conference in Seattle.

Sec.
129. 1999
c 309 s 154 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE
CONVENTION AND TRADE CENTER

State
Convention and Trade Center Operating

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 29,963,000

State
Convention and Trade Center Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,471,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION............. $ 32,434,000

Sec.
130. 1999
c 379 s 947 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE MILITARY
DEPARTMENT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ ((3,000,000))

2,000,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 1,000,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation.................. $ 474,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 3,474,000

The appropriation in this section is provided for emergency
services readiness centers in Bremerton, Yakima, and Spokane. The
$2,000,000 general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 is
provided solely for the design and/or construction of the Bremerton and Spokane
readiness centers. The $1,000,000 general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2001 and the $474,000 general fund‑-federal appropriation are
provided solely for the design and/or construction of the Yakima armory.

(End of part)

PART
II

HUMAN
SERVICES

Sec.
201. 1999
c 309 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES. (1) Appropriations made in
this act to the department of social and health services shall initially be
allotted as required by this act. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not
include transfers of moneys between sections of this act except as expressly
provided in this act, nor shall allotment modifications permit moneys that are
provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that purpose,
except as expressly provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(2)
The department of social and health services shall not initiate any services
that will require expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly
authorized in this act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and
spend, under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in
this act as long as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state
moneys for the program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the
department receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys
shall be spent for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation
providing appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state
general fund moneys shall lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this
subsection, the office of financial management shall notify the legislative
fiscal committees. As used in this subsection, "unrestricted federal
moneys" includes block grants and other funds that federal law does not
require to be spent on specifically defined projects or matched on a formula
basis by state funds.

(3)(a)
The appropriations to the department of social and health services in this act
shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified herein. However,
after May 1, 2000, unless specifically prohibited by this act, the department
may transfer general fund‑‑state appropriations for fiscal year
2000 among programs after approval by the director of financial management.
However, the department shall not transfer state moneys that are provided
solely for a specified purpose except as expressly provided in subsection
(3)(b) of this section.

(b)
To the extent that transfers under subsection (3)(a) of this section are
insufficient to fund actual expenditures in excess of fiscal year 2000 caseload
forecasts and utilization assumptions in the medical assistance, long‑term
care, foster care, adoption support, voluntary placement, and child support
programs, the department may transfer state moneys that are provided solely for
a specified purpose after approval by the director of financial management.

(c)
For the sole purpose of ensuring adequate state matching funds for the federal
welfare-to-work grant, the department may transfer sufficient amounts of
general fund--federal appropriations and general fund--state appropriations
between sections 202 and 208 of this act.

(d)
The director of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal
committees of the senate and house of representatives in writing prior to
approving any allotment modifications.

Sec.
202. 1999
c 309 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-CHILDREN
AND FAMILY SERVICES PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((207,273,000))

196,980,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((223,208,000))

214,108,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((337,357,000))

355,205,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 400,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 4,194,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 1,037,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((772,432,000))

771,924,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$594,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$1,964,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $195,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No.
5557 (the HOPE act) or sections 10 through 29 of Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 1493. If neither bill is enacted by June 30, 1999, the funds
shall be provided for:

(a)
The department to contract for 10 temporary residential placements, for up to
30 days, for youth by June 30, 2000, and for 29 temporary residential
placements for youth by June 30, 2001. These youth shall be sixteen to
eighteen years old who are dependents of the state, and who live outdoors or in
unsafe locations not intended for occupancy by a minor, and whose permanency
plan of care does not include return to home or family reunification. The
department shall contact the missing children's clearinghouse regarding these
youth. The department may approve placements for fourteen and fifteen-year
olds who also meet these criteria. Youth who receive these placements may
receive one or more of the following services: Educational services,
vocational training, job readiness assistance, job search assistance, chemical
dependency treatment, and counseling; and

(b)
For the department to contract for 10 residential placements for dependent youth
by June 30, 2000, and for 29 residential placements for youth by June 30,
2001. These youth shall be aged sixteen through eighteen who live outdoors or
in unsafe locations not intended for occupancy by a minor, and whose permanency
plan does not include return to home or family reunification. These placements
may be available to youth up to eighteen years of age. Youth who receive these
placements shall receive training related to one or more of the following:
Basic education, employment, money management and other skills that will assist
the youth in developing independent living skills.

(2)
(($2,745,000)) $2,191,000 of the fiscal year 2000 general fund‑-state
appropriation, (($2,745,000)) $2,191,000 of the fiscal year 2001
general fund‑-state appropriation, and (($1,944,000)) $1,540,000
of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for
the category of services titled "intensive family preservation
services." The reduction in funds assumed in this section are intended
to realign the appropriation with actual service levels and expenditures and is
not intended to reduce the current level of intensive family preservation
services across the state.

(3)
$670,925 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2000 appropriation and
$670,925 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2001 appropriation are
provided to contract for the operation of one pediatric interim care facility.
The facility shall provide residential care for up to thirteen children through
two years of age. Seventy-five percent of the children served by the facility
must be in need of special care as a result of substance abuse by their
mothers. The facility shall also provide on-site training to biological,
adoptive, or foster parents. The facility shall provide at least three months
of consultation and support to parents accepting placement of children from the
facility. The facility may recruit new and current foster and adoptive parents
for infants served by the facility. The department shall not require case management
as a condition of the contract.

(4)
$513,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2000 appropriation and
$513,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2001 appropriation are
provided for up to three nonfacility-based programs for the training, consultation,
support, and recruitment of biological, foster, and adoptive parents of
children through age three in need of special care as a result of substance
abuse by their mothers, except that each program may serve up to three
medically fragile nonsubstance-abuse-affected children. In selecting
nonfacility-based programs, preference shall be given to programs whose federal
or private funding sources have expired or that have successfully performed
under the existing pediatric interim care program.

(5)
(($3,440,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2000 and $3,441,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2001 are provided solely for distribution to county juvenile court
administrators to fund the costs of processing truancy, children in need of
services, and at-risk youth petitions. The department shall not retain any
portion of these funds to cover administrative or any other departmental
costs. The department, in conjunction with the juvenile court administrators,
shall develop an equitable funding distribution formula. The formula shall
neither reward counties with higher than average per petition processing costs
nor shall it penalize counties with lower than average per petition processing
costs.

(6)
Each quarter during the 1999-01 fiscal biennium, each county shall report the
number of petitions processed and the total costs of processing the petitions
in each of the following categories: Truancy, children in need of services,
and at-risk youth. Counties shall submit the reports to the department no
later than 45 days after the end of the quarter. The department shall forward
this information to the chair and ranking minority member of the house of
representatives appropriations committee and the senate ways and means
committee no later than 60 days after a quarter ends. These reports are deemed
informational in nature and are not for the purpose of distributing funds.)) $140,000
of the fiscal year 2001 state general fund appropriation is provided solely for
the department to establish and maintain a toll-free telephone number and an
electronic on-line system for communication of information regarding child
day-care centers and family day-care providers. This number shall be available
during standard business hours, and during nonbusiness hours callers shall be
able to leave messages. The number shall be published in reasonably available
printed and electronic media. The number shall be easily identifiable as a
method that callers may use to determine whether a day-care provider is
licensed, determine whether a day-care provider is in good standing regarding
licensing requirements, determine the general nature of enforcement actions
against the provider, obtain information on how to report suspected or observed
noncompliance with licensing requirements, obtain information on how to report
health, safety, and welfare concerns, receive follow-up assistance including
information on the office of the family and children's ombudsman, and receive
referral information on other agencies or entities that may be of further
assistance to the caller. Upon request, the department shall disclose the
receipt, general nature, current status and resolution of all complaints on
record with the department after the effective date of this section against a
child day-care center or family day-care provider that result in an enforcement
action. The department shall make available to the public during business
hours all inspection reports and notices of enforcement actions involving child
day-care centers and family day-care providers consistent with chapter 42.17
RCW. The department shall include in the inspection report a statement of the
corrective measures taken by the center or provider.

(((7)))
(6) $2,311,000 of the fiscal year 2000 general fund‑-state
appropriation, $2,370,000 of the fiscal year 2001 general fund‑-state
appropriation, and $4,182,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement
account appropriation are provided solely for the family policy council and
community public health and safety networks.

(((8)))
(7) $90,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2000, $91,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2001, and $64,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 1619 (foster parent
reimbursements). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((9)))
(8) $121,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2000, $101,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2001, and $80,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1668
(foster parent training). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((10)
$213,000)) (9) $307,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2000, (($93,000)) $258,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and (($78,000))
$137,000 of the general fund‑‑federal appropriation are
provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1692 or sections
1 through 7 of Senate Bill No. 5127 (child abuse investigations). If neither
of these bills is enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(10)
$348,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided solely
for the department to determine the character of persons who have unsupervised
access to children in care, including exempt child care providers defined in
RCW 74.15.020, through a conviction record and pending charges check at the
Washington state patrol, in order to authorize payment for care. If a check
through the Washington state patrol or the federal bureau of investigation has
been completed within the preceding year of the department's request, the
department may rely upon the previous check for persons who confirm no offenses
have been committed within the last year. Further, the appropriation is
provided to the department to implement a waiver process and administrative
hearing review process for exempt child care providers whose background check
may otherwise disqualify them. This subsection does not establish any
obligation, duty, or cause of action.

(11)
$1,037,000 of the public safety and education account is provided to contract
for a citizen awareness campaign regarding domestic violence, train service
providers in serving and advocating for domestic violence victims with disabilities,
monitor batterer treatment programs for compliance with certification
standards, fund domestic violence services to underserved populations, and
support the fatality review process.

(12)
$2,214,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
and $686,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for an increase in the combined adoption support and foster care
caseloads. Of the amounts provided in this subsection, $1,107,000 shall not be
expended if the total expenditures for these programs or per capita
expenditures for fiscal year 2000 or for the first quarter of fiscal year 2001
for any portion of these caseloads exceed the November 1999 expenditure
forecast and the department does not provide a detailed explanation of the
reasons for each overexpenditure by December 1, 2000, to the appropriate policy
and fiscal committees of the legislature.

(13)
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided solely for allocation, without deduction for administrative costs by
the department, to the educational institute for rural families to ensure
continued seasonal child care in region two of the department. These funds are
not intended to supplant the contracted rate of reimbursement or the total
reimbursement for the provision of seasonal child care by this provider.

(14)
The amounts provided in this section are sufficient to implement Engrossed
Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 6400 (domestic violence).

Sec.
203. 1999
c 309 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-JUVENILE
REHABILITATION PROGRAM

(1)
COMMUNITY SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((32,816,000))

31,679,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((34,094,000))

36,183,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((8,072,000))

9,732,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 380,000

Juvenile
Accountability Incentive Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ ((5,427,000))

6,548,000

Public
Safety and Education Account--State

Appropriation.............................. $ 10,700,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((21,034,000))

26,777,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((101,823,000))

121,999,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
$666,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation
is provided solely for deposit in the county criminal justice assistance
account for costs to the criminal justice system associated with the
implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions). The
amounts provided in this subsection are intended to provide funding for county
adult court costs associated with the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of
1997 and shall be distributed in accordance with RCW 82.14.310.

(b)
$5,742,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation
is provided solely for the implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997
(juvenile code revisions). The amounts provided in this subsection are
intended to provide funding for county impacts associated with the
implementation of chapter 338, Laws of 1997 and shall be distributed to
counties as prescribed in the current consolidated juvenile services (CJS)
formula.

(c)
$1,161,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$1,162,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
$5,000,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account
appropriation, and $177,000 of the juvenile accountability incentive account‑-federal
appropriation are provided solely to implement community juvenile
accountability grants pursuant to chapter 338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code
revisions). Funds provided in this subsection may be used solely for community
juvenile accountability grants, administration of the grants, and evaluations
of programs funded by the grants.

(d)
(($2,507,000)) $2,419,000 of the violence reduction and drug
enforcement account appropriation is provided solely to implement alcohol and
substance abuse treatment programs for locally committed offenders. The
juvenile rehabilitation administration shall award these moneys on a
competitive basis to counties that submitted a plan for the provision of
services approved by the division of alcohol and substance abuse. The juvenile
rehabilitation administration shall develop criteria for evaluation of plans
submitted and a timeline for awarding funding and shall assist counties in
creating and submitting plans for evaluation.

(e)
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for juvenile rehabilitation administration to contract
with the institute for public policy for responsibilities assigned in chapter
338, Laws of 1997 (juvenile code revisions).

(f)
The juvenile rehabilitation administration, in consultation with the juvenile
court administrators, may agree on a formula to allow the transfer of funds
among amounts appropriated for consolidated juvenile services, community
juvenile accountability act grants, the chemically dependent disposition
alternative, and the special sex offender disposition alternative.

(g)
$75,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 ((is))
and $100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for a contract for expanded services of the
teamchild project.

(h)
$75,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 is
provided solely for the Skagit county delinquency prevention project.

(i)
$350,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$735,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
$229,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation, and $673,000 of the
violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation are provided
solely to increase payment rates for contracted service providers. It is the
legislature's intent that these amounts be used primarily to increase
compensation for persons employed in direct, front‑line service delivery.

(j)
(($1,191,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2000, $1,191,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 and $356,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for parole services for lower risk youth.)) No later than January
1, 2001, the Washington state institute for public policy shall report to the
legislature on the outcomes of low and moderate risk juvenile rehabilitation
administration offenders who were released without supervision compared to
those who were released with supervision. The study shall compare both the
recidivism rates as well as the nature of any new criminal offenses each group
commits. The legislature shall consider the results of this study in making
any decision to continue or revise parole services for this group of offenders.

(k)
$16,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$16,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5214
(firearms on school property). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999,
the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse. The amounts provided in
this subsection are intended to provide funding for county impacts associated
with the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5214 and shall be
distributed to counties as prescribed in the current consolidated juvenile services
(CJS) formula.

(l)
$3,440,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $3,441,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for distribution to county juvenile court
administrators to fund the costs of processing truancy, children in need of
services, and at-risk youth petitions. The department shall not retain any
portion of these funds to cover administrative or any other departmental
costs. The department, in conjunction with the juvenile court administrators,
shall develop an equitable funding distribution formula. The formula shall
neither reward counties with higher than average per-petition processing costs
nor shall it penalize counties with lower than average per-petition processing
costs.

(m)
$6,000,000 of the public safety and education account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for distribution to county juvenile court
administrators to fund the costs of processing truancy, children in need of
services, and at-risk youth petitions. To the extent that distributions made
under (l) and (m) of this subsection and pursuant to section 801 of this act
exceed actual costs of processing truancy, children in need of services, and
at-risk youth petitions, the department, in consultation with the respective
juvenile court administrator and the county, may approve expenditure of funds
provided in this subsection on other costs of the civil or criminal justice
system. When this occurs, the department shall notify the office of financial
management and the legislative fiscal committees. The department shall not
retain any portion of these funds to cover administrative or any other
departmental costs. The department, in conjunction with the juvenile court
administrators, shall develop an equitable funding distribution formula. The
formula shall neither reward counties with higher than average per petition
processing costs nor shall it penalize counties with lower than average per
petition processing costs.

(n)
$4,700,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for distribution to counties pursuant to stipulation and agreed to order
of dismissal in case number 98-2-02458. The department shall not retain any
portion of these funds to cover administrative or any other departmental costs.

(o)
The distributions made under (l), (m), and (n) of this subsection and
distributions from the county criminal justice assistance account made pursuant
to section 801 of this act constitute appropriate reimbursement for costs for
any new programs or increased level of service for purposes of RCW 43.135.060.

(p)
Each quarter during the 1999-01 fiscal biennium, each county shall report the
number of petitions processed and the total actual costs of processing the petitions
in each of the following categories: Truancy, children in need of services,
and at-risk youth. Counties shall submit the reports to the department no
later than 45 days after the end of the quarter. The department shall forward
this information to the chair and ranking minority member of the house of
representatives appropriations committee and the senate ways and means
committee no later than 60 days after a quarter ends. These reports are deemed
informational in nature and are not for the purpose of distributing funds.

(q)
$31,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation is
provided solely for the juvenile rehabilitation administration to contract with
the institute for public policy for an evaluation of the juvenile offender
co-occurring disorder pilot program implemented pursuant to section 204 of this
2000 act.

(r)
Amounts provided in subsection (1) of this section are sufficient to implement
Senate Bill No. 6071 (duties of drivers involved in accidents).

(2)
INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((47,599,000))

46,815,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((48,799,000))

48,061,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 740,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 15,282,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((112,420,000))

110,898,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: $37,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2000 and $74,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2001 are provided solely to increase payment rates for contracted service
providers. It is the legislature's intent that these amounts be used primarily
to increase compensation for persons employed in direct, front‑line
service delivery.

(3)
PROGRAM SUPPORT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 1,419,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((1,418,000))

1,421,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((320,000))

317,000

Juvenile
Accountability Incentive Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,100,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 421,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 4,678,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 204. A
new section is added to 1999 c 309 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-JUVENILE
OFFENDER CO‑OCCURRING DISORDER PILOT PROGRAM

$867,000
from the juvenile accountability incentive account‑-federal is
appropriated to the department of social and health services, juvenile rehabilitation
administration, community services program, solely to implement a pilot program
to provide for postrelease planning and treatment of juvenile offenders with
co-occurring disorders. The secretary shall select and contract with a private
or nonprofit provider to provide a program of specialized access and integrated
services to juvenile offenders who are identified as having co-occurring
disorders and selected for participation in the pilot program prior to release
from total confinement within the juvenile rehabilitation administration. The
program shall enroll no more juvenile offenders than the number that can be
accommodated within the appropriated funding level and shall seek to fill any
vacancies that occur.

Juvenile
offenders identified by the secretary and selected by the program as having
co-occurring disorders and a high risk of reoffending are eligible for
consideration for enrollment in the program.

(1)
Criteria for admission into the program shall include a determination by the
secretary that the offender:

(a)
Has a mental disorder as defined in chapter 71.05 RCW, or is a severely
emotionally disturbed child or a seriously disturbed person as defined in
chapter 71.24 RCW and needs continued mental health treatment;

(b)
Has a chemical abuse disorder, as determined by the secretary;

(c)
Is less likely to reoffend if he or she receives integrated, highly
individualized treatment;

(d)
Is unable or unlikely to obtain appropriate treatment from other sources; and

(e)
Will remain under the supervision of the secretary for at least four months
following release from total confinement.

(2)
The program enrollment shall, to the extent possible, reflect the demographics
of juvenile offenders having co-occurring disorders and who are in total
confinement under the jurisdiction of the secretary.

(3)
The provider shall provide research-based, integrated, and highly
individualized mental health and chemical abuse treatment to persons enrolled
in the program. The services shall emphasize family and community involvement
and shall be aimed at:

(a)
Lowering the risk of reoffending;

(b)
Improving the education level and vocational opportunities;

(c)
Connecting the offenders with appropriate community services;

(d)
Achieving abstinence from unlawful use of controlled substances and alcohol;

(e)
Improving the mental health status and stability of the juvenile; and

(f)
Increasing prosocial behavior.

(4)
The services offered in the program shall:

(a)
Include intensive, community-based case management and treatment with a
client-to-staff ratio not to exceed seven offenders to each case manager;

(b)
Be available at any time;

(c)
Be based on a collaboration with the appropriate department employees during
the preparation of a release plan for the offender, prior to discharge, and in
on-going supervision of the offender by the secretary;

(d)
Include all appropriate medications, including the full range of psychotropic
medications, as well as monitoring and counseling to support offender
understanding, acceptance, and compliance with medication regimens;

(e)
Include a systematic effort to engage offenders and their families, where
possible, to continuously involve themselves in current and long-term treatment
and appropriate rehabilitative activities;

(f)
Include classes appropriate to the clinical and living needs of the offender
and to his or her level of understanding;

(g)
Provide assistance in applying for all appropriate federal, state, and private
support for which the offender or his or her family is eligible; and

(h)
Include access to daily activities such as school, drop-in centers,
prevocational and vocational training and jobs, and volunteer activities.

(5)
The pilot program must begin providing services to selected juveniles no later
than September 1, 2000.

Sec.
205. 1999
c 309 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-MENTAL
HEALTH PROGRAM

(1)
COMMUNITY SERVICES/REGIONAL SUPPORT NETWORKS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((166,271,000))

165,723,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((174,541,000))

179,190,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((306,547,000))

305,644,000

General
Fund‑-Local Appropriation.............. $ 1,827,000

Health
Services Account Appropriation.......... $ 1,225,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((649,186,000))

653,609,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
Regional support networks shall use portions of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for implementation of working agreements with the vocational
rehabilitation program which will maximize the use of federal funding for
vocational programs.

(b)
From the general fund‑-state appropriations in this subsection, the
secretary of social and health services shall assure that regional support
networks reimburse the aging and adult services program for the general fund‑-state
cost of medicaid personal care services that enrolled regional support network
consumers use because of their psychiatric disability.

(c)
(($600,000)) $711,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and (($616,000)) $757,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely to directly reimburse eligible providers for the medicaid share of
mental health services provided to persons eligible for both medicaid and
medicare.

(d)
$64,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
are provided solely for regional support networks to participate in prerelease
treatment planning and to conduct involuntary commitment evaluations, as
required by Substitute Senate Bill No. 5011 (mentally ill offenders). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, these amounts shall lapse.

(e)
$5,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$466,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
are provided solely for case management and other community support services,
as authorized by Substitute Senate Bill No. 5011 (mentally ill offenders). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, these amounts shall lapse.

(f)
Within funds appropriated in this subsection, the department shall contract
with the Clark county regional support network for development and operation of
a pilot project demonstrating new and collaborative methods for providing
intensive mental health services in the school setting for severely emotionally
disturbed children who are medicaid eligible. Project services are to be
delivered by teachers and teaching assistants who qualify as, or who are under
the supervision of, mental health professionals meeting the requirements of WAC
275-57. The department shall increase medicaid payments to the regional
support network by the amount necessary to cover the necessary and allowable
costs of the demonstration, not to exceed the upper payment limit specified for
the regional support network in the department's medicaid waiver agreement with
the federal government. The regional support network shall provide the
department with (i) periodic reports on project service levels, methods, and
outcomes; (ii) protocols, guidelines, and handbooks suitable for use by other
school districts and regional support networks seeking to replicate the pilot
project's approach; and (iii) intergovernmental transfer equal to the state
share of the increased medicaid payment provided for operation of this project.

(g)
$47,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$47,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5214 (firearms on
school premises). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts
provided shall lapse.

(h)
The general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 includes $1,891,000
to replace federal funding for outpatient services which is no longer available
due to the reduction in the federal medical assistance percentage. The
department shall distribute these additional state funds among the regional
support networks according to each regional support network's capitation rate
by eligibility category.

(i)
The appropriations in this subsection include an increase in funding for
medicaid outpatient services as a result of the forecasted increase in the
number of persons eligible for medicaid over the number previously budgeted.
The department shall distribute these additional appropriations among the
regional support networks according to each regional support network's
capitation rate by eligibility category.

(j)
The health services account appropriation is provided solely for implementation
of strategies which the department and the affected regional support networks
conclude will best assure continued availability of community-based inpatient
psychiatric services in all areas of the state. Such strategies may include,
but are not limited to, emergency contracts for continued operation of
inpatient facilities otherwise at risk of closure because of demonstrated,
disproportionate uncompensated care; start-up grants for development of
evaluation and treatment facilities; and increases in the rate paid for inpatient
psychiatric services for medically indigent and/or general assistance for the
unemployed patients. The funds provided in this subsection must be: (i)(A)
Prioritized for use in those areas of the state which are at greatest risk of
lacking sufficient inpatient psychiatric treatment capacity; (B) prioritized
for use by those hospitals which do not receive low-income disproportionate
share hospital payments as of the date of application for funding; (C) matched
on a one-quarter local, three-quarters state basis by funding from the regional
support network or networks in the area in which the funds are expended; and
(D) used to support strategies which can be sustained during the 2001-03
biennium at a state cost no more than 100 percent greater than the amount
provided in this subsection. Payments from the amount provided in this
subsection shall not be made to any provider that has not agreed: (ii)(A)
That, except for prospective rate increases, the payment shall offset, on a
dollar-for-dollar basis, any liability that may be established against the
state for the rate of state reimbursement for inpatient psychiatric care; and
(B) that the provider will maintain or enhance its inpatient psychiatric
treatment capacity throughout the period ending June 30, 2001, or for the
duration of the funding, whichever is later. The funds provided in this
subsection shall not be considered "available resources" as defined
in RCW 71.24.025 and are not subject to the distribution formula established
pursuant to RCW 71.24.035.

(k)
$1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
is provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2663
(atypical antipsychotic medications). If Substitute House Bill No. 2663 is not
enacted by June 30, 2000, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.
Prior to implementing the projects established in the bill, the department
shall report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature
on proposed medication delivery and monitoring systems and arrangements for
obtaining manufacturer discounts or rebates. No more than $175,000 of the
funds provided in this subsection may be used for state and contractor
start-up, evaluation, and administration of the projects, and no more than
$100,000 of that amount may be for ongoing costs which continue beyond fiscal
year 2001. The department may transfer and allot the state component of such
administrative costs to its mental health program support subprogram. The
funds provided in this subsection shall not be considered "available
resources" as defined in RCW 71.24.025 and are not subject to the
distribution formula established pursuant to RCW 71.24.035.

(2)
INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((69,946,000))

69,797,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((69,932,000))

72,597,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((138,825,000))

141,160,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ ((29,456,000))

29,848,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((308,159,000))

313,402,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
The state mental hospitals may use funds appropriated in this subsection to
purchase goods and supplies through hospital group purchasing organizations
when it is cost-effective to do so.

(b)
The mental health program at Western state hospital shall continue to use labor
provided by the Tacoma prerelease program of the department of corrections.

(c)
The department shall use general fund‑-local appropriations in this
subsection to establish a third-party revenue incentive pool, which shall be
used for staff-initiated projects which will increase the quality of care at
the state hospitals. For fiscal year 2000, the incentive pool shall be (i) the
first $200,000 by which revenues from third-party payers exceed (($27,800,000))
$28,000,000; and (ii) fifty percent of any amounts beyond (($28,000,000))
$28,200,000, up to a maximum of $500,000. For fiscal year 2001, the
incentive pool shall be (iii) the first $350,000 by which third-party revenues
exceed (($29,050,000)) $28,550,000; and (iv) fifty percent of any
amounts beyond (($29,400,000)) $28,900,000, up to a maximum of
$700,000. For purposes of this subsection, "third-party revenues"
does not include disproportionate share hospital payments or the federal
share of salaries and benefit allocations. The department may establish
separate incentive pools for each hospital. The department may also divide the
annual revenue target into quarterly goals, and make funds available from the
incentive pool on a quarterly basis.

(d)
$444,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$1,866,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $253,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided for
improved, more specialized care for persons with developmental disabilities
during their treatment for a psychiatric illness at the state hospitals.

(3)
CIVIL COMMITMENT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((8,665,000))

10,895,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((9,524,000))

11,940,000

Public
Safety and Education

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 11,964,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 2,036,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((18,189,000))

36,835,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
The department shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by
October 1, 1999, on plans for increasing the efficiency of staffing patterns at
the civil commitment center sufficiently to operate within authorized staffing
and expenditure levels.

(b)
The public safety and education account appropriation and the violence
reduction and drug enforcement account appropriation are provided solely for
deposit into the state building and construction account for design and
construction of a new special commitment center facility (capital project
01-2-001). These funds shall not be transferred for other purposes as
otherwise provided in section 201(3)(b) of this act. The amount provided in
this subsection is subject to the review and allotment procedures under
sections 902 and 903 of chapter 379, Laws of 1999. In accordance with section
909 of chapter 379, Laws of 1999, the department of corrections is responsible
for project management.

(4)
SPECIAL PROJECTS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 444,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 443,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 3,282,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 4,169,000

(5)
PROGRAM SUPPORT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 2,612,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 2,706,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 3,227,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 8,545,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
By December 1, 1999, the department shall provide the fiscal committees of the
legislature with an independent assessment of options for increasing the
efficiency and effectiveness of current systems and organizational structures
for billing third-party payers for hospital services.

(b)
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $120,000 of the general fund federal appropriation are provided solely for
the institute for public policy to evaluate the impacts of Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5011 (mentally ill offenders), and of chapter 297, Laws of 1998
(commitment of mentally ill persons). If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5011 is
not enacted by June 30, 1999, one-half of each of these amounts shall lapse.

Sec.
206. 1999
c 309 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES PROGRAM

(1)
COMMUNITY SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((183,530,000))

185,473,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((197,412,000))

205,602,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((319,962,000))

325,535,000

Health
Services Account‑-State Appropriation... $ 262,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((701,166,000))

716,872,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
The health services account appropriation and $127,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation are provided solely for health care benefits for home care
workers with family incomes below 200 percent of the federal poverty level who
are employed through state contracts for twenty hours per week or more.
Premium payments for individual provider home care workers shall be made only
to the subsidized basic health plan. Home care agencies may obtain coverage
either through the basic health plan or through an alternative plan with
substantially equivalent benefits.

(b)
$3,100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$4,650,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $8,250,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely to increase services and supports for people with developmental
disabilities. These funds shall be expended in accordance with priorities
established by the stakeholder advisory group established in accordance with
chapter 216, Laws of 1998 (developmental disabilities), except that (i) at
least 60 percent of these amounts must be used to increase the number of people
receiving residential, employment, family support, or other direct services;
(ii) the services and supports must be designed and implemented such that the
cost of continuing them in the 2001-03 biennium does not exceed $19.2 million,
of which no more than $9.3 million is from state funds; and (iii) strong
consideration shall be given to the need for increased wages for direct care
workers in contracted residential programs.

(c)
$413,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$1,172,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $694,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for employment, or other day activities and training programs, for young
people who complete their high school curriculum in 1999 or 2000.

(d)
$1,919,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
(($2,892,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001, and $4,992,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are
provided solely for alternatives for persons who would otherwise be at
substantial risk of state psychiatric hospitalization. The department shall
use these funds and other resources appropriated in this section and in section
205(1) of this act to assure that the average number of persons with
developmental disabilities in the state hospitals does not exceed sixty-six per
day during the first biennial quarter; sixty per day during the second;
fifty-four per day during the third; and forty-eight per day during the final
quarter of the 1999-2001 biennium. The developmental disabilities program
shall transfer $285 of the general fund‑-state appropriation to the
mental health program for each bed-day by which these quarterly targets are
exceeded.)) $6,673,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation
for fiscal year 2001, and $7,361,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation are provided solely to improve services for persons with
developmental disabilities who would otherwise be at risk of needing
involuntary commitment to or prolonged treatment at state psychiatric
hospitals. The department shall use these funds to enhance the community
crisis response system managed by regional support networks, improve crisis
prevention and stabilization services through the developmental disabilities
community services system, and expand community residential capacity for
persons with developmental disabilities who are ready for discharge from state
psychiatric hospitals. Funding for community residential capacity is
sufficient to move a biennium total of 48 patients out of the state hospitals
at a reasonable pace by June 30, 2001. The department shall manage the
intensity of services provided so that the average cost per day does not exceed
$300 per person placed in this expanded community residential capacity. The
department shall report to the appropriate committees of the legislature
progress towards implementing this subsection after each calendar quarter. The
legislature finds that, in addition to the appropriations in this subsection
for improvements in services to persons with developmental disabilities who are
committed to the custody of the secretary under chapter 71.05 RCW, it is
necessary to study long-term treatment alternatives and their legal, fiscal,
and policy implications. Therefore, the department shall provide a report to
the ways and means committee of the senate and the appropriations committee of
the house of representatives by December 1, 2000, containing options and
recommendations for secure treatment programs. The report shall identify
various treatment models that could be implemented and various types and
locations of secure facilities, both state-owned and leased, in which programs
could be sited, together with the department's recommendations. The report shall
evaluate the potential for siting such programs on the grounds of existing
state residential habilitation centers. The report shall also include analysis
of advantages and disadvantages associated with contracting for some or all of
the new program options identified. The report shall evaluate the options
based on short-term and long-term costs, client and community security,
efficiency of coordination with other service delivery systems, and how they
address specific legal issues. In developing this report, the department shall
invite participation by representatives of the Washington protection and
advocacy system (WPAS), and shall include in the report WPAS' position on
options and recommendations submitted by the department and any additional recommendations
made by WPAS. The legislature recognizes a need to improve long-term services
provided to individuals with developmental disabilities who are undergoing
involuntary treatment under chapter 71.05 RCW. The legislature is committed to
providing resources necessary to address issues in the U.S. District Court case
of Allen v. Western State Hospital.

(e)
$513,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$1,421,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $2,033,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided to
develop and operate secure residential and day program placements for persons
who seem likely to pose a significant risk to the public safety if their
current residential arrangement were to continue.

(f)
$209,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$664,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $939,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided to
increase wages as required by Initiative No. 688 (state minimum wage) for
contracted adult family homes, adult residential care facilities, hourly and
daily family support providers, and hourly attendant care providers.

(g)
$1,978,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$4,475,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $6,989,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely to increase compensation for individual and agency home care workers.
Payments to individual providers are to be increased from $6.18 per hour to
$6.68 per hour on July 1, 1999, and to $7.18 per hour on July 1, 2000.
Payments to agency providers are to be increased to $11.97 per hour on July 1,
1999, and to $12.62 per hour on July 1, 2000. All but 14 cents per hour of the
July 1, 1999, increase to agency providers, and all but 15 cents per hour of
the additional July 1, 2000, increase is to be used to increase wages for
direct care workers. The appropriations in this subsection also include the
funds needed for the employer share of unemployment and social security taxes
on the amount of the increase.

(h)
Within amounts appropriated in this subsection, the developmental disabilities
program shall contract for a pilot program to test an alternative service
delivery model for persons with autism. The department must use a competitive
process to determine the site of the pilot. The pilot program must be
time-limited and subject to an evaluation of client outcomes to determine the
effectiveness and efficiency of the pilot program compared to the standard
service model for persons with autism.

(i)
$500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
and $160,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for increased family support services and related case management
support.

(2)
INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 66,076,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((66,184,000))

67,478,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((147,776,000))

146,482,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 10,227,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 290,263,000

(3)
PROGRAM SUPPORT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 2,431,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 2,435,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 2,080,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 6,946,000

(4)
SPECIAL PROJECTS

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 12,007,000

Sec.
207. 1999
c 376 s 3 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-AGING
AND ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((452,044,000))

446,025,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((476,761,000))

475,133,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((1,001,629,000))

979,407,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ ((4,274,000))

3,910,000

Health
Services Account‑-State Appropriation... $ 2,104,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((1,936,812,000))

1,906,579,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The entire health services account appropriation, $2,118,000 of the general
fund‑-federal appropriation, $923,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2000, and $958,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for health care benefits
for home care workers who are employed through state contracts for at least
twenty hours per week. Premium payments for individual provider home care
workers shall be made only to the subsidized basic health plan. Home care
agencies may obtain coverage either through the basic health plan or through an
alternative plan with substantially equivalent benefits.

(2)
$1,640,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,640,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001, plus the associated vendor rate increase for each year, are provided
solely for operation of the volunteer chore services program.

(3)
For purposes of implementing Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1484 (nursing
home payment rates), the weighted average nursing facility payment rate for
fiscal year 2000 shall be no more than (($10.36)) $10.85 for the
capital portion of the rate and no more than $108.20 for the noncapital portion
of the rate. For fiscal year 2001, the weighted average nursing facility
payment rate shall be no more than (($10.57)) $11.44 for the
capital portion of the rate and no more than (($110.91)) $111.21
for the noncapital portion of the rate. These rates include vendor rate
increases, but exclude nurse's aide training.

(4)
In addition to the rates set forth in subsection (3), $286,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000((, $574,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,)) and (($928,000)) $310,000
of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for supplemental
rate adjustments for certain nursing facilities. In accordance with RCW
74.46.431, the department shall use these funds to apply an additional economic
trends and conditions adjustment factor to the rate of any facility whose total
rate allocation would otherwise be less than its April 1, 1999, total rate,
adjusted for case-mix changes. This supplemental adjustment factor shall be
the percentage by which the facility's April 1, 1999, rate would otherwise
exceed the rate calculated in accordance with chapter 74.46 RCW and subsection
(3) of this section, except that (a) no adjustment shall be provided for any
amounts by which a facility's rate is lower due to a reduction in its
facility-average medicaid case-mix score; and (b) the adjustment factor shall
be reduced proportionately for all facilities by the percentage by which total
supplemental payments would otherwise exceed the funds provided for such
payments in this subsection. This subsection applies only to rates paid for
services provided between July 1, 1999, and March 31, 2000.

(5)
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for payments to any nursing facility licensed under chapter
18.51 RCW which meets all of the following criteria: (a) The nursing home
entered into an arm's length agreement for a facility lease prior to January 1,
1980; (b) the lessee purchased the leased nursing home after January 1, 1980;
and (c) the lessor defaulted on its loan or mortgage for the assets of the home
after January 1, 1991, and prior to January 1, 1992. Payments provided
pursuant to this subsection shall not be subject to the settlement, audit, or
rate-setting requirements contained in chapter 74.46 RCW.

(6)
(($6,264,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2000, $13,860,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2001, and $21,795,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are
provided solely)) Funds are appropriated in this section to increase
compensation for individual and for agency home care providers. Payments to
individual home care providers are to be increased from $6.18 per hour to $6.68
per hour on July 1, 1999, and to $7.18 per hour on July 1, 2000. Payments to
agency providers are to increase to $11.97 per hour on July 1, 1999, and to
$12.62 per hour on July 1, 2000. All but 14 cents per hour of the July 1,
1999, increase to agency providers, and all but 15 cents per hour of the
additional July 1, 2000, increase is to be used to increase wages for direct
care workers. The appropriations in this subsection also include the funds
needed for the employer share of unemployment and social security taxes on the
amount of the increase.

(7)
$200,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$80,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $280,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for enhancement and integration of existing management information
systems to (a) provide data at the local office level on service utilization,
costs, and recipient characteristics; and (b) reduce the staff time devoted to
data entry.

(8)
The department of social and health services shall provide access and choice to
consumers of adult day health services for the purposes of nursing services,
physical therapy, occupational therapy, and psychosocial therapy. Adult day
health services shall not be considered a duplication of services for persons
receiving care in long-term care settings licensed under chapter 18.20, 72.36,
or 70.128 RCW.

(9)
$1,452,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$1,528,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $2,980,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1546 (in-home
care services). If Second Substitute House Bill No. 1546 is not enacted by
June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(10)
$131,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6401
(protecting vulnerable adults) or Substitute House Bill No. 2637 (background
checks). If neither bill is enacted by June 30, 2000, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

(11)
$600,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided solely for implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 2454 (caregiver
support). If Substitute House Bill No. 2454 is not enacted by June 30, 2000,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec.
208. 1999
c 309 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-ECONOMIC
SERVICES PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((457,162,000))

427,742,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((441,575,000))

410,420,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((1,220,874,000))

1,232,359,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ ((30,838,000))

30,807,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((2,150,449,000))

2,101,328,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
(($308,504,000)) $283,801,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2000, (($293,144,000)) $268,121,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, (($1,133,782,000))
$1,142,647,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation, and (($28,402,000))
$28,371,000 of the general fund‑-local appropriation are provided
solely for the WorkFirst program and child support operations. WorkFirst
expenditures include TANF grants, diversion services, subsidized child care,
employment and training, other WorkFirst related services, allocated field services
operating costs, and allocated economic services program administrative costs.
Within the amounts provided in this subsection, the department shall:

(a)
Continue to implement WorkFirst program improvements that are designed to
achieve progress against outcome measures specified in RCW 74.08A.410. Valid outcome
measures of job retention and wage progression shall be developed and reported quarterly
to appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature for families
who leave assistance, measured after 12 months, 24 months, and 36 months. An
increased attention to job retention and wage progression is necessary to
emphasize the legislature's goal that the WorkFirst program succeed in helping
recipients gain long-term economic independence and not cycle on and off public
assistance. The wage progression measure shall report the median percentage
increase in quarterly earnings and hourly wage after 12 months, 24 months, and
36 months. The wage progression report shall also report the percent with
earnings above one hundred percent and two hundred percent of the federal
poverty level. The report shall compare former WorkFirst participants with
similar workers who did not participate in WorkFirst. The department shall
also report percentage of families who have returned to temporary assistance
for needy families after 12 months, 24 months, and 36 months.

(b)
Develop informational materials that educate families about the difference
between cash assistance and work support benefits. These materials must
explain, among other facts, that the benefits are designed to support their
employment, that there are no time limits on the receipts of work support
benefits, and that immigration or residency status will not be affected by the
receipt of benefits. These materials shall be posted in all community service
offices and distributed to families. Materials must be available in multiple
languages. When a family leaves the temporary assistance for needy families
program, receives cash diversion assistance, or withdraws a temporary
assistance for needy families application, the department of social and health
services shall educate them about the difference between cash assistance and
work support benefits and offering them the opportunity to begin or to continue
receiving work support benefits, so long as they are eligible. The department
shall provide this information through in-person interviews, over the
telephone, and/or through the mail. Work support benefits include food stamps,
medicaid for all family members, medicaid or state children's health insurance
program for children, and child care assistance. The department shall report
annually to the legislature the number of families who have had exit
interviews, been reached successfully by phone, and sent mail. The report
shall also include the percentage of families who elect to continue each of the
benefits and the percentage found ineligible by each substantive reason code.
A substantive reason code shall not be "other." The report shall
identify barriers to informing families about work support benefits and
describe existing and future actions to overcome such barriers.

(c)
Provide $500,000 from the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2000 and $500,000 from the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2001 for continuation of the WorkFirst evaluation conducted by the
joint legislative audit and review committee.

(((c)))
(d) Report to the appropriate committees of the legislature, by December
1, ((1999)) 2000, how the new federal child support incentive
system can be used to maximize federal incentive payments and to support the
greatest achievement of WorkFirst program goals. In the event that the
department earns federal child support incentive payments in excess of amounts
budgeted, the department shall use one-half of those additional funds to offset
general fund‑-state allotments and one-half of those additional funds to
improve child support services. The department shall also work with the
Washington state association of county clerks to identify ways to protect the
confidentiality of social security numbers on court documents needed by the
child support enforcement system while ensuring the reliability of this
information without significantly increasing the cost to administer the child
support system. The department shall report its recommendations for protecting
the confidentiality of social security numbers to appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2000.

(e)
Provide up to $500,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation to the
office of financial management for a study of rate setting methods and policy
for subsidized child care, and for a review of the various state programs for
low-income families with children. The child care rate study shall analyze the
effects of rate setting policy on the affordability and quality of the overall
child care market. The study of state programs for low-income families shall
compare and contrast eligibility and access to these programs and identify ways
to coordinate or consolidate these programs to reduce administrative costs and
improve access.

(f)
Integrate information about apprenticeship and preapprenticeship opportunities
into caseworker training materials; and provide information about
apprenticeship and preapprenticeship opportunities to WorkFirst clients through
written materials, during initial client orientation, and during subsequent
client contact.

(g)
Convene a working group that includes stakeholders and recipients of public assistance
to establish basic customer service performance measures and goals. The
customer service measures and goals will seek to make support for working
families a priority. Customer service measures and goals may include, but are
not limited to: Hours of operation that allow working families to get services
without missing work, reduced wait times, systems for answering and returning
phone calls in a timely manner, access to benefits that support work, access to
job training and education, and, access to services for families with limited
literacy or English skills, and families with special needs. The department
shall report to the legislature by January 2001 the establishment of customer
service measures and goals, and the departmental actions to assure the goals
are being met.

(h)
Use existing flexibility in federal and state welfare laws and regulations to
support, on a limited basis, longer education and training plans that have a
strong likelihood to lead to long-term economic independence for recipient. If
revisions to state laws are required to support such longer educational plans,
the department shall identify those necessary revisions.

(i)
Implement the provisions of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6296 (ICAN). If
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6296 is not enacted by June 30, 2000, $2,136,000 of
the general fund‑-federal amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(j)
Ensure that funds provided in this subsection to implement policies that
disregard or exempt a portion of recipients' income are designed to achieve
stated WorkFirst program goals and outcomes. Income disregards are effective
incentives to help WorkFirst families move towards economic independence.
Income disregard policy shall not discriminate based on who the specific employer
is.

(2)
(($50,860,000)) $43,408,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and (($50,825,000)) $42,886,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for cash assistance and other services to recipients in the
general assistance‑-unemployable program. Within these amounts, the
department may expend funds for services that assist recipients to reduce their
dependence on public assistance, provided that expenditures for these services
and cash assistance do not exceed funds provided. The department shall, by
July 1, 2000, begin using federal funds provided in subsection (1) of this
section, as allowed by federal rules, for the costs of providing income
assistance to children with court-appointed guardians and court-appointed
custodians.

(3)
(($8,752,000)) $5,444,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and (($8,752,000)) $5,632,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for the food assistance program for legal immigrants. The
level of benefits shall be equivalent to the benefits provided by the federal
food stamp program.

Sec.
209. 1999
c 309 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-ALCOHOL
AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((21,451,000))

17,217,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((21,858,000))

19,306,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((90,800,000))

90,373,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 1,204,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 6,660,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((77,150,000))

83,893,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((219,123,000))

218,653,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$1,960,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$1,960,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for expansion of 50 drug and alcohol treatment beds for persons
committed under RCW 70.96A.140. Patients meeting the commitment criteria of
RCW 70.96A.140 but who voluntarily agree to treatment in lieu of commitment
shall also be eligible for treatment in these additional treatment beds. The
department shall develop specific placement criteria for these expanded
treatment beds to ensure that this new treatment capacity is prioritized for
persons incapacitated as a result of chemical dependency and who are also high
utilizers of hospital services.

(2)
$18,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $88,000
of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and $116,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely for
activities related to chemical dependency services under subsection 202(1) of
this act. If that subsection is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts
provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3)
$1,444,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$1,484,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and
$330,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided for
implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5480 (drug-affected
infants) or sections 1 through 17 of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1574. If
legislation expanding services to prevent drug-affected infants is not enacted
by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection shall be provided
solely for the development and implementation of comprehensive programs for alcohol
and drug abusing mothers and their young children. The pilot programs shall be
implemented in several locations, including at least one rural location. The
pilot programs shall also be supported with TANF funds provided in section 208
of this act as a way to reduce prolonged dependency on public assistance for
program participants.

Sec.
210. 1999
c 392 s 2 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-MEDICAL
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((722,863,000))

744,327,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((784,657,000))

834,864,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((2,401,804,000))

2,542,652,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ ((261,534,000))

258,616,000

Emergency
Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems

Trust
Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 9,200,000

Health
Services Account‑-State Appropriation... $ ((391,582,000))

487,197,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((4,571,641,000))

4,876,856,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The department shall continue to make use of the special eligibility category
created for children through age 18 and in households with incomes below 200
percent of the federal poverty level made eligible for medicaid as of July 1,
1994.

(2)
It is the intent of the legislature that Harborview medical center continue to
be an economically viable component of the health care system and that the
state's financial interest in Harborview medical center be recognized.

(3)
Funding is provided in this section for the adult dental program for Title XIX
categorically eligible and medically needy persons and to provide foot care
services by podiatric physicians and surgeons.

(4)
$1,647,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,672,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided for treatment of low-income kidney dialysis patients.

(5)
$80,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$80,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $160,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for the prenatal triage clearinghouse to provide access and outreach to
reduce infant mortality.

(6)
((The department shall adopt a new formula for distributing funds under the
low-income disproportionate share hospital (LI-DSH) program. Under this new
formula, (a) the state's Level 1 trauma center shall continue to receive the
same amount of LI-DSH payments as in fiscal year 1999; and (b) a net profitability
factor shall be included with other factors to determine LI-DSH payments. The
net profitability factor shall inversely relate hospital percent net operating
income to payment under the program.

(7))) The
department shall report to the fiscal committees of the legislature by
September 15, 1999, and again by December 15, 1999, on (a) actions it has taken
and proposes to take to increase the share of medicare part B premium payments
upon which it is collecting medicaid matching funds; (b) the percentage of such
premium payments for each month of service subsequent to June 1998 which have
been paid with unmatched, state-only funds; and (c) why matching funds could
not be collected on those payments.

(((8)))
(7) The department shall report to the fiscal committees of the
legislature by December 1, 1999, and again by October 1, 2000, on the amount
which has been recovered from third-party payers as a result of its efforts to
improve coordination of benefits on behalf of "basic health
plan-plus" enrollees.

(((9)))
(8) The department shall report to the health care and fiscal committees
of the legislature by December 1, 1999, on options for controlling the growth
in medicaid prescription drug expenditures through strategies such as but not
limited to volume purchasing, selective contracting, supplemental drug
discounts, and improved care coordination for high utilizers.

(((10)))
(9) $3,992,000 of the health services account appropriation and
$7,651,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely
for health insurance coverage for children with family incomes between 200
percent and 250 percent of the federal poverty level, as provided in Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5416 (children's health insurance program). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 1999, these amounts shall lapse.

(((11)
$191,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $391,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5587
(patient bill of rights). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, these
amounts shall lapse.

(12))) (10)
Upon approval from the federal health care financing administration, the
department shall implement the section 1115 family planning waiver to provide
family planning services to persons with family incomes at or below two hundred
percent of the federal poverty level.

(((13)
Except in the case of rural hospitals and Harborview medical center, weighted
average payments under the ratio-of-cost-to-charges hospital payment system
shall increase by no more than 175 percent of the DRI HCFA hospital
reimbursement market basket index.

(15))) (11)
In accordance with Substitute Senate Bill No. 5968, (($25,978,000)) $70,821,000
of the health services account appropriation for fiscal year 2000, (($26,069,000))
$42,041,000 of the health services account appropriation for fiscal year
2001, and (($56,002,000)) $120,278,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation, or so much thereof as may be expended without
exceeding the medicare upper payment limit, are provided solely for
supplemental payments to nursing homes operated by rural public hospital
districts. Such payments shall be distributed among the participating rural
public hospital districts proportional to the number of days of medicaid-funded
nursing home care provided by each district during the preceding calendar year,
relative to the total number of such days of care provided by all participating
rural public hospital districts. Prior to making any supplemental payments,
the department shall first obtain federal approval for such payments under the
medicaid state plan. The payments shall further be conditioned upon (a) a
contractual commitment by the association of public hospital districts and
participating rural public hospital districts to make an intergovernmental
transfer to the state treasurer, for deposit into the health services account,
equal to at least 82 percent of the initial supplemental payment amount,
and 88 percent of subsequent supplemental payment amounts; and (b) a
contractual commitment by the participating districts to not allow expenditures
covered by the supplemental payments to be used for medicaid nursing home
rate-setting.

(12)
In determining financial eligibility for medicaid-funded services, the
department is authorized to disregard recoveries by Holocaust survivors of
insurance proceeds or other assets, as defined in RCW 48.104.030.

(13)
$1,529,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$4,077,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and
$5,394,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for
implementation of the settlement negotiated by the department and the attorney
general in the case of Allenmore et al. vs. DSHS.

(14)
From funds provided in this section, the department shall develop disease state
management and therapeutic substitution programs which will substantially
maintain or enhance the quality of the drug benefit for medical assistance
recipients, while controlling overall health care costs. In designing the
disease state management programs, the department shall research programs which
have proven effective with similar populations in other states, and shall then
work with concerned provider and consumer groups to adapt those strategies to
Washington's service delivery system. The department shall work with its drug
utilization and education council to develop a therapeutic substitution program
for at least two classes of drugs. Under the therapeutic substitution program,
the council shall analyze pharmacoeconomic research on the costs and benefits
of all drugs within the class, and identify the most cost-effective drug or
drugs within the class for placement on the formulary. Other drugs within the
class shall be preauthorized when clinically indicated under criteria
established by the council. The department shall report to appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2000, prior to implementing its
proposed strategies.

(15)
$14,848,000 of the health services account appropriation for fiscal year 2001
and $15,269,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely
for additional disproportionate share hospital payments to public hospital
districts. Such additional payments shall not be made prior to federal
approval of a revision in the medicaid payment methodology for state teaching
hospitals, and shall not exceed the increase in medicaid payments which results
from that change. The payments shall further be conditioned upon a contractual
commitment by the participating public hospital districts to make an
intergovernmental transfer to the health services account equal to at least 77
percent of the additional disproportionate share payment. At least 28 percent
of the amounts retained by the participating hospital districts shall be
allocated to the state teaching hospitals.

(16)(a)
$49,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 and
$49,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation for fiscal year 2001
are provided solely for the medical assistance administration and the health
care authority to jointly conduct a state-wide study to:

(i)
Determine payment sources and rates paid for primary health care providers
performing outpatient primary care services and primary care in hospital
emergency rooms for the state's medical assistance programs, including healthy
options, and the basic health plan. To determine payment sources and rates
paid, the agencies may seek information in relation to such factors as:

(A)
The rates paid to primary care providers for their medical assistance programs,
including healthy options, and basic health plan contracts; and

(B)
How these rates compare with nonpublic pay clients for the same services.

The
agencies are authorized to attain this information from health plans or
providers. The agencies shall maintain the confidentiality of data collected
for the purpose of the study;

(ii)
Determine which primary care providers serve a relatively high number of
low-income clients, and how that affects their medical practice. For purposes
of the study, "primary care providers" includes pediatricians, family
practitioners, general practitioners, internists, physician assistants, and
advanced registered nurse practitioners; and (iii) Develop
proposals to support these providers' medical practices. The agencies must
determine what constitutes a relatively high percentage of low-income clients
for individual primary care providers who contract for medical assistance
administration programs, including healthy options, and the basic health plan,
and recommend whether and at what point this disproportionately high percentage
should result in additional compensation to the primary care provider. The
agencies shall recommend a method to calculate a payment adjustment designed to
help support medical practices, according to the study's findings.

(b)
In conducting the study, the agencies shall determine which regions of the
state to include in the study, based on factors the agencies determine will
provide the most representative data state-wide. The agencies shall also
consult with interested parties, including any organization or agency affected
by this subsection, throughout the course of the study.

(c)
The agencies shall report to the legislature by December 1, 2000, with the
results of the primary health care provider study. The report shall include
recommendations on: (i) What constitutes a disproportionately high percentage
of low-income clients; (ii) possible payment adjustments for these providers;
(iii) methods to implement such a rate adjustment; and (iv) what such a payment
adjusted program will cost.

(17)
From funds appropriated in this section, the medical assistance program shall
assist the Washington state institute for public policy with the assessment of
options for expanding medicaid eligibility required in section 607 of this 2000
act. Such assistance shall include analysis of medicaid enrollment and
expenditure data needed for enrollment and cost projections; information and
advice on state and federal medicaid requirements; and liaison with state and
federal officials in other states undertaking similar expansions.

(18)
$290,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided solely for implementation of the asset exemption provisions of House
Bill No. 2686. If these provisions are not enacted by June 30, 2000, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec.
211. 1999
c 309 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-VOCATIONAL
REHABILITATION PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((8,960,000))

8,770,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((9,078,000))

8,635,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 81,906,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ ((2,904,000))

1,865,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((102,848,000))

101,176,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The division of vocational rehabilitation shall negotiate cooperative
interagency agreements with state and local organizations to improve and expand
employment opportunities for people with severe disabilities served by those
organizations.

(2)
$190,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$240,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $1,590,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for vocational rehabilitation services for individuals enrolled for
services with the developmental disabilities program who complete their high
school curriculum in 1999 or 2000.

Sec.
212. 1999
c 309 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-ADMINISTRATION
AND SUPPORTING SERVICES PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((25,695,000))

26,004,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((25,200,000))

20,119,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((46,601,000))

43,227,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 720,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((98,216,000))

90,070,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Funding is provided for the incremental cost of lease renewals and for the
temporary increased costs for relocating staff out of state office building no.
2 (OB2) during the renovation of that building. Of this increase, $2,400,000
is provided for relocating staff. This amount is recognized as one-time-only
funding for the 1999-01 biennium. As part of the 2001-2003 budget request, the
department shall update the estimate of increased cost for relocating staff,
including specifying what portion of that increase is due to providing more
square footage per FTE in the new leased space compared to the space occupied
previously.

(2)
The department may transfer up to $528,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation
for fiscal year 2000, $1,057,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2001, and $812,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation to
the administration and supporting services program from various other programs
to implement administrative reductions.

(3)
The department may transfer and allot up to $5,560,000 of the general fund‑‑state
appropriation for fiscal year 2001 and $3,518,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation to the administration and supporting services program from
various other programs in the department to achieve fiscal reductions assumed
in this section. At least 25 percent of the reductions implemented in this
subsection shall be taken from administrative positions that do not provide
direct services to clients. By September 1, 2000, the department shall report
its plan to implement the savings in this section to the fiscal committees of
the legislature.

(4)
$187,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$746,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and
$2,251,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided to
implement a new fraud and abuse detection system. By December 1, 2000, the
department shall provide a report to the fiscal committees of the legislature
that will include: The actual cost recovery in fiscal year 1999 and fiscal
year 2000, prior to implementation of the new fraud and abuse detection system;
actual cost avoidance in fiscal year 1999 and fiscal year 2000, prior to
implementation of the new fraud and abuse detection system; actual cost
recovery and actual cost avoidance achieved to date after implementation in
fiscal year 2000 and 2001, compared to the savings included in sections 202,
205, 206, and 209 of this 2000 act; and the criteria and methodology used for
determining cost recovery and cost avoidance. Within this reduction, the
department may not eliminate any funding or staff that will cause an increase
in appeals or filings to superior court.

Sec.
213. 1999
c 309 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES‑-PAYMENTS
TO OTHER AGENCIES PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((30,790,000))

31,190,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((30,719,000))

31,225,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((22,747,000))

21,932,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((84,256,000))

84,347,000

Sec.
214. 1999
c 309 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 6,441,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 6,563,000

State
Health Care Authority Administrative

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ ((39,585,000))

16,705,000

Health
Services Account‑-State Appropriation... $ ((414,159,000))

416,292,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 4,501,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((471,249,000))

450,502,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The general fund‑-state appropriations are provided solely for health
care services provided through local community clinics.

(2)
Within funds appropriated in this section and sections ((205)) 206
and ((206 of chapter 149, Laws of 1997)) 207 of this 2000 act,
the health care authority shall continue to provide an enhanced basic health
plan subsidy option for foster parents licensed under chapter 74.15 RCW and
workers in state-funded home care programs. Under this enhanced subsidy
option, foster parents and home care workers with family incomes below 200
percent of the federal poverty level shall be allowed to enroll in the basic
health plan at a cost of ten dollars per covered worker per month.

(3)
The health care authority shall require organizations and individuals which are
paid to deliver basic health plan services and which choose to sponsor
enrollment in the subsidized basic health plan to pay the following: (i) A
minimum of fifteen dollars per enrollee per month for persons below 100 percent
of the federal poverty level; and (ii) a minimum of twenty dollars per enrollee
per month for persons whose family income is 100 percent to 125 percent of the
federal poverty level.

(4)
$442,000 of the state health care authority administrative account
appropriation is provided solely for the uniform medical plan to contract for
the following services: (a) A provider profiling system; (b) a waste, fraud,
and abuse monitoring and information system; (c) an optional case management
program; and (d) hospital audits. The health care authority may not expend any
funds under this subsection until the office of financial management has
approved a detailed project plan for expenditure of these funds.

(5)
(($572,000 of the health services account appropriation is provided solely
to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5587 (patient bill of rights). If this
bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, this amount shall lapse.)) $33,000
of the health services account appropriation is provided solely for the study
to be completed jointly with the department of social and health services, as
required by section 210(16) of this 2000 act.

(6)
$111,000 of the state health care authority administrative account
appropriation and $164,000 of the health services account appropriation are
provided solely for a study of the agency's insurance information systems.

(7)
$199,000 of the health services account appropriation is provided solely for
administration and implementation of premium discounts for enrollees in the
Washington state high-risk insurance pool, as authorized by Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6067 (health care coverage). If the provisions of Substitute Senate
Bill No. 6067 authorizing such premium discounts are not enacted by June 30,
2000, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(8)
$150,000 of the health services account appropriation is provided solely for
the design and development of administrative systems which would be needed for
the health care authority to offer the new plan of health care coverage
established by Substitute Senate Bill No. 6067 (health care coverage). If the
provisions of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6067 authorizing this new health
coverage plan are not enacted by June 30, 2000, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

Sec.
215. 1999
c 309 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE HUMAN
RIGHTS COMMISSION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((2,536,000))

2,567,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((2,550,000))

2,580,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 1,474,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 100,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((6,660,000))

6,721,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and limitations:
$31,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$30,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided to educate business owners with seven or fewer employees of the
impacts on their business of the state supreme court decision Roberts v.
Dudley (cause no. 67365-9, February 17, 2000), information on how to meet
the requirements of the applicable laws, and how to obtain additional
information and assistance. The commission shall contract with the employment
security department to mail, by July 30, 2000, information prepared by the
commission to those employers identified by the employment security department
as having between one and seven employees at the time of the mailing. By June
30, 2000, the commission shall also establish a special location on its
internet web site to provide information for small business on the application
of, and compliance with, the state's laws against discrimination that apply to
their business as a result of the court's decision. By December 1, 2000, the
commission shall provide a report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature that describes the implementation of this section.

Sec.
216. 1999
c 309 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE CRIMINAL
JUSTICE TRAINING COMMISSION

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $ 100,000

Death
Investigations Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((38,000))

148,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((17,469,000))

17,597,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((17,607,000))

17,845,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$125,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for information technology upgrades and improvements for the criminal
justice training commission.

(2)
$481,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of provisions of chapter 351, Laws of 1997
(criminal justice training) dealing with supervisory and management training of
law enforcement personnel. Within the funds provided in this subsection, the
criminal justice training commission shall provide the required training in the
least disruptive manner to local law enforcement agencies and may include, but
is not limited to, regional on-site training, interactive training, and credit
for training given by the home department.

(3)
(($2,092,000)) $1,990,000 of the public safety and education
account appropriation is provided solely for expanding the basic law
enforcement academy (BLEA) from 469 hours to 720 hours. The funds provided in
this subsection are assumed sufficient for the criminal justice training
commission to provide expanded BLEA training to 330 attendees in fiscal year
2000 and 660 attendees in fiscal year 2001.

(4)
$180,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1176
(sexually violent offender records). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
1999, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(5)
$276,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of Second Substitute House Bill No. 1692 or
sections 1 through 7 of Senate Bill No. 5127 (child abuse investigations). If
neither of these bills is enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(6)
$50,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for additional domestic violence training courses for 911 operators.

(7)
$180,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to conduct
a study of law enforcement services and expenditures for both counties and
cities within the county for counties with populations over one hundred fifty
thousand. The study shall begin no later than July 1, 2000, and shall be
completed by January 1, 2001. The final report shall be distributed by the
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to the appropriate
standing committees of the legislature. The study shall:

(a)
Make recommendations to improve the efficiency of delivering law enforcement
services. The recommendations may be made to law enforcement jurisdictions,
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs, units of local
government, and the legislature;

(b)
Research, compile, and analyze data sufficient to provide a comprehensive
analysis of the costs and total expenditures for law enforcement. These costs
include but are not limited to special services, defined as but not limited to:
SWAT teams, bomb disposal units, air support, marine units, hostage
negotiation teams, homicide investigation units, drug units, canine units,
arson investigation teams, computer fraud and forensics units, domestic
violence and special assault units, and gang and youth violence units. The
study shall identify duplications and inefficiencies in current service
delivery;

(c)
Obtain data from all local governments on the types of costs identified in (b)
of this subsection; and

(d)
Obtain data from those counties and law enforcement agencies where master
interlocal agreements, joint specialty service units, and other cooperative
arrangements have been developed between law enforcement agencies to improve
the effectiveness, efficiency, and ensured quality of specialty law enforcement
services.

Sec.
217. 1999
c 309 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF LABOR AND INDUSTRIES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 7,268,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 7,240,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((16,091,000))

18,756,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-Federal

Appropriation............ ................. $ 5,950,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,057,000

Electrical
License Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 24,055,000

Farm
Labor Revolving Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 28,000

Worker
and Community Right-to-Know Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,211,000

Public
Works Administration Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,996,000

Accident
Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ ((167,736,000))

167,197,000

Accident
Account‑-Federal Appropriation ........ $ 9,112,000

Medical
Aid Account‑-State Appropriation........ $...................................... ((170,197,000))

169,190,000

Medical
Aid Account‑-Federal Appropriation..... $ 1,592,000

Plumbing
Certificate Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 971,000

Pressure
Systems Safety Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,167,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((420,671,000))

421,790,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Pursuant to RCW 7.68.015, the department shall operate the crime victims
compensation program within the public safety and education account funds
appropriated in this section. In the event that cost containment measures are
necessary, the department may (a) institute copayments for services; (b)
develop preferred provider and managed care contracts; (c) coordinate with the
department of social and health services to use the public safety and education
account as matching funds for federal Title XIX reimbursement, to the extent
this maximizes total funds available for services to crime victims. Cost
containment measures shall not include holding invoices received in one fiscal
period for payment from appropriations in subsequent fiscal periods.

(2)
$2,665,000 of the public safety and education account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for additional costs for client benefits in
the crime victims compensation program, provided that no more than $5,095,000
of the appropriations provided in subsection (1) of this section is expended
for department administration of the crime victims compensation program.

(3)
From within funds provided, the department shall improve customer service and
satisfaction for injured workers by speeding up the process for reporting
injuries, and shall enhance vocational rehabilitation services for injured
workers.

(((2)
$123,000 of the accident account‑-state appropriation and $22,000 of the
medical aid account‑-state appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5597 (needle stick protection). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(3)
$302,000 of the accident account‑-state appropriation and $302,000 of the
medical aid account‑-state appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5439 (false claims). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(4)
$709,000 of the accident account‑-state appropriation and $709,000 of the
medical aid account‑-state appropriation are provided solely for the
implementation of Engrossed Senate Bill No. 5580 (payments during appeals). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(5)
$481,000 of the medical aid account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 5470
(chemically related illnesses). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999,
the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.))

Sec.
218. 1999
c 309 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

(1)
HEADQUARTERS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((1,409,000))

1,640,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((1,428,000))

1,628,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $ 134,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 78,000

Industrial
Insurance Premium Refund Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 78,000

Charitable,
Educational, Penal, and Reformatory

Institutions
Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((3,129,000))

3,560,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
$39,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely as an
additional state contribution toward the cost of constructing a memorial on the
state capitol grounds to the men and women who served in the nation's armed
forces during the second world war.

(b)
$231,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 is
provided solely for disbursement to the national World War II memorial fund for
construction and maintenance of the national monument honoring the men and
women from Washington and the other states who served in the nation's armed
forces during the second world war.

(c)
$200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided solely to conduct a predesign study for replacement of aging skilled
nursing facilities. The predesign study shall comply with the requirements of
sections 902 and 903, chapter 379, Laws of 1999.

(2)
FIELD SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 2,466,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 2,494,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $ 26,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 1,495,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 6,481,000

(3)
INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((6,155,000))

5,346,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((5,337,000))

4,790,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((20,949,000))

23,002,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ ((14,682,000))

16,527,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((47,123,000))

49,665,000

Sec.
219. 1999
sp.s. c 12 s 4 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF HEALTH

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((65,437,000))

65,465,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((66,135,000))

67,546,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((268,710,000))

268,032,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 68,648,000

Hospital
Commission Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((3,128,000))

2,378,000

Health
Professions Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 37,529,000

Emergency
Medical Services and Trauma Care Systems

Trust
Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 14,856,000

State
Drinking Water Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,531,000

Drinking
Water Assistance Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,456,000

Waterworks
Operator Certification‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 593,000

Water
Quality Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 3,124,000

Accident
Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 258,000

Medical
Aid Account‑-State Appropriation........ $ 45,000

State
Toxics Control Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,614,000

Health
Services Account Appropriation.......... $ 7,000,000

Medical
Test Site Licensure Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,651,000

Youth
Tobacco Prevention Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,804,000

Tobacco
Prevention and Control Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((620,000))

20,620,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((550,139,000))

570,150,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$2,434,000 of the health professions account appropriation is provided solely
for the development and implementation of a licensing and disciplinary
management system. Expenditures are conditioned upon compliance with section
902 of this act. These funds shall not be expended without appropriate project
approval by the department of information systems.

(2)
The department or any successor agency is authorized to raise existing fees
charged to the nursing assistants, podiatrists, and osteopaths; for certificate
of need; for temporary worker housing; for state institution inspection; for
residential care facilities and for transient accommodations, in excess of the
fiscal growth factor established by Initiative Measure No. 601, if necessary,
to meet the actual costs of conducting business and the appropriation levels in
this section.

(3)
$339,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$339,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $678,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided
solely for technical assistance to local governments and special districts on
water conservation and reuse. $339,000 of the general fund‑-federal
amount may be expended in each fiscal year of the biennium, only if the state
receives greater than $25,000,000 from the federal government for salmon
recovery activities in that fiscal year. Funds authorized for expenditure in
fiscal year 2000 may be expended in fiscal year 2001.

(4)
$1,685,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2000 appropriation and
$1,686,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2001 appropriation are
provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound water work plan and
agency action items, DOH-01, DOH-02, DOH-03, and DOH-04.

(5)
The department of health shall not initiate any services that will require
expenditure of state general fund moneys unless expressly authorized in this
act or other law. The department may seek, receive, and spend, under RCW
43.79.260 through 43.79.282, federal moneys not anticipated in this act as long
as the federal funding does not require expenditure of state moneys for the
program in excess of amounts anticipated in this act. If the department
receives unanticipated unrestricted federal moneys, those moneys shall be spent
for services authorized in this act or in any other legislation that provides
appropriation authority, and an equal amount of appropriated state moneys shall
lapse. Upon the lapsing of any moneys under this subsection, the office of financial
management shall notify the legislative fiscal committees. As used in this
subsection, "unrestricted federal moneys" includes block grants and
other funds that federal law does not require to be spent on specifically
defined projects or matched on a formula basis by state funds.

(6)
(($620,000)) $20,620,000 of the tobacco prevention and control
account appropriation and $209,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation are provided solely for ((implementation of Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5516 or, if the bill is not enacted, for)) the
development and initial implementation of a sustainable, long-term,
comprehensive tobacco control program. ((The plan shall identify a specific
set of outcome measures that shall be used to track long range progress in
reducing the use of tobacco. Nationally accepted measures that can be used to
compare progress with other states shall be included. The plan shall emphasize
programs that have demonstrated effectiveness in achieving progress towards the
specified outcome measures. Components of the plan that do not have a record
of success may be included, provided that the plan also includes the means of
evaluating those components. The plan shall also include an inventory of
existing publically funded programs that seek to prevent the use of tobacco,
alcohol, or other drugs by children and youth and recommendations to coordinate
and consolidate these programs in order to achieve greatest positive outcomes
within total available resources. A preliminary plan shall be submitted to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 1999, with the final
plan submitted by September 1, 2000.))

(7)
$2,075,000 of fiscal year 2000 general fund‑-state appropriation and
$2,075,000 of fiscal year 2001 general fund‑-state appropriation are
provided for the Washington poison center. The department shall require the
center to develop a long range financing plan that identifies options for
diversifying funding for center operations, including, but not limited to,
federal grants, private sector grants and sponsorships, and multistate or
regional operating agreements. The plan shall be submitted to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2000.

(8)
$50,000 of fiscal year 2000 general fund--state appropriation and $50,000 of
fiscal year 2001 general fund--state appropriation are provided solely for fund
raising and other activities for the development of early hearing loss
clinics. The development plan for these clinics shall not assume ongoing
general fund‑-state appropriations.

(9)
$100,000 of the fiscal year 2001 general fund‑-state appropriation is
provided for functional and consolidated space planning for the department.
The department shall also conduct an analysis of the financing of the public
health system and report findings and recommendations to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2000. The report shall address
how to link public health financing to expected performance standards for local
health jurisdictions, potential alternatives for the organization of public
health services, and other ways to achieve efficiencies in the provision of
public health services. The department may use up to $50,000 from within
existing funds to conduct the analysis.

Sec.
220. 1999
c 309 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF CORRECTIONS

The
appropriations to the department of corrections in chapter 309, Laws of 1999,
as amended, shall be expended for the programs and in the amounts specified
therein. However, after April 1, 2000, unless specifically prohibited by this
act, the department may transfer general fund‑-state appropriations for
fiscal year 2000 between the correctional operations and community supervision
programs after approval by the director of financial management. The director
of financial management shall notify the appropriate fiscal committees of the
senate and house of representatives in writing prior to approving any
deviations from appropriation levels.

(1)
ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((29,449,000))

28,064,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((28,169,000))

28,022,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((5,216,000))

2,962,000

Cost
of Supervision Fund Appropriation......... $ 2,254,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((62,834,000))

61,302,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
$2,072,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$212,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
((and $5,216,000)) $2,962,000 of the public safety and education
account appropriation and $2,254,000 of the cost of supervision fund
appropriation are provided solely for replacement of the department's
offender-based tracking system. These amounts are subject to section 902 of
this act.

(b)
$462,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $538,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5421 (offender accountability). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2)
CORRECTIONAL OPERATIONS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((363,411,000))

360,882,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((364,857,000))

365,189,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((34,393,000))

35,577,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 1,614,000

Public
Health Services Account Appropriation... $ 1,884,000

Institutional
Welfare Betterment Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,570,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((764,275,000))

767,716,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
Not more than $3,000,000 may be expended to provide financial assistance to
counties for monitoring and treatment services provided to felony offenders
involved in drug court programs pursuant to sections 7 though 12 of Engrossed
Second Substitute House Bill No. 1006 (drug offender sentencing). The
secretary may negotiate terms, conditions, and amounts of assistance with
counties or groups of counties operating drug courts, and may review charging
and other documents to verify eligibility for payment. The secretary may
contract with the division of alcohol and substance abuse, department of social
and health services, for monitoring and treatment services provided pursuant to
this subsection.

(b)
The department may expend funds generated by contractual agreements entered
into for mitigation of severe overcrowding in local jails. If any funds are
generated in excess of actual costs, they shall be deposited in the state
general fund. Expenditures shall not exceed revenue generated by such
agreements and shall be treated as recovery of costs.

(c)
The department shall provide funding for the pet partnership program at the
Washington corrections center for women at a level at least equal to that
provided in the 1995‑97 biennium.

(d)
The department of corrections shall accomplish personnel reductions with the
least possible impact on correctional custody staff, community custody staff,
and correctional industries. For the purposes of this subsection, correctional
custody staff means employees responsible for the direct supervision of
offenders.

(e)
$583,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,178,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to increase payment rates for contracted education
providers and contracted work release facilities. It is the legislature's
intent that these amounts be used primarily to increase compensation for
persons employed in direct, front‑line service delivery.

(f)
$151,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $57,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5421 (offender accountability). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(g)
$18,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$334,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
are provided solely for the implementation of Senate Bill No. 5538 (sentencing)
or section 3 of House Bill No. 1544 (sentencing corrections). If neither bill
is enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(h)
$171,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,094,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
House Bill No. 1006 (drug offender sentencing). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(i)
The department of corrections shall submit to the appropriate policy and fiscal
committees of the senate and house of representatives, by December 15, 1999, a
report on how the department plans to manage hepatitis C in the inmate
population. In developing the plan, the department shall work with recognized
experts in the field and shall take notice of the current national institutes
of health hepatitis C guidelines and hepatitis C protocols observed in other
correctional settings. Included in the plan shall be offender education about
the disease, how and when offenders would be tested, how the disease would be
managed if an inmate is determined to have hepatitis C, and an estimate of the
number of inmates in the Washington prison system with hepatitis C. The
proposed plan must also include recommendations to the legislature on ways to
improve hepatitis C disease management and what level of funding would be
necessary to appropriately test for and treat the disease.

(j)
For the acquisition of properties and facilities, the department of corrections
is authorized to enter into financial contracts, paid for from operating
resources, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal
amounts indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW. This authority applies to the following:

(A)
Enter into a long-term ground lease or a long-term lease with purchase option
for development of a Tacoma prerelease facility for approximately $360,000 per
year. Prior to entering into any lease, the department of corrections shall
obtain written confirmation from the city of Tacoma and Pierce county that the
prerelease facility planned for the site meets all land use, environmental
protection, and community notification requirements.

(B)
Enter into a financing contract in the amount of $21,350,000 to acquire,
construct, or remodel a 400-bed, expandable to 600-bed, Tacoma prerelease
facility.

(C)
Lease-develop with the option to purchase or lease-purchase approximately 100
work release beds in facilities throughout the state for $7,000,000.

(k)
$1,884,000 of the public health services account appropriation is provided
solely for costs associated with the testing, treatment, and other activities
related to managing hepatitis C in the inmate population.

(l)
$117,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No.
6255 (anhydrous ammonia). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2000, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(m)
$2,570,000 of the institutional welfare betterment account appropriation is
provided solely for deposit in the public health services account.

(n)
During the 1999-01 biennium, when contracts are established or renewed for
offender pay phone and other telephone services provided to inmates, the
department shall select the contractor or contractors primarily based on the
following factors: (i) The lowest rate charged to both the inmate and the
person paying for the telephone call; and (ii) the lowest commission rates paid
to the department, while providing reasonable compensation to cover the costs
of the department to provide the telephone services to inmates and provide
sufficient revenues for the activities funded from the institutional welfare
betterment account as of January 1, 2000.

(3)
COMMUNITY SUPERVISION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((54,371,000))

52,074,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((61,321,000))

60,025,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((115,692,000))

112,099,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
The department of corrections shall accomplish personnel reductions with the
least possible impact on correctional custody staff, community custody staff,
and correctional industries. For the purposes of this subsection, correctional
custody staff means employees responsible for the direct supervision of
offenders.

(b)
$445,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2000 and $6,662,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for
fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5421 (offender accountability). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(c)
$109,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $126,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No.
5011 (dangerous mentally ill offenders). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(d)
$219,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $75,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
are provided solely for the department of corrections to contract with the
institute for public policy for responsibilities assigned in Engrossed Second
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5421 (offender accountability act) and sections 7
through 12 of Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1006 (drug offender
sentencing).

(4)
CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 817,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((3,654,000))

3,523,000

Institutional
Welfare Betterment Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,509,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((4,471,000))

7,849,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for transfer to the jail industries board. The board
shall use the amounts provided only for administrative expenses, equipment
purchases, and technical assistance associated with advising cities and
counties in developing, promoting, and implementing consistent, safe, and
efficient offender work programs.

(b)
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for the correctional industries board of directors to hire one
staff person, responsible directly to the board, to assist the board in
fulfilling its duties.

(5)
INTERAGENCY PAYMENTS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((12,823,000))

12,898,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((11,908,000))

11,983,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((24,731,000))

24,881,000

Sec.
221. 1999
c 309 s 224 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SENTENCING
GUIDELINES COMMISSION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 803,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((746,000))

838,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((1,549,000))

1,641,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$63,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2000 is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed Second Substitute
Senate Bill No. 5421 (offender accountability). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(2)
$80,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided solely for the sentencing guidelines commission to conduct a
comprehensive review and evaluation of state sentencing policy. The review and
evaluation shall include an analysis of whether current sentencing ranges and
standards, as well as existing mandatory minimum sentences, existing sentence
enhancements, and special sentencing alternatives, are consistent with the
purposes of the sentencing reform act as set out in RCW 9.94A.010. The review
and evaluation shall also examine whether current sentencing ranges and
standards are consistent with existing corrections capacity.

The
review and evaluation shall consider studies on the cost-effectiveness of
sentencing alternatives, as well as the fiscal impact of sentencing policies on
state and local government. In conducting the review and evaluation, the
commission shall consult with the superior court judges' association, the
Washington association of prosecuting attorneys, the Washington defenders' association,
the Washington association of criminal defense lawyers, the Washington
association of sheriffs and police chiefs, organizations representing crime
victims, and other organizations and individuals with expertise and interest in
sentencing policy.

Not
later than December 1, 2001, the commission shall present to the appropriate
standing committees of the legislature the report of its comprehensive review
and evaluation, together with any recommendations for revisions and
modifications to state sentencing policy, including sentencing ranges and
standards, mandatory minimum sentences, and sentence enhancements. If
implementation of the recommendations of the commission would result in
exceeding the capacity of correctional facilities, the commission shall at the
same time present to the legislature a list of revised standard sentence ranges
which are consistent with currently authorized rated and operational
corrections capacity, and consistent with the purposes of the sentencing reform
act.

Sec.
222. 1999
c 309 s 225 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE EMPLOYMENT
SECURITY DEPARTMENT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 1,263,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((1,259,000))

1,449,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 209,498,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 29,135,000

Unemployment
Compensation Administration Account‑-

Federal
Appropriation...................... $ ((174,343,000))

168,145,000

Administrative
Contingency Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 9,443,000

Employment
Service Administrative Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((16,890,000))

18,730,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((441,831,000))

437,663,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Expenditures of funds appropriated in this section for the information systems
project to improve the agency's labor exchange system are conditioned upon
compliance with section 902 of this act.

(2)
$327,000 of the unemployment compensation administration account‑-federal
appropriation is provided consistent with section 903(c)(2) of the federal
social security act to address deficiencies in the tax and wage information
system (TAXIS) and to improve the quality and timeliness of employer tax
information and employee wage records.

(3)
$190,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided solely for a study of Washington's contingent work force. The study
shall be conducted in cooperation with the senate labor and workforce development
committee, the house of representatives commerce and labor committee, and an
advisory group including representatives of the business and labor
communities. The department shall submit an interim report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature by December 1, 2000, and a final report by June
30, 2001. The study shall address:

(a)
The number of workers, in both the private and the public sectors, that are
part of the contingent work force;

(b)
The demographic profile of the contingent work force;

(c)
The wage and benefit profile of the contingent work force;

(d)
The industrial profile of the contingent work force;

(e)
The geographic profile of the contingent work force;

(f)
The growth rate of the contingent work force;

(g)
The explanations for the growth of the contingent work force;

(h)
The preference for contingent work compared to the preference for noncontingent
work;

(i)
The duration of contingent work compared to the duration of noncontingent work;

(j)
State and federal laws, if any, that provide for a different level of employee
benefits based on the number of hours per week a person works or on the
permanence of his or her employment;

(k)
The extent to which employment-based benefits are based on the number of hours
per week a person works or on the permanence of his or her employment;

(l)
The impact of the growth of the contingent work force on workers, families,
businesses, social services, local economies, and the state economy; and

(m) Legislative proposals, at either the federal or state level,
related to the contingent work force.

(End of part)

PART
III

NATURAL
RESOURCES

Sec.
301. 1999
c 309 s 302 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((33,558,000))

36,462,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((33,539,000))

45,015,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((48,981,000))

55,141,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 4,234,000

Special
Grass Seed Burning Research Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 14,000

Reclamation
Revolving Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,735,000

Flood
Control Assistance Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 3,989,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 749,000

State
Emergency Water Projects Revolving Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 317,000

Waste
Reduction/Recycling/Litter Control Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((13,192,000))

13,193,000

State
Drought Preparedness Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 675,000

Salmon
Recovery Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,120,000

State
and Local Improvements Revolving Account

(Water
Supply Facilities)‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 557,000

Water
Quality Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((3,879,000))

3,881,000

Wood
Stove Education and Enforcement Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((351,000))

551,000

Worker
and Community Right-to-Know Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 3,155,000

State
Toxics Control Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((46,838,000))

49,869,000

State
Toxics Control Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 377,000

Local
Toxics Control Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((4,586,000))

4,587,000

Water
Quality Permit Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((21,003,000))

21,763,000

Underground
Storage Tank Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,475,000

Environmental
Excellence Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 20,000

Biosolids
Permit Account‑-State Appropriation... $ 572,000

Hazardous
Waste Assistance Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((3,942,000))

3,943,000

Air
Pollution Control Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((15,844,000))

4,576,000

Oil
Spill Administration Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((7,521,000))

7,522,000

Air
Operating Permit Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((3,548,000))

3,549,000

Freshwater
Aquatic Weeds Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,430,000

Oil
Spill Response Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 7,078,000

Metals
Mining Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 43,000

Water
Pollution Control Revolving Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 439,000

Water
Pollution Control Revolving Account‑-

Federal
Appropriation...................... $ 2,200,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((266,537,000))

281,231,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$3,432,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$3,438,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
$394,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation, $2,070,000 of the
oil spill administration account‑-state appropriation, $819,000 of the
state toxics control account‑-state appropriation, and $3,686,000 of the
water quality permit account‑-state appropriation are provided solely for
the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action items DOE-01,
DOE-02, DOE-03, DOE-05, DOE-06, DOE-07, DOE-08, and DOE-09.

(2)
$170,000 of the oil spill administration account appropriation is provided
solely for implementation of the Puget Sound work plan action item UW-02
through a contract with the University of Washington's sea grant program to
develop an educational program targeted to small spills from commercial fishing
vessels, ferries, cruise ships, ports, and marinas.

(3)
$374,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $283,000
of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for the department to digitize water rights documents and to provide
this information to watershed planning groups.

(4)
(($500,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation is provided solely for
the department to update its water rights tracking system. $250,000 of this
amount may be expended in each fiscal year of the biennium only if the state
receives greater than $25,000,000 from the federal government for salmon
recovery activities in that fiscal year. Funds authorized for expenditure in
fiscal year 2000 may be expended in fiscal year 2001.

(5)))
$1,566,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation, $1,033,000 of the
general fund‑-private/local appropriation, and $919,000 of the water
quality account appropriation are provided to employ residents of the state
between eighteen and twenty-five years of age in activities to enhance
Washington's natural, historic, environmental, and recreational resources.

(((6)))
(5) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2000 is provided solely for study of the impacts of gravel removal on the
hydrology of Maury Island. The study shall consider impacts to the nearshore
environment and aquifer recharge, and assess the potential for groundwater or
marine sediment contamination. The department shall contract for the study,
which shall be completed by June 30, 2000.

(((7)))
(6) $250,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2000 is provided solely for a study of the impacts of gravel deposit on the
Highline aquifer. The study shall consider impacts to instream flow and
sedimentation of Des Moines, Miller, and Walker creeks. The department shall
contract for the study, which shall be completed by June 30, 2000.

(((8)))
(7) The entire freshwater aquatic weeds account appropriation shall be
distributed according to the provisions of RCW 43.21A.660. Funding may be
provided for chemical control of Eurasian watermilfoil.

(((9)))
(8) $15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2000 and $15,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
are provided solely to monitor and address, in coordination with the marine
operations division of the department of transportation, odor problems in
Fauntleroy Cove.

(((10)))
(9) $144,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2000((,)) and $133,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2001((, and $277,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation)) are provided solely for water quality activities related to
forest practices. (($138,500 of the general fund‑-federal amount may
be expended in each fiscal year of the biennium only if the state receives
greater than $25,000,000 from the federal government for salmon recovery
activities in that fiscal year. Funds authorized for expenditure in fiscal
year 2000 may be expended in fiscal year 2001.

(11))) (10)
$100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 is provided
solely for the department to form an advisory committee for the purpose of
updating the department's storm water management plan and the Puget Sound storm
water management manual. The advisory committee shall be appointed no later
than September 1, 1999, and it shall provide its recommendations on storm water
management to the legislature by December 31, 2000.

(((12)))
(11) $383,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2000 and $384,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for an agency permit assistance center,
including four regional permit assistance offices.

(((13)))
(12) $438,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2000, $1,025,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2001, and $1,870,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are
provided solely ((to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5670 (noxious weed
herbicide))) for the establishment of total maximum daily loads for water
bodies across the state((. $433,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation is to implement the Puget Sound work plan and agency action item
DOE-2. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse)), and for pilot projects to evaluate the
ability of existing voluntary and regulatory programs to improve water quality
in water quality limited segments listed pursuant to section 303(d) of the
federal clean water act. In areas with a ground water management area, total
maximum daily loads that include a ground water element will be done in
cooperation with the ground water management area process. Pilot projects
shall include the following allocations from the general fund‑-state
amounts provided in this subsection: $100,000 shall be provided to a
conservation district in the Palouse region; $100,000 shall be provided to the
Lake Whatcom management committee through the city of Bellingham; and $250,000
shall be provided to the Roza-Sunnyside irrigation district joint board of
control. Each pilot project sponsor shall provide a report to the
legislature by January 1, 2001, describing the water quality goals of the
project, how the goals relate to meeting state water quality standards, the
strategies to accomplish those goals, and the method of evaluating project
effectiveness. The pilot project sponsors shall also submit final reports to
the legislature at project completion.

(((14)))
(13) $591,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2000 and $1,131,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to process water rights applications.

(((15)))
(14) $414,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2000((,)) and $383,000 of the general fund--state appropriation
for fiscal year 2001((, and $797,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation)) are provided solely for technical assistance and project
review for water conservation and reuse projects. (($398,000 of the general
fund--federal appropriation may be expended in each fiscal year of the biennium
only if the state receives greater than $25,000,000 from the federal government
for salmon recovery activities in that fiscal year. Funds authorized for
expenditure in fiscal year 2000 may be expended in fiscal year 2001.

(16))) (15)
The entire salmon recovery account appropriation is provided to increase
compliance with existing water quality and water resources laws.

(((17)
$4,500,000)) (16) $4,250,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2000((, $4,500,000)) and $4,750,000
of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001((, and
$1,500,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation)) are provided
solely for grants to local governments to conduct watershed planning. (($750,000
of the general fund‑-federal amount may be expended in each fiscal year
of the biennium only if the state receives greater than $25,000,000 from the
federal government for salmon recovery activities in that fiscal year. Funds
authorized for expenditure in fiscal year 2000 may be expended in fiscal year
2001)) Of the general fund‑-state amounts provided in this
subsection, $500,000 is provided solely for a grant to the Methow river
planning unit to develop baseline hydrological data for the Methow river.

(((18)))
(17) $100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2000((,)) and $82,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2001((, and $181,000 of the general fund‑-federal
appropriation)) are provided solely for the department, in cooperation with
the department of fish and wildlife, to establish fish and habitat index
monitoring sites to measure the effectiveness of salmon recovery activities.
(($90,500 of the general fund‑-federal amount may be expended in each
fiscal year of the biennium only if the state receives greater than $25,000,000
from the federal government for salmon recovery activities in that fiscal
year. Funds authorized for expenditure in fiscal year 2000 may be expended in
fiscal year 2001.

(19))) (18)
$276,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$207,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5424 (aquatic plant management).
If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(((20)))
(19) $500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2000 and $500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for the continuation of the southwest
Washington coastal erosion study.

(((21)))
(20) $638,000 of the oil spill administration account appropriation is
provided solely to implement Substitute House Bill No. 2247 (oil spill response
tax). Of this amount: (a) $120,000 is provided solely for spill response
equipment; (b) $307,000 is provided solely to develop an oil spill risk
management plan; and (c) $211,000 is provided solely for spills information
management improvements. If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the
amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((23)))
(21) $145,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2000
appropriation and $145,000 of the general fund‑-state fiscal year 2001
appropriation are provided solely for training and technical assistance to
support the activities of county water conservancy boards.

(22)
$3,154,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2000 and $6,649,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2001 are provided solely to maintain the state's air quality program.
Within the funds provided in this subsection, the department shall maintain
funding for local air pollution control authorities at no less than ninety
percent of the level of grants provided prior to January 1, 2000.

(23)
$749,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation for fiscal
year 2001 is provided solely for methamphetamine lab clean up activities.

(24)
$300,000 of the state drought preparedness account‑-state appropriation
for fiscal year 2001 is provided solely for a preconstruction and feasibility
analysis of the Roza irrigation district off-stream storage project at Washout
canyon. Moneys may be expended from the amount provided in this subsection
only to the extent that matching funds in cash and in-kind contributions are
provided by the Roza irrigation district. If this match is not provided by the
district, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(25)
$3,340,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
is provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 6446 (extension of comprehensive
plan deadlines) or House Bill No. 2391 (shoreline planning). Of this amount,
$3,000,000 is for grants to local governments, and $340,000 is for technical
assistance. If neither bill is enacted by June 30, 2000, the amount provided
in this subsection shall lapse.

(26)
$3,000,000 of the state toxics control account appropriation is provided solely
for cleanup actions related to the Everett smelter site in the city of
Everett. The department shall seek recovery of the funds expended for this
purpose from the liable parties by way of a settlement agreement or court
action under the authority of chapter 70.105D RCW, the model toxics control
act. Moneys collected as a result of a cost recovery action at the Everett
smelter site shall be used first to reimburse the local toxics control account
for the total amount of this appropriation.

(27)
$1,100,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 is provided solely for processing of water right applications for changes
and transfers in accordance with Senate Bill No. 6525 (water right changes and
transfers) or Engrossed House Bill No. 2994 (trust water rights). If neither
bill is enacted by June 30, 2000, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(28)
$375,000 of the state drought preparedness account‑-state appropriation
is provided solely for an environmental impact statement of the Pine Hollow
reservoir project to be conducted in conjunction with the local irrigation
district.

(29)
$150,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided solely for creating the task force on water storage. The purpose of
the task force is to examine the role of increased water storage in providing
water supplies to meet the needs of fish, population growth, and economic
development, and to enhance the protection of people's lives and their property
and the protection of aquatic habitat through flood control facilities. For
this purpose, increased storage may be in the form of surface storage including
off-stream storage, underground storage, or the enlargement or enhancement of
existing structures. The task force shall also examine means of providing
funding for increased water storage.

The
department of ecology shall provide staff support for the task force and the
director of the department of ecology shall convene the first meeting of the
task force not less than thirty days after the effective date of this section.

No
member of the task force shall receive compensation, per diem, or reimbursement
of expenses from the task force or the department of ecology for his or her
activities as a member of the task force. However, each may receive such
compensation, per diem, and/or reimbursement as is authorized by the entity he
or she is employed by, is appointed from, or represents on the task force.

Following
its examination, the task force shall report its recommendations to the
appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31, 2000.

Sec.
302. 1999
c 309 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((27,498,000))

27,522,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((28,073,000))

28,227,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 2,113,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 59,000

Winter
Recreation Program Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 763,000

Off
Road Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation... $ 264,000

Snowmobile
Account‑-State Appropriation........ $ 3,653,000

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 325,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 48,000

Water
Trail Program Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 14,000

Parks
Renewal and Stewardship Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 25,907,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((88,717,000))

88,895,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$189,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan agency action items
P&RC-01 and P&RC-03.

(2)
(($105,000)) $65,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and (($31,000)) $71,000 of the
general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for the state parks and recreation commission to meet its
responsibilities under the Native American graves protection and repatriation
act (P.L. 101-601).

(3)
$2,000,000 of the parks renewal and stewardship account appropriation is
dependent upon the parks and recreation commission generating revenue to the
account in excess of $26,000,000 for the biennium. These funds shall be used
for deferred maintenance and visitor and ranger safety activities.

(4)
$772,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $849,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided to employ residents of the state between eighteen and
twenty-five years of age in activities to enhance Washington's natural,
historic, environmental, and recreational resources.

(5)
Fees approved by the state parks and recreation commission in 1998 for camping,
group camping, extra vehicles, and the sno-park daily permit are authorized to
exceed the fiscal growth factor under RCW 43.135.055.

(6)
(($40,000)) $79,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2000 and (($40,000)) $79,000 of the general
fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for a grant
for the operation of the Northwest avalanche center.

(7)
The state parks and recreation commission may increase fees adopted prior to
January 1, 2000, for implementation on or after July 1, 2000, in excess of the
fiscal growth factor under RCW 43.135.055.

(8)
$25,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$75,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for a study on existing and future recreational needs and
opportunities on the west slope of the Cascade foothills. The study shall
include an inventory of existing land and facilities, an assessment of
projected demand, and recommendations for regional coordination among public and
private outdoor recreation providers to promote expanded recreation
opportunities within the Cascade foothills. The study shall be submitted to
the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30,
2001.

Sec.
303. 1999
sp.s. c 13 s 21 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 137,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 138,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation.................. $.................................. 3,332,000

Firearms
Range Account‑-State Appropriation......... $ 34,000

Recreation
Resources Account‑-State Appropriation.... $................................................ 2,370,000

Recreation
Resources Account‑-Federal Appropriation. $ 11,000

NOVA
Program Account‑-State Appropriation........... $ 604,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ ((3,294,000))

6,626,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions
and limitations:

(1)
$137,000 of the fiscal year 2000 general fund‑-state appropriation and
$138,000 of the fiscal year 2001 general fund‑-state appropriation are
provided solely to implement Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5595 or
Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 2079 (salmon recovery). If legislation
establishing the board is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

(2)
$3,332,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is provided for the
development of guidelines for hatchery management, and for actions to use
hatcheries to directly support fisheries, assist with the recovery of natural
stocks, and minimize the potentially negative effects of hatchery programs on
naturally spawning populations.

Sec.
304. 1999
c 309 s 306 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((2,630,000))

2,680,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((2,634,000))

2,851,000

((General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation.......... $ 1,800,000))

Salmon
Recovery Account‑-State Appropriation... $ 3,618,000

Water
Quality Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 444,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((11,126,000))

9,593,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$182,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$182,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $130,000 of the water quality account appropriation are provided solely for
the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan agency action item CC-01.

(2)
$550,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $550,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for grants to conservation districts to reduce nitrate
contamination in the Columbia Basin ground water management area.

(3)
$1,968,000 of the salmon recovery account appropriation is provided solely for
conducting limiting factors analysis for salmon species.

(4)
$167,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
and $250,000 of the salmon recovery account appropriation ((is)) are
provided solely for the agriculture, fish, and water negotiation process,
including a facilitated review of the field office technical guides of the
federal natural resource conservation service to ensure the guides meet the
requirements of the federal endangered species act and clean water act.

(5)
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for the agricultural and environmental communities for costs
associated with participating in the agriculture, fish, and water negotiation
process.

(((5)))
(6) $500,000 of the salmon recovery account appropriation ((and
$1,500,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation are)) is
provided solely for a volunteer salmon recovery initiative. ((The salmon
recovery account)) This appropriation is provided for volunteer
coordination through regional fisheries enhancement groups. (($750,000 of
the general fund‑‑federal amount may be expended in each fiscal
year only if the state receives greater than $25,000,000 from the federal
government for salmon recovery activities in that fiscal year. Funds
authorized for expenditure in fiscal year 2000 may be expended in fiscal year
2001.

(6))) (7)
$900,000 of the salmon recovery account appropriation ((and $300,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation are)) is provided solely
for local salmon recovery technical assistance. Technical assistance shall be
coordinated among all state agencies including the conservation commission,
department of fish and wildlife, department of ecology, department of health,
department of agriculture, department of transportation, state parks and
recreation, interagency committee for outdoor recreation, governor's salmon
recovery office, Puget Sound water quality action team, department of
community, trade, and economic development, and department of natural
resources. (($150,000 of the general fund‑-federal amount may be
expended in each fiscal year of the biennium only if the state receives greater
than $25,000,000 from the federal government for salmon recovery activities in
that fiscal year. Funds authorized for expenditure in fiscal year 2000 may be
expended in fiscal year 2001.))

Sec.
305. 1999
c 309 s 307 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((42,896,000))

42,646,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((42,443,000))

44,521,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((42,755,000))

37,380,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ ((14,416,000))

16,800,000

Off
Road Vehicle Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 490,000

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((6,432,000))

5,992,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 586,000

Recreational
Fisheries Enhancement Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 3,596,000

Salmon
Recovery Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 9,316,000

Warm
Water Game Fish Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((2,419,000))

2,499,000

Eastern
Washington Pheasant Enhancement Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((551,000))

851,000

Wildlife
Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ ((40,293,000))

41,109,000

Wildlife
Account‑-Federal Appropriation........ $ ((40,040,000))

38,040,000

Wildlife
Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ ((13,072,000))

15,072,000

Game
Special Wildlife Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,939,000

Game
Special Wildlife Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 9,603,000

Game
Special Wildlife Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 350,000

Environmental
Excellence Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 15,000

Regional
Fisheries Salmonid Recovery Account‑-

Federal
Appropriation...................... $ ((750,000))

1,750,000

Oil
Spill Administration Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 969,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((272,931,000))

273,524,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$1,252,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,244,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan
agency action items DFW-01, DFW-02, DFW-03, DFW-04, and DFW-05.

(2)
$776,000 of the salmon recovery account appropriation ((and $775,000 of the
general fund--federal appropriation are)) is provided solely for the
department's review of forest practices applications and related hydraulic
permit applications. ((Up to $387,500 of the general fund‑-federal
amount may be expended in each fiscal year of the biennium only if the state
receives greater than $25,000,000 from the federal government for salmon
recovery activities in that fiscal year. Funds authorized for expenditure in
fiscal year 2000 may be expended in fiscal year 2001.))

(3)
$1,500,000 of the salmon recovery account appropriation ((and $1,500,000 of
the general fund--federal appropriation are)) is provided solely for
the department to update the salmon and steelhead stock inventory and, in
cooperation with the department of ecology, to establish fish and habitat index
monitoring sites to measure the effectiveness of salmon recovery activities.
((Up to $750,000 of the general fund‑-federal amount may be expended
in each fiscal year of the biennium only if the state receives greater than
$25,000,000 from the federal government for salmon recovery activities in that
fiscal year. Funds authorized for expenditure in fiscal year 2000 may be
expended in fiscal year 2001.))

(4)
$232,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $232,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided for the control of European green crab (Carcinus maenas).
The department shall submit a report to the governor and the appropriate
legislative committees by September 1, 2000, evaluating the effectiveness of
various control strategies and providing recommendations on long-term control
strategies. $248,000 of this amount is for implementation of Puget Sound work
plan and agency action item DFW-23.

(5)
$191,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $191,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided for noxious weed control and survey activities on department
lands. Of this amount, $48,000 is provided for the biological control of
yellowstar thistle.

(6)
All salmon habitat restoration and protection projects proposed for funding by
regional fisheries enhancement groups shall be submitted by January 1st or July
1st of each year for review to the salmon recovery funding board.

(7)
$2,340,000 of the salmon recovery account appropriation and $7,000,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided solely to implement a
license buy-back program for commercial fishing licenses.

(8)
$511,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $488,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided to employ residents of the state between eighteen and
twenty-five years of age in activities to enhance Washington's natural,
historic, environmental, and recreational resources.

(9)
Any indirect cost reimbursement received by the department from federal grants
must be spent on agency administrative activities and cannot be redirected to
direct program activities.

(10)
$43,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$42,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for staffing and operation of the Tennant Lake interpretive
center.

(11)
$32,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$33,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely to support the activities of the aquatic nuisance species
coordination committee to foster state, federal, tribal, and private
cooperation on aquatic nuisance species issues. The committee shall strive to
prevent the introduction of nonnative aquatic species and to minimize the
spread of species that are introduced.

(12)
(($50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$50,000)) $100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for
fiscal year 2001 ((are)) is provided solely to implement Senate
Bill No. 5508 (crab catch record cards). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(13)
$6,440,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$5,796,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
$12,260,000 of the wildlife account--state appropriation, $710,000 of the
aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation, and $500,000 of the public
safety and education account appropriation are provided solely for operation of
the enforcement division. Within these funds, the department shall emphasize
enforcement of laws related to protection of fish habitat and the illegal
harvest of salmon and steelhead. Within these funds, the department shall
provide support to the department of health to enforce state shellfish harvest
laws.

(14)
$500,000 of the salmon recovery account, $624,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2000, and $624,000 of the general fund--state
appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for the department to
implement a hatchery endangered species act response. The strategy shall
include emergency hatchery responses and retrofitting of hatcheries for salmon
recovery.

(15)
$45,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$46,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for operation of the Rod Meseberg (ringold) warm water fish
hatchery to implement House Bill No. 1716 (warm water fish culture). If the
bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection
shall lapse.

(16)
$2,500,000 of the salmon recovery account appropriation is provided solely for
grants to lead entities established in accordance with RCW 75.46.060.

(17)
$200,000 of the salmon recovery account appropriation ((and $600,000 of the
general fund‑-federal appropriation are)) is provided solely
for salmon and steelhead predation control((,)) and
bycatch monitoring((, and selective harvest strategies. $300,000 of the
general fund‑-federal amount may be expended in each fiscal year of the
biennium only if the state receives greater than $25,000,000 from the federal
government for salmon recovery activities in that fiscal year. Funds
authorized for expenditure in fiscal year 2000 may be expended in fiscal year
2001)) strategies.

(18)
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 ((and)),
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $150,000 of the wildlife account‑-state appropriation are
provided solely for ((additional field surveys of the Olympic Peninsula,
North Rainier, and Packwood/South Rainier)) field surveys and harvest
management for Washington elk herds.

(19)
(($425,000)) $155,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and (($75,000)) $345,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely to purchase and implement the automated recreational license data base
system.

(20)
$1,400,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,400,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for fish passage barrier and screening technical
assistance, engineering services, and construction assistance for local
governments, state agencies, volunteer groups, and regional fisheries
enhancement groups.

(21)
$1,500,000 of the salmon recovery account appropriation ((and $500,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are)) is provided
solely for local salmon recovery technical assistance. Technical assistance
shall be coordinated among all state agencies including the conservation
commission, department of fish and wildlife, department of ecology, department
of health, department of agriculture, department of transportation, state parks
and recreation, interagency committee for outdoor recreation, governor's salmon
recovery office, Puget Sound water quality action team, department of
community, trade, and economic development, and department of natural
resources. (($250,000 of the general fund‑-federal amount may be
expended in each fiscal year of the biennium, only if the state receives
greater than $25,000,000 from the federal government for salmon recovery
activities in that fiscal year. Funds authorized for expenditure in fiscal
year 2000 may be expended in fiscal year 2001.))

(22)
$400,000 of the wildlife account appropriation is provided solely to implement
House Bill No. 1681 (trout purchase by state). The fish and wildlife
commission may authorize expenditure of these funds only if the costs of the
program will be recovered by the increase in license sales directly
attributable to the planting of privately grown trout. If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(23)
(($50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5508 (crab fishery catch
records). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

(24)))
$2,000,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation is provided
for cooperative volunteer projects.

(24)
$245,000 of the state wildlife account appropriation is provided solely for
winter feeding of deer and winter range rehabilitation on the Chiliwist
wildlife area.

(25)
Within the appropriation from the wildlife account the department shall, at a
minimum, operate Reiter Pond at fiscal year 2000 production levels.

(26)
$384,000 of the general fund‑-private/local appropriation is provided
solely to implement Senate Bill No. 6277 (authorizing cost reimbursement
agreements). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2000, the amount provided
in this subsection shall lapse.

(27)
$400,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 is provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan
agency action items DFW-10 and DFW-18, implementing a comprehensive Puget Sound
ground fish and forage fish recovery plan.

(28)
$203,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided solely for data collection and analysis related to Lake Washington
sockeye.

(29)
$800,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided solely for additional enforcement staff to respond and take
appropriate action in response to public complaints regarding bear and cougar.

(30)
$500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
and $80,000 of the wildlife account‑‑state appropriation are
provided solely to implement an endangered species act strategy for state
hatchery operations, including fish passage improvements, screen compliance,
rearing strategies, and restoration of production.

Sec.
306. 1999
c 309 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 25,784,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((25,641,000))

28,576,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((12,656,000))

2,865,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ ((420,000))

1,604,000

Forest
Development Account‑-State

Appropriation............................... $ ((46,029,000))

48,086,000

Off
Road Vehicle Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,668,000

Surveys
and Maps Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,221,000

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((2,656,000))

2,356,000

Resources
Management Cost Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((77,016,000))

79,097,000

Surface
Mining Reclamation Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,435,000

Disaster
Response Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,651,000

Salmon
Recovery Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,483,000

Aquatic
Land Dredged Material Disposal Site

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ ((764,000))

1,014,000

Natural
Resource Conservation Areas Stewardship

Account
Appropriation...................... $ 1,100,000

Access
Road Revolving Fund‑‑State

Appropriation ........................... $ 8,600,000

Air
Pollution Control Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((864,000))

687,000

Metals
Mining Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 63,000

Agricultural
College Trust Management Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,736,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((205,536,000))

215,026,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$18,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$18,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and (($1,058,000)) $958,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement
account appropriation are provided solely for the implementation of the Puget
Sound work plan and agency action items DNR-01, DNR-02, and DNR-04.

(2)
$7,304,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
((and)), $7,304,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and $2,651,000 of the disaster response
account‑-state appropriation are provided solely for emergency fire
suppression.

(3)
$331,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $339,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for geologic studies to evaluate ground stability in
high growth areas and to provide geologic expertise to small communities.

(4)
$663,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $689,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided to employ residents of the state between eighteen and
twenty-five years of age in activities to enhance Washington's natural,
historic, environmental, and recreational resources.

(5)
$3,483,000 of the salmon recovery account appropriation ((and $10,991,000 of
the general fund‑-federal appropriation are provided for the department
to implement changes in forest practice rules for the protection of salmon.
$5,495,500 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation may be expended in
each fiscal year of the biennium only if the state receives greater than
$25,000,000 from the federal government for salmon recovery activities in that
fiscal year. Funds authorized for expenditure in fiscal year 2000 may be
expended in fiscal year 2001.)) and $3,000,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for implementation of
chapter 4, Laws of 1999 sp. sess.

(a)
Of the salmon recovery account appropriation in this subsection:

(i)
$2,580,000 is provided solely for costs associated with adopting and
implementing new forest rules for protection of riparian habitat and water
quality; road maintenance and abandonment planning; fish and water quality
compliance staff; geographic information systems improvements for forest roads
and hydrography; and updating the forest practices permit application system;
and

(ii)
$903,000 is provided solely to implement sections 501 through 505 of chapter 4,
Laws of 1999 sp. sess., including:

(A)
The establishment of a small landowner office;

(B)
Administration of the forestry riparian easement program;

(C)
Contracting with private consultants to perform timber cruises;

(D)
Development of small landowner options through alternate management plans;

(E)
Evaluation of cumulative impacts of alternate plans;

(F)
Establishment of a small landowners advisory committee;

(G)
Development of criteria for determining compensation for qualifying timber; and

(H)
Collection and reporting of the statistical information on small landowners as
directed in section 503 of chapter 4, Laws of 1999 sp. sess.

(b)
Of the general fund‑-state appropriation in this subsection:

(i)
$2,128,000 is provided solely for cooperative monitoring, evaluation, and
research projects; hazard zonation; adopting and implementing new forest rules
to protect riparian habitat and water quality; and geographic information
systems improvements for forest roads and hydrography; and

(ii)
$872,000 is provided solely for the department to implement sections 501
through 505 of chapter 4, laws of 1999 sp. sess., including providing technical
assistance for small forest landowners for the following:

(A)
Determining streamside buffers;

(B)
Preparation of road management plans;

(C)
Participation in watershed analysis and adaptive management;

(D)
Determining culvert replacement needs; and

(E)
Developing alternative plans to comply with forest and fish rules.

(6)
$44,000 of the resource management cost account appropriation is provided
solely for maintenance and safety improvements at the Gull Harbor marine
station. The department shall develop a plan for use or disposal of the marine
station by December 1, 1999.

(7)
$582,000 of the resource management cost account appropriation is provided
solely to expand geoduck resource management activities.

(8)
$172,000 of the resource management cost account appropriation is provided
solely to convert aquatic land maps and records to an electronic format.

(9)
$100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$100,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and
$400,000 of the aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation are provided
solely for spartina control. Within these amounts, the department shall
continue support for a field study of biological control methods.

(10)
$2,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $2,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for fire protection activities.

(11)
$450,000 of the resource management cost account appropriation is provided
solely for the control and eradication of class B designate weeds on state
lands.

(12)
$1,100,000 of the natural resources conservation areas stewardship account is
provided solely to the department for planning, management, and stewardship of
natural area preserves and natural resources conservation areas.

(13)
$384,000 of the general fund‑-private/local appropriation is provided
solely to implement Senate Bill No. 6277 (authorizing cost reimbursement
agreements). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2000, the amount provided
in this subsection shall lapse.

(14)
$1,918,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
$2,574,000 of the forest development account appropriation, and $4,625,000 of
the resource management cost account appropriation are provided solely for
agency administration and support for fiscal year 2001. Of these amounts, $90,000
of the general fund--state appropriation, $75,000 of the forest development
account appropriation, and $135,000 of the resource management cost account
appropriation are provided solely for independent staff to support the board of
natural resources. The office of financial management shall assist the board
with initial staff hiring.

(15)
$2,000,000 of the forest development account appropriation is provided solely
for immediate road decommissioning, maintenance, and repair in the Lake Whatcom
watershed.

(16)
The department shall submit a report of the uses of the access road revolving
fund to the legislature and the office of financial management no later than
December 1, 2000. The report shall include the following:

(a)
Distribution of funds from fiscal year 1996 through fiscal year 2000;

(b)
Types of activities funded;

(c)
Method for prioritizing road projects, state-wide and by region; and

(d)
Proposed plan for road maintenance and repair in the 2001-2003 biennium.

Sec.
307. 1999
c 309 s 309 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((7,476,000))

7,876,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001) ... $ ((7,316,000))

7,516,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 4,440,000

General
fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 410,000

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 818,000

State
Toxics Control Account‑-State

Appropriation....... ...................... $ 1,365,000

Local
Toxics Control Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 241,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((22,066,000))

22,666,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$36,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$37,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for technical assistance on pesticide management, including the
implementation of the Puget Sound work plan and agency action item DOA-01.

(2)
$241,000 of the local toxics control account appropriation is provided solely
to implement chapter 36, Laws of 1998 (fertilizer regulation). The amount
provided in this subsection shall be used to conduct a comprehensive study of
plant uptake of metals and to implement new fertilizer registration
requirements.

(3)
$133,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $127,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for technical assistance to local watershed and salmon
recovery planning efforts.

(4) $400,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2000 and $200,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation
for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for activities to control and
eradicate infestations of the asian gypsy moth.

(End of part)

PART
IV

TRANSPORTATION

Sec.
401. 1999
c 309 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF LICENSING

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((5,519,000))

5,630,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((4,947,000))

4,871,000

Architects'
License Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((754,000))

678,000

Cemetery
Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ ((203,000))

205,000

Profession
Engineers' Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((2,828,000))

2,703,000

Real
Estate Commission‑-State Appropriation.... $ ((7,114,000))

6,824,000

Master
License Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ ((7,423,000))

7,317,000

Uniform
Commercial Code Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((3,472,000))

3,448,000

Real
Estate Education Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((606,000))

630,000

Funeral
Directors and Embalmers Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((457,000))

472,000

Washington
Real Estate Research Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((368,000))

313,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((33,691,000))

33,091,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$25,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $100,000 of the professional engineers' account appropriation are provided
solely for Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5821 (on-site wastewater
treatment). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided
in this subsection shall lapse.

(2)
(($368,000)) $313,000 of the Washington real estate research
account appropriation is provided solely for the implementation of Engrossed
Senate Bill No. 5720 (real estate research). If the bill is not enacted by
June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec.
402. 1999
c 309 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE
PATROL

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((22,129,000))

21,496,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((20,858,000))

20,707,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 3,999,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 344,000

Death
Investigations Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((2,816,000))

3,689,000

Public
Safety and Education Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((6,867,000))

9,613,000

County
Criminal Justice Assistance Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((4,641,000))

2,887,000

Municipal
Criminal Justice Assistance Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((1,831,000))

1,118,000

Fire
Service Trust Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 125,000

Fire
Service Training Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((6,730,000))

6,731,000

Disaster
Response Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,386,000

State
Toxics Control Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 442,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 260,000

Fingerprint
Identification Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((2,392,000))

2,958,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((73,434,000))

75,755,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$255,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $95,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
are provided solely for replacement of fire training equipment at the fire
service training academy.

(2)
(($430,000)) $604,000 of the public safety and education account
appropriation is provided solely for implementation of Second Substitute Senate
Bill No. 5108 (missing/exploited children). If the bill is not enacted by June
30, 1999, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3)
$2,816,000 of the death investigation account appropriation is provided solely
for the implementation of Substitute House Bill No. 1560 (forensic lab
services). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

(4)
$2,900,000 of the fire service training account appropriation is provided
solely for the implementation of Second Substitute Senate Bill No. 5102 (fire
fighter training). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount
provided in this subsection shall lapse. In providing the fire fighter one
training program required by the bill, the state patrol shall, to the extent
possible, utilize existing public and private fire fighting training facilities
in southeastern Washington.

(5)
$354,000 of the public safety and education account appropriation is provided
solely for additional law enforcement and security coverage on the west capitol
campus.

(6)
$66,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$58,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for activities of the missing children's clearinghouse as related
to services performed under subsection 202(1) of this act. If that subsection
is not enacted, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(7)
$134,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided solely for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 6641 or
Substitute House Bill No. 2420 (oil and gas pipeline safety). If neither bill
is enacted by June 30, 2000, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(8)
$300,000 of the death investigation account appropriation is provided solely
for the operation of the state toxicology laboratory. If House Bill No. 2330
(liquor disbursements) is not enacted by June 30, 2000, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

(9) $1,386,000 of the disaster response account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for costs associated with the state patrol's
participation in support of the world trade organization conference.

(End of part)

PART
V

EDUCATION

Sec.
501. 1999
c 309 s 501 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR STATE
ADMINISTRATION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((27,800,000))

34,844,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((26,535,000))

45,918,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((78,121,000))

83,099,000

((Public
Safety and Education Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 6,602,000

Health
Services Account Appropriation.......... $ 5,242,000

Violence
Reduction and Drug Enforcement Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,671,000))

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((147,971,000))

163,861,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
AGENCY OPERATIONS

(a)
$404,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $403,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for the operation and expenses of the state board of education,
including basic education assistance activities.

(b)
$348,000 of the ((public safety and education account)) general fund‑-state
appropriation is provided for administration of the traffic safety education
program, including in-service training related to instruction in the risks of
driving while under the influence of alcohol and other drugs.

(c)
$128,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for
increased costs of providing a norm-referenced test to all third grade students
and retests of certain third grade students and other costs in accordance with
chapter 319, Laws of 1998 (student achievement).

(d)
$145,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for an
institutional education program director.

(2)
STATE-WIDE PROGRAMS

(a)
$2,524,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for
in-service training and educational programs conducted by the Pacific Science
Center. Of this amount, $350,000 is provided to add a math van.

(b)
$63,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for
operation of the Cispus environmental learning center.

(c)
$2,754,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for
educational centers, including state support activities. $100,000 of this
amount is provided to help stabilize funding through distribution among
existing education centers that are currently funded by the state at an amount
less than $100,000 a biennium.

(d)
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided for an
organization in southwest Washington that received funding from the Spokane
educational center in the 1995-97 biennium and provides educational services to
students who have dropped out of school.

(e)
(($3,671,000 of the violence reduction and drug enforcement account
appropriation and $2,252,000 of the public safety education account
appropriation are)) $5,923,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation
is provided solely for matching grants to enhance security in schools. Not
more than seventy-five percent of a district's total expenditures for school
security in any school year may be paid from a grant under this subsection.
The grants shall be expended solely for the costs of employing or contracting
for building security monitors in schools during school hours and school
events. Of the amount provided in this subsection, at least $2,850,000 shall
be spent for grants to districts that, during the 1988-89 school year, employed
or contracted for security monitors in schools during school hours. However,
these grants may be used only for increases in school district expenditures for
school security over expenditure levels for the 1988-89 school year.

(f)
$9,485,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for FY 2001 is
provided for school safety allocations to school districts. The amount
provided in this subsection (2)(f) is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(i)
School districts may use funds allocated under this subsection (2)(f) for
school safety purposes for the 2000-01 school year, including but not limited
to the following: Planning; training; equipment; before, during and
after-school safety; and minor building renovations.

(ii)
Allocations to school districts shall be made beginning on July 1, 2000, at a
maximum rate of $10.00 multiplied by the full-time equivalent enrollment of the
district. For purposes of this subsection "full-time equivalent
enrollment" means the average K-12 full-time equivalent enrollment from
September 1, 1999, to May 31, 2000.

(g)
$200,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000,
$200,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001,
and $400,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation transferred from the
department of health are provided solely for a program that provides grants to
school districts for media campaigns promoting sexual abstinence and addressing
the importance of delaying sexual activity, pregnancy, and childbearing until
individuals are ready to nurture and support their children. Grants to the
school districts shall be for projects that are substantially designed and
produced by students. The grants shall require a local private sector match
equal to one-half of the state grant, which may include in-kind contribution of
technical or other assistance from consultants or firms involved in public
relations, advertising, broadcasting, and graphics or video production or other
related fields.

(((g)))
(h) $1,500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2000 and $1,500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal
year 2001 are provided solely for school district petitions to juvenile court
for truant students as provided in RCW 28A.225.030 and 28A.225.035. Allocation
of this money to school districts shall be based on the number of petitions
filed.

(((h)))
(i) A maximum of $300,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation
is provided for alcohol and drug prevention programs pursuant to RCW 66.08.180.

(((i)))
(j) $5,702,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for shared infrastructure costs, data equipment maintenance,
and depreciation costs for operation of the K-20 telecommunications network.

(((j)))
(k) $4,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for a K-20 telecommunications network technical support system
in the K-12 sector to prevent system failures and avoid interruptions in school
utilization of the data processing and video-conferencing capabilities of the
network. These funds may be used to purchase engineering and advanced
technical support for the network. A maximum of $650,000 may be expended for
state-level administration and staff training on the K-20 network.

(((k)))
(l) $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year
2000 and $50,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
are provided solely for allocation to the primary coordinators of the state
geographic alliance to improve the teaching of geography in schools.

(((l)))
(m) $2,000,000 of the ((public safety and education account)) general
fund‑-state appropriation is provided for start-up grants for
alternative programs and services that improve instruction and learning for
at-risk students. Grants shall be awarded to applicants showing the greatest
potential for improved student learning for at-risk students including:

(i)
Students who are disruptive or have been suspended, expelled, or subject to
other disciplinary actions;

(ii)
Students with unexcused absences who need intervention;

(iii)
Students who have left school; and

(iv)
Students involved with the court system.

(((m)))
(n) $1,600,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is
provided for grants for magnet schools.

(((n)))
(o) $4,300,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is
provided for complex need grants. Grants shall be provided according to
amounts shown in LEAP Document 30C as developed on April 27, 1997, at 03:00
hours.

(((o)
$262,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $235,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 5593
(professional educator standards board). If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5593 is
not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse)) (p) $431,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is
provided solely to implement Substitute Senate Bill No. 6668 or House Bill No.
2760 (professional educator standards board). If neither bill is enacted by
June 30, 2000, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((p)
$200,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for
the purposes of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5413 (teacher
assessment/certification). If Substitute Senate Bill No. 5413 is not enacted
by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse)) (q)
$297,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for
training in oral medications administration. If Substitute Senate Bill No.
6328 (oral medications training) is enacted, the funds are provided to
implement the provisions of the bill. If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2000, the superintendent shall provide training in administration of oral
medications using the model program developed by the office of the
superintendent of public instruction.

(((q)))
(r) $500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2000 and $500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for grants to schools and school districts
to establish school safety plans.

(((r)))
(s) $5,242,000 of the ((health services account)) general fund‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for a corps of nurses located at educational
service districts, as determined by the superintendent of public instruction,
to be dispatched to the most needy schools to provide direct care to students,
health education, and training for school staff.

(((s)))
(t) $50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided
as matching funds for district contributions to provide analysis of the
efficiency of school district business practices.

(((t)))
(u) $750,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for computer system programming and upgrades to benefit the office of
the superintendent of public instruction, schools, and school districts.

(((u)))
(v) $21,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2000 appropriation and $21,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation
for fiscal year 2001 appropriation are provided solely for the increased costs
resulting from Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1477 (school district
organization). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts in
this subsection shall lapse.

(((v)))
(w) $1,500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for the excellence in mathematics training program as specified
in Substitute House Bill No. 1569 (excellence in mathematics). If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount in this subsection shall lapse.

(((w)))
(x) $2,000,000 of the ((public safety and education account)) general
fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for teacher institutes
during the summer of 2000, programs, and administration costs, as provided for
in Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 2085 (disruptive students). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount in this subsection shall lapse.

(((x)
$100,000)) (y) $200,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for support for vocational student leadership
organizations.

(((y)))
(z) $1,100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is
provided for an equal matching grant to the Northeast vocational area
cooperative to establish high-technology learning centers to provide
college-level technology curriculum for high school students leading to an
information technology certificate or degree. Only the following sources may
be used as matching for the state funds: Private sector contributions;
operating levy revenues; capital levy revenues; technology levy revenues; or
other local funds not from federal or state sources.

(((z)))
(aa) $75,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided
for speech pathology grants to charitable organizations as qualified under the
internal revenue code and incorporated under the laws of the state of
Washington. These grants shall be used for the purpose of providing childhood
speech pathology by nationally certified speech pathologists to children who
have demonstrated a lack of verbal communication skills and who would benefit
from such a program. Speech pathology services shall be provided at no cost to
the child receiving the benefits or to the parents or guardians of the child.

(((aa)))
(bb) $500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for competitive grants to school districts to obtain curriculum or
programs that allow high school students to have access to internet-based
curriculum that leads directly to higher education credits or provides
preparation for tests that lead to higher education credit in subjects
including but not limited to mathematics, languages, and science.

(((bb)))
(cc) $1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2000 and (($1,000,000)) $2,200,000 of the general
fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is provided solely for
grants to school districts for programs to prepare high school students to
achieve information technology industry skills certifications. The funds may
be expended to provide or improve internet access; purchase and install
networking or computer equipment; train faculty; or acquire curriculum
materials. A match of cash or in-kind contributions from nonstate sources
equal to at least half of the cash amount of the grant is required. To assure
continuity of the curriculum with higher education institutions, the grant
program will be designed and implemented by an interagency team comprised of
representatives from the office of the superintendent of public instruction,
the state board for community and technical colleges, the higher education
coordinating board, and the office of financial management. School districts
may apply for grants in cooperation with other school districts or community or
technical colleges and must demonstrate in the grant application a cooperative
relationship with a community or technical college in information technology
programs. Preference for grants shall be made to districts with sound
technology plans, which offer student access to computers outside of school hours,
which demonstrate involvement of the private sector in information technology
programs, and which serve the needs of low-income communities.

(dd)
$49,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided solely for the Washington civil liberties education program pursuant
to Engrossed Second Substitute House Bill No. 1572 (civil liberties
education). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2000, the amount provided
in this subsection shall lapse.

(ee)
$49,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided solely for the World War II oral history project pursuant to
Substitute House Bill No. 2418 (WWII oral history project). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2000, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3)
School districts and other organizations may carry over from one school year to
the next up to ten percent of funds allocated under subsection (2) of this
section; however, carryover funds shall be expended in a manner consistent with
the specified purpose for the allocation.

Sec.
502. 1999
c 309 s 502 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR GENERAL
APPORTIONMENT (BASIC EDUCATION)

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((3,545,737,000))

3,507,296,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((3,551,100,000))

3,499,343,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((7,096,837,000))

7,006,639,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are
necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior
fiscal year adjustments.

(2)
Allocations for certificated staff salaries for the 1999-00 and 2000-01 school
years shall be determined using formula‑generated staff units calculated
pursuant to this subsection. Staff allocations for small school enrollments in
(d) through (f) of this subsection shall be reduced for vocational full-time
equivalent enrollments. Staff allocations for small school enrollments in
grades K-6 shall be the greater of that generated under (a) of this subsection,
or under (d) and (e) of this subsection. Certificated staffing allocations
shall be as follows:

(a)
On the basis of each 1,000 average annual full-time equivalent enrollments,
excluding full-time equivalent enrollment otherwise recognized for certificated
staff unit allocations under (c) through (f) of this subsection:

(i)
Four certificated administrative staff units per thousand full-time equivalent
students in grades K-12;

(ii)
49 certificated instructional staff units per thousand full-time equivalent
students in grades K-3;

(iii)
For school year 1999-00, an additional 4.2 certificated instructional
staff units for grades K-3 and an additional 7.2 certificated instructional
staff units for grade 4. Any funds allocated for these additional certificated
units shall not be considered as basic education funding;

(A)
Funds provided under this subsection (2)(a)(iii) in excess of the amount
required to maintain the statutory minimum ratio established under RCW
28A.150.260(2)(b) shall be allocated only if the district documents an actual
ratio equal to or greater than 53.2 certificated instructional staff per
thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-4. For any school district
documenting a lower certificated instructional staff ratio, the allocation
shall be based on the district's actual grades K-4 certificated instructional
staff ratio achieved in that school year, or the statutory minimum ratio
established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b), if greater;

(B)
Districts at or above 51.0 certificated instructional staff per one thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades K-4 may dedicate up to 1.3 of the 53.2
funding ratio to employ additional classified instructional assistants assigned
to basic education classrooms in grades K-4. For purposes of documenting a
district's staff ratio under this section, funds used by the district to employ
additional classified instructional assistants shall be converted to a
certificated staff equivalent and added to the district's actual certificated
instructional staff ratio. Additional classified instructional assistants, for
the purposes of this subsection, shall be determined using the 1989-90 school
year as the base year;

(C)
Any district maintaining a ratio equal to or greater than 53.2 certificated
instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-4
may use allocations generated under this subsection (2)(a)(iii) in excess of
that required to maintain the minimum ratio established under RCW
28A.150.260(2)(b) to employ additional basic education certificated
instructional staff or classified instructional assistants in grades 5-6.
Funds allocated under this subsection (2)(a)(iii) shall only be expended to
reduce class size in grades K-6. No more than 1.3 of the certificated
instructional funding ratio amount may be expended for provision of classified
instructional assistants; ((and))

(iv)
For school year 2000-01, an additional 5.4 certificated instructional staff
units for grades K-3 and an additional 8.4 certificated instructional staff
units for grade 4. Any funds allocated for these additional certificated units
shall not be considered as basic education funding.

(A)
Funds provided under this subsection (2)(a)(iv) in excess of the amount
required to maintain the statutory minimum ratio established under RCW
28A.150.260(2)(b) shall be allocated only if the district documents an actual
ratio equal to or greater than 54.4 certificated instructional staff per
thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-4. For any school district
documenting a lower certificated instructional staff ratio, the allocation
shall be based on the district's actual grades K-4 certificated instructional
staff ratio achieved in that school year, or the statutory minimum ratio
established under RCW 28A.150.260(2)(b), if greater;

(B)
Districts at or above 51.0 certificated instructional staff per one thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades K-4 may dedicate up to 1.3 of the 54.4
funding ratio to employ additional classified instructional assistants assigned
to basic education classrooms in grades K-4. For purposes of documenting a
district's staff ratio under this section, funds used by the district to employ
additional classified instructional assistants shall be converted to a
certificated staff equivalent and added to the district's actual certificated
instructional staff ratio. Additional classified instructional assistants, for
the purposes of this subsection, shall be determined using the 1989-90 school
year as the base year;

(C)
Districts above 53.2 certificated instructional staff per one thousand
full-time equivalent students in grades K-4 may dedicate up to 1.2 of the 54.4
funding ratio to provide additional classroom contact hours before-school,
after-school, weekends, and other times when school is not in session, beyond
the normal school day of an elementary school to assist students in meeting the
standards set for the Washington assessment of student learning. For purposes
of this section, additional classroom contact hours provided by teachers beyond
the normal school day under a supplemental contract shall be converted to a
certificated full-time equivalent by dividing the classroom contact hours by
900;

(D)
Any district maintaining a ratio equal to or greater than 54.4 certificated
instructional staff per thousand full-time equivalent students in grades K-4
may use allocations generated under this subsection (2)(a)(iii) in excess of
that required to maintain the minimum ratio established under RCW
28A.150.260(2)(b) to employ additional basic education certificated
instructional staff or classified instructional assistants in grades 5-6.
Funds allocated under this subsection (2)(a)(iii) shall only be expended to
reduce class size in grades K-6. No more than 1.3 of the certificated
instructional funding ratio amount may be expended for provision of classified
instructional assistants; and

(v)
Forty‑six certificated instructional staff units per thousand full-time
equivalent students in grades 4-12;

(b)
For school districts with a minimum enrollment of 250 full-time equivalent
students whose full-time equivalent student enrollment count in a given month
exceeds the first of the month full-time equivalent enrollment count by 5
percent, an additional state allocation of 110 percent of the share that such
increased enrollment would have generated had such additional full-time
equivalent students been included in the normal enrollment count for that particular
month;

(c)(i)
On the basis of full-time equivalent enrollment in:

(A)
Vocational education programs approved by the superintendent of public
instruction, a maximum of 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08
certificated administrative staff units for each 19.5 full-time equivalent
vocational students for the 1999-00 school year and the 2000-01 school year.
Districts documenting staffing ratios of less than 1 certificated staff per
19.5 students shall be allocated the greater of the total ratio in subsections
(2)(a)(i) and (iv) of this section or the actual documented ratio; and

(B)
Skills center programs meeting the standards for skill center funding
recommended by the superintendent of public instruction, January 1999, 0.92
certificated instructional staff units and 0.08 certificated administrative
units for each 16.67 full-time equivalent vocational students;

(ii)
Indirect cost charges, as defined by the superintendent of public instruction,
to vocational-secondary programs shall not exceed 10 percent; and

(iii)
Vocational full-time equivalent enrollment shall be reported on the same
monthly basis as the enrollment for students eligible for basic support, and
payments shall be adjusted for reported vocational enrollments on the same
monthly basis as those adjustments for enrollment for students eligible for
basic support.

(d)
For districts enrolling not more than twenty‑five average annual
full-time equivalent students in grades K-8, and for small school plants within
any school district which have been judged to be remote and necessary by the
state board of education and enroll not more than twenty‑five average
annual full-time equivalent students in grades K-8:

(i)
For those enrolling no students in grades 7 and 8, 1.76 certificated
instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated administrative staff units for
enrollment of not more than five students, plus one‑twentieth of a
certificated instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled; and

(ii)
For those enrolling students in grades 7 or 8, 1.68 certificated instructional
staff units and 0.32 certificated administrative staff units for enrollment of
not more than five students, plus one‑tenth of a certificated
instructional staff unit for each additional student enrolled;

(e)
For specified enrollments in districts enrolling more than twenty‑five
but not more than one hundred average annual full-time equivalent students in
grades K-8, and for small school plants within any school district which
enroll more than twenty‑five average annual full-time equivalent students
in grades K-8 and have been judged to be remote and necessary by the state
board of education:

(i)
For enrollment of up to sixty annual average full-time equivalent students in
grades K-6, 2.76 certificated instructional staff units and 0.24 certificated
administrative staff units; and

(ii)
For enrollment of up to twenty annual average full-time equivalent students in
grades 7 and 8, 0.92 certificated instructional staff units and 0.08
certificated administrative staff units;

(f)
For districts operating no more than two high schools with enrollments of less
than three hundred average annual full-time equivalent students, for enrollment
in grades 9-12 in each such school, other than alternative schools:

(i)
For remote and necessary schools enrolling students in any grades 9-12 but no
more than twenty‑five average annual full-time equivalent students in
grades K-12, four and one‑half certificated instructional staff units and
one‑quarter of a certificated administrative staff unit;

(ii)
For all other small high schools under this subsection, nine certificated
instructional staff units and one‑half of a certificated administrative
staff unit for the first sixty average annual full time equivalent students,
and additional staff units based on a ratio of 0.8732 certificated
instructional staff units and 0.1268 certificated administrative staff units
per each additional forty‑three and one‑half average annual full
time equivalent students.

Units
calculated under (f)(ii) of this subsection shall be reduced by certificated
staff units at the rate of forty‑six certificated instructional staff
units and four certificated administrative staff units per thousand vocational
full-time equivalent students.

(g)
For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than seventy
annual average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty
students, operating a grades K-8 program or a grades 1-8 program, an additional
one-half of a certificated instructional staff unit; and

(h)
For each nonhigh school district having an enrollment of more than fifty annual
average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty
students, operating a grades K-6 program or a grades 1-6 program, an additional
one‑half of a certificated instructional staff unit.

(3)
Allocations for classified salaries for the 1999-00 and 2000-01 school years
shall be calculated using formula‑generated classified staff units
determined as follows:

(a)
For enrollments generating certificated staff unit allocations under subsection
(2)(d) through (h) of this section, one classified staff unit for each three
certificated staff units allocated under such subsections;

(b)
For all other enrollment in grades K-12, including vocational full-time
equivalent enrollments, one classified staff unit for each sixty average annual
full-time equivalent students; and

(c)
For each nonhigh school district with an enrollment of more than fifty annual
average full-time equivalent students and less than one hundred eighty
students, an additional one‑half of a classified staff unit.

(4)
Fringe benefit allocations shall be calculated at a rate of ((16.97)) 16.49
percent in the 1999‑00 school year and 15.62 percent in the
2000-01 school year((s)) for certificated salary allocations provided
under subsection (2) of this section, and a rate of ((15.75)) 15.56
percent in the 1999‑00 school year and 15.82 percent in the
2000-01 school year((s)) for classified salary allocations provided
under subsection (3) of this section.

(5)
Insurance benefit allocations shall be calculated at the maintenance rate
specified in section 504(2) of this act, based on the number of benefit units
determined as follows:

(a)
The number of certificated staff units determined in subsection (2) of this
section; and

(b)
The number of classified staff units determined in subsection (3) of this
section multiplied by 1.152. This factor is intended to adjust allocations so
that, for the purposes of distributing insurance benefits, full-time equivalent
classified employees may be calculated on the basis of 1440 hours of work per
year, with no individual employee counted as more than one full-time
equivalent.

(6)(a)
For nonemployee-related costs associated with each certificated staff unit
allocated under subsection (2)(a), (b), and (d) through (h) of this section,
there shall be provided a maximum of $8,117 per certificated staff unit in the
1999‑00 school year and a maximum of (($8,271)) $8,239 per
certificated staff unit in the 2000-01 school year.

(b)
For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational certificated
staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(A) of this section, there shall
be provided a maximum of $19,933 per certificated staff unit in the 1999‑00
school year and a maximum of (($20,312)) $20,232 per certificated
staff unit in the 2000-01 school year.

(c)
For nonemployee-related costs associated with each vocational certificated
staff unit allocated under subsection (2)(c)(i)(B) of this section, there shall
be provided a maximum of $15,467 per certificated staff unit in the 1999-00
school year and a maximum of (($15,761)) $15,699 per certificated
staff unit in the 2000-01 school year.

(7)
Allocations for substitute costs for classroom teachers shall be distributed at
a maintenance rate of $365.28 for the 1999-00 school year and $479.94 for
the 2000-01 school year per allocated classroom teachers exclusive of
salary increase amounts provided in section 504 of this act. Solely for the
purposes of this subsection, allocated classroom teachers shall be equal to the
number of certificated instructional staff units allocated under subsection (2)
of this section, multiplied by the ratio between the number of actual basic
education certificated teachers and the number of actual basic education
certificated instructional staff reported state‑wide for the 1998-99
school year.

(8)
Any school district board of directors may petition the superintendent of
public instruction by submission of a resolution adopted in a public meeting to
reduce or delay any portion of its basic education allocation for any school
year. The superintendent of public instruction shall approve such reduction or
delay if it does not impair the district's financial condition. Any delay
shall not be for more than two school years. Any reduction or delay shall have
no impact on levy authority pursuant to RCW 84.52.0531 and local effort
assistance pursuant to chapter 28A.500 RCW.

(9)
The superintendent may distribute a maximum of (($6,444,000)) $10,598,000
outside the basic education formula during fiscal years 2000 and 2001 as
follows:

(a)
For fire protection for school districts located in a fire protection district
as now or hereafter established pursuant to chapter 52.04 RCW, a maximum of
$457,000 may be expended in fiscal year 2000 and a maximum of (($466,000))
$464,000 may be expended in fiscal year 2001;

(b)
For summer vocational programs at skills centers, a maximum of $2,098,000 may
be expended each fiscal year;

(c)
A maximum of (($325,000)) $585,000 may be expended for school
district emergencies provided that up to $260,000 shall be for the Toutle
Lake school district emergency; ((and))

(d)
A maximum of $500,000 per fiscal year may be expended for programs providing
skills training for secondary students who are enrolled in extended day
school-to-work programs, as approved by the superintendent of public
instruction. The funds shall be allocated at a rate not to exceed $500 per
full-time equivalent student enrolled in those programs; and

(e)
A maximum of $3,117,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2000 and $779,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation
for fiscal year 2001 is provided for the 1999-2000 school year for districts
which experience an enrollment decline in the 1999-2000 school year from the
1998-99 school year of more than 4.5 percent in full-time equivalent enrollment
or more than 300 full-time equivalent students. The superintendent shall
allocate funds to eligible school districts for up to one-half of the
enrollment loss at the basic education unenhanced rate for the district.
School districts receiving small school factor bonus funds shall not be
eligible for enrollment decline funds to the extent that the district has no
state apportionment loss as a result of the enrollment decline.

(10)
For the purposes of RCW 84.52.0531, the increase per full-time equivalent
student in state basic education appropriations provided under this act,
including appropriations for salary and benefits increases, is 4.0 percent from
the 1998-99 school year to the 1999-00 school year, and 3.5 percent from the
1999-00 school year to the 2000-01 school year. This subsection
supersedes section 1, chapter 10, Laws of 1999 sp. sess.

(11)
If two or more school districts consolidate and each district was receiving
additional basic education formula staff units pursuant to subsection (2)(b)
through (h) of this section, the following shall apply:

(a)
For three school years following consolidation, the number of basic education
formula staff units shall not be less than the number of basic education
formula staff units received by the districts in the school year prior to the
consolidation; and

(b)
For the fourth through eighth school years following consolidation, the
difference between the basic education formula staff units received by the
districts for the school year prior to consolidation and the basic education
formula staff units after consolidation pursuant to subsection (2)(a) through
(h) of this section shall be reduced in increments of twenty percent per year.

Sec.
503. 1999
c 309 s 503 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-BASIC
EDUCATION EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION. (1) The following
calculations determine the salaries used in the general fund allocations for
certificated instructional, certificated administrative, and classified staff
units under section 502 of this act:

(a)
Salary allocations for certificated instructional staff units shall be
determined for each district by multiplying the district's certificated
instructional total base salary shown on LEAP Document 12E for the appropriate
year, by the district's average staff mix factor for basic education and
special education certificated instructional staff in that school year,
computed using LEAP Document 1S; and

(b)
Salary allocations for certificated administrative staff units and classified
staff units for each district shall be based on the district's certificated
administrative and classified salary allocation amounts shown on LEAP Document
12E for the appropriate year.

(2)
For the purposes of this section:

(a)
"Basic education certificated instructional staff" is defined as
provided in RCW 28A.150.100 and "special education certificated
staff" means staff assigned to the state-supported special education
program pursuant to chapter 28A.155 RCW in positions requiring a certificate;

(b)
"LEAP Document 1S" means the computerized tabulation establishing
staff mix factors for certificated instructional staff according to education
and years of experience, as developed by the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee on March 25, 1999, at 16:55 hours; and

(c)
"LEAP Document 12E" means the computerized tabulation of 1999-00 and
2000-01 school year salary allocations for certificated administrative staff
and classified staff and derived and total base salaries for certificated
instructional staff as developed by the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee on March 25, 1999, at 18:53 hours.

(3)
Incremental fringe benefit factors shall be applied to salary adjustments at a
rate of ((16.33)) 15.85 percent for school year 1999-00 and
14.98 percent for school year 2000-01 for certificated staff and ((12.25))
12.06 percent for school year 1999-00 and 12.32 percent for school
year 2000-01 for classified staff ((for both years of the biennium)).

(4)(a)
Pursuant to RCW 28A.150.410, the following state‑wide salary allocation
schedules for certificated instructional staff are established for basic
education salary allocations:

1999-00
K-12 Salary Schedule for Certificated Instructional Staff

Years
of

Service
BA BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90

0 25,716 26,410 27,130 27,850 30,165

1 26,062 26,765 27,494 28,248 30,586

2 26,649 27,367 28,111 28,930 31,284

3 27,527 28,267 29,033 29,895 32,291

4 28,146 28,927 29,705 30,605 33,040

5 28,790 29,581 30,375 31,334 33,785

6 29,161 29,935 30,756 31,765 34,203

7 30,113 30,906 31,747 32,820 35,319

8 31,079 31,915 32,776 33,938 36,471

9 32,960 33,863 35,067 37,659

10 34,964 36,255 38,881

11 37,477 40,161

12 38,660 41,474

13 42,820

14 44,173

15 45,322

16 or
more 46,228

Years
of MA+90

Service
BA+135 MA MA+45 or PHD

0 31,656 30,831 33,146 34,637

1 32,068 31,174 33,511 34,994

2 32,797 31,827 34,181 35,694

3 33,871 32,794 35,189 36,769

4 34,647 33,476 35,910 37,518

5 35,440 34,176 36,627 38,282

6 35,866 34,551 36,989 38,653

7 37,047 35,607 38,105 39,833

8 38,261 36,724 39,257 41,048

9 39,511 37,853 40,446 42,297

10 40,795 39,042 41,668 43,581

11 42,112 40,264 42,948 44,899

12 43,485 41,534 44,261 46,271

13 44,890 42,848 45,607 47,677

14 46,349 44,202 47,047 49,136

15 47,554 45,351 48,270 50,413

16 or
more 48,505 46,258 49,236 51,421

2000-01
K-12 Salary Schedule for Certificated Instructional Staff

Years
of

Service BA BA+15 BA+30 BA+45 BA+90

0 26,487 27,203 27,943 28,686 31,070

1 26,843 27,568 28,319 29,095 31,503

2 27,448 28,189 28,954 29,798 32,223

3 28,352 29,115 29,904 30,792 33,260

4 28,991 29,794 30,596 31,524 34,031

5 29,653 30,469 31,286 32,274 34,798

6 30,036 30,833 31,679 32,718 35,229

7 31,017 31,833 32,699 33,805 36,378

8 32,011 32,873 33,759 34,956 37,565

9 33,949 34,879 36,119 38,789

10 36,013 37,343 40,048

11 38,601 41,366

12 39,820 42,718

13 44,105

14 45,498

15 46,681

16 or
more 47,615

Years
of MA+90

Service
BA+135 MA MA+45 or PHD

0 32,605 31,756 34,140 35,676

1 33,030 32,109 34,517 36,044

2 33,781 32,782 35,207 36,765

3 34,887 33,778 36,245 37,872

4 35,687 34,480 36,988 38,643

5 36,503 35,202 37,726 39,431

6 36,942 35,588 38,099 39,813

7 38,158 36,675 39,249 41,028

8 39,409 37,826 40,435 42,279

9 40,696 38,989 41,659 43,566

10 42,018 40,213 42,918 44,889

11 43,375 41,471 44,236 46,246

12 44,789 42,780 45,589 47,659

13 46,237 44,134 46,975 49,107

14 47,739 45,528 48,459 50,610

15 48,981 46,711 49,719 51,926

16 or
more 49,960 47,645 50,713 52,964

(b)
As used in this subsection, the column headings "BA+(N)" refer to the
number of credits earned since receiving the baccalaureate degree.

(c)
For credits earned after the baccalaureate degree but before the masters
degree, any credits in excess of forty‑five credits may be counted after
the masters degree. Thus, as used in this subsection, the column headings
"MA+(N)" refer to the total of:

(i)
Credits earned since receiving the masters degree; and

(ii)
Any credits in excess of forty‑five credits that were earned after the
baccalaureate degree but before the masters degree.

(5)
For the purposes of this section:

(a)
"BA" means a baccalaureate degree.

(b)
"MA" means a masters degree.

(c)
"PHD" means a doctorate degree.

(d)
"Years of service" shall be calculated under the same rules adopted
by the superintendent of public instruction.

(e)
"Credits" means college quarter hour credits and equivalent
in-service credits computed in accordance with RCW 28A.415.020 and 28A.415.023.

(6)
No more than ninety college quarter-hour credits received by any employee after
the baccalaureate degree may be used to determine compensation allocations
under the state salary allocation schedule and LEAP documents referenced in
this act, or any replacement schedules and documents, unless:

(a)
The employee has a masters degree; or

(b)
The credits were used in generating state salary allocations before January 1,
1992.

(7)
The certificated instructional staff base salary specified for each district in
LEAP Document 12E and the salary schedules in subsection (4)(a) of this section
include a 1.67 percent increase for three learning improvement days added in
the 1999-00 school year and maintained in the 2000-01 school year. A school
district is eligible for the learning improvement day funds for school years
1999-00 and 2000-01, only if three days have been added to the base contract in
effect for the 1998-99 school year. If fewer than three days are added, the
additional learning improvement allocation shall be adjusted accordingly. The
additional days shall be for activities related to improving student learning
consistent with education reform implementation. The length of a learning
improvement day shall not be less than the length of a full day under the base
contract. The superintendent of public instruction shall ensure that school
districts adhere to the intent and purposes of this subsection.

(8)
The salary allocation schedules established in this section are for allocation
purposes only except as provided in RCW 28A.400.200(2).

Sec.
504. 1999
c 309 s 504 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR SCHOOL
EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION ADJUSTMENTS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((187,659,000))

186,314,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((348,636,000))

345,765,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((536,295,000))

532,079,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
(($412,995,000)) $407,914,000 is provided for a cost of living
adjustment of 3.0 percent effective September 1, 1999, and another 3.0 percent
effective September 1, 2000, for state formula staff units. The appropriations
include associated incremental fringe benefit allocations at rates of ((16.33))
15.85 percent for school year 1999-00 and 14.98 percent for school
year 2000-01 for certificated staff and ((12.25)) 12.06
percent for school year 1999-00 and 12.32 percent for school year 2000-01
for classified staff. The appropriation also includes 1.67 percent effective
September 1, 1999, for three learning improvement days pursuant to section
503(7) of this act and the salary allocation schedule adjustments for beginning
and senior certificated instructional staff.

(a)
The appropriations in this section include the increased portion of salaries
and incremental fringe benefits for all relevant state-funded school programs
in part V of this act. Salary adjustments for state employees in the office of
superintendent of public instruction and the education reform program are
provided in part VII of this act. Increases for general apportionment (basic
education) are based on the salary allocation schedules and methodology in
section 502 of this act. Increases for special education result from increases
in each district's basic education allocation per student. Increases for
educational service districts and institutional education programs are
determined by the superintendent of public instruction using the methodology
for general apportionment salaries and benefits in section 502 of this act.

(b)
The appropriations in this section provide cost-of-living, learning improvement
days for certificated instructional staff, and incremental fringe benefit
allocations based on formula adjustments as follows:

(i)
For pupil transportation, an increase of $0.60 per weighted pupil‑mile
for the 1999‑00 school year and $1.23 per weighted pupil-mile for the
2000-01 school year;

(ii)
For education of highly capable students, an increase of $14.04 per formula
student for the 1999‑00 school year and (($21.28)) $21.09
per formula student for the 2000-01 school year; and

(iii)
For transitional bilingual education, an increase of (($36.18)) $36.19
per eligible bilingual student for the 1999‑00 school year and (($54.99))
$54.51 per eligible student for the 2000-01 school year; and

(iv)
For learning assistance, an increase of (($13.98)) $13.97 per
entitlement unit for the 1999‑00 school year and (($23.16)) $23.04
per entitlement unit for the 2000-01 school year.

(c)
The appropriations in this section include (($420,000)) $417,000
for fiscal year 2000 and (($962,000)) $1,224,000 for fiscal year
2001 for salary increase adjustments for substitute teachers.

(2)
(($123,300,000)) $124,165,000 is provided for adjustments to
insurance benefit allocations. The maintenance rate for insurance benefit
allocations is $335.75 per month for the 1999-00 and 2000-01 school years. The
appropriations in this section provide for a rate increase to $388.02 per month
for the 1999-00 school year and (($423.57)) $425.89 per month for
the 2000-01 school year at the following rates:

(a)
For pupil transportation, an increase of $0.48 per weighted pupil‑mile
for the 1999‑00 school year and (($0.80)) $0.82 for the
2000-01 school year;

(b)
For education of highly capable students, an increase of (($3.30)) $3.32
per formula student for the 1999‑00 school year and (($5.58)) $5.72
for the 2000-01 school year;

(c)
For transitional bilingual education, an increase of (($8.45)) $8.46
per eligible bilingual student for the 1999‑00 school year and (($14.22))
$14.59 for the 2000-01 school year; and

(d)
For learning assistance, an increase of $6.65 per funded unit for the 1999‑00
school year and (($11.17)) $11.47 for the 2000-01 school year.

(3)
The rates specified in this section are subject to revision each year by the
legislature.

Sec.
505. 1999
c 309 s 505 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR PUPIL
TRANSPORTATION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((179,802,000))

181,204,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((180,925,000))

181,061,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((360,727,000))

362,265,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are
necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior
fiscal year adjustments.

(2)
A maximum of (($1,475,000)) $1,473,000 may be expended for
regional transportation coordinators and related activities. The
transportation coordinators shall ensure that data submitted by school
districts for state transportation funding shall, to the greatest extent
practical, reflect the actual transportation activity of each district.

(3)
$10,000 of the fiscal year 2000 appropriation and $10,000 of the fiscal year
2001 appropriation are provided solely for the transportation of students
enrolled in "choice" programs. Transportation shall be limited to
low-income students who are transferring to "choice" programs solely
for educational reasons.

(4)
Allocations for transportation of students shall be based on reimbursement
rates of (($34.99)) $34.96 per weighted mile in the 1999-00
school year and (($35.20)) $35.17 per weighted mile in the
2000-01 school year exclusive of salary and benefit adjustments provided in
section 504 of this act. Allocations for transportation of students transported
more than one radius mile shall be based on weighted miles as determined by
superintendent of public instruction multiplied by the per mile reimbursement
rates for the school year pursuant to the formulas adopted by the
superintendent of public instruction. Allocations for transportation of
students living within one radius mile shall be based on the number of enrolled
students in grades kindergarten through five living within one radius mile of
their assigned school multiplied by the per mile reimbursement rate for the
school year multiplied by 1.29.

Sec.
506. 1999
c 309 s 506 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR SCHOOL
FOOD SERVICE PROGRAMS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)..... $ 3,100,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)..... $ 3,100,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((194,483,000))

227,204,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((200,683,000))

233,404,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$6,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriations are provided for
state matching money for federal child nutrition programs.

(2)
$175,000 of the general fund--state appropriations are provided for summer food
programs for children in low-income areas.

Sec.
507. 1999
c 309 s 507 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR SPECIAL
EDUCATION PROGRAMS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((392,036,000))

387,011,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((393,461,000))

385,482,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((148,159,000))

171,667,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((933,656,000))

944,160,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Funding for special education programs is provided on an excess cost basis,
pursuant to RCW 28A.150.390. School districts shall ensure, to the greatest
extent possible, that special education students receive their appropriate
share of the general apportionment allocation accruing through sections 502 and
504 of this act. To the extent a school district cannot provide an appropriate
education for special education students under chapter 28A.155 RCW through the
general apportionment allocation, it shall provide services through the special
education allocation funded in this section.

(2)
Each general fund‑-state fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as
are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for
prior fiscal year adjustments.

(((2)))
(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall distribute state
funds to school districts based on two categories: The optional birth through
age two program for special education eligible developmentally delayed infants
and toddlers, and the mandatory special education program for special education
eligible students ages three to twenty-one. A "special education eligible
student" means a student receiving specially designed instruction in
accordance with a properly formulated individualized education program.

(((3)))
(4) For the 1999-00 and 2000-01 school years, the superintendent shall
distribute state funds to each district based on the sum of:

(a)
A district's annual average headcount enrollment of developmentally delayed
infants and toddlers ages birth through two, multiplied by the district's
average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student, multiplied
by 1.15; and

(b)
A district's annual average full-time equivalent basic education enrollment
multiplied by the funded enrollment percent determined pursuant to subsection
(((4)(c))) (5)(c) of this section, multiplied by the district's
average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student multiplied
by 0.9309.

(((4)))
(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section.

(a)
"Average basic education allocation per full-time equivalent student"
for a district shall be based on the staffing ratios required by RCW
28A.150.260 and shall not include enhancements, secondary vocational education,
or small schools.

(b)
"Annual average full-time equivalent basic education enrollment"
means the resident enrollment including students enrolled through choice (RCW
28A.225.225) and students from nonhigh districts (RCW 28A.225.210) and excluding
students residing in another district enrolled as part of an interdistrict
cooperative program (RCW 28A.225.250).

(c)
"Enrollment percent" means the district's resident special education
annual average enrollment including those students counted under the special
education demonstration projects, excluding the birth through age two
enrollment, as a percent of the district's annual average full-time equivalent
basic education enrollment. For the 1999-00 and the 2000-01 school years, each
district's funded enrollment percent shall be the lesser of the district's
actual enrollment percent for the school year for which the allocation is being
determined or 12.7 percent.

(((5)))
(6) At the request of any interdistrict cooperative of at least 15
districts in which all excess cost services for special education students of
the districts are provided by the cooperative, the maximum enrollment percent
shall be 12.7, and shall be calculated in the aggregate rather than individual
district units. For purposes of this subsection, the average basic education
allocation per full-time equivalent student shall be calculated in the
aggregate rather than individual district units.

(((6)))
(7) A maximum of $12,000,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and a maximum of $12,000,000 of the general
fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided as safety net
funding for districts with demonstrated needs for state special education
funding beyond the amounts provided in subsection (((3))) (4) of
this section. Safety net funding shall be awarded by the state safety net
oversight committee.

(a)
The safety net oversight committee shall first consider the needs of districts
adversely affected by the 1995 change in the special education funding
formula. Awards shall be based on the amount required to maintain the 1994-95
state special education excess cost allocation to the school district in
aggregate or on a dollar per funded student basis.

(b)
The committee shall then consider unusual needs of districts due to a special
education population which differs significantly from the assumptions of the
state funding formula. Awards shall be made to districts that convincingly
demonstrate need due to the concentration and/or severity of disabilities in
the district. Differences in program costs attributable to district philosophy
or service delivery style are not a basis for safety net awards.

(c)
The maximum allowable indirect cost for calculating safety net eligibility may
not exceed the federal restricted indirect cost rate for the district plus one
percent.

(d)
Safety net awards shall be adjusted based on the percent of potential medicaid
eligible students billed as calculated by the superintendent in accordance with
Substitute Senate Bill No. 5626 (medicaid payments to schools).

(e)
Safety net awards must be adjusted for any audit findings or exceptions related
to special education funding.

(f)
The superintendent may expend up to $100,000 per year of the amounts provided
in this subsection to provide staff assistance to the committee in analyzing
applications for safety net funds received by the committee.

(((7)))
(8) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt such rules and
procedures as are necessary to administer the special education funding and
safety net award process. Prior to revising any standards, procedures, or
rules, the superintendent shall consult with the office of financial management
and the fiscal committees of the legislature.

(((8)))
(9) The safety net oversight committee appointed by the superintendent
of public instruction shall consist of:

(a)
Staff of the office of superintendent of public instruction;

(b)
Staff of the office of the state auditor;

(c)
Staff of the office of the financial management; and

(d)
One or more representatives from school districts or educational service
districts knowledgeable of special education programs and funding.

(((9)
A maximum of $5,500,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation shall
be expended for safety net funding to meet the extraordinary needs of one or
more individual special education students.

(10)
A maximum of $678,000 may be expended from the general fund‑-state
appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1 full-time
equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and medical center. This
amount is in lieu of money provided through the home and hospital allocation
and the special education program.

(11)
A maximum of $1,000,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is
provided for projects to provide special education students with appropriate
job and independent living skills, including work experience where possible, to
facilitate their successful transition out of the public school system. The
funds provided by this subsection shall be from federal discretionary grants.

(12)
A school district may carry over from one year to the next year up to 10
percent of general fund‑-state funds allocated under this program;
however, carry over funds shall be expended in the special education program.

(13)
The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal flow-through to
school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other purposes, school
districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for
purchasing regional special education services from educational service
districts, and for staff development activities particularly relating to
inclusion issues.

(14)
A maximum of $1,200,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation may be
expended by the superintendent for projects related to use of inclusion
strategies by school districts for provision of special education services.
The superintendent shall prepare an information database on laws, best
practices, examples of programs, and recommended resources. The information
may be disseminated in a variety of ways, including workshops and other staff
development activities.))

(10)
The superintendent shall maintain the percentage of federal flow-through to
school districts at 85 percent. In addition to other purposes, school
districts may use increased federal funds for high-cost students, for
purchasing regional special education services from educational service districts,
and for staff development activities particularly relating to inclusion issues.

(11)
To the extent necessary, $5,500,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation
shall be expended for safety net funding to meet the extraordinary needs of one
or more individual special education students. If safety net awards to meet
the extraordinary needs of one or more individual special education students
exceed $5,500,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation, the
superintendent shall expend all available federal discretionary funds necessary
to meet this need. General fund--state funds shall not be expended for this
purpose.

(12)
A maximum of $1,000,000 of the general fund‑-federal appropriation is
provided for projects to provide special education students with appropriate
job and independent living skills, including work experience where possible, to
facilitate their successful transition out of the public school system. The
funds provided by this subsection shall be from federal discretionary grants.

(13)
A maximum of $1,200,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation may be
expended by the superintendent for projects related to use of inclusion
strategies by school districts for provision of special education services.
The superintendent shall prepare an information database on laws, best
practices, examples of programs, and recommended resources. The information
may be disseminated in a variety of ways, including workshops and other staff
development activities.

(14)
A maximum of $678,000 may be expended from the general fund‑-state
appropriations to fund 5.43 full-time equivalent teachers and 2.1 full-time
equivalent aides at children's orthopedic hospital and medical center. This
amount is in lieu of money provided through the home and hospital allocation
and the special education program.

(15)
A school district may carry over from one year to the next year up to 10
percent of general fund‑-state funds allocated under this program;
however, carryover funds shall be expended in the special education program.

Sec.
508. 1999
c 309 s 508 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR TRAFFIC
SAFETY EDUCATION PROGRAMS

((Public
Safety and Education Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 16,276,000))

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 7,738,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 7,771,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 15,509,000

The
appropriations in this section ((is)) are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:

(1)
The appropriations include((s)) such funds as are necessary to
complete the school year ending in each fiscal year and for prior fiscal year
adjustments.

(2)
A maximum of $507,000 may be expended for regional traffic safety education
coordinators.

(3)
The maximum basic state allocation per student completing the program shall be
$137.16 in the 1999-00 and 2000-01 school years.

(4)
Additional allocations to provide tuition assistance for students from
low-income families who complete the program shall be a maximum of $66.81 per
eligible student in the 1999-00 and 2000-01 school years.

Sec.
509. 1999
c 309 s 509 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR EDUCATIONAL
SERVICE DISTRICTS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((4,547,000))

4,537,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((4,547,000))

4,530,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((9,094,000))

9,067,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The educational service districts shall continue to furnish financial services
required by the superintendent of public instruction and RCW 28A.310.190 (3)
and (4).

(2)
$250,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $250,000 of
the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for
student teaching centers as provided in RCW 28A.415.100.

(3)
A maximum of $500,000 is provided for centers for the improvement of teaching
pursuant to RCW 28A.415.010.

Sec.
510. 1999
c 309 s 510 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR LOCAL
EFFORT ASSISTANCE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((98,315,000))

102,563,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((107,973,000))

122,114,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((206,288,000))

224,677,000

Sec.
511. 1999
c 309 s 512 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR INSTITUTIONAL
EDUCATION PROGRAMS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((20,201,000))

19,296,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((21,542,000))

19,469,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 8,548,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((50,291,000))

47,313,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Each general fund‑-state fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as
are necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for
prior fiscal year adjustments.

(2)
State funding provided under this section is based on salaries and other
expenditures for a 220‑day school year. The superintendent of public
instruction shall monitor school district expenditure plans for institutional
education programs to ensure that districts plan for a full-time summer
program.

(3)
State funding for each institutional education program shall be based on the
institution's annual average full-time equivalent student enrollment. Staffing
ratios for each category of institution shall remain the same as those funded
in the 1995-97 biennium.

(4)
The funded staffing ratios for education programs for juveniles age 18 or less
in department of corrections facilities shall be the same as those provided in
the 1997-99 biennium.

(5)
$92,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$143,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
are provided solely to maintain at least one certificated instructional staff
and related support services at an institution whenever the K-12 enrollment is
not sufficient to support one full-time equivalent certificated instructional
staff to furnish the educational program. The following types of institutions
are included: Residential programs under the department of social and health
services for developmentally disabled juveniles, programs for juveniles under
the department of corrections, and programs for juveniles under the juvenile
rehabilitation administration.

(6)
Ten percent of the funds allocated for each institution may be carried over
from one year to the next.

Sec.
512. 1999
c 309 s 513 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR PROGRAMS
FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE STUDENTS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((6,226,000))

6,164,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((6,220,000))

6,105,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((12,446,000))

12,269,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are
necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior
fiscal year adjustments.

(2)
Allocations for school district programs for highly capable students shall be
distributed at a maximum rate of (($313.27)) $312.19 per funded
student for the 1999-00 school year and (($313.39)) $310.43 per
funded student for the 2000-01 school year, exclusive of salary and benefit
adjustments pursuant to section 504 of this act. The number of funded students
shall be a maximum of two percent of each district's full-time equivalent basic
education enrollment.

(3)
$350,000 of the appropriation is for the centrum program at Fort Worden state
park.

(4)
$186,000 of the appropriation is for the ((odyssey of the mind)) Washington
imagination network and future problem-solving programs.

Sec.
513. 1999
c 309 s 511 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR THE ELEMENTARY
AND SECONDARY SCHOOL IMPROVEMENT ACT

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((264,388,000))

285,193,000

Sec.
514. 1999
c 309 s 514 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-EDUCATION
REFORM PROGRAMS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((35,144,000))

53,333,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((34,355,000))

36,346,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((69,499,000))

89,679,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
(($143,000)) $268,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and (($197,000)) $258,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for the commission established under PART I of Substitute Senate Bill
No. 5418 or Second Substitute House Bill No. 1462. If neither bill is enacted
by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this subsection shall be used for
implementation of education reform and an accountability system by the office
of the superintendent of public instruction.

(2)
(($11,343,000)) $9,307,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and (($10,414,000)) $11,329,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided for development and implementation of the Washington assessments of
student learning. Up to $689,000 of the appropriation may be expended for data
analysis and data management of test results.

(3)
$2,190,000 is provided solely for training of paraprofessional classroom
assistants and certificated staff who work with classroom assistants as
provided in RCW 28A.415.310.

(4)
$6,818,000 is provided for mentor teacher assistance, including state support
activities, under RCW 28A.415.250 and 28A.415.260. Funds for the teacher
assistance program shall be allocated to school districts based on the number
of beginning teachers.

(5)
$4,050,000 is provided for improving technology infrastructure, monitoring and
reporting on school district technology development, promoting standards for
school district technology, promoting statewide coordination and planning for
technology development, and providing regional educational technology support
centers, including state support activities, under chapter 28A.650 RCW.

(6)
$7,200,000 is provided for grants to school districts to provide a continuum of
care for children and families to help children become ready to learn. Grant
proposals from school districts shall contain local plans designed
collaboratively with community service providers. If a continuum of care
program exists in the area in which the school district is located, the local
plan shall provide for coordination with existing programs to the greatest
extent possible. Grant funds shall be allocated pursuant to RCW 70.190.040.

(7)
$5,000,000 is provided solely for the meals for kids program under RCW
28A.235.145 through 28A.235.155.

(8)
$1,260,000 is provided for technical assistance related to education reform
through the office of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation
with the commission on student learning or its successor, as specified in RCW
28A.300.130 (center for the improvement of student learning).

(9)
(($1,598,000)) $2,208,000 is provided solely for the leadership
internship program for superintendents, principals, and program administrators.

(10)
$1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to establish a mathematics helping corps subject to
the following conditions and limitations:

(a)
In order to increase the availability and quality of technical mathematics
assistance state-wide, the superintendent of public instruction, shall employ
regional school improvement coordinators and mathematics school improvement
specialists to provide assistance to schools and districts. The regional
coordinators and specialists shall be hired by and work under the direction of
a state-wide school improvement coordinator. The mathematics improvement
specialists shall serve on a rotating basis from one to three years and shall
not be permanent employees of the superintendent of public instruction.

(b)
The school improvement coordinators and specialists shall provide the
following:

(i)
Assistance to schools to disaggregate student performance data and develop
improvement plans based on those data;

(ii)
Consultation with schools and districts concerning their performance on the
Washington assessment of student learning and other assessments emphasizing the
performance on the mathematics assessments;

(iii)
Consultation concerning curricula that aligns with the essential academic
learning requirements emphasizing the academic learning requirements for
mathematics, the Washington assessment of student learning, and meets the needs
of diverse learners;

(iv)
Assistance in the identification and implementation of research-based
instructional practices in mathematics;

(v)
Staff training that emphasizes effective instructional strategies and
classroom-based assessment for mathematics;

(vi)
Assistance in developing and implementing family and community involvement
programs emphasizing mathematics; and

(vii)
Other assistance to schools and school districts intended to improve student
mathematics learning.

(11)
A maximum of $1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is
provided to expand the number of summer accountability institutes offered by
the superintendent of public instruction and the commission on student learning
or its successor. The institutes shall provide school district staff with
training in the analysis of student assessment data, information regarding
successful district and school teaching models, research on curriculum and
instruction, and planning tools for districts to improve instruction in
reading, mathematics, language arts, and guidance and counseling but placing an
emphasis on mathematics.

(12)
$8,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $8,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the Washington reading corps subject to the
following conditions and limitations:

(a)
Grants shall be allocated to schools and school districts to implement proven,
research-based mentoring and tutoring programs in reading for low-performing
students in grades K-6. If the grant is made to a school district, the
principals of schools enrolling targeted students shall be consulted concerning
design and implementation of the program.

(b)
The programs may be implemented before, after, or during the regular school
day, or on Saturdays, summer, intercessions, or other vacation periods.

(c)
Two or more schools may combine their Washington reading corps programs.

(d)
A program is eligible for a grant if it meets one of the following conditions:

(i)
The program is recommended either by the education commission of the states or
the Northwest regional educational laboratory; or

(ii)
The program is developed by schools or school districts and is approved by the
office of the superintendent of public instruction based on the following
criteria:

(A)
The program employs methods of teaching and student learning based on reliable
reading/literacy research and effective practices;

(B)
The program design is comprehensive and includes instruction, on-going student
assessment, professional development, parental/community involvement, and
program management aligned with the school's reading curriculum;

(C)
It provides quality professional development and training for teachers, staff,
and volunteer mentors and tutors;

(D)
It has measurable goals for student reading aligned with the essential academic
learning requirements; and

(E)
It contains an evaluation component to determine the effectiveness of the
program.

(e)
Funding priority shall be given to low-performing schools.

(f)
Beginning, interim, and end-of-program testing data shall be available to
determine the effectiveness of funded programs and practices. Common
evaluative criteria across programs, such as grade-level improvements shall be
available for each reading corps program. The superintendent of public
instruction shall provide program evaluations to the governor and the
appropriate committees of the legislature. Administrative and evaluation costs
may be assessed from the annual appropriation for the program.

(g)
Grants provided under this section may be used by schools and school districts
for expenditures from July 1, 1999, through August 31, 2001.

(13)
(($100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2000 and $227,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2001 are provided solely for a 15 percent salary bonus for teachers who
have attained certification by the national board for professional teaching
standards. The bonus is provided in recognition of their outstanding performance.
The bonuses shall be provided subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
For teachers achieving certification prior to September 1, 1999, the bonus
shall begin on September 1, 1999.

(b)
Teachers enrolled in the program prior to September 1, 1999, achieving
certification during the 1999-2000 school year shall be eligible for the bonus
for the number of months during the school year that the individual has
achieved certification.

(c)
The superintendent shall establish a competitive selection process for teachers
desiring to enroll in the program after September 1, 1999, to become eligible
for the national certification bonus. Funds are provided for a maximum of 45
bonuses for the 2000-2001 school year. The superintendent shall approve a
limited number of the most qualified applicants for potential bonus eligibility
to ensure that the number of bonuses does not exceed available funds. The
Washington state professional standards board, if created by law, or an
advisory committee established by the superintendent of public instruction in
consultation with the state board of education if a professional standards
board is not created, shall review the national board certification standards
to determine whether additional requirements to the national standards are
needed to align the national requirements with Washington state standards for
teachers and students under education reform.)) $180,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$382,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
are provided solely for a salary bonus for teachers who have attained
certification by the national board for professional teaching standards and
beginning in the 2000-01 school year, for assistance with fees for national
certification for teachers newly enrolled in the program. The amounts provided
in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(a)
For teachers achieving certification prior to September 1, 1999, the bonus
shall begin on September 1, 1999, and shall be a 15 percent salary bonus for
the 1999-2000 school year.

(b)
Teachers enrolled in the program prior to September 1, 1999, achieving
certification during the 1999-2000 school year shall be eligible for a 15
percent salary bonus for the number of months during the school year that the
individual has achieved certification.

(c)
Teachers enrolled in the program prior to September 1, 2000, achieving
certification during the 2000-2001 school year, shall be eligible for a one-time
$5,000 bonus.

(d)
Solely for the 2000-01 school year, teachers having attained certification
prior to September 1, 2000, shall be eligible for the one-time $5,000 bonus.

(e)
$75,000 of the amount provided for fiscal year 2001 is to provide a $1,000 fee
subsidy for not more than 75 teachers enrolled in the program for the 2000-01
school year. The superintendent shall provide the subsidies in the same manner
that national board for professional teaching standards candidate subsidy funds
were provided during the 1999-2000 school year.

(14)
$20,074,000 of the general fund-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 is
provided for professional development and technology training allocations to
school districts. The amount provided in this subsection is subject to the
following conditions and limitations:

(a)
The funds are provided to complement salary allocations made for three learning
improvement days for certificated instructional staff and to provide staff
development and training for classified staff. The funds may be expended for
training costs including but not limited to: Classified staff compensation for
training time; course fees; contractual services; and supplies and materials.

(b)
The funds shall be utilized for school improvement for the 2000-01 school year
to improve student learning consistent with education reform and to integrate
technology in the classroom.

(c)
The superintendent shall allocate the funds to school districts prior to July
1, 2000, at a rate of $20.00 per student based on the October 1999 P-105
unduplicated headcount.

(d)
School districts shall allocate the funds to schools and the expenditure of the
funds shall be determined by the staff at each school site.

(15)
$71,000 of the general fund appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is provided
solely for the second grade reading test. The funds shall be expended for
assessment training for new second grade teachers and replacement of assessment
materials.

(16)
$125,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided solely to increase the participation of home schooled and private
school students taking the Washington assessment of student learning pursuant
to Substitute House Bill No. 2803 (student assessment). If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 2000, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec.
515. 1999
c 309 s 515 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR TRANSITIONAL
BILINGUAL PROGRAMS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((35,136,000))

35,876,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((36,608,000))

37,605,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((71,744,000))

73,481,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are necessary
to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior fiscal year
adjustments.

(2)
The superintendent shall distribute a maximum of (($648.50)) $646.06
per eligible bilingual student in the 1999-00 ((and)) school year and
$641.64 in the 2000-01 school year((s)), exclusive of salary and
benefit adjustments provided in section 503 of this act.

Sec.
516. 1999
c 309 s 516 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-FOR THE LEARNING
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((71,205,000))

68,936,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((75,045,000))

69,470,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((146,250,000))

138,406,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are
necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior
fiscal year adjustments.

(2)
Funding for school district learning assistance programs shall be allocated at
maximum rates of (($382.95)) $382.08 per funded unit for the
1999-00 school year and (($383.76)) $381.90 per funded unit for
the 2000-01 school year.

(3)
A school district's funded units for the 1999-2000 and 2000-01 school years
shall be the sum of the following:

(a)
The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades K-6, multiplied by the
5-year average 4th grade test results as adjusted for funding purposes in the
school years prior to 1999-2000, multiplied by 0.92. As the 3rd grade test
becomes available, it shall be phased into the 5-year average on a 1-year lag;
and

(b)
The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades 7-9, multiplied by the
5-year average 8th grade test results as adjusted for funding purposes in the
school years prior to 1999-2000, multiplied by 0.92. As the 6th grade test
becomes available, it shall be phased into the 5-year average for these grades
on a 1-year lag; and

(c)
The district's full-time equivalent enrollment in grades 10-11 multiplied by
the 5-year average 11th grade test results, multiplied by 0.92. As the 9th
grade test becomes available, it shall be phased into the 5-year average for
these grades on a 1-year lag; and

(d)
If, in the prior school year, the district's percentage of October headcount
enrollment in grades K-12 eligible for free and reduced price lunch exceeded
the state average, subtract the state average percentage of students eligible
for free and reduced price lunch from the district's percentage and multiply
the result by the district's K-12 annual average full-time equivalent
enrollment for the current school year multiplied by 22.3 percent.

(4)
School districts may carry over from one year to the next up to 10 percent of
funds allocated under this program; however, carryover funds shall be expended
for the learning assistance program.

Sec.
517. 1999
c 309 s 517 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION‑-LOCAL
ENHANCEMENT FUNDS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((33,095,000))

32,981,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((27,265,000))

27,315,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((60,720,000))

60,296,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Each general fund fiscal year appropriation includes such funds as are
necessary to complete the school year ending in the fiscal year and for prior
fiscal year adjustments.

(2)
Funds are provided for local education program enhancements to meet educational
needs as identified by the school district, including alternative education
programs.

(3)
Allocations for the 1999-00 school year shall be at a maximum annual rate of
$28.81 per full-time equivalent student and $28.81 per full-time equivalent
student for the 2000-01 school year. Allocations shall be made on the monthly
apportionment payment schedule provided in RCW 28A.510.250 and shall be based
on school district annual average full-time equivalent enrollment in grades
kindergarten through twelve: PROVIDED, That for school districts enrolling not
more than one hundred average annual full-time equivalent students, and for
small school plants within any school district designated as remote and
necessary schools, the allocations shall be as follows:

(a)
Enrollment of not more than sixty average annual full-time equivalent students
in grades kindergarten through six shall generate funding based on sixty
full-time equivalent students;

(b)
Enrollment of not more than twenty average annual full-time equivalent students
in grades seven and eight shall generate funding based on twenty full-time
equivalent students; ((and)) or

(c)
Enrollment of not more than sixty average annual full-time equivalent students
in grades nine through twelve shall generate funding based on sixty full-time
equivalent students.

(4)
Funding provided pursuant to this section does not fall within the definition
of basic education for purposes of Article IX of the state Constitution and the
state's funding duty thereunder.

(5)
The superintendent shall not allocate up to one-fourth of a district's funds
under this section if:

(a)
The district is not maximizing federal matching funds for medical services
provided through special education programs, pursuant to RCW 74.09.5241 through
74.09.5256 (Title XIX funding); ((and)) or

(b)
The district is not in compliance in filing truancy petitions as required under
chapter 312, Laws of 1995 and RCW 28A.225.030.

Sec.
518. 1999
c 309 s 519 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE
BOARD OF EDUCATION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 21,551,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 13,178,000

Education
Savings Account‑-State Appropriation. $ ((72,000,000))

78,612,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 113,341,000

The
appropriations in this section ((is)) are subject to the
following conditions and limitations: (($36,000,000 in fiscal year 2000 and
$36,000,000 in fiscal year 2001 are appropriated to))

(1)
The education savings account appropriation shall be deposited in the
common school construction account.

(2)
The general fund‑-state appropriations for fiscal year 2000 and fiscal
year 2001 shall be deposited in the state building construction account for the
purposes of common school construction in the 2001-03 biennium.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 519. 1999
sp.s. c 10 s 1 (uncodified) is repealed.

(End of part)

PART
VI

HIGHER
EDUCATION

Sec.
601. 1999
c 309 s 602 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The
appropriations in sections 603 through 609 of this act provide state general
fund support or employment and training trust account support for full-time
equivalent student enrollments at each institution of higher education. Listed
below are the annual full-time equivalent student enrollments by institutions
assumed in this act.

1999-2000 2000-2001

Annual Annual

Average Average

University
of Washington

Main
campus 31,927 32,266

Bothell
branch 993 1,136

Tacoma
branch 1,143 ((1,316))

1,286

Washington
State University

Main
campus 17,272 17,649

Spokane
branch 472 601

Tri-Cities
branch 754 ((754))

616

Vancouver
branch 1,021 1,121

Central
Washington University 7,670 7,867

Eastern
Washington University 7,739 ((7,739))

7,936

The
Evergreen State College 3,638 3,713

Western
Washington University 10,648 10,761

State
Board for Community and

Technical
Colleges 120,529 ((123,332))

123,362

Higher
Education Coordinating

Board 50 ((550))

600

Sec.
602. 1999
c 309 s 603 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE
BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((455,664,000))

456,291,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((486,387,000))

490,804,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 11,404,000

Employment
and Training Trust Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((1,474,000))

888,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((954,929,000))

959,387,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The technical colleges may increase tuition and fees in excess of the fiscal
growth factor to conform with the percentage increase in community college
operating fees.

(2)(a)
$5,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $5,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to increase salaries and related benefits for
part-time faculty. The state board for community and technical colleges shall
allocate these funds to college districts based on the headcount of part-time
faculty under contract for the 1998-99 academic year. To earn these funds, a
college district must match the state funds with local revenue, the amounts for
which shall be determined by the state board. State fund allocations that go
unclaimed by a college district shall lapse. The board may provide salary
increases to part-time faculty in a total amount not to exceed $10,000,000 from
tuition revenues. The board shall report to the office of financial management
and legislative fiscal committees on the distribution of state funds, match
requirements of each district, and the wage adjustments for part-time faculty
by October 1 of each fiscal year.

(b)
Each college district shall examine its current ratio of part-time to full-time
faculty by discipline and report to the board a plan to reduce wage disparity
and reliance on part-time faculty through salary improvements, conversion of
positions to full-time status, and other remedies deemed appropriate given
labor market conditions and educational programs offered in each community.
The board shall set long-term performance targets for each district with
respect to use of part-time faculty and monitor progress annually. The board
shall report to the fiscal and higher education committees of the legislature
on implementation of this subsection by no later than December 1, 1999, with
recommendations for the ensuing biennium provided no later than December 1,
2000.

(3)
$1,155,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $2,345,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for faculty salary increments and associated benefits
and may be used in combination with salary and benefit savings from faculty
turnover to provide faculty salary increments and associated benefits. To the
extent general salary increase funding is used to pay faculty increments, the
general salary increase shall be reduced by the same amount.

(4)
$950,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $950,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to lower the part-time faculty retirement eligibility
threshold to fifty percent of the full-time workload.

(5)
$332,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $3,153,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for Cascadia Community College start-up and enrollment
costs.

(6)
$1,441,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,441,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for 500 FTE enrollment slots to implement RCW
28B.50.259 (timber-dependent communities).

(7)
(($27,361,000)) $27,775,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2000, $28,761,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2001, and the entire employment and training
trust account appropriation are provided solely as special funds for training
and related support services, including financial aid, child care, and
transportation, as specified in chapter 226, Laws of 1993 (employment and
training for unemployed workers).

(a)
Funding is provided to support up to 7,200 full-time equivalent students in
each fiscal year.

(b)
The state board for community and technical colleges shall submit a plan for
allocation of the full-time equivalent students provided in this subsection to
the workforce training and education coordinating board for review and approval.

(8)
$1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for tuition support for students enrolled in
work-based learning programs.

(9)
$567,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $568,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for administration and customized training contracts
through the job skills program.

(10)
$750,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $750,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for grants to expand information technology and
computer science programs. Successful grant applications from a college,
partnerships of colleges, or partnerships of colleges and K-12 school districts
must include a match of cash, in-kind, or donations equivalent to the grant
amount. Grant applications shall receive priority that prepare students to
meet industry standards, achieve industry skill certificates, or continue to
upper division computer science or computer engineering studies. No college
may receive more than $300,000 from appropriations in this section. The state
board for community and technical colleges shall report the implementation of
this section to the governor and legislative fiscal committees by June 30,
2001, including plans of successful grant recipients for the continuation of
programs funded by this section.

(11)
$1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the Pierce College branch at Puyallup.

(12)
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5277 (higher education
student child care matching grants). In no case shall funds provided in this
subsection be used to construct or remodel facilities. If the bill is not
enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(13)
Funding in this section provides for the collection and reporting of Washington
enrollment data, and related activities, for the distance learning information
project described in section 129 of this act.

(14)
$425,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation is provided solely for
allocation to Olympic college. Olympic college shall contract with accredited
baccalaureate institution(s) to bring a program of upper-division courses,
concentrating on but not limited to business, education, and human relations,
to Bremerton. Moneys may be used by Olympic college during either fiscal year
to equip and support a state-owned or state-leased facility in Bremerton where
contracted courses are delivered.

(15)
$1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
is provided to replace failing roofs at Columbia basin college.

(16)
$500,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided for assistance to students with disabilities.

(17)
$750,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided solely for a student centered online delivery system to broaden access
and increase use of college catalogs, schedules, and registration systems.

Sec.
603. 1999
c 309 s 604 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR UNIVERSITY
OF WASHINGTON

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((316,592,000))

316,379,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((334,314,000))

335,134,000

Death
Investigations Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((221,000))

111,000

Accident
Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ ((5,773,000))

5,780,000

Medical
Aid Account‑-State Appropriation........ $...................................... ((5,815,000))

5,820,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((662,715,000))

663,224,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$8,617,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $10,528,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided for upper division and graduate courses and other educational
services offered at the Bothell branch campus. Of these amounts: The
office of financial management shall hold and release funds to the university
at the rate of $9,636 per enrolled state FTE student at the Bothell branch
campus in excess of fiscal year 2000 actual annualized enrollment as determined
in the budget driver tracking report prepared by the office of financial
management. Moneys not earned by the university for enrolling additional state
students during the 2000-2001 academic year shall lapse to the education
savings account at the close of the biennium.

(2)
(($10,147,000)) $9,934,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and (($11,438,000)) $11,226,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided for upper division and graduate courses and other educational services
offered at the Tacoma branch campus. Of these amounts: The office of
financial management shall hold and release funds to the university at the rate
of $10,308 per enrolled state FTE student at the Tacoma branch campus in excess
of fiscal year 2000 actual annualized enrollment as determined in the budget
driver tracking report prepared by the office of financial management. Moneys
not earned by the university for enrolling additional state students during the
2000-2001 academic year shall lapse to the education savings account at the
close of the biennium.

(3)
$2,312,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $2,312,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for competitively offered recruitment and retention
salary adjustments for instructional and research faculty, exempt professional
staff, academic administrators, academic librarians, counselors, teaching and
research assistants, as classified by the office of financial management, and
all other nonclassified staff, but not including employees under RCW
28B.16.015. Tuition revenues may be expended in addition to those required by
this section to further provide recruitment and retention salary adjustments.
The university shall provide a report in their 2001-03 biennial operating
budget request submittal on the effective expenditure of funds for the purposes
of this section.

(4)
$1,975,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,975,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to extend the next-generation internet hub and related
expertise.

(5)
(($200,000)) $90,000 of the death investigations account
appropriation is provided solely for the forensic pathologist fellowship
program.

(6)
$136,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $137,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound work plan
and agency action item UW-01.

(7)
$75,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$75,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for the Olympic natural resource center.

(8)
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for the dental education in care of persons with disabilities
program.

(9)
$904,000 of the accident account and medical aid account appropriations is
provided ((solely for)) to establish a bio-contaminant laboratory
and consultation service, create a demonstration project, and enhance
laboratory and computing equipment in the department of environmental
health.

(10)
((For the 1999-01 biennium, five percent of tuition and fee revenue collected
from law students may be used when privately matched dollar-for-dollar to
provide public interest law scholarships to enrolled students at the
university.

(11)))
$958,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $958,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided for the mathematics, engineering, science achievement (MESA)
program.

(((12)))
(11) $1,250,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2000 and $1,250,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation
for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for research faculty clusters in the
advanced technology initiative program.

(12)
For the remainder of this biennium, the university shall not alter the benefits
or terms of health insurance for teaching assistants, research assistants and
other graduate student appointees. Legislative fiscal committees shall work
with the office of financial management, in consultation with the council of
presidents and affected student groups, to comprehensively examine options and
develop a response for the governor and lawmakers to consider during the 2001
session.

Sec.
604. 1999
c 309 s 605 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR WASHINGTON
STATE UNIVERSITY

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((183,551,000))

184,951,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((197,015,000))

200,276,000

Air
Pollution Control Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((198,000))

49,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((380,764,000))

385,276,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The office of financial management shall hold and release funds to the
university at the rate of $4,568 per enrolled state FTE students at the Pullman
campus in excess of fiscal year 2000 actual annualized enrollment as determined
in the budget driver tracking report prepared by the office of financial
management. Moneys not earned by the university for enrolling additional state
students during the 2000-2001 academic year shall lapse to the education
savings account at the close of the biennium.

(2)
$6,702,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $7,980,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided for upper division and graduate courses and other educational
services offered at the Spokane branch campus. Of these amounts: The
office of financial management shall hold and release funds to the university
at the rate of $9,442 per enrolled state FTE student at the Spokane branch
campus in excess of fiscal year 2000 actual annualized enrollment as determined
in the budget driver tracking report prepared by the office of financial management.
Moneys not earned by the university for enrolling additional state students
during the 2000-2001 academic year shall lapse to the education savings account
at the close of the biennium.

(((2)))
(3) $5,134,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2000 and $5,325,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2001 are provided for upper division and graduate courses and other
educational services offered at the Tri-Cities branch campus for 616 state
FTE students. The office of financial management shall hold and release funds
to the university at the rate of $8,650 per enrolled state FTE student at the
Tri-Cities branch campus in excess of fiscal year 2000 actual annualized
enrollment as determined in the budget driver tracking report prepared by the
office of financial management. Moneys not earned by the university for
enrolling additional state students during the 2000-2001 academic year shall
lapse to the education savings account at the close of the biennium.

(((3)))
(4) $8,537,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2000 and $10,164,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2001 are provided for upper division and graduate courses and other
educational services offered at the Vancouver branch campus. Of these
amounts: The office of financial management shall hold and release funds to
the university at the rate of $9,880 per enrolled state FTE student at the
Vancouver branch campus in excess of fiscal year 2000 actual annualized
enrollment as determined in the budget driver tracking report prepared by the
office of financial management. Moneys not earned by the university for
enrolling additional state students during the 2000-2001 academic year shall
lapse to the education savings account at the close of the biennium.

(((4)))
(5) $1,438,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2000 and $1,438,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for competitively offered recruitment and
retention salary adjustments for instructional and research faculty, exempt
professional staff, academic administrators, academic librarians, counselors,
teaching and research assistants, as classified by the office of financial
management, and all other nonclassified staff, but not including employees
under RCW 28B.16.015. Tuition revenues may be expended in addition to those
required by this section to further provide recruitment and retention salary
adjustments. The university shall provide a report in their 2001-03 biennial
operating budget request submittal on the effective expenditure of funds for
the purposes of this section.

(((5)))
(6) $565,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation in fiscal
year 2000 and $340,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation in fiscal
year 2001 are provided for learning centers in Skagit, Walla Walla, and Grays
Harbor counties.

(((6)))
(7) $500,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2000 and $3,750,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for the safe food initiative. Of these
amounts, $500,000 each fiscal year is provided solely for the commission on
pesticide registration.

(((7)))
(8) $44,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2000 and $44,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2001 are provided solely for research efforts to develop suitable and
economical alternatives to field burning of grass seed harvest residue.

(((8)))
(9) $165,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2000 and $166,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for the implementation of the Puget Sound
work plan and agency action item WSU-01.

(((9)))
(10) $750,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal
year 2000 and $750,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for research faculty clusters in the
advanced technology initiative program.

(11)
$1,900,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,700,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided to install a steam boiler in response to a failure incidence
at the Pullman campus. Funds may be used to conduct an energy audit of the
campus-wide heating system to assess its viability and the need for modern
upgrades.

(12)
$450,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided solely for a portion of the costs of implementing the health sciences
initiative, enabling the university to conduct cancer research and
biotechnology programs from Spokane.

Sec.
605. 1999
c 309 s 606 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR EASTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 41,620,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((43,345,000))

44,436,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((84,965,000))

86,056,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: $375,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2000 and $375,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation
for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for competitively offered recruitment
and retention salary adjustments for instructional and research faculty, exempt
professional staff, academic administrators, academic librarians, counselors,
teaching and research assistants, as classified by the office of financial
management, and all other nonclassified staff, but not including employees
under RCW 28B.16.015. Tuition revenues may be expended in addition to those
required by this section to further provide recruitment and retention salary
adjustments. The university shall provide a report in their 2001-03 biennial
operating budget request submittal on the effective expenditure of funds for
the purposes of this section.

Sec.
606. 1999
c 309 s 607 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR CENTRAL
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((41,898,000))

42,060,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((44,465,000))

44,786,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((86,363,000))

86,846,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$312,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $312,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for competitively offered recruitment, retention, and
equity salary adjustments for instructional and research faculty, exempt
professional staff, academic administrators, academic librarians, counselors,
teaching and research assistants, as classified by the office of financial
management, and all other nonclassified staff, but not including employees
under RCW 28B.16.015. Tuition revenues may be expended in addition to those
required by this section to further provide recruitment and retention salary
adjustments. The university shall provide a report in their 2001-03 biennial
operating budget request submittal on the effective expenditure of funds for
the purposes of this section.

(2)
The office of financial management shall hold and release funds to the
university at the rate of $4,756 per enrolled state FTE student in excess of
fiscal year 2000 actual annualized enrollment as determined in the budget
driver tracking report prepared by the office of financial management. Moneys
not earned by the university for enrolling additional state students during the
2000-2001 academic year shall lapse to the education savings account at the
close of the biennium.

Sec.
607. 1999
c 309 s 608 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR THE
EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((22,359,000))

22,384,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((24,233,000))

24,831,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((46,592,000))

47,215,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$188,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $188,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for competitively offered recruitment and retention
salary adjustments for instructional and research faculty, exempt professional
staff, academic administrators, academic librarians, counselors, teaching and
research assistants, as classified by the office of financial management, and
all other nonclassified staff, but not including employees under RCW
28B.16.015. Tuition revenues may be expended in addition to those required by
this section to further provide recruitment and retention salary adjustments.
The college shall provide a report in their 2001-03 biennial operating budget
request submittal on the effective expenditure of funds for the purposes of
this section.

(2)
(($101,000)) $41,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $102,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely for the institute for
public policy to complete studies of services described in subsection 202(1) of
this act. If that subsection is not enacted, the amounts provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(3)
$40,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 is
provided solely for the institute for public policy to facilitate a work group
pursuant to Second Substitute House Bill No. 1692 or sections 1 through 7 of
Senate Bill No. 5127 (child abuse investigations). If neither of these bills
are enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(4)
$100,000 of the state general fund appropriations is provided solely for the
institute for public policy to conduct a study of certain public high school
programs in Washington. The study shall examine what high school educational
opportunities are currently available for students. Information shall be
gathered on program attributes, student demographics, and outcomes for high
school programs including, but not limited to, college credit (e.g. advanced
placement and running start), tech prep, distance learning, and career
pathways. The institute shall report its findings to the legislature through
an interim report due January 1, 2001, and a final report due September 15,
2001.

(5)
$30,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$264,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
are provided solely for the institute for public policy to conduct a study of
current issues in the state's child welfare system. The study shall: (a)
Using existing data sources, examine criminal, substance abuse, and education
outcomes of "Becca" youth (youth who have been placed in secure
crisis residential facilities or mandatory chemical dependency treatment); (b)
identify problems and barriers to improved educational attainment of children
in long-term foster care, and suggest ways to improve the availability of
information about the educational experiences of these children; (c) compare
placement decisions and funding methodologies for residential care services for
children in Washington to best practices in other states and in the research
literature, using a sample of children from different types of residential care
settings; and (d) examine adoption support program criteria, service level
decisions, and funding methodologies, using a sample of children receiving
different levels of support. The office of the administrator for the courts,
the department of social and health services, the superintendent of public
instruction, and all other state and local governments shall provide access to
any data necessary for the completion of this study. The institute shall
provide a report with findings for issues (c) and (d) of this subsection by
December 15, 2000, and a report with findings for issues (a) and (b) of this
subsection by December 15, 2001.

(6)
$25,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$51,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided for the institute for public policy to analyze strategies for
containing state health care expenditures. The institute may contract for
actuarial or other services as needed to complete these analyses, and shall
report findings to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature.

(7)
$12,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$63,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for the institute for public policy to study the mission,
programs, and usage of the state library. The institute shall provide a report
to the legislature with recommendations regarding alternatives to improve state
library services and or reduce costs by November 1, 2000.

(8)
$18,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$36,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided for the institute for public policy to identify and assess options for
expanding Medicaid eligibility in accordance with H.R. 1180, the federal
"ticket to work and work incentives improvement act of 1999." The
assessment shall identify potential state costs and savings, and potential
participant and public benefits, under alternative eligibility standards and
participant cost-sharing requirements. In conducting its analysis, the
institute shall consult with the governor's committee on disability issues and
employment; the department of social and health services; other states which
have enacted or which are studying similar expansions; and the federal social
security and health care financing administrations. The institute shall report
its findings to the health care and fiscal committees of the legislature by
November 1, 2000.

Sec.
608. 1999
c 309 s 609 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR WESTERN
WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 53,293,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((56,272,000))

56,462,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((109,565,000))

109,755,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$375,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $375,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for competitively offered recruitment and retention
salary adjustments for instructional and research faculty, exempt professional
staff, academic administrators, academic librarians, counselors, teaching and
research assistants, as classified by the office of financial management, and
all other nonclassified staff, but not including employees under RCW
28B.16.015. Tuition revenues may be expended in addition to those required by
this section to further provide recruitment and retention salary adjustments.
The university shall provide a report in their 2001-03 biennial operating
budget request submittal on the effective expenditure of funds for the purposes
of this section.

(2)
The office of financial management shall hold and release funds to the
university at the rate of $4,885 per enrolled state FTE student in excess of
fiscal year 2000 actual annualized enrollment as determined in the budget
driver tracking report prepared by the office of financial management. Moneys
not earned by the university for enrolling additional state students during the
2000-2001 academic year shall lapse to the education savings account at the
close of the biennium.

Sec.
609. 1999
c 309 s 610 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD‑-POLICY
COORDINATION AND ADMINISTRATION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 4,458,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 8,027,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $ 653,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 13,138,000

The
appropriations in this section are provided to carry out the accountability,
performance measurement, policy coordination, planning, studies and
administrative functions of the board and are subject to the following
conditions and limitations:

(1)
The board shall review, recommend changes if necessary, and approve plans
defined in section 601(6) of this act for achieving measurable and specific
improvements in academic years 1999-00 and 2000-01.

(2)
$280,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $280,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for enrollment to implement RCW 28B.80.570 through
28B.80.585 (rural natural resources impact areas). The number of students
served shall be 50 full-time equivalent students per fiscal year. The board
shall ensure that enrollments reported under this subsection meet the criteria
outlined in RCW 28B.80.570 through 28B.80.585.

(3)
$100,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $4,650,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to contract for ((500)) 550 full-time
equivalent undergraduate students in high-demand fields and programs as
evidenced by limited current access, despite graduates who are highly sought
after by employers of this state. The board shall consult with the office of
financial management and the legislative fiscal and higher education committees
to design and implement a bidding process to solicit proposals from public
institutions to deliver these student enrollments. Participating institutions
shall cooperate with the board to collect the data necessary to report to the
governor and the legislature on the impact of this subsection, particularly the
degree of improved access to high-demand fields and programs for students and
successful job placements for graduates.

(4)
$1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for competitive grants to public baccalaureate
institutions to expand information technology programs. Successful grant
applications to fund faculty, staff, or equipment for computer science,
computer engineering, or related disciplines must include a match of nonstate
cash or donations equivalent to the grant amount. No institution may receive
more than $1,000,000 from appropriations in this section. The board shall
report on the implementation of this section to the governor and legislative
fiscal committees by June 30, 2001, including plans of successful grant
recipients for the continuation of programs funded by this section.

(5)
$600,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 is
provided solely for the higher education coordinating board fund for innovation
and quality under RCW 28B.120.040. If Substitute House Bill No. 1013 is not
enacted by June 30, 1999, the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(6)
$150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $150,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to implement Second Substitute House Bill No. 1729
(teacher training pilot program). If Second Substitute House Bill No. 1729 is
not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(7)
With funding provided in this section, the higher education coordinating board,
in cooperation with the office of financial management and the state board for
community and technical colleges, shall study the feasibility of collecting
Washington enrollment data on distance learning programs sponsored by private
institutions in Washington as well as by institutions outside the state of
Washington, and it shall report findings to the legislature by January, 2000.

(8)
With funding provided in this section, the higher education coordinating
board shall study the feasibility of Washington State University operating on
the quarter system and make recommendations to the appropriate legislative
policy and fiscal committees by December 1, 2000.

(9)
$432,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $68,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001
are provided solely for a demonstration project to improve rural access to
post-secondary education by bringing distance learning technologies into
Jefferson county.

Sec.
610. 1999
c 309 s 611 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD‑-FINANCIAL
AID AND GRANT PROGRAMS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((106,945,000))

107,613,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((117,807,000))

121,224,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 2,422,000

Advanced
College Tuition Payment Program Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 3,408,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((230,582,000))

234,667,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$534,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $529,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the displaced homemakers program.

(2)
$220,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $225,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the western interstate commission for higher
education.

(3)
$1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to implement an aid program for the benefit of
elementary and secondary public school teachers who do not now hold a masters
of education degree. Within available funds and until these funds are
exhausted, the board may repay all or a portion of the educational expenses
incurred by a teacher, or teacher candidate, for one year of masters' level
studies at an accredited Washington college or university. Payment is
conditioned upon the applicant's successful matriculation and resumption, or
assumption, of classroom teaching duties in a public elementary or secondary
school in this state. Among the potential applicants for this program, the
board shall give priority to those individuals who returned to the classroom
with a math or science teaching credential. The board may adopt rules as
necessary to implement this program.

(4)
$1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,000,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the health professional conditional scholarship
and loan program under chapter 28B.115 RCW. This amount shall be deposited to
the health professional loan repayment and scholarship trust fund to carry out
the purposes of the program.

(5)
$1,685,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 is provided solely for classified public employees of a K-12 school
district or educational district to receive a conditional college scholarship,
not to exceed $4,000, as a "future teacher" under chapter 28B.102
RCW.

(6)
$75,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$75,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for implementation of Substitute Senate Bill No. 5277 (higher
education student child care matching grants). In no case shall funds provided
in this subsection be used to construct or remodel facilities. If the bill is
not enacted by June 30, 1999, the amounts provided in this subsection shall
lapse.

(((6)
$103,686,000)) (7) $104,354,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and (($114,700,000)) $116,432,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for student financial aid, including all administrative costs.
Of these amounts:

(a)
$80,240,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $87,696,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the state need grant program. After April 1 of
each fiscal year, up to one percent of the annual appropriation for the state
need grant program may be transferred to the state work study program;

(b)
$15,350,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $15,350,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the state work study program. After April 1 of
each fiscal year, up to one percent of the annual appropriation for the state
work study program may be transferred to the state need grant program;

(c)
$2,920,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $2,920,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for educational opportunity grants. The board may
deposit sufficient funds from its appropriation into the state education trust
fund as established in RCW 28B.10.821 to provide a one-year renewal of the
grant for each new recipient of the educational opportunity grant award. For
the purpose of establishing eligibility for the equal opportunity grant program
for placebound students under RCW 28B.101.020, Thurston county lies within the
branch campus service area of the Tacoma branch campus of the University of Washington;

(d)
A maximum of 2.1 percent of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2000 and 2.1 percent of the general fund‑-state appropriation
for fiscal year 2001 may be expended for financial aid administration,
excluding the 4 percent state work study program administrative allowance
provision;

(e)
$230,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $201,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for the educator's excellence awards. Any educator's
excellence moneys not awarded by April 1st of each year may be transferred by
the board to either the Washington scholars program or to the Washington award
for vocational excellence;

(f)(i)
$1,361,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $1,548,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to implement the Washington scholars program. Any
Washington scholars program moneys not awarded by April 1st of each year may be
transferred by the board to either the educator's excellence awards or to the
Washington award for vocational excellence;

(ii)
Of the amounts in (f)(i) of this subsection, $25,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and $207,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided solely to implement Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1661 (Washington scholars program). If Second
Substitute House Bill No. 1661 is not enacted prior to June 30, 1999, then the
amounts provided in this subsection (6)(f)(ii) shall lapse;

(g)
$534,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000
and $534,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely to implement Washington award for vocational
excellence program. Any Washington award for vocational program moneys not
awarded by April 1st of each year may be transferred by the board to either the
educator's excellence awards or the Washington scholars program;

(h)
(($251,000)) $121,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and (($251,000)) $381,000 of
the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are provided
solely for community scholarship matching grants of $2,000 each. To be eligible
for the matching grant, a nonprofit community organization organized under
section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code must demonstrate that it has
raised $2,000 in new moneys for college scholarships after the effective date
of this act. ((No)) An organization may receive more than one
$2,000 matching grant and preference shall be given to organizations affiliated
with the citizens' scholarship foundation; and

(i)
(($2,800,000)) $3,598,000 of the general fund‑-state
appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and (($6,200,000)) $7,802,000
of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely to establish the Washington promise scholarship program subject
to the following conditions and limitations:

(i)
Within available funds, the higher education coordinating board shall award
scholarships for use at accredited institutions of higher education in the
state of Washington to as many students as possible from among those qualifying
under (iv) and (v) of this subsection. Each qualifying student will receive
two consecutive annual installments, the value of each not to exceed the
full-time annual resident tuition rates charged by community colleges.

(ii)
Of the amounts provided, no more than $250,000 each year is for administration
of the Washington promise scholarship program.

(iii)
The Washington's promise scholarship account is created in the custody of the
state treasurer. The account shall be a discrete nonappropriated account.
Other than funds provided for program administration, the higher education
coordinating board shall deposit in this account all money received for the
program. The account shall be self-sustaining and consist of funds
appropriated by the legislature for these scholarships, private contributions,
and receipts from refunds of tuition and fees.

(iv)
Seniors in the top ten percent of their individual Washington state high school
class in 1999 and whose family income does not exceed one hundred and
thirty-five percent of the state's median family income, adjusted for family
size qualify for a scholarship in fiscal year 2000.

(v)
((Seniors in the top fifteen percent of their individual Washington state
high school class in 2000 and whose family income does not exceed one hundred
thirty-five percent of the state's median family income, adjusted for family
size qualify for a scholarship in fiscal year 2001.)) Scholarships in
fiscal year 2001 shall be awarded to students who graduate from high school or
its equivalent whose family income does not exceed one hundred thirty-five
percent of the state's median family income, adjusted for family size if they
meet any of the following academic criteria:

(A)
Students graduating from public and approved private high schools under chapter
28A.195 RCW in 2001 must be in the top fifteen percent of their graduating
class;

(B)
Students graduating from public high schools, approved private high schools
under chapter 28A.195 RCW, and students participating in home-based instruction
as provided in chapter 28A.200 RCW must equal or exceed a cumulative scholastic
aptitude test score of 1200 on their first attempt.

(vi)
For students eligible under subsections (iv) and (v) of this subsection, the
superintendent of public instruction shall provide the higher education
coordinating board with the names, addresses, and unique numeric identifiers of
(A) students in the top ten percent, or (B) students in the top
fifteen percent or who meet the scholastic aptitude test score requirement,
as appropriate in each of the respective high school senior or home based
instruction classes in Washington state. This shall be provided no later
than ((August)) October 1 of each year.

(vii)
Scholarships awarded under this section may only be used at accredited
institutions of higher education in the state of Washington for college-related
expenses, including but not limited to, tuition, room and board, books,
materials, and transportation. The Washington promise scholarship award shall
not supplant other scholarship awards, financial aid, or tax programs related
to postsecondary education. Scholarships may not be transferred or refunded to
students.

(viii)
The higher education coordinating board shall evaluate the impact and
effectiveness of the Washington promise scholarship program. The evaluation
shall include, but not be limited to: (A) An analysis of other financial
assistance promise scholarship recipients are receiving through other federal,
state, and institutional programs, including grants, work study, tuition
waivers, tax credits, and loan programs; (B) an analysis of whether the
implementation of the promise scholarship program has had an impact on student
indebtedness; and (C) an evaluation of what types of students are successfully
completing high school but do not have the financial ability to attend college
because they cannot obtain financial aid or the financial aid is insufficient.
The board shall report its findings to the governor and the legislature by
November 1, 2001.

(ix)
The higher education coordinating board may adopt rules as necessary to
implement this program.

Sec.
611. 1999
c 309 s 613 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR WASHINGTON
STATE LIBRARY

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((8,400,000))

8,419,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((8,198,000))

8,299,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 8,859,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((25,457,000))

25,577,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: At least $2,763,219 shall be expended for a contract with the
Seattle public library for library services for the Washington book and braille
library.

Sec.
612. 1999
c 309 s 614 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE WASHINGTON
STATE ARTS COMMISSION

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 2,314,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 2,562,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation.................. $.................................. ((1,000,000))

1,020,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation........... $ 25,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ ((5,876,000))

5,921,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$250,000 from the fiscal year 2000 general fund‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for the arts in education program, arts organization funding,
and for new arts funding for underserved communities. During fiscal year 2000,
the agency shall prepare a strategic plan. The plan shall be submitted to the
governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by July 1, 2000.

(2)
$500,000 from the fiscal year 2001 general fund‑-state appropriation is
contingent upon the completion of the strategic plan required in subsection (1)
of this section. If the strategic plan is not completed by July 1, 2000, the
amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(3)
Private/local funds appropriated in this section shall be used to complete the
strategic planning process.

Sec.
613. 1999
c 309 s 615 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE WASHINGTON
STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 2,646,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ ((2,661,000))

2,861,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ ((5,307,000))

5,507,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$50,000 of the general fund‑‑state appropriation for fiscal year
2000 and $50,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year
2001 are provided solely for activities related to the Lewis and Clark
Bicentennial.

(2)
$25,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2000 and
$25,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 are
provided solely for the purchase and replacement costs of historic elm trees
along Des Moines memorial drive. These funds shall be allocated to the
Highline historical society.

(3)
$200,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 is
provided solely for the Columbia gorge interpretive center for the continued
provision of interpretive services to the public. These funds shall be
allocated to the Skamania historical society.

Sec.
614. 1999
c 309 s 617 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE
SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ ((3,986,000))

4,040,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ ((4,006,000))

4,169,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation........... $ 644,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ ((8,636,000))

8,853,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: $103,556 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2001 is provided for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6361 (child abuse and neglect). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2000, the funds provided shall lapse.

Sec.
615. 1999
c 309 s 618 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE
SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((6,704,000))

6,768,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((6,686,000))

6,931,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((13,390,000))

13,699,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: $175,596 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2001 is provided for the implementation of Substitute Senate Bill
No. 6361 (child abuse and neglect). If the bill is not enacted by June 30,
2000, the funds provided shall lapse.

Sec.
616. 1999
c 309 s 612 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE WORK
FORCE TRAINING AND EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 1,124,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((1,123,000))

1,923,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 34,408,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((36,655,000))

37,455,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: $800,000 of the general fund‑-state appropriation for
fiscal year 2001 is provided solely for grants to local work force development
councils that will help close the skills gap facing Washington business.
Expenditure of the grant amounts provided in this section is contingent upon receiving
a 50 percent in-kind or cash nonstate match. The grants shall be used to:

(1)
Create partnerships with businesses, labor organizations, and industry
associations that share common occupations for the purpose of determining their
future employment and training needs;

(2)
Bring together community colleges and other employment and training providers
to develop the programs that meet the employment and training needs defined by
the above industry partnerships;

(3)
Expand the use of skills standards and customized training designed to meet the
specific needs of business; and

(4)
Support increased use of on-the-job learning strategies among small- and
medium-sized enterprises.

The board shall provide a preliminary report of the results of
at least three partnerships by December 1, 2000, and shall present the report
to the appropriate committees of the legislature. The preliminary report shall
describe the progress of the partnerships toward meeting the skills gap. The
work of all of the partnerships shall be completed by June 30, 2001, and a
final report shall be provided to the appropriate committees of the
legislature. The final report shall describe the customized training that the
board, industries, and the community colleges will use to meet the skills gap.

(End of part)

PART
VII

SPECIAL
APPROPRIATIONS

Sec.
701. 1999
c 309 s 701 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES:
FOR DEBT SUBJECT TO THE DEBT LIMIT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((604,672,000))

639,872,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((455,689,000))

430,208,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((4,168,000))

6,797,000

Debt-Limit
Reimbursable Bond Retirement Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((2,574,000))

2,565,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((1,067,103,000))

1,079,442,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The general fund appropriations are for deposit into the
debt-limit general fund bond retirement account. The appropriation for fiscal
year 2000 shall be deposited in the debt-limit general fund bond retirement
account by June 30, 2000.

Sec.
702. 1999
c 309 s 702 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES:
FOR GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED BY ENTERPRISE ACTIVITIES

State
Convention and Trade Center Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((32,575,000))

32,724,000

Accident
Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 5,080,000

Medical
Aid Account‑-State Appropriation........ $...................................... 5,080,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((42,735,000))

42,884,000

Sec.
703. 1999
c 309 s 703 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES:
FOR GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT TO BE REIMBURSED AS PRESCRIBED BY STATUTE

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((23,806,000))

23,678,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((23,445,000))

23,283,000

Higher
Education Construction Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((118,000))

695,000

Nondebt-Limit
Reimbursable Bond Retirement

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ ((106,498,000))

119,977,000

Stadium
and Exhibition Center Construction‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((1,250,000))

1,970,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((155,117,000))

169,603,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The general fund appropriation is for deposit into the
nondebt-limit general fund bond retirement account.

Sec.
704. 1999
c 309 s 705 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES:
FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 567,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 568,000

Higher
Education Construction Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((30,000))

83,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,237,000

Public
Safety Reimbursable Bond Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((3,000))

0

Stadium/Exhibition
Center Construction

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 250,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((2,655,000))

2,705,000

Total
Bond Retirement and Interest Appropriations

contained
in sections 701 through 705 of this

act........................................ $ ((1,268,839,000))

1,294,634,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 705. LAPSED
APPROPRIATION. 1999 c 309 s 709 (uncodified) is repealed.

Sec.
706. 1999
c 309 s 710 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE EDUCATION
TECHNOLOGY REVOLVING ACCOUNT. The sum of (($8,200,000))
$6,400,000 from the general fund and $6,600,000 from the K-20 technology
account are appropriated for fiscal year 2000 to the education technology
revolving account.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 707. A
new section is added to 1999 c 309 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT--DIGITAL
GOVERNMENT POOL

Data
Processing Revolving Account Appropriation..... $ 4,000,000

Master
Licensing Account Appropriation.............. $ 1,000,000

Digital
Government Revolving Account

Appropriation................................... $ 5,000,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 10,000,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
$4,000,000 of the data processing revolving account appropriation and
$5,000,000 of the digital government revolving account appropriation may be
allocated by the office of financial management, in consultation with the
department of information services, to agencies to support the activities
necessary to provide digital services of government to citizens, businesses,
and to state and other governments.

(2)
$1,000,000 of the master licensing account appropriation may be expended to
support systems to enable businesses to file their master business licenses
electronically and to enable corporations and companies to file reports
electronically as provided in Engrossed House Bill No. 3144.

(3)
To facilitate the transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and accounts, the
state treasurer is directed to transfer sufficient moneys from each dedicated
fund or account to the digital government revolving account, hereby created in
the state treasury, in accordance with schedules provided by the office of
financial management for additional digital government projects.

(4)
Agencies receiving these allocations shall report at a minimum to the
information services board and to the office of financial management on the
progress of digital government projects and efforts.

Sec.
708. 1999
c 309 s 711 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE AGRICULTURAL
COLLEGE TRUST MANAGEMENT ACCOUNT

Resource
Management Cost Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((2,632,000))

2,753,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The appropriation shall be deposited in the agricultural college
trust management account.

Sec.
709. 1999
c 309 s 713 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE OFFICE
OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-YEAR 2000 ALLOCATIONS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((5,000,000))

3,466,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $ 462,000

Hospital
Commission Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 19,000

Health
Professions Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 182,000

Certified
Public Accountants' Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,000

Safe
Drinking Water Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 96,000

Water
Quality Permit Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 258,000

State
Health Care Authority Administrative

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 1,456,000

Year
2000 Contingency Revolving Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 10,000,000

Accident
Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 150,000

Medical
Aid Account‑-State Appropriation........ $ 150,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((17,778,000))

16,244,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriations will be allocated by the office of financial management to
agencies to resolve year 2000 issues. Agencies shall submit their estimated
costs to resolve year 2000 issues to the office of financial management.

(2)
To facilitate the transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and accounts, the
state treasurer is directed to transfer sufficient moneys from each dedicated
fund or account to the year 2000 contingency revolving account, in accordance
with schedules provided by the office of financial management.

Sec.
710. 1999
c 309 s 714 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE GOVERNOR‑-EXTRAORDINARY
CRIMINAL JUSTICE COSTS. (($1,200,000)) (1)
$510,000 of the public safety and education account, or so much thereof as
may be necessary, is appropriated solely for providing financial assistance in
the 1999-01 biennium to Okanogan county for extraordinary criminal justice
costs incurred in the adjudication of an aggravated homicide case. The office
of financial management, in consultation with Okanogan county, shall determine
the amount to be paid based on an assessment of the portion of the costs
associated with the homicide case which is disproportionate relative to the
county's criminal justice resources. The amount paid under this section shall
not exceed eighty percent of the total costs associated with the investigation,
prosecution, indigent defense, jury impanelment, expert witness, interpreters,
incarceration, and other adjudication costs of the case. On January 1, 2000,
any unexpended funds of the amount appropriated in this section shall lapse and
revert to the public safety and education account.

(2)
$500,000 of the public safety and education account, or so much thereof as may
be necessary, is appropriated solely for providing financial assistance in the
1999-01 biennium to Franklin, Cowlitz, and Thurston counties for extraordinary
criminal justice costs incurred in the adjudication of aggravated homicide
cases. Within the amount appropriated in this subsection, the office of
financial management, in consultation with the counties, shall determine the
amount to be paid based on an assessment of the portion of the costs associated
with the homicide case which is disproportionate relative to the county's
criminal justice resources. The amount paid under this section shall not
exceed eighty percent of the total costs associated with the investigation,
prosecution, indigent defense, jury impanelment, expert witness, interpreters,
incarceration, and other adjudication costs of the cases. On January 1, 2001,
any unexpended funds of the amount appropriated in this section shall lapse and
revert to the public safety and education account.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 711. A
new section is added to 1999 c 309 (uncodified) to read as follows:

MIDWIFERY
CERTIFICATION PROGRAM. $73,000 from the general
fund‑-state is appropriated for fiscal year 2001 for the purposes of
deposit to the health professions account to cover a revenue shortfall in the
midwifery certification program in the department of health.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 712. A
new section is added to 1999 c 309 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE
HEALTH INSURANCE POOL ACCOUNT. The sum of three million
dollars is appropriated from the health services account to the state health
insurance pool account for the purposes of Second Substitute Bill Senate No.
6067 (health insurance coverage). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2000,
the appropriation in this section shall lapse.

Sec.
713. 1999
c 309 s 718 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

For
the period from July 1, 1999, through June 30, 2001, a one hundred fifty
thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid as a sundry claim to ((a
teacher's)) the estate ((if the teacher)) of an employee
in the common school system of the state who is killed in the course of
employment. The determination of eligibility for the benefit shall be made
consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and industries. The
department of labor and industries shall notify the director of the department
of general administration ((if a teacher's estate is determined to be
eligible for payment under this section)) by order under RCW 51.52.050.

Sec.
714. 1999
c 309 s 719 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE GOVERNOR‑-COMPENSATION‑-INSURANCE
BENEFITS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 10,401,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((26,095,000))

30,502,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((12,987,000))

14,488,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ ((747,000))

828,000

Salary
and Insurance Increase Revolving Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((25,941,000))

29,093,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((75,166,000))

85,312,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)(a)
The monthly employer funding rate for insurance benefit premiums, public
employees benefits board administration, and the uniform medical plan shall
not exceed (($375.50)) $388.02 per eligible employee for fiscal
year 2000, and (($410.53)) $425.62 for fiscal year 2001. The
fiscal year 2001 funding rate includes an additional $0.02 per eligible
employee for the benefit expansion in (h) of this subsection, $0.23 for the
assessments funded in (i) of this subsection, and $1.82 for increased managed
care plan premium trends.

(b)
((The monthly employer funding rate for the operating costs of the health
care authority shall not exceed $12.52 per eligible employee for fiscal year
2000, and $13.04 for fiscal year 2001.

(c))) An
additional $2.42 per eligible employee shall be included in the employer
funding rate for fiscal year((s)) 2000 and an additional $7.23 for
fiscal year 2001 to repay the public employees' and retirees' insurance
account for any claims paid as a result of a court-approved stipulated settlement
in Retired State Employees et al. v. State of Washington (Thurston
county superior court cause no. 92-2-01294-1). An additional $7.10 per
eligible employee shall be included in the employer funding rate for fiscal
year 2001 for uniform medical plan claims expenditures and reserves.

(((d)))
(c) An additional $0.71 per eligible employee shall be included in the
employer funding rate for fiscal year 2000, and an additional $1.47 per
eligible employee shall be included in the employer funding rate for fiscal
year 2001, solely to increase life insurance coverage in accordance with a
court approved settlement in Burbage et al. v. State of Washington
(Thurston county superior court cause no. 94-2-02560-8).

(((e)))
(d) Surplus moneys accruing to the public employees' and retirees'
insurance account due to lower-than-projected insurance costs may not be
reallocated by the health care authority to increase the actuarial value of
public employee insurance plans. Such funds shall be held in reserve in the
public employees' and retirees' insurance account and may not be expended
without prior legislative authorization.

(((f)))
(e) In order to achieve the level of funding provided for health
benefits, the public employees' benefits board may require employee premium
copayments, increase point-of-service cost sharing, and/or implement managed
competition.

(((g)))
(f) The health care authority shall use funds accruing to the public
employees' and retirees' insurance account in fiscal year 1999 from payments
made by the standard insurance company to the state of Washington related to
the state's basic long-term disability plan, for insurance costs in the
1999-2001 biennium.

(g)
The health care authority shall deposit any moneys received on behalf of the
uniform medical plan as a result of rebates on prescription drugs, audits of
hospitals, subrogation payments, or any other moneys recovered as a result of
prior uniform medical plan claims payments, into the public employees' and
retirees' insurance account to be used for insurance benefits. Such receipts
shall not be used for administrative expenditures.

(h)
An additional $0.02 per eligible employee is included in the employer funding
rate exclusively for the expansion of contraceptive coverage for health plans
available through the public employees' benefits board, including the uniform
medical plan. Funding is sufficient for the board to include coverage for all
methods of prescription contraceptive drugs and devices approved by the federal
food and drug administration. The specific conditions for expanded coverage
shall be determined and designed by the public employees' benefits board.

(i)
An additional $0.23 per eligible employee is included in the employer funding
rate for increased assessments resulting from implementation of individual
insurance market reform legislation (Substitute Senate Bill No. 6067).

(j)
When setting the employee premiums for calendar year 2001, the public employee
benefits board shall set the projected average premium not lower than $16.89,
using reasonable assumptions concerning employee plan selection.

(2)
To facilitate the transfer of moneys from dedicated funds and accounts, the
state treasurer is directed to transfer sufficient moneys from each dedicated
fund or account to the special fund salary and insurance contribution increase
revolving fund in accordance with schedules provided by the office of financial
management.

(3)
The health care authority, subject to the approval of the public employees'
benefits board, shall provide subsidies for health benefit premiums to eligible
retired or disabled public employees and school district employees who are
eligible for parts A and B of medicare, pursuant to RCW 41.05.085. From
January 1, 2000 through December 31, 2000, the subsidy shall be $62.48.
Starting January 1, 2001, the subsidy shall be $69.98 per month.

(4)
Technical colleges, school districts, and educational service districts shall
remit to the health care authority for deposit into the public employees' and
retirees' insurance account established in RCW 41.05.120 the following amounts:

(a)
For each full-time employee, $22.03 per month beginning September 1, 1999, and
$25.06 beginning September 1, 2000;

(b)
For each part-time employee who, at the time of the remittance, is employed in
an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.32.010 or 41.40.010 and is eligible
for employer fringe benefit contributions for basic benefits, $22.03 each month
beginning September 1, 1999, and $25.06 beginning September 1, 2000, prorated
by the proportion of employer fringe benefit contributions for a full-time
employee that the part-time employee receives.

The
remittance requirements specified in this subsection shall not apply to
employees of a technical college, school district, or educational service
district who purchase insurance benefits through contracts with the health care
authority.

(5)
The salary and insurance increase revolving account appropriation includes
amounts sufficient to fund health benefits for ferry workers at the premium
levels specified in subsection (1) of this section, consistent with the 1999-01
transportation appropriations act.

(6)
The allocations to agencies and institutions under this section reflect a
reduction of $3,982,000 general fund‑-state for fiscal year 2000, an
increase of $458,000 general fund‑-state for fiscal year 2001, and
reductions of $1,330,000 general fund‑-federal, $74,000 general fund‑-local,
and $3,342,000 salary and insurance increase revolving account, to reflect
savings resulting from the implementation of employer pension rate reductions
on July 1, 1999.

Sec.
715. 1999
c 309 s 720 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT SYSTEMS‑-CONTRIBUTIONS
TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS. The appropriations in this
section are subject to the following conditions and limitations: The
appropriations for the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement
system shall be made on a monthly basis beginning July 1, 1999, consistent with
chapter 41.45 RCW as amended by this act, and the appropriations for the judges
and judicial retirement systems shall be made on a quarterly basis consistent
with chapters 2.10 and 2.12 RCW.

(1)
There is appropriated for state contributions to the law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' retirement system:

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((16,320,000))

16,082,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((18,050,000))

20,130,000

The
appropriations in this subsection are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(a)
The appropriations include $3,564,000 general fund‑-state for fiscal year
2001 to pay the increased state law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 2 contributions resulting from enactment of Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6530 (provisions for early retirement in plan 2/3
pensions). If the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2000, the amount provided in
this subsection shall lapse.

(b)
The appropriations include a reduction of $238,000 general fund‑-state
for fiscal year 2000 and $1,484,000 general fund‑-state for fiscal year
2001, to reflect savings resulting from the implementation of a new state law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2 contribution
rate, based on the 1998 actuarial valuation study conducted by the office of
the state actuary, effective May 1, 2000.

(2)
There is appropriated for contributions to the judicial retirement system:

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 7,000,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001) ... $ 7,000,000

(3)
There is appropriated for contributions to the judges retirement system:

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 750,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ 750,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((49,870,000))

51,712,000

Sec.
716. 1999
c 309 s 723 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

SALARY
COST OF LIVING ADJUSTMENT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((33,614,000))

33,424,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((68,186,000))

68,376,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. 31,436,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ ((2,001,000))

2,014,000

Salary
and Insurance Increase Revolving Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 72,609,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((207,846,000))

207,859,000

The
appropriations in this section shall be expended solely for the purposes
designated in this section and are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
In addition to the purposes set forth in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section, appropriations in this section are provided solely for a 3.0 percent
salary increase effective July 1, 1999, and a 3.0 percent salary increase
effective July 1, 2000, for all classified employees, including those employees
in the Washington management service, and exempt employees under the
jurisdiction of the personnel resources board.

(2)
The appropriations in this section are sufficient to fund a 3.0 percent salary
increase effective July 1, 1999, and a 3.0 percent increase effective July 1,
2000, for general government, legislative, and judicial employees exempt from
merit system rules whose maximum salaries are not set by the commission on
salaries for elected officials.

(3)
The salary and insurance increase revolving account appropriation in this
section includes funds sufficient to fund a 3.0 percent salary increase
effective July 1, 1999, and a 3.0 percent salary increase effective July 1,
2000, for ferry workers consistent with the 1999-01 transportation
appropriations act.

(4)(a)
No salary increase may be paid under this section to any person whose salary
has been Y-rated pursuant to rules adopted by the personnel resources board.

(b)
The average salary increases paid under this section and section 724 of this
act to agency officials whose maximum salaries are established by the committee
on agency official salaries shall not exceed the average increases provided by
subsection (2) of this section.

(5)
The appropriations in this section include $1,498,000 general fund‑-state
for fiscal year 2000, $1,765,000 general fund‑-state for fiscal year
2001, and a reduction of $3,263,000 general fund‑-federal for the
department of social and health services to adjust employer pension funding
levels to reflect historical fund source ratios.

Sec.
717. 1999
c 309 s 727 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-COMPENSATION
ACTIONS OF PERSONNEL RESOURCES BOARD

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ ((6,543,000))

6,578,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((6,543,000))

7,379,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((3,343,000))

3,743,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ 173,000

Salary
and Insurance Increase Revolving Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((22,783,000))

23,025,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((39,385,000))

40,898,000

The
appropriations in this section shall be expended solely for the purposes
designated in this section and are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Funding is provided to implement the salary increase recommendations of the
Washington personnel resources board for the top 26 priority classes identified
pursuant to RCW 41.06.152. The salary increases shall be effective July 1,
1999.

(2)
$800,000 of the general fund--state appropriation for fiscal year 2001 and
$400,000 of the general fund--federal appropriation are provided solely for one
or more additional steps to the following registered nurse job classes used in
state mental hospitals, developmental disability facilities, correctional
facilities, and other similar state institutional settings: Registered nurse
1-3; community nurse specialist; clinical nurse specialist; and nurse
practitioner. Funding is contingent upon review and approval by the personnel
resources board that providing additional steps is an appropriate means to
improve the recruitment and retention of registered nurses at Western state
hospital and the McNeil Island correctional facility, and upon approval by the
office of financial management that the annual general fund--state cost of the
increases proposed for approval does not exceed $800,000. The increases shall
be effective July 1, 2000. If the additional step or steps are not added by
July 1, 2000, the amounts provided in this subsection shall lapse.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 718. A
new section is added to 1999 c 309 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
SUNDRY CLAIMS. The following sums, or so much thereof as may
be necessary, are appropriated from the general fund, unless otherwise
indicated, for relief of various individuals, firms, and corporations for
sundry claims. These appropriations are to be disbursed on vouchers approved
by the director of general administration, except as otherwise provided, as
follows:

(1)
Reimbursement of criminal defendants acquitted on the basis of self-defense,
pursuant to RCW 9A.16.110:

(a)
Douglas Jones, claim number SCJ 99-05 $ 9,420

(b)
Tyler Davis, claim number SCJ 99-07 $ 4,933

(c)
Joel Maza, claim number SCJ 99-08 $ 4,236

(d)
Thomas Vigil, claim number SCJ 99-09 $ 8,070

(e)
Wayne Tweed, claim number SCJ 99-10 $ 5,588

(f)
William Rhodes, claim number SCJ 99-11 $ 5,000

(g)
Lew Roberts, claim number SCJ 99-12 $ 5,091

(h)
Thomas Cheetham, claim number SCJ 99-13 $ 7,648

(i)
Adonta Goldsby, claim number SCJ 99-14 $ 7,860

(j)
Lorenzo Macklin, claim number SCJ 99-16 $ 32,785

(k)
Valeriano Rueda, claim number SCJ 99-17 $ 1,211

(l)
Duane Dunlap, claim number SCJ 00-01 $ 19,646

(m)
Nathan Borge, claim number SCJ 00-02 $ 4,864

(n)
George D. Easton Jr., claim number SCJ 00-03 $ 5,837

(o)
James Shank, claim number SCJ 00-04 $ 9,977

(p)
Jacob Sloboda, claim number SCJ 00-05 $ 12,856

(q)
Shawn G. Nickel, claim number SCJ 00-06 $ 4,214

(r)
Anthony M. Davis, claim number SCJ 00-07 $ 10,513

(s)
Gregory O. Thornton, claim number SCJ 00-08 $ 41,989

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 719. A
new section is added to 1999 c 309 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE OFFICE OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-LEGAL COSTS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 24,000

Disaster
Response Account‑-State Appropriation...... $ 200,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 224,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided for legal costs
incurred by the citizens commission on salaries for elected officials and the
military department.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 720. A
new section is added to 1999 c 309 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE OFFICE
OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-CONTRIBUTIONS
TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 9,302,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation.................. $.................................. 3,368,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation........... $ 133,000

Special
Account Retirement Contribution Increase

Revolving
Account Appropriation.................. $ 8,081,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 20,884,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: The appropriations in this section are provided solely to pay the
increased retirement contributions resulting from enactment of Engrossed
Substitute Senate Bill No. 6530 (early retirement in plan 2/3 pensions). If
the bill is not enacted by June 30, 2000, the amounts provided in this section
shall lapse.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 721. A
new section is added to 1999 c 309 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE OFFICE
OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT‑-CONTRIBUTIONS
TO RETIREMENT SYSTEMS

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ (1,715,000)

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ (10,721,000)

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation.................. $.................................. (4,122,000)

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation........... $ (145,000)

Special
Account Retirement Contribution Increase

Revolving
Account Appropriation.................. $ (8,663,000)

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ (25,366,000)

The
appropriations in this section are provided solely to reduce agency and
institution appropriations to reflect: (1) Savings resulting from the
implementation of new employer pension contribution rates, effective May 1,
2000, based on the 1998 actuarial valuation studies conducted by the office of
the state actuary; and (2) a 0.04 percent increase in the department of
retirement systems administrative expense rate, effective May 1, 2000, to fund
implementation of the public employees' retirement system plan 3.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 722. A
new section is added to 1999 c 309 (uncodified) to read as follows:

LOCAL
GOVERNMENT COSTS. For the biennium ending June
30, 2001, as limited by general fund appropriation, the state shall provide a
portion of the local share of any political subdivisions' costs for criminal
justice, public health, and police and fire services, in support of programs
and services that are the ongoing responsibility of the recipient political
subdivision. It is the intent of the legislature that the funding provided in
sections 723, 725, and 726 of this act, increased by the fiscal growth factor,
will be appropriated in subsequent fiscal biennia. Any appropriation by the
state is an assumption of local government costs under RCW 43.135.060(2), but
does not constitute a state obligation after June 30, 2001.

It
is the intent of the legislature to make state general fund appropriations to
provide revenue to political subdivisions to partially offset the loss of
revenues as a result of voter approval of Initiative Measure No. 695. In
addition to the direct appropriations to local governments, it is the intent of
the legislature that Senate Bill No. 6858 will provide an additional source of
revenues to local governments for a variety of public purposes, the funding for
which may be impacted by the revenue reductions enacted by Initiative Measure
No. 695.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 723. A
new section is added to 1999 c 309 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE COUNTY
PUBLIC HEALTH ACCOUNT. For the purpose of public
health, subject to section 722 of this act, the sum of $34,616,180 is
appropriated from the state general fund to the county public health account
for distribution as follows:

(1)
$11,538,727 is provided for distribution for calendar year 2000 for the period
from July 1 through December 31.

(2)
$23,077,453 is provided for public health expenses for calendar year 2001.

(3)
Distributions to public health districts and county public health programs
shall equal, but not exceed, 90 percent of the 1999-2001 public health revenue
loss attributable to enactment of Initiative Measure No. 695, except that
excess funds may be allocated for emergency situations by director of community,
trade, and economic development in consultation with public health districts
and programs.

(4)
Up to $50,000 of the funds determined to be in excess of the distribution may
be used by the department of community, trade, and economic development for administration
of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 724. A
new section is added to 1999 c 309 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT‑-DEFINITIONS. The
definitions in this section apply to sections 725 through 727 of this act.

(1)
"Unrestricted revenues" means unrestricted revenues identified in
budget and accounting reporting system extract 3-2-2000 (BARS 3-2) maintained
by the legislative evaluation and accountability program committee.

(2)
"MVET revenues" means motor vehicle excise tax revenues not including
public health distributions identified in budget and accounting reporting
system extract 3-2-2000 (BARS 3-2) maintained by the legislative evaluation and
accountability program committee.

(3)
"County revenue replacement" means 35 percent of MVET revenues as
defined in this section.

(4)
"City revenue replacement" means 25 percent of MVET revenues as
defined in this section.

(5)
"Budget reduction" means unrestricted revenues minus MVET revenues
plus city revenue replacement or county revenue replacement, as appropriate.

(6)
"Minimum budget reduction threshold" means 95 percent of unrestricted
revenues.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 725. A
new section is added to 1999 c 309 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT‑-COUNTY
CORPORATIONS

General
Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 11,346,896

General
Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 22,693,792

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 34,040,688

Subject
to section 722 of this act, the appropriations in this section are provided
solely for distribution to counties, subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The fiscal year 2000 appropriation is provided for distribution to each county
for expenses for the period July 1 through December 31, 2000. The distribution
to each county shall be one-half of the amounts provided from the fiscal year
2001 appropriation under subsection (2) of this section.

(2)
The fiscal year 2001 appropriation is provided for distribution to each county
for county revenue replacement for expenses for calendar year 2001. If,
however, following the county revenue replacement, the budget reduction for a
county exceeds the minimum budget reduction threshold, additional funds shall
be provided to attain the minimum budget reduction threshold.

(3)
In addition to the conditions in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, no
county shall receive more funding from the appropriations in this section than
95 percent of the revenue loss attributable to enactment of Initiative Measure
No. 695 for that fiscal year, based on the November 1999 MVET revenue forecast
by the office of financial management.

(4)
If, following the distributions provided in this section, there are funds in
excess of the calculated distributions, the department may expend up to $50,000
of the excess funds for administration of this section or for the task force
established in section 727 of this act. Any remaining excess funds shall be
allocated in the following priority order: (a) For distribution to counties
heavily impacted by the loss of motor vehicle excise tax allocated to
distressed counties under referendum 49; (b) for distribution to newly
qualifying jurisdictions as if the jurisdiction had been in existence prior to
November 1999; (c) to correct for errors in BARS data; and (d) for emergency
situations as determined by the director of community, trade, and economic
development in consultation with the Washington state association of counties
and Washington association of county officials.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 726. A
new section is added to 1999 c 309 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT‑-CITY
MUNICIPAL CORPORATIONS

General
Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2000)......... $ 22,097,509

General
Fund--State Appropriation (FY 2001)......... $ 44,195,012

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION...................... $ 66,292,518

Subject
to section 722 of this act, the appropriations in this section are provided
solely for distribution to cities, subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The fiscal year 2000 appropriation is provided for distribution to each city
for expenses for the period July 1 through December 31, 2000. The distribution
to each city shall be one-half of the amounts provided from the fiscal year
2001 appropriation under subsection (2) of this section.

(2)
The fiscal year 2001 appropriation is provided for distribution to each city
for city revenue replacement for expenses for calendar year 2001. If, however,
following the city revenue replacement, the budget reduction for a city exceeds
the minimum budget reduction threshold, additional funds shall be provided to
attain the minimum budget reduction threshold.

(3)
In addition to the conditions in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, no
city shall receive more funding from the appropriations in this section than 95
percent of the revenue loss attributable to enactment of Initiative Measure No.
695 for that fiscal year, based on the November 1999 MVET revenue forecast by
the office of financial management.

(4)
If, following the distributions provided in this section, there are funds in
excess of the calculated distributions, the department may expend up to $50,000
of the excess funds for administration of this section or for the task force
established in section 726 of this act. Any remaining excess funds shall be
allocated in the following priority order: (a) For distribution to newly
qualifying jurisdictions as if the jurisdiction had been in existence prior to
November 1999; (b) to correct for errors in BARS data; and (c) for emergency
situations as determined by the director of community, trade, and economic
development in consultation with the association of Washington cities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 727. A
new section is added to 1999 c 309 (uncodified) to read as follows:

LOCAL
GOVERNMENT TASK FORCE. The department of community, trade, and economic
development shall convene a task force for the purpose of providing to the
legislature recommendations for the future distribution of the ongoing
Initiative Measure No. 695 replacement funding as provided in sections 723,
725, and 726 of this act. The report shall include recommendations that
provide equalization funding for newly qualifying jurisdictions based on
incorporation, growth, or economic changes.

The
director or the director's designee shall be a member and chair of the task
force. Other members of the task force shall include representatives from the
office of financial management and the department of revenue, four county
representatives, one of whom shall represent a public health district, and four
city representatives.

The
task force recommendations shall be presented to the governor and the chairs of
the appropriate legislative committees by November 1, 2000.

The department of community, trade, and economic development may
utilize a portion of the funds provided to the department for the
implementation of sections 723, 725, and 726 of this act for the costs of the
task force.

(End of part)

PART
VIII

OTHER
TRANSFERS AND APPROPRIATIONS

Sec.
801. 1999
c 309 s 801 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-STATE
REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

General
Fund Appropriation for fire insurance

premiums
distribution...................... $ 6,617,250

General
Fund Appropriation for public utility

district
excise tax distribution........... $ 35,876,898

General
Fund Appropriation for prosecuting attorneys

salaries................................... $ 2,960,000

City
Police and Fire Protection Assistance

Account
Appropriation...................... $ ((95,667,000))

33,383,000

General
Fund Appropriation for camper and travel

trailer
excise tax distribution............. $ ((4,325,826))

2,061,000

General
Fund Appropriation for boating

safety/education
and law enforcement

distribution............................... $ 3,616,000

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account Appropriation

for
harbor improvement revenue distribution $ 138,000

Liquor
Excise Tax Account Appropriation for liquor

excise
tax distribution.................... $ 25,580,000

Liquor
Revolving Fund Appropriation for liquor

profits
distribution....................... $ 52,269,932

Timber
Tax Distribution Account Appropriation

for
distribution to "Timber" counties...... $ 74,025,900

Municipal
Sales and Use Tax Equalization Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((84,851,000))

28,145,000

County
Sales and Use Tax Equalization Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((13,147,000))

9,426,000

Death
Investigations Account Appropriation for

distribution
to counties for publicly funded

autopsies.................................. $ 1,375,332

County
Criminal Justice Account Appropriation... $........................................... ((103,169,000))

70,490,000

Municipal
Criminal Justice Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((40,269,000))

29,519,000

County
Public Health Account Appropriation..... $ ((51,520,250))

17,938,000

Distressed
County Assistance Account

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,928,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((595,408,380))

398,349,312

The
total expenditures from the state treasury under the appropriations in this
section shall not exceed the funds available under statutory distributions for
the stated purposes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 802. A
new section is added to 1999 c 309 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-TRANSFERS

Local
Toxics Control Account: For transfer to

the
state toxics control account on or

before
May 1, 2000, an amount equal to

$3,000,000.
This transfer shall be

repaid
to the local toxics control account

from
moneys in the state toxics control

account
by June 30, 2005. The transfer

shall
be repaid prior to June 30, 2005,

to
the extent that moneys are received

from
the cost recovery action at the

Everett
smelter site............................ $ 3,000,000

Emergency
Reserve Fund: For transfer to the

multimodal
fund................................. $ 300,000,000

Park
Land Trust Revolving Fund: For transfer

to
the common school construction fund,

$13,350,000
of the amount deposited into

the
park land trust revolving fund on

January
6, 2000, plus all interest attributed

to
that amount that has accrued since

deposit,
up to $13,550,000. Nothing in this

section
constitutes an authorization or

ratification
of the transaction that resulted

in
this deposit................................. $ 13,550,000

Park
Land Trust Revolving Fund: For transfer

to
the natural resources real property

replacement
account, $3,200,000 of the

amount
deposited into the park land trust

revolving
fund on January 6, 2000, plus

all
interest attributed to that amount

that
has accrued since deposit, up to

$3,300,000.
Nothing in this section

constitutes
an authorization or ratification

of
the transaction that resulted in this

deposit......................................... $ 3,300,000

Health
Services Account: For transfer to

the
state general fund for public health

purposes........................................ $ 34,616,180

(End of part)

PART
IX

MISCELLANEOUS

Sec.
901. 1999
c 309 s 907 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

RETIREMENT
CONTRIBUTION RATES. (1) The changes to the
basic state and employer contribution rates adopted by the pension funding
council for the 1999-2001 biennium shall be effective on the following dates:

(a)
The changes to the basic state contribution rate for the law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' retirement system, and to the basic employer
contribution rate for the public employees' retirement system plan 1 and the
Washington state patrol retirement system shall each take effect on July 1,
1999, and continue until April 30, 2000; and

(b)
The change to the basic employer contribution rate for the teachers' retirement
system plan 1 shall take effect on September 1, 1999, and continue until
April 30, 2000.

(2)
The director of the department of retirement systems shall establish new
contribution rates, to be effective July 1, 1999, for the public employees'
retirement system plan 2 and the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 2. The new rates shall be established pursuant to RCW
41.40.650 and 41.26.450 respectively. The director of the department of
retirement systems shall establish a new contribution rate, to be effective
September 1, 1999, for the teachers' retirement system plan 2. The new rate
shall be established pursuant to RCW 41.45.061.

(3)
This section expires on ((June 30, 2001)) April 30, 2000.

Sec.
902. 1999
c 309 s 908 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

PUBLIC
EMPLOYEES' RETIREMENT SYSTEM. For the period from July 1, 1999, through ((June
30, 2001)) April 30, 2000, in addition to the basic and supplemental
employer contributions required by RCW 41.45.060 and 41.45.070, the department
of retirement systems shall also charge all public employees' retirement system
employers an additional employer contribution rate of 0.05 percent for all
members of the public employees' retirement system.

This
section expires on ((June 30, 2001)) April 30, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 903. A
new section is added to chapter 41.45 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Beginning May 1, 2000, through June 30, 2001, the basic state contribution rate
for the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2,
and the basic employer contribution rates for the public employees' retirement
system, the school employees' retirement system, and the teachers retirement
system, shall be as follows:

(a)
2.16 percent for all plan 2 members of the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system;

(b)
3.58 percent for all members of the public employees' retirement system;

(c)
3.58 percent for all members of the school employees' retirement system,
effective as of the establishment of the new retirement system on September 1,
2000; and

(d)
6.03 percent for all members of the teachers' retirement system.

(2)
The department shall also adjust employer and member contribution rates for the
law enforcement officers and fire fighters retirement system plan 2, on May 1,
2000.

Sec.
904. RCW
41.45.060 and 1998 c 341 s 404, 1998 c 340 s 11, and 1998 c 283 s 6 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
The state actuary shall provide actuarial valuation results based on the
assumptions adopted under RCW 41.45.030.

(2)
Not later than September 30, 1998, and every two years thereafter, consistent
with the assumptions adopted under RCW 41.45.030, the council shall adopt
changes to:

(a)
A basic state contribution rate for the law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' retirement system;

(b)
Basic employer contribution rates for the public employees' retirement system
((plan 1)), the teachers' retirement system ((plan 1)), and the
Washington state patrol retirement system to be used in the ensuing biennial
period; and

(c)
A basic employer contribution rate for the school employees' retirement system
for funding the public employees' retirement system plan 1.

For
the 1999-2001 fiscal biennium, the rates adopted by the council shall be
effective for the period designated in section 901 of this 2000 act.

(3)
The employer and state contribution rates adopted by the council shall be the
level percentages of pay that are needed:

(a)
To fully amortize the total costs of the public employees' retirement system
plan 1, the teachers' retirement system plan 1, the law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1, and the unfunded liability of the
Washington state patrol retirement system not later than June 30, 2024, except
as provided in subsection (5) of this section; and

(b)
To also continue to fully fund the public employees' retirement system plan 2,
the teachers' retirement system plans 2 and 3, the school employees' retirement
system plans 2 and 3, and the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 2 in accordance with RCW 41.40.650, 41.26.450, and this
section.

(4)
The aggregate actuarial cost method shall be used to calculate a combined plan
2 and 3 employer contribution rate.

(5)
An amount equal to the amount of extraordinary investment gains as defined in
RCW 41.31.020 shall be used to shorten the amortization period for the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 and the teachers' retirement system plan 1.

(6)
The council shall immediately notify the directors of the office of financial
management and department of retirement systems of the state and employer
contribution rates adopted.

(7)
The director of the department of retirement systems shall collect those rates
adopted by the council.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 905. A
new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The uniform medical plan benefits administration account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. Moneys in the account shall be used
exclusively for contracted expenditures for uniform medical plan claims
administration, data analysis, utilization management, preferred provider
administration, and activities related to benefits administration where the
level of services provided pursuant to a contract fluctuate as a direct result
of changes in uniform medical plan enrollment. Moneys in the account may also
be used for administrative activities required to respond to new and unforeseen
conditions that impact the uniform medical plan, but only when the authority
and the office of financial management jointly agree that such activities must
be initiated prior to the next legislative session.

(2)
Receipts from amounts due from or on behalf of uniform medical plan enrollees
for expenditures related to benefits administration, including moneys disbursed
from the public employees' and retirees' insurance account, shall be deposited
into the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures. All proposals
for allotment increases shall be provided to the house of representatives
appropriations committee and to the senate ways and means committee at the same
time as they are provided to the office of financial management.

(3)
The uniform dental plan benefits administration account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. Moneys in the account shall be used exclusively
for contracted expenditures related to benefits administration for the uniform
dental plan as established under RCW 41.05.140. Receipts from amounts due from
or on behalf of uniform dental plan enrollees for expenditures related to
benefits administration, including moneys disbursed from the public employees'
and retirees' insurance account, shall be deposited into the account. The
account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for expenditures.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 906. A
new section is added to 1999 c 309 (uncodified) to read as follows:

DONATIONS
OF EMPLOYEE LEAVE. During the 1999-2001 fiscal
biennium, a state employee may, consistent with the provisions of RCW
41.04.665(3), donate leave to the existing leave balances of an employee who
dies in the line of duty between February 1, 2000, and June 30, 2001. The
value of the donated leave will be included in the deceased employee's final
compensation, but is not compensation earnable for the purposes of chapter
41.40 RCW. The agency head shall determine the total amount of leave, not to
exceed 261 days, that may be donated under this section. The department of
personnel may adopt rules, in consultation with the office of financial
management, as it deems necessary for the implementation of this temporary
benefit.

Sec.
907. RCW
43.135.045 and 1994 c 2 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The emergency reserve fund is established in the state treasury. During each
fiscal year, the state treasurer shall deposit in the emergency reserve fund
all general fund‑-state revenues in excess of the state expenditure limit
for that fiscal year. Deposits shall be made at the end of each fiscal quarter
based on projections of state revenues and the state expenditure limit.

(2)
The legislature may appropriate moneys from the emergency reserve fund only
with approval of at least two-thirds of the members of each house of the
legislature, and then only if the appropriation does not cause total
expenditures to exceed the state expenditure limit under this chapter. During
the 1999-2001 fiscal biennium and notwithstanding this subsection, the
legislature may transfer up to three hundred million dollars from the emergency
reserve fund to the multimodal fund.

(3)
The emergency reserve fund balance shall not exceed five percent of biennial
general fund‑-state revenues as projected by the official state revenue
forecast. Any balance in excess of five percent shall be transferred on a
quarterly basis by the state treasurer to the education construction fund
hereby created in the treasury.

(4)(a)
Funds may be appropriated from the education construction fund exclusively for
common school construction or higher education construction.

(b)
Funds may be appropriated for any other purpose only if approved by a
two-thirds vote of each house of the legislature and if approved by a vote of
the people at the next general election. An appropriation approved by the
people under this subsection shall result in an adjustment to the state
expenditure limit only for the fiscal period for which the appropriation is
made and shall not affect any subsequent fiscal period.

Sec.
908. RCW
70.105D.070 and 1999 c 309 s 923 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The state toxics control account and the local toxics control account are
hereby created in the state treasury.

(2)
The following moneys shall be deposited into the state toxics control account:
(a) Those revenues which are raised by the tax imposed under RCW 82.21.030 and
which are attributable to that portion of the rate equal to thirty-three
one-hundredths of one percent; (b) the costs of remedial actions recovered
under this chapter or chapter 70.105A RCW; (c) penalties collected or recovered
under this chapter; and (d) any other money appropriated or transferred to the
account by the legislature. Moneys in the account may be used only to carry
out the purposes of this chapter, including but not limited to the following
activities:

(i)
The state's responsibility for hazardous waste planning, management,
regulation, enforcement, technical assistance, and public education required
under chapter 70.105 RCW;

(ii)
The state's responsibility for solid waste planning, management, regulation,
enforcement, technical assistance, and public education required under chapter
70.95 RCW;

(iii)
The hazardous waste cleanup program required under this chapter;

(iv)
State matching funds required under the federal cleanup law;

(v)
Financial assistance for local programs in accordance with chapters 70.95,
70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW;

(vi)
State government programs for the safe reduction, recycling, or disposal of
hazardous wastes from households, small businesses, and agriculture;

(vii)
Hazardous materials emergency response training;

(viii)
Water and environmental health protection and monitoring programs;

(ix)
Programs authorized under chapter 70.146 RCW;

(x)
A public participation program, including regional citizen advisory committees;

(xi)
Public funding to assist potentially liable persons to pay for the costs of
remedial action in compliance with cleanup standards under RCW
70.105D.030(2)(e) but only when the amount and terms of such funding are
established under a settlement agreement under RCW 70.105D.040(4) and when the
director has found that the funding will achieve both (A) a substantially more
expeditious or enhanced cleanup than would otherwise occur, and (B) the
prevention or mitigation of unfair economic hardship; and

(xii)
Development and demonstration of alternative management technologies designed
to carry out the top two hazardous waste management priorities of RCW
70.105.150.

(3)
The following moneys shall be deposited into the local toxics control account:
Those revenues which are raised by the tax imposed under RCW 82.21.030 and
which are attributable to that portion of the rate equal to thirty-seven
one-hundredths of one percent.

(a)
Moneys deposited in the local toxics control account shall be used by the
department for grants or loans to local governments for the following purposes
in descending order of priority: (i) Remedial actions; (ii) hazardous waste
plans and programs under chapter 70.105 RCW; (iii) solid waste plans and
programs under chapters 70.95, 70.95C, 70.95I, and 70.105 RCW; and (iv) funds
for a program to assist in the assessment and cleanup of sites of
methamphetamine production, but not to be used for the initial containment of
such sites, consistent with the responsibilities and intent of RCW 69.50.511.
Funds for plans and programs shall be allocated consistent with the priorities
and matching requirements established in chapters 70.105, 70.95C, 70.95I, and
70.95 RCW. During the 1999-2001 fiscal biennium, moneys in the account may
also be used for the following activities: Conducting a study of whether
dioxins occur in fertilizers, soil amendments, and soils; reviewing
applications for registration of fertilizers; and conducting a study of plant
uptake of metals.

(b)
Funds may also be appropriated to the department of health to implement
programs to reduce testing requirements under the federal safe drinking water
act for public water systems. The department of health shall reimburse the
account from fees assessed under RCW 70.119A.115 by June 30, 1995.

(4)
Except for unanticipated receipts under RCW 43.79.260 through 43.79.282, moneys
in the state and local toxics control accounts may be spent only after
appropriation by statute.

(5)
One percent of the moneys deposited into the state and local toxics control
accounts shall be allocated only for public participation grants to persons who
may be adversely affected by a release or threatened release of a hazardous
substance and to not-for-profit public interest organizations. The primary
purpose of these grants is to facilitate the participation by persons and
organizations in the investigation and remedying of releases or threatened
releases of hazardous substances and to implement the state's solid and
hazardous waste management priorities. However, during the 1999-2001 fiscal
biennium, funding may not be granted to entities engaged in lobbying
activities, and applicants may not be awarded grants if their cumulative grant
awards under this section exceed $200,000. No grant may exceed sixty
thousand dollars. Grants may be renewed annually. Moneys appropriated for
public participation from either account which are not expended at the close of
any biennium shall revert to the state toxics control account.

(6)
No moneys deposited into either the state or local toxics control account may
be used for solid waste incinerator feasibility studies, construction,
maintenance, or operation.

(7)
The department shall adopt rules for grant or loan issuance and performance.

Sec.
909. RCW
43.08.250 and 1999 c 309 s 915 are each amended to read as follows:

The
money received by the state treasurer from fees, fines, forfeitures, penalties,
reimbursements or assessments by any court organized under Title 3 or 35 RCW,
or chapter 2.08 RCW, shall be deposited in the public safety and education
account which is hereby created in the state treasury. The legislature shall
appropriate the funds in the account to promote traffic safety education,
highway safety, criminal justice training, crime victims' compensation, judicial
education, the judicial information system, civil representation of indigent
persons, winter recreation parking, and state game programs. During the fiscal
biennium ending June 30, 2001, the legislature may appropriate moneys from the
public safety and education account for purposes of appellate indigent defense
and other operations of the office of public defense, the criminal litigation
unit of the attorney general's office, the treatment alternatives to street
crimes program, crime victims advocacy programs, justice information network
telecommunication planning, sexual assault treatment, operations of the office
of administrator for the courts, security in the common schools, alternative
school start-up grants, programs for disruptive students, criminal justice data
collection, Washington state patrol criminal justice activities, department
of ecology methamphetamine-related activities, domestic violence treatment and
other related services, reimbursement of local governments for costs associated
with implementing criminal and civil justice legislation, the design, sitework,
and construction of the special commitment center, and the replacement of
the department of corrections' offender-based tracking system.

Sec.
910. RCW
43.72.902 and 1995 c 43 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The
public health services account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the
account may be spent only after appropriation. Moneys in the account may be
expended only for maintaining and improving the health of Washington residents
through the public health system. For purposes of this section, the public
health system shall consist of the state board of health, the state department
of health, and local health departments and districts. During the 1999-01
biennium, moneys in the fund may also be used for costs associated with
hepatitis C testing and treatment in correctional facilities.

Sec.
911. RCW
50.22.--- and 2000 c 2 (SHB 3077) s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The
employment security department is authorized to pay training benefits under
section 8 of this act, but may not obligate expenditures beyond the limits
specified in this section or as otherwise set by the legislature. ((Beginning
with expenditures)) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, ((and
including expenditures for the fiscal biennium)) the commissioner may
not obligate more than twenty million dollars for training benefits. For the
two fiscal years ending June 30, 2002, the commissioner may not obligate
more than sixty million dollars for training benefits. Any funds not obligated
in one fiscal year may be carried forward to the next fiscal year. For each
fiscal year beginning after June 30, 2002, the commissioner may not obligate
more than twenty million dollars annually in addition to any funds carried over
from previous fiscal years. The department shall develop a process to ensure
that expenditures do not exceed available funds and to prioritize access to
funds when again available.

Sec.
912. RCW
69.50.520 and 1999 c 309 s 922 are each amended to read as follows:

The
violence reduction and drug enforcement account is created in the state
treasury. All designated receipts from RCW 9.41.110(8), 66.24.210(4),
66.24.290(2), 69.50.505(h)(1), 82.08.150(5), 82.24.020(2), 82.64.020, and
section 420, chapter 271, Laws of 1989 shall be deposited into the account.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for funding services and
programs under chapter 271, Laws of 1989 and chapter 7, Laws of 1994 sp. sess.,
including state incarceration costs. Funds from the account may also be
appropriated to reimburse local governments for costs associated with
implementing criminal justice legislation including chapter 338, Laws of 1997.
During the 1999-2001 biennium, funds from the account may also be used for
costs associated with providing grants to local governments in accordance with
chapter 338, Laws of 1997, the design, sitework, and construction of the
special commitment center, and for multijurisdictional narcotics task
forces. After July 1, 2001, at least seven and one-half percent of
expenditures from the account shall be used for providing grants to community
networks under chapter 70.190 RCW by the family policy council.

Sec.
913. RCW
72.11.040 and 1999 c 309 s 921 are each amended to read as follows:

The
cost of supervision fund is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All
receipts from assessments made under RCW 9.94A.270 and 72.04A.120 shall be
deposited into the fund. Expenditures from the fund may be used only to
support the collection of legal financial obligations. During the 1999-2001
biennium, funds from the account may also be used for costs associated with the
department's supervision of the offenders in the community, and the
replacement of the department of corrections' offender-based tracking system.
Only the secretary of the department of corrections or the secretary's designee
may authorize expenditures from the fund. The fund is subject to allotment
procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
expenditures.

Sec.
914. RCW
76.12.110 and 1999 sp.s. c 13 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

There
is created a forest development account in the state treasury. The state
treasurer shall keep an account of all sums deposited therein and expended or
withdrawn therefrom. Any sums placed in the account shall be pledged for the
purpose of paying interest and principal on the bonds issued by the department,
and for the purchase of land for growing timber. Any bonds issued shall
constitute a first and prior claim and lien against the account for the payment
of principal and interest. No sums for the above purposes shall be withdrawn
or paid out of the account except upon approval of the department.

Appropriations
may be made by the legislature from the forest development account to the
department for the purpose of carrying on the activities of the department on
state forest lands, lands managed on a sustained yield basis as provided for in
RCW 79.68.040, and for reimbursement of expenditures that have been made or may
be made from the resource management cost account in the management of state
forest lands. For the 1999-2001 fiscal biennium, moneys from the account
shall be distributed as directed in the omnibus appropriations act to the
beneficiaries of the revenues derived from state forest lands. Funds that
accrue to the state from such a distribution shall be deposited into the salmon
recovery account. These funds shall be used for shoreline restoration and
preservation activities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 915. It is
the intent of the legislature that statutory guidelines for the payment of
certain extraordinary nursing home and other medical expenses be adopted in the
2001 legislative session, taking into consideration the recommendations of the
report required by section 916 of this act. It is also the intent of the
legislature that such expenditures be authorized only if the actuarial
valuation study of the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement
system plan 1 assets and liabilities as of December 31, 1999, indicates that
the system has not less than five hundred million dollars in surplus assets.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 916. The
joint committee on pension policy shall provide for a study, through the office
of the state actuary during the 2000 interim, of the options for providing
partial funding of law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement
system plan 1 retiree medical expenses from the surplus assets of the law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1 fund. The
study shall include a report by the office of the state actuary on local
government liabilities, as required by the 1999-2001 operating budget, and a
review of legal issues, federal tax compliance issues, variations in local
government benefits and funding mechanisms, and other relevant issues.

In
conducting the study, the joint committee shall solicit information and advice
from representatives of organizations that represent employers and retirees of the
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1. The
office of the state actuary may provide administrative support for the study.

The
joint committee shall submit its report and recommendations to the legislature
no later than December 15, 2000.

Sec.
917. RCW
41.26.080 and 1991 c 35 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as set forth under subsection (2) of this section, the total
liability of the plan 1 system shall be funded as follows:

(((1)))
(a) Every plan 1 member shall have deducted from each payroll a sum
equal to six percent of his or her basic salary for each pay period.

(((2)))
(b) Every employer shall contribute monthly a sum equal to six percent
of the basic salary of each plan 1 employee who is a member of this retirement
system. The employer shall transmit the employee and employer contributions
with a copy of the payroll to the retirement system monthly.

(((3)))
(c) The remaining liabilities of the plan 1 system shall be funded as
provided in chapter 41.45 RCW.

(((4)))
(d) Every member shall be deemed to consent and agree to the
contribution made and provided for herein, and shall receipt in full for his or
her salary or compensation. Payment less said contributions shall be a
complete discharge of all claims and demands whatsoever for the services
rendered by such person during the period covered by such payments, except his
or her claim to the benefits to which he or she may be entitled under the
provisions of this chapter.

(2) No employer or member contribution is required after June
30, 2000, unless the most recent valuation study for law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' retirement system plan 1 indicates the plan has unfunded
liabilities.

(End of part)

PART
X

CAPITAL
APPROPRIATIONS

Sec.
1001. 1999
c 379 s 106 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE

Eastern
Branch Archives Building: Design (98-2-001)

The
reappropriation in this section is provided solely for completion of the design
phase for the eastern regional archives facility to be sited on the south
campus of the Riverpoint higher education park in Spokane.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ ((48,645))

295,482

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ ((530,972))

284,135

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 5,135,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,714,617

Sec.
1002. 1999
c 379 s 107 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Community
Economic Revitalization (86-1-001) (00-2-001)

The
reappropriation in this section from the public facilities construction loan
revolving account is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)
The department shall ensure that all funds transferred from the public works
assistance account into the public facilities construction loan revolving
account during the 1997-99 biennium are used only for loans to local
governments.

(2)
The department shall also ensure that all principal and interest payments from
these loans are paid into the public works assistance account.

(3)
The new appropriation from the public facility construction loan revolving
account shall be used solely to provide loans to eligible local governments and
grants to the extent permitted by law. The department shall ensure that all
principal and interest payments from loans made on moneys from this account are
paid into this account.

Reappropriation:

Public
Works Assistance Account‑-State..... $ 1,539,515

Public
Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account‑-State...................... $ 9,500,000

-------------

Subtotal Reappropriation............. $ ((11,539,515))

11,039,515

Appropriation:

Public
Facility Construction Loan Revolving

Account‑-State...................... $ ((13,000,000))

6,641,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 559,003

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ ((36,000,000))

0

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ ((60,598,518))

18,239,518

Sec.
1003. 1999
c 379 s 108 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

County
Public Facility Construction (00-2-010)

The
appropriations in this section shall be used solely for financial assistance to
distressed counties that have experienced extraordinary costs due to the
location of a major new business facility or the substantial expansion of an
existing business facility in the county. The entire appropriation from the
state building construction account shall be provided as a grant to support the
Grays Harbor water system project.

Appropriation:

Distressed
County Facilities Construction

Loan
Account‑-State................. $ ((4,000,000))

2,619,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State. $ 3,500,000

-------------

Subtotal Appropriation.............. $ ((7,500,000))

6,119,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ ((16,000,000))

0

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ ((23,500,000))

6,119,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1004. A
new section is added to 1999 c 379 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Holly
Park Education Center

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is provided solely for education space in the
Holly park housing development for Seattle Central Community College; and

(2)
The appropriation in this section must be matched by an equal amount from other
sources.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account--State...... $ 500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 500,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1005. A
new section is added to 1999 c 379 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Clark
County Skills Center

The
appropriation in this section must be matched by at least $1,300,000 from other
sources.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account--State...... $ 350,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 350,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1006. A
new section is added to 1999 c 379 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Community
Services Facilities Program

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1)
The state grant may provide no more than twenty-five percent of either the
estimated total capital cost or actual total capital cost, whichever is less.
The remaining portion of the project capital cost shall be a match from
nonstate sources and may include cash, land value, and other in-kind
contributions.

(2)
Funds provided in this section shall be applied in the amounts and in the order
of the list of projects approved and prioritized by the community services
facility program advisory board.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account--State...... $ 953,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 953,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1007. A
new section is added to 1999 c 379 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY, TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT

Shoreline
Block Grants

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation is provided for block grants to counties and cities for fish
habitat restoration projects and for acquisition and preservation of riparian
habitat. A county or city must have an approved shorelines master program, as
defined in RCW 90.58.030, to qualify for a grant under this section.

(2)
The department shall prioritize applications from cities and counties with
shorelines that have been designated by the United States national marine
fisheries service or the United States fish and wildlife service as critical
habitat for threatened or endangered species according to 16 U.S.C. Sec.
1533(a)(3), and cities and counties that have consulted with the designated
lead entity that has been established under RCW 75.46.060.

(3)
Any acquisitions must occur in the following manner:

(a)
Riparian parcels located within a county or city designated as a critical area
under chapter 36.70A RCW or within a county or city shoreline management
jurisdiction under chapter 90.58 RCW, may be acquired in fee simple. A county
or city may also acquire less than fee simple interests to be held in
perpetuity, including conservation easements, and conservation futures as
defined by RCW 84.34.220, in such areas; or

(b)
Less than fee simple interests to be held in perpetuity, including conservation
easements, and conservation futures as defined by RCW 84.34.220, may be
acquired in other riparian properties.

(4)
Once acquired, property or interests in property may be held and managed by the
county or city, transferred to an appropriate state agency or local
governmental entity, or transferred to a private nonprofit nature conservancy
corporation as defined by RCW 64.04.130.

(5)
None of the appropriation in this section may be deducted for administrative or
overhead costs of the department.

Appropriation:

Salmon
Recovery Account--State.................. $ 5,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 5,000,000

Sec.
1008. 1999
c 379 s 927 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Legislative
Buildings: Safety and infrastructure (98-1-005)

(1)
The appropriations shall support the detailed list of projects maintained by
the office of financial management.

(2)
(($270,000)) $520,000 of the new appropriation is provided to
complete heating, ventilation, and air conditioning repair and improvements in
the Newhouse building.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 179,454

Thurston
County Capital Facilities Account‑-

State.................................... $ 475,000

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation.................. $ 654,454

Appropriation:

Capitol
Building Construction Account‑-State.... $ ((4,250,000))

4,500,000

Thurston
County Capital Facilities Account‑-

State.................................... $ 585,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 495,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ ((5,330,000))

5,580,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,415,546

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ ((7,400,000))

7,650,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1009. A
new section is added to 1999 c 379 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION

Legislative
Building Renovation

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903, chapter 379, Laws of 1999.

(2)
$2,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided for design of the
interior rehabilitation and exterior preservation of the state legislative
building. Funds in this subsection are also provided for planning and
development of surge space for current and future construction projects related
to the capitol historic district as well as access and site improvements to the
south portico area.

(3)
$1,000,000 of the appropriation in this section is provided for associated
studies including:

(a)
A private financing feasibility study;

(b)
An investigation of exterior sandstone attachment; and

(c)
A space use programming study to include:

(i)
A prioritization of uses within the legislative building based on functional
affiliation with the legislative process and the ceremonial functions of
state-wide office holders that takes into consideration emerging
telecommunication capabilities;

(ii)
An analysis of space efficiency and space use related to legislative and
state-wide ceremonial functions in the following buildings: Cherberg, O'Brien,
Pritchard, Newhouse, the governor's mansion, and insurance;

(iii)
Review of alternative uses and expansion capabilities for white, press, general
administration, and archives buildings; and

(iv)
The space analysis study shall take into consideration ongoing planning, space
use studies, and programmatic reviews authorized in section 942, chapter 379,
Laws of 1999 (Thurston county lease study), section 303, chapter 1, Laws of
1999 sp. sess. (transportation agencies consolidation study), and section 607
of this act (state library program review).

(4)
From the appropriation in this section, up to $10,000 or an amount based on an
appraised value may be expended to acquire a photo and document collection of
historic significance that depicts legislative activities and facilities.

Appropriation:

Capitol
Building Construction Account........... $ 3,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 102,500,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 105,500,000

Sec.
1010. 1999
c 379 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Western
State Hospital: Ward renovation phase 6 (94-1-316)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ ((768,458))

82,800

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ ((5,400,765))

12,088,480

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ ((6,169,223))

12,171,280

Sec.
1011. 1999
c 379 s 240 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Eastern
State Hospital: Legal offender unit (98-2-002)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State. $ ((6,297,315))

5,297,315

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 12,398,685

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 0

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ ((18,696,000))

17,696,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1012. A
new section is added to 1999 c 379 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND HEALTH SERVICES

Security
Improvements at Western State Hospital (99-1-001)

The
reappropriation in this section is provided solely for facility improvements
that are required as a result of the passage of Senate Bill No. 6214.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 538,815

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 115,185

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)... ............ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 654,000

Sec.
1013. 1999
c 379 s 252 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH

Drinking
Water Assistance Program (97-2-001)

The
reappropriation in this section is provided solely for an interagency agreement
with the department of community, trade, and economic development to make, in
cooperation with the public works board, loans to local governments and public
water systems for projects and activities to protect and improve the state's
drinking water facilities and resources.

Reappropriation:

Drinking
Water Assistance Account‑-Federal. $ 16,133,576

Appropriation:

Drinking
Water Assistance Account‑-Federal. $ 16,985,921

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 17,739,874

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 34,000,000

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ ((67,873,450))

84,859,371

Sec.
1014. 1999
c 379 s 929 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

McNeil
Island Corrections Center: Department of social and health services-Special
Commitment Center (00-2-005)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

(2)
Within the funds provided in this section, the department of social and health
services shall evaluate options and site locations for least restrictive
alternative placements. The department of social and health services shall
provide a report to the office of financial management and the legislative
fiscal committees detailing the results of this evaluation, including statutory
changes necessary to implement preferred options, by November 15, 2000.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State. $ ((2,500,000))

16,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ ((37,100,000))

66,200,000

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ ((39,600,000))

82,700,000

Sec.
1015. 1999
c 379 s 293 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS

Local
Government Criminal Justice Facilities (99-2-003)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The appropriations in this section are provided solely for the purpose of
construction, developing, expanding, modifying, or improving local jails and
other correctional facilities in accordance with the violent offender
incarceration and truth-in-sentencing grant requirements.

(2)
The department of corrections, in consultation with the Washington association
of sheriffs and police chiefs, shall develop criteria for allocating moneys
appropriated in this section to local governments.

(3)
The general fund--federal appropriations made in this section and sections 266,
283, and 294, chapter 379, Laws of 1999 represent the state's total award from
the federal violent offender incarceration and truth-in-sentencing grant
expected during the 1999-2001 biennium. The department of corrections shall
not expend more than the level provided in these sections without prior
legislative appropriation.

Reappropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ 639,196

Appropriation:

General
Fund‑-Federal........................... $ ((2,894,165))

3,506,165

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ ((3,533,361))

4,145,361

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1016. 1999
c 379 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Referendum
38 Water Supply Facilities (74-2-006)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for projects under
contracts on or before June 30, 1999. Reappropriated funds not associated with
contracted projects shall lapse on June 30, 1999.

(2)
The office of financial management may grant waivers from this lapse
requirement for specific projects upon findings of exceptional circumstances
after notification of the chairs of the house of representatives capital budget
committee and senate ways and means committee.

(3)
The department shall submit a report to the office of financial management and
the house of representatives capital budget committee and senate ways and means
committee by December 1, 1999, listing all projects funded from this section.

Reappropriation:

State
and Local Improvements Revolving Account

(Water
Supply Facilities)‑-State.... $ 6,004,436

Appropriation:

State
and Local Improvements Revolving Account

(Water
Supply Facilities)‑-State.... $ 4,100,000

State
Drought Preparedness Account‑-State... $ ((6,800,000))

6,125,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation.............. $ ((10,900,000))

10,225,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 4,320,950

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 0

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ ((21,225,386))

20,550,386

Sec.
1017. 1999
c 379 s 305 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Referendum
39 Waste Disposal Facilities (82-2-005)

The
reappropriation in this section is provided solely for projects under contracts
on or before June 30, 1999. Reappropriated funds not associated with
contracted projects shall lapse on June 30, 1999. The office of financial
management may grant waivers from this lapse requirement for specific projects
upon findings of exceptional circumstances after notification of the chairs of
the house of representatives capital budget committee and senate ways and means
committee. The department shall submit a report to the office of financial
management and the house of representatives capital budget committee and senate
ways and means committee by December 1, 1999, listing all projects funded from
this section.

Reappropriation:

State
and Local Improvements Revolving Account

(Waste
Facilities 1980)‑-State...... $ ((6,113,126))

6,871,420

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ ((12,293,785))

11,535,491

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 0

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ 18,406,911

Sec.
1018. 1999
c 379 s 306 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Centennial
Clean Water Fund (86-2-007)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
Up to $15,000,000 of the water quality account appropriation is provided for
the extended grant payment to Metro/King county. The department shall, in
cooperation with Metro/King county, document the eligible costs remaining for
the extended grant payment, and submit a revised payment schedule to the
governor and appropriate legislative committees by December 1, 1999.

(2)
Up to $10,000,000 of the water quality account appropriation is provided for
the extended grant payment to Spokane for the Spokane-Rathdrum Prairie aquifer.

(3)
$3,600,000 of the water quality account appropriation is provided for the
construction of a wastewater treatment plant at the city of Connell.

(4)
The entire public works assistance account appropriation is provided for water
quality facility grants for communities with populations less than 5,000. $900,000
of this amount is provided for the construction of a wastewater treatment plant
at the city of Pateros. In allocating the remaining funds, the department
shall give priority consideration to: (a) Communities subject to a regulatory
order from the department of ecology for noncompliance with water quality
regulations; (b) projects for which design work has been completed; and (c)
projects with a local match from reasonable water quality rates and charges.

(5)
The remaining appropriation in this section is provided for state-wide water
quality implementation and planning grants and loans. The department shall
give priority consideration to projects located in basins with critical or
depressed salmonid stocks.

(6)
The reappropriation in this section is provided solely for projects under
contract on or before June 30, 1999. Reappropriated funds not associated with
contracted projects lapse on June 30, 1999. The office of financial management
may grant waivers from this subsection for specific projects upon findings of
exceptional circumstances after notification of the chairs of the house of
representatives capital budget committee and the senate ways and means
committee. The department shall submit a report to the office of financial
management and the house of representatives capital budget committee and the
senate ways and means committee by December 1, 1999, listing all projects
funded from the reappropriation in this section.

(7)
The department shall develop a policy to establish time limits for the
distribution of funds for individual projects, and the method for determining
when reappropriations will lapse. The policies shall be incorporated into the
budget submittal provided to the legislature and the office of financial
management for the 2001-2003 budget.

Reappropriation:

Water
Quality Account‑-State............... $ 32,336,890

Appropriation:

Water
Quality Account‑-State............... $ 52,000,000

Public
Works Assistance Account‑-State..... $ ((10,000,000))

10,450,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation.............. $ ((62,000,000))

62,450,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 158,376,857

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 140,000,000

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ ((392,713,747))

393,163,747

Sec.
1019. 1999
c 379 s 308 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY

Water
Pollution Control Revolving Fund (90-2-002)

Reappropriation:

Water
Pollution Control Revolving Account‑-

State............................... $ ((55,640,931))

28,810,479

Water
Pollution Control Revolving Account‑-

Federal............................. $ ((34,914,688))

38,704,192

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation............. $ ((90,555,619))

67,514,671

Appropriation:

Water
Pollution Control Revolving Account‑-

State............................... $ ((32,375,833))

52,854,981

Water
Pollution Control Revolving Account‑-

Federal............................. $ ((46,830,366))

48,147,555

-------------

Subtotal Appropriation.............. $ ((79,206,199))

101,002,536

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 120,971,790

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 320,207,299

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ ((610,940,907))

609,696,296

Sec.
1020. 1999
c 379 s 331 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR OUTDOOR RECREATION

Washington
Wildlife and Recreation Program (98-2-003)

The
appropriations in this section for the wildlife and recreation program under
chapter 43.98A RCW and RCW 43.98A.040 are subject to the following condition
and limitation:

(1)
The new appropriations in this section are provided for the approved list of projects
included in LEAP capital document No. 1999-W3, as developed on April 23, 1999,
and LEAP capital document No. 2000 W-4, as developed on February 28, 2000.

(2)
Any funding provided in this section for the Mt. Spokane - Quartz Mountain
acquisition by the state parks and recreation commission shall not exceed fair
market value as determined by an evaluation of three independent appraisals.

(3)
The committee shall develop a policy to establish time limits for the award of
funds for individual projects, the method for reallocating funds to alternate
projects, and the method for determining when reappropriations will lapse. The
policies shall be incorporated into the budget submittal provided to the
legislature and the office of financial management for the 2001-2003 budget.

(4)
The federal appropriation in this section (land and water conservation fund)
shall be applied to projects included on the project lists approved in this
section and in accordance with federal expenditure guidelines for the land and
water conservation fund.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State. $ 6,475,416

Outdoor
Recreation Account‑-State.......... $ 23,733,311

Habitat
Conservation Account‑-State........ $ 25,872,718

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation............. $ 56,081,445

Appropriation:

Outdoor
Recreation Account‑-State.......... $ 23,000,000

Outdoor
Recreation Account--Federal........ $ 773,000

Habitat
Conservation Account‑-State........ $ 25,000,000

-------------

Subtotal Appropriation.............. $ ((48,000,000))

48,773,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 213,018,555

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 190,000,000

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ ((507,100,000))

507,873,000

Sec.
1021. 1999
c 379 s 335 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Conservation
Reserve Enhancement Program (00-2-004)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State. $ 5,000,000

((Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State. $ 5,000,000))

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ ((10,000,000))

15,000,000

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ 20,000,000

Sec.
1022. 1999
c 379 s 337 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE CONSERVATION COMMISSION

Dairy
Waste Management Grants Program (98-2-002)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
(($1,500,000)) $4,000,000 of the appropriation is provided solely
for a state-wide grant program to assist dairy operators in implementing dairy
waste management systems; and

(2)
$1,500,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for a state-wide grant
program to provide technical assistance to dairy operators for development and
implementation of dairy waste management plans.

Reappropriation:

Water
Quality Account‑-State............... $ 529,132

Appropriation:

Water
Quality Account‑-State............... $ 3,000,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State. $ 2,500,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation.............. $ 5,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 2,470,868

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 12,000,000

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ ((18,000,000))

20,500,000

Sec.
1023. 1999
c 379 s 348 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Emergency
Repairs (98-1-003)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The state building construction account appropriation in this section
shall support the detailed list of projects maintained by the office of
financial management.

(2)
The aquatic lands enhancement account appropriation is provided solely for
repair of the Silver lake weir in Cowlitz county.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 135,000

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 700,000

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account‑-State........ $ 205,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 905,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,610,923

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 2,300,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ ((4,745,923))

4,950,923

Sec.
1024. 1999
c 379 s 361 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND WILDLIFE

Warm
Water Game Fish Access Facilities (98-2-006)

Reappropriation:

Warm
Water Game Fish Account‑-State............. $ 210,000

Appropriation:

Warm
Water Game Fish Account‑-State............. $ ((600,000))

300,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 2,080,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ ((2,890,000))

2,590,000

Sec.
1025. 1999
c 379 s 373 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Small
Timber Landowner Program (00-5-001)

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(((1)))
This appropriation is provided solely to purchase ((or lease riparian and
other sensitive aquatic areas from willing owners of small parcels of forest
land.

(2)
If federal grants for salmon recovery efforts are equal to or less than
$50,000,000 during the 1999-2001 fiscal biennium, then $5,000,000 of the
appropriation in this section may be expended. If federal grants for salmon
recovery efforts during the 1999-2001 biennium exceed $50,000,000, then the
entire appropriation in this section may be expended)) forest
riparian easements as defined in RCW 76.13.120(2)(a) to mitigate diminished
economic viability, as described in RCW 76.13.100 from willing small forest
landowners as defined in RCW 76.13.100(2)(c).

Appropriation:

((General
Fund‑-Federal)) State Building

Construction
Account................ $ ((10,000,000))

2,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ ((0))

16,000,000

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ ((10,000,000))

18,500,000

Sec.
1026. 1999
c 379 s 383 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Administrative
Site Preservation (00-1-018)

Appropriation:

Agricultural
College Trust Management

Account‑-State........................... $ 51,400

Forest
Development Account‑-State............... $ 203,580

Resources
Management Cost Account‑-State........ $ ((565,500))

514,100

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 361,920

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 1,131,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 938,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 5,118,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 7,187,000

Sec.
1027. 1999
c 379 s 384 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Trust
Land Transfer (00-2-001)

The
state building construction account appropriation in this section is subject to
the following conditions and limitations:

(1)
The total appropriation is provided to the department solely to transfer from
trust status or enter into thirty-year timber harvest restrictive easements for
certain trust lands of state-wide significance deemed appropriate for state
park, fish and wildlife habitat, natural area preserve, natural resources
conservation area, open space, or recreation purposes.

(2)
Property transferred under this section shall be appraised and transferred at
fair market value. The value of the timber transferred shall be deposited by
the department to the common school construction account in the same manner as
timber revenues from other common school trust lands. No deduction shall be
made for the resource management cost account under RCW 79.64.040. The value
of the land transferred shall be deposited in the natural resources real
property replacement account. These funds shall be expended by the department
for the exclusive purpose of acquiring real property of equal value to be
managed as common school trust land.

(3)
Property subject to easement agreements under this section shall be appraised
at fair market value both with and without the imposition of the easement. The
entire difference in appraised value shall be deposited by the department to
the common school construction fund in the same manner as lease revenues from
other common school trust lands. No deduction shall be made for the resource
management cost account under RCW 79.64.040.

(4)
((All)) Up to $1,000,000 of the appropriation in this section may be
used for reasonable costs incurred by the department to implement this
section ((are authorized to be paid out of this appropriation)).
Authorized costs include the actual cost of appraisals, staff time,
environmental reviews, surveys, and other similar costs.

(5)
Intergrant exchanges between common school and other trust lands of equal value
may occur if the exchange is in the interest of each trust, as determined by
the board of natural resources.

(6)
Prior to or concurrent with conveyance of these properties, the department,
with full cooperation of the receiving agencies, shall execute and record a
real property instrument that dedicates the transferred properties to the
purposes identified in subsection (1) of this section for a minimum period of
thirty years. The department of natural resources, in consultation with the
receiving state agencies, shall develop policy to address requests to replace
transferred properties subject to the recorded property instrument that are no
longer deemed appropriate for the purposes identified in subsection (1) of this
section.

(7)
The department and receiving agencies shall work in good faith to carry out the
intent of this section. However, the department or receiving agencies may
remove a property from the transfer list in subsection (8) of this section if,
based on new, substantive information, it is determined that transfer of the
property is not in the state-wide interest of either the common school trust or
the receiving agency.

(8)
The appropriation in this section is provided to execute transfers or easements
for the list of properties identified in LEAP capital document No. ((99-3,
as developed on April 8, 1999)) 2000 T-1, as developed on February 29,
2000, as follows: Projects in category A shall be transferred; to the
extent that local funding is provided for the land value of the property,
projects in category B shall be transferred; and projects in category C and
remaining projects in category B may be transferred or leased as funding
allows.

(9)
The department shall execute trust land transfers and easements such that ((90)),
subsequent to the deduction for administrative costs, 85 percent of the
appropriation in this section is deposited in the common school construction
fund. To achieve the ((90:10)) 85:15 ratio, the department may
offset transfers of property with low timber-to-land ratios with easements on
other properties.

(10)
On June 30, 2001, the state treasurer shall transfer all remaining uncommitted
funds from this appropriation to the common school construction fund and the
appropriation in this section shall be reduced by an equivalent amount.

Appropriation:

Natural
Resources Real Property Replacement‑-

State.................................... $ 6,200,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 66,000,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 72,200,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 34,500,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 220,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 326,700,000

Sec.
1028. 1999
c 379 s 388 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Right-of-Way
Acquisition (00-2-005)

Appropriation:

Agricultural
College Trust Management

Account‑-State........................... $ 6,000

Forest
Development Account‑-State............... $ 387,000

Resources
Management Cost Account‑-State........ $ ((650,000))

644,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 1,037,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 1,392,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 6,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 8,429,000

Sec.
1029. 1999
c 379 s 390 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Minor
Works: Program (00-2-011)

The
appropriations in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

Agricultural
College Trust Management

Account‑-State........................... $ 35,000

Forest
Development Account‑-State............... $ 136,600

Resources
Management Cost Account‑-State........ $ ((379,500))

344,500

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 242,900

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation................... $ 759,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 609,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 5,580,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 6,948,000

Sec.
1030. 1999
c 379 s 931 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Grants (00-2-014)

The
appropriation in this section is provided for a list of projects in LEAP
capital document No. ((1999-A1, as developed on April 23, 1999)) 2000-A1,
as developed on February 15, 2000.

The
department shall submit a list of recommended projects to be funded from the
aquatic lands enhancement account in the 2001-03 capital budget. The list
shall result from a competitive grants program developed by the department
based upon, at a minimum: A uniform criteria for the selection of projects and
awarding of grants for up to fifty percent of the total project cost; local
community support for the project; and a state-wide geographic distribution of
projects. The list of projects shall be submitted to the office of financial
management by September 15, 2000.

Reappropriation:

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account‑-State... $ 2,340,000

Appropriation:

Aquatic
Lands Enhancement Account‑-State... $ ((5,550,000))

4,753,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 9,716,817

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ ((24,000,000))

20,000,000

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ ((41,606,817))

36,809,817

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1031. A
new section is added to 1999 c 379 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES

Distribution
of Excess Funds from the Forest Development Account

For
distribution of state forest land revenues to taxing authorities that received
such revenue from calendar year 1995 through calendar year 1999.

(1)
Within fifteen days of the effective date of this section, the department shall
transmit funds in the amounts specified in subsection (3) of this section to
the county treasurers of the counties receiving the funds.

(2)
The county treasurer of the counties listed in this section shall distribute
funds received from this appropriation to taxing authorities in proportion to
the state forest transfer land funds distributed to the taxing authorities
based on information available for the calendar years 1995 through 1999. Funds
to be credited to the state of Washington and funds credited to school district
general levies shall be remitted to the state of Washington within thirty days
after the effective date of this section for deposit into the salmon recovery
account.

(3)
Funds shall be distributed in the following amounts:

Clallam......................................... $ 1,468,937

Clark........................................... $ 560,244

Cowlitz......................................... $ 344,785

Grays
Harbor.................................... $ 325,060

Jefferson....................................... $ 197,457

King............................................ $ 203,627

Kitsap...................................... ... $ 145,059

Klickitat....................................... $ 46,489

Lewis........................................... $ 1,465,767

Mason........................................... $ 196,270

Pacific......................................... $ 357,582

Pierce.......................................... $ 124,595

Skagit.......................................... $ 1,156,019

Skamania........................................ $ 189,649

Snohomish....................................... $ 1,200,492

Stevens......................................... $ 3,712

Thurston........................................ $ 855,545

Wahkiakum....................................... $ 366,534

Whatcom......................................... $ 792,178

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,000,000

Appropriation:

Forest
Development Account--State............... $ 10,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 10,000,000

Sec.
1032. 1999
c 379 s 502 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

Seattle
Crime Laboratory (00-2-008)

The
appropriation in this section shall not be expended until the documents
described in the capital project review requirements process and procedures
prescribed by the office of financial management have been complied with under
sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State. $ 900,000

Appropriation:

County
Criminal Justice Assistance

Account‑-State...................... $ 650,000

Death
Investigations Account‑-State........ $ 2,500,000

Municipal
Criminal Justice Assistance

Account‑-State...................... $ 250,000

State
Building Construction Account‑-State. $ 9,100,000

-------------

Subtotal
Appropriation.............. $ ((10,000,000))

12,500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 200,000

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 0

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ ((11,100,000))

13,600,000

Sec.
1033. 1999
c 379 s 604 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION

Public
School Building Construction (98-2-001)(00-2-001)

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)(a)
Up to $6,491,519 of the new appropriation provided in this section may be
provided for emergency repairs.

(((a)))
(b) Prior to the distribution of funds authorized by this subsection,
the state board shall develop rules for school district eligibility to receive
emergency grants and requirements for repayment of recovered costs. It is
intended that these funds be provided to school districts only for emergency
repairs due to accidents, natural disasters, fire, floods, vandalism, or
similar events and only after all avenues of local funding have been exhausted.

(((b)))
(2) The state board shall report to the fiscal committees of the
legislature and the office of financial management the amount and purpose of
each grant provided to school districts.

(((c)))
(3) Any recoveries by the districts from insurance, litigation, or other
sources for repairs and improvements funded from this appropriation shall be
returned to the state in proportion to the state assistance as a share of total
project cost.

(((2)))
(4) Total cash disbursed from the common school construction account may
not exceed the available cash balance.

(5)
A maximum of $4,900,000 of this appropriation is provided to implement chapter
379, Laws of 1999.

(6)
$200,000 from this appropriation is provided to fund two FTEs in the office of
state fire marshal to exclusively review K-12 construction documents for fire
and life safety in accordance with the state building code. It is the intent
of this appropriation to provide these services only to those districts that
are located in counties without qualified review capabilities.

(7)
On an annual basis, the state board shall report to the fiscal committees of
the legislature and the office of financial management with a summary of the
results of the value engineering studies and constructability reviews, and an
evaluation of the use of building commissioning construction management
services and fire marshal reviews.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State. $ 1,993,556

Common
School Construction Account‑-State... $ 112,424,633

-------------

Subtotal
Reappropriation............. $ 114,418,189

Appropriation:

Common
School Construction Account‑-State... $ ((315,081,000))

376,881,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 607,956,559

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 1,390,582,000

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ ((2,428,037,748))

2,489,837,748

Sec.
1034. 1999
c 379 s 605 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION

Program
Management (98-1-001)

Funding
is provided for up to five FTE regional coordinators. The coordinators
shall have direct construction or architectural training and experience and be
strategically located across the state. The coordinators shall assist local
school districts with: State board of education rules relating to school
construction and modernization projects, building condition analysis,
development of state studies and surveys, architect/engineer and construction
manager selection, value engineering, and constructability reviews during
design, building commissioning, construction administration, maintenance
issues, and data verification to allow equitable administration of the state
board priority system.

Appropriation:

Common
School Construction Account‑-State........ $ 1,619,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 7,644,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 9,263,000

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1035. A
new section is added to 1999 c 379 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Classroom
Improvements and Minor Works (00-S-001)

The
appropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Appropriation:

University
of Washington Building Account‑‑

State...................................... $ 16,000,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 0

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ 16,000,000

Sec.
1036. 1999
c 379 s 613 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF

Clark
Hall((, HVAC))/Lloyd: Upgrade (00-1-006)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ ((500,000))

1,400,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ ((1,275,000))

325,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ ((1,775,000))

1,725,000

Sec.
1037. 1999
c 379 s 615 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF

((Campus
Wide)) Clark Hall/Lloyd: Seismic stabilization (02-1-008)

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ ((500,000))

1,400,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ ((500,000))

0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ ((1,000,000))

1,400,000

Sec.
1038. 1999
c 379 s 634 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Minor
Works: Safety (98-1-001)

The
reappropriation in this section shall support the detailed list of projects
maintained by the office of financial management.

Reappropriation:

((State
Building Construction Account‑-State.... $ 2,500,000))

University
of Washington Building Account‑-

State.................................... $ 2,671,684

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ ((1,200,000))

1,028,316

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)....... ........ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 3,700,000

Sec.
1039. 1999
c 379 s 641 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Nuclear
Reactor: Decommissioning (99-2-009)

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ ((750,000))

1,149,696

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ ((450,000))

50,304

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 1,200,000

Sec.
1040. 1999
c 379 s 642 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON

Tacoma
Branch Campus: Phase III predesign (00-2-021)

The
appropriation in this section is to conduct a predesign of the project
described in this section in accordance with the predesign manual published by
the office of financial management. Future appropriations for this project are
subject to the submittal of completed predesign requirements on or before July
1, 2000.

Appropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 500,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 55,000,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 55,500,000

Sec.
1041. 1999
c 379 s 686 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY

WSU
Spokane - Health Sciences Building (98-2-903)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
The reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 through 904 of this act.

(2)
No money from the reappropriation may be expended in a manner that is
inconsistent with the recommendations of the higher education coordinating
board and the project design, scope, and schedule approved by the office of
financial management.

(3)
Design and construction of this building shall accommodate at least 240
additional full-time equivalent students on the Riverpoint campus.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State...... $ 1,871,010

Appropriation:

((Higher
Education Construction Account‑-State))

State
Higher Education Construction Account‑-

State.................................... $ 36,300,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 814,365

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 0

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 38,985,375

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1042. A
new section is added to 1999 c 379 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY

Cheney
Hall: Renovation (00-S-001)

To
conduct a predesign of the project described in this section in accordance with
the predesign manual published by the office of financial management. The
appropriation in this section is subject to review and allotment procedures
under sections 902 through 904, chapter 379, Laws of 1999. Future
appropriations for this project are subject to the submittal of completed
predesign requirements on or before October 1, 2000.

Appropriation:

Eastern
Washington University Capital Projects

Account--State........................... $ 300,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures).................... $ 0

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)................ $ 12,950,000

-------------

TOTAL.................................... $ 13,250,000

Sec.
1043. 1999
c 379 s 794 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM

Everett
Community College - Instructional Technology Center: Construction (96-2-652)

The
reappropriation in this section is subject to the review and allotment
procedures under sections 902 and 903 of this act.

Reappropriation:

State
Building Construction Account‑-State. $ ((1,600,000))

1,873,000

Prior
Biennia (Expenditures)............... $ ((15,017,483))

14,744,483

Future
Biennia (Projected Costs)........... $ 0

-------------

TOTAL............................... $ 16,617,483

Sec.
1044. 1999
c 379 s 905 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

ACQUISITION
OF PROPERTIES AND FACILITIES THROUGH FINANCIAL CONTRACTS. The
following agencies may enter into financial contracts, paid for from operating
revenues, for the purposes indicated and in not more than the principal amounts
indicated, plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW. When securing properties under this section, agencies shall use the
most economical financial contract option available, including long-term
leases, lease-purchase agreements, lease-development with option to purchase
agreements or financial contracts using certificates of participation. The
director of general administration shall ensure that the clustering of state
facilities and the collocation and consolidation of state agencies take place
where such configurations are economical and consistent with agency space
needs. Agencies shall assist the department of general administration with
facility collocation and consolidation efforts.

State
agencies may enter into agreements with the department of general
administration and the state treasurer's office to develop requests to the
legislature for acquisition of properties and facilities through financial
contracts. The agreements may include charges for services rendered.

The
alternative finance authorizations granted in this section and in section
222(2)(j), chapter 309, Laws of 1999, do not imply commitments or guarantees
that the legislature will provide for future expenses of properties and
facilities acquired, constructed, or improved through financial contracts. The
office of financial management shall develop a standardized request form for
alternative finance contracts that includes a full assessment of all
acquisition and operating costs including proposed revenue sources for such
expenditures. In the 2001-2003 budget request from the governor, the office of
financial management shall not forward to the legislature requests for
alternative financing contracts that fail to fulfill the information
requirements developed under this section.

(1)
Department of general administration:

(a)
Enter into a financing contract in the amount of $9,435,000 plus financing
expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW, to purchase an
existing office building and associated land in Yakima for use by state
agencies.

(b)
Enter into a financing contract in the amount of $4,621,000 plus financing
expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW, to purchase an
existing office building and associated land in Kelso for use by the department
of social and health services and the employment security department.

(2)
Department of corrections: Enter into a financing contract on behalf of the
department of corrections in the amount of $2,300,000 plus financing expenses
and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase or construct a
correctional industries transportation services warehouse.

(3)
State parks and recreation: It is the intent of the legislature that the
operating revenues of the department provide the primary source of funds
necessary to meet financing contract obligations for the projects financed
under this authority. In addition, state parks and recreation is authorized to
pledge to make payments from appropriated funds pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW:

(a)
Enter into financing contracts on behalf of state parks and recreation in the
amount of $500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to construct cabins at Cama beach.

(b)
Enter into financing contracts on behalf of state parks and recreation in the
amount of $250,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to complete improvements at the interpretive center/store at
Deception Pass.

(c)
Enter into financing contracts on behalf of state parks and recreation in the
amount of $1,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase and install additional yurts and cabins
state-wide.

(d)
Enter into financing contracts on behalf of state parks and recreation in the
amount of $500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to construct a day use shelter at Lake Sammamish.

(e)
Enter into financing contracts on behalf of state parks and recreation in the
amount of $500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to improve campsite electrification state-wide.

(f)
Enter into financing contracts on behalf of state parks and recreation in the
amount of $750,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to develop additional campsites state-wide.

(4)
Community and technical colleges:

(a)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Green River Community College in
the amount of $1,526,150 plus financing expenses and reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for remodel of the Lindbloom student center building.

(b)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Highline Community College in the
amount of $2,070,613 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for the purchase of the Federal Way Center, currently being
leased by the college.

(c)
Enter into a financial contract on behalf of Green River Community College in
the amount of $100,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase approximately 1.5 acres of land adjacent to
the westside parking lot.

(d)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Grays Harbor Community College in
the amount of $600,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW for the purchase and remodeling of the Riverview School
and 2.83 acres of property, currently being leased by the college.

(e)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Everett Community College in the
amount of $1,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for the remodeling of the fitness center.

(f)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Tacoma Community College in the
amount of $1,697,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for a 10,000 gross square foot addition to the existing
student center.

(g)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Spokane Community College in the
amount of $3,840,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for a 20,000 gross square foot addition and remodeling to the
existing Lair student service building costing $6,000,000. The balance of
project cost will be cash from student and activity fees and enterprise funds.

(h)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Big Bend Community College in the
amount of $150,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for the exchange of 10 acres of land with Grant county.

(i)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Green River Community College in
the amount of $7,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW for purchase and development of property in the downtown
Kent area.

(j)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Columbia Basin Community College
in the amount of $1,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves
pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for a 10,000 gross square foot student services
auditorium.

(k)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Yakima Valley Community College in
the amount of $375,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW for a 2,700 gross square foot addition and remodeling to
the existing student union building costing $1,400,000. Prior to commencing,
the college shall prepare and present a business plan describing the financing
of the complete project to the state board for community and technical
colleges, the office of financial management, and the legislative fiscal
committees.

(l)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Peninsula Community College in the
amount of $2,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for a 10,000 gross square foot addition to the student union
building.

(m)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Whatcom Community College in the
amount of $2,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for a 20,000 gross square foot addition and remodeling to the
existing extended learning/work force facility costing $4,388,000. Prior to
commencing, the college shall prepare and present a business plan describing
the financing of the complete project to the state board for community and
technical colleges, the office of financial management, and the legislative
fiscal committees.

(n)
Enter into a financial contract on behalf of Green River Community College in
the amount of $350,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase Lea Hill park from King county.

(o)
Enter into a financial contract on behalf of Bellevue Community College in the
amount of $4,000,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for replacement of the Robinswood school. This authority is
provided in addition to the appropriation in section 761 of this act.

(p)
Enter into a financial contract on behalf of Wenatchee Valley College in the
amount of $500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to purchase two buildings and property contiguous to the
college campus.

(q)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Whatcom Community College in the
amount of $1,918,483 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW for the purchase of 10.71 acres of property for the
completion of the Whatcom Community College campus.

(r)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of Edmonds Community College in the
amount of $3,700,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to
chapter 39.94 RCW to develop a music building on the college campus.

(5)
Central Washington University: Enter into a financing contract on behalf of
Central Washington University in the amount of $5,700,000 plus financing
expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW for the Central
Washington University/Edmonds Community College center.

(6)
University of Washington:

(a)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of the University of Washington in
the amount of $7,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW to finance real property improvements to the Sand Point
building.

(b)
Enter into a financing contract on behalf of the University of Washington in
the amount of $7,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant
to chapter 39.94 RCW to finance primate center tenant improvements.

(7)
Washington state convention and trade center: Enter into one or more financing
contracts not exceeding an aggregate total amount of $27,500,000 plus financing
expenses and reserves pursuant to chapter 39.94 RCW, for funding unanticipated
costs in excess of the $111,700,000 principal amount of the financing contract
authorized in section 802(10)(b), chapter 16, Laws of 1995 2nd sp. sess., for
the construction of the expansion of the Washington state convention and trade
center as authorized under chapter 386, Laws of 1995. The balance of the
expansion project funds shall be provided from interest earnings and public or
private funds. The financing contract or contracts representing all or part of
the amount authorized by this section shall not be executed without prior
written approval of the office of financial management based upon its
determination that such financing contract or contracts are reasonably
necessary for the expansion project.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1045. 1999
c 379 ss 603, 610, and 611 (uncodified) are each repealed.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1046. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 1047. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

(End of part)

ADMINISTRATOR
FOR THE COURTS.................................... 7

AGRICULTURAL COLLEGE TRUST
MANAGEMENT ACCOUNT................. 201

ATTORNEY GENERAL............................................... 16

BOARD OF ACCOUNTANCY........................................... 36

CAPITAL APPROPRIATIONS........................................ 233

CASELOAD FORECAST COUNCIL...................................... 17

CENTRAL WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY................................. 182

CITIZENS' COMMISSION ON
SALARIES FOR ELECTED OFFICIALS......... 15

CONSERVATION COMMISSION....................................... 112

COUNTY PUBLIC HEALTH ACCOUNT.................................. 213

COURT OF APPEALS................................................ 6

CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING
COMMISSION........................... 84

DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE..................................... 124

DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY,
TRADE, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT....... 17

CITY MUNICIPAL CORPORATIONS................................... 215

COUNTY CORPORATIONS........................................... 214

DEFINITIONS................................................... 214

DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS...................................... 93

DEPARTMENT OF ECOLOGY......................................... 102

DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND
WILDLIFE............................... 114

DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL
ADMINISTRATION........................... 33

DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH........................................... 89

DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION
SERVICES............................. 34

DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND
INDUSTRIES............................. 86

DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING....................................... 126

DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL
RESOURCES............................... 120

DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL........................................ 30

DEPARTMENT OF RETIREMENT
SYSTEMS

CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT
SYSTEMS........................... 207

OPERATIONS..................................................... 31

DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND
HEALTH SERVICES....................... 41

ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORTING
SERVICES PROGRAM................. 80

AGING AND ADULT SERVICES
PROGRAM............................... 65

ALCOHOL AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE
PROGRAM............................ 72

CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
PROGRAM........................... 42

DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
PROGRAM............................. 60

ECONOMIC SERVICES PROGRAM...................................... 68

JUVENILE OFFENDER
CO-OCCURRING DISORDER PILOT PROGRAM.......... 52

JUVENILE REHABILITATION
PROGRAM................................ 47

MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM..................................... 73

MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM.......................................... 54

PAYMENTS TO OTHER AGENCIES
PROGRAM............................. 81

VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION
PROGRAM.............................. 79

DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS
AFFAIRS................................. 88

DONATIONS OF EMPLOYEE LEAVE................................... 224

EASTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY................................. 182

EDUCATION TECHNOLOGY
REVOLVING ACCOUNT........................ 200

EMPLOYMENT SECURITY
DEPARTMENT................................ 100

GOVERNOR

COMPENSATION--INSURANCE
BENEFITS.............................. 204

EXTRAORDINARY CRIMINAL
JUSTICE COSTS.......................... 202

HIGHER EDUCATION COORDINATING
BOARD

FINANCIAL AID AND GRANT
PROGRAMS.............................. 188

POLICY COORDINATION AND
ADMINISTRATION........................ 186

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES........................................ 2

HUMAN RIGHTS COMMISSION........................................ 83

INSURANCE COMMISSIONER......................................... 35

INTERAGENCY COMMITTEE FOR
OUTDOOR RECREATION.................. 111

JOINT LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND
REVIEW COMMITTEE.................... 4

LAPSED APPROPRIATION.......................................... 200

LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR............................................ 11

LIQUOR CONTROL BOARD........................................... 36

LOCAL GOVERNMENT COSTS........................................ 212

LOCAL GOVERNMENT TASK FORCE................................... 216

MIDWIFERY CERTIFICATION
PROGRAM............................... 203

MILITARY DEPARTMENT........................................ 38,
40

MUNICIPAL RESEARCH COUNCIL..................................... 33

OFFICE OF FINANCIAL
MANAGEMENT....................... 27, 211, 212

COMPENSATION ACTIONS OF
PERSONNEL RESOURCES BOARD............. 209

CONTRIBUTIONS TO RETIREMENT
SYSTEMS...................... 211, 212

DIGITAL GOVERNMENT POOL....................................... 200

YEAR 2000 ALLOCATIONS......................................... 201

OFFICE OF PUBLIC DEFENSE........................................ 9

OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR......................................... 10

PUBLIC DISCLOSURE COMMISSION................................... 11

PUBLIC EMPLOYEES' RETIREMENT
SYSTEM........................... 221

RETIREMENT CONTRIBUTION RATES................................. 221

SALARY COST OF LIVING
ADJUSTMENT.............................. 208

SECRETARY OF STATE............................................. 12

SENATE.......................................................... 2

SENTENCING GUIDELINES
COMMISSION............................... 99

STATE BOARD FOR COMMUNITY AND
TECHNICAL COLLEGES.............. 173

STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION...................................... 170

STATE CONVENTION AND TRADE
CENTER.............................. 40

STATE HEALTH CARE AUTHORITY.................................... 81

STATE HEALTH INSURANCE POOL
ACCOUNT........................... 203

STATE INVESTMENT BOARD......................................... 33

STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION......................... 110

STATE PATROL.................................................. 127

STATE SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND.................................... 195

STATE SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF..................................... 196

STATE TREASURER................................................ 15

BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST............................. 198,
199

STATE REVENUES FOR
DISTRIBUTION............................... 218

SUPERINTENDENT OF PUBLIC
INSTRUCTION

BASIC EDUCATION EMPLOYEE
COMPENSATION......................... 145

EDUCATION REFORM PROGRAMS..................................... 161

EDUCATIONAL SERVICE DISTRICTS................................. 158

ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY
SCHOOL IMPROVEMENT ACT............... 161

GENERAL APPORTIONMENT (BASIC
EDUCATION)....................... 136

INSTITUTIONAL EDUCATION
PROGRAMS.............................. 159

LEARNING ASSISTANCE PROGRAM................................... 168

LOCAL EFFORT ASSISTANCE....................................... 159

LOCAL ENHANCEMENT FUNDS....................................... 169

PROGRAMS FOR HIGHLY CAPABLE
STUDENTS.......................... 160

PUPIL TRANSPORTATION.......................................... 151

SCHOOL EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION
ADJUSTMENTS...................... 149

SCHOOL FOOD SERVICE PROGRAMS.................................. 152

SPECIAL EDUCATION PROGRAMS.................................... 153

STATE ADMINISTRATION.......................................... 130

TRAFFIC SAFETY EDUCATION PROGRAMS............................. 158

TRANSITIONAL BILINGUAL
PROGRAMS............................... 167

SUPREME COURT................................................... 6

THE EVERGREEN STATE COLLEGE................................... 183

UNIVERSITY OF WASHINGTON...................................... 176

UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION
COMMISSION........................ 37

WASHINGTON STATE ARTS
COMMISSION.............................. 194

WASHINGTON STATE HISTORICAL
SOCIETY........................... 195

WASHINGTON STATE LIBRARY...................................... 194

WASHINGTON STATE UNIVERSITY................................... 179

WESTERN WASHINGTON UNIVERSITY................................. 186

WORK FORCE TRAINING AND
EDUCATION COORDINATING BOARD.......... 196

--- END ---