BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
19.86.090 and 1987 c 202 s 187 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
person who is injured in his or her business or property by a violation of RCW
19.86.020, 19.86.030, 19.86.040, 19.86.050, or 19.86.060, or any person so injured
because he or she refuses to accede to a proposal for an arrangement which, if
consummated, would be in violation of RCW 19.86.030, 19.86.040, 19.86.050, or
19.86.060, may bring a civil action in the superior court to enjoin further
violations, to recover the actual damages sustained by him or her, or both,
together with the costs of the suit, including a reasonable attorney's fee, and
the court may in its discretion, increase the award of damages to an amount not
to exceed three times the actual damages sustained: PROVIDED, That such
increased damage award for violation of RCW 19.86.020 may not exceed ((ten))
thirty-five thousand dollars: PROVIDED FURTHER, That such person may
bring a civil action in the district court to recover his or her actual damages,
except for damages which exceed the amount specified in RCW 3.66.020, and the
costs of the suit, including reasonable attorney's fees. The district court
may, in its discretion, increase the award of damages to an amount not more
than three times the actual damages sustained, but such increased damage award
shall not exceed the amount specified in RCW 3.66.020. For the purpose of this
section "person" shall include the counties, municipalities, and all
political subdivisions of this state.

Whenever the state of Washington is injured by reason of a
violation of RCW 19.86.030, 19.86.040, 19.86.050, or 19.86.060, it may sue
therefor in the superior court to recover the actual damages sustained by it
and to recover the costs of the suit including a reasonable attorney's fee.

---
END ---