BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.61.165 and 1999 c 206 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The state department of transportation and the local authorities
are authorized to reserve all or any portion of any highway under their
respective jurisdictions as high-occupancy vehicle lanes, including any
designated lane or ramp, for the exclusive or preferential use of public
transportation vehicles or private motor vehicles carrying no fewer than a
specified number of passengers when ((such)) the limitation will
increase the efficient utilization of the highway or will aid in the
conservation of energy resources. Regulations authorizing ((such))
exclusive or preferential use of a highway facility ((may be declared to be))
are effective ((at all times or at specified times of day or on
specified days)) only from 6:00 through 9:00 a.m. and 3:30 through 6:00
p.m. Monday through Friday, excluding state holidays. Violation of a
restriction of highway usage prescribed by the appropriate authority under this
section is a traffic infraction.

---
END ---