BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
If a person, who is neither a permit applicant nor the issuing agency, appeals
a decision by a board identified in RCW 43.21B.005 to a court, the permit
applicant may request the court to require the person to post a bond. In
making the request to the court, the permit applicant must show the combined
cost of appeal and the costs of delay of the permit exceed ten thousand
dollars. The court may require the person to post a bond that will be
sufficient to cover: (a) The costs incurred by the permit applicant in preparing
for the appeal to a board identified in RCW 43.21B.005; (b) the costs of delay
that are attributable to the appeal; and (c) an estimate of the costs likely to
be incurred by the permit applicant in the appeal to the court. The court may
hold a bond hearing and determine the amount of the bond. If the appeal is
made directly to the court of appeals, as provided in RCW 34.05.518, a
commissioner for the court of appeals may conduct the bond hearing and
determine the amount of the bond.

(2) Consistent with the court's decision on the appeal, the court
shall direct the dispersal of funds from the bond to the person bringing the
appeal and the permit applicant.

---
END ---