BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
41.06.079 and 1993 c 281 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

In addition to the exemptions set forth in RCW 41.06.070, the
provisions of this chapter shall not apply in the department of transportation
to the secretary, ((a)) two deputy ((secretary, an
administrative assistant to the secretary, if any)) secretaries, one
assistant secretary for each division designated pursuant to RCW 47.01.081, one
confidential secretary for each of the above-named officers, up to six
transportation ((district)) regional administrators and one
confidential secretary for each ((district)) regional
administrator, and up to ((six additional new administrators or
confidential secretaries)) eighteen other positions designated by
the secretary of the department of transportation and approved by the
Washington personnel resources board ((pursuant to the provisions of)) under
RCW 41.06.070(((1)(z), the legislative liaison for the department, the state
construction engineer, the state aid engineer, the personnel manager, the state
project development engineer, the state maintenance and operations engineer,
one confidential secretary for each of the last-named five positions, and a
confidential secretary for the public affairs administrator)) (3).
The individuals appointed under this section shall be exempt from the
provisions of the state civil service law, and shall be paid salaries to be
fixed by the governor in accordance with the procedure established by law for
the fixing of salaries for individuals exempt from the operation of the state
civil service law.

---
END ---