BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
47.68.233 and 1987 c 220 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department shall require that every pilot who is a resident of this state and
every nonresident pilot who regularly operates any aircraft in this state be
registered with the department. The department shall charge an annual fee not
to exceed ten dollars for each registration. All registration certificates
issued under this section shall be renewed annually during the month of the
registrant's birthdate.

The
registration fee imposed by this section shall be used by the department for
the purpose of (a) search and rescue of lost and downed aircraft and airmen
under the direction and supervision of the secretary ((and)), (b)
safety and education, and (c) volunteer recognition and support.

Registration
shall be effected by filing with the department a certified written statement
that contains the information reasonably required by the department. The
department shall issue certificates of registration and in connection therewith
shall prescribe requirements for the possession and exhibition of the
certificates.

The
provisions of this section do not apply to:

(1)
A pilot who operates an aircraft exclusively in the service of any government
or any political subdivision thereof, including the government of the United
States, any state, territory, or possession of the United States, or the
District of Columbia;

(2)
A pilot registered under the laws of a foreign country;

(3)
A pilot engaged exclusively in commercial flying constituting an act of
interstate or foreign commerce;

(4)
A person piloting an aircraft equipped with fully functioning dual controls
when a licensed instructor is in full charge of one set of the controls and the
flight is solely for instruction or for the demonstration of the aircraft to a
bona fide prospective purchaser.

Failure to register as provided in this section is a violation of
RCW 47.68.230 and subjects the offender to the penalties incident thereto.

---
END ---