BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Commission" means the Washington state medical quality assurance
commission.

(2)
"Department" means the department of health.

(3)
"Optometric physician assistant" means a person who is licensed by
the commission to practice medicine to a limited extent, but only under the
supervision of a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, and if the
optometric physician assistant is academically and clinically prepared, to
provide eye care related health care services and perform diagnostic,
therapeutic, preventive, and health maintenance services in the specialty of
ophthalmology.

(4)
"Physician" includes a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW or
an osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW.

(5)
"Practice medicine" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 18.71.011
but shall not extend beyond those ophthalmologic health care services
specifically authorized and not prohibited by section 9 of this act.

(6)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's
designee.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The commission shall adopt rules that establish the qualifications, educational
requirements, and training requirements for licensure as an optometric
physician assistant. The qualifications and requirements include completion of
an optometric physician assistant training program approved by the commission,
and eligibility to take an examination approved by the commission, but only if
the examination tests subjects substantially equivalent to the curriculum of an
accredited optometric physician assistant training program.

(2)
The commission shall adopt rules establishing curriculum requirements for
optometric physician assistant training programs. At a minimum, the rules must
require that:

(a)
The program be under the control and supervision of physicians specializing in
ophthalmology; and

(b)
The program includes substantial and meaningful elements of:

(i)
Appropriately supervised delivery of clinical services of the type for which
the student is being trained to deliver;

(ii)
Didactic classes offered by physician faculty members;

(iii)
Presentations of seminar topics to and by the student;

(iv)
Involvement with quality assurance audits; and

(v)
Preparation of case studies as well as periodic formal and objective testing to
determine that there is adequate progress by the student through the training
program and regimens.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The commission shall adopt rules governing the extent to which:

(a)
Optometric physician assistant students may practice medicine during training;
and

(b)
Optometric physician assistants may practice medicine after successful
completion of an optometric physician assistant training course.

(2)
The rules adopted under subsection (1) of this section shall provide that:

(a)
The practice of an optometric physician assistant be limited to the performance
of those services permitted by section 9(1) of this act for which he or she is
trained, but shall not include services prohibited by section 9(2) of this act;
and

(b)
Each optometric physician assistant shall practice medicine only under the
supervision and control of a physician licensed in this state, but that
supervision and control shall not be construed to require the personal presence
of the supervising physician at the place where services are rendered.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
An applicant for licensure as an optometric physician assistant shall file an
application with the commission on a form prepared by the secretary and
approved by the commission. The application form must detail the applicant's
education, training, and experience and other information as the commission may
require.

(2)
Each applicant shall furnish to the commission proof, in a manner deemed
satisfactory to the commission, of the following:

(a)
That the applicant has completed an optometric physician assistant program
approved by the commission and is eligible to take the examination approved by
the commission; and

(b)
That the applicant has a current and unrestricted license as an optometrist
under chapter 18.53 RCW and has the training to qualify for certification under
RCW 18.53.010 to use drugs for diagnostic and therapeutic purposes, although
this does not require that the applicant be certified by the optometry board.

(3)
The commission may approve, deny, or take other disciplinary action upon the
application for license as provided in the Uniform Disciplinary Act, chapter
18.130 RCW. The license shall be renewed as determined under RCW 43.70.250 and
43.70.280. The commission may authorize the use of alternative supervisors who
are licensed either under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW.

(4)
The commission may adopt rules governing mandatory continued education
requirements for optometric physician assistants. The rules shall provide that
mandatory continuing education requirements may be met, in part, by showing
evidence of completion of approved activities relating to professional
liability risk management.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
Uniform Disciplinary Act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs the issuance and denial
of licenses and the discipline of licensees under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. Prior
to practicing in this state, an optometric physician assistant must obtain a
practice arrangement plan that has been approved by the commission.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. (1)
No optometric physician assistant licensed in this state may be employed or
supervised by a physician or physician group without the approval of the
commission.

(2)
Prior to commencing practice, an optometric physician assistant licensed in
this state shall apply to the commission for permission to be employed or
supervised by a physician or physician group. The physician or physician group
and optometric physician assistant shall jointly submit a practice arrangement
plan to the commission. The practice arrangement plan shall describe the
manner and extent to which the optometric physician assistant will practice and
be supervised. No practice arrangement may be approved where a physician
supervises more than three optometric physician assistants, or where a group
practice supervises more than three optometric physician assistants per
physician. Whenever an optometric physician assistant is practicing in a
manner inconsistent with the approved practice arrangement plan, the commission
may take disciplinary action under the Uniform Disciplinary Act, chapter 18.130
RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. No
physician who supervises a licensed optometric physician assistant in
accordance with and within the terms of any permission granted by the
commission is considered as aiding and abetting an unlicensed person to
practice medicine. The supervising physician and optometric physician
assistant retain professional and personal responsibility for any act that
constitutes the practice of medicine as defined in RCW 18.71.011 when performed
by the optometric physician assistant.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. (1)
Subject to subsection (2) of this section, health care services performed under
this chapter include only the following procedures:

(a)
Prescribing, ordering, or administering any over-the-counter substances;

(b)
Prescribing, ordering, or administering oral legend medications for eye care
and controlled substances as defined in Schedules III through V of the Uniform
Controlled Substances Act, chapter 69.50 RCW, that are necessary to perform
services with the commission-approved practice arrangement of the optometric
physician assistant;

(c)
Administering topical anesthesia for procedures of a superficial nature;

(d)
Performing only the following surgical procedures:

(i)
Epilation of the lashes;

(ii)
Removal of foreign bodies that do not penetrate the corneal stroma, and

(iii)
lacrimal irrigation or punctal plug insertion;

(e)
Ordering and interpreting the results of, but not performing, the following
diagnostic tests when conducted to ascertain the condition of the eye:

(i)
Cultures of surface materials that involve only swabbing the surface;

(ii)
Blood or serum tests;

(iii)
Urinalysis;

(iv)
Fluorescein angiograms;

(v)
Ultrasound, except on the eye and eye orbit;

(vi)
Radiographs; and

(vii)
CT scans or MRI tests; and

(f)
Ophthalmologic surgical assisting following an approved residency program under
the direct supervision of an ophthalmologist.

(2)
Subject to those services expressly referred to in subsection (1) of this
section, no health care services may be performed under this chapter in any of
the following areas:

(a)
Surgery of any kind, whether performed with knives, machines, light or laser,
or with other apparatus, including treating the complications or sequelae of
any surgery;

(b)
Prescribing, ordering, or administering legend or controlled substances,
including but not limited to:

(i)
Intravenous medications;

(ii)
Subconjunctival steroid injections;

(iii)
Controlled substances as defined in Schedule II of the Uniform Controlled
Substances Act, chapter 69.50 RCW;

(iv)
Corticosteroids;

(v)
Antimetabolites;

(vi)
Immunosuppressives; and

(vii)
Enteral or parenteral medications;

(c)
Administering local or systemic anesthesia; or

(d)
Administering or interpreting diagnostic laboratory or imaging tests.

Failure
to prohibit a procedure under this subsection shall not be construed as
authority for performing. The scope of practice of optometric physician
assistants is confined to those health services expressly referred to in subsection
(1) of this section.

Sec.
10. RCW
18.71A.060 and 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 324 are each amended to read as follows:

No
health care services may be performed under this chapter in any of the
following areas:

(1)
((The measurement of the powers or range of human vision, or the
determination of the accommodation and refractive state of the human eye or the
scope of its functions in general, or the fitting or adaptation of lenses or
frames for the aid thereof.

(2)
The prescribing or directing the use of, or using, any optical device in
connection with ocular exercises, visual training, vision training, or
orthoptics.

(3))) The
prescribing of contact lenses for, or the fitting or adaptation of contact
lenses to, the human eye.

(((4)))
(2) Nothing in this section shall preclude the performance of routine
visual screening.

(((5)))
(3) The practice of dentistry or dental hygiene as defined in chapters
18.32 and 18.29 RCW respectively. The exemptions set forth in RCW 18.32.030
(1) and (8), shall not apply to a physician assistant.

(((6)))
(4) The practice of chiropractic as defined in chapter 18.25 RCW
including the adjustment or manipulation of the articulations of the spine.

(((7)))
(5) The practice of podiatric medicine and surgery as defined in chapter
18.22 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11.
Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

---
END ---