BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that opportunities to improve bloodborne pathogens standards
arise when product engineering improvements result in safer medical devices.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall, by March 1, 2001, adopt rules revising the bloodborne
pathogens standard governing occupational exposure to blood and other
potentially infectious materials. The rules must require product evaluation in
accordance with subsection (3) of this section, beginning no later than April
1, 2001. The rules must also embody a bloodborne pathogens standard meeting
the requirements of subsection (4) of this section.

(2)
The definitions in this subsection apply to all rules regarding occupational
exposure to bloodborne pathogens and other potentially infectious materials.

(a)
"Bloodborne pathogens" means pathogenic microorganisms that are
present in human blood and can cause disease in humans. These pathogens
include, but are not limited to, hepatitis B virus, hepatitis C virus, and
human immunodeficiency virus.

(b)
"Engineering controls" means controls including, but not limited to,
sharps disposal containers, needleless systems, and sharps with engineered
sharps injury protection that isolate or remove the bloodborne pathogens hazard
from the workplace.

(c)
"Engineered sharps injury protection" means either:

(i)
A physical attribute built into a needle device used for withdrawing body
fluids, accessing a vein or artery, or administering medications or other
fluids, that effectively reduces the risk of an exposure incident by a
mechanism such as barrier creation, blunting, encapsulation, withdrawal,
retraction, destruction, or other effective mechanisms; or

(ii)
A physical attribute built into any other type of needle device, or into a
nonneedle sharp, that effectively reduces the risk of an exposure incident.

(d)
"Front-line health care worker" means a nonmanagerial employee
responsible for direct patient care with potential occupational exposure to
sharps-related injuries.

(e)
"Needleless system" means a device that does not use needles for:

(i)
The withdrawal of body fluids after initial venous or arterial access is established;

(ii)
The administration of medication or fluids; and

(iii)
Any other procedure involving the potential for an exposure incident.

(f)
"Sharp" means any object used or encountered in a health care setting
that can be reasonably anticipated to penetrate the skin or any other part of
the body, and to result in an exposure incident, including, but not limited to,
needle devices, scalpels, lancets, and broken capillary tubes.

(g)
"Sharps injury" means any injury caused by a sharp, including, but not
limited to, cuts, abrasions, or needlesticks.

(h)
"Sharps injury log" means a written or electronic record satisfying
the requirements of subsection (4)(b)(iii) of this section.

(3)(a)
The rules adopted under subsection (1) of this section must require each
employer to adopt a methodology for product review and evaluation of available
needleless systems and sharps with engineered sharps injury protections,
including an evaluation of reliable sources of information from such sources as
government agencies, employer organizations, labor organizations, and other
sources deemed appropriate, to enable the employer to select the appropriate
engineering controls in the categories listed below for implementation no later
than the date required under subsection (4) of this section. The employer's
methodology for review and evaluation must include input from front-line health
care workers who will be engaged in the use of the devices in accordance with
the provisions of subsection (4)(b) of this section, as well as other
appropriate sources in the employer's organization. Product review and
evaluation should include, but not be limited to, the following categories of
devices as used in the employer's facilities:

(i)
Intravenous catheters;

(ii)
Intravenous access devices and intravenous connectors;

(iii)
Vacuum tube blood collection devices;

(iv)
Blood-drawing devices such as phlebotomy needle/tube holders, butterfly-type
devices, and syringes;

(v)
Syringes used for purposes other than blood drawing;

(vi)
Suture needles;

(vii)
Scalpel devices; and

(viii)
Any other category of medical device used at the employer's facility where
there is a sharps injury risk.

(b)
For each category of device, product review and evaluation must be conducted
with meaningful input from front-line health care workers representing areas in
which they will be used, as well as infection control professionals and
representatives of other disciplines as appropriate. In addition, the
department, in consultation with the Washington state hospital association and
other provider associations, shall determine means by which these associations
can help employers meet the requirements of this subsection. The product
evaluation period should continue for not less than six months from the date of
commencement.

(4)
The rules adopted under subsection (1) of this section must require each
employer to develop a written exposure control plan to be completed no later
than three months following the effective date of the rules, establish sharps
injury logs no later than three months following the effective date of the
rules, and implement engineering controls as soon as possible but no later than
nine months after the effective date of the rules. The rules must include, but
are not limited to, the following:

(a)
A requirement that the most effective available needleless systems and sharps
with engineered sharps injury protection be included as engineering and work
practice controls. However, needleless systems and sharps with engineered
sharps injury protection are not required if:

(i)
Such devices are not available in the marketplace;

(ii)
The employer, with input from the evaluation committee, described in (b)(v) of
this subsection, determines by means of objective product evaluation criteria
that use of such devices may jeopardize patient safety if utilized for a class
or type of procedure, or for a class or type of procedure when performed on a
certain type of patient;

(iii)
A certified or licensed health care worker directly involved in the patient's
care determines, in the reasonable exercise of clinical judgment, that use of
such devices will jeopardize the patient's safety or the success of the
particular medical procedure involving the patient. A health care worker who
makes such a determination must report, in accordance with the requirements of
(b)(vi) of this subsection, the reasons for failing to use an approved
needleless system or sharp with engineered sharps injury protection;

(iv)
The employer can demonstrate by means of objective product evaluation criteria
that use of such devices are not more effective in preventing exposure
incidents than the alternative used by the employer; or

(v)
The employer can demonstrate, with respect to an engineering control which has
not been available in the marketplace for twelve months, that reasonably
specific and reliable information is not available regarding the safety
performance of the engineering control for the employer's procedures, and that
the employer is actively determining by means of objective product evaluation
criteria whether the use of the engineering control will reduce the risk of
exposure incidents occurring in the employer's workplace;

(b)
A requirement that each employer develop and implement an effective written
exposure control plan that includes, but is not limited to, procedures for:

(i)
Identifying and selecting needleless systems and sharps with engineered sharps
injury protection. Any procedure adopted should provide that the
evaluation committee described in (b)(v) of this subsection will have
meaningful input into the identification and evaluation of such devices;

(ii)
Updating the written exposure control plan when necessary to reflect progress
in implementing needleless systems and sharps with engineered sharps injury
protection as determined by the evaluation committee described in (b)(v) of
this subsection, but in no event less than once every year;

(iii)
Recording information concerning exposure incidents in a sharps injury log,
including, but not limited to, the following information, if known:

(A)
The date and time of the exposure incident;

(B)
The type and brand of sharp involved in the exposure incident; and

(C)
The description of the exposure incident that includes:

(I)
The job classification of the exposed employee;

(II)
The department or work area where the exposure incident occurred;

(III)
The procedure that the exposed employee was performing at the time of the
incident;

(IV)
How the incident occurred;

(V)
The body part involved in the exposure incident;

(VI)
If the sharp had engineered sharps injury protection, whether the protective
mechanism was activated, and whether the injury occurred before the protective
mechanism was activated, during activation of the mechanism, or after
activation of the mechanism;

(VII)
If the sharp had no engineered sharps injury protection, whether and how such a
mechanism could have prevented the injury, as well as the basis for the
assessment; and

(VIII)
An assessment of whether any other engineering, administrative, or work
practice control could have prevented the injury, as well as the basis for the
assessment;

(iv)
Ensuring that all front-line health care workers are trained in, and
demonstrate their ability to use, engineering controls before they are
introduced into the clinical setting;

(v)
Establishment by the employer of an evaluation committee to advise the employer
on the implementation of the requirements of this section. At least half the
members of the committee must be either front-line health care workers or
representatives of employee organizations which represent front-line health
care workers in job classifications impacted by the requirements of this
section, including but not limited to nurses, medical assistants or nurses
aides, technicians who handle or process sharps, phlebotomists, and
physicians. An employer that is affiliated with, or affiliated for certain
purposes with, a multistate or multilocation health care organization is in
compliance with this section if it relies on an evaluation committee
established by the organization centrally, so long as implementation of the
advice of the centralized evaluation committee is accomplished in a manner that
ensures communication with, training of, and feedback from affected staff of
the local employer. Members of the evaluation committee must be provided
demonstrations of the use of engineering controls and must be trained in
product evaluation criteria prior to the commencement of any product
evaluation; and

(vi)
Ensuring all determinations pursuant to (a)(iii) of this subsection are
reported in writing, including the date, time, patient, and procedure involved,
and a statement of why the employee failed to use an approved needleless system
or sharp with engineered sharps injury protections.

(5)
In complying with this section, an employer with no more than ten full-time
equivalent employees, responsible for direct patient care with potential
occupational exposure to sharps related injuries, at any time during the
calendar year immediately preceding the current calendar year may:

(a)
Evaluate new technology through its own evaluation committee, as defined in
subsection (4)(b)(v) of this section, a joint evaluation committee, established
by multiple small business employers, that meets the requirements of subsection
(4)(b)(v) of this section;

(b)
Use a joint evaluation committee to develop and update the written procedure
for identifying and selecting devices as required by subsection (4)(b)(i) and
(ii) of this section; and

(c)
Comply with the provisions of subsection (4)(b)(iii) of this section by
recording the required sharps injury data in its OSHA 200 log.

(6)
The department shall promulgate additional amendments to the bloodborne
pathogens standard necessary to implement this section; and, to the extent that
funds are available, evaluate the impact of this section on the reduction of
needlestick and sharps injuries and costs of employer operations.

(7)
To assist employers in complying with the requirements of the bloodborne
pathogens standard adopted under this section, the department shall compile and
maintain a list of needleless systems and sharps with engineered sharps injury
protection. The list may be developed from existing sources of information
including, but not limited to, the federal food and drug administration, the
federal centers for disease control, the national institute of occupational
safety and health, and the United States department of veterans affairs.

(8)
Nothing in this section provides an exemption or other basis of appeal in
relation to the existing requirements of the bloodborne pathogens standard and
any other requirements adopted under the authority of RCW 49.17.040 and
49.17.050.

(9)
To the extent they exceed the existing bloodborne pathogens standard and any
other requirements adopted under the authority of RCW 49.17.040 and 49.17.050,
the requirements of this section do not apply to the practice of dentistry.

(10) The department shall consult with the Washington state
hospital association and other provider associations to develop policy
guidance, as effective as federal enforcement and consistent with existing
bloodborne pathogens standards and any other requirements adopted under the
authority of this chapter, which addresses compliance requirements prior to the
implementation of regulations under this section.

---
END ---