BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.300.130 and 1999 c 388 s 401 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Expanding activity in educational research, educational restructuring, and
educational improvement initiatives has produced and continues to produce much
valuable information. The legislature finds that such information should be
shared with the citizens and educational community of the state as widely as
possible. To facilitate access to information and materials on educational
improvement and research, the superintendent of public instruction, to the
extent funds are appropriated, shall establish the center for the improvement
of student learning. The primary purpose of the center is to provide
assistance and advice to parents, school board members, educators, and the
public regarding strategies for assisting students in learning the essential
academic learning requirements pursuant to RCW ((28A.630.885)) 28A.655.060.
The center shall work in conjunction with the academic achievement and accountability
commission, educational service districts, institutions of higher education,
and education, parent, community, and business organizations.

(2)
The center, in conjunction with other staff in the office of the superintendent
of public instruction, shall:

(a)
Establish, maintain, and staff full time, a help line with a toll-free phone
number for parents, students, and interested citizens. The purpose of the help
line is to promote public awareness and understanding of public education,
identify issues of concern and interest that need response, and provide a
resource for parents, students, and interested citizens who have questions
about education and the local and state education systems;

(b)
Serve as a clearinghouse for the completed work and activities of the academic
achievement and accountability commission;

(((b)))
(c) Serve as a clearinghouse for information regarding successful
educational improvement and parental involvement programs in schools and
districts, and information about efforts within institutions of higher
education in the state to support educational improvement initiatives in
Washington schools and districts;

(((c)))
(d) Provide best practices research and advice that can be used to help
schools develop and implement: Programs and practices to improve instruction
of the essential academic learning requirements ((under section 701 of this
act)); systems to analyze student assessment data, with an emphasis on
systems that will combine the use of state and local data to monitor the
academic progress of each and every student in the school district;
comprehensive, school-wide improvement plans; school-based shared decision-making
models; programs to promote lifelong learning and community involvement in
education; school-to-work transition programs; programs to meet the needs of
highly capable students; programs and practices to meet the diverse needs of
students based on gender, racial, ethnic, economic, and special needs status;
research, information, and technology systems; and other programs and practices
that will assist educators in helping students learn the essential academic
learning requirements;

(((d)))
(e) Develop and distribute, in conjunction with the academic achievement
and accountability commission, parental involvement materials, including
instructional guides developed to inform parents of the essential academic
learning requirements. The instructional guides also shall contain actions
parents may take to assist their children in meeting the requirements, and
should focus on reaching parents who have not previously been involved with
their children's education;

(((e)))
(f) Identify obstacles to greater parent and community involvement in
school shared decision-making processes and recommend strategies for helping
parents and community members to participate effectively in school shared
decision-making processes, including understanding and respecting the roles of
school building administrators and staff;

(((f)))
(g) Develop and maintain an internet web site to increase the
availability of information, research, and other materials;

(((g)))
(h) Take other actions to increase public awareness of the importance of
parental and community involvement in education;

(((h)))
(i) Work with appropriate organizations to inform teachers, district and
school administrators, and school directors about the waivers available and the
broadened school board powers under RCW 28A.320.015;

(((i)))
(j) Provide training and consultation services, including conducting
regional summer institutes;

(((j)))
(k) Address methods for improving the success rates of certain ethnic
and racial student groups; and

(((k)))
(l) Perform other functions consistent with the purpose of the center as
prescribed in subsection (1) of this section.

(3)
The superintendent of public instruction, after consultation with the academic
achievement and accountability commission, shall select and employ a director
for the center.

(4) The superintendent may enter into contracts with individuals or
organizations including but not limited to: School districts; educational
service districts; educational organizations; teachers; higher education
faculty; institutions of higher education; state agencies; business or
community-based organizations; and other individuals and organizations to
accomplish the duties and responsibilities of the center. In carrying out the
duties and responsibilities of the center, the superintendent, whenever
possible, shall use practitioners to assist agency staff as well as assist
educators and others in schools and districts.

---
END ---