BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that it is crucial to establish a process for determining
when the high school assessment is valid and reliable and to give a specific
date about when that finding will be made. A specific process must be followed
both to be legally valid and for students, parents, educators, and other
citizens to both understand and have confidence in the validity and reliability
of the tenth grade assessment and that the certificate of mastery is an
appropriate measure of student achievement.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.655 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
By September 2010, the state board of education shall determine whether the
high school assessment of the Washington assessment of student learning is
sufficiently reliable and valid so that successful completion of the assessment
shall lead to a certificate of mastery as required under RCW 28A.655.060. The
state board of education shall determine that the assessment is reliable and
valid only if the board makes positive findings based on the following:

(a)
The curriculum and instruction are aligned with the assessments;

(b)
Students have the opportunity to receive instruction aligned with the
assessments;

(c)
The assessments measure student learning accurately, including but not limited
to, finding that the scoring of the assessments is valid; the standards for
achievement on the assessments are clearly and appropriately established; a
process is established to protect the integrity of the assessments; the items
on the assessments are reviewed and updated; and the assessment is reliable,
which includes internal consistency, interrater reliability, the ability for
the results to be generalized across tasks, and reliability of the cut score;

(d)
Educators have training in administering the assessments;

(e)
Educational issues have been addressed including assessments in the early and
middle grades, procedures for retesting students, and help for students who do
not meet the standards on the assessments;

(f)
A reporting system is in place to accurately report the results of the
assessments.

(g)
The development of the assessment meets accepted test construction procedures;

(h)
The content of the assessment represents an adequate sampling of the academic
subject being assessed;

(i)
There is a correlation between the scores on the state-wide standardized
norm-reference assessment and the Washington assessment on student learning;

(j)
Scoring procedures are dependable and free from random errors of measurement;

(k)
The passing standards or cut-scores ensure reasonable student proficiency and
are empirically reliable; and

(l)
There is a standardization of test administration.

(2)
The state board of education shall consult with the superintendent of public
instruction, the academic achievement and accountability commission,
representatives of higher education, educators, school directors, students,
parents, and interested citizens in preparing its findings under this section.

(3)
The state board of education shall develop and implement rules that ensure that
once the high school assessment leads to a certificate of mastery the
achievement of the certificate of mastery shall not be used as the measure of
student achievement which enables a high school student to be eligible to enter
into a running start program at an institution of higher education.

(4)
The state board of education shall ensure that qualified students enrolled in
approved private schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW, home-based instruction
students under chapter 28A.200 RCW, and students who come from out-of-state
shall not be discriminated against in any way or denied equal access or
opportunities to any benefit or benefits provided by meeting the high school
assessment standards and achieving the certificate of mastery, including
admission to higher education institutions and job opportunities.

---
END ---