BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.20.031 and 1999 c 6 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department shall not issue a driver's license to a person:

(1)
Who is under the age of sixteen years;

(2)
Whose driving privilege has been withheld unless and until the department may
authorize the driving privilege under RCW 46.20.311;

(3)
Who has been classified as an alcoholic, drug addict, alcohol abuser, or drug
abuser by a program approved by the department of social and health services.
The department may, however, issue a license if the person:

(a)
Has been granted a deferred prosecution under chapter 10.05 RCW; or

(b)
Is satisfactorily participating in or has successfully completed an alcohol or
drug abuse treatment program approved by the department of social and health
services and has established control of his or her alcohol or drug abuse
problem;

(4)
Who has previously been adjudged to be mentally ill or insane, or to be
incompetent due to a mental disability or disease. The department shall,
however, issue a license to the person if he or she otherwise qualifies and:

(a)
Has been restored to competency by the methods provided by law; or

(b)
The superior court finds the person able to operate a motor vehicle with safety
upon the highways during such incompetency;

(5)
Who has not passed the driver's licensing examination required by RCW 46.20.120
and 46.20.305, if applicable;

(6)
Who is required under the laws of this state to deposit proof of financial
responsibility and who has not deposited such proof;

(7)
Who is unable to safely operate a motor vehicle upon the highways due to a
physical or mental disability. The department's conclusion that a person is
barred from licensing under this subsection must be reasonable and be based
upon good and substantial evidence. This determination is subject to review by
a court of competent jurisdiction((;

(8)
Who has violated his or her written promise to appear, respond, or comply
regarding a notice of infraction issued for abandonment of a vehicle in
violation of RCW 46.55.105, unless:

(a)
The court has not notified the department of the violation;

(b)
The department has received notice from the court showing that the person has
been found not to have committed the violation of RCW 46.55.105; or

(c)
The person has paid all monetary penalties owing, including completion of
community service, and the court is satisfied that the person has made
restitution as provided by RCW 46.55.105(2))).

Sec.
2. RCW
46.20.289 and 1999 c 274 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department shall suspend all driving privileges of a person when the department
receives notice from a court under RCW 46.63.070(5), 46.63.110(5), or 46.64.025
that the person has failed to respond to a notice of traffic infraction, failed
to appear at a requested hearing, violated a written promise to appear in
court, or has failed to comply with the terms of a notice of traffic infraction
or citation, other than for ((a notice of a violation of RCW 46.55.105 or))
a standing, stopping, or parking violation. A suspension under this section
takes effect thirty days after the date the department mails notice of the
suspension, and remains in effect until the department has received a
certificate from the court showing that the case has been adjudicated, and
until the person meets the requirements of RCW 46.20.311. In the case of
failure to respond to a traffic infraction issued under RCW 46.55.105, the
department shall suspend all driving privileges for ninety days and until all
penalties have been paid. A suspension under this section does not take
effect if, prior to the effective date of the suspension, the department
receives a certificate from the court showing that the case has been
adjudicated.

Sec.
3. RCW
46.20.291 and 1998 c 165 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department is authorized to suspend the license of a driver upon a showing by
its records or other sufficient evidence that the licensee:

(1)
Has committed an offense for which mandatory revocation or suspension of
license is provided by law;

(2)
Has, by reckless or unlawful operation of a motor vehicle, caused or
contributed to an accident resulting in death or injury to any person or
serious property damage;

(3)
Has been convicted of offenses against traffic regulations governing the
movement of vehicles, or found to have committed traffic infractions, with such
frequency as to indicate a disrespect for traffic laws or a disregard for the
safety of other persons on the highways;

(4)
Is incompetent to drive a motor vehicle under RCW 46.20.031(3);

(5)
Has failed to respond to a notice of traffic infraction, failed to appear at a
requested hearing, violated a written promise to appear in court, or has failed
to comply with the terms of a notice of traffic infraction or citation, as
provided in RCW 46.20.289;

(6)
Is subject to suspension under RCW 46.20.305;

(7)
Has committed one of the prohibited practices relating to drivers' licenses
defined in RCW ((46.20.336)) 46.20.0921; ((or))

(8)
Has been certified by the department of social and health services as a person
who is not in compliance with a child support order or a residential or
visitation order as provided in RCW 74.20A.320; or

(9)
Has committed an infraction under RCW 46.55.105.

Sec.
4. RCW
46.20.311 and 1998 c 212 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
The department shall not suspend a driver's license or privilege to drive a
motor vehicle on the public highways for a fixed period of more than one year,
except as specifically permitted under RCW 46.20.342 or other provision of
law. Except for a suspension under RCW 46.20.289, 46.20.291(5), or 74.20A.320,
whenever the license or driving privilege of any person is suspended by reason
of a conviction, a finding that a traffic infraction has been committed,
pursuant to chapter 46.29 RCW, or pursuant to RCW 46.20.291 or 46.20.308, the
suspension shall remain in effect until the person gives and thereafter
maintains proof of financial responsibility for the future as provided in
chapter 46.29 RCW. If the suspension is the result of a violation of RCW
46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the department shall determine the person's eligibility
for licensing based upon the reports provided by the alcoholism agency or
probation department designated under RCW 46.61.5056 and shall deny
reinstatement until enrollment and participation in an approved program has
been established and the person is otherwise qualified. Whenever the license
or driving privilege of any person is suspended as a result of certification of
noncompliance with a child support order under chapter 74.20A RCW or a
residential or visitation order, the suspension shall remain in effect until
the person provides a release issued by the department of social and health
services stating that the person is in compliance with the order.

(b)(i)
The department shall not issue to the person a new, duplicate, or renewal
license until the person pays a reissue fee of twenty dollars.

(ii)
If the suspension is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504,
or is the result of administrative action under RCW 46.20.308, the reissue fee
shall be one hundred fifty dollars.

(2)(a)
Any person whose license or privilege to drive a motor vehicle on the public
highways has been revoked, unless the revocation was for a cause which has been
removed, is not entitled to have the license or privilege renewed or restored
until the person provides evidence from the court that all penalties have
been paid and restitution has been made, and: (i) After the expiration of
one year from the date the license or privilege to drive was revoked; (ii)
after the expiration of the applicable revocation period provided by RCW
46.20.3101 or 46.61.5055; (iii) after the expiration of two years for persons
convicted of vehicular homicide; or (iv) after the expiration of the applicable
revocation period provided by RCW 46.20.265.

(b)(i)
After the expiration of the appropriate period, the person may make application
for a new license as provided by law together with a reissue fee in the amount
of twenty dollars.

(ii)
If the revocation is the result of a violation of RCW 46.20.308, 46.61.502, or
46.61.504, the reissue fee shall be one hundred fifty dollars. If the
revocation is the result of a violation of RCW 46.61.502 or 46.61.504, the
department shall determine the person's eligibility for licensing based upon
the reports provided by the alcoholism agency or probation department
designated under RCW 46.61.5056 and shall deny reissuance of a license, permit,
or privilege to drive until enrollment and participation in an approved program
has been established and the person is otherwise qualified.

(c)
Except for a revocation under RCW 46.20.265, the department shall not then
issue a new license unless it is satisfied after investigation of the driving
ability of the person that it will be safe to grant the privilege of driving a
motor vehicle on the public highways, and until the person gives and thereafter
maintains proof of financial responsibility for the future as provided in
chapter 46.29 RCW. For a revocation under RCW 46.20.265, the department shall
not issue a new license unless it is satisfied after investigation of the
driving ability of the person that it will be safe to grant that person the
privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the public highways.

(3)(a)
Whenever the driver's license of any person is suspended pursuant to Article IV
of the nonresident violators compact or RCW 46.23.020 or 46.20.289 or
46.20.291(5), the department shall not issue to the person any new or renewal
license until the person pays a reissue fee of twenty dollars.

(b)
If the suspension is the result of a violation of the laws of this or any other
state, province, or other jurisdiction involving (i) the operation or physical
control of a motor vehicle upon the public highways while under the influence
of intoxicating liquor or drugs, or (ii) the refusal to submit to a chemical
test of the driver's blood alcohol content, the reissue fee shall be one
hundred fifty dollars.

Sec.
5. RCW
46.55.085 and 1993 c 121 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A law enforcement officer discovering an unauthorized vehicle left within a
highway right of way shall attach to the vehicle a readily visible notification
sticker. The sticker shall contain the following information:

(a)
The date and time the sticker was attached;

(b)
The identity of the officer;

(c)
A statement that if the vehicle is not removed within twenty-four hours from
the time the sticker is attached, the registered owner will have committed
the traffic infraction of littering--abandoned vehicle and the vehicle may
be taken into custody and stored at the owner's expense; and

(d)
The address and telephone number where additional information may be obtained.

(2)
If the vehicle has current Washington registration plates, the officer shall
check the records to learn the identity of the last owner of record. The
officer or his department shall make a reasonable effort to contact the owner
by telephone in order to give the owner the information on the notification
sticker.

(3)
If the vehicle is not removed within twenty-four hours from the time the
notification sticker is attached, the law enforcement officer may take custody
of the vehicle and provide for the vehicle's removal to a place of safety. A
vehicle that does not pose a safety hazard may remain on the roadside for more
than twenty-four hours if the owner or operator is unable to remove it from the
place where it is located and so notifies law enforcement officials and
requests assistance.

(4)
For the purposes of this section a place of safety includes the business
location of a registered tow truck operator.

Sec.
6. RCW
46.55.105 and 1999 c 86 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The abandonment of any vehicle creates a prima facie presumption that the last
registered owner of record is responsible for the abandonment and is liable for
costs incurred in removing, storing, and disposing of the abandoned vehicle,
less amounts realized at auction.

(2)
If an unauthorized vehicle is found abandoned under subsection (1) of this
section and removed at the direction of law enforcement, the last registered
owner of record is guilty of ((a)) the traffic infraction of
"littering‑-abandoned vehicle," unless the vehicle
is redeemed as provided in RCW 46.55.120 and the registered owner pays a
fine of fifty dollars. In addition to any other monetary penalty payable
under chapter 46.63 RCW, the court shall not consider all monetary penalties as
having been paid until the court is satisfied that the person found to have
committed the infraction has made restitution in the amount of the deficiency
remaining after disposal of the vehicle under RCW 46.55.140.

(3)
A vehicle theft report filed with a law enforcement agency relieves the last
registered owner of liability under subsection (2) of this section for failure
to redeem the vehicle. However, the last registered owner remains liable for
the costs incurred in removing, storing, and disposing of the abandoned vehicle
under subsection (1) of this section. Nothing in this section limits in any
way the registered owner's rights in a civil action or as restitution in a
criminal action against a person responsible for the theft of the vehicle.

(4)
Properly filing a report of sale or transfer regarding the vehicle involved in
accordance with RCW 46.12.101(1) relieves the last registered owner of
liability under subsections (1) and (2) of this section. If the date of sale
as indicated on the report of sale is on or before the date of impoundment, the
buyer identified on the latest properly filed report of sale with the
department is assumed liable for the costs incurred in removing, storing, and
disposing of the abandoned vehicle, less amounts realized at auction. If the
date of sale is after the date of impoundment, the previous registered owner is
assumed to be liable for such costs. A licensed vehicle dealer is not liable
under subsections (1) and (2) of this section if the dealer, as transferee or
assignee of the last registered owner of the vehicle involved, has complied
with the requirements of RCW 46.70.122 upon selling or otherwise disposing of
the vehicle, or if the dealer has timely filed a transitional ownership record
or report of sale under RCW 46.12.103. In that case the person to whom the
licensed vehicle dealer has sold or transferred the vehicle is assumed liable
for the costs incurred in removing, storing, and disposing of the abandoned
vehicle, less amounts realized at auction.

(5)
For the purposes of reporting notices of traffic infraction to the department
under RCW 46.20.270 and 46.52.101, and for purposes of reporting notices of
failure to appear, respond, or comply regarding a notice of traffic infraction
to the department under RCW 46.63.070(5), a traffic infraction under subsection
(2) of this section is not considered to be a standing, stopping, or parking
violation.

(6)
The finding that an infraction has been committed will result in suspension
of a person's driving privileges for ninety days and until all penalties have
been paid and restitution has been made.

(7)
A notice of infraction for a violation of this section may be filed with a
court of limited jurisdiction organized under Title 3, 35, or 35A RCW, or with
a violations bureau subject to the court's jurisdiction.

Sec.
7. RCW
46.55.110 and 1999 c 398 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
When an unauthorized vehicle is impounded, the impounding towing operator shall
notify the legal and registered owners of the impoundment of the unauthorized
vehicle and the owners of any other items of personal property registered or
titled with the department. The notification shall be sent by first-class mail
within twenty-four hours after the impoundment to the last known registered and
legal owners of the vehicle, and the owners of any other items of personal
property registered or titled with the department, as provided by the law
enforcement agency, and shall inform the owners of the identity of the person
or agency authorizing the impound. The notification shall include the name of
the impounding tow firm, its address, and telephone number. The notice shall
also include the location, time of the impound, and by whose authority the
vehicle was impounded. The notice shall also include the written notice of the
right of redemption and opportunity for a hearing to contest the validity of
the impoundment pursuant to RCW 46.55.120.

(2)
In addition, if a suspended license impound has been ordered, the notice must
state the length of the impound, the requirement of the posting of a security
deposit to ensure payment of the costs of removal, towing, and storage,
notification that if the security deposit is not posted the vehicle will
immediately be processed and sold at auction as an abandoned vehicle, and the
requirements set out in RCW 46.55.120(1)(b) regarding the payment of the costs
of removal, towing, and storage as well as providing proof of satisfaction of
any penalties, fines, or forfeitures before redemption. The notice must also
state that the registered owner is ineligible to purchase the vehicle at the
abandoned vehicle auction, if held.

(3)
In the case of an abandoned vehicle, or other item of personal property registered
or titled with the department, within twenty-four hours after receiving
information on the owners from the department through the abandoned vehicle
report, the tow truck operator shall send by certified mail, with return
receipt requested, a notice of custody and sale to the legal and registered
owners and of the penalties for the traffic infraction littering‑-abandoned
vehicle.

(4)
If the date on which a notice required by subsection (3) of this section is to
be mailed falls upon a Saturday, Sunday, or a postal holiday, the notice may be
mailed on the next day that is neither a Saturday, Sunday, nor a postal
holiday.

(5) No notices need be sent to the legal or registered owners of an
impounded vehicle or other item of personal property registered or titled with
the department, if the vehicle or personal property has been redeemed.

Sec.
8. RCW
46.63.030 and 1995 c 219 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A law enforcement officer has the authority to issue a notice of traffic
infraction:

(a)
When the infraction is committed in the officer's presence;

(b)
When the officer is acting upon the request of a law enforcement officer in
whose presence the traffic infraction was committed; or

(c)
If an officer investigating at the scene of a motor vehicle accident has
reasonable cause to believe that the driver of a motor vehicle involved in the
accident has committed a traffic infraction.

(2)
A court may issue a notice of traffic infraction upon receipt of a written
statement of the officer that there is reasonable cause to believe that an
infraction was committed.

(3)
If any motor vehicle without a driver is found parked, standing, or stopped in
violation of this title or an equivalent administrative regulation or local
law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution, the officer finding the vehicle
shall take its registration number and may take any other information displayed
on the vehicle which may identify its user, and shall conspicuously affix to
the vehicle a notice of traffic infraction. In the case of an abandoned
vehicle, the notice must be entitled "Littering‑-Abandoned
Vehicle," and give notice of the monetary penalty.

(4)
In the case of failure to redeem an abandoned vehicle under RCW 46.55.120, upon
receiving a complaint by a registered tow truck operator that has incurred
costs in removing, storing, and disposing of an abandoned vehicle, an officer
of the law enforcement agency responsible for directing the removal of the
vehicle shall send a notice of infraction by certified mail to the last known
address of the registered owner of the vehicle. The officer shall append to
the notice of infraction, on a form prescribed by the department of licensing,
a notice indicating the amount of costs incurred as a result of removing,
storing, and disposing of the abandoned vehicle, less any amount realized at
auction, and a statement that monetary penalties for the infraction will not be
considered as having been paid until the monetary penalty payable under this
chapter has been paid and the court is satisfied that the person has made
restitution in the amount of the deficiency remaining after disposal of the
vehicle.

Sec.
9. RCW
46.63.060 and 1993 c 501 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A notice of traffic infraction represents a determination that an infraction
has been committed. The determination will be final unless contested as
provided in this chapter.

(2)
The form for the notice of traffic infraction shall be prescribed by rule of
the supreme court and shall include the following:

(a)
A statement that the notice represents a determination that a traffic
infraction has been committed by the person named in the notice and that the
determination shall be final unless contested as provided in this chapter;

(b)
A statement that a traffic infraction is a noncriminal offense for which
imprisonment may not be imposed as a sanction; that the penalty for a traffic
infraction may include sanctions against the person's driver's license
including suspension, revocation, or denial; that the penalty for a traffic
infraction related to standing, stopping, or parking may include nonrenewal of
the vehicle license;

(c)
A statement of the specific traffic infraction for which the notice was issued;

(d)
A statement of the monetary penalty established for the traffic infraction;

(e)
A statement of the options provided in this chapter for responding to the
notice and the procedures necessary to exercise these options;

(f)
A statement that at any hearing to contest the determination the state has the
burden of proving, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the infraction was
committed; and that the person may subpoena witnesses including the officer who
issued the notice of infraction;

(g)
A statement that at any hearing requested for the purpose of explaining
mitigating circumstances surrounding the commission of the infraction the
person will be deemed to have committed the infraction and may not subpoena
witnesses;

(h)
A statement that the person must respond to the notice as provided in this
chapter within fifteen days or the person's driver's license or driving
privilege will be suspended by the department until any penalties imposed
pursuant to this chapter have been satisfied;

(i)
A statement that failure to appear at a hearing requested for the purpose of
contesting the determination or for the purpose of explaining mitigating
circumstances will result in the suspension of the person's driver's license or
driving privilege((,)); or in the case of a standing, stopping,
or parking violation, refusal of the department to renew the vehicle license,
until any penalties imposed pursuant to this chapter have been satisfied; or
in the case of littering--abandoned vehicle, suspension of the person's
driver's license, until any penalties imposed under this chapter have been
satisfied;

(j)
A statement, which the person shall sign, that the person promises to respond
to the notice of infraction in one of the ways provided in this chapter.

Sec.
10. RCW
46.63.110 and 1997 c 331 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person found to have committed a traffic infraction shall be assessed a
monetary penalty. No penalty may exceed two hundred and fifty dollars for each
offense unless authorized by this chapter or title. For the commission of
littering‑-abandoned vehicle under RCW 46.55.105(2), the department shall
suspend the driver's license of the person for ninety days or until all
penalties are paid, whichever is later.

(2)
The supreme court shall prescribe by rule a schedule of monetary penalties for
designated traffic infractions. This rule shall also specify the conditions
under which local courts may exercise discretion in assessing fines and
penalties for traffic infractions. The legislature respectfully requests the
supreme court to adjust this schedule every two years for inflation.

(3)
There shall be a penalty of twenty-five dollars for failure to respond to a
notice of traffic infraction except where the infraction relates to parking as
defined by local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution or failure to pay a
monetary penalty imposed pursuant to this chapter. A local legislative body
may set a monetary penalty not to exceed twenty-five dollars for failure to
respond to a notice of traffic infraction relating to parking as defined by local
law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution. The local court, whether a
municipal, police, or district court, shall impose the monetary penalty set by
the local legislative body.

(4)
Monetary penalties provided for in chapter 46.70 RCW which are civil in nature
and penalties which may be assessed for violations of chapter 46.44 RCW
relating to size, weight, and load of motor vehicles are not subject to the
limitation on the amount of monetary penalties which may be imposed pursuant to
this chapter.

(5)
Whenever a monetary penalty is imposed by a court under this chapter it is
immediately payable. If the person is unable to pay at that time the court
may, in its discretion, grant an extension of the period in which the penalty
may be paid. If the penalty is not paid on or before the time established for
payment the court shall notify the department of the failure to pay the
penalty, and the department shall suspend the person's driver's license or
driving privilege until the penalty has been paid and the penalty provided in
subsection (3) of this section has been paid.

(6)
In addition to any other penalties imposed under this section and not subject
to the limitation of subsection (1) of this section, a person found to have
committed a traffic infraction shall be assessed a fee of five dollars per
infraction. Under no circumstances shall this fee be reduced or waived.
Revenue from this fee shall be forwarded to the state treasurer for deposit in
the emergency medical services and trauma care system trust account under RCW
70.168.040.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 11. The
legislature respectfully requests the Washington state supreme court to set the
fine for littering--abandoned vehicle at two hundred fifty dollars.

---
END ---