BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 9.46 RCW to read as follows:

Any
city, town, city-county, or county may exercise its planning and zoning powers
with respect to social card game activities licensed by the commission under this
chapter, including the power to adopt moratoria and interim zoning controls
under RCW 36.70A.390.

Sec.
2. RCW
9.46.295 and 1974 ex.s. c 155 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Any license to engage in any of the gambling activities authorized
by this chapter ((as now exists or as hereafter amended,)) and issued
under the authority thereof shall be legal authority to engage in the gambling
activities for which issued throughout the incorporated and unincorporated area
of any county, except that a city located therein with respect to that city, or
a county with respect to all areas within that county except for such cities,
may absolutely prohibit or exercise its planning and zoning powers in
accordance with section 1 of this act, but may not change the scope of
license, any or all of the gambling activities for which the license was
issued.

---
END ---