BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to the conditions in subsections (2) through (5) of this section, the
legislative body of a county or city, through ordinance or resolution, may
impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The
tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected on
the sale of or charge made for new construction, as defined in subsection (6)
of this section. The tax shall be deducted from the amount of tax otherwise
required to be collected or paid over to the department of revenue under
chapter 82.08 RCW.

(2)
The rate of tax shall not exceed one percent of the selling price.

(3)
Any county ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to this section shall
contain a provision allowing as a credit against the county tax the full amount
of any city tax imposed pursuant to this section upon the same taxable event.

(4)
A county or city may impose the tax authorized under subsection (1) of this
section if it meets the requirements of (a) through (e) or (f) of this subsection:

(a)
The county or city is planning under RCW 36.70A.040;

(b)
The county or city is in compliance with all deadlines under chapter 36.70A
RCW;

(c)
The county or city is not under an order of noncompliance issued by a growth
management hearings board;

(d)
The county or city has adopted a capital facilities plan under chapter 36.70A
RCW that is consistent with its comprehensive plan; and

(e)
The county or city files with the department a statement signed by the chief
executive officer of the county or city that it meets the requirements set
forth in (a) through (d) of this subsection; or

(f)
The county or city is not planning under RCW 36.70A.040, but has adopted a
capital facilities plan that substantially meets the requirements of RCW
36.70A.070(3), and the county or city files with the department a statement
signed by the chief executive officer of the county or city that its capital
facilities plan substantially meets the requirements of RCW 36.70A.070(3).

(5)
Moneys collected under this section: (a) Must be used for the purpose of
implementing a county's or city's capital facilities plan; and (b) shall be
used to supplement, and not supplant, any other funds expended by a county or
city for the same purpose.

(6)
For purposes of this section, "new construction" means (a) the
constructing, repairing, decorating, or improving of existing structures for
the purpose of increasing the floor space by twenty-five percent or more; or
(b) the constructing of new structures.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---