BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
purpose of this act is to encourage owners of land to make available land and
water areas to the public for recreational purposes by limiting their liability
toward persons entering thereon who may be injured or otherwise damaged by the
acts or omissions of persons entering thereon.

Sec.
2. RCW
4.24.210 and 1997 c 26 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
((Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section,)) Any
public or private landowners or others in lawful possession and control of any
lands whether designated resource, rural, or urban, or water areas or channels
and lands adjacent to such areas or channels, who allow members of the public
to use them for the purposes of outdoor recreation, which term includes, but is
not limited to, the cutting, gathering, and removing of firewood by private
persons for their personal use without purchasing the firewood from the
landowner, hunting, fishing, camping, picnicking, swimming, hiking, bicycling,
skateboarding or other nonmotorized wheel-based activities, hanggliding,
paragliding, the riding of horses or other animals, clam digging, pleasure
driving of off-road vehicles, snowmobiles, and other vehicles, boating, nature
study, winter or water sports, viewing or enjoying historical, archaeological,
scenic, or scientific sites, without charging a fee of any kind therefor, shall
not be liable for unintentional injuries to such users, nor shall they be
liable for injuries to third parties caused by such users.

(2)
((Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section,)) Any
public or private landowner or others in lawful possession and control of any
lands whether rural or urban, or water areas or channels and lands adjacent to
such areas or channels, who offer or allow such land to be used for purposes of
a fish or wildlife cooperative project, or allow access to such land for
cleanup of litter or other solid waste, shall not be liable for unintentional
injuries to any volunteer group or to any other users, nor shall they be
liable for injuries to third parties caused by such users.

(3)
Any public or private landowner, or others in lawful possession and control of
the land, may charge an administrative fee of up to twenty-five dollars for the
cutting, gathering, and removing of firewood from the land. ((Nothing in
this section shall prevent the liability of such a landowner or others in
lawful possession and control for injuries sustained to users by reason of a
known dangerous artificial latent condition for which warning signs have not
been conspicuously posted.)) Nothing in RCW 4.24.200 and ((4.24.210))
this section limits or expands in any way the doctrine of attractive
nuisance. Usage by members of the public, volunteer groups, or other users is
permissive and does not support any claim of adverse possession,
prescriptive easement, or other right to use or occupy such property.

(4) For purposes of this section, a license or permit issued for
state-wide use under authority of chapter ((43.51)) 79A.05 RCW,
Title 75, or Title 77 RCW is not a fee.

---
END ---