BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
21.20.005 and 1998 c 15 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
definitions set forth in this section shall apply throughout this chapter,
unless the context otherwise requires:

(1)
"Director" means the director of financial institutions of this
state.

(2)
"Salesperson" means any individual other than a broker-dealer who
represents a broker-dealer or issuer in effecting or attempting to effect sales
of securities. "Salesperson" does not include an individual who
represents an issuer in (a) effecting a transaction in a security exempted by
RCW 21.20.310 (1), (2), (3), (4), (9), (10), (11), (12), or (13), (b) effecting
transactions exempted by RCW 21.20.320 unless otherwise expressly required by
the terms of the exemption, or (c) effecting transactions with existing
employees, partners, or directors of the issuer if no commission or other
remuneration is paid or given directly or indirectly for soliciting any person
in this state.

(3)
"Broker-dealer" means any person engaged in the business of effecting
transactions in securities for the account of others or for that person's own
account. "Broker-dealer" does not include (a) a salesperson, issuer,
bank, savings institution, or trust company, (b) a person who has no place of
business in this state if the person effects transactions in this state
exclusively with or through the issuers of the securities involved in the
transactions, other broker-dealers, or banks, savings institutions, trust
companies, insurance companies, investment companies as defined in the
investment company act of 1940, pension or profit-sharing trusts, or other
financial institutions or institutional buyers, whether acting for themselves
or as trustees, or (c) a person who has no place of business in this state if
during any period of twelve consecutive months that person does not direct more
than fifteen offers to sell or to buy into or make more than five sales in this
state in any manner to persons other than those specified in (b) of this
subsection.

(4)
"Guaranteed" means guaranteed as to payment of principal, interest,
or dividends.

(5)
"Full business day" means all calendar days, excluding therefrom
Saturdays, Sundays, and all legal holidays, as defined by statute.

(6)
"Investment adviser" means any person who, for compensation, engages
in the business of advising others, either directly or through publications or
writings, as to the value of securities or as to the advisability of investing
in, purchasing, or selling securities, or who, for compensation and as a part of
a regular business, issues or promulgates analyses or reports concerning
securities. "Investment adviser" also includes financial planners
and other persons who, as an integral component of other financially related
services, (a) provide the foregoing investment advisory services to others for
compensation as part of a business or (b) hold themselves out as providing the
foregoing investment advisory services to others for compensation. Investment
adviser shall also include any person who holds himself or herself out
as a financial planner. However, a person who is a member of an
organization using "financial planner" or "financial
adviser" in its name and who merely cites such membership shall not, by
those acts alone, be deemed an investment adviser or to be holding himself or
herself out as an investment adviser or representing that he or she is an
investment adviser.

"Investment
adviser" does not include (a) a bank, savings institution, or trust
company, (b) a lawyer, accountant, certified public accountant licensed under
chapter 18.04 RCW, engineer, or teacher whose performance of these services is
solely incidental to the practice of his or her profession, (c) a broker-dealer
or its salesperson whose performance of these services is solely incidental to
the conduct of its business as a broker-dealer and who receives no special
compensation for them, (d) a publisher of any bona fide newspaper, news
magazine, news column, newsletter, or business or financial publication or
service, whether communicated in hard copy form, by electronic means, or
otherwise, that does not consist of the rendering of advice on the basis of the
specific investment situation of each client, (e) a radio or television
station, (f) a person whose advice, analyses, or reports relate only to
securities exempted by RCW 21.20.310(1), (g) an investment adviser
representative, or (h) such other persons not within the intent of this
paragraph as the director may by rule or order designate.

(7)
"Issuer" means any person who issues or proposes to issue any
security, except that with respect to certificates of deposit, voting trust
certificates, or collateral-trust certificates, or with respect to certificates
of interest or shares in an unincorporated investment trust not having a board
of directors (or persons performing similar functions) or of the fixed,
restricted management, or unit type; the term "issuer" means the
person or persons performing the acts and assuming the duties of depositor or
manager pursuant to the provisions of the trust or other agreement or
instrument under which the security is issued.

(8)
"Nonissuer" means not directly or indirectly for the benefit of the
issuer.

(9)
"Person" means an individual, a corporation, a partnership, a limited
liability company, a limited liability partnership, an association, a
joint-stock company, a trust where the interest of the beneficiaries are
evidenced by a security, an unincorporated organization, a government, or a
political subdivision of a government.

(10)
"Sale" or "sell" includes every contract of sale of,
contract to sell, or disposition of, a security or interest in a security for
value. "Offer" or "offer to sell" includes every attempt
or offer to dispose of, or solicitation of an offer to buy, a security or
interest in a security for value.

Any
security given or delivered with, or as a bonus on account of, any purchase of
securities or any other thing is considered to constitute part of the subject
of the purchase and to have been offered and sold for value. A purported gift
of assessable stock is considered to involve an offer and sale. Every sale or
offer of a warrant or right to purchase or subscribe to another security of the
same or another issuer, as well as every sale or offer of a security which
gives the holder a present or future right or privilege to convert into another
security of the same or another issuer, is considered to include an offer of
the other security.

(11)
"Securities Act of 1933," "Securities Exchange Act of
1934," "Public Utility Holding Company Act of 1935,"
"Investment Company Act of 1940," and "Investment Advisers Act
of 1940" means the federal statutes of those names as amended before or
after June 10, 1959.

(12)
"Security" means any note; stock; treasury stock; bond; debenture;
evidence of indebtedness; certificate of interest or participation in any
profit-sharing agreement; collateral-trust certificate; preorganization
certificate or subscription; transferable share; investment contract;
investment of money or other consideration in the risk capital of a venture
with the expectation of some valuable benefit to the investor where the
investor does not receive the right to exercise practical and actual control
over the managerial decisions of the venture; voting-trust certificate; certificate
of deposit for a security; certificate of interest or participation in an oil,
gas or mining title or lease or in payments out of production under such a
title or lease; charitable gift annuity; any put, call, straddle, option, or
privilege on any security, certificate of deposit, or group or index of
securities, including any interest therein or based on the value thereof; or
any put, call, straddle, option, or privilege entered into on a national
securities exchange relating to foreign currency; or, in general, any interest
or instrument commonly known as a "security," or any certificate of
interest or participation in, temporary or interim certificate for, receipt
for, guarantee of, or warrant or right to subscribe to or purchase, any of the
foregoing; or any sale of or indenture, bond or contract for the conveyance of
land or any interest therein where such land is situated outside of the state
of Washington and such sale or its offering is not conducted by a real estate
broker licensed by the state of Washington. "Security" does not
include any insurance or endowment policy or annuity contract under which an
insurance company promises to pay money either in a lump sum or periodically
for life or some other specified period.

(13)
"State" means any state, territory, or possession of the United
States, as well as the District of Columbia and Puerto Rico.

(14)
"Investment adviser representative" means any partner, officer,
director, or a person occupying similar status or performing similar functions,
or other individual, who is employed by or associated with an investment
adviser, and who does any of the following:

(a)
Makes any recommendations or otherwise renders advice regarding securities;

(b)
Manages accounts or portfolios of clients;

(c)
Determines which recommendation or advice regarding securities should be given;

(d)
Solicits, offers, or negotiates for the sale of or sells investment advisory
services; or

(e)
Supervises employees who perform any of the functions under (a) through (d) of
this subsection.

(15)
"Relatives," as used in RCW 21.20.310(11) includes:

(a)
A member's spouse;

(b)
Parents of the member or the member's spouse;

(c)
Grandparents of the member or the member's spouse;

(d)
Natural or adopted children of the member or the member's spouse;

(e)
Aunts and uncles of the member or the member's spouse; and

(f)
First cousins of the member or the member's spouse.

(16)
"Customer" means a person other than a broker-dealer or investment adviser.

(17)
"Federal covered security" means any security defined as a covered
security in the Securities Act of 1933.

(18) "Federal covered adviser" means any person
registered as an investment adviser under section 203 of the Investment
Advisers Act of 1940.

---
END ---