BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. In
1996, the legislature acknowledged the danger of the public not knowing that
vehicles they own may have been rebuilt from salvage. The 1996 legislature
responded by mandating that vehicles rebuilt from salvage be branded with words
indicating that the vehicle had been totaled. While the branding program has
been effective, the law only impacts vehicles that have been declared totaled
inside Washington state. It is the intent of this act to extend the law to
vehicles that have been declared totaled outside of the state.

Sec.
2. RCW
46.12.005 and 1996 c 26 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
The words "delivery," "notice," "send," and
"security interest" have the same meaning as these terms are defined
in RCW 62A.1-201; the word "secured party" has the same meaning as
this term is defined in RCW 62A.9‑105.

(2)
A vehicle is a "salvage vehicle" ((means)) when:

(a)
A vehicle's ((whose)) certificate of ownership has been
surrendered to the department under RCW 46.12.070 due to the vehicle's
destruction or declaration as a total loss; or ((for which))

(b)
There is documentation indicating that the vehicle has been declared
salvage or has been damaged to the extent that the owner, an insurer, or other
person acting on behalf of the owner, has determined that the cost of parts and
labor plus the salvage value has made it uneconomical to repair the vehicle;
or

(c)
A vehicle has been previously declared a total loss as reported to the National
Insurance Crime Bureau, or an equivalent organization.

The term does not include a motor vehicle having a model year
designation of a calendar year that is at least six years before the calendar
year in which the vehicle was wrecked, destroyed, or damaged.

Sec.
3. RCW
46.12.075 and 1996 c 26 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Effective January 1, 1997, the department shall issue a unique certificate of
ownership and certificate of license registration, as required by chapter 46.16
RCW, for vehicles that are rebuilt after becoming a salvage vehicle, as
defined in RCW 46.12.005. Each certificate shall conspicuously display
across its front, a word indicating that the vehicle was rebuilt.

(2)
((Beginning January 1, 1997,)) Upon inspection of a ((salvage))
vehicle ((that has been rebuilt)), as required under RCW
46.12.030, if the state patrol determines that a vehicle has been
declared salvage as defined in RCW 46.12.005, the state patrol shall
securely affix or inscribe a marking at the driver's door latch pillar
indicating that the vehicle has previously been destroyed or declared a total
loss.

(3)
It is a class C felony for a person to remove the marking prescribed in
subsection (2) of this section.

(4)
((The department may adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.))
No later than July 1, 2002, the department and the state patrol shall each
deliver a report to the legislature. The report shall contain:

(a)
The number of vehicles inspected which were declared to be salvage under RCW
46.12.005 between January 1, 2001, and December 31, 2001, and whether the
designation is the result of RCW 46.12.005(2) (a) through (c); and

(b) The amount of vehicles that were defined as salvage under
RCW 46.12.005 between January 1, 2001, and December 31, 2001, but did not have
their title or vehicle branded as required under this section, and the reasons
why.

---
END ---