BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the marine waters located in and adjacent to the Strait
of Juan de Fuca between the state of Washington and Canada are some of the most
pristine and diverse marine waters in the United States and include
irreplaceable natural resources. The area includes such national treasures as
the Olympic Coast National Marine Sanctuary and the Olympic National Park, is
home to five federally recognized Indian reservations, holds one of the largest
sea bird colonies on the west coast, and is the habitat for several threatened
and endangered species.

The
legislature also finds that the marine waters are of great environmental and
economic importance to not only the state of Washington, but also to the people
of Canada and the United States. The legislature also recognizes that the
marine vessel traffic on these waters presents risks of accidents and oil
spills which would be devastating to the environment and to the economy.

The
legislature recognizes that transits by commercial vessels through the Strait
of Juan de Fuca are projected by the United States coast guard to increase by
fifty percent from the year 2000 to the year 2025. Volumes of petroleum
movement, including cargo and bunker oil, are conservatively projected to
increase by nearly four billion gallons by the year 2025. The legislature also
recognizes that this growth in commercial vessel transits, including increased
transits by high risk or priority 1 cargo vessels, and petroleum movement
constitute a significant and growing increase in projected oil spill frequency.

The
legislature finds that the 1975 legislative requirement of tug escorts for all
laden, single-hull tank vessels operating east of New Dungeness, as augmented
by federal law, has greatly improved navigational safety in the eastern Strait
of Juan de Fuca and Rosario Strait. Extension of this proven safety measure to
other vessel traffic that impacts tank vessel navigational safety and westward
to the mouth of the strait by locating a dedicated oil spill prevention tug or
implementation of other effective safety measures will similarly improve
navigational safety and correct a growing safety gap in the marine navigation
system.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
legislature recognizes the important work currently underway by the north Puget
Sound oil spill risk management panel that has been convened by the department
of ecology and the United States coast guard. The panel is presently reviewing
options such as oil spill prevention tugs stationed at the mouth of the Strait
of Juan de Fuca, escort tugs for tank vessels, traffic management options, and
other measures designed to reduce the risk of powered groundings, drift
groundings, and collisions. One of the options considered by the panel is the
use of the international tug of opportunity system, known as ITOS, however, the
United States coast guard study of this system indicates that the ITOS will
only be effective in reducing drift groundings, and will only reduce that risk
by approximately three percent in the year 2000 and six percent by 2025. The
legislature finds that the ITOS, although it offers some benefit, does not
adequately reduce the risks of oil spills.

The
legislature intends that the provisions contained in this act supplement the
panel's efforts and specifically accommodate that process by providing
additional data to the panel as provided in section 3 of this act, by including
rule-making authority for the department of ecology to provide a method of
implementing the panel's recommendations and other safety measures, and by
allowing the department of ecology to waive the provisions of RCW 88.16.190 (1)
through (3) (as recodified by this act) for a portion of the Strait of Juan de
Fuca based upon a consensus decision by the panel.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
department of ecology shall make, or otherwise acquire, monetary estimates of
the natural resource damages, urban and rural economic impacts, and private
property damages associated with potential oil spills in the Strait of Juan de
Fuca and associated waterways included in the north Puget Sound oil spill risk
management panel's study area.

The
estimates shall include multiple scenarios that include variations of spill
sites, volume of oil discharges, tidal movement, and weather conditions. The
study scenarios must include the following variables: (1) Spill sites for the
westward end of the Strait of Juan de Fuca and the northern end of Haro Strait;
and (2) crude oil or bunker fuel oil volumes of ten thousand gallons, one
hundred thousand gallons, one million gallons, and ten million gallons. In
establishing the scenarios, the department shall consult with representatives
of the national oceanic and atmospheric administration and may consult with
other entities with scientific expertise.

The
preliminary estimates shall be submitted to the governor, the north Puget Sound
oil spill risk management panel, and the legislature by May 15, 2000. Final
estimates shall be completed and submitted to the governor and legislature by
December 15, 2000.

Sec.
4. RCW
88.16.190 and 1994 c 52 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any ((oil tanker, whether enrolled or registered,)) tank vessel
of greater than ((one hundred and twenty-five)) forty thousand
deadweight tons shall ((be prohibited from proceeding)) not proceed
beyond a point, within the internal waters of the state of Washington and
the United States, east of a line extending from ((Discovery Island
light south to New Dungeness light)) Bonilla Point light on Vancouver
Island to Cape Flattery light on Tatoosh Island, unless the conditions set in
subsection (2) of this section are met.

(2)
((An oil tanker, whether enrolled or registered,)) A tank vessel
of greater than forty ((to one hundred and twenty-five)) thousand
deadweight tons may proceed beyond the points enumerated in subsection (1) of
this section if ((such tanker)) the tank vessel is in ballast or
under the escort of a tug or tugs with the ability to control the movement of
or stop the tank vessel. A tank vessel is exempt from this section if it
possesses all of the following standard safety features:

(a)
((Shaft horsepower in the ratio of one horsepower to each two and one-half
deadweight tons; and)) A bow thruster with an independent power source;

(b)
Two rudders with separate steering systems;

(c)
An independent source of electrical power for each rudder and screw
combination;

(d)
Twin screws with an independent power source to each; ((and

(c))) (e)
Double ((bottoms, underneath)) hulls for all oil, fuel,
and liquid cargo compartments; and

(((d)
Two radars in working order and operating, one of which must be collision
avoidance radar; and

(e))) (f)
Such other navigational position location systems as may be prescribed from
time to time by the ((board of pilotage commissioners:

PROVIDED,
That, if such forty to one hundred and twenty-five thousand deadweight ton
tanker is in ballast or is under escort of a tug or tugs with an aggregate
shaft horsepower equivalent to five percent of the deadweight tons of that
tanker, subsection (2) of this section shall not apply: PROVIDED FURTHER, That
additional tug shaft horsepower equivalencies may be required under certain
conditions as established by rule and regulation of the Washington utilities
and transportation commission pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW: PROVIDED FURTHER,
That tanker)) department.

(3)
High risk or priority 1 covered vessels, as evaluated by the United States
coast guard or the department, shall not proceed beyond a point, within the
internal waters of the state of Washington and the United States, east of a
line extending from Bonilla Point light on Vancouver Island to Cape Flattery
light on Tatoosh Island, unless the covered vessel is under the escort of a tug
or tugs with the ability to control the movement of or stop the covered vessel.

(4)
The provisions of subsections (1) through (3) of this section do not apply west
of a line extending from Discovery Island light south to New Dungeness light
if:

(a)
An oil spill prevention tug, of size and capacity as determined by the
department, is in continuous operation at or near the westward end of the
Strait of Juan de Fuca. The oil spill prevention tug shall, to the extent the
department determines feasible, include among its operations the escorting of
laden tank vessels through the traffic convergence zone where tank vessels must
cross the paths of other vessels entering or exiting established vessel traffic
lanes;

(b)
The provisions are waived by the department following adoption of rules that
substantially reduce the risks of drift grounding, powered grounding, and
collision, for tank vessels and covered vessels;

(c)
The department has waived provisions for an individual tank vessel that has
additional safety features that supersede the features in subsection (2) of
this section, based on the department's own risk assessment; or

(d)
The department has waived the provisions in an emergency situation.

(5)
A tank vessel assigned a deadweight of less than forty thousand deadweight
tons at the time of construction or reconstruction as reported in Lloyd's
Register of Ships is not subject to the provisions of RCW 88.16.170 through
88.16.190 (as recodified by this act).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 88.46 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall adopt a rule waiving the provisions of RCW 88.16.190 (1)
through (3) (as recodified by this act) for the area west of a line extending
from Discovery Island light south to New Dungeness light if there is a
consensus decision made on or before June 30, 2000, by the north Puget Sound
oil spill risk management panel, that the provisions are not necessary. For
the purposes of this section, "consensus decision" means not more
than two votes less than unanimous.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
following sections are each recodified as new sections in chapter 88.46 RCW:

RCW
88.16.170

RCW
88.16.190

RCW
88.16.195

RCW
88.16.200

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. Sections
4 through 6 of this act take effect September 30, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 1 through 3 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and
its existing public institutions, and take effect immediately.

---
END ---