BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

Counties
that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 may designate national
historic towns that may constitute urban growth outside of urban growth areas
as limited by this section. A national historic town means a town or district
that has been designated a national historic landmark by the United States
secretary of the interior based on its significant historic urban features, and
which historically contained a mix of residential and commercial or industrial
uses.

A
national historic town may be designated under this chapter by a county only
if:

(1)
The comprehensive plan specifically identifies policies to guide the
preservation, redevelopment, infill, and development of the town;

(2)
The comprehensive plan and development regulations specify a mix of
residential, commercial, industrial, tourism-recreation, waterfront, or other
historical uses, along with other uses, infrastructure, and services which
promote the economic sustainability of the town and its historic character. To
promote historic preservation, redevelopment, and an economically sustainable
community, the town also may include the types of uses that existed at times
during its history and is not limited to those present at the time of the
historic designation. Portions of the town may include urban densities if they
reflect density patterns that existed at times during its history;

(3)
The boundaries of the town include all of the area contained in the national
historic landmark designation, along with any additional limited areas
determined by the county as appropriate for transitional uses and buffering.
Provisions for transitional uses and buffering must be compatible with the
town's historic character and must protect the rural character under the
requirements of this chapter within and beyond the additional limited areas,
including assuring visual compatibility. The comprehensive plan and
development regulations must include restrictions that preclude new urban or
suburban land uses in the vicinity of the town, except in areas otherwise
designated for urban growth under this chapter;

(4)
The development regulations provide for architectural controls and review
procedures applicable to the rehabilitation, redevelopment, infill, or new
development to promote the historic character of the town;

(5)
The county finds that the national historic town is consistent with the
development regulations established for critical areas; and

(6)
On-site and off-site infrastructure impacts are fully considered and mitigated
concurrent with development.

A county may allocate a portion of its twenty-year population
projection, prepared by the office of financial management, to the national
historic town corresponding to the projected number of permanent residents
within the national historic town.

---
END ---