BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.33.051 and 1984 c 204 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislative body of any county may impose a tax upon every person engaging
in the county in business as a harvester effective October 1, 1984. The tax
shall be equal to the stumpage value of timber harvested from privately or
publicly owned land multiplied by a rate of four percent.

(2)
Before the effective date of any ordinance imposing a tax under this section,
the county shall contract with the department of revenue for administration and
collection of the tax. The tax collected by the department of revenue under
this section shall be deposited by the department in the timber tax
distribution account. Moneys in the account may be spent only for
distributions to counties under RCW 84.33.081 and, after appropriation by the
legislature, for the activities undertaken by the department of revenue
relating to the collection and administration of the taxes imposed under this
section and RCW 84.33.041. Appropriations are not required for distributions
to counties under RCW 84.33.081.

Sec.
2. RCW
84.33.035 and 1995 c 165 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Agricultural methods" means the cultivation of trees that are grown
on land prepared by intensive cultivation and tilling, such as irrigating,
plowing, or turning over the soil, and on which all unwanted plant growth is
controlled continuously for the exclusive purpose of raising trees such as
Christmas trees and short-rotation hardwoods.

(2)
"Composite property tax rate" for a county means the total amount of
property taxes levied upon forest lands by all taxing districts in the county
other than the state, divided by the total assessed value of all forest land in
the county.

(3)
"Forest land" means forest land which is classified or designated
forest land under this chapter.

(4)
"Harvested" means the time when in the ordinary course of business
the quantity of timber by species is first definitely determined. The amount
harvested shall be determined by the Scribner Decimal C Scale or other
prevalent measuring practice adjusted to arrive at substantially equivalent
measurements, as approved by the department of revenue.

(5)
"Harvester" means every person who from the person's own land or from
the land of another under a right or license granted by lease or contract,
either directly or by contracting with others for the necessary labor or
mechanical services, fells, cuts, or takes timber for sale or for commercial or
industrial use: PROVIDED, That whenever the United States or any instrumentality
thereof, the state, including its departments and institutions and political
subdivisions, or any municipal corporation therein so fells, cuts, or takes
timber for sale or for commercial or industrial use, the harvester is the first
person other than the United States or any instrumentality thereof, the state,
including its departments and institutions and political subdivisions, or any
municipal corporation therein, who acquires title to or a possessory interest
in such timber. The term "harvester" does not include persons
performing under contract the necessary labor or mechanical services for a
harvester.

(6)
"Short-rotation hardwoods" means hardwood trees, such as but not
limited to hybrid cottonwoods, cultivated by agricultural methods in growing
cycles shorter than ten years.

(7)
"Stumpage value of timber" means the appropriate stumpage value shown
on tables prepared by the department of revenue under RCW 84.33.091, provided
that for timber harvested from public land and sold under a competitive bidding
process, stumpage value shall mean that actual amount paid to the seller in
cash or other consideration. Whenever payment for the stumpage includes
considerations other than cash, the value shall be the fair market value of the
other consideration, provided that if the other consideration is permanent
roads, the value of the roads shall be the appraised value as appraised by the
seller.

(8)
"Timber" means forest trees, standing or down, on privately or
publicly owned land, and except as provided in RCW 84.33.170 includes Christmas
trees and short-rotation hardwoods.

(9)
"Timber assessed value" for a county means a value, calculated by the
department of revenue before October 1 of each year, equal to the total
stumpage value of timber harvested from privately and publicly owned
land in the county during the most recent four calendar quarters for which the
information is available multiplied by a ratio. The numerator of the ratio is
the rate of tax imposed by the county under RCW 84.33.051 for the year of the
calculation. The denominator of the ratio is the composite property tax rate
for the county for taxes due in the year of the calculation, expressed as a
percentage of assessed value.

(10)
"Timber assessed value" for a taxing district means the timber
assessed value for the county multiplied by a ratio. The numerator of the
ratio is the total assessed value of forest land in the taxing district. The
denominator is the total assessed value of forest land in the county. As used
in this section, "assessed value of forest land" means the assessed
value of forest land for taxes due in the year the timber assessed value for
the county is calculated.

Sec.
3. RCW
84.33.040 and 1984 c 204 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

Timber
on privately owned land or ((federally)) publicly owned land
shall be exempt from ad valorem taxation.

Sec.
4. RCW
84.36.473 and 1998 c 311 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
to RCW 84.36.477.

(1)
"Business inventories" means all livestock and means personal
property not under lease or rental, acquired or produced solely for the purpose
of sale or lease, or for the purpose of consuming such property in producing
for sale or lease a new article of tangible personal property of which such
property becomes an ingredient or component. Business inventories shall not
mean personal property acquired or produced for the purpose of lease or rental
if such property was leased or rented at any time during the calendar year
immediately preceding the year of assessment and was not thereafter
remanufactured, nor shall it include property held within the normal course of
business for lease or rental for periods of less than thirty days. It shall
not include agricultural or horticultural property fully or partially exempt
under RCW 84.36.470 ((or timber which is standing on public land and which
is sold under a contract entered into after August 1, 1982)). It shall
include inventories of finished goods and work in process. For purposes of
this section, "remanufacturing" shall mean restoration of property to
essentially original condition, but shall not mean normal maintenance or repairs.

(2)
"Successor" shall have the meaning given to it in RCW 82.04.180.

Sec.
5. RCW
84.33.077 and 1984 c 204 s 21 are each amended to read as follows:

The
amount of any property taxes paid on timber standing on public land shall be
allowed as a credit against any tax imposed with respect to the business of
harvesting timber from publicly owned land under RCW 84.33.041 or 84.33.051.
However, the amount of credit allowed shall not exceed the amount of excise tax
due in respect to the business of harvesting timber from publicly owned land.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
Section 3 of this act applies to taxes levied for collection in 2001 and
thereafter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---