BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 16.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature finds that exotic and wild animals used for entertainment and
amusement pose public safety hazards, as evidenced by attacks and rampages,
which injure or kill both staff and bystanders. Conditions for such animal
acts generally deprive the animals of social, physical, and behavioral
requirements inherent to their species. Inadequate care and abusive training
methods are often documented. Additionally, exotic animal acts present a
distorted image of wildlife to the public, disallowing any natural behaviors
because of the confinement and training.

The
purpose of this section is to prohibit traveling displays in Washington state,
with exemptions for facilities accredited by the American zoo and aquarium
association and the association of sanctuaries, for the filming of movies, and
for all domestic animal events and institutions.

(2)
The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.

(a)
"Display" includes, but is not limited to, the undertaking of any
exhibition, act, circus, ride, carnival, parade, race, photographic
opportunity, or similar undertaking in which animals are required to perform
tricks, fight, or participate as accompaniments in performances for the
amusement or benefit for an audience.

(b)
"Wild or exotic animal" means any or all of the following orders and
families, whether bred in the wild or in captivity, and also any or all of
their hybrids with domestic species:

(i)
Nonhuman primates and prosimians (chimpanzees, monkeys);

(ii)
Felidae, except domesticated cats;

(iii)
Canidae, except domesticated dogs;

(iv)
Ursidae (all bears);

(v)
Proboscidae (elephants);

(vi)
Cetacea (whales, dolphins, porpoises);

(vii)
Crocodilia (alligators, crocodiles);

(viii)
Marsupialia (kangaroos, opossums);

(ix)
Reptilia (snakes) over eight feet in length and snakes and reptiles of venomous
variety;

(x)
Perissodactyla (hippopotamuses);

(xi)
Hyaenidae;

(xii)
Mustelidae (skunks, weasels, otters, badgers);

(xiii)
Procyonidae (raccoons, coatis);

(xiv)
Endentata (anteaters, sloth, armadillos); and

(xv)
Viverridae (mongoose, civets, genets).

(c)
"Domestic animal" means any animal commonly kept by inhabitants of
Washington state as a pet or for companionship:

(i)
Domesticated dogs;

(ii)
Domesticated cats;

(iii)
Domesticated ungulates (horses, mules, donkeys, goats, sheep, pigs, and cattle)
or any domestic animal designated by rule under the livestock protection act;

(iv)
Domestic llamas and alpacas;

(v)
Birds; and

(vi)
Ferrets.

(d)
"Person" means any individual, partnership, corporation,
organization, trade or professional association, joint venture, association,
trust, estate, or any other legal entity and any officer, member, shareholder,
director, employee, agent, or representative of same.

(3)
No person may display or sponsor a display of wild or exotic animals within the
state of Washington.

(4)
A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

(5)
The provisions of this section do not apply to the display of wild or exotic
animals:

(a)
At institutions accredited by the American zoo and aquarium association;

(b)
At institutions accredited by the association of sanctuaries;

(c)
On the premises of a television or movie studio setting where such animals are
being kept temporarily for the purposes of film production; and

(d) At nonaccredited permanent facilities in existence before
January 1, 2000, that do not transport animals other than for veterinary care.

---
END ---