BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 26.44 RCW to read as follows:

For
the purposes of case planning and obtaining medical care for a child placed
under the care and supervision of the department under an order entered in a
proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW, a child in need of services proceeding
under chapter 13.32A RCW, or a voluntary placement agreement executed by the
child's parent, legal custodian, or legal guardian, the department shall have
access to all medical, mental health, counseling, and educational records for
the child from birth to present to the same extent that the child's parent,
legal custodian, or legal guardian has access to such records. No provider may
be held responsible for information subsequently used or disseminated by the department
as stated in RCW 26.44.030 (7) or (9).

Sec.
2. RCW
26.44.030 and 1999 c 267 s 20 and 1999 c 176 s 30 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
When any practitioner, county coroner or medical examiner, law enforcement
officer, professional school personnel, registered or licensed nurse, social
service counselor, psychologist, pharmacist, licensed or certified child care
providers or their employees, employee of the department, juvenile probation
officer, placement and liaison specialist, responsible living skills program
staff, HOPE center staff, or state family and children's ombudsman or any
volunteer in the ombudsman's office has reasonable cause to believe that a
child has suffered abuse or neglect, he or she shall report such incident, or
cause a report to be made, to the proper law enforcement agency or to the
department as provided in RCW 26.44.040.

(b)
The reporting requirement also applies to department of corrections personnel
who, in the course of their employment, observe offenders or the children with
whom the offenders are in contact. If, as a result of observations or
information received in the course of his or her employment, any department of
corrections personnel has reasonable cause to believe that a child has suffered
abuse or neglect, he or she shall report the incident, or cause a report to be
made, to the proper law enforcement agency or to the department as provided in
RCW 26.44.040.

(c)
The reporting requirement shall also apply to any adult who has reasonable
cause to believe that a child who resides with them, has suffered severe abuse,
and is able or capable of making a report. For the purposes of this
subsection, "severe abuse" means any of the following: Any single
act of abuse that causes physical trauma of sufficient severity that, if left
untreated, could cause death; any single act of sexual abuse that causes
significant bleeding, deep bruising, or significant external or internal
swelling; or more than one act of physical abuse, each of which causes
bleeding, deep bruising, significant external or internal swelling, bone
fracture, or unconsciousness.

(d)
The report must be made at the first opportunity, but in no case longer than
forty-eight hours after there is reasonable cause to believe that the child has
suffered abuse or neglect. The report must include the identity of the accused
if known.

(2)
The reporting requirement of subsection (1) of this section does not apply to
the discovery of abuse or neglect that occurred during childhood if it is
discovered after the child has become an adult. However, if there is
reasonable cause to believe other children are or may be at risk of abuse or
neglect by the accused, the reporting requirement of subsection (1) of this
section does apply.

(3)
Any other person who has reasonable cause to believe that a child has suffered
abuse or neglect may report such incident to the proper law enforcement agency
or to the department of social and health services as provided in RCW 26.44.040.

(4)
The department, upon receiving a report of an incident of alleged abuse or
neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child who has died or has had
physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him or her other than by accidental
means or who has been subjected to alleged sexual abuse, shall report such
incident to the proper law enforcement agency. In emergency cases, where the
child's welfare is endangered, the department shall notify the proper law
enforcement agency within twenty-four hours after a report is received by the
department. In all other cases, the department shall notify the law
enforcement agency within seventy-two hours after a report is received by the
department. If the department makes an oral report, a written report must also
be made to the proper law enforcement agency within five days thereafter.

(5)
Any law enforcement agency receiving a report of an incident of alleged abuse
or neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child who has died or has had
physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him or her other than by accidental
means, or who has been subjected to alleged sexual abuse, shall report such
incident in writing as provided in RCW 26.44.040 to the proper county
prosecutor or city attorney for appropriate action whenever the law enforcement
agency's investigation reveals that a crime may have been committed. The law
enforcement agency shall also notify the department of all reports received and
the law enforcement agency's disposition of them. In emergency cases, where
the child's welfare is endangered, the law enforcement agency shall notify the
department within twenty-four hours. In all other cases, the law enforcement
agency shall notify the department within seventy-two hours after a report is
received by the law enforcement agency.

(6)
Any county prosecutor or city attorney receiving a report under subsection (5)
of this section shall notify the victim, any persons the victim requests, and
the local office of the department, of the decision to charge or decline to
charge a crime, within five days of making the decision.

(7)
The department may conduct ongoing case planning and consultation with those
persons or agencies required to report under this section, with consultants
designated by the department, and with designated representatives of Washington
Indian tribes if the client information exchanged is pertinent to cases
currently receiving child protective services. Upon request, the department
shall conduct such planning and consultation with those persons required to
report under this section if the department determines it is in the best
interests of the child. Information considered privileged by statute and not
directly related to reports required by this section must not be divulged without
a valid written waiver of the privilege.

(8)
Any case referred to the department by a physician licensed under chapter 18.57
or 18.71 RCW on the basis of an expert medical opinion that child abuse,
neglect, or sexual assault has occurred and that the child's safety will be
seriously endangered if returned home, the department shall file a dependency
petition unless a second licensed physician of the parents' choice believes
that such expert medical opinion is incorrect. If the parents fail to designate
a second physician, the department may make the selection. If a physician
finds that a child has suffered abuse or neglect but that such abuse or neglect
does not constitute imminent danger to the child's health or safety, and the
department agrees with the physician's assessment, the child may be left in the
parents' home while the department proceeds with reasonable efforts to remedy
parenting deficiencies.

(9)
Persons or agencies exchanging information under subsection (7) of this section
shall not further disseminate or release the information except as authorized
by state or federal statute. Violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor.

(10)
Upon receiving reports of alleged abuse or neglect, the department or law
enforcement agency may interview children. The interviews may be conducted on
school premises, at day-care facilities, at the child's home, or at other
suitable locations outside of the presence of parents. Parental notification
of the interview must occur at the earliest possible point in the investigation
that will not jeopardize the safety or protection of the child or the course of
the investigation. Prior to commencing the interview the department or law
enforcement agency shall determine whether the child wishes a third party to be
present for the interview and, if so, shall make reasonable efforts to
accommodate the child's wishes. Unless the child objects, the department or
law enforcement agency shall make reasonable efforts to include a third party
in any interview so long as the presence of the third party will not jeopardize
the course of the investigation.

(11)
Upon receiving a report of alleged child abuse and neglect, the department or
investigating law enforcement agency shall have access to all ((relevant))
records birth to present of the child in the possession of mandated
reporters and their employees.

(12)
The department shall maintain investigation records and conduct timely and
periodic reviews of all cases constituting abuse and neglect. The department
shall maintain a log of screened-out nonabusive cases.

(13)
The department shall use a risk assessment process when investigating alleged
child abuse and neglect referrals. The department shall present the risk
factors at all hearings in which the placement of a dependent child is an
issue. Substance abuse must be a risk factor. The department shall, within
funds appropriated for this purpose, offer enhanced community-based services to
persons who are determined not to require further state intervention.

The
department shall provide annual reports to the legislature on the effectiveness
of the risk assessment process.

(14)
Upon receipt of a report of alleged abuse or neglect the law enforcement agency
may arrange to interview the person making the report and any collateral
sources to determine if any malice is involved in the reporting.

(15)
The department shall make reasonable efforts to learn the name, address, and
telephone number of each person making a report of abuse or neglect under this
section. The department shall provide assurances of appropriate
confidentiality of the identification of persons reporting under this section.
If the department is unable to learn the information required under this
subsection, the department shall only investigate cases in which: (a) The
department believes there is a serious threat of substantial harm to the child;
(b) the report indicates conduct involving a criminal offense that has, or is
about to occur, in which the child is the victim; or (c) the department has, after
investigation, a report of abuse or neglect that has been founded with regard
to a member of the household within three years of receipt of the referral.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW to read as follows:

For
the purposes of case planning and obtaining medical care for a child placed
under the care and supervision of the department under an order entered in a
proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW, a child in need of services proceeding
under chapter 13.32A RCW, or a voluntary placement agreement executed by the
child's parent, legal custodian, or legal guardian, the department shall have
access to all medical, mental health, counseling, and educational records for
the child from birth to present. No provider may be held responsible for
information subsequently used or disseminated by the department as stated in
RCW 26.44.030 (7) or (9).

Sec.
4. RCW
71.34.200 and 1985 c 354 s 18 are each amended to read as follows:

The
fact of admission and all information obtained through treatment under this
chapter is confidential. Confidential information may be disclosed only:

(1)
In communications between mental health professionals to meet the requirements
of this chapter, in the provision of services to the minor, or in making
appropriate referrals;

(2)
((In the course of guardianship or dependency proceedings)) To the
department, the court, or the minor's guardian ad litem when the department is
responsible for the care and supervision of the minor under an order entered in
a proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW, a child in need of services proceeding
under chapter 13.32A RCW, or a voluntary placement agreement executed by the
child's parent, legal custodian, or legal guardian. No provider may be held
responsible for information subsequently used or disseminated by the department
as stated in RCW 26.44.030 (7) or (9);

(3)
To persons with medical responsibility for the minor's care;

(4)
To the minor, the minor's parent, and the minor's attorney, subject to RCW
13.50.100;

(5)
When the minor or the minor's parent ((designate[s])) designates
in writing the persons to whom information or records may be released;

(6)
To the extent necessary to make a claim for financial aid, insurance, or
medical assistance to which the minor may be entitled or for the collection of
fees or costs due to providers for services rendered under this chapter;

(7)
To the courts as necessary to the administration of this chapter;

(8)
To law enforcement officers or public health officers as necessary to carry out
the responsibilities of their office. However, only the fact and date of
admission, and the date of discharge, the name and address of the treatment
provider, if any, and the last known address shall be disclosed upon request;

(9)
To law enforcement officers, public health officers, relatives, and other
governmental law enforcement agencies, if a minor has escaped from custody, disappeared
from an evaluation and treatment facility, violated conditions of a less
restrictive treatment order, or failed to return from an authorized leave, and
then only such information as may be necessary to provide for public safety or
to assist in the apprehension of the minor. The officers are obligated to keep
the information confidential in accordance with this chapter;

(10)
To the secretary for assistance in data collection and program evaluation or
research, provided that the secretary adopts rules for the conduct of such
evaluation and research. The rules shall include, but need not be limited to,
the requirement that all evaluators and researchers sign an oath of
confidentiality substantially as follows:

"As
a condition of conducting evaluation or research concerning persons who have
received services from (fill in the facility, agency, or person) I,
. . . . . ., agree not to divulge, publish, or
otherwise make known to unauthorized persons or the public any information
obtained in the course of such evaluation or research regarding minors who have
received services in a manner such that the minor is identifiable.

I
recognize that unauthorized release of confidential information may subject me
to civil liability under state law.

/s/............................... "

(11)
To appropriate law enforcement agencies and to a person, when the identity of
the person is known to the public or private agency, whose health and safety
has been threatened, or who is known to have been repeatedly harassed, by the
patient. The person may designate a representative to receive the disclosure.
The disclosure shall be made by the professional person in charge of the public
or private agency or his or her designee and shall include the dates of
admission, discharge, authorized or unauthorized absence from the agency's
facility, and only such other information that is pertinent to the threat or
harassment. The decision to disclose or not shall not result in civil
liability for the agency or its employees so long as the decision was reached
in good faith and without gross negligence;

(12)
To a minor's next of kin, attorney, guardian, or conservator, if any, the
information that the minor is presently in the facility or that the minor is
seriously physically ill and a statement evaluating the mental and physical
condition of the minor as well as a statement of the probable duration of the
minor's confinement;

(13)
Upon the death of a minor, to the minor's next of kin;

(14)
To a facility in which the minor resides or will reside.

This
section shall not be construed to prohibit the compilation and publication of
statistical data for use by government or researchers under standards,
including standards to assure maintenance of confidentiality, set forth by the
secretary. The fact of admission and all information obtained pursuant to this
chapter are not admissible as evidence in any legal proceeding outside this
chapter, except guardianship or dependency, without the written consent of the
minor or the minor's parent.

Sec.
5. RCW
70.02.050 and 1998 c 158 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A health care provider may disclose health care information about a patient
without the patient's authorization to the extent a recipient needs to know the
information, if the disclosure is:

(a)
To a person who the provider reasonably believes is providing health care to
the patient;

(b)
To any other person who requires health care information for health care
education, or to provide planning, quality assurance, peer review, or
administrative, legal, financial, or actuarial services to the health care
provider; or for assisting the health care provider in the delivery of health
care and the health care provider reasonably believes that the person:

(i)
Will not use or disclose the health care information for any other purpose; and

(ii)
Will take appropriate steps to protect the health care information;

(c)
To any other health care provider reasonably believed to have previously
provided health care to the patient, to the extent necessary to provide health
care to the patient, unless the patient has instructed the health care provider
in writing not to make the disclosure;

(d)
To any person if the health care provider reasonably believes that disclosure
will avoid or minimize an imminent danger to the health or safety of the
patient or any other individual, however there is no obligation under this
chapter on the part of the provider to so disclose;

(e)
Oral, and made to immediate family members of the patient, or any other
individual with whom the patient is known to have a close personal
relationship, if made in accordance with good medical or other professional
practice, unless the patient has instructed the health care provider in writing
not to make the disclosure;

(f)
To a health care provider who is the successor in interest to the health care
provider maintaining the health care information;

(g)
For use in a research project that an institutional review board has
determined:

(i)
Is of sufficient importance to outweigh the intrusion into the privacy of the
patient that would result from the disclosure;

(ii)
Is impracticable without the use or disclosure of the health care information
in individually identifiable form;

(iii)
Contains reasonable safeguards to protect the information from redisclosure;

(iv)
Contains reasonable safeguards to protect against identifying, directly or
indirectly, any patient in any report of the research project; and

(v)
Contains procedures to remove or destroy at the earliest opportunity,
consistent with the purposes of the project, information that would enable the
patient to be identified, unless an institutional review board authorizes
retention of identifying information for purposes of another research project;

(h)
To a person who obtains information for purposes of an audit, if that person
agrees in writing to:

(i)
Remove or destroy, at the earliest opportunity consistent with the purpose of
the audit, information that would enable the patient to be identified; and

(ii)
Not to disclose the information further, except to accomplish the audit or
report unlawful or improper conduct involving fraud in payment for health care
by a health care provider or patient, or other unlawful conduct by the health
care provider;

(i)
To an official of a penal or other custodial institution in which the patient
is detained;

(j)
To provide directory information, unless the patient has instructed the health
care provider not to make the disclosure;

(k)
In the case of a hospital or health care provider to provide, in cases reported
by fire, police, sheriff, or other public authority, name, residence, sex, age,
occupation, condition, diagnosis, or extent and location of injuries as
determined by a physician, and whether the patient was conscious when admitted.

(2)
A health care provider shall disclose health care information about a patient
without the patient's authorization if the disclosure is:

(a)
To federal, state, or local public health authorities, to the extent the health
care provider is required by law to report health care information; when needed
to determine compliance with state or federal licensure, certification or
registration rules or laws; or when needed to protect the public health;

(b)
To federal, state, or local law enforcement authorities to the extent the
health care provider is required by law;

(c)
To county coroners and medical examiners for the investigations of deaths;

(d)
Pursuant to compulsory process in accordance with RCW 70.02.060.

(3)
A health care provider shall disclose health care information about a minor
patient without the minor patient's authorization to the department of social
and health services, the court, or the minor's court-appointed guardian ad
litem when the department is responsible for the care and supervision of the
minor under an order entered in a proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW, a child
in need of services proceeding under chapter 13.32A RCW, or a voluntary
placement agreement executed by the child's parent, legal custodian, or legal
guardian. No provider may be held responsible for information subsequently
used or disseminated by the department as stated in RCW 26.44.030 (7) or (9).

(4) All state or local agencies obtaining patient health
care information pursuant to this section shall adopt rules establishing their
record acquisition, retention, and security policies that are consistent with
this chapter.

---
END ---