BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
intent of this act is to protect the health and safety of the citizens of the
state of Washington and the quality of the state's environment by developing
and implementing environmental and public safety measures applicable to persons
transporting hazardous liquids and gas by pipeline within the state of
Washington. The legislature finds that public safety and the environment may
best be protected by adopting standards that are equal to, or more stringent
than, those adopted by the federal government, so long as they do not
impermissibly interfere with interstate commerce.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Dangerous release" means a release of hazardous liquid that poses a
clear and immediate danger to life or health, threatens a significant loss of
property, or threatens significant environmental damages.

(2)
"Department" means the department of ecology.

(3)
"Failsafe system" means a nonelectronic or mechanically based system
that prevents a pipeline from exceeding its maximum operating pressure in the
event of a failure of the primary or electronic system designed for this
purpose.

(4)
"Gas" has the meaning given to it in 49 C.F.R. Part 192.

(5)
"Hazardous liquid" means: (a) Petroleum, petroleum products, or
anhydrous ammonia as those terms are defined in 49 C.F.R. Part 195 in effect
March 1, 1998; and (b) carbon dioxide. The department by rule may incorporate
by reference other substances designated as hazardous by the secretary of
transportation under 49 U.S.C. Sec. 60101(a)(4).

(6)
"Local government" means a subdivision of the state or a city or
town.

(7)
"Person" means an individual, partnership, franchise holder,
association, corporation, a state, a city, a county, or any subdivision or
instrumentality of a state, and its employees, agents, or legal
representatives.

(8)
"Pipeline" or "pipeline system" means all parts of a
pipeline facility through which a hazardous liquid or carbon dioxide moves in
transportation, including, but not limited to, line pipe, valves, and other
appurtenances connected to line pipe, pumping units, fabricated assemblies
associated with pumping units, metering and delivery stations and fabricated
assemblies therein, and breakout tanks.

(9)
"Pipeline company" means a person or entity constructing, owning, or
operating a pipeline for transporting hazardous liquid or gas.

(10)
"Process safety management systems" means management systems that
include coordinated and interdisciplinary evaluations of the effect of
significant changes to a pipeline system before such changes are implemented.

(11)
"Release" means a spilling, leaking, pumping, pouring, emitting,
emptying, discharging, injecting, leaching, dumping, disposing, flowing, or any
other uncontrolled escape of a hazardous liquid or gas from a pipeline.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The department shall have charge for the state of the administration and enforcement
of all laws related to hazardous liquid pipeline safety. To the extent not
expressly prohibited by federal law, the department shall develop and implement
a comprehensive program of pipeline safety.

(2)
The department shall adopt rules for pipeline safety standards for hazardous
liquid pipeline transportation that:

(a)
Require pipeline companies to design, construct, and maintain their pipeline
facilities so they are safe and efficient;

(b)
Require pipeline companies to rapidly locate and isolate all releases from
hazardous liquid pipelines, including:

(i)
Installation of remote control shut-off valves at a distance of no less than
four to ten miles in urban areas and twenty to sixty miles in rural areas,
depending on the type and density of development, the presence of
environmentally sensitive areas, and the application of appropriate engineering
standards. The installation of remote valves shall include design features and
safety procedures to minimize risks associated with valve malfunctions;

(ii)
Installation of remotely monitored pressure gauges and meters at each pump
station and remote valve location; and

(iii)
Emergency response procedures, combined with training, for shutting down pumps,
locating leaks and spills, and shutting appropriate valves as rapidly as
possible;

(c)
Require the training and certification of personnel who operate hazardous
liquid pipelines and the associated systems; and

(d)
Require hazardous liquid pipeline companies to submit operations safety plans
once every five years and provide annual plan updates that identify plan
implementation progress, as well as any amendments to the plan made necessary
by changes to the pipeline system or its operation.

(3)
The department shall approve operations safety plans if they have been deemed
fit for service. A plan shall be deemed fit for service when it provides for
pipelines that are designed, developed, constructed, operated, and periodically
modified to provide the highest practicable level of public safety. Pipeline
operations safety plans shall include:

(a)
A schedule of inspection and testing within the pipeline distribution system
of:

(i)
All mechanical components;

(ii)
All electronic components; and

(iii)
The structural integrity of all pipelines as determined through pressure
testing and internal inspection tool surveys;

(b)
Failsafe systems;

(c)
Process safety management principles; and

(d)
Emergency management training for pipeline operators.

(4)
The department shall coordinate information related to pipeline safety by
providing technical assistance to local planning and siting authorities and to
the energy facility site evaluation council established in chapter 80.50 RCW.

(5)
The department shall evaluate, and consider adopting, proposals developed by
the federal office of pipeline safety, the national transportation safety
board, and other agencies and organizations related to methods and technologies
for testing the integrity of pipeline structure, leak detection, and other
elements of pipeline operation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
department shall adopt rules aimed at the prevention of third-party excavation
damage to pipelines through the establishment and required use of a one-call
system. The department shall make available to municipal workers and
construction workers who are involved in construction work above or near
pipelines training on:

(1)
Prevention of damage to pipelines;

(2)
The danger involved if a pipeline is damaged;

(3)
The significance of pipeline damage that does not cause immediate failure; and

(4)
The importance of immediately reporting damage to a pipeline and the importance
of immediately repairing a damaged pipeline.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
department shall require hazardous liquid and gas pipeline companies to provide
accurate maps of their pipeline distribution networks to specifications
developed by the department. The specifications shall include depth
information. The department shall verify the accuracy of the maps, consolidate
the maps into a state-wide geographic information system, and fill any gaps for
which companies or local governments may have no information. The mapping
system shall be used in conjunction with the one-number locator service as
provided in chapter 19.122 RCW. The mapping system shall be compatible with
the United States department of transportation national pipeline mapping
program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
department shall, by June 30, 2002, develop and periodically update, for the
consideration by local governments:

(1)
A model ordinance that establishes setback and depth requirements for new
pipeline construction;

(2)
A model franchise agreement for jurisdictions through which a hazardous liquid
or gas pipeline is located; and

(3)
Protective standards applicable to existing and proposed pipelines in densely
populated areas and environmentally sensitive areas.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. (1)
The department shall seek and accept federal designation of the department's
inspectors as federal agents for the purposes of enforcement of the federal
hazardous liquid pipeline safety act (49 U.S.C. Sec. 60101 et seq.), and
federal rules adopted to implement that act, as they exist as of the effective
date of this act. The department shall establish and submit to the United
States secretary of transportation an inspection program that complies with
requirements for delegated interstate agent inspection authority. To the
extent that federal delegation of interstate agent inspection authority
permits, the inspection program for interstate pipelines and liquified natural
gas facilities must be the same as the inspection program for intrastate
pipelines and facilities. If the secretary of transportation delegates
inspection authority to the state as provided in this subsection, the
department, at a minimum, shall do the following to carry out the delegated
federal authority:

(a)
Inspect hazardous liquid pipelines periodically as specified in the inspection
program;

(b)
Collect inspection fees;

(c)
Order and oversee the testing of hazardous liquid pipelines as authorized by
federal law and regulation; and

(d)
File reports with the United States secretary of transportation as required to
maintain the delegated inspection authority.

(2)
The department shall also seek federal authority to adopt safety standards
related to the monitoring and testing of interstate hazardous liquid pipelines.

(3)
Upon designation under subsection (1) of this section or under a grant of
authority under subsection (2) of this section, to the extent authorized by
federal law, the department shall adopt rules for interstate pipelines that are
consistent with the state's laws and rules for intrastate hazardous liquid
pipelines.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. The
department shall inspect, as necessary, any record, map, or written procedure
required by federal law to be kept by a hazardous liquid pipeline company
concerning the reporting of dangerous releases, and the design, construction,
testing, or operation and maintenance of hazardous liquid pipelines.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. (1)
All powers, duties, and functions of the utilities and transportation
commission pertaining to hazardous liquid pipeline safety are transferred to
the department of ecology. All references to the commission or the utilities
and transportation commission in the Revised Code of Washington shall be
construed to mean the director or the department of ecology when referring to
the functions transferred in this section.

(2)(a)
All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material
in the possession of the utilities and transportation commission pertaining to
the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be delivered to the custody
of the department of ecology. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor
vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the utilities and
transportation commission in carrying out the powers, functions, and duties
transferred shall be made available to the department of ecology. All funds,
credits, or other assets held in connection with the powers, functions, and
duties transferred shall be assigned to the department of ecology.

(b)
Any appropriations made to the utilities and transportation commission for
carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on the effective
date of this section, be transferred and credited to the department of ecology.

(c)
Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books,
documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used
or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and
functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a
determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state
agencies concerned.

(3)
All employees of the utilities and transportation commission engaged in
performing the powers, functions, and duties transferred are transferred to the
jurisdiction of the department of ecology. All employees classified under
chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the department
of ecology to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly,
without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate
thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.

(4)
All rules and all pending business before the utilities and transportation
commission pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be
continued and acted upon by the department of ecology. All existing contracts
and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the
department of ecology.

(5)
The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the utilities
and transportation commission shall not affect the validity of any act
performed before the effective date of this section.

(6)
If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers
directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify
the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state
treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments
in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with
the certification.

(7)
Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any existing
collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing collective
bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or until the bargaining
unit has been modified by action of the personnel board as provided by law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. (1) A
pipeline safety advisory committee is established to advise the department, the
utilities and transportation commission, energy facility site evaluation
council, and other appropriate federal, state, and local government agencies
and officials on matters relating to pipeline safety, routing, construction,
operation, and maintenance. Members of the advisory committee shall be
appointed by the governor to staggered three-year terms and, at a minimum,
shall consist of representatives of local government, including elected
officials and the general public. The committee shall review and comment on
proposed rules and the operation of the state pipeline safety programs.

(2)
The advisory committee established in subsection (1) of this section
constitutes a class one group under RCW 43.03.220. Expenses for this group, as
well as staff support provided by the department, shall be funded through a
legislative appropriation to the department.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. A
new section is added to chapter 19.122 RCW to read as follows:

The
department of ecology, in consultation with the utilities and transportation
commission, shall establish a single state-wide toll-free telephone number to
be used for excavation notification and shall require the six one-call centers
that exist as of the effective date of this act to be reachable through that
number.

Sec.
12. RCW
19.122.050 and 1984 c 144 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever excavation work is to occur within twenty-five feet of a hazardous
liquid or gas pipeline, the state-wide one-call system established under
section 11 of this act shall be notified. In addition, if the excavation work
is to occur within five feet of a hazardous liquid or gas pipeline, the
pipeline company that owns or operates the pipeline shall be notified, and its
representative shall be on-site, prior to the start of excavation.

(2)
An excavator who, in the course of excavation, contacts or damages an
underground facility shall immediately notify the utility owning or
operating such facility and the ((one-number locator service)) state-wide
one-call system. If the damage causes an emergency condition, the
excavator causing the damage shall also immediately alert the
appropriate local public safety agencies and take all appropriate steps to
ensure the public safety. No damaged underground facility may be buried until it
is repaired or relocated.

(((2)))
(3) The owner of the underground facilities damaged shall arrange for
repairs or relocation as soon as is practical or may permit the excavator to do
necessary repairs or relocation at a mutually acceptable price.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. A
new section is added to chapter 48.48 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
In consultation with the emergency management program within the state military
department, the department of ecology, the utilities and transportation
commission, and local emergency services organizations, the chief of the
Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection or his or her
authorized deputy, shall:

(a)
Evaluate the preparedness of local first responders in meeting emergency
management demands under subsection (2) of this section; and

(b)
Conduct an assessment of the equipment needed by local first responders to meet
emergency management demands related to pipelines.

(2)
The chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire
protection or his or her deputy, shall develop curricula for training local
first responders to deal with pipeline accidents. The curricula shall be
developed in conjunction with pipeline companies and local first responders,
and shall include a timetable and costs for providing training as defined in
the curricula to all communities housing pipelines. The need for a training
program for regional incident management teams shall also be evaluated.

(3)
In consultation with other relevant agencies, the chief of the Washington state
patrol, through the director of fire protection or his or her deputy, shall
identify the need and means for achieving consistent application of the national
interagency incident management system.

(4)
For the purposes of this section, "local first responders" means
police, fire, emergency medical staff, and volunteers.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. (1) A
pipeline company that has been notified by an excavator pursuant to RCW
19.122.050 that excavation work will occur within five feet of a hazardous
liquid or gas pipeline shall ensure that the pipeline company's representative
is on-site during the excavation within the five foot zone. The pipeline
company has the discretion to require that the pipeline section in the vicinity
of the excavation is fully uncovered and examined for damage prior to being
reburied. If safety concerns exist, the pipeline company may elect, at the
excavator's expense, to conduct the uncovering of the pipeline.

(2)
Immediately upon receiving information of third-party damage to a pipeline
owned or operated by a pipeline company, that company shall terminate the flow
of hazardous liquid or gas in that pipeline until it has visually inspected the
pipeline. After visual inspection, a pipeline company shall determine whether
the pipeline section that has sustained third-party damage should be replaced
or repaired, or whether it is safe to resume pipeline operation. A record of
the company's inspection report and test results shall be provided to the
department within fourteen calendar days of the inspection.

(3)
Pipeline companies shall immediately notify local first responders and the
department of any dangerous release from a pipeline.

Sec.
15. RCW
19.122.070 and 1984 c 144 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any person who fails to notify the one-call system of excavation work that
is planned to occur within twenty-five feet of a hazardous liquid or gas
pipeline is subject to a civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars
for each violation.

(2)
Any person who fails to notify a pipeline company of excavation work that is
planned to occur within five feet of a hazardous liquid or gas pipeline, or
excavates within five feet of the pipeline without the pipeline company's
representative on-site, is subject to a civil penalty of not more than ten
thousand dollars for each violation.

(3)
Any person who violates any provision of this chapter, and which violation
results in damage to underground facilities, is subject to a civil penalty of
not more than ((one)) ten thousand dollars for each violation.

(4)
All civil penalties recovered ((in such actions)) under
subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section shall be deposited in the
general fund.

(((2)))
(5) Any person who willfully or maliciously damages or removes a marking
used to identify a hazardous liquid or gas pipeline, as defined in section 2 of
this act, is subject to a civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars
for each act.

(6)
Any excavator who willfully or maliciously damages a field-marked
underground facility shall be liable for treble the costs incurred in repairing
or relocating the facility. In those cases in which an excavator fails to
notify known underground facility owners or the one-number locator service, any
damage to the underground facility shall be deemed willful and malicious
and shall be subject to treble damages for costs incurred in repairing or
relocating the facility.

(((3)))
(7) This chapter does not affect any civil remedies for personal injury
or for property damage, including that to underground facilities, nor does this
chapter create any new civil remedies for such damage.

Sec.
16. RCW
47.44.150 and 1989 c 196 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In
any action for damages against the state of Washington, its agents,
contractors, or employees by reason of damages to a utility or other facility
located on a state highway, the damages are limited to the cost of repair of
the utility or facility and are recoverable only in those instances where the
utility or facility is authorized to be located on the state highway. However,
the state is subject to the penalties provided in RCW 19.122.070 (((1)))
(3) and (((2))) (6) only if the state has failed to give a
notice meeting the requirements of RCW 19.122.030 to utilities or facilities
that are authorized to be located on the state highway.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 17. (1) A
pipeline company that fails to comply with any provision of this chapter shall
be subject to civil penalties of not less than five thousand dollars.

(2)
A pipeline company that fails to report a dangerous release shall be guilty of
a class B felony punishable under RCW 9A.20.021 if:

(a)
The company knows or has reason to know that a dangerous release exists;

(b)
The company does not immediately report the release to the local first
responder; and

(c)
The dangerous release causes the death of, or bodily injury to, an individual.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 18. A
pipeline that is wholly located on the owner's property is exempt from the
provisions of this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 19. If
any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding
does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application
to the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by
the state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 20. This
act may be known and cited as the Washington state pipeline safety act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 21.
Sections 1 through 10, 14, and 17 through 20 of this act constitute a new
chapter in Title 70 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 22. RCW
81.88.040 (Intrastate pipeline safety
standards--Definitions--Rules--Violations) and 1998 c 123 s 1 are each
repealed.

---
END ---