BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.185A.010 and 1995 c 399 s 102 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Affordable housing" means residential housing for rental ((or private
individual ownership)) occupancy which, as long as the same is
occupied by low-income households, requires payment of monthly housing costs,
including utilities other than telephone, of no more than thirty percent of the
family's income. The department shall adopt policies for residential
home-ownership housing, occupied by low-income households, which specify the
percentage of family income that may be spent on monthly housing costs,
including utilities other than telephone, to qualify as affordable housing.

(2)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development.

(3)
"Director" means the director of the department of community, trade,
and economic development.

(4)
"First-time home buyer" means an individual or his or her spouse who
have not owned a home during the three-year period prior to purchase of a home.

(5)
"Low-income household" means a single person, family or unrelated
persons living together whose adjusted income is less than eighty percent of
the median family income, adjusted for household size, for the county where the
project is located.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---