BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.19.1919 and 1997 c 264 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

((Except
as provided in RCW 28A.335.180 and 43.19.1920,)) The division of
purchasing shall sell or exchange personal property belonging to the state for
which the agency, office, department, or educational institution having custody
thereof has no further use, at public or private sale, and cause the moneys
realized from the sale of any such property to be paid into the fund from which
such property was purchased or, if such fund no longer exists, into the state
general fund((: PROVIDED,)). This requirement is subject to the
following exceptions and limitations:

(1)
This section does not apply to property under RCW 27.53.045, 28A.335.180, or
43.19.1920;

(2)
Sales of capital assets may be made by the division of purchasing and a credit
established in central stores for future purchases of capital items as provided
for in RCW 43.19.190 through 43.19.1939((, as now or hereafter amended:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That));

(3)
Personal property, excess to a state agency, including educational
institutions, shall not be sold or disposed of prior to reasonable efforts by
the division of purchasing to determine if other state agencies have a
requirement for such personal property. Such determination shall follow
sufficient notice to all state agencies to allow adequate time for them to make
their needs known. Surplus items may be disposed of without prior notification
to state agencies if it is determined by the director of general administration
to be in the best interest of the state. The division of purchasing shall
maintain a record of disposed surplus property, including date and method of
disposal, identity of any recipient, and approximate value of the property((:
PROVIDED, FURTHER, That this section shall));

(4)
This section does not apply to personal property acquired by a state
organization under federal grants and contracts if in conflict with special
title provisions contained in such grants or contracts;

(5)
A state agency having a surplus personal property asset with a fair market
value of less than five hundred dollars may transfer the asset to another state
agency without charging fair market value. A state agency conducting this
action must maintain adequate records to comply with agency inventory
procedures and state audit requirements.

((This
section does not apply to property under RCW 27.53.045.))

Sec.
2. RCW
43.09.210 and 1965 c 8 s 43.09.210 are each amended to read as follows:

Separate
accounts shall be kept for every appropriation or fund of a taxing or
legislative body showing date and manner of each payment made therefrom, the
name, address, and vocation of each person, organization, corporation, or
association to whom paid, and for what purpose paid.

Separate
accounts shall be kept for each department, public improvement, undertaking,
institution, and public service industry under the jurisdiction of every taxing
body.

All
service rendered by, or property transferred from, one department, public
improvement, undertaking, institution, or public service industry to another,
shall be paid for at its true and full value by the department, public
improvement, undertaking, institution, or public service industry receiving the
same, and no department, public improvement, undertaking, institution, or
public service industry shall benefit in any financial manner whatever by an
appropriation or fund made for the support of another.

All
unexpended balances of appropriations shall be transferred to the fund from
which appropriated, whenever the account with an appropriation is closed.

This section does not apply to agency surplus personal property
handled under RCW 43.19.1919(5).

---
END ---