BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
66.28.040 and 1998 c 256 s 1 and 1998 c 126 s 12 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

Except as permitted by the board under RCW 66.20.010, no brewery,
distributor, distiller, winery, importer, rectifier, or other manufacturer of
liquor shall, within the state, give to any person any liquor; but nothing in
this section nor in RCW 66.28.010 shall prevent a brewery, distributor, winery,
distiller, or importer from furnishing samples of beer, wine, or spirituous
liquor to authorized licensees for the purpose of negotiating a sale, in
accordance with regulations adopted by the liquor control board, provided that
the samples are subject to taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.290 and 66.24.210, and in
the case of spirituous liquor, any product used for samples must be purchased
at retail from the board; nothing in this section shall prevent the furnishing
of samples of liquor to the board for the purpose of negotiating the sale of
liquor to the state liquor control board; nothing in this section shall prevent
a brewery, winery, distillery, or distributor from furnishing beer, wine, or
spirituous liquor for instructional purposes under RCW 66.28.150 and 66.28.155;
nothing in this section shall prevent a winery or distributor from furnishing
wine without charge, subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.210, to a
not-for-profit group organized and operated solely for the purpose of enology
or the study of viticulture which has been in existence for at least six months
and that uses wine so furnished solely for such educational purposes or a
domestic winery, or an out-of-state certificate of approval holder, from
furnishing wine without charge or a domestic brewery, or an out-of-state
certificate of approval holder, from furnishing beer without charge,
subject to the taxes imposed by RCW 66.24.210 or 66.24.290, to a nonprofit
charitable corporation or association exempt from taxation under section
501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)) for
use consistent with the purpose or purposes entitling it to such exemption;
nothing in this section shall prevent a brewer from serving beer without
charge, on the brewery premises; nothing in this section shall prevent
donations of wine for the purposes of RCW 66.12.180; and nothing in this
section shall prevent a domestic winery from serving wine without charge, on
the winery premises.

---
END ---