BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
36.70A.130 and 1997 c 429 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each comprehensive land use plan and development regulations shall be subject
to continuing review and evaluation by the county or city that adopted them.
Not later than September 1, 2002, and at least every five years thereafter, a
county or city shall take action to review ((and, if needed, revise))
its comprehensive land use plan and development regulations to ensure that the
plan and regulations are complying with the requirements of this chapter. If
needed, a county or city shall revise its comprehensive plan and development
regulations to ensure compliance with this chapter by September 1, 2003, and at
least every five years thereafter. However, by September 1, 2002, each county
and city shall both review and, if needed, revise its policies and regulations
to comply with RCW 36.70A.172(1). The review and evaluation required by
this subsection and subsection (2) of this section may be combined with
the review required by subsection (((3))) (4) of this section.

Any
amendment or revision to a comprehensive land use plan shall conform to this
chapter, and any change to development regulations shall be consistent with and
implement the comprehensive plan.

(2)
The term "take action to review" includes the submittal of an
evaluation by each county and city that is required to plan under RCW
36.70A.040 to the department indicating its review and evaluation process and a
schedule for considering amendments as required to ensure compliance with this
chapter. This evaluation may be combined with the requirements of RCW
36.70A.180(2).

(3)(a)
Each county and city shall establish and broadly disseminate to the public a
public participation program identifying procedures whereby proposed amendments
or revisions of the comprehensive plan are considered by the governing body of
the county or city no more frequently than once every year except that
amendments may be considered more frequently under the following circumstances:

(i)
The initial adoption of a subarea plan;

(ii)
The adoption or amendment of a shoreline master program under the procedures
set forth in chapter 90.58 RCW; and

(iii)
The amendment of the capital facilities element of a comprehensive plan that
occurs concurrently with the adoption or amendment of a county or city budget.

(b)
Except as otherwise provided in (a) of this subsection, all proposals shall be
considered by the governing body concurrently so the cumulative effect of the
various proposals can be ascertained. However, after appropriate public
participation a county or city may adopt amendments or revisions to its
comprehensive plan that conform with this chapter whenever an emergency exists
or to resolve an appeal of a comprehensive plan filed with a growth management
hearings board or with the court.

(((3)))
(4) Each county that designates urban growth areas under RCW 36.70A.110
shall review, at least every ten years, its designated urban growth area or
areas, and the densities permitted within both the incorporated and
unincorporated portions of each urban growth area. In conjunction with this
review by the county, each city located within an urban growth area shall
review the densities permitted within its boundaries, and the extent to which
the urban growth occurring within the county has located within each city and
the unincorporated portions of the urban growth areas. The county
comprehensive plan designating urban growth areas, and the densities permitted
in the urban growth areas by the comprehensive plans of the county and each
city located within the urban growth areas, shall be revised to accommodate the
urban growth projected to occur in the county for the succeeding twenty-year
period. The review required by this subsection may be combined with the review
and evaluation required by RCW 36.70A.215.

Sec.
2. RCW
90.58.080 and 1995 c 347 s 305 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
To assist local governments in aligning the related work of reviewing and
revising comprehensive plans and development regulations under section 1 of
this act, the department upon the request of a local government may grant an
extension of up to an additional twelve months to the deadlines provided in
this section for developing and amending the shoreline master program element
of comprehensive plans.

(2)
Local governments shall develop or amend((, within twenty-four months after
the adoption of guidelines as provided in RCW 90.58.060,)) a master program
for regulation of uses of the shorelines of the state consistent with the
required elements of the guidelines adopted by the department. Except as
provided in subsection (3) of this section as to state guidelines adopted
before December 31, 2000, master programs shall be reviewed for compliance with
the guidelines and adopted or amended as necessary within twenty-four months
after the adoption of guidelines as provided in RCW 90.58.060.

(3)
Consistent with the priority salmon recovery regions identified in the
state-wide strategy to recover salmon and population growth data provided by
the office of financial management, the following master program development or
amendment schedule applies for guidelines adopted by the department before
December 31, 2000:

(a)
For King, Snohomish, Pierce, Clark, and Kitsap counties and the cities and
towns therein with shorelines of the state, master programs shall be reviewed
for compliance with the guidelines and adopted or amended as necessary within
thirty-six months after the adoption of guidelines as provided in RCW
90.58.060;

(b)
For Thurston, Whatcom, Benton, Yakima, Skagit, Cowlitz, Clallam, Chelan, Mason,
and Jefferson counties and the cities and towns therein with shorelines of the
state, master programs shall be reviewed for compliance with the guidelines and
adopted or amended as necessary within forty-eight months after the adoption of
guidelines as provided in RCW 90.58.060;

(c)
For all other counties, cities, and towns with shorelines of the state, master
programs shall be reviewed for compliance with the guidelines and adopted or
amended as necessary within sixty months after the adoption of guidelines
amendments as provided in RCW 90.58.060.

Sec.
3. RCW
36.61.020 and 1987 c 432 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
To assist with development and implementation of elements of comprehensive
plans related to long-term lake management objectives in coordination with
revision of comprehensive plans, local governments may create lake management
districts for any needed period of time.

(2)
Any county may create lake management districts to finance the improvement and
maintenance of lakes located within or partially within the boundaries of the
county. All or a portion of a lake and the adjacent land areas may be included
within one or more lake management districts. More than one lake, or portions
of lakes, and the adjacent land areas may be included in a single lake
management district. ((A lake management district may be created for a
period of up to ten years.))

Special
assessments or rates and charges may be imposed on the property included within
a lake management district to finance lake improvement and maintenance
activities, including: (1) The control or removal of aquatic plants and
vegetation; (2) water quality; (3) the control of water levels; (4) storm water
diversion and treatment; (5) agricultural waste control; (6) studying lake
water quality problems and solutions; (7) cleaning and maintaining ditches and
streams entering or leaving the lake; and (8) the related administrative,
engineering, legal, and operational costs, including the costs of creating the
lake management district.

Special
assessments or rates and charges may be imposed annually on all the land in a
lake management district for the duration of the lake management district
without a related issuance of lake management district bonds or revenue bonds.
Special assessments also may be imposed in the manner of special assessments in
a local improvement district with each landowner being given the choice of
paying the entire special assessment in one payment, or to paying installments,
with lake management district bonds being issued to obtain moneys not derived
by the initial full payment of the special assessments, and the installments covering
all of the costs related to issuing, selling, and redeeming the lake management
district bonds.

Sec.
4. RCW
36.61.260 and 1985 c 398 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Counties may issue lake management district bonds in accordance with this
section. Lake management district bonds may be issued to obtain money
sufficient to cover that portion of the special assessments that are not paid
within the thirty-day period provided in RCW 36.61.190. ((The maximum term
of lake management district bonds shall be ten years.))

Whenever
lake management district bonds are proposed to be issued, the county
legislative authority shall create a special fund or funds for the lake
management district from which all or a portion of the costs of the lake
improvement and maintenance activities shall be paid. Lake management district
bonds shall not be issued in excess of the costs and expenses of the lake
improvement and maintenance activities and shall not be issued prior to twenty
days after the thirty days allowed for the payment of special assessments
without interest or penalties.

Lake
management district bonds shall be exclusively payable from the special fund or
funds and from a guaranty fund that the county may have created out of a
portion of proceeds from the sale of the lake management district bonds.

(2)
Lake management district bonds shall not constitute a general indebtedness of
the county issuing the bond nor an obligation, general or special, of the
state. The owner of any lake management district bond shall not have any claim
for the payment thereof against the county that issues the bonds except for
payment from the special assessments made for the lake improvement or
maintenance activities for which the lake management district bond was issued
and from a lake management district guaranty fund that may have been created.
The county shall not be liable to the owner of any lake management district
bond for any loss to the lake management district guaranty fund occurring in
the lawful operation of the fund. The owner of a lake management district bond
shall not have any claim against the state arising from the lake management
district bond, special assessments, or guaranty fund. Tax revenues shall not
be used to secure or guarantee the payment of the principal of or interest on
lake management district bonds.

The
substance of the limitations included in this subsection shall be plainly
printed, written, engraved, or reproduced on: (a) Each lake management
district bond that is a physical instrument; (b) the official notice of sale;
and (c) each official statement associated with the lake management district
bonds.

(3)
If the county fails to make any principal or interest payments on any lake
management district bond or to promptly collect any special assessment securing
the bonds when due, the owner of the lake management district bond may obtain a
writ of mandamus from any court of competent jurisdiction requiring the county
to collect the special assessments, foreclose on the related lien, and make
payments out of the special fund or guaranty fund if one exists. Any number of
owners of lake management districts may join as plaintiffs.

(4)
A county may create a lake management district bond guaranty fund for each
issue of lake management district bonds. The guaranty fund shall only exist
for the life of the lake management district bonds with which it is
associated. A portion of the bond proceeds may be placed into a guaranty
fund. Unused moneys remaining in the guaranty fund during the last two years
of the installments shall be used to proportionally reduce the required level
of installments and shall be transferred into the special fund into which
installment payments are placed.

(5) Lake management district bonds shall be issued and sold in
accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW. The authority to create a special fund or
funds shall include the authority to create accounts within a fund.

---
END ---