BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department is authorized to work with wildlife and ecotourism guides and
nonprofit wildlife conservation organizations to identify professional
practices and competencies, to implement a program of recognizing master
wildlife guides, and to support wildlife-viewing tour operators as ambassadors
for Washington's fish and wildlife.

(2)
Program elements that may be addressed include but are not limited to:

(a)
Working with guides, tour operators, and nonprofit wildlife conservation
organizations to develop best management practices for viewing wildlife and to
create a code of ethics for tour operators and wildlife guides that sustains
and promotes wildlife resources;

(b)
Developing a program to recognize professional competence for designation as a
master wildlife guide;

(c)
Developing a nature tourism enterprise training workshop, to assist individuals
and businesses engaged in wildlife tours and as guides, to provide training and
education that will lead to opportunities for displaced timber workers to enter
the nature tourism business; and

(d) Providing training materials, decals recognizing master
wildlife guides, publications on wildlife tour best management practices and
code of ethics, information on wildlife management and habitat management
programs that produce increased populations of watchable wildlife, and other
publications promoting the wildlife viewing industry.

---
END ---