BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 77.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall deposit all moneys received from the following activities
into the state wildlife fund:

(a)
The sale of interpretive, recreational, historical, educational, and informational
literature and materials;

(b)
The sale of advertisements in regulation pamphlets and other appropriate
mediums; and

(c)
Enrollment fees in department-sponsored educational training events.

(2)
Moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section shall be spent primarily
for producing regulation booklets for users and for the development,
production, reprinting, and distribution of informational and educational
materials. The department may also spend these moneys for necessary expenses
associated with training activities, and other activities as determined by the
director.

(3)
Regulation pamphlets may be subsidized through appropriate advertising, but
must be made available free of charge to the users.

(4)
The director may enter into joint ventures with other agencies and
organizations to generate revenue for providing public information and
education on wildlife and hunting and fishing rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. RCW
77.12.185 (Publications--Authority to recover costs--Disposition
of moneys) and 1987 c 506 s 26, 1980 c 78 s 66, & 1979 c 56 s 2 are each
repealed.

---
END ---