BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 9.41 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
It is unlawful for any person to carry, transport, convey, or to have in his or
her possession or under his or her control any firearm while within the east
state capitol campus grounds, the west state capitol campus grounds, or the old
capitol building. This section does not apply to a law enforcement officer,
security personnel, or a person engaged in military activities sponsored by the
federal or state government while engaged in official duties. This section
does not apply within the parking area of any parking lot or parking garage.

(2)
For the purposes of this section:

(a)
"East state capitol campus grounds" means those grounds, and
buildings on those grounds, described in RCW 79.24.500 that include the campus
area north of Maple Park (16th Avenue) and south of 11th Avenue, east of
Capitol Way and west of Interstate 5 and the Interstate 5 entrance to the state
capitol.

(b)
"West state capitol campus grounds" means those state-owned grounds,
and buildings on those grounds, that constitute the state capitol grounds west
of Capitol Way, including all of the grounds addressed in the 1928 Olmsted
Brothers landscape plan for the state capitol grounds and the state capitol
historic district, as designated in the National Register of Historic Places,
but excluding the area bounded by Union Avenue on the north, Columbia Street on
the west, 11th Avenue on the south, and Capitol Way on the east.

(3)
Any person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

---
END ---