BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.36.025 and 1999 c 269 s 16 and 1999 c 94 s 29 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
A motor vehicle fuel tax rate of twenty-three cents per gallon shall apply to
the sale, distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel.

(2)
The department shall adjust the motor vehicle fuel tax rate on July 1, 2001,
and every year thereafter. The adjustment is calculated by multiplying the
motor vehicle fuel tax rate effective for the current year by the sum of one
plus the fiscal growth factor, as defined in RCW 43.135.025, for every year in
which the fiscal growth factor is greater than zero. The department must
calculate and transmit the new motor vehicle fuel tax rate for the upcoming
fiscal year to the legislature by January 1st of the year in which the new
motor vehicle fuel tax rate is to take effect. The adjustment derived under
this subsection must be rounded to the nearest one-tenth of one percent.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The
secretary of state shall submit this act to the people for their adoption and
ratification, or rejection, at the next general election to be held in this
state, in accordance with RCW 43.135.090.

---
END ---