BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the current formula for determining the state's
expenditure limit is inadequate. It is the intent of this act to change the
fiscal growth factor used to determine the state expenditure limit so that it
accurately approximates the growth in the state's economy. Personal income
growth is a more accurate measure of the state's growth in both strong and weak
economic times. The current formula increases more slowly than the economy in
good economic times and therefore causes underfunding of vital state programs.
It is the intent of the legislature to maintain an expenditure limit that
increases at the same pace as the economy and therefore establishes personal
income as the appropriate measure for fiscal growth.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.135.010 and 1994 c 2 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
people of the state of Washington hereby find and declare:

(1)
The continuing increases in our state tax burden and the corresponding growth
of state government is contrary to the interest of the people of the state of
Washington.

(2)
It is necessary to limit the rate of growth of state government while assuring adequate
funding of essential services, including basic education as defined by the
legislature.

(3)
The current budgetary system in the state of Washington lacks stability. The
system encourages crisis budgeting and results in cutbacks during lean years
and overspending during surplus years.

(4)
It is therefore the intent of this chapter to:

(a)
Establish a limit on state expenditures that will assure that the growth rate
of state expenditures does not exceed the growth rate of ((inflation and
state population)) Washington personal income;

(b)
Assure that local governments are provided funds adequate to render those
services deemed essential by their citizens;

(c)
Assure that the state does not impose responsibility on local governments for
new programs or increased levels of service under existing programs unless the
costs thereof are paid by the state;

(d)
Provide for adjustment of the limit when costs of a program are transferred
between the state and another political entity;

(e)
Establish a procedure for exceeding this limit in emergency situations;

(f)
Provide for voter approval of tax increases; and

(g)
Avoid overfunding and underfunding state programs by providing stability,
consistency, and long-range planning by basing the expenditure limit on the
growth of the overall state economy as measured by personal income.

Sec.
3. RCW
43.135.025 and 1994 c 2 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The state shall not expend from the general fund during any fiscal year state
moneys in excess of the state expenditure limit established under this chapter.

(2)
Except pursuant to a declaration of emergency under RCW 43.135.035 or pursuant
to an appropriation under RCW 43.135.045(4)(b), the state treasurer shall not
issue or redeem any check, warrant, or voucher that will result in a state
general fund expenditure for any fiscal year in excess of the state expenditure
limit established under this chapter. A violation of this subsection
constitutes a violation of RCW 43.88.290 and shall subject the state treasurer
to the penalties provided in RCW 43.88.300.

(3)
The state expenditure limit for any fiscal year shall be the previous fiscal
year's state expenditure limit increased by a percentage rate that equals the
fiscal growth factor.

(4)
For purposes of computing the state expenditure limit for the fiscal year
beginning July 1, 1995, the phrase "the previous fiscal year's state
expenditure limit" means the total state expenditures from the state
general fund, not including federal funds, for the fiscal year beginning July
1, 1989, plus the fiscal growth factor. This calculation is then computed for
the state expenditure limit for fiscal years 1992, 1993, 1994, and 1995, and as
required under RCW 43.135.035(4).

(5)
Each November, the office of financial management shall adjust the expenditure
limit for the preceding fiscal year based on actual expenditures and known
changes in the fiscal growth factor and then project an expenditure limit for
the next two fiscal years. The office of financial management shall notify the
legislative fiscal committees of all adjustments to the state expenditure limit
and projections of future expenditure limits.

(6)
"Fiscal growth factor" means:

(a)
For fiscal years 2001 and before, the average of the sum of inflation and
population change for each of the prior three fiscal years; and

(b)
For fiscal years 2002 and thereafter, the average of the change in Washington
personal income for the prior three fiscal years.

(7)
"Inflation" means the percentage change in the implicit price
deflator for the United States for each fiscal year as published by the federal
bureau of labor statistics.

(8) "Population change" means the percentage change in
state population for each fiscal year as reported by the office of financial
management.

---
END ---