BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
On July 1, 2001, any remaining fund balances in the following accounts are
transferred to the state wildlife account:

(a)
The aquaculture disease control account;

(b)
The Cedar river channel construction and operation account; and

(c)
The wildlife conservation reward fund.

(2)
On July 1, 2001, any remaining fund balances in the following accounts are
transferred to the parks renewal and stewardship account:

(a)
The state wildlife and recreation lands management account;

(b)
The state and local improvements revolving account; and

(c)
The underwater park account.

(3)
On July 1, 2001, any remaining fund balances in the following accounts are
transferred to the state toxics control account:

(a)
The clean Washington account;

(b)
The vehicle tire recycling account; and

(c)
The solid waste management account.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
79A.20.020 (State wildlife and recreation lands management
account) and 1992 c 153 s 4;

(2) RCW
75.58.020 (Disease inspection and control program--User
fees--Aquaculture disease control account) and 1993 sp.s. c 2 s 56 & 1985 c
457 s 9;

(3) RCW
70.95H.800 (Clean Washington account) and 1991 c 319 s 212;

(4) RCW
70.95.520 (Vehicle tire recycling account--Deposit of funds) and
1996 c 283 s 902, 1989 c 431 s 94, & 1985 c 345 s 6;

(5) RCW
70.95.800 (Solid waste management account--Expenditures) and 1993
c 130 s 2, 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 73, & 1989 c 431 s 90;

(6) RCW
43.21J.020 (Environmental and forest restoration account) and 1993
c 516 s 3;

(7) RCW
43.83C.030 (Proceeds to be deposited in state and local
improvements revolving account) and 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 54, 1985 c 57 s 47, &
1972 ex.s. c 129 s 3;

(8) RCW
79A.05.365 (Underwater parks--Fees--Underwater park account) and
1993 c 267 s 3;

(9) RCW
75.52.140 (Cedar river spawning channel--Transfer of funds) and
1989 c 85 s 7; and

(10) RCW
77.21.080 (Wildlife conservation reward fund) and 1989 c 11 s 29
& 1987 c 506 s 75.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act takes effect July 1, 2001.

---
END ---