BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
36.61.020 and 1987 c 432 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
county may create lake management districts to finance the improvement and
maintenance of lakes located within or partially within the boundaries of the
county. All or a portion of a lake and the adjacent land areas may be included
within one or more lake management districts. More than one lake, or portions
of lakes, and the adjacent land areas may be included in a single lake
management district. ((A lake management district may be created for a
period of up to ten years.))

Special
assessments or rates and charges may be imposed on the property included within
a lake management district to finance lake improvement and maintenance
activities, including: (1) The control or removal of aquatic plants and
vegetation; (2) water quality; (3) the control of water levels; (4) storm water
diversion and treatment; (5) agricultural waste control; (6) studying lake
water quality problems and solutions; (7) cleaning and maintaining ditches,
dikes, levees, flumes, and streams entering or leaving the lake; and (8)
the related administrative, engineering, legal, and operational costs,
including the costs of creating the lake management district.

Special assessments or rates and charges may be imposed annually on
all the land in a lake management district for the duration of the lake
management district without a related issuance of lake management district
bonds or revenue bonds. Special assessments also may be imposed in the manner
of special assessments in a local improvement district with each landowner
being given the choice of paying the entire special assessment in one payment,
or to paying installments, with lake management district bonds being issued to
obtain moneys not derived by the initial full payment of the special
assessments, and the installments covering all of the costs related to issuing,
selling, and redeeming the lake management district bonds.

---
END ---