BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
29.36.045 and 1987 c 346 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:

The
county auditor shall send each absentee voter a ballot, a security envelope in
which to seal the ballot after voting, a larger envelope in which to return the
security envelope, and instructions on how to mark the ballot and how to return
it to the county auditor. The larger return envelope shall contain a
declaration by the absentee voter reciting his or her qualifications and
stating that he or she has not voted in any other jurisdiction at this
election, together with a summary of the penalties for any violation of any of
the provisions of this chapter. The return envelope shall provide space for
the voter to indicate the date on which the ballot was voted and for the voter
to sign the oath. A summary of the applicable penalty provisions of this
chapter shall be printed on the return envelope immediately adjacent to the
space for the voter's signature. The signature of the voter on the return
envelope shall affirm and attest to the statements regarding the qualifications
of that voter and to the validity of the ballot. For out-of-state voters,
overseas voters, and service voters, the signed declaration on the return
envelope constitutes the equivalent of a voter registration for the election or
primary for which the ballot has been issued. The voter shall be instructed to
either return the ballot to the county auditor by whom it was issued or attach
sufficient first class postage, if applicable, and mail the ballot to the
appropriate county auditor ((no later than the day of the election or
primary for which the ballot was issued)) in accordance with the time
requirements of RCW 29.36.060.

Sec.
2. RCW
29.36.060 and 1991 c 81 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

The
opening and subsequent processing of return identification envelopes for
any primary or election may begin on or after the tenth day prior to such
primary or election. The opening of the security envelopes and tabulation of
absentee ballots shall not commence until after 8:00 ((o'clock)) p.m. on
the day of the primary or election.

After
opening the return identification envelopes, the county canvassing board
or its representative shall place all of the ((ballot)) inner
security envelopes in containers that can be secured with numbered seals.
These sealed containers shall be stored in a secure location until after 8:00
((o'clock)) p.m. of the day of the primary or election. Absentee
ballots that are to be tabulated on an electronic vote tallying system may be
taken from the inner security envelopes and all the normal procedural
steps may be performed to prepare these ballots for tabulation before sealing
the containers.

The
canvassing board shall examine the postmark, statement, and signature on each
return identification envelope containing the security envelope and
absentee ballot. ((They)) An absentee ballot may be counted only if
the return identification envelope was signed by the date of the primary or
election for which it was issued and is in the office of the county auditor
before the close of the polls on the day of the primary or election for which
it was issued. However, an absentee ballot from an out-of-state, overseas, or
service voter may be counted if it was mailed no later than the day of the
primary or election for which it was issued. The canvassing board or its
representative shall verify that the voter's signature is the same as that
in the registration files for that voter. For ((absentee voters other than))
out-of-state voters, overseas voters, and service voters, if the postmark is
illegible, the date on the return identification envelope to which the
voter attests shall determine the validity, as to the ((time of voting))
date of mailing, of that absentee ballot under this chapter. For any
absentee voter, a variation between the signature of the voter on the return
envelope and that in the registration files due to the substitution of initials
or the use of common nicknames is permitted so long as the surname and
handwriting are clearly the same.

Sec.
3. RCW
29.36.126 and 1993 c 417 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon
receipt of the mail ballot, the voter shall mark it, sign the return
identification envelope supplied with the ballot, and comply with the
instructions provided with the ballot. The voter may return the marked ballot
to the county auditor. The ballot must be returned in the return
identification envelope. ((If)) Whether mailed or returned
otherwise, a ballot must be ((postmarked not later than the date of the
election. Otherwise, the ballot must be deposited at the office of the county
auditor or the designated place of deposit not later than 8:00 p.m. on the date
of the election)) returned in accordance with the time requirements as
provided for an absentee ballot under RCW 29.36.060.

Sec.
4. RCW
29.36.139 and 1993 c 417 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A mail ballot shall be counted only if it is returned in the return
identification envelope, if the envelope is signed by the registered voter to
whom the ballot is issued and was returned in accordance with the time
requirements as provided for an absentee ballot under RCW 29.36.060, and if
the signature is verified as provided in this subsection. The county auditor
shall verify the signature of each voter on the return identification envelope
with the signature on the voter's registration record. A person who votes or
attempts to vote more than once in a mail ballot election is subject to the
penalties provided in chapter 29.85 RCW.

(2) Any mail ballot may be challenged in the same manner as an
absentee ballot.

---
END ---