BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.35.020 and 1999 c 368 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No person may knowingly use or knowingly transfer a means of identification of
another person with the intent to commit, or to aid or abet, any unlawful
activity harming or intending to harm the person whose identity is used, or for
committing any felony.

(2)
It is unlawful for any person to knowingly use a means of identification of
another person to solicit undesired mail with the intent to annoy, harass,
intimidate, torment, or embarrass that person.

(3)
For purposes of this section, "means of identification" means any
information or item that is not describing finances or credit but is personal
to or identifiable with any individual or other person, including any current
or former name of the person, telephone number, and electronic address or
identifier of the individual or any member of his or her family, including the
ancestor of such person; any information relating to a change in name, address,
telephone number, or electronic address or identifier of the individual or his
or her family; any social security, driver's license, or tax identification
number of the individual or any member of his or her family; and other
information which could be used to identify the person, including unique biometric
data.

(((3)))
(4) Violation of this section is a class C felony.

(((4))) (5) Additionally, a person ((that [who]))
who violates this section is liable for civil damages of five
hundred dollars or actual damages, including costs to repair the person's
credit record, whichever is greater, and reasonable attorneys' fees as
determined by the court. If the person violating this section is a
business that repeatedly violates this section, that person also violates the
Consumer Protection Act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

---
END ---