BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
41.05.080 and 1996 c 39 s 22 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Under the qualifications, terms, conditions, and benefits set by the board:

(a)
Retired or disabled state employees, retired or disabled school employees, or
employees of county, municipal, or other political subdivisions covered by this
chapter who are retired may continue their participation in insurance plans and
contracts after retirement or disablement;

(b)
Separated employees may continue their participation in insurance plans and
contracts if participation is selected immediately upon separation from
employment.

(2)
Rates charged retired or disabled employees, separated employees, spouses, or
dependent children who are not eligible for parts A and B of medicare shall be
based on the experience of the community rated risk pool established under RCW
41.05.022.

(3)
Rates charged to retired or disabled employees, separated employees, spouses,
or children who are eligible for parts A and B of medicare shall be calculated
from a separate experience risk pool comprised only of individuals eligible for
parts A and B of medicare; however, the premiums charged to medicare-eligible
retirees and disabled employees shall be reduced by the amount of the subsidy
provided under RCW 41.05.085.

(4)
Retired or disabled and separated employees shall be responsible for payment of
premium rates developed by the authority which shall include the cost to the
authority of providing insurance coverage including any amounts necessary for
reserves and administration in accordance with this chapter. These self pay
rates will be established based on a separate rate for the employee, the
spouse, and the children.

(5)
Unless he or she requests otherwise in writing, a retired, disabled, or
separated employee shall automatically be enrolled in the uniform medical plan
if the health plan in which he or she is otherwise enrolled pursuant to this
section ceases to be available.

(6) The term "retired state employees" for the
purpose of this section shall include but not be limited to members of the
legislature whether voluntarily or involuntarily leaving state office.

---
END ---