BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the best path to leave welfare and achieve long-term
economic self-sufficiency is postsecondary education. Recent studies
demonstrate that without some postsecondary education, most women who leave
welfare for work will earn wages far below the federal poverty line for several
years thereafter. In addition, only twenty-two percent of new jobs created
through 2006 will be available to women who have only completed high school.
Furthermore, the national economy is expected to create fewer low-skill jobs
than there will be welfare recipients entering the work force. Some
postsecondary education is required in order to qualify for more of the new
jobs created. The legislature also finds that young teen parents, who lack
postsecondary education, are more likely to return and remain on welfare longer
than those with postsecondary education.

Sec.
2. RCW
74.08A.250 and 1997 c 58 s 311 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, as used in this chapter, "work
activity" means:

(1)
Unsubsidized paid employment in the private or public sector;

(2)
Subsidized paid employment in the private or public sector;

(3)
Work experience, including work associated with the refurbishing of publicly
assisted housing, if sufficient paid employment is not available;

(4)
On-the-job training;

(5)
Job search and job readiness assistance;

(6)
Community service programs;

(7)
Vocational educational training, not to exceed twelve months with respect to
any individual except those individuals meeting the requirements of
subsection (11) of this section;

(8)
Job skills training directly related to employment;

(9)
Education directly related to employment, in the case of a recipient who has
not received a high school diploma or a GED;

(10)
Satisfactory attendance at secondary school or in a course of study leading to
a GED, in the case of a recipient who has not completed secondary school or
received such a certificate;

(11)
Satisfactory maintenance of a full credit load in a vocational or two-year
community college program or program at a licensed or accredited proprietary
school or approved high school program providing job-specific education or
training in a high demand field, and the individual is within the ages of
eighteen and twenty-one years;

(12)
The provision of child care services to an individual who is participating in a
community service program; and

(((12)))
(13) Services required by the recipient under RCW 74.08.025(3) and
74.08A.010(3) to become employable.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. If
any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that
are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the
conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the
conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding
does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application
to the agencies concerned. Rules adopted under this act must meet federal
requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by
the state.

---
END ---