BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds and declares:

(1)
The national board for professional teaching standards has established high and
rigorous standards for what highly accomplished teachers should know and be
able to do in order to increase student learning results;

(2)
The national board certifies teachers who meet these standards through a
rigorous, performance-based assessment process;

(3)
A certificate awarded by the national board attests that a teacher has met high
and rigorous standards and has demonstrated the ability to make sound
professional judgments about how to best meet students' learning needs and
effectively help students meet challenging academic standards;

(4)
Teachers who attain national board certification should be acknowledged and
rewarded in order to encourage more teachers to pursue certification for the
benefit of Washington students.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.405 RCW to read as follows:

To the extent funds are appropriated, in addition to the
compensation received under the salary schedule adopted in accordance with RCW
28A.405.200, teachers who have attained certification by the national board for
professional teaching standards shall receive a bonus.

---
END ---