BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that early detection of vision and hearing problems can help
the problems be corrected or prevent further problems. The legislature finds
that school districts are currently required to screen for visual and auditory
acuity of children attending school in their districts and intends to permit
school districts to extend the benefits of early screening to preschool-age
children.

Sec.
2. RCW
28A.210.020 and 1971 c 32 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Every board of school directors shall have the power, and it shall
be its duty to provide for and require screening for the visual and auditory
acuity of all children attending schools in their districts to ascertain which
if any of such children have defects sufficient to retard them in their
studies. School boards may choose to offer the visual screening or auditory
screening, or both, to preschool-age children living within the school
district. Auditory and visual screening shall be made in accordance with
procedures and standards adopted by rule ((or regulation)) of the state
board of health. Prior to the adoption or revision of such rules ((or
regulations)) the state board of health shall seek the recommendations of
the superintendent of public instruction regarding the administration of visual
and auditory screening and the qualifications of persons competent to
administer such screening.

---
END ---