BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.300 RCW to read as follows:

The center for the improvement of student learning shall prepare
and distribute information to parents about how to select early childhood
education programs for children, how best to prepare children for kindergarten,
and guidelines for preparing children for success in school. The information
provided must include, but not be limited to, special education programs for
children of preschool age with disabilities. In preparing the information, the
center shall consult with representatives including but not limited to early
childhood educators, nonprofit associations for early childhood education,
parents, child care providers, and early childhood education faculty at
institutions of higher education. The information shall be prepared and
distributed in a manner to help parents easily receive and use the information.

---
END ---