BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
23.86.035 and 1989 c 307 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as limited by section 2 of this act, each association subject to this
chapter shall have the following powers:

(1)
To have perpetual succession by its corporate name unless a limited period of
duration is stated in the articles of incorporation.

(2)
To sue and be sued, complain, and defend in its corporate name.

(3)
To have and use a corporate seal.

(4)
To purchase, take, receive, lease, or otherwise acquire, own, hold, improve,
use, and deal in and with real or personal property or any interest therein,
wherever situated.

(5)
To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, transfer, or otherwise
dispose of all or any part of its property and assets.

(6)
To purchase, take, receive, subscribe for, or otherwise acquire, own, hold,
vote, use, employ, sell, mortgage, lend, pledge, or otherwise dispose of, use,
and deal in and with shares or other interest in, or obligations of, other
domestic or foreign corporations, associations, partnerships or individuals, or
direct or indirect obligations of the United States or any other government,
state, territory, governmental district or municipality, or any instrumentality
thereof.

(7)
To make contracts and incur liabilities, borrow money at rates of interest the
association may determine, issue notes, bonds, certificates of indebtedness,
and other obligations, receive funds from members and pay interest thereon,
issue capital stock and certificates representing equity interests in assets,
allocate earnings and losses at the times and in the manner the articles of
incorporation or bylaws or other contract specify, create book credits, capital
funds, and reserves, and secure obligations by mortgage or pledge of any of its
property, franchises, and income.

(8)
To lend money for corporate purposes, invest and reinvest funds, and take and
hold real and personal property as security for the payment of funds loaned or
invested.

(9)
To conduct business, carry on operations, have offices, and exercise the powers
granted by this chapter, within or without this state.

(10)
To elect or appoint officers and agents of the corporation, define their duties,
and fix their compensation.

(11)
To make and alter bylaws, not inconsistent with its articles of incorporation
or with the laws of this state, for the administration and regulation of the
affairs of the association.

(12)
To make donations for the public welfare or for charitable, scientific, or
educational purposes, and in time of war to make donations in aid of war
activities.

(13)
To pay pensions and establish pension plans, pension trusts, profit-sharing
plans, stock bonus plans, stock option plans, and other incentive plans for any
or all of its directors, officers, and employees.

(14)
To be a partner, member, associate, or manager of any partnership, joint
venture, trust, or other enterprise.

(15)
To cease corporate activities and surrender its corporate franchise.

(16)
To have and exercise all powers necessary or convenient to effect its purposes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 23.86 RCW to read as follows:

An electric service cooperative organized under this chapter is
subject to regulation of its rates and service by the utilities and
transportation commission and may not exercise any powers listed under RCW
23.86.035 except as authorized under Title 80 RCW.

Sec.
3. RCW
80.04.010 and 1995 c 243 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this title, unless specifically defined otherwise or unless the context
indicates otherwise:

(1)
"Automatic location identification" means a system by which
information about a caller's location, including the seven-digit number or
ten-digit number used to place a 911 call or a different seven-digit number or
ten-digit number to which a return call can be made from the public switched
network, is forwarded to a public safety answering point for display.

(2)
"Automatic number identification" means a system that allows for the
automatic display of the seven-digit or ten-digit number used to place a 911
call.

(3)
"Cogeneration facility" means any machinery, equipment, structure,
process, or property, or any part thereof, installed or acquired for the
primary purpose of the sequential generation of electrical or mechanical power
and useful heat from the same primary energy source or fuel.

(4)
"Commission" means the utilities and transportation commission.

(5)
"Commissioner" means one of the members of such commission.

(6)
"Competitive telecommunications company" means a telecommunications
company which has been classified as such by the commission pursuant to RCW
80.36.320.

(7)
"Competitive telecommunications service" means a service which has
been classified as such by the commission pursuant to RCW 80.36.330.

(8)
"Corporation" includes a corporation, company, association or joint
stock association.

(("Person"
includes an individual, a firm or partnership.

"Gas
plant" includes all real estate, fixtures and personal property, owned,
leased, controlled, used or to be used for or in connection with the
transmission, distribution, sale or furnishing of natural gas, or the
manufacture, transmission, distribution, sale or furnishing of other type gas,
for light, heat or power.

"Gas
company" includes every corporation, company, association, joint stock
association, partnership and person, their lessees, trustees or receiver
appointed by any court whatsoever, and every city or town, owning, controlling,
operating or managing any gas plant within this state.))

(9)
"Department" means the department of health.

(10)
"Electric plant" includes all real estate, fixtures and personal
property operated, owned, used or to be used for or in connection with or to
facilitate the generation, transmission, distribution, sale or furnishing of
electricity for light, heat, or power for hire; and any conduits, ducts or other
devices, materials, apparatus or property for containing, holding or carrying
conductors used or to be used for the transmission of electricity for light,
heat or power.

(11)
"Electrical company" includes any corporation, company, association, electric
service cooperative association organized under chapter 23.86 RCW, joint
stock association, partnership and person, their lessees, trustees or receivers
appointed by any court whatsoever (other than a railroad or street railroad
company generating electricity solely for railroad or street railroad purposes
or for the use of its tenants and not for sale to others), and every city or
town owning, operating or managing any electric plant for hire within this
state. "Electrical company" does not include a company or person
employing a cogeneration facility solely for the generation of electricity for
its own use or the use of its tenants or for sale to an electrical company,
state or local public agency, municipal corporation, or quasi municipal corporation
engaged in the sale or distribution of electrical energy, but not for sale to
others, unless such company or person is otherwise an electrical company.

(12)
"Facilities" means lines, conduits, ducts, poles, wires, cables,
cross-arms, receivers, transmitters, instruments, machines, appliances,
instrumentalities and all devices, real estate, easements, apparatus, property,
and routes used, operated, owned, or controlled by any telecommunications
company to facilitate the provision of telecommunications service.

(13)
"Gas company" includes every corporation, company, association, joint
stock association, partnership, and person, their lessees, trustees or receiver
appointed by any court whatsoever, and every city or town, owning, controlling,
operating, or managing any gas plant within this state.

(14)
"Gas plant" includes all real estate, fixtures and personal property,
owned, leased, controlled, used, or to be used for or in connection with the
transmission, distribution, sale, or furnishing of natural gas, or the
manufacture, transmission, distribution, sale or furnishing of other type gas,
for light, heat, or power.

(15)
"LATA" means a local access transport area as defined by the
commission in conformance with applicable federal law.

(("Private
telecommunications system" means a telecommunications system controlled by
a person or entity for the sole and exclusive use of such person, entity, or
affiliate thereof, including the provision of private shared telecommunications
services by such person or entity. "Private telecommunications
system" does not include a system offered for hire, sale, or resale to the
general public.))

(16)
"Local exchange company" means a telecommunications company providing
local exchange telecommunications service.

(17)
"Noncompetitive telecommunications service" means any service which
has not been classified as competitive by the commission.

(18)
"Person" includes an individual, a firm, or partnership.

(19)
"Private shared telecommunications services" includes the provision
of telecommunications and information management services and equipment within
a user group located in discrete private premises in building complexes,
campuses, or high-rise buildings, by a commercial shared services provider or
by a user association, through privately owned customer premises equipment and
associated data processing and information management services and includes the
provision of connections to the facilities of a local exchange and to
interexchange telecommunications companies.

(20)
"Private switch automatic location identification service" means a
service that enables automatic location identification to be provided to a
public safety answering point for 911 calls originating from station lines
served by a private switch system.

(21)
"Private telecommunications system" means a telecommunications system
controlled by a person or entity for the sole and exclusive use of such person,
entity, or affiliate thereof, including the provision of private shared
telecommunications services by such person or entity. "Private
telecommunications system" does not include a system offered for hire,
sale, or resale to the general public.

(22)
"Public service company" includes every gas company, electrical
company, telecommunications company, and water company. Ownership or operation
of a cogeneration facility does not, by itself, make a company or person a
public service company.

(23)
"Radio communications service company" includes every corporation,
company, association, joint stock association, partnership, and person, their
lessees, trustees, or receivers appointed by any court, and every city or town
making available facilities to provide radio communications service, radio
paging, or cellular communications service for hire, sale, or resale.

(24)
The term "service" is used in this title in its broadest and most
inclusive sense.

(25)
"Telecommunications" is the transmission of information by wire,
radio, optical cable, electromagnetic, or other similar means. As used in this
definition, "information" means knowledge or intelligence represented
by any form of writing, signs, signals, pictures, sounds, or any other symbols.

(26)
"Telecommunications company" includes every corporation, company,
association, joint stock association, partnership and person, their lessees,
trustees or receivers appointed by any court whatsoever, and every city or town
owning, operating or managing any facilities used to provide telecommunications
for hire, sale, or resale to the general public within this state.

(("Noncompetitive
telecommunications service" means any service which has not been
classified as competitive by the commission.

"Facilities"
means lines, conduits, ducts, poles, wires, cables, cross-arms, receivers,
transmitters, instruments, machines, appliances, instrumentalities and all
devices, real estate, easements, apparatus, property and routes used, operated,
owned or controlled by any telecommunications company to facilitate the
provision of telecommunications service.

"Telecommunications"
is the transmission of information by wire, radio, optical cable,
electromagnetic, or other similar means. As used in this definition,
"information" means knowledge or intelligence represented by any form
of writing, signs, signals, pictures, sounds, or any other symbols.

"Water
system" includes all real estate, easements, fixtures, personal property,
dams, dikes, head gates, weirs, canals, reservoirs, flumes or other structures
or appliances operated, owned, used or to be used for or in connection with or
to facilitate the supply, storage, distribution, sale, furnishing, diversion,
carriage, apportionment or measurement of water for power, irrigation,
reclamation, manufacturing, municipal, domestic or other beneficial uses for
hire.))

(27)
"Water company" includes every corporation, company, association,
joint stock association, partnership and person, their lessees, trustees or
receivers appointed by any court whatsoever, and every city or town owning,
controlling, operating, or managing any water system for hire within this
state: PROVIDED, That for purposes of commission jurisdiction it shall not
include any water system serving less than one hundred customers where the
average annual gross revenue per customer does not exceed three hundred dollars
per year, which revenue figure may be increased annually by the commission by
rule adopted pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW to reflect the rate of inflation as
determined by the implicit price deflator of the United States department of
commerce: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That such measurement of customers or revenues
shall include all portions of water companies having common ownership or
control, regardless of location or corporate designation. "Control"
as used herein shall be defined by the commission by rule and shall not include
management by a satellite agency as defined in chapter 70.116 RCW if the
satellite agency is not an owner of the water company. "Water
company" also includes, for auditing purposes only, nonmunicipal water
systems which are referred to the commission pursuant to an administrative
order from the department, or the city or county as provided in RCW 80.04.110.
However, water companies exempt from commission regulation shall be subject to
the provisions of chapter 19.86 RCW. A water company cannot be removed from
regulation except with the approval of the commission. Water companies subject
to regulation may petition the commission for removal from regulation if the
number of customers falls below one hundred or the average annual revenue per
customer falls below three hundred dollars. The commission is authorized to
maintain continued regulation if it finds that the public interest so requires.

(("Cogeneration
facility" means any machinery, equipment, structure, process, or property,
or any part thereof, installed or acquired for the primary purpose of the
sequential generation of electrical or mechanical power and useful heat from
the same primary energy source or fuel.

"Public
service company" includes every gas company, electrical company,
telecommunications company, and water company. Ownership or operation of a
cogeneration facility does not, by itself, make a company or person a public
service company.

"Local
exchange company" means a telecommunications company providing local
exchange telecommunications service.

"Department"
means the department of health.

The
term "service" is used in this title in its broadest and most
inclusive sense.))

(28)
"Water system" includes all real estate, easements, fixtures,
personal property, dams, dikes, head gates, weirs, canals, reservoirs, flumes,
or other structures or appliances operated, owned, used, or to be used for or
in connection with or to facilitate the supply, storage, distribution, sale,
furnishing, diversion, carriage, apportionment, or measurement of water for
power, irrigation, reclamation, manufacturing, municipal, domestic, or other
beneficial uses for hire.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 80.28 RCW to read as follows:

An
electric service cooperative organized under chapter 23.86 RCW is subject to
the jurisdiction of the commission with respect to its rates and services and
shall comply with the requirements of this title to the same extent as other
electrical companies regulated under this title.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. RCW
23.86.400 (Locally regulated utilities--Attachments to poles) and
1996 c 32 s 1 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. This
act takes effect September 1, 2000.

---
END ---