BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9A.08.020 and 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 38 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of a crime if it is committed by the conduct of another
person for which he or she is legally accountable.

(2)
A person is legally accountable for the conduct of another person when:

(a)
Acting with the kind of culpability that is sufficient for the commission of
the crime, he or she causes an innocent or irresponsible person to
engage in such conduct; or

(b)
He or she is made accountable for the conduct of such other person by
this title or by the law defining the crime; or

(c)
He or she is an accomplice of such other person in the commission of the
crime.

(3)
A person is an accomplice of another person in the commission of a crime if:

(a)
With knowledge that it will promote or facilitate the commission of the crime,
he or she:

(i)
Solicits, commands, encourages, or requests such other person to commit
it; or

(ii)
Aids or agrees to aid such other person in planning or committing it; or

(iii)
Having a legal duty to prevent the commission of the offense, fails to make
proper effort so to do; or

(b)
His or her conduct is expressly declared by law to establish his or
her complicity.

(4)
A person who is legally incapable of committing a particular crime himself or
herself may be guilty thereof if it is committed by the conduct of another
person for which he or she is legally accountable, unless such liability
is inconsistent with the purpose of the provision establishing his or her
incapacity.

(5)
Unless otherwise provided by this title or by the law defining the crime, a
person is not an accomplice in a crime committed by another person if:

(a)
He or she is a victim of that crime; or

(b)
He or she terminates his or her complicity prior to the
commission of the crime, and either gives timely warning to the law enforcement
authorities or otherwise makes a good faith effort to prevent the commission of
the crime.

(6) A person legally accountable for the conduct of another person
may be convicted on proof of the commission of the crime and of his or her
complicity therein, though the person claimed to have committed the crime has
not been prosecuted or convicted or has been convicted of a different crime or
degree of crime or has an immunity to prosecution or conviction or has been
acquitted.

---
END ---