BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.79.460 and 1998 c 302 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The savings incentive account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. The account shall consist of all moneys appropriated to the account
by the legislature. The account is subject to the allotment procedures under
chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures from the
account.

(2)
Within the savings incentive account, the state treasurer may create
subaccounts to be credited with incentive savings attributable to individual
state agencies, as determined by the office of financial management in
consultation with the legislative fiscal committees. Moneys deposited in the
subaccounts may be expended only on the authorization of the agency's executive
head or designee and only for the purpose of one-time expenditures to improve
the quality, efficiency, and effectiveness of services to customers of the
state, such as one-time expenditures for employee training, employee
incentives, technology improvements, new work processes, or performance
measurement. Funds may not be expended from the account to establish new
programs or services, expand existing programs or services, or incur ongoing
costs that would require future expenditures.

(3)
For purposes of this section, "incentive savings" means state ((general
fund)) appropriations that are unspent as of ((June 30th of a fiscal
year)) the end of the fiscal period for which they were appropriated,
excluding any amounts included in across-the-board reductions under RCW
43.88.110 or other reductions implemented because of a revenue shortfall or
cash deficit, and excluding unspent appropriations for:

(a)
Caseload and enrollment in entitlement programs, except to the extent that an
agency has clearly demonstrated that efficiencies have been achieved in the
administration of the entitlement program. "Entitlement program," as
used in this section, includes programs for which specific sums of money are
appropriated for pass-through to third parties or other entities;

(b)
Enrollments in state institutions of higher education;

(c)
A specific amount contained in a condition or limitation to an appropriation in
the biennial appropriations act, if the agency did not achieve the specific
purpose or objective of the condition or limitation;

(d)
Debt service on state obligations; ((and))

(e)
State retirement system obligations;

(f)
Federal or local funds;

(g)
Bond retirement accounts;

(h)
Dedicated accounts that distribute unspent balances to the state general fund;

(i)
Trust funds; and

(j)
Capital appropriations.

(4) The office of fiscal [financial] management, after consulting
with the legislative fiscal committees, shall report to the treasurer the
amount of savings incentives achieved. By December 1, 1998, and each December
1st thereafter, the office of financial management shall submit a report to the
fiscal committees of the legislature on the implementation of this section.
The report shall (a) evaluate the impact of this section on agency reversions
and end-of-biennium expenditure patterns, and (b) itemize agency expenditures
from the savings recovery account.

---
END ---