BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 84.55 RCW to read as follows:

The
state property tax levy for collection in 2001 shall be reduced by 6.2 percent
of the levy amount that would otherwise be allowed under this chapter without
regard to this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is effective for taxes levied for collection in 2001 and thereafter.

---
END ---