BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature finds that it is necessary to reflect upon and reassert the
provisions of Article I, section 3 of the state Constitution, which recognize
that no person may be deprived of life, liberty, or property without due
process.

(2)
In addition, the legislature further recognizes and guarantees that all
individuals and their posterity are entitled to certain inherent and
inalienable rights, including life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "posterity" means
all of a person's descendants, and includes all future and yet unborn
generations.

---
END ---