BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.20A RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that foster care issues continue from year to year without
resolution. In addition, caseloads have grown, which impairs the capacity of
caseworkers to provide efficient and effective services. The legislature finds
that relationships with foster parents, biological parents, providers, and the
children have suffered as a result. Therefore, it is the legislature's intent
to begin to alleviate some of these problems by encouraging the department to
evaluate its criteria for delivery of services and selection of vendors. It is
not the legislature's intent to supplant state jobs in doing so but rather to
improve the quality of services and service delivery.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.20A RCW to read as follows:

Consistent
with chapter . . . (Senate Bill No. 6402), Laws of 2000, the
secretary of the department shall emphasize the purchase of child welfare
services from licensed child-placing agencies or other entities as permitted
under chapter 41.06 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 43.20A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall increase by at least fifteen percent the number of
children currently being served by licensed child-placing agencies.

(2)
The department shall determine on a regional basis the method by which the
increase required in subsection (1) of this section will be met.

(3)
The department shall develop guidelines to determine which cases will be
managed by licensed child-placing agencies. These guidelines shall be
developed in conjunction with the licensed child-placing agencies no later than
November 15, 2000.

(4)
The department shall use the following outcome measures for child welfare services
provided by the department and licensed child-placing agencies:

(a)
Children in out-of-home care will not experience confirmed abuse or neglect
while in placement;

(b)
Children will not experience confirmed abuse or neglect within six months of
reunification with their biological parent;

(c)
Youth age sixteen and older discharged from foster care have either completed
high school, obtained a GED, or are participating in an educational or job
training program;

(d)
Parents and youth age fourteen and older will report satisfaction with services
upon case closure;

(e)
Fewer than ten percent of the foster families annually will leave the program
because of dissatisfaction;

(f)
Foster families will report satisfaction with overall support; and

(g)
Other outcomes as deemed appropriate by the department.

(5)
The department shall compare the outcomes achieved by the department with those
achieved by licensed child-placing agencies and report to the appropriate
committees of the legislature on an annual basis beginning January 1, 2001.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
For purposes of this section, "specialized rate for family foster
care" means amounts paid by the department to foster families in addition
to the basic foster care rate.

(2)
The department shall discontinue payment of the specialized rate for family
foster care.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
For purposes of this section, "exceptional cost plans" means funds to
reimburse foster parents for unusual, highly demanding activities or
supervision for children with severe impairments or acute emotional or
behavioral problems.

(2)
The department is authorized to pay for exceptional cost plans, in addition to
the basic foster care rate, as provided in this act.

(3)
The department shall create the following levels of exceptional cost plans:

(a)
Level I, for which the maximum monthly reimbursement shall be seven hundred
fifty dollars.

(b)
Level II, for which the maximum monthly reimbursement shall be two thousand
dollars.

(4)
The criteria for reimbursement of foster parents at the level I range are:

(a)
The foster child requires special classes, lessons, or social activities not
related to physical care or supervision;

(b)
The foster child requires minimal mental health therapy; or

(c)
The foster child requires special therapeutic interventions by the foster
parent.

(5)
The criteria for reimbursement of foster parents at the level II range are:

(a)
Respite or child care as a substitute for or to assist the foster parent in
caring for the child is required;

(b)
The foster child requires a special diet;

(c)
The foster child requires mental health treatment beyond that reimbursed under
level I;

(d)
The foster child requires special equipment or furniture; or

(e)
Additional reimbursement to the foster parent is necessary for the maintenance
or special supervision of the foster child.

(6)
Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (4) and (5) of this section, only
when authorized by the regional administrator, foster parents may receive
payments in excess of those authorized in subsection (5) of this section under
the following criteria:

(a)
The foster child is severely medically fragile as defined by the department in
rule;

(b)
The foster child requires extraordinary twenty-four hour supervision;

(c)
The foster child has severe emotional or physical disabilities; or

(d)
The foster child has an extensive history of inpatient mental health or
substance abuse treatment.

(7)
No regional administrator may delegate to any subordinate the authority to
authorize an exception granted under subsection (6) of this section. In the
absence, or disability, of a regional administrator, the assistant secretary
shall determine whether an exception shall be granted.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall develop a training curriculum for foster parents by which
foster parents receiving level I or II exceptional cost plan reimbursement or
an exceptional amount in addition to those levels as provided in section 5 of
this act are required to complete a certain number of hours of training on an
annual basis to continue receiving the higher rates of reimbursement. The
training required of each foster parent shall be directly related to the
specific special needs of the foster child or children for whom the foster
parent provides care. The annual amount of training required shall be
determined by the department in rule.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A new
section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall develop by September 1, 2000, and implement by December 15,
2000, a state-wide policy for the provision of a minimum level of respite care
for all licensed foster parents.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. A
new section is added to chapter 74.13 RCW to read as follows:

The
assistant secretary for the children's administration at the department shall
convene a quality improvement team whose sole responsibility shall be to
oversee the implementation of this act. The team shall consist of at least the
following members: A representative of two private child-placing agencies; a
licensed foster parent; a member of the foster parents association of
Washington state; a parent of a child in foster care provided by the children's
administration; a parent of a child who is in foster care provided by a
child-placing agency; a representative of the department; and a representative
of a state employees' union. The team shall meet at least quarterly to oversee
the department's progress on implementation. The department shall provide
access to all records and documents necessary for the team to perform its
responsibilities under this act. The team shall provide a preliminary report
to the legislature by January 1, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9.
Sections 1, 2, 3, 5, and 6 of this act take effect May 1, 2001.

---
END ---