BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW to read as follows:

(1)
An agency that is the primary sponsor or proponent of a project or proposal
shall not serve as the lead agency responsible for complying with the review
procedures under this chapter. In the case of such a public project or
proposal subject to review under this chapter, the lead agency shall be
determined by agreement among all agencies with jurisdiction and agencies with
expertise.

(2)
For purposes of this section:

(a)
"Agency with jurisdiction" means an agency with authority to approve,
veto, or finance all or part of a project or proposal; and

(b) "Agency with expertise" means an agency with special
expertise on the environmental impacts involved in a proposal or alternative
significantly affecting the environment.

---
END ---