BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that over four hundred thousand breakfasts and lunches are
served in Washington's schools each school day. The legislature further finds
that food safety standards specifically tailored to food service workers in
schools will help maintain and improve the high standards of service currently
provided in our schools.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 69.06 RCW to read as follows:

The state board of health shall, in consultation with the
department of health, the superintendent of public instruction, local health
jurisdictions, representatives of food and nutrition service employees, and
representatives of the food service industry, adopt rules establishing minimum
food safety and sanitation training requirements specifically designed for
kitchen managers and lead kitchen workers hired by school districts to handle
or prepare food. In developing the rules, the state board of health shall
consider the specific health risks applicable to children. The rules shall
apply to school employees hired, renewing a food and beverage service worker's
permit, or transferring into a kitchen manager or lead kitchen worker position,
after the effective date of this section.

---
END ---