BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the intent of the legislature to improve student safety by providing parents
and guardians with information concerning pesticides that pose risks to
children. The metabolism, physiology, and diet of children puts them at higher
risk than adults to pesticide exposure. Children spend much of their time in
schools and day care centers, and parents and guardians have a right to be
informed about potential health threats to their children.

Sec.
2. RCW
17.21.020 and 1994 c 283 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Agricultural commodity" means any plant or part of a plant, or
animal, or animal product, produced by a person (including farmers, ranchers,
vineyardists, plant propagators, Christmas tree growers, aquaculturists,
floriculturists, orchardists, foresters, or other comparable persons) primarily
for sale, consumption, propagation, or other use by people or animals.

(2)
"Agricultural land" means land on which an agricultural commodity is
produced or land that is in a government-recognized conservation reserve
program. This definition does not apply to private gardens where agricultural
commodities are produced for personal consumption.

(3)
"Apparatus" means any type of ground, water, or aerial equipment,
device, or contrivance using motorized, mechanical, or pressurized power and
used to apply any pesticide on land and anything that may be growing, habitating,
or stored on or in such land, but shall not include any pressurized handsized
household device used to apply any pesticide, or any equipment, device, or
contrivance of which the person who is applying the pesticide is the source of
power or energy in making such pesticide application, or any other small
equipment, device, or contrivance that is transported in a piece of equipment
licensed under this chapter as an apparatus.

(4)
"Arthropod" means any invertebrate animal that belongs to the phylum arthropoda,
which in addition to insects, includes allied classes whose members are
wingless and usually have more than six legs; for example, spiders, mites,
ticks, centipedes, and isopod crustaceans.

(5)
"Certified applicator" means any individual who is licensed as a
commercial pesticide applicator, commercial pesticide operator, public
operator, private-commercial applicator, demonstration and research applicator,
or certified private applicator, or any other individual who is certified by
the director to use or supervise the use of any pesticide which is classified
by the EPA or the director as a restricted use pesticide.

(6)
"Commercial pesticide applicator" means any person who engages in the
business of applying pesticides to the land of another.

(7)
"Commercial pesticide operator" means any employee of a commercial
pesticide applicator who uses or supervises the use of any pesticide and who is
required to be licensed under provisions of this chapter.

(8)
"Defoliant" means any substance or mixture of substances intended to
cause the leaves or foliage to drop from a plant with or without causing
abscission.

(9)
"Department" means the Washington state department of agriculture.

(10)
"Desiccant" means any substance or mixture of substances intended to
artificially accelerate the drying of plant tissues.

(11)
"Device" means any instrument or contrivance intended to trap,
destroy, control, repel, or mitigate pests, but not including equipment used
for the application of pesticides when sold separately from the pesticides.

(12)
"Direct supervision" by certified private applicators shall mean that
the designated restricted use pesticide shall be applied for purposes of
producing any agricultural commodity on land owned or rented by the applicator
or the applicator's employer, by a competent person acting under the
instructions and control of a certified private applicator who is available if
and when needed, even though such certified private applicator is not
physically present at the time and place the pesticide is applied. The
certified private applicator shall have direct management responsibility and
familiarity of the pesticide, manner of application, pest, and land to which
the pesticide is being applied. Direct supervision by all other certified
applicators means direct on-the-job supervision and shall require that the
certified applicator be physically present at the application site and that the
person making the application be in voice and visual contact with the certified
applicator at all times during the application. Direct supervision of an
aerial apparatus means the pilot of the aircraft must be appropriately
certified.

(13)
"Director" means the director of the department or a duly authorized
representative.

(14)
"Engage in business" means any application of pesticides by any
person upon lands or crops of another.

(15)
"EPA" means the United States environmental protection agency.

(16)
"EPA restricted use pesticide" means any pesticide classified for
restricted use by the administrator, EPA.

(17)
"FIFRA" means the federal insecticide, fungicide and rodenticide act
as amended (61 Stat. 163, 7 U.S.C. Sec. 136 et seq.).

(18)
"Fumigant" means any pesticide product or combination of products
that is a vapor or gas or forms a vapor or gas on application and whose method
of pesticidal action is through the gaseous state.

(19)
"Fungi" means all nonchlorophyll-bearing thallophytes (all
nonchlorophyll-bearing plants of lower order than mosses and liverworts); for
example, rusts, smuts, mildews, molds, and yeasts, except those on or in a
living person or other animals.

(20)
"Fungicide" means any substance or mixture of substances intended to
prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate any fungi.

(21)
"Herbicide" means any substance or mixture of substances intended to
prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate any weed or other higher plant.

(22)
"Immediate service call" means a landscape application to satisfy an
emergency customer request for service, or a treatment to control a pest to
landscape plants.

(23)
"Insect" means any small invertebrate animal, in any life stage,
whose adult form is segmented and which generally belongs to the class insecta,
comprised of six-legged, usually winged forms, as, for example, beetles, bugs,
bees, and flies. The term insect shall also apply to other allied classes of
arthropods whose members are wingless and usually have more than six legs, for
example, spiders, mites, ticks, centipedes, and isopod crustaceans.

(24)
"Insecticide" means any substance or mixture of substances intended
to prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate any insect.

(25)
"Land" means all land and water areas, including airspace and all
plants, animals, structures, buildings, devices, and contrivances, appurtenant
to or situated on, fixed or mobile, including any used for transportation.

(26)
"Landscape application" means an application by a certified
applicator of any EPA registered pesticide to any exterior landscape plants
found around residential property, commercial properties such as apartments or
shopping centers, parks, golf courses, schools including nursery schools and licensed
day cares, or cemeteries or similar areas. This definition shall not apply
to: (a) Applications made by certified private applicators; (b) mosquito
abatement, gypsy moth eradication, or similar wide-area pest control programs
sponsored by governmental entities; and (c) commercial pesticide applicators
making structural applications.

(27)
"Nematocide" means any substance or mixture of substances intended to
prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate nematodes.

(28)
"Nematode" means any invertebrate animal of the phylum
nemathelminthes and class nematoda, that is, unsegmented round worms with
elongated, fusiform, or saclike bodies covered with cuticle, and inhabiting
soil, water, plants or plant parts. Nematodes may also be called nemas or
eelworms.

(29)
"Person" means any individual, partnership, association, corporation,
or organized group of persons whether or not incorporated.

(30)
"Pest" means, but is not limited to, any insect, rodent, nematode,
snail, slug, weed, and any form of plant or animal life or virus, except virus,
bacteria, or other microorganisms on or in a living person or other animal or
in or on processed food or beverages or pharmaceuticals, which is normally
considered to be a pest, or which the director may declare to be a pest.

(31)
"Pesticide" means, but is not limited to:

(a)
Any substance or mixture of substances intended to prevent, destroy, control,
repel, or mitigate any pest;

(b)
Any substance or mixture of substances intended to be used as a plant
regulator, defoliant or desiccant; and

(c)
Any spray adjuvant, such as a wetting agent, spreading agent, deposit builder,
adhesive, emulsifying agent, deflocculating agent, water modifier, or similar
agent with or without toxic properties of its own intended to be used with any
pesticide as an aid to the application or effect thereof, and sold in a package
or container separate from that of the pesticide with which it is to be used.

(32)
"Pesticide advisory board" means the pesticide advisory board as
provided for in this chapter.

(33)
"Plant regulator" means any substance or mixture of substances
intended through physiological action, to accelerate or retard the rate of
growth or maturation, or to otherwise alter the behavior of ornamental or crop
plants or their produce, but shall not include substances insofar as they are
intended to be used as plant nutrients, trace elements, nutritional chemicals,
plant inoculants, or soil amendments.

(34)
"Private applicator" means a certified applicator who uses or is in
direct supervision of the use of any pesticide classified by the EPA or the
director as a restricted use pesticide, for the purposes of producing any
agricultural commodity and for any associated noncrop application on land owned
or rented by the applicator or the applicator's employer or if applied without
compensation other than trading of personal services between producers of
agricultural commodities on the land of another person.

(35)
"Private-commercial applicator" means a certified applicator who uses
or supervises the use of any pesticide classified by the EPA or the director as
a restricted use pesticide for purposes other than the production of any
agricultural commodity on lands owned or rented by the applicator or the
applicator's employer.

(36)
"Residential property" includes property less than one acre in size
zoned as residential by a city, town, or county, but does not include property
zoned as agricultural or agricultural homesites.

(37)
"Restricted use pesticide" means any pesticide or device which, when
used as directed or in accordance with a widespread and commonly recognized
practice, the director determines, subsequent to a hearing, requires additional
restrictions for that use to prevent unreasonable adverse effects on the
environment including people, lands, beneficial insects, animals, crops, and
wildlife, other than pests.

(38)
"Rodenticide" means any substance or mixture of substances intended
to prevent, destroy, repel, or mitigate rodents, or any other vertebrate animal
which the director may declare by rule to be a pest.

(39)
"School facility" means any facility used for licensed day care,
preschool, kindergarten, or elementary or secondary school purposes. School
facility includes the buildings or structures, playgrounds, landscape areas, athletic
fields, school vehicles, or any other area of school property visited or used
by children attending the school. School facility does not include a private
school approved under chapter 28A.195 RCW or any postsecondary educational
facility attended by secondary school students.

(40)
"Snails or slugs" include all harmful mollusks.

(((40)))
(41) "Unreasonable adverse effects on the environment" means
any unreasonable risk to people or the environment taking into account the
economic, social, and environmental costs and benefits of the use of any
pesticide, or as otherwise determined by the director.

(((41)))
(42) "Weed" means any plant which grows where it is not
wanted.

Sec.
3. RCW
17.21.410 and 1994 c 283 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A certified applicator making a landscape application to:

(a)
Residential property shall at the time of the application place a marker at the
usual point of entry to the property. If the application is made to an
isolated spot that is not a substantial portion of the property, the applicator
shall only be required to place a marker at the application site. If the
application is in a fenced or otherwise isolated backyard, no marker is
required.

(b)
Commercial properties such as apartments or shopping centers shall at the time
of application place a marker in a conspicuous location at or near each site
being treated.

(c)
A golf course shall at the time of the application place a marker at the first
tee and tenth tee or post the information in a conspicuous location such as on
a central message board.

(d)
((A school, nursery school, or licensed day care shall at the time of the
application place a marker at each primary point of entry to the school
grounds.

(e))) A
park, cemetery, rest stop, or similar property as may be defined in rule shall
at the time of the application place a marker at each primary point of entry.

(2)
((An individual making a landscape application to a school grounds, nursery
school, or licensed day care, and not otherwise covered by subsection (1) of
this section, shall be required to comply with the posting requirements in
subsection (1)(d) of this section.

(3))) The
marker shall be a minimum of four inches by five inches. It shall have the
words: "THIS LANDSCAPE HAS BEEN TREATED BY" as the headline and
"FOR MORE INFORMATION PLEASE CALL" as the footer. Larger size
requirements for markers may be established in rule for specific applications.
The company name and service mark with the applicator's telephone number where
information can be obtained shall be included between the headline and the
footer on the marker. The letters and service marks shall be printed in colors
contrasting to the background.

(((4)))
(3) The property owner or tenant shall remove the marker according to
the schedule established in rule. A commercial applicator is not liable for
the removal of markers by unauthorized persons or removal outside the
designated removal time.

(((5)))
(4) A certified applicator who complies with this section cannot be held
liable for personal property damage or bodily injury resulting from markers
that are placed as required.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 17.21 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A school shall notify students, parents or guardians of students, and employees
annually about the school's pest control policies and methods, including any
pesticides that may be used.

(2)
A school shall provide posted and written notice to students, parents or
guardians of students, and employees at least forty-eight hours before a school
facility application.

(3)
A school shall post notification signs at the treatment site, in a central area
at the school, and at points of entry at least forty-eight hours before a
school facility application. Signs shall remain in place for at least one week
following pesticide application to a school facility. Notification signs shall
be at least eight and one‑half by eleven inches.

(4)
An individual making a landscape application to a school facility shall at the
time of application place a marker at each primary point of entry to the school
grounds. The marker shall be at least eight and one-half by eleven inches. It
shall have the words: "THIS LANDSCAPE HAS BEEN TREATED BY" as the
headline and "FOR MORE INFORMATION PLEASE CALL" as the footer. The
company name and service mark with the applicator's telephone number where
information can be obtained shall be included between the headline and the
footer on the marker. The letters and service marks shall be printed in colors
contrasting to the background.

(5)
An individual making a school facility application shall display the name and
telephone number of the applicator or the applicator's employer on any power
application apparatus, and shall carry a material safety data sheet for each
pesticide being applied.

(6)
All notices and notification signs required under this section shall include
the signal word from the pesticide label alongside the words
"Pesticide/Herbicide Application"; for example, "WARNING:
PESTICIDE/HERBICIDE APPLICATION." Notices shall include:

(a)
The name of the pesticide;

(b)
The pesticide's active ingredient;

(c)
The date and time of application;

(d)
The area and rate of application; and

(e)
The name and phone number of a contact person.

(7)
A school facility application does not include the application of antimicrobial
pesticides as defined by 7 U.S.C. Sec. 136(mm), or the placement of bait
stations that are not accessible to children.

(8)
Any school facility application during an extended break when children are not
present, and when the treatment ends no less than ninety-six hours before the
end of the break, shall send written notice before to the beginning of the
break. Any school application to a landscape, athletic field, or outdoor
structure during the break is subject to posted notice requirements of this
subsection.

(9)
An applicator is not liable for the removal of markers by unauthorized persons
or removal outside the designated removal time. An applicator who complies
with this section may not be held liable for personal property damage or bodily
injury resulting from markers that are placed as required.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

Schools
shall provide notice of pesticide applications to students, parents or
guardians of students, and employees pursuant to chapter 17.21 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 74.15 RCW to read as follows:

Day care centers shall provide notice of pesticide applications to
children, parents or guardians of children, and employees pursuant to chapter
17.21 RCW.

---
END ---