BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds there are increasing recreational use pressures on state
trust lands, and that pressure for these public uses will only intensify as the
state's population continues to grow, as private lands are increasingly gated
off and restricted from public use, and as fees on private facilities continue
to rise. The legislature further finds that increased public recreational use
and demand have complicated public lands management and created new challenges
for the department. These pressures can conflict with the ability and demand
to generate revenue for the trust beneficiaries and recipients of forest board
land revenues, and can also increase management costs.

(2)
The legislature finds it to be in the public interest to protect, by leasing,
certain trust lands that are difficult to manage for revenue production because
these lands are extensively and intensively used for recreation purposes.
Therefore, the legislature finds that, in addition to the traditional fee
simple transfer of certain trust lands out of trust status, a new tool is
needed to accommodate increasing recreational use on state lands while still
providing revenue to the trusts. The new tool shall allow, contingent on public
funding, for the public to enter into a recreational conservation lease
covering eligible trust lands managed by the department.

(3)
The legislature finds that public use of department managed roads results in
multiple impacts and associated costs. These impacts cause approximately five
to eight percent of the impact on the over fourteen thousand miles of
department managed roads. Therefore, in an attempt to cover the costs related
to road impacts associated with public use, recreational lease rates shall
include, in addition to the lease rate, a fee adequate to cover public use
associated road maintenance and repair work during the term of the lease.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Department" means the department of natural resources.

(2)
"Recreational conservation lease" means a lease authorized and
approved by the department on granted trust lands for a period of up to thirty
years with the purpose of enabling department land managers to better manage
and meet demands for recreational use while ensuring trust lands are not
adversely impacted by the recreational use.

(3)
"Municipal watershed protection lease" means a lease authorized and
approved by the department on state trust lands for a period of up to thirty
years with the purpose of enabling the department to (a) alter its land
management practices on public lands lying within the limits of any watershed
over and through which is derived the water supply of any city or town and (b)
provide water with qualities exceeding standards established for intrastate and
interstate waters by the department of ecology.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The public land recreational conservation lease program is created within the
department. The board of natural resources shall develop a process to
implement this program which directs the department to identify, evaluate, and
prioritize public lands appropriate to encumber with a recreational
conservation lease. Under the public land recreational conservation lease
program the department may authorize recreational conservation leases on
selected department managed trust lands that are (a) identified as areas
experiencing high public use and demand for access; (b) experiencing high
levels of concerns about timber harvesting; and (c) in close proximity to urban
population centers. The recreational conservation leases shall contain
provisions and compensation for reducing timber harvest on the identified trust
lands by up to twenty percent, for a period of up to thirty years. The lease
shall include a rental value associated directly with the value of the timber
harvest deferred and will be deposited as all other lease revenues.
The lease shall also include a fee adequate to cover existing maintenance and
operation costs for authorized recreational uses on the leased site and a fee
to cover anticipated public use-associated road maintenance and repair work during
the term of the lease. The recreational conservation lease may apply to an
entire state forest or land block, or to individually identified parcels within
a state forest or land block. The tools to achieve this reduced harvest level
may include: Smaller clear cuts; greater use of noninvasive harvesting
techniques; and enhanced protective buffers along trail corridors, road
corridors, and recreational areas. If a state forest or state block of land
includes a campground or trail head covered by an existing lease but the
existing lease does not include compensation for maintenance and operation of
the leased site, the existing lease shall remain in effect; however, the
existing leased site shall be eligible for inclusion in the new recreational
conservation lease as long as the terms of the original lease are not negated
or impaired. If a state forest or state block of land includes an existing
trail easement, this easement remains in effect, but the trail with the
easement is eligible for inclusion in the recreational conservation lease.

(2)
The rental value of the recreational conservation lease shall be associated
directly with the value of the timber harvest deferred and will be deposited as
all other lease revenues. At the end of the ten-year lease, the department may
negotiate a new lease, contingent upon funding. For the duration of the lease,
the land shall be managed by the department under applicable forest practices
rules and other applicable agreements, but overall harvest rates shall be reduced
up to twenty percent, as agreed to in each individual lease agreement.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. Four
pilot recreational conservation leases shall be initiated by the department.
The four pilot lease sites shall be the Yacolt State Forest, Elbe Hills State
Forest, Tiger Mountain State Forest, and the Blanchard Hill area block. The
terms of the lease shall reduce timber harvests on each site by up to twenty
percent over a ten-year period. The amount of the reduced harvest shall be
determined by the department based on the harvest levels planned for the areas,
the level of appropriation, and the location of authorized recreational uses
within the state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
The public land recreational conservation lease account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from gifts, grants, endowments,
and legislative appropriations for the public land recreational lease program
must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used
only for costs associated with the public land recreational conservation lease
program. Only the commissioner of public lands or the commissioner's designee
may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

(2)
The department may receive gifts, grants, or endowments from public or private
sources that are made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and
benefit of the purposes of the public land recreational conservation lease
account and spend gifts, grants, or endowments or income from the public or
private sources according to their terms, unless the receipt of the gifts,
grants, or endowments violates RCW 42.17.710.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. (1)
Effective July 1, 2000, the sum of eleven million two hundred eighty-five
thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is transferred from
the general fund to the public land recreational conservation lease account for
covering the recreational management costs and road use costs associated with
public use for each of the four pilot recreational conservation leases
developed under section 4 of this act. "Costs" includes maintenance
and operation of all facilities and trails, including administration, salaries,
materials, various contracts, and Washington conservation corps' crews; and
education and enforcement officers on each of the four pilot sites. "Costs"
also includes the costs related to public use road impacts under section 3 of
this act.

(2)
The sum of twenty-four million three hundred thousand dollars, or as much
thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the biennium ending June 30,
2001, from the state building construction account to the department of natural
resources to use to compensate trust land beneficiaries and forest board
counties for the deferred timber value on the four pilot recreational
conservation leases identified in section 4 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
proceeds of the lease attributed to timber value shall be deposited by the
department in the same manner as lease revenues from other trust lands.
Deductions for the cost of administering such transactions shall be as set
forth in RCW 79.64.040, 76.12.030, or 76.12.120, depending on the lands
leased. These deductions shall cover all reasonable costs incurred by the
department to implement this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 1 through 5 and 7 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 79
RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. If
specific funding for section 4 of this act, referencing section 4 of this act
by section and bill number, is not provided by June 30, 1999, in section 6 of
this act or the omnibus appropriations act, section 4 of this act is null and
void.

Sec.
10. RCW
43.84.092 and 1999 c 380 s 8, 1999 c 309 s 928, 1999 c 268 s 4, and 1999 c 94 s
2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations
shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4)
of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall
occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this
section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the state higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance
premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local
leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the
local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system plan 2 account, the public land recreational conservation lease
account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource management cost
account, the site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account,
the state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system plan 2
account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement
account, the transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust
fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of
Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve
officers' relief and pension principal ((account)) fund, the
volunteer fire fighters' ((relief and pension)) and reserve officers'
administrative ((account)) fund, the Washington judicial
retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington state
patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account,
the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital projects
account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural
permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school
fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to
be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the county arterial preservation account, the department of
licensing services account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry
bond retirement fund, the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity
transportation account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety
account, the marine operating fund, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle
safety education account, the pilotage account, the public transportation
systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound
ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial
trust account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation equipment fund,
the transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

Sec.
11. RCW
43.84.092 and 1999 c 380 s 8, 1999 c 309 s 928, 1999 c 268 s 4, 1999 c 94 s 3,
and 1999 c 94 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash
management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall
occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education
construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest revolving
account, the health services account, the public health services account, the
health system capacity account, the personal health services account, the state
higher education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local
leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the
local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public
employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement
system plan 2 account, the public land recreational conservation lease
account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource management
cost account, the site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account,
the state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system plan 2
account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement
account, the transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust
fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of
Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve
officers' relief and pension principal ((account)) fund, the
volunteer fire fighters' ((relief and pension)) and reserve officers'
administrative ((account)) fund, the Washington judicial
retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington
state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building
account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water
pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural
permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school
fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to
be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the county arterial preservation account, the department of
licensing services account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry
bond retirement fund, the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity
transportation account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety
account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget Sound
capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the
recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust account, the safety and
education account, the special category C account, the state patrol highway
account, the transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the
transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond
retirement account, and the urban arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

Sec.
12. RCW
43.84.092 and 1999 c 380 s 9, 1999 c 309 s 929, 1999 c 268 s 5, and 1999 c 94 s
4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds
between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash
management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall
occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the higher education construction account, the highway
infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium refund account, the
judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the
judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold excise tax account,
the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account,
the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation fund, the municipal criminal
justice assistance account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization
account, the natural resources deposit account, the perpetual surveillance and
maintenance account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account,
the public employees' retirement system plan 2 account, the public land
recreational conservation lease account, the Puyallup tribal settlement
account, the resource management cost account, the site closure account, the
special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account, the state
employees' insurance reserve account, the state higher education
construction account, the state investment board expense account, the state
investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension
account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers'
retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention
and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation
infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account,
the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal ((account)) fund, the volunteer fire fighters' ((relief
and pension)) and reserve officers' administrative ((account))
fund, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington
law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement account,
the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2
retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined
plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the
Washington State University building account, the Washington State University
bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund, and the
Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings derived from
investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school
permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent
fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their
respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under this
subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's
service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the county arterial preservation account, the department of
licensing services account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry
bond retirement fund, the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation
account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account, the
motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the pilotage
account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget Sound capital
construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the
recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust account, the safety and
education account, the special category C account, the state patrol highway
account, the transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the
transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond
retirement account, and the urban arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13.
Sections 10 and 11 of this act expire September 1, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. (1)
Section 11 of this act takes effect July 1, 2000.

(2) Section 12 of this act takes effect September 1, 2000.

---
END ---