BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature hereby finds and declares that:

(1)
Article III, section 1 of the state Constitution permits midterm salary
increases for municipal officers who do not fix their own compensation;

(2)
The Washington citizens' commission on salaries for elected officials
established pursuant to Article 28, section 1 of the state Constitution with
voter approval has assured that the compensation for state and county elected
officials will be fair and certain, while minimizing the dangers of midterm
salary increases being used to influence those officers in the performance of
their duties;

(3)
The same public benefits of independent salary commissions should be extended to
the setting of compensation of municipal elected officers; and

(4)
This act is intended to clarify the intent of the legislature that existing
state law authorizes the establishment of independent salary commissions to set
the salaries of mayors and councilmembers and the authority of the voters of
such cities and towns to review commission decisions to increase or decrease
such salaries by means of referendum.

Sec.
2. RCW
35.22.200 and 1965 ex.s. c 47 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislative powers of a charter city shall be vested in a mayor and a city
council, to consist of such number of members and to have such powers as may be
provided for in its charter. The charter may provide for direct legislation by
the people through the initiative and referendum upon any matter within the
scope of the powers, functions, or duties of the city. The mayor and council
and such other elective officers as may be provided for in such charter shall
be elected at such times and in such manner as provided in Title 29 RCW, and
for such terms and shall perform such duties ((and receive such compensation))
as may be prescribed in the charter, and shall receive compensation in
accordance with the process or standards of a charter provision or ordinance
which conforms with section 3 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 35.21 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Salaries for mayors and councilmembers of towns and cities may be set by mayor
and council salary commissions established in accordance with city charter or
by ordinance and in conformity with this section.

(2)
The members of such commissions:

(a)
Shall be appointed by the mayor with approval of the city council;

(b)
May not be appointed to more than two terms;

(c)
May only be removed during their terms of office for cause of incapacity,
incompetence, neglect of duty, or malfeasance in office or for a disqualifying
change of residence; and

(d)
May not include any officer, official, or employee of the city or town or any
of their immediate family members. "Immediate family member" as used
in this subsection means the parents, spouse, siblings, children, or dependent
relatives of the officer, official, or employee, whether or not living in the
household of the officer, official, or employee.

(3)
Any change in salary shall be filed by the commission with the city clerk and
shall become effective and incorporated into the city or town budget without
further action of the city council or salary commission.

(4)
Salary increases established by the commission shall be effective as to the
mayor and all members of the city council, regardless of their terms of office.

(5)
Salary decreases established by the commission shall become effective as to
incumbent mayors and councilmembers at the commencement of their next
subsequent terms of office.

(6)
Salary increases and decreases shall be subject to referendum petition by the
people of the town or city in the same manner as a city ordinance upon filing
of such petition with the city clerk within thirty days after filing of the
salary schedule. In the event of the filing of a valid referendum petition,
the salary increase or decrease shall not go into effect until approved by vote
of the people.

(7)
Referendum measures under this section shall be submitted to the voters of the
city or town at the next following general or municipal election occurring
thirty days or more after the petition is filed, and shall be otherwise
governed by the provisions of the state Constitution, city charter, and laws
generally applicable to referendum measures.

(8)
The action fixing the salary of a city or town mayor or councilmember by a commission
established in conformity with this section shall supersede any other provision
of state statute or city or town ordinance related to municipal budgets or to
the fixing of salaries of mayors and councilmembers.

(9)
Salaries for mayors and councilmembers established under an ordinance or
charter provision in existence on the effective date of this act that
substantially comply with this section shall remain in effect unless and until
changed in accordance with such charter provision or ordinance.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---