BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 39.04 RCW to read as follows:

In
the predesign phase of every capital project valued at two million dollars or
more involving the construction, alteration, or improvement of a building used
for office space or as a warehouse, the predesign document shall include but
not be limited to program, site, and cost analysis in accordance with the
predesign manual adopted by the office of financial management and shall
include evaluation of cost savings that would be realized by leasing comparable
space. No additional funds may be expended until the office of financial
management has reviewed and approved the agency's predesign and other documents
and approved an allotment for the project. To improve monitoring of such
capital construction projects, progress reports shall be submitted by the
agency administering the project to the office of financial management and to
the fiscal committees of the house of representatives and senate. Reports
shall be submitted on July 1st and December 31st each year in a format to be
developed by the office of financial management.

Allotments for appropriations shall be provided in accordance with
the capital project review requirements adopted by the office of financial
management. The office of financial management shall notify the house of
representatives capital budget committee and the senate ways and means
committee of allotment releases based on review by the office of financial
management. No expenditure may be incurred or obligation entered into for
appropriations referring to this section until the allotment of the funds to be
expended has been approved by the office of financial management. Projects
that will be employing alternative public works construction procedures, under
chapter 39.10 RCW, are subject to the allotment procedures defined in this
section and RCW 43.88.110. Contracts shall not be executed that call for
expenditures in excess of the approved allotment, and the total amount shown in
such contracts for the cost of future work that has not been appropriated shall
not exceed the amount identified for such work in the level of funding approved
by the office of financial management at the completion of predesign.

---
END ---