BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 49.17 RCW to read as follows:

New
ergonomic rules proposed for adoption by the department may be applied only to
those employers selected by the department for participation in a pilot project
conducted under the requirements of RCW 34.05.313. The group of pilot project
employers selected shall be representative of employers that the proposed rules
are designed to apply to. The department shall work with the group of pilot
project employers for one year to test and improve proposed rules, best
practices, and inspection policies and procedures. During the course of the year
that the rules apply only to the pilot project employers, the department shall
propose changes to its ergonomic rules as appropriate based on its experience
in applying the rules to the pilot project employers. The department shall
report to the legislature by January 1, 2002, on its experience applying the
rules to the pilot project employers prior to the adoption of the final
ergonomic rules.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---