BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
13.32A.250 and 1998 c 296 s 37 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In all child in need of services proceedings and at-risk youth proceedings, the
court shall verbally notify the parents and the child of the possibility of a
finding of contempt for failure to comply with the terms of a court order
entered pursuant to this chapter. Except as otherwise provided in this
section, the court shall treat the parents and the child equally for the
purposes of applying contempt of court processes and penalties under this
section.

(2)
Failure by a party to comply with an order entered under this chapter is a
civil contempt of court as provided in RCW 7.21.030(2)(e), subject to the
limitations of subsection (3) of this section.

(3)
For contempt of court under this section, the court may impose remedial
sanctions, including, but not limited to, a fine of up to one
hundred dollars ((and)), community restitution as defined in RCW
13.40.020, or confinement for up to seven days, or ((both for contempt
of court under this section)) any combination of sanctions but only when
the child cannot be confined within three days after the order is entered
because the facility at which the child would be confined is at full capacity.

(4)
A child ((placed in confinement for)) found in contempt under
this section shall be placed in confinement only in a secure juvenile detention
facility operated by or pursuant to a contract with a county, or the court
may impose alternatives to detention, including community restitution as
defined in RCW 13.40.020 but only as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(5)
A motion for contempt may be made by a parent, a child, juvenile court
personnel, or by any public agency, organization, or person having custody of
the child under a court order adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(6) Whenever the court finds probable cause to believe, based upon
consideration of a motion for contempt and the information set forth in a
supporting declaration, that a child has violated a placement order entered
under this chapter, the court may issue an order directing law enforcement to
pick up and take the child to detention. The order may be entered ex parte
without prior notice to the child or other parties. Following the child's
admission to detention, a detention review hearing must be held in accordance
with RCW 13.32A.065.

---
END ---