BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that:

(1)
The Constitution of the state of Washington provides that the lawmaking power
is vested in the legislature and the citizens of the state.

(2)
Agency employees who are writing rules are neither elected nor are they
formally accountable to the citizens who must abide by the rules.

(3)
The proliferation of rules causes confusion and frustration for Washington
citizens. It is the intent of the legislature to limit the rule-making
authority of agencies by implementing a one-year moratorium on the adoption of
any rules.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW to read as follows:

No
agency may adopt any rules for one year after the effective date of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---