BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the rule-making authority of agencies is too expansive.
The number of rules adopted by agencies is so excessive that the Washington
Administrative Code containing agency rules now fills twelve volumes, while the
Revised Code of Washington, containing the legislative enactments, fills only
seven volumes. The legislature further finds that while it may be necessary
for the legislature to occasionally delegate rule-making and regulatory powers
to an agency, the lawmaking power continues to belong to the legislature and to
the people.

Sec.
2. RCW
34.05.335 and 1989 c 175 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A proposed rule may be withdrawn by the proposing agency at any time before
adoption. A withdrawn rule may not be adopted unless it is again proposed in
accordance with RCW 34.05.320.

(2)
Before adopting a rule, an agency shall consider the written and oral
submissions, or any memorandum summarizing oral submissions.

(3)
An agency may not adopt a rule when the legislature is not in session.

(4)
Rules not adopted and filed with the code reviser within one hundred eighty
days after publication of the text as last proposed in the register ((shall
be)) or by the end of the next ensuing session of the legislature,
whichever is later, are regarded as withdrawn. An agency may not
thereafter adopt the proposed rule without refiling it in accordance with RCW
34.05.320. The code reviser shall give notice of the withdrawal in the
register.

(((4))) (5) An agency may not adopt a rule before the
time established in the published notice, or such later time established on the
record or by publication in the state register.

---
END ---