BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the Constitution of the state of Washington provides
that the lawmaking power is vested in the legislature and the citizens of the
state. In order to protect taxpayers from frivolous government spending, it is
the responsibility of the legislature to safeguard the integrity of the budget
process by carefully allocating taxpayer funds through budget appropriations.
However, agency rule making often obligates taxpayer funds without the approval
of the legislature. Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to monitor
agency rule making by closely examining those rules that, if implemented, would
obligate taxpayer funds.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 34.05 RCW to read as follows:

If
an agency adopts a rule that obligates the expenditure of taxpayer funds, that
rule may not take effect until the end of the next ensuing session of the
legislature. If the legislature affirmatively votes to reject the rule, the
rule is not effective and is considered to be repealed.

As
used in this chapter, "a rule that obligates the expenditure of taxpayer
funds" does not include a rule affecting fees for services or fines that
the agency is authorized to collect.

Sec.
3. RCW
34.05.380 and 1989 c 175 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each agency shall file in the office of the code reviser a certified copy of
all rules it adopts, except for rules contained in tariffs filed with or
published by the Washington utilities and transportation commission. The code
reviser shall place upon each rule a notation of the time and date of filing
and shall keep a permanent register of filed rules open to public inspection.
In filing a rule, each agency shall use the standard form prescribed for this
purpose by the code reviser.

(2)
Emergency rules adopted under RCW 34.05.350 become effective upon filing unless
(a) a later date is specified in the order of adoption or (b) they
obligate the expenditure of taxpayer funds. Any rules, whether regular or
emergency, that obligate the expenditure of taxpayer funds may not take effect
before the end of the next ensuing session of the legislature. All other
rules become effective upon the expiration of thirty days after the date of
filing, unless a later date is required by statute or specified in the order of
adoption.

(3)
A rule may become effective immediately upon its filing with the code reviser
or on any subsequent date earlier than that established by subsection (2) of
this section, if the agency establishes that effective date in the adopting
order and finds that:

(a)
Such action is required by the state or federal Constitution, a statute, or
court order;

(b)
The rule only delays the effective date of another rule that is not yet
effective; or

(c)
The earlier effective date is necessary because of imminent peril to the public
health, safety, or welfare.

The
finding and a brief statement of the reasons therefor required by this
subsection shall be made a part of the order adopting the rule.

(4) With respect to a rule made effective pursuant to subsection
(3) of this section, each agency shall make reasonable efforts to make the
effective date known to persons who may be affected by it.

Sec.
4. RCW
34.05.356 and 1998 c 280 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If a proposed rule will not obligate the expenditure of taxpayer funds, an
agency may file notice for the expedited adoption of rules in accordance with
the procedures set forth in this section for rules meeting any one of the
following criteria:

(a)
The proposed rules relate only to internal governmental operations that are not
subject to violation by a person;

(b)
The proposed rules adopt or incorporate by reference without material change
federal statutes or regulations, Washington state statutes, rules of other
Washington state agencies, shoreline master programs other than those programs
governing shorelines of state-wide significance, or, as referenced by
Washington state law, national consensus codes that generally establish
industry standards, if the material adopted or incorporated regulates the same
subject matter and conduct as the adopting or incorporating rule;

(c)
The proposed rules only correct typographical errors, make address or name
changes, or clarify language of a rule without changing its effect;

(d)
The content of the proposed rules is explicitly and specifically dictated by
statute;

(e)
The proposed rules have been the subject of negotiated rule making, pilot rule
making, or some other process that involved substantial participation by
interested parties before the development of the proposed rule; or

(f)
The proposed rule is being amended after a review under RCW 34.05.328.

(2)
The expedited rule-making process must follow the requirements for rule making
set forth in RCW 34.05.320, except that the agency is not required to prepare a
small business economic impact statement under RCW 19.85.025, a statement
indicating whether the rule constitutes a significant legislative rule under
RCW ((34.05.328(6)(c)(iii))) 34.05.328(5)(c)(iii), or a
significant legislative rule analysis under RCW 34.05.328. An agency is not
required to prepare statements of inquiry under RCW 34.05.310 or conduct a
hearing for the expedited adoption of rules. The notice for the expedited
adoption of rules must contain a statement in at least ten-point type, that is
substantially in the following form:

NOTICE

THIS RULE IS BEING PROPOSED TO BE ADOPTED USING AN
EXPEDITED RULE-MAKING PROCESS THAT WILL ELIMINATE THE NEED FOR THE AGENCY TO
HOLD PUBLIC HEARINGS, PREPARE A SMALL BUSINESS ECONOMIC IMPACT STATEMENT, OR
PROVIDE RESPONSES TO THE CRITERIA FOR A SIGNIFICANT LEGISLATIVE RULE. IF YOU
OBJECT TO THIS RULE BEING ADOPTED USING THE EXPEDITED RULE-MAKING PROCESS, YOU
MUST EXPRESS YOUR OBJECTIONS IN WRITING AND THEY MUST BE SENT TO (INSERT NAME
AND ADDRESS) AND RECEIVED BY (INSERT DATE).

(3)
The agency shall send a copy of the notice of the proposed expedited rule
making to any person who has requested notification of proposals for the
expedited adoption of rules or of agency rule making, as well as the joint
administrative rules review committee, within three days after its publication
in the Washington State Register. An agency may charge for the actual cost of
providing a requesting party mailed copies of these notices. The notice of the
proposed expedited rule making must be preceded by a statement substantially in
the form provided in subsection (2) of this section. The notice must also
include an explanation of the reasons the agency believes the expedited
adoption of the rule is appropriate.

(4)
The code reviser shall publish the text of all rules proposed for expedited
adoption along with the notice required in this section in a separate section
of the Washington State Register. Once the text of the proposed rules has been
published in the Washington State Register, the only changes that an agency may
make in the text of these proposed rules before their final adoption are to
correct typographical errors.

(5)
Any person may file a written objection to the expedited adoption of a rule.
The objection must be filed with the agency rules coordinator within forty-five
days after the notice of the proposed expedited rule making has been published
in the Washington State Register. A person who has filed a written objection
to the expedited adoption of a rule may withdraw the objection.

(6)
If no written objections to the expedited adoption of a rule are filed with the
agency within forty-five days after the notice of proposed expedited rule
making is published, or if all objections that have been filed are withdrawn by
the persons filing the objections, the agency may enter an order adopting the
rule without further notice or a public hearing. The order must be published
in the manner required by this chapter for any other agency order adopting,
amending, or repealing a rule.

(7)
If a written notice of objection to the expedited adoption of the rule is
timely filed with the agency and is not withdrawn, the notice of proposed
expedited rule making published under this section is considered a statement of
inquiry for the purposes of RCW 34.05.310, and the agency may initiate further
rule adoption proceedings in accordance with this chapter.

(8)
This section expires December 31, 2000.

Sec.
5. RCW
34.05.350 and 1994 c 249 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If an agency for good cause finds:

(a)
That immediate adoption, amendment, or repeal of a rule is necessary for the
preservation of the public health, safety, or general welfare, and that
observing the time requirements of notice and opportunity to comment upon
adoption of a permanent rule would be contrary to the public interest; or

(b)
That state or federal law or federal rule or a federal deadline for state
receipt of federal funds requires immediate adoption of a rule,

the
agency may dispense with those requirements and adopt, amend, or repeal the
rule on an emergency basis. The agency's finding and a concise statement of
the reasons for its finding shall be incorporated in the order for adoption of
the emergency rule or amendment filed with the office of the code reviser under
RCW 34.05.380 and with the rules review committee.

(2)
An emergency rule adopted under this section takes effect upon filing with the
code reviser, unless (a) a later date is specified in the order of
adoption((, and)) or (b) it obligates the expenditure of taxpayer
funds, in which case it takes effect as provided under section 2 of this act.
An emergency rule may not remain in effect for longer than one hundred
twenty days after ((filing)) taking effect. Identical or
substantially similar emergency rules may not be adopted in sequence unless
conditions have changed or the agency has filed notice of its intent to adopt
the rule as a permanent rule, and is actively undertaking the appropriate procedures
to adopt the rule as a permanent rule. This section does not relieve any
agency from compliance with any law requiring that its permanent rules be
approved by designated persons or bodies before they become effective.

(3)
Within seven days after the rule is adopted, any person may petition the
governor requesting the immediate repeal of a rule adopted on an emergency
basis by any department listed in RCW 43.17.010. Within seven days after
submission of the petition, the governor shall either deny the petition in
writing, stating his or her reasons for the denial, or order the immediate
repeal of the rule. In ruling on the petition, the governor shall consider
only whether the conditions in subsection (1) of this section were met such
that adoption of the rule on an emergency basis was necessary. If the governor
orders the repeal of the emergency rule, any sanction imposed based on that
rule is void. This subsection shall not be construed to prohibit adoption of
any rule as a permanent rule.

(4) In adopting an emergency rule, the agency shall comply with
section 4 of this act or provide a written explanation for its failure to do
so.

---
END ---