BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.21C RCW to read as follows:

(1)
For a public project over one million dollars proposed by a county, the lead
agency for the purpose of the rules adopted under this chapter shall be the
nearest city with a population over one hundred thousand. The county shall pay
the costs of the city in serving as the lead agency.

(2) For a public project over one million dollars proposed by a
municipal or public corporation, the lead agency for the purpose of the rules
adopted under this chapter shall be the county in which the project is located.
The municipal or public corporation shall pay the costs of the county in
serving as the lead agency.

---
END ---