BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
12.40.010 and 1991 c 71 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

In every district court there shall be created and organized by the
court a department to be known as the "small claims department of the
district court."((.)) The small claims department shall
have jurisdiction, but not exclusive, in cases for the recovery of money only
if the amount claimed does not exceed ((two)) four thousand ((five
hundred)) dollars.

---
END ---