BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.94.200 and 1987 c 109 s 38 are each amended to read as follows:

For the purpose of investigating conditions specific to the
control, recovery or release of air contaminants into the atmosphere, a control
officer, the department, or their duly authorized representatives, shall have
the power to enter at reasonable times upon any private or public property,
excepting nonmultiple unit private dwellings housing two families or less. ((No
person shall refuse entry or access to any control officer, the department, or
their duly authorized representatives, who requests entry for the purpose of
inspection, and who presents appropriate credentials; nor shall any person
obstruct, hamper or interfere with any such inspection.)) If entry is
refused, the control officer, department, or their authorized representatives
may apply to any court of competent jurisdiction for a search warrant
authorizing access to such property. The court may upon such application and a
proper showing, issue the search warrant for the purposes requested.

---
END ---