BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that there is a diminishing supply of school nurses serving
the health needs of students in the state's school districts. The supply of
nurses has not increased in proportion to school enrollment. In addition, the
increasingly complex health needs of students can no longer be adequately met
by the delegation of nursing tasks to unlicensed and untrained school
personnel, such as teachers, teacher's assistants, and secretarial staff,
without compromising the health of students and exposing school districts to
legal liability. The delegation practices in public schools of complex nursing
tasks are of questionable legality and the opportunity for error has
life-threatening consequences. Removing health barriers to learning is essential
to the successful education of students, and should be addressed in the state's
school districts by recognizing established nursing practice standards and the
state's uniform professional accountability processes. The legislature
declares that the training of registered school health aides is in the interest
of public health and safety.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Commission" means the nursing care quality assurance commission
created in RCW 18.79.070.

(2)
"Department" means the department of health.

(3)
"School health aide" means a person registered under this chapter who
regularly performs ongoing nursing tasks delegated by a licensed registered
nurse as authorized by this chapter.

(4)
"Secretary" means the secretary of health.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
No certificated or noncertificated school district employee may practice or
represent himself or herself as a school health aide by use of any title or
description of services without being registered to practice by the department,
unless otherwise exempted by this chapter.

(2)
Nursing tasks delegated to a school health aide include those nursing
procedures applicable to school districts provided by law, including those
tasks determined by the commission by rule in consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction.

(3)
Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the scope of nursing
procedures applicable to school districts as provided by law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit or restrict:

(1)
The practice by an individual licensed, certified, or registered under the laws
of this state and performing services within the authorized scope of practice;

(2)
The practice by an individual employed by the government of the United States
while engaged in the performance of duties prescribed by the laws of the United
States; or

(3)
The practice by a person who is a regular student in an educational program
approved by the secretary, and whose performance of services is pursuant to a
regular course of instruction or assignments from an instructor and under the
general supervision of the instructor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. In
addition to any other authority provided by law, the secretary has the
authority to:

(1)
Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to implement this chapter;

(2)
Establish all registration, examination, and renewal fees in accordance with
RCW 43.70.250;

(3)
Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this chapter;

(4)
Register any applicants, and to deny registration to applicants who do not meet
the minimum qualifications, except that proceedings concerning the denial of
registration based upon unprofessional conduct or impairment shall be governed
by the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW;

(5)
Hire clerical, administrative, investigative, and other staff as needed to
implement this chapter, and hire individuals registered under this chapter to
serve as examiners for any practical examinations;

(6)
Determine minimum education or training requirements;

(7)
Determine whether alternative methods of training are equivalent to formal
education, and establish forms, procedures, and criteria for evaluation of an
applicant's alternative training to determine the applicant's eligibility for
registration;

(8)
Implement and administer a program for consumer education;

(9)
Adopt rules implementing a continuing competency program; and

(10)
Maintain the official department record of all applicants and persons
registered under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
secretary shall keep an official record of all proceedings. A part of the
record shall consist of a register of all applicants for registration under
this chapter and the results of each application.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. The
secretary shall issue a registration to any applicant who completes an
application that identifies the name and address of the applicant, the
registration being requested, and information required by the secretary
necessary to establish whether there are grounds for denial of a registration
or issuance of a conditional registration under chapter 18.130 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. The
commission, in consultation with the superintendent of public instruction,
shall establish by rule the standards and procedures for approval of
educational and alternative training programs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9.
Applications for registration shall be submitted on forms provided by the
secretary. The secretary may require any information and documentation that
reasonably relates to the need to determine whether the applicant meets the
criteria for registration provided for in this chapter and chapter 18.130 RCW.
Each applicant shall pay a fee determined by the secretary under RCW
43.70.250. The fee shall accompany the application.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. The
secretary shall establish by rule the procedural requirements and fees for
renewal of a registration. Failure to renew shall invalidate the registration
and all privileges granted by the registration. If a registration has lapsed
for a period longer than three years, the person shall demonstrate competence
to the satisfaction of the secretary by taking continuing education courses, or
meeting other standards determined by the secretary.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. The
uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs the issuance and denial
of registrations, unauthorized practice, and the discipline of persons
registered under this chapter. The secretary is the disciplining authority
under this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 12. This
chapter only applies to a business or profession regulated under the laws of
this state if this chapter is specifically referenced in the laws regulating
that business or profession.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 13. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 14.
Sections 1 through 13 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 18 RCW.

---
END ---