BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It
has been found that a number of convicted and incarcerated people have been
proven innocent by DNA evidence unavailable at the time of conviction. It is
the intent of the legislature to maximize the use of advances in DNA technology
for the purposes of exonerating convicted offenders and prosecuting offenders.
Use of DNA technology requires a deliberated balance between the pursuit of
truth and finality in the criminal justice system. The national institute of
justice has published a report from the national commission on the future of
DNA evidence. The report entitled "Postconviction DNA: Recommendations
for Handling Requests, September 1999 NCJ 177626," makes recommendations
to prosecutors, defense counsel, law enforcement personnel, the court, victims'
advocates, and laboratory personnel. The legislature finds it in the best
interests of the public health, safety, and welfare to implement the
recommendations of the report state-wide.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 10.73 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
On or before December 31, 2002, a person convicted in this state may submit a
request to the county prosecutor in the county where the conviction was
obtained for postconviction DNA testing, if DNA evidence was not admitted
because the court ruled DNA testing did not meet acceptable scientific
standards or DNA testing technology was not sufficiently developed to test the
DNA evidence in the case. On and after January 1, 2003, a person must raise
the DNA issues at trial or on appeal.

(2)
The prosecutor shall screen the request. The request should be categorized
based upon the likelihood that the DNA evidence would demonstrate innocence,
reasonable doubt of guilt, be helpful relevant evidence, or is a frivolous
request. The prosecutor must consider the state of evidence or technology to
produce inconclusive or conclusive results and the presence of DNA evidence in
the case. Upon determining the category of the case and that the case is not
frivolous, the prosecutor shall proceed to court with appropriate motions to
initiate DNA testing in cases where DNA testing more probably than not would
result in newly discovered evidence material for the defendant. Notice shall be
served on any party the court may require to produce evidence for DNA testing.
Contact with the victims shall be handled through victim/witness divisions,
according to the recommendations in the report.

(3)
A convicted offender has a right to appeal his or her request within thirty
days of service of the request upon the prosecutor in the event the prosecutor
does not file a motion to initiate DNA testing. The appeal shall be to
superior court.

(4) Any person who the court determines to be indigent shall be
appointed counsel. The costs of DNA testing shall be paid for any indigent
person who obtains an order for DNA testing under this chapter.

---
END ---