BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 1 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

(1)
The transportation budget of the state is hereby adopted and, subject to the
provisions hereinafter set forth, the several amounts hereinafter specified, or
as much thereof as may be necessary to accomplish the purposes designated, are
hereby appropriated from the several accounts and funds hereinafter named to
the designated state agencies and offices for employee compensation and other
expenses, for capital projects, and for other specified purposes, including the
payment of any final judgments arising out of such activities, for the period
ending June 30, 2001.

(2)
Legislation with fiscal impacts enacted in the 1997 or 1998 legislative session
not assumed in this act are not funded in the 1997-99 transportation budget.

(3)
Legislation with fiscal impacts enacted in the 1999 legislative session not
assumed in this act are not funded in the 1999-01 transportation budget.

(4)
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this
subsection apply throughout this act.

(a)
"Fiscal year 2000" or "FY 2000" means the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2000.

(b)
"Fiscal year 2001" or "FY 2001" means the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2001.

(c)
"FTE" means full-time equivalent.

(d)
"Lapse" or "revert" means the amount shall return to an
unappropriated status.

(e)
"Provided solely" means the specified amount may be spent only for
the specified purpose. Unless otherwise specifically authorized in this
act, any portion of an amount provided solely for a specified purpose which is
unnecessary to fulfill the specified purpose shall lapse.

(f)
"Provided for" means the agency may apportion the specified amount
among identified uses as the director or secretary deems most prudent.

(g)
"Performance-based budgeting" means a budget that bases resource
needs on quantified outcomes and results expected from use of the total
appropriation. "Performance-based budgeting" does not mean
incremental budgeting that focuses on justifying changes from the historic
budget or to line-item input-driven budgets.

(((g)))
(h) "Goals" means the statements of purpose that identify a
desired result or outcome. The statements shall be realistic, achievable,
directive, assignable, evaluative, and logically linked to the agency's mission
and statutory mandate.

(((h)))
(i) "Strategic plan" means the strategies agencies create for
investment choices in the future. All agency strategic plans shall present
alternative investment strategies for providing services.

(j)
"Enacted in the form passed by the legislature" means the referenced
bill, as identified by a four-digit number, was:

(i)
Passed by the legislature and enacted either with no provisions vetoed by the
governor or with only ministerial or de minimus changes resulting from a
partial veto; or

(ii)
Attached in full onto another bill as an amendment and the entire bill,
including the amendment, was passed by the legislature and enacted either with
no provisions vetoed by the governor or with only ministerial or de minimus
changes resulting from a partial veto.

PART
I

GENERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES-‑OPERATING

Sec.
101. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 101 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF AGRICULTURE

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ ((327,000))

311,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

The
entire appropriation is provided solely for costs associated with the motor
fuel quality program.

Sec.
102. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 102 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE LEGISLATIVE
EVALUATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ ((900,000))

887,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
$103,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the local government
finance reporting system project. This amount shall lapse unless $207,000 is
appropriated for this project from the state general fund; and

(2)
$202,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for the transportation
infrastructure needs data base project. This amount shall lapse unless
$405,000 is appropriated for this project in the omnibus operations
appropriations act.

(3)
$325,000 of the appropriation is provided solely for contracting with the
office of the state auditor for the collection of local government fiscal data
associated with the local government finance reporting system. In implementing
the reporting system, the legislative evaluation and accountability program
shall work with the local government finance study technical advisory
committee. The committee shall include, but not be limited to, one member from
the senate and one member from the house of representatives. An alternate
legislator shall also be picked for each designated legislator to serve in the
event that the designated legislator is unable to fulfill his or her duties on
the committee. This amount shall lapse unless the legislature appropriates
$325,000 for the same purpose by June 30, 1999, in the omnibus appropriations
act.

(4)
To the extent possible, the appropriation in subsections (1) through (3) of
this section shall utilize funds allocated under RCW 46.68.110(2).

Sec.
103. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 103 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE UTILITIES
AND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION

Grade
Crossing Protective Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ ((111,000))

222,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The utilities and transportation commission shall develop a competitive rail
grade crossing safety grant program which will fully fund selected safety
projects to the extent allowable under chapter 81.53 RCW.

(((3)
The appropriation in this section is for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000.))

(2)
To the extent possible under current program guidelines, the utilities and
transportation commission's small projects program and grade crossing
protection program shall give preference to those projects that enhance safety
at railroad lines that operate high speed trains and are located within city
limits.

Sec.
104. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 104 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE
PARKS AND RECREATION COMMISSION

Motor Vehicle
Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ ((931,000))

859,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: A
report of actual expenditures and descriptions of the expenditures from the
motor vehicle fund will be submitted to the legislature with the governor's
2001-2003 biennial budget request.

GENERAL
GOVERNMENT AGENCIES‑-CAPITAL

Sec.
105. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 105 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
WASHINGTON STATE PARKS AND RECREATION‑-CAPITAL
PROJECTS

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 2,690,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
$900,000 is a reappropriation provided to complete the Cama Beach project and
the Damon point project funded in section 110, chapter 457, Laws of 1997. The
projects shall be completed by June 30, 2001. Upon completion of these
projects any surplus funding may be used for the projects listed in subsection
(2) of this section.

(2)
$1,790,000 is a one-time appropriation provided solely for the following
projects, apportioned as follows:

(a)
Ike Kinswa State Park, $100,000 to commission a hydrology and geology study for
the park road drainage system and a traffic study of the intersection of the
park entrance roads with SR 122;

(b)
Mt. Spokane State Park, $1,300,000;

(c)
Beacon Rock State Park, $300,000; and

(d)
Cama Beach State Park, $90,000.

These
projects shall be completed by June 30, 2001. Project status reports shall be
submitted to the senate transportation committee and the house of
representatives transportation committee in January 2000 and January 2001.

(3) A legislative subcommittee shall be established to address
the issue of funding for state parks' capital roadway projects and determine
the funding source. The membership of this subcommittee shall be comprised as
follows: Two members from the house transportation committee; two members from
the house capital budget committee; two members from the senate transportation
committee; and two members from the senate ways and means capital budget
subcommittee. Findings and recommendations must be submitted to the senate and
house of representatives transportation committees, the house of
representatives capital budget committee and the senate ways and means
committee by December 1, 2000.

(End of part)

PART
II

TRANSPORTATION
AGENCIES

Sec.
201. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 201 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE WASHINGTON
TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMISSION

Highway
Safety Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ 1,452,000

Highway
Safety Account‑-Federal Appropriation... $........................................... 9,038,000

School
Zone Safety Account‑-State Appropriation $ 1,004,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 11,494,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and limitations
and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
$25,000 of the highway safety account‑-state is provided as a one-time
appropriation to implement the Cooper Jones act, chapter 165, Laws of 1998.

(2)
The Washington traffic safety commission may oversee no more than four pilot
projects regarding the use of traffic safety cameras at school zones and/or
railroad crossings and no more than one pilot project regarding the use of
traffic safety cameras at school zones, stoplights, and/or railroad crossings.
The traffic safety commission shall use the following guidelines to administer
the program:

(a)
Traffic safety cameras may take pictures of the vehicle and vehicle license
plate only;

(b)
The law enforcement agency of the city or county government shall plainly mark
the locations where the automated traffic enforcement system is used by placing
signs on street locations that clearly indicate to a driver that he or she is
entering a zone where traffic laws are enforced by an automated traffic
enforcement system;

(c)
Cities and counties using traffic safety cameras must provide periodic notice
by mail to its citizens indicating the zones in which the traffic safety
cameras will be used;

(d)
Notices of infractions must be mailed to the registered owner of a vehicle
within fourteen days of the infraction occurring;

(e)
The owner of the vehicle is not responsible for the violation if the owner of
the vehicle, within fifteen days after notification of the violation, furnishes
the officials or agents of the municipality that issued the citation with:

(i)
An affidavit made under oath, stating that the vehicle involved was, at the
time, stolen or in the care, custody, or control of some person other than the
registered owner; or

(ii)
Testimony in open court under oath that the person was not the operator of the
vehicle at the time of the alleged violation;

(f)
Infractions detected through the use of traffic safety cameras are not part of
the registered owner's driving record under RCW 46.52.101 and 46.52.120;

(g)
By January 1, 2001, the traffic safety commission shall provide a report to the
legislature regarding the use, public acceptance, outcomes, and other relevant
issues regarding traffic safety cameras demonstrated by the pilot projects.

Sec.
202. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 202 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE BOARD
OF PILOTAGE COMMISSIONERS

Pilotage
Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ ((290,000))

253,000

Sec.
203. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 203 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE COUNTY
ROAD ADMINISTRATION BOARD

Rural
Arterial Trust Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((72,510,000))

60,568,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((9,546,000))

1,661,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 376,000

County
Arterial Preservation Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((28,612,000))

28,542,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((111,044,000))

91,147,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: (($8,000,000))
$240,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided
solely for ((projects)) the completion of a study updating the
legislature on the freight and goods road systems on county roads.

Sec.
204. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 204 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE TRANSPORTATION
IMPROVEMENT BOARD

Urban
Arterial Trust Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((104,508,000))

104,433,000

Transportation
Improvement Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((99,414,000))

148,814,000

Public
Transportation Systems Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((33,496,000))

4,532,000

Multimodal
Transportation Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 11,977,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((237,418,000))

269,756,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: ((To
the extent practicable, the board shall give preference, for amounts which
would otherwise be granted to cities, to those projects which complement
projects funded under the county corridor congestion relief program contained
in section 231(8) of this act.)) The transportation improvement account‑-state
appropriation includes $60,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds,
$30,000,000 authorized by RCW 47.26.500, and $30,000,000 authorized by House
Bill No. 2788. If House Bill No. 2788 is not enacted in the form passed by the
legislature $30,000,000 of the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

Sec.
205. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 205 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE SENATE

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((2,586,000))

2,436,000

((The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The appropriation in this section is provided solely to fund the activities of
the senate transportation committee.

(2)
The senate transportation committee shall work during the 1999 interim with
members of the senate ways and means committee to assess funding options for
aviation.

(3)
The senate transportation committee shall evaluate the transportation functions
currently performed by the utilities and transportation commission including
but not limited to those regarding the issuance of certificates of public
convenience and necessity for auto transportation companies.

(4)
A legislative task force consisting of one member from each caucus of the
senate and one member from each caucus of the house of representatives shall
conduct a road jurisdiction study. The legislative task force shall appoint a
technical advisory panel consisting of representatives of cities, counties, and
the department of transportation. The study shall include but not be limited
to an examination of the following issues:

(a)
Whether changed conditions merit redesignation of certain local roadways as
state routes and the return of certain state routes to local jurisdictions;

(b)
Alternatives to current revenue distribution methodologies for funding roadway
and highway needs;

(c)
Determine roadway responsibilities, authorities, and practices by
jurisdictional level; and

(d)
Evaluate governance issues associated with road jurisdiction.

(5)
The committee shall oversee program accountability reviews of department of
transportation, department of licensing, and Washington state patrol programs
selected by the senate transportation committee.))

Sec.
206. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 206 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE LEGISLATIVE TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE

Motor
Vehicle Account--State Appropriation..... $ ((4,283,000))

3,633,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
$2,467,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is provided for
the operation of the house of representatives transportation committee. The
appropriation includes $500,000 for personal service contracts and other
activities as deemed necessary by the house of representatives transportation
committee.

(2)
((The transportation committees of the legislature shall evaluate the
transportation functions currently performed by the utilities and
transportation commission including but not limited to those regarding the
issuance of certificates of public convenience and necessity for auto
transportation companies.

(3)
A legislative task force consisting of one member from each caucus of the
senate and one member from each caucus of the house of representatives shall
conduct a road jurisdiction study. The legislative task force shall appoint a
technical advisory panel consisting of representatives of cities, counties, and
the department of transportation. The study shall include but not be limited
to an examination of the following issues:

(a)
Whether changed conditions merit redesignation of certain local roadways as
state routes and the return of certain state routes to local jurisdictions;

(b)
Alternatives to current revenue distribution methodologies for funding roadway
and highway needs;

(c)
Determine roadway responsibilities, authorities, and practices by jurisdictional
level; and

(d)
Evaluate governance issues associated with road jurisdiction.

(4)
The transportation committees of the legislature shall oversee program
accountability reviews of department of transportation, department of
licensing, and Washington state patrol programs selected by the senate
transportation committee)) To the extent possible,
this appropriation shall utilize funds allocated under RCW 46.68.110(2).

Sec.
207. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 207 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE BLUE
RIBBON COMMISSION ON TRANSPORTATION

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 1,800,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity: (((1)))
The $1,800,000 motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for the purpose of enabling the blue ribbon commission on transportation
to fulfill its mission. The funds are to be administered by the senate
transportation committee and the house of representatives transportation
committee on behalf of the blue ribbon commission on transportation. To the
extent possible, this appropriation shall utilize funds allocated under RCW
46.68.110(2).

Sec.
208. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 208 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE MARINE
EMPLOYEES COMMISSION

Puget
Sound Ferry Operations Account‑-

State
Appropriation............................. $ ((356,000))

322,000

Sec.
209. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 209 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE TRANSPORTATION
COMMISSION

((Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation))

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((807,000))

767,000

Sec.
210. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 210 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE FREIGHT
MOBILITY STRATEGIC INVESTMENT BOARD

((Transportation))
Motor Vehicle Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((600,000))

540,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The freight mobility strategic investment board is authorized to revise the
criteria for selecting and ranking freight mobility projects, to be applied
during the next call for projects. The original portfolio of projects
submitted by the board to the legislature in December of 1999 shall not be
impacted by any revisions to the criteria.

(2)
The legislature recognizes that the freight mobility strategic investment board
has submitted projects meeting the geographic allocation requirements of RCW
47.06A.050, even though some of the projects ultimately will be funded with
regionally‑allocated federal funds.

Sec.
211. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 211 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL‑-FIELD OPERATIONS
BUREAU

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((154,538,000))

154,314,000

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-

Federal
Appropriation...................... $ 6,153,000

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-

Private/Local
Appropriation................ $ 169,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((160,860,000))

160,636,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
((The following amounts are provided solely for administration of the field
operations group subprogram: $120,372,000 of the state patrol highway account‑-state
appropriation; $2,854,000 of the state patrol highway account‑-federal
appropriation; and $83,000 of the state patrol highway account‑-private/local
appropriation.

(2)
The following amounts are provided solely for the administration of the
commercial vehicle division subprogram: $26,367,000 of the state patrol highway
account‑-state appropriation; $3,299,000 of the state patrol highway
account‑-federal appropriation; and $86,000 of the state patrol highway
account‑-private/local appropriation.

(3)
$7,799,000 of the state patrol highway account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for the administration of the traffic investigation division
subprogram.

(4)
$1,137,000 of the state patrol highway account--state appropriation is provided
solely for the license fraud task force to begin on July 1, 1999. Positions
funded are one sergeant/detective, three Washington state patrol detectives,
and one clerical support person, for administrative support for the task force
as a whole. $115,400 of this amount is for reimbursement to the department of
revenue and $228,315 of this amount is for reimbursement to the attorney
general's office. If Senate Bill No. 5706 is not enacted in the form passed by
the legislature the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse. Any funds
provided in this subsection not used to implement Senate Bill No. 5706 as
enacted by the legislature shall revert at the end of the 1999-01 biennium.

(5)))
$1,435,000 of the state patrol highway account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely to the field operations group subprogram as a one-time
appropriation to begin funding phase III of the Washington state patrol's
upgrade to the state-wide emergency communication system. The Washington state
patrol shall provide a full analysis of the costs, benefits, and requirements
for completing all phases of the upgrade to the state-wide emergency
communication system to the senate transportation committee and the house of
representatives transportation committee by December 1, 1999.

(((6)))
(2) The Washington state patrol is authorized to use the federal
community-oriented policing program (COPS) for 18 COPS troopers to begin in
July 2000. The troopers must be used on the state's highways and up to six may
be utilized in the Vancouver, Washington area.

Sec.
212. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 212 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE WASHINGTON STATE PATROL‑-SUPPORT
SERVICES BUREAU

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((67,015,000))

65,621,000

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-

Federal
Appropriation...................... $ 104,000

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-

Private/Local
Appropriation................ $ 743,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((67,862,000))

66,468,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:
$877,000 of the state patrol highway account‑‑state appropriation
is provided solely to maintain pursuit vehicles and provide for replacement of
the vehicles at 110,000 miles. The agency may purchase a total of 354 pursuit
vehicles during the biennium ending June 30, 2001. The appropriation in this
section reflects carry forward and new funding due to the consolidation of
gasoline, maintenance, parts, and pursuit vehicles into the fleet section of
the support services bureau.

Sec.
213. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 213 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING‑-MANAGEMENT
AND SUPPORT SERVICES

Marine
Fuel Tax Refund Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,000

Motorcycle
Safety Education Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((118,000))

102,000

Wildlife
Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ ((50,000))

80,000

Highway
Safety Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ ((6,578,000))

7,074,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((4,571,000))

3,998,000

DOL
Services Account‑-State Appropriation...... $ 123,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((11,317,000))

11,380,000

Sec.
214. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 214 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING‑-INFORMATION
SYSTEMS

Marine
Fuel Tax Refund Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 2,000

Motorcycle
Safety Education Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((102,000))

44,000

Wildlife
Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ ((46,000))

32,000

Highway
Safety Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ ((5,725,000))

5,953,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((3,651,000))

2,909,000

DOL
Services Account‑-State Appropriation...... $ 292,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((9,524,000))

9,232,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:
$745,000 of the highway safety fund‑-state appropriation is a
reappropriation of funds originally appropriated for the document scanner
project in the 1997-99 biennium.

Sec.
215. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 215 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF LICENSING‑-VEHICLE SERVICES

Marine
Fuel Tax Refund Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 26,000

Wildlife
Account‑-State Appropriation.......... $ 556,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((56,137,000))

53,532,000

DOL
Services Account‑-State Appropriation...... $ ((2,907,000))

3,057,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((59,626,000))

57,171,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(((4)))
(1) $300,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement Senate Bill No. 6009 enacted in the form passed by
the legislature. If Senate Bill No. 6009 is not enacted in the form passed by
the legislature the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((5)))
(2) $15,000 of the motor vehicle account--state appropriation is
provided solely to implement House Bill No. 2201 enacted in the form passed by
the legislature.

(3)
$150,000 of the DOL services account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for the purchase and implementation of a revenue system to accompany the
department's electronic commerce initiative.

Sec.
216. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 216 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF LICENSING‑-DRIVER SERVICES

Motorcycle
Safety Education Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((1,960,000))

2,210,000

Highway
Safety Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ ((78,075,000))

77,971,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((80,035,000))

80,181,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
By January 1, 2001, the department shall report to the transportation
committees of the house of representatives and the senate on the progress of
the driver history initiative project and make recommendations for implementing
this project on a state-wide level.

(2)
$2,880,000 of the highway safety account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely for the department to enter into a contract for the implementation of an
improved state driver's license and identicard. The contract with the vendor
providing the improved license and identicard shall state that the license and
the identicard shall not contain: (a) The driver's social security number in
either visible or machine readable form; or (b) the driver's fingerprint or
thumbprint. Consistent with RCW 42.17.260(9) the department shall not sell or
otherwise make available any information that it gathers from citizens of the
state of Washington in administering the driver's licensing program except as
already authorized in Title 46 RCW.

(((2)))
(3) In September of 1999 the department of licensing shall report to the
senate transportation committee and the house of representatives transportation
committee on:

(a)
The controls implemented by the department to ensure the integrity and
credibility of the written driver's license test administered by the
department; and

(b)
The policies and procedures implemented by the department to ensure that the
driver's manuals produced and distributed by the department contain correct
data based on current federal, state, and local statutes, ordinances, and
rules.

(4)
$17,000 of the highway safety fund--state appropriation is provided solely to
implement House Bill No. 1774 enacted in the form passed by the legislature.
If House Bill No. 1774 is not enacted in the form passed by the legislature the
amount referenced in this subsection shall lapse.

(5)
$130,000 of the highway safety fund‑-state appropriation is provided
solely to implement House Bill No. 2259 enacted in the form passed by the
legislature. If House Bill No. 2259 is not enacted in the form passed by the
legislature the amount provided in this subsection shall lapse.

(((6)
$34,000 of the highway safety fund‑-state appropriation is provided
solely to implement Senate Bill No. 5374 enacted in the form passed by the
legislature. If Senate Bill No. 5374 is not enacted in the form passed by the
legislature the amount referenced in this subsection shall lapse.

(8)
$329,000 of the highway safety account--state appropriation is provided solely
to implement Senate Bill No. 5399 enacted as passed by the legislature.))

Sec.
217. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 217 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-HIGHWAY
MANAGEMENT AND FACILITIES‑-PROGRAM D‑-OPERATING

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((44,508,000))

45,236,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation... $ 400,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((44,908,000))

45,636,000

Sec.
218. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 218 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-AVIATION‑-PROGRAM F

Aeronautics
Account‑-State Appropriation........ $...................................... ((4,010,000))

5,047,000

Aircraft
Search and Rescue Safety and

Education
Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 159,000

((Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation... $........................................... 247,000))

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((4,416,000))

5,206,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations: Grants awarded by the department of transportation shall
emphasize safety-related activities.

Sec.
219. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 219 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-IMPROVEMENTS‑-PROGRAM I

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((630,010,000))

459,765,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation... $ ((234,939,000))

240,241,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ ((43,344,000))

50,363,000

((High
Capacity Transportation Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 110,000))

Special
Category C Account‑-State Appropriation $ 55,220,000

((Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation... $........................................... 197,284,000

Transportation
Account‑-Federal Appropriation... $........................................... 56,808,000))

Puyallup
Tribal Settlement Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 8,662,000

((Transportation
Infrastructure Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,750,000

Transportation
Infrastructure Account‑-

Private/Local
Appropriation................ $ 1,750,000))

Multimodal
Transportation Account--State

Appropriation.............................. $ 4,880,000

Multimodal
Transportation Account--Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,275,000

Multimodal
Transportation Account--Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,106,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((1,229,877,000))

821,512,000

The
appropriations in this section are provided for the location, design, right of
way acquisition, or construction of state highway projects designated as
improvements under RCW 47.05.030. The appropriations in this section are
subject to the following conditions and limitations and specified amounts are
provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The special category C account‑-state appropriation of $55,220,000
includes $40,500,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by Senate
Bill No. 5060 or House Bill No. 1203 enacted in the form passed by the
legislature. The transportation commission may authorize the use of current
revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds
for any part of the state appropriation.

(2)
The motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation includes $1,285,000 in
proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.819(1) for match on
federal demonstration projects. The transportation commission may authorize
the use of current revenues available to the department of transportation in
lieu of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.

(3)
The department shall report December 1st and June 1st of each year to the
senate transportation committee and the house of representatives transportation
committee and the office of financial management on the timing and the scope of
work being performed for the regional transit authority known as sound
transit. This report shall provide a description of all department activities
related to the regional transit authority including investments in state‑owned
infrastructure.

(4)
The motor vehicle account‑-federal appropriation in this section is
transferrable to the transportation account or multimodal transportation
account to ensure efficient funds management and program delivery.

(5)
((The north Sumner interchange project shall be funded entirely from the
motor vehicle account appropriation.)) $2,270,000 of the motor vehicle
account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the north Sumner
interchange project. The project shall no longer receive a portion of its
funding from the economic development account.

(6)
(($34,920,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation)) $4,880,000
of the multimodal transportation account--state appropriation is provided
solely for the state program share of freight mobility projects as identified
by the freight mobility strategic investment board. The amount provided in
this subsection can only be expended upon authorization from the freight
mobility strategic investment board.

(7)
The motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation includes (($469,779,000))
$147,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.843. The transportation commission may authorize the use of current
revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds
for any part of the state appropriation.

(8)
(($500,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for analysis and design of congestion solutions at the
intersections of the South Lake Union/Mercer corridor with Interstate 5 and SR
99. The amount provided in this subsection shall be expended on the state's
portion of the project. The department's authority to expend the amount
referenced in this subsection is contingent on the city of Seattle
appropriating $500,000 or more toward design and analysis for the local street
portion of the project.

(9)
$10,000,000)) (a) $50,000,000 of the motor vehicle
account--state appropriation ((and $40,000,000 of the transportation account‑-state
appropriation are)) is provided as a cash contribution for the
development of the public private initiatives project at Tacoma Narrows. State
funds shall be used initially for the acquisition of right of way and the
forensic studies of the existing bridge including purchase of equipment
necessary to conduct the studies. The balance of state funds not required for
acquisition of right of way and forensic studies shall be placed with the
designated bond trustee at the same time the privately secured debt proceeds
are deposited.

(b)
The $50,000,000 provided in (a) of this subsection includes $5,527,000 in
proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.834 for all forms of
cash contributions, or payment of other costs incident to the location,
development, design, right of way, and construction of the Tacoma narrows
bridge improvements under the public-private transportation initiative program
authorized under chapter 47.46 RCW.

(((11)))
(9) $5,800,000 of the motor vehicle account‑‑state
appropriation is provided solely for the completion of the weigh stations at
Stanwood and Cle Elum along with weigh in motion at those sites ((an)) and
weigh in motion at Fort Lewis Northbound. The Washington state patrol and
department of transportation shall work cooperatively to complete these
projects.

(((12)))
(10) $485,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is
a reappropriation provided solely to enable the translake committee to finalize
and present its recommendations. Upon presentation of the recommendations, or
upon the expenditure of the appropriation provided by this subsection, the
department of transportation shall disband the committee.

(((13)))
(11) $800,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation ((is))
and $3,000,000 of the motor vehicle account--federal appropriation are
provided solely to the Washington state department of transportation, office of
urban mobility, to advance the recommendations of the translake Washington
study committee. These funds shall be used to develop a scope of work for an
environmental impact statement and related engineering work, including an
environmental strategy, a decision process, a statement of purpose and need,
and a formal notice of intent. None of the appropriation for the scope of work
for the environmental impact statement shall be available to support any
activities of the translake Washington study committee.

(((14)
$500,000)) (12) $1,166,000 of the motor vehicle fund‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for predesign of the northeast 44th street
interchange on I-405. ((The department of transportation and the city of
Renton shall develop a proposal that includes a funding plan for the
interchange that specifies the partner's share of the cost. The department and
the city shall report to the legislative transportation committees by December
1, 1999.)) This amount shall be placed into a reserve status until such
time as a one-third contribution is made by the city of Renton and a one-third
contribution is made by the project developer. If the city and developer
contributions are not obtained by October 31, 2000, this amount shall lapse.

(13)
The department's work force levels for highway construction for the 1999-2001
biennium shall be 2200 FTEs. Additional work force increases for highway
construction are authorized and shall not exceed five percent of the authorized
work force. The department shall report quarterly on program delivery and
related work force adjustments.

(14)
$1,250,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is provided
solely to establish alternatives for flood management and flood hazard
reduction projects in the Chehalis basin.

(a)
The department of transportation shall convene a technical committee to develop
watershed-based solutions to flooding within the Chehalis basin. The technical
committee shall be comprised of representatives of the department of
transportation, department of ecology, department of fish and wildlife, the
department of community, trade, and economic development, the military
department's emergency management division, and affected counties and tribes.
The department of transportation shall also seek the participation of the
United States army corps of engineers, federal emergency management
administration, the United States geological survey, the United States fish and
wildlife service, the United States environmental protection agency, and other
entities with critical knowledge related to the structural or nonstructural
flood hazard reduction projects in the Chehalis basin. Funds shall be
distributed by the department of transportation for alternative analysis,
mapping, and model testing projects as recommended by the technical committee.
The solutions considered by the technical committee shall be consistent with
fish and habitat recovery efforts and avoid additional flood hazard to
downstream communities. The department of transportation shall present a
report to the senate transportation committee and the house of representatives
transportation committee by December 1, 1999, regarding findings and progress
made by funded projects.

(b)
If the federal government makes funds available to accomplish the project
described in (a) of this subsection, the department of transportation shall
place the appropriation identified in this section in reserve.

Sec.
220. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 220 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSPORTATION
ECONOMIC PARTNERSHIPS‑-PROGRAM K

((Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation... $........................................... 1,212,000))

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((10,162,000))

5,847,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((11,374,000))

5,847,000

The
appropriation((s)) in this section ((are)) is subject to
the following conditions and limitations and specified amounts are provided
solely for that activity:

(1)
The motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation includes (($10,162,000))
$4,635,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.834
for all forms of cash contributions, or the payment of other costs incident to
the location, development, design, right of way, and construction of the Tacoma
narrows bridge improvements under the public-private transportation initiative
program authorized under chapter 47.46 RCW; and for support costs of the
public-private transportation initiatives program.

(2)
The department of transportation and the freight mobility strategic investment
board must coordinate activities relating to relieving traffic congestion and
promoting the movement of freight.

Sec.
221. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 221 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE‑-PROGRAM M

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((251,426,000))

239,927,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation... $ ((887,000))

486,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,417,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((255,730,000))

243,830,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
If portions of the appropriations in this section are required to fund
maintenance work resulting from major disasters not covered by federal
emergency funds such as fire, flooding, and major slides, supplemental
appropriations will be requested to restore state funding for ongoing
maintenance activities.

(2)
The department shall request an unanticipated receipt for any federal moneys
received for emergency snow and ice removal and shall place an equal amount of
the motor vehicle fund‑-state into unallotted status. This exchange
shall not affect the amount of funding available for snow and ice removal.

(3)
The department shall not close any highway rest areas but shall continue to
operate and maintain all existing rest areas. The department shall convene a
panel of stakeholders to evaluate innovative financing options and partnership
opportunities at safety rest areas on state highways. At a minimum, the
evaluation shall include: (a) A survey of relevant laws that impact the
state's ability to create public‑private partnerships or utilize
innovative financing techniques for the maintenance and operation of safety
rest areas; and (b) an identification of maintenance and operation activities
necessary to ensure continuous operation of safety rest areas. By December 1,
2000, the stakeholder panel shall make recommendations to the house of
representatives and senate transportation committees and the office of
financial management on the feasibility of instituting a pilot project for
public‑private partnerships or innovative financing of safety rest areas.

Sec.
222. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 222 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-PRESERVATION‑-PROGRAM P

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((318,691,000))

103,569,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation... $ ((284,587,000))

386,087,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ ((3,117,000))

4,117,000

((Transportation
Account)) Multimodal

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation $ ((121,000))

38,121,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((606,516,000))

531,894,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The motor vehicle fund‑-state appropriation includes $6,650,000 in
proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized in RCW 47.10.761 and 47.10.762 for
emergency purposes. However, the transportation commission may authorize the
use of current revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu
of bond proceeds for any part of the state appropriation.

(2)
The motor vehicle account‑-federal appropriation in this section is
transferrable to the transportation account or multimodal transportation
account to ensure efficient funds management and program delivery.

(3)
The department's work force levels for highway construction for the 1999-2001
biennium shall be 2200 FTEs. Additional work force increases for highway
construction are authorized and shall not exceed five percent of the authorized
work force. The department shall report quarterly on program delivery and
related work force adjustments.

(4)
The department of transportation is authorized to maximize the use of federal
and state funds to implement the provisions of this section.

Sec.
223. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 223 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-TRAFFIC
OPERATIONS‑-PROGRAM Q

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-State

Appropriation.......................... ... $ 221,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((37,085,000))

33,793,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation... $ 1,662,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 122,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((39,090,000))

35,798,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and the specified amount is provided solely for that activity:

(1)
The motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation includes $4,324,000 for
state matching funds for federally selected competitive grant or congressional
earmark projects other than commercial vehicle information system and network
(CVISN). These moneys shall be placed into reserve status until such time as
federal funds are secured and a state match is required. If matching federal
funds are not obtained by September 30, 2000, the amount provided in this
subsection shall lapse.

(2)
The motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation includes $600,000 for a
two-year pilot program for contracted roving service patrols. The department
shall provide a progress report on this pilot program to the office of
financial management, the senate transportation committee, and the house of
representatives transportation committee on December 1, 2000. The pilot
program will be evaluated with future direction and funding to be determined by
the documented results and benefits of the pilot program.

(3)
Projects selected by the department in this section must be selected using
safety-related and congestion-related criteria.

Sec.
224. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 224 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT‑-PROGRAM S

Puget
Sound Capital Construction Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((4,464,000))

2,989,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((98,390,000))

84,062,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation... $ 125,000

Puget
Sound Ferry Operations Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((6,308,000))

6,353,000

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ ((1,517,000))

115,000

Multimodal
Transportation Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,402,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((110,804,000))

95,046,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and the specified amount is provided solely for that activity:

(1)
(($586,000)) $75,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely to enable the secretary of transportation to
implement a leadership training program at the department of transportation.
The program shall include a mentoring component. The department shall develop
performance measures to evaluate the effectiveness of the program, including
but not limited to a performance measure to determine the effect of the program
on employee retention. The department shall provide a progress report on the
training program to the office of financial management, the senate
transportation committee, and the house of representatives transportation
committee by December 1, 2000.

(2)
Appropriation transfers from transportation management and support to the
transportation equipment fund for management information services activities
shall be permitted through fiscal year 2000. Effective July 1, 2000,
expenditures for these activities shall be charged directly to transportation
management and support.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 225. RCW
47.08.125 (Transfer of purchases to transportation equipment
fund--Charge for computer services) and 1979 c 39 s 2 are each repealed.

Sec.
226. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 225 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSPORTATION PLANNING, DATA, AND
RESEARCH‑-PROGRAM T

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((12,109,000))

10,459,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation... $ 17,000,000

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ ((1,371,000))

328,000

Multimodal
Transportation Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,043,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((30,480,000))

28,830,000

Sec.
227. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 226 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-CHARGES FROM OTHER AGENCIES‑-PROGRAM U

(1)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL TORT CLAIMS SUPPORT

((Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation... $........................................... 2,595,000))

Motor
Vehicle Account‑‑State Appropriation..... $ 2,913,000

Puget
Sound Ferry Operations‑‑State

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,155,000

(2)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE OFFICE OF THE STATE AUDITOR

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 907,000

(3)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION FACILITIES AND
SERVICES AND CONSOLIDATED MAIL SERVICES

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((3,743,000))

3,693,000

(4)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((2,240,000))

1,990,000

(5)
FOR PAYMENT OF SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY PREMIUMS AND ADMINISTRATION

((Transportation
Account))

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((12,039,000))

11,539,000

(6)
FOR PAYMENT OF SELF-INSURANCE LIABILITY PREMIUMS AND ADMINISTRATION

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((3,462,000))

3,262,000

(7)
FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF OFFICE OF MINORITY AND WOMEN'S BUSINESS ENTERPRISES

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 158,000

(8)
((FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION STATE
PARKING SERVICES

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 90,000

(9))) FOR
PAYMENT OF THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL ADMINISTRATION CAPITAL PROJECTS SURCHARGE

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 1,100,000

(((10)))
(9) FOR ARCHIVES AND RECORDS MANAGEMENT

Motor Vehicle
Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ 392,000

Sec.
228. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 227 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-PUBLIC
TRANSPORTATION‑-PROGRAM V

High
Capacity Transportation Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((3,701,000))

1,451,000

Air
Pollution Control Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((6,253,000))

1,313,000

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation ... $ ((7,187,000))

2,046,000

Transportation
Account‑-Federal Appropriation... $........................................... ((7,345,000))

358,000

((Transportation
Account‑-Private/Local

Appropriation.............................. $ 105,000

Public
Transportation Systems Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 800,000))

Multimodal
Transportation Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 7,189,000

Multimodal
Transportation Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 6,987,000

Multimodal
Transportation Account‑‑

Private/Local
Appropriation................ $ 105,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((24,391,000))

19,449,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
Appropriations in this section shall initially be allotted as appropriated
by this section. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not permit moneys
that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that
purpose. After January 1, 2000, after approval by the director of financial
management and unless specifically prohibited by this act, the department may
transfer appropriations between the transportation account‑-state and the
multimodal transportation account‑-state appropriations. However, the
program shall not expend more than the total amount appropriated from these
accounts.

(2)
Up to $750,000 of the multimodal transportation account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for grants and activities relating to
coordinating special needs transportation among state and local providers.
When selecting grant recipients, the agency council on coordinated
transportation shall give priority to projects and programs that can be
accomplished in the 1999-2001 biennium. ((The department may expend up to
$250,000 without a matching appropriation. The department's authority to
expend more than that amount is conditioned upon the legislature authorizing a
matching appropriation equal to the total expenditure of the amount provided in
this subsection.

(2)
$50,000 of the public transportation systems account‑-state appropriation
is provided solely to continue and enhance an existing pilot project between a
public transit provider and a school district expanding public transit service
to high school students in order to reduce the use of single occupancy vehicles.))

(3)
The department shall assess its commute trip reduction program. The assessment
shall include an evaluation of tax credits or other incentives to employers who
reduce commute trips to their work sites by encouraging employees to
telecommute. Up to $50,000 of the air pollution control account--state
appropriation is provided for a pilot project implementing telecommuting as
part of the commute trip reduction program. The pilot project may include use
of tax credits or other financial incentives.

(4)
In evaluating applications for rural mobility grants to public transportation
agencies, the department shall give added weight to projects that improve
connectivity among transit providers and across jurisdictional boundaries.

(5)
$4,900,000 of the multimodal transportation account‑‑federal
appropriation is provided solely for commute trip reduction programs
administered by the department of transportation. These funds come from the
TEA‑21 congestion mitigation air quality program. ((The office of
financial management shall place $1,000,000 of the air pollution control
account‑‑state appropriation in reserve status.))

Sec.
229. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 228 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES CONSTRUCTION‑-PROGRAM
W

Puget
Sound Capital Construction Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((140,135,000))

119,535,000

Puget
Sound Capital Construction Account‑-

Federal
Appropriation...................... $ ((29,575,000))

42,466,000

Passenger
Ferry Account‑-State Appropriation... $ ((789,000))

215,000

((Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation... $ 116,221,000))

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((286,720,000))

162,216,000

The
appropriations in this section are provided for improving the Washington state
ferry system, including, but not limited to, vessel acquisition, vessel
construction, major and minor vessel improvements, and terminal construction
and improvements. The appropriations in this section are subject to the
following conditions and limitations and specified amounts are provided solely
for that activity:

(1)
The appropriations in this section, unless otherwise specified, are provided to
carry out only the projects in the Washington state ferries capital program
plan - version ((3)) 1. The department shall reconcile the
1997-99 capital expenditures within ninety days of the end of the biennium and
submit a final report to the senate transportation committee, the house of
representatives transportation committee, and the office of financial
management.

(2)
The Puget Sound capital construction account‑-state appropriation
includes $27,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.60.800 for vessel and terminal acquisition, major and minor improvements,
and long lead time materials acquisition for the Washington state ferries. The
transportation commission may authorize the use of current revenues available
to the Puget Sound capital construction account in lieu of bond proceeds for
any part of the state appropriation.

(((4)
The motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation includes $110,729,000 in
proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.843. The
transportation commission may authorize the use of current revenues available
to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any part of
the state appropriation.

(5)
The department shall structure the request for proposal for the purchase of
passenger-only ferries authorized under RCW 47.60.652 to include the purchase
of a fifth back-up ferry to support maintenance schedules, emergency service
needs, and provide continuity of service on all passenger-only ferry routes.
The purchase of a fifth passenger-only ferry is subject to subsequent
legislative appropriation.))

Sec.
230. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 229 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-MARINE‑-PROGRAM X

Marine
Operating Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ ((303,014,000))

148,330,000

Puget
Sound Ferry Operations Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 137,587,000

Multimodal
Transportation Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,092,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ 291,009,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
Appropriations in this section shall initially be allotted as appropriated
by this section. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not permit moneys
that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that
purpose. After May 1, 2000, after approval by the director of financial
management and unless specifically prohibited by this act, the department may
transfer appropriations between the marine operating account‑-state and
the Puget Sound ferry operations account‑-state appropriations. However,
the program shall not expend more than the total amount appropriated from these
accounts.

(2)
The appropriation is based on the budgeted expenditure of (($29,104,000))
$29,539,000 for vessel operating fuel in the 1999-2001 biennium. If the
actual cost of fuel is less than this budgeted amount, the excess amount may
not be expended. If the actual cost exceeds this amount, the department shall
request a supplemental appropriation.

(((2)))
(3) The appropriation provides for the compensation of ferry employees.
The expenditures for compensation paid to ferry employees during the 1999-2001
biennium may not exceed (($205,640,000)) $195,690,000 plus a
dollar amount, as prescribed by the office of financial management, that is
equal to any insurance benefit increase granted general government employees in
excess of $341.75 a month annualized per eligible marine employee multiplied by
the number of eligible marine employees for the respective fiscal year, a
dollar amount as prescribed by the office of financial management for costs
associated with pension amortization charges, and a dollar amount prescribed by
the office of financial management for salary increases during the 1999-2001
biennium. For the purposes of this section, the expenditures for compensation
paid to ferry employees shall be limited to salaries and wages and employee
benefits as defined in the office of financial management's policies,
regulations, and procedures named under objects of expenditure "A"
and "B" (7.2.6.2).

The
prescribed salary and insurance benefit increase or decrease dollar amount that
shall be allocated from the governor's compensation appropriations is in
addition to the appropriation contained in this section and may be used to
increase or decrease compensation costs, effective July 1, 1999, and
thereafter, as established in the 1999-2001 general fund operating budget.

(((3)
Up to $2,770,000 of the marine operating account‑-state appropriation may
be used for leasing and operating an appropriate passenger only ferry vessel
for the purpose of supporting existing, or testing new, passenger only service
while testing alternative vessel technologies.))

(4)
The department, when implementing ferry service reductions, shall, to the
extent possible, maintain peak hour vehicle and passenger service capacity,
summer tourist route capacity, and a fall/winter/spring presence on all auto
ferry routes, while ensuring equitable treatment among routes.

(5)
The joint task force on ferries is created.

(a)
The joint task force on ferries is composed of:

(i)
Eight members of the legislature selected as follows:

(A)
Four members of the senate, two from each of the major caucuses, to be
appointed by the president of the senate, who shall select one of the four
senate members as cochair;

(B)
Four members of the house of representatives, two from each of the major
caucuses, to be appointed by the cospeaker of the respective caucus. The
cospeakers shall jointly select one of the four house members as cochair; and

(C)
The members appointed from each major caucus of the senate and the house of
representatives must include one member from a legislative district that
encompasses a terminus of a Washington state ferry route and one from a
legislative district that does not include a terminus of a Washington state
ferry route;

(ii)
At least one person designated by the cochairs representing each of the
following:

(A)
Ferry advisory committees;

(B)
Persons who do not use ferries;

(C)
Labor organizations representing ferry workers;

(D)
Washington State Ferries;

(E)
Transit operators;

(F)
The office of financial management; and

(G)
Other groups as deemed appropriate by the cochairs of the task force.

(b)
The transportation committees shall provide staff support as mutually agreed by
the cochairs of the joint task force.

(c)
The legislative transportation committee shall pay the expenses of the
legislative committee members.

(d)
The joint task force on ferries shall report to the full legislature at the
beginning of the 2001 legislative session. The report must include, but not be
limited to, analysis and recommendations on the following:

(i)
Establishment of a long-term goal for recovery of operating costs from fare
revenue;

(ii)
Options for further cuts in ferry service or full or partial restoration of
ferry service cuts;

(iii)
Feasibility of full or partial privatization of the ferry system,
public-private partnerships, or state and local partnerships; and

(iv)
Establishing the short-term and long-term capital needs of the Washington state
ferry system.

Sec.
231. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 230 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-RAIL‑-PROGRAM
Y

Essential
Rail Assistance Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 85,000

High
Capacity Transportation Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ ((15,094,000))

10,794,000

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ ((95,915,000))

7,030,000

Transportation
Account‑-Federal Appropriation... $........................................... ((10,000,000))

12,000

((Public
Transportation Systems Account‑-

State
Appropriation........................ $ 5,000,000))

Multimodal
Transportation Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 41,935,000

Multimodal
Transportation Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 9,988,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((126,094,000))

69,844,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
Appropriations in this section shall initially be allotted as appropriated
by this section. Subsequent allotment modifications shall not permit moneys
that are provided solely for a specified purpose to be used for other than that
purpose. After January 1, 2000, after approval by the director of financial
management and unless specifically prohibited by this act, the department may
transfer appropriations between the transportation account‑-state and the
multimodal transportation account‑-state appropriations. However, the
program shall not expend more than the total amount appropriated from these accounts.

(2)
No appropriation in this section may be used to fund rail passenger service
south of Portland, Oregon.

(((2)
$2,000,000 of the transportation account‑-state appropriation and
$4,000,000 of the high capacity transportation account‑-state appropriation
are provided solely for the freight rail assistance program to provide grants
and loans for light density rail lines.

(3)
$3,000,000 of the high capacity transportation account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for acquisition of up to six rail passenger
cars to add capacity to existing advanced technology train sets operating in
Washington state.

(4))) (3)
$6,298,000 of the ((high capacity)) multimodal transportation
account‑-state appropriation is provided to fund the operation of a
second train set providing additional roundtrip service from Seattle to
Vancouver, British Columbia. The department's authority to expend the
appropriation referenced in this subsection for service north of Blaine is
conditioned upon Canada, the province of British Columbia, and/or private
sources undertaking the capital expenditures necessary to make the rail capital
improvements required to facilitate improved round trip rail service between
Seattle and Vancouver, B.C.

(((5)
$10,000,000 of the transportation account‑-state appropriation and
$5,000,000 of the public transportation systems account‑-state
appropriation are provided solely for the King street maintenance facility to
be built in partnership with Amtrak. The amount referenced in this subsection
is conditioned on the execution of agreements between the department of
transportation, Amtrak, sound transit, and other participating parties which
will assure that the maintenance and operation of the maintenance facility will
not require state funding, except for billings for maintenance of state owned
passenger trains.

(6))) (4)
To the greatest extent practicable, expenditure of funds shall maximize funds
from partnerships and coordinate with other agencies investing in track
improvements.

(((7)))
(5) $5,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account‑-federal
appropriation is provided from TEA-21 surface transportation program
enhancement funds is provided solely for restoration of and improvements to the
King street station.

(6)
$500,000 of the multimodal transportation account‑‑state
appropriation is provided solely for use towards implementation of a program to
purchase refrigerated express railcars, to be known as the George Sellar
express railcars, that may be leased for the purpose of hauling express
shipments, including but not limited to Washington produce, to market.

(a)
Subject to (b) of this subsection, the department is authorized to incur a
federal railroad rehabilitation and improvement financing loan of up to
$10,000,000 for program implementation, to be repaid with revenues generated
from the program.

(b)
As a precondition to purchasing refrigerated express railcars, the department
shall conduct a feasibility study. If satisfied with the feasibility study
results, the transportation commission may direct the department to proceed
with a program for the purchase of refrigerated express railcars.

(c)
Any revenues derived from the program must be placed in a separate account and
used strictly for: The repayment of debt, including the risk insurance
premium; ongoing maintenance of assets; and reserves for the express railcar
program.

(d)
The department shall make semiannual progress reports to the senate
transportation committee, the house of representatives transportation
committee, and the office of financial management until December 31, 2001, and
annual progress reports thereafter.

(7)
$100,000 of the multimodal transportation account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for the department of transportation in conjunction with the
utilities and transportation commission and the Spokane regional transportation
council to study and make recommendations on issues related to railroad rights
of way in the Spokane valley. A status report shall be provided to the
transportation committees of the house of representatives and the senate by
December 1, 2000.

Sec.
232. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 231 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-LOCAL PROGRAMS‑-PROGRAM Z

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((129,886,000))

83,435,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-Federal Appropriation... $ 8,040,000

Transportation
Account‑-State Appropriation.... $ ((10,767,000))

321,000

((Transportation
Infrastructure Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 3,250,000

Transportation
Infrastructure Account‑-

Private/Local
Appropriation................ $ 1,750,000))

High
Capacity Transportation Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 150,000

Highway
Infrastructure Account‑-Federal

Appropriation.............................. $ 1,500,000

Highway
Infrastructure Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 234,000

Multimodal
Transportation Account‑‑State

Appropriation.............................. $ 10,381,000

Urban
Arterial Trust Account‑‑State

Appropriation.............................. $ 5,000,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((155,577,000))

109,061,000

The
appropriations in this section are subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
(($300,000 of the transportation account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely to establish alternatives for flood management and flood hazard
reduction projects in the Chehalis basin.

(a)
The department of transportation shall convene a technical committee to develop
watershed-based solutions to flooding within the Chehalis basin. The technical
committee shall be comprised of representatives of the department of
transportation, department of ecology, department of fish and wildlife, the
department of community, trade, and economic development, the military
department's emergency management division, and affected counties and tribes.
The department of transportation shall also seek the participation of the
United States army corps of engineers, federal emergency management
administration, the United States geological survey, the United States fish and
wildlife service, the United States environmental protection agency, and other
entities with critical knowledge related to the structural or nonstructural
flood hazard reduction projects in the Chehalis basin. Funds shall be
distributed by the department of transportation for alternative analysis,
mapping, and model testing projects as recommended by the technical committee.
The solutions considered by the technical committee shall be consistent with
fish and habitat recovery efforts and avoid additional flood hazard to
downstream communities. The department of transportation shall present a
report to the senate transportation committee and the house of representatives
transportation committee by December 1, 1999, regarding findings and progress
made by funded projects.

(b)
If the federal government makes funds available to accomplish the project
described in (a) of this subsection, the department of transportation shall
place the appropriation identified in this section in reserve.

(2)
$85,121,000)) $40,692,000 of the motor vehicle
account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for the state program
share of freight mobility projects as identified by the freight mobility
strategic investment board. The amount provided in this subsection can only be
expended upon authorization from the freight mobility strategic investment
board.

(((3)
$400,000)) (2) $187,000 of the transportation account‑-state
appropriation ((is)) and $213,000 of the multimodal transportation
account--state appropriation are provided solely for a study by the senate
transportation committee and the house of representatives transportation
committee in cooperation with the port of Benton developing a strategic
corridor feasibility and master site plan for the port of Benton. If the port
of Benton does not provide at least $200,000 to fund the plan development, the
transportation fund‑-state appropriation referenced in this subsection
shall lapse and this subsection shall be null and void.

(((4)))
(3) The motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation includes (($105,121,000))
$30,000,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW
47.10.843. The transportation commission may authorize the use of current
revenues available to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds
for any part of the state appropriation.

(((5)))
(4) $10,000,000 of the multimodal transportation account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely to fund the first phase of a multiphase
cooperative project with the state of Oregon to dredge the Columbia river. The
department shall not expend the appropriation in this section unless agreement
on ocean disposal sites has been reached which protects the state's commercial
crab fishery. The amount provided in this subsection shall lapse unless the
state of Oregon appropriates a dollar-for-dollar match to fund its share of the
project.

(((6)))
(5) The motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation includes
$1,167,000 in proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by RCW 47.10.819(1).
The transportation commission may authorize the use of current revenues
available to the department of transportation in lieu of bond proceeds for any
part of the state appropriation.

(((7)))
(6) $5,000,000 of the ((motor vehicle)) urban arterial trust
account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for a small city pavement
preservation program, to be administered by the department's ((TransAid))
highways and local programs division. The department, in consultation
with stakeholders, shall establish program guidelines. The guidelines should
include but not be limited to a provision limiting program eligibility to
cities with a population of 2,500 or less.

(((8)
$20,000,000)) (7) $15,000,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state
appropriation is provided solely for a county corridor congestion relief
program, to be administered by the department's ((TransAid)) highways
and local programs division. Urban corridors must connect to urban or
significant activity centers; begin or end at the intersection of another
arterial, state highway, or limited access freeway system; and provide an
alternate route to the limited access freeway system. The purpose of the
program is to provide funding for congested urban corridors, as defined and
selected by the department of transportation in consultation with counties((,))
and regional transportation planning organizations((, and the
transportation improvement board)). At a minimum, project selection
criteria should include: Consistency with regional transportation plans;
measurable improvements in mobility; cost effectiveness; ((systemic)) systematic
corridor mobility improvements rather than isolated "spot" improvements;
and optimal timing for construction.

(((9)))
(8) $5,000,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation
is provided solely for improving traffic and pedestrian safety near schools.
The ((TransAid)) highways and local programs division within the
department of transportation shall administer this program. Funds should be
used for traffic and pedestrian improvements near schools, including roadway
channelization and signalization.

(((10)))
(9) The ((TransAid)) highways and local programs division
within the department of transportation shall develop a prequalification
procedure for potential bidders on projects administered or approved by the
transportation improvement board. The board shall work with other interested
parties including but not limited to associations representing general
contractors and the office of minority and women's business enterprises. The
prequalification procedure's goal is to ascertain that bidders are qualified
by experience, financing, equipment, and organization to do the work called for
in the contract documents. The prequalification procedure may require a bidder
to (1) satisfy threshold requirements established by the board prior to being
furnished a proposal form on any contract; or (2) complete a preaward survey of
the bidder's qualification prior to award.

(((11)
Up to $100,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state appropriation is
provided solely for audits of city and county transportation funding to
determine whether any city or county has supplanted its local transportation
funding with state funding provided under sections 408 and 409 of this act.
The department shall report the results of this audit to the senate
transportation committee, the house of representatives transportation
committee, and the office of financial management by December 31, 2000.

(12)
$5,000,000)) (10) $2,000,000 of the motor vehicle
account‑-state appropriation is provided solely for city fish passage
barrier removal and habitat restoration. Funds should be used for eliminating
fish passage barriers, including stormwater facilities, and providing for
habitat restoration for salmonid species that are listed as threatened or
endangered. The amount provided in this section may only be expended upon
authorization from the department of transportation's environmental affairs
office.

(11) $10,000,000 of the motor vehicle fund--state appropriation
is provided solely for a city corridor congestion relief program, to be
administered by the department's highways and local programs division. Urban
corridors must connect to urban or significant activity centers, begin or end
at the intersection of another arterial, state highway or limited access
freeway system, and provide an alternate route to the limited access freeway
system. The purpose of the program is to provide funding for congested urban
corridors as defined and selected by the department of transportation in
consultation with counties and regional transportation planning organizations.
At a minimum, project selection criteria should include: Consistency with
regional transportation plans; measurable improvements in mobility; cost
effectiveness; systematic corridor mobility improvements rather than isolated
"spot" improvements; and optimal timing for construction.

(End of part)

PART
III

TRANSPORTATION
AGENCIES CAPITAL FACILITIES

Sec.
301. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 303 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION‑-PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS)‑-CAPITAL

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((26,147,000))

15,231,000

The
appropriation in this section is subject to the following conditions and
limitations and specified amounts are provided solely for that activity:

(1)
Before any funds are expended for the transportation facility to be located in
Tumwater, Washington, the director of general administration shall conduct an
evaluation of the planned facility design and budget using life-cycle cost
analysis, value-engineering, and other techniques to maximize the long-term
effectiveness and efficiency of the facility or improvement as required under
RCW 43.82.010(10). Furthermore, the director shall present the findings of the
evaluation to the fiscal committees of the house of representatives and the
senate by December 31, 1999. Up to $100,000 of the motor vehicle account‑-state
appropriation may be expended by the department of general administration to
conduct an analysis of future transportation-related facility office space
needs in Thurston county, by agency, for the next ten years. The analysis
shall consult with state agencies, private developers, and building owners to
determine the inventory of space available and planned over the next ten years
in government and nongovernment buildings, and the impact on current office
space. The analysis must be completed by January 31, 2000.

(2) The department of transportation is authorized to enter into a
financing contract using certificate of participation in the amount of
$14,500,000 plus financing expenses and required reserves pursuant to chapter
39.94 RCW to acquire and remodel a regional complex in the department's
southwest region.

(End of part)

PART
IV

TRANSFERS
AND DISTRIBUTIONS

Sec.
401. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 401 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES: FOR
BOND SALES DISCOUNTS AND DEBT TO BE PAID BY MOTOR VEHICLE FUND AND
TRANSPORTATION FUND REVENUE

Highway
Bond Retirement Account Appropriation... $........................................... ((184,810,000))

161,310,000

Ferry
Bond Retirement Account Appropriation.... $ ((53,353,000))

53,592,000

Transportation
Improvement Board Bond Retirement

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ ((35,158,000))

35,909,000

Puget
Sound Capital Construction Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 270,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((6,543,000))

1,960,000

Special
Category C Account‑-State Appropriation $ 405,000

Transportation
Improvement Account‑-State

Appropriation.............................. $ 600,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((280,539,000))

254,046,000

Sec.
402. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 402 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-BOND
RETIREMENT AND INTEREST, AND ONGOING BOND REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER CHARGES:
FOR BOND SALE EXPENSES AND FISCAL AGENT CHARGES

Motor
Vehicle Fund‑-Puget Sound Capital Construction

Account
Appropriation...................... $ ((36,000))

61,000

Motor
Vehicle Account‑-State Appropriation..... $ ((811,000))

443,000

Special
Category C Account Appropriation........ $...................................... ((53,000))

91,000

Transportation
Improvement

Account‑-State
Appropriation............... $ 135,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((900,000))

730,000

Sec.
403. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 403 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE
TREASURER‑-STATE REVENUES FOR DISTRIBUTION

(1)
Motor Vehicle Fund Appropriation for

motor
vehicle fuel tax and overload penalties

distribution................................... $ ((492,721,000))

483,325,000

(2)
Transportation Fund Appropriation for

motor
vehicle excise tax distribution.......... $ ((491,606,000))

178,207,000

(3)
Multimodal Transportation Account‑‑State

Appropriation
for motor vehicle excise tax

distribution................................... $ 52,619,000

Sec.
404. 1999
sp.s. c 1 s 407 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

FOR
THE STATE TREASURER‑-TRANSFERS

(1)
RV Account‑-State Appropriation:

For
transfer to the Motor Vehicle Fund‑-State... $........................................... ((1,590,000))

1,865,000

(2)
((Transportation Account‑-State Appropriation:

For
transfer to the Transportation Infrastructure

Account‑-State................................. $ 5,000,000))

State
Patrol Highway Account‑-State

Appropriation:
For transfer to the Motor Vehicle

Account‑‑State................................. $ 27,000,000

(3)
Highway Safety Fund--State Appropriation:

For
transfer to the Multimodal Transportation

Account--State................................. $ 3,220,000

(4)
Puget Sound Ferry Operations Account‑‑State

Appropriation:
For transfer to the Marine

Operating
Account‑‑State..... ................. $ 1,400,000

(5)
Public Transportation Systems Account‑-

State
Appropriation: For transfer to the

Multimodal
Transportation Account--State........ $...................................... 23,182,000

(6)
Transportation Fund--State

Appropriation:
For transfer to the Multimodal

Transportation
Account‑-State.................. $ 28,061,000

The
department of transportation shall only transfer funds provided under ((this))
subsection (1) of this section on an as‑needed basis.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 405. A
new section is added to 1999 sp.s. c 1 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSFERS

Puget
Sound Ferry Operations Account‑-State

Appropriation:
For transfer to the Puget Sound

Capital
Construction Account‑‑State.................. $.................................. 67,000,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund--State Appropriation:

For
transfer to the Advanced Environmental

Mitigation
Revolving Account........................ $ 1,000,000

Motor
Vehicle Fund--State Appropriation:

For
transfer to Puget Sound Capital Construction

Account............................................. $ 18,272,000

Transportation
Equipment Fund--State

Appropriation:
For transfer to the Motor

Vehicle
Fund........................................ $ 2,500,000

High
Capacity Transportation Account‑-State

Appropriation:
For transfer to the Multimodal

Transportation
Account.............................. $ 2,036,000

Passenger
Ferry Account‑-State Appropriation:

For
transfer to the Multimodal Transportation

Account............................................. $ 235,000

The
department of transportation shall only transfer funds to the Puget Sound
capital construction account--state as provided under this subsection on an
as-needed basis.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 406. A
new section is added to 1999 sp.s. c 1 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑-TRANSFERS. The
balance remaining on April 30, 2000 in the transportation account shall be
transferred to the multimodal transportation account‑-state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 407. A new
section is added to 1999 sp.s. c 1 (uncodified) to read as follows:

FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION‑‑TRANSFERS. The
balance remaining at the close of the 2000 fiscal year in the marine operating
account‑‑state shall be transferred to the Puget Sound ferry
operations account‑‑state.

(End of part)

PART
VI

PROVISIONS NECESSARY
TO IMPLEMENT APPROPRIATIONS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 601. A
new section is added to 1999 sp.s. c 1 (uncodified) to read as follows:

DONATIONS
OF EMPLOYEE LEAVE. During the 1999-2001 fiscal
biennium, an employee of the Washington state department of transportation may,
consistent with the provisions of RCW 41.04.665(3), donate leave to the
existing leave balances of an employee of the Washington state department of
transportation who dies in the line of duty between February 1, 2000, and June
30, 2000. The value of the donated leave will be included in the deceased
employee's final compensation, but is not compensation earnable for the
purposes of chapter 41.40 RCW. The agency head shall determine the total
amount of leave, not to exceed 261 days, that may be donated under this
section. The Washington personnel resources board may adopt rules, in
consultation with the office of financial management, as it deems necessary for
the implementation of this temporary benefit.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 602. The
following bills, as identified by bill number, in the form passed by the
legislature are necessary to implement portions of this act: House Bill No.
2788 and Senate Bill No. 6856.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 603. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 604. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

(End of part)

INDEX PAGE #

BLUE
RIBBON COMMISSION ON TRANSPORTATION....................... 11

BOARD OF PILOTAGE
COMMISSIONERS................................. 8

COUNTY ROAD ADMINISTRATION
BOARD................................ 8

DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE....................................... 3

DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING

DRIVER SERVICES................................................ 17

INFORMATION SYSTEMS............................................ 15

MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT
SERVICES................................ 15

VEHICLE SERVICES............................................... 16

DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION

AVIATION--PROGRAM F............................................ 18

CHARGES FROM OTHER
AGENCIES--PROGRAM U......................... 28

HIGHWAY MAINTENANCE--PROGRAM
M................................. 24

HIGHWAY MANAGEMENT AND
FACILITIES--PROGRAM D--OPERATING........ 18

IMPROVEMENTS--PROGRAM I........................................ 19

LOCAL PROGRAMS--PROGRAM Z...................................... 37

MARINE--PROGRAM X.............................................. 32

PRESERVATION--PROGRAM P........................................ 25

PROGRAM D (DEPARTMENT OF
TRANSPORTATION-ONLY PROJECTS)......... 43

PUBLIC
TRANSPORTATION--PROGRAM V............................... 29

RAIL--PROGRAM Y................................................ 35

TRAFFIC OPERATIONS--PROGRAM Q.................................. 26

TRANSFERS.................................................. 46,
47

TRANSPORTATION ECONOMIC
PARTNERSHIPS--PROGRAM K................ 23

TRANSPORTATION MANAGEMENT AND
SUPPORT--PROGRAM S............... 27

TRANSPORTATION PLANNING,
DATA, AND RESEARCH--PROGRAM T......... 28

WASHINGTON STATE FERRIES
CONSTRUCTION--PROGRAM W............... 31

DONATIONS OF EMPLOYEE LEAVE.................................... 48

FREIGHT MOBILITY STRATEGIC
INVESTMENT BOARD.................... 12

LEGISLATIVE EVALUATION AND
ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM............... 3

LEGISLATIVE TRANSPORTATION
COMMITTEE........................... 10

MARINE EMPLOYEES COMMISSION.................................... 12

SENATE.......................................................... 9

STATE PARKS AND RECREATION
COMMISSION........................... 5

STATE TREASURER

BOND RETIREMENT AND INTEREST................................... 44

STATE REVENUES FOR
DISTRIBUTION................................ 45

TRANSFERS...................................................... 45

TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION...................................... 12

TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT
BOARD................................ 9

UTILITIES AND TRANSPORTATION
COMMISSION......................... 4

WASHINGTON STATE PARKS AND
RECREATION

CAPITAL PROJECTS................................................ 5

WASHINGTON STATE PATROL

FIELD OPERATIONS BUREAU........................................ 13

SUPPORT SERVICES BUREAU........................................ 14

WASHINGTON TRAFFIC SAFETY
COMMISSION............................ 7

--- END ---