BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that middle school youth, grades six, seven, and eight, are
experiencing remarkable physical and emotional development. These changes
often affect how they perform in school and how they relate to parents and
others in the community. The legislature finds that adolescents enjoy
excitement and activities with peers. The legislature further finds that
quality programs organized by responsible adults will promote safety for
adolescents and the community.

The
legislature further finds that there is a lack of affordable, safe,
age-appropriate child care opportunities for middle school youth.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.215 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The superintendent of public instruction shall establish a grant program to
provide funding for after-school programs for middle school youth. Under the
grant program:

(a)
Public schools and other public, private, and nonprofit organizations may apply
for grants to provide after-school programs to youth in sixth, seventh, and
eighth grades;

(b)
Grants may be awarded to provide funding to either supplement existing programs
or start new programs;

(c)
Applicants must provide twenty-five percent matching funds, either money or in-kind;

(d)
Preference is to be given to providing grants to programs that will:

(i)
Serve low-income youth;

(ii)
Serve youth with special needs, including youth with developmental or physical
disabilities and youth in individualized educational programs;

(iii)
Serve economically depressed areas; and

(iv)
Provide age-appropriate activities for the youth.

(2)
In administering the grant program, the superintendent of public instruction
shall:

(a)
Establish an advisory board that includes representatives from middle schools,
parents of middle school youth, and providers from community-based
organizations and is geographically diverse. The advisory board shall review
and rate applications prior to selection by the superintendent of public
instruction;

(b)
Develop outcome measures with input from the advisory board and keep track of
program impact using developmental assets as performance measures; and

(c)
Encourage participating organizations to participate in federal food programs.

(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules
under chapter 34.05 RCW setting forth criteria, application procedures, and
methods to implement this section.

---
END ---