BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.52.130 and 1998 c 165 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

A
certified abstract of the driving record shall be furnished only to the
individual named in the abstract, an employer or prospective employer or an
agent acting on behalf of an employer or prospective employer, the insurance
carrier that has insurance in effect covering the employer or a prospective
employer, the insurance carrier that has insurance in effect covering the named
individual, the insurance carrier to which the named individual has applied, an
alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agency approved by the department of
social and health services, to which the named individual has applied or been
assigned for evaluation or treatment, or city and county prosecuting
attorneys. City attorneys and county prosecuting attorneys may provide the
driving record to alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agencies approved by the
department of social and health services to which the named individual has
applied or been assigned for evaluation or treatment. The director, upon
proper request, shall furnish a certified abstract covering the period of not
more than the last three years to insurance companies. Upon proper request,
the director shall furnish a certified abstract ((covering a period of not
more than the last five years)) of the full driving record to state
approved alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agencies, except that the
certified abstract shall also include records of alcohol-related offenses as
defined in RCW 46.01.260(2) ((covering a period of not more than the last
ten years)). Upon proper request, a certified abstract of the full driving
record maintained by the department shall be furnished to a city or county
prosecuting attorney, to the individual named in the abstract or to an employer
or prospective employer or an agent acting on behalf of an employer or
prospective employer of the named individual. The abstract, whenever possible,
shall include an enumeration of motor vehicle accidents in which the person was
driving; the total number of vehicles involved; whether the vehicles were legally
parked or moving; whether the vehicles were occupied at the time of the
accident; whether the accident resulted in any fatality; any reported
convictions, forfeitures of bail, or findings that an infraction was committed
based upon a violation of any motor vehicle law; and the status of the person's
driving privilege in this state. The enumeration shall include any reports of
failure to appear in response to a traffic citation or failure to respond to a
notice of infraction served upon the named individual by an arresting officer.
Certified abstracts furnished to prosecutors and alcohol/drug assessment or
treatment agencies shall also indicate whether a recorded violation is an
alcohol-related offense as defined in RCW 46.01.260(2) that was originally
charged as one of the alcohol-related offenses designated in RCW
46.01.260(2)(b)(i).

The
abstract provided to the insurance company shall exclude any information,
except that related to the commission of misdemeanors or felonies by the
individual, pertaining to law enforcement officers or fire fighters as defined
in RCW 41.26.030, or any officer of the Washington state patrol, while driving
official vehicles in the performance of occupational duty. The abstract
provided to the insurance company shall include convictions for RCW 46.61.5249
and 46.61.525 except that the abstract shall report them only as negligent
driving without reference to whether they are for first or second degree
negligent driving. The abstract provided to the insurance company shall
exclude any deferred prosecution under RCW 10.05.060, except that if a person
is removed from a deferred prosecution under RCW 10.05.090, the abstract shall
show the deferred prosecution as well as the removal.

The
director shall collect for each abstract the sum of four dollars and fifty
cents which shall be deposited in the highway safety fund.

Any
insurance company or its agent receiving the certified abstract shall use it
exclusively for its own underwriting purposes and shall not divulge any of the
information contained in it to a third party. No policy of insurance may be
canceled, nonrenewed, denied, or have the rate increased on the basis of such
information unless the policyholder was determined to be at fault. No
insurance company or its agent for underwriting purposes relating to the
operation of commercial motor vehicles may use any information contained in the
abstract relative to any person's operation of motor vehicles while not engaged
in such employment, nor may any insurance company or its agent for underwriting
purposes relating to the operation of noncommercial motor vehicles use any
information contained in the abstract relative to any person's operation of
commercial motor vehicles.

Any
employer or prospective employer or an agent acting on behalf of an employer or
prospective employer receiving the certified abstract shall use it exclusively
for his or her own purpose to determine whether the licensee should be
permitted to operate a commercial vehicle or school bus upon the public
highways of this state and shall not divulge any information contained in it to
a third party.

Any
alcohol/drug assessment or treatment agency approved by the department of
social and health services receiving the certified abstract shall use it
exclusively for the purpose of assisting its employees in making a
determination as to what level of treatment, if any, is appropriate. The
agency, or any of its employees, shall not divulge any information contained in
the abstract to a third party.

Release
of a certified abstract of the driving record of an employee or prospective
employee requires a statement signed by: (1) The employee or prospective
employee that authorizes the release of the record, and (2) the employer
attesting that the information is necessary to determine whether the licensee
should be employed to operate a commercial vehicle or school bus upon the
public highways of this state. If the employer or prospective employer
authorizes an agent to obtain this information on their behalf, this must be
noted in the statement.

Any
violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec.
2. RCW
46.61.5056 and 1995 c 332 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person subject to alcohol assessment and treatment under RCW 46.61.5055 shall
be required by the court to complete a course in an alcohol information school
approved by the department of social and health services or to complete more
intensive treatment in a program approved by the department of social and
health services, as determined by the court. The court shall notify the
department of licensing whenever it orders a person to complete a course or
treatment program under this section.

(2)
A diagnostic evaluation and treatment recommendation shall be prepared under
the direction of the court by an alcoholism agency approved by the department
of social and health services or a qualified probation department approved by
the department of social and health services. Prior to completion of the report,
the alcoholism agency shall obtain a complete criminal history from the
Washington state patrol. A copy of the report shall be forwarded to the
department of licensing. Based on the diagnostic evaluation, the court shall
determine whether the person shall be required to complete a course in an
alcohol information school approved by the department of social and health
services or more intensive treatment in a program approved by the department of
social and health services.

(3)
Standards for approval for alcohol treatment programs shall be prescribed by
the department of social and health services. The department of social and
health services shall periodically review the costs of alcohol information
schools and treatment programs.

(4)
Any agency that provides treatment ordered under RCW 46.61.5055, shall
immediately report to the appropriate probation department where applicable,
otherwise to the court, and to the department of licensing any noncompliance by
a person with the conditions of his or her ordered treatment. The court shall
notify the department of licensing and the department of social and health
services of any failure by an agency to so report noncompliance. Any agency
with knowledge of noncompliance that fails to so report shall be fined two
hundred fifty dollars by the department of social and health services. Upon
three such failures by an agency within one year, the department of social and
health services shall revoke the agency's approval under this section.

(5) The department of licensing and the department of social and
health services may adopt such rules as are necessary to carry out this
section.

---
END ---