BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
39.12.020 and 1989 c 12 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The
hourly wages to be paid to laborers, workers, or mechanics, upon all public
works and under all public building service maintenance contracts of the state
or any county, municipality or political subdivision created by its laws, shall
be not less than the prevailing rate of wage for an hour's work in the same
trade or occupation in the locality within the state where such labor is
performed. For a contract in excess of ten thousand dollars, a contractor
required to pay the prevailing rate of wage shall post in a location readily
visible to workers at the job site: PROVIDED, That on road construction, sewer
line, pipeline, transmission line, street, or alley improvement projects for
which no field office is needed or established, a contractor may post the
prevailing rate of wage statement at the contractor's local office, gravel
crushing, concrete, or asphalt batch plant as long as the contractor provides a
copy of the wage statement to any employee on request:

(1)
A copy of a statement of intent to pay prevailing wages approved by the
industrial statistician of the department of labor and industries under RCW
39.12.040; and

(2)
The address and telephone number of the industrial statistician of the
department of labor and industries where a complaint or inquiry concerning
prevailing wages may be made.

This
chapter shall not apply to workers or other persons regularly employed on
monthly or per diem salary by the state, or any county, municipality, or
political subdivision created by its laws.

This
chapter shall not apply to county or municipal projects in any county with a
population of less than twenty thousand.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---