BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
36.77.065 and 1980 c 40 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board may cause any county road to be constructed or improved by day labor as
provided in this section.

(1)
As used in this section, "county road construction budget" means the
aggregate total of those costs as defined by the budgeting, accounting, and
reporting system for counties and cities and other local governments authorized
under RCW 43.09.200 and 43.09.230 as prescribed in the state auditor's budget,
accounting, and reporting manual's (BARS) road and street construction accounts
541.00 through 541.90 in effect April 1, 1975: PROVIDED, That such costs shall
not include those costs assigned to the preliminary engineering account 541.11,
right of way accounts 541.20 through 541.25, ancillary operations account
541.80, and ferries account 541.81 in the budget, accounting, and reporting
manual.

(2)
The total amount of day labor construction programs one county may perform
annually shall total no more than the amounts determined in the following
manner:

(a)
Any county with a total annual county road construction budget of four million
dollars or more may accumulate a day labor road construction budget equal to no
more than eight hundred thousand dollars or fifteen percent of the county's
total annual county road construction budget, whichever is greater.

(b)
Any county with a total annual county road construction budget over one million
five hundred thousand dollars and less than four million dollars may accumulate
a day labor road construction budget equal to not more than five hundred
twenty-five thousand dollars or ((twenty)) thirty percent of the
county's total annual county road construction budget, whichever is greater.

(c)
Any county with a total annual county road construction budget over five
hundred thousand dollars and less than one million five hundred thousand
dollars may accumulate a day labor road construction budget equal to two
hundred fifty thousand dollars or thirty-five percent of the county's total
annual county road construction budget, whichever is greater.

(d)
Any county with a total annual county road construction budget less than five
hundred thousand dollars may accumulate a day labor road construction budget
equal to two hundred fifty thousand dollars: PROVIDED, That any county with a
total annual road construction budget of less than five hundred thousand
dollars may, by resolution of the board at the time the county road
construction budget is adopted, elect to construct or improve county roads by day
labor in an amount not to exceed thirty-five thousand dollars on any one
project, including labor, equipment, and materials; such election to be in lieu
of the two hundred fifty thousand dollar limit provided for in this section,
except that any project means a complete project and the division of any
project into units of work or classes of work so as to permit construction by
day labor is not authorized.

Any
county that adopts a county road construction budget unreasonably exceeding
that county's actual road construction expenditures for the same budget year
which has the effect of permitting the county to exceed the day labor amounts
established in this section is in violation of the county road administration
board's standards of good practice under RCW 36.78.020 and is in violation of
this section. Any county, whose expenditure for day labor for road
construction projects unreasonably exceeds the limits specified in this
section, is in violation of the county road administration board's standards of
good practice under RCW 36.78.020 and is in violation of this section.

(3)
Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, whenever the construction
work or improvement is the installation of electrical traffic control devices,
highway illumination equipment, electrical equipment, wires, or equipment to
convey electrical current, in an amount exceeding ten thousand dollars for any
one project including labor, equipment, and materials, such work shall be
performed by contract as in this chapter provided. This section means a
complete project and does not permit the construction of any project by day
labor by division of the project into units of work or classes of work.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---