BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.09.050 and 1986 c 206 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

ORV
use permits and ORV tags shall be required under the provisions of this chapter
except for the following:

(1)
Off-road vehicles owned and operated by the United States, another state, or a
political subdivision thereof.

(2)
Off-road vehicles owned and operated by this state, or by any municipality or
political subdivision thereof.

(3)
An off-road vehicle operating in an organized competitive event on privately
owned or leased land: PROVIDED, That if such leased land is owned by the state
of Washington this exemption shall not apply unless the state agency exercising
jurisdiction over the land in question specifically authorizes said competitive
event: PROVIDED FURTHER, That such exemption shall be strictly construed.

(4)
Off-road vehicles operated on lands owned or leased by the ORV owner or
operator or on lands which the operator has permission to operate without an
ORV use permit.

(5)
Off-road vehicles owned by a resident of another state that have a valid ORV
permit or vehicle license issued in accordance with the laws of the other
state. This exemption shall apply only to the extent that a similar exemption
or privilege is granted under the laws of that state.

(6)
Off-road vehicles while being used for search and rescue purposes under the
authority or direction of an appropriate search and rescue or law enforcement
agency.

(7)
Vehicles used primarily for construction or inspection purposes during the
course of a commercial operation.

(8)
Vehicles which are licensed pursuant to chapter 46.16 RCW or in the case of
nonresidents, vehicles which are validly licensed for operation over public
highways in the jurisdiction of the owner's residence.

(9) Off-road vehicles used on forest or park roads.

---
END ---