BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
26.09.175 and 1992 c 229 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A proceeding for the modification of an order of child support shall commence
with the filing of a petition and worksheets. The petition shall be in the
form prescribed by the administrator for the courts. There shall be a fee of
twenty dollars for the filing of a petition for modification of dissolution.

(2)
The petitioner shall serve upon the other party the summons, a copy of the
petition, and the worksheets in the form prescribed by the administrator for
the courts. If the modification proceeding is the first action filed in this
state, service shall be made by personal service. If the decree to be modified
was entered in this state, service shall be by personal service or by any form
of mail requiring a return receipt. If the support obligation has been
assigned to the state pursuant to RCW 74.20.330 or the state has a subrogated
interest under RCW 74.20A.030, the summons, petition, and worksheets shall also
be served on the attorney general; except that notice shall be given to the
office of the prosecuting attorney for the county in which the action is filed
in lieu of the office of the attorney general in those counties and in the
types of cases as designated by the office of the attorney general by letter
sent to the presiding superior court judge of that county. Proof of
service shall be filed with the court.

(3)
The responding party's answer and worksheets shall be served and the answer
filed within twenty days after service of the petition or sixty days if served
out of state. The responding party's failure to file an answer within the time
required shall result in entry of a default judgment for the petitioner.

(4)
At any time after responsive pleadings are filed, either party may schedule the
matter for hearing.

(5)
Unless both parties stipulate to arbitration or the presiding judge authorizes
oral testimony pursuant to subsection (6) of this section, a petition for
modification of an order of child support shall be heard by the court on
affidavits, the petition, answer, and worksheets only.

(6)
A party seeking authority to present oral testimony on the petition to modify a
support order shall file an appropriate motion not later than ten days after
the time of notice of hearing. Affidavits and exhibits setting forth the
reasons oral testimony is necessary to a just adjudication of the issues shall
accompany the petition. The affidavits and exhibits must demonstrate the
extraordinary features of the case. Factors which may be considered include,
but are not limited to: (a) Substantial questions of credibility on a major
issue; (b) insufficient or inconsistent discovery materials not correctable by
further discovery; or (c) particularly complex circumstances requiring expert
testimony.

Sec.
2. RCW
26.23.130 and 1991 c 367 s 43 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department shall be given twenty calendar days prior notice of the entry of any
final order and five days prior notice of the entry of any temporary order in
any proceeding involving child support or maintenance if the department has a
financial interest based on an assignment of support rights under RCW 74.20.330
or the state has a subrogated interest under RCW 74.20A.030. Service of this
notice upon the department shall be by personal service on, or mailing by any
form of mail requiring a return receipt to, the office of the attorney general;
except that notice shall be given to the office of the prosecuting attorney for
the county in which the action is filed in lieu of the office of the attorney
general in those counties and in the types of cases as designated by the office
of the attorney general by letter sent to the presiding superior court judge of
that county. The department shall not be entitled to terms for a party's
failure to serve the department within the time requirements for this section,
unless the department proves that the party knew that the department had an
assignment of support rights or a subrogated interest and that the failure to
serve the department was intentional.

Sec.
3. RCW
74.20A.055 and 1997 c 58 s 940 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The secretary may, in the absence of a superior court order, or pursuant to an
establishment of paternity under chapter 26.26 RCW, serve on the responsible
parent or parents and custodial parent a notice and finding of financial
responsibility requiring ((a responsible parent or)) the parents
to appear and show cause in an adjudicative proceeding why the finding of
responsibility and/or the amount thereof is incorrect, should not be finally
ordered, but should be rescinded or modified. This notice and finding shall
relate to the support debt accrued and/or accruing under this chapter and/or
RCW 26.16.205, including periodic payments to be made in the future. The
hearing shall be held pursuant to this section, chapter 34.05 RCW, the
Administrative Procedure Act, and the rules of the department. A custodian
who is not the parent of a child and who has lawful physical custody of a child
has the same notice and hearing rights that a custodial parent has under this
section.

(2)
The notice and finding of financial responsibility shall be served in the same
manner prescribed for the service of a summons in a civil action or may be
served on the responsible parent by certified mail, return receipt requested.
The receipt shall be prima facie evidence of service. The notice shall be
served upon the debtor within sixty days from the date the state assumes
responsibility for the support of the dependent child or children on whose
behalf support is sought. If the notice is not served within sixty days from
such date, the department shall lose the right to reimbursement of payments
made after the sixty-day period and before the date of notification: PROVIDED,
That if the department exercises reasonable efforts to locate the debtor and is
unable to do so the entire sixty-day period is tolled until such time as the
debtor can be located. The notice may be served upon the custodial parent,
who is the nonassistance applicant or public assistance recipient, by first
class mail to the last known address. If the custodial parent is not the
nonassistance applicant or public assistance recipient, service shall be in the
same manner as for the responsible parent.

(3)
The notice and finding of financial responsibility shall set forth the amount
the department has determined the responsible parent owes, the support debt
accrued and/or accruing, and periodic payments to be made in the future. The
notice and finding shall also include:

(a)
A statement of the name of the ((recipient or custodian)) custodial
parent and the name of the child or children for whom support is sought;

(b)
A statement of the amount of periodic future support payments as to which
financial responsibility is alleged;

(c)
A statement that the responsible parent or custodial parent may object
to all or any part of the notice and finding, and file an application for an
adjudicative proceeding to show cause why ((said responsible parent should
not be determined to be liable for any or all of the debt, past and future))
the terms set forth in the notice should not be ordered;

(d)
A statement that, if neither the responsible parent ((fails)) nor
the custodial parent files in a timely fashion ((to file)) an
application for an adjudicative proceeding, the support debt and payments
stated in the notice and finding, including periodic support payments in the
future, shall be assessed and determined and ordered by the department and that
this debt and amounts due under the notice shall be subject to collection
action;

(e)
A statement that the property of the debtor, without further advance notice or
hearing, will be subject to lien and foreclosure, distraint, seizure and sale,
order to withhold and deliver, notice of payroll deduction or other collection
action to satisfy the debt and enforce the support obligation established under
the notice.

(4)
A responsible parent or custodial parent who objects to the notice and
finding of financial responsibility may file an application for an adjudicative
proceeding within twenty days of the date of service of the notice or
thereafter as provided under this subsection. ((An adjudicative proceeding
shall be held in the county of residence or other place convenient to the
responsible parent.))

(a)
If the responsible parent or custodial parent files the application
within twenty days, the ((department)) office of administrative
hearings shall schedule an adjudicative proceeding to hear the parent's or
parents' objection and determine the ((parents')) support obligation
for the entire period covered by the notice and finding of financial
responsibility. The filing of the application stays collection action pending
the entry of a final administrative order;

(b)
If both the responsible parent and the custodial parent fail((s))
to file an application within twenty days, the notice and finding shall become
a final administrative order. The amounts for current and future support and
the support debt stated in the notice are final and subject to collection,
except as provided under (c) and (d) of this subsection;

(c)
If the responsible parent or custodial parent files the application more
than twenty days after, but within one year of the date of service, the
department shall schedule an adjudicative proceeding to hear the parent's or
parents' objection and determine the ((parent's)) support obligation for
the entire period covered by the notice and finding of financial
responsibility. The filing of the application does not stay further collection
action, pending the entry of a final administrative order, and does not affect
any prior collection action;

(d)
If the responsible parent or custodial parent files the application more
than one year after the date of service, the ((department)) office of
administrative hearings shall schedule an adjudicative proceeding at which
the ((responsible)) parent who requested the late hearing must
show good cause for failure to file a timely application. The filing of the
application does not stay future collection action and does not affect prior
collection action:

(i)
If the presiding officer finds that good cause exists, the presiding officer
shall proceed to hear the parent's objection to the notice and determine the ((parent's))
support obligation;

(ii)
If the presiding officer finds that good cause does not exist, the presiding
officer shall treat the application as a petition for prospective modification
of the amount for current and future support established under the notice and
finding. In the modification proceeding, the presiding officer shall set
current and future support under chapter 26.19 RCW. The ((responsible))
petitioning parent need show neither good cause nor a substantial change
of circumstances to justify modification of current and future support;

(e)
The department shall retain and/or shall not refund support money collected
more than twenty days after the date of service of the notice. Money withheld
as the result of collection action shall be delivered to the department. The
department shall distribute such money, as provided in published rules.

(5)
If an application for an adjudicative proceeding is filed, the presiding or
reviewing officer shall determine the past liability and responsibility, if
any, of the alleged responsible parent and shall also determine the amount of
periodic payments to be made in the future, which amount is not limited by the
amount of any public assistance payment made to or for the benefit of the
child. If deviating from the child support schedule in making these
determinations, the presiding or reviewing officer shall apply the standards
contained in the child support schedule and enter written findings of fact
supporting the deviation.

(6)
If either the responsible parent or the custodial parent fails to
attend or participate in the hearing or other stage of an adjudicative
proceeding, upon a showing of valid service, the presiding officer shall enter
an order of default against each party who did not appear, and may enter an
administrative order declaring the support debt and payment provisions stated
in the notice and finding of financial responsibility to be assessed and
determined and subject to collection action. The parties who appear may
enter an agreed settlement or consent order, which may be different than the
terms of the department's notice. Any party who appears may choose to proceed
to the hearing, after the conclusion of which the presiding officer or
reviewing officer may enter an order that is different than the terms stated in
the notice, if the obligation is supported by credible evidence presented by
any party at the hearing.

(7)
The final administrative order establishing liability and/or future periodic
support payments shall be superseded upon entry of a superior court order for
support to the extent the superior court order is inconsistent with the
administrative order.

(8)
Debts determined pursuant to this section, accrued and not paid, are subject to
collection action under this chapter without further necessity of action by a
presiding or reviewing officer.

Sec.
4. RCW
74.20A.056 and 1997 c 58 s 941 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
If an alleged father has signed an affidavit acknowledging paternity which has
been filed with the state registrar of vital statistics before July 1, 1997,
the division of child support may serve a notice and finding of parental
responsibility on him and the custodial parent. Procedures for and
responsibility resulting from acknowledgments filed after July 1, 1997, are in
subsections (8) and (9) of this section. Service of the notice shall be in the
same manner as a summons in a civil action or by certified mail, return receipt
requested on the alleged father. The custodial parent shall be served by
first class mail to the last known address, if the custodial parent is the
nonassistance applicant or public assistance recipient. If the custodial
parent is not the nonassistance applicant or public assistance recipient,
service shall be in the same manner as for the responsible parent. The
notice shall have attached to it a copy of the affidavit or certification of
birth record information advising of the existence of a filed affidavit,
provided by the state registrar of vital statistics, and shall state that:

(a)
The alleged father or custodial parent may file an application for an
adjudicative proceeding at which ((he)) they both will be
required to appear and show cause why the amount stated in the finding of
financial responsibility as to support is incorrect and should not be ordered;

(b)
An alleged father or the mother, if she is also the custodial parent,
may request that a blood or genetic test be administered to determine whether
such test would exclude him from being a natural parent and, if not excluded,
may subsequently request that the division of child support initiate an action
in superior court to determine the existence of the parent-child relationship;
and

(c)
If neither the alleged father ((does not request)) nor the
custodial parent requests that a blood or genetic test be administered or
files an application for an adjudicative proceeding, the amount of
support stated in the notice and finding of parental responsibility shall
become final, subject only to a subsequent determination under RCW 26.26.060
that the parent-child relationship does not exist.

(2)
An alleged father or custodial parent who objects to the amount of
support requested in the notice may file an application for an adjudicative
proceeding up to twenty days after the date the notice was served. An
application for an adjudicative proceeding may be filed within one year of
service of the notice and finding of parental responsibility without the
necessity for a showing of good cause or upon a showing of good cause thereafter.
An adjudicative proceeding under this section shall be pursuant to RCW
74.20A.055. The only issues shall be the amount of the accrued debt, the
amount of the current and future support obligation, and the reimbursement of
the costs of blood or genetic tests if advanced by the department. A
custodian who is not the parent of a child and who has lawful physical custody
of a child has the same notice and hearing rights that a custodial parent has
under this section.

(3)
If the application for an adjudicative proceeding is filed within twenty days
of service of the notice, collection action shall be stayed pending a final
decision by the department. If no application is filed within twenty days:

(a)
The amounts in the notice shall become final and the debt created therein shall
be subject to collection action; and

(b)
Any amounts so collected shall neither be refunded nor returned if the alleged
father is later found not to be a responsible parent.

(4)
An alleged father ((who denies being a responsible parent)) or the
mother, if she is also the custodial parent, may request that a blood or
genetic test be administered at any time. The request for testing shall be in
writing or as the department may specify by rule and served on the
division of child support ((personally or by registered or certified mail)).
If a request for testing is made, the department shall arrange for the test
and, pursuant to rules adopted by the department, may advance the cost of such
testing. The department shall mail a copy of the test results by certified
mail, return receipt requested, to the alleged father's and the mother's, if
she is also the custodial parent, last known address.

(5)
If the test excludes the alleged father from being a natural parent, the
division of child support shall file a copy of the results with the state
registrar of vital statistics and shall dismiss any pending administrative
collection proceedings based upon the affidavit in issue. The state registrar
of vital statistics shall remove the alleged father's name from the birth
certificate and change the child's surname to be the same as the mother's
maiden name as stated on the birth certificate, or any other name which the
mother may select.

(6)
The alleged father or the mother, if she is also the custodial parent,
may, within twenty days after the date of receipt of the test results, request
the division of child support to initiate an action under RCW 26.26.060 to
determine the existence of the parent-child relationship. If the division of
child support initiates a superior court action at the request of the alleged
father or the mother and the decision of the court is that the alleged
father is a natural parent, the ((alleged father)) parent who
requested the test shall be liable for court costs incurred.

(7)
If the alleged father or the mother, if she is also the custodial parent,
does not request the division of child support to initiate a superior court
action, or ((if the alleged father)) fails to appear and cooperate with
blood or genetic testing, the notice of parental responsibility shall become
final for all intents and purposes and may be overturned only by a subsequent
superior court order entered under RCW 26.26.060.

(8)(a)
If an alleged father has signed an affidavit acknowledging paternity that has
been filed with the state registrar of vital statistics after July 1, 1997,
within sixty days from the date of filing of the acknowledgment:

(i)
The division of child support may serve a notice and finding of parental
responsibility on him and the custodial parent as set forth under this
section; and

(ii)
The alleged father or any other signatory may rescind ((his)) the
acknowledgment of paternity. The rescission shall be notarized and delivered
to the state registrar of vital statistics personally or by registered or
certified mail. The state registrar shall remove the father's name from the
birth certificate and change the child's surname to be the same as the mother's
maiden name as stated on the birth certificate or any other name that the
mother may select. The state registrar shall file rescission notices in a
sealed file. All future paternity actions on behalf of the child in question
shall be performed under court order.

(b)
If neither the alleged father ((does not)) nor the custodial
parent files an application for an adjudicative proceeding or ((rescind
his)) rescinds the acknowledgment of paternity, the amount of
support stated in the notice and finding of parental responsibility becomes
final, subject only to a subsequent determination under RCW 26.26.060 that the
parent-child relationship does not exist.

(c)
An alleged father or custodial parent who objects to the amount of
support requested in the notice may file an application for an adjudicative
proceeding up to twenty days after the date the notice was served. An
application for an adjudicative proceeding may be filed within one year of
service of the notice and finding of parental responsibility without the
necessity for a showing of good cause or upon a showing of good cause
thereafter. An adjudicative proceeding under this section shall be pursuant to
RCW 74.20A.055. The only issues shall be the amount of the accrued debt and
the amount of the current and future support obligation.

(i)
If the application for an adjudicative proceeding is filed within twenty days
of service of the notice, collection action shall be stayed pending a final
decision by the department.

(ii)
If the application for an adjudicative proceeding is not filed within twenty
days of the service of the notice, any amounts collected under the notice shall
be neither refunded nor returned if the alleged father is later found not to be
a responsible parent.

(d)
If an alleged father or the mother, if she is also the custodial parent,
makes a request for genetic testing, the department shall proceed as set forth
under RCW 74.20.360.

(e)
If neither the alleged father ((does not)) nor the custodial
parent requests an adjudicative proceeding, or if neither the
alleged father ((fails to rescind his)) nor the mother rescinds the
filed acknowledgment of paternity, the notice of parental responsibility
becomes final for all intents and purposes and may be overturned only by a
subsequent superior court order entered under RCW 26.26.060.

(9)
Affidavits acknowledging paternity that are filed after July 1, 1997, are
subject to requirements of chapters 26.26 and 70.58 RCW.

(10)
The department and the department of health may adopt rules to implement the
requirements under this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 26.23 RCW to read as follows:

If
this chapter requires service in the manner prescribed for service of a summons
in a civil action or by certified mail, valid service also includes delivery by
a parcel delivery service that returns the signature of the addressee on a
return receipt.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 74.20A RCW to read as follows:

If
this chapter requires service in the manner prescribed for service of a summons
in a civil action or by certified mail, valid service also includes delivery by
a parcel delivery service that returns the signature of the addressee on a
return receipt.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7. RCW
74.20A.058 (Adjudicative proceeding contesting parental
responsibility--Notice to mother) and 1989 c 55 s 5 are each repealed.

---
END ---