BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
26.18.055 and 1997 c 58 s 942 are each amended to read as follows:

Child
support debts, not paid when due, become liens by operation of law against all
property of the debtor with priority of a secured creditor. This lien shall be
separate and apart from, and in addition to, any other lien created by, or
provided for, in this title. The lien attaches to all real and personal
property of the debtor on the date of filing with the county auditor of the
county in which the property is located. Liens filed by other states or
jurisdictions that comply with the procedural rules for filing liens under
chapter 65.04 RCW shall be accorded full faith and credit and are enforceable
without judicial notice or hearing.

Sec.
2. RCW
26.18.170 and 1995 c 34 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever an obligor parent who has been ordered to provide health insurance
coverage for a dependent child fails to provide such coverage or lets it lapse,
the department or the obligee may seek enforcement of the coverage order as
provided under this section.

(2)(a)
If the obligor parent's order to provide health insurance coverage contains
language notifying the obligor that failure to provide such coverage or proof
that such coverage is unavailable may result in direct enforcement of the order
and orders payments through, or has been submitted to, the Washington state
support registry for enforcement, then the department may, without further
notice to the obligor, send a notice of enrollment to the obligor's employer or
union ((by certified mail, return receipt requested)). The notice
shall be served:

(i)
By regular mail;

(ii)
In the manner prescribed for the service of a summons in a civil action;

(iii)
By certified mail, return receipt requested; or

(iv)
By electronic means if there is an agreement between the secretary of the
department and the person, firm, corporation, association, political
subdivision, department of the state, or agency, subdivision, or
instrumentality of the United States to accept service by electronic means.

(b)
The notice shall require the employer or union to enroll the child in the
health insurance plan as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(((b)))
(c) The returned answer to the division of child support by the employer
constitutes proof of service of the notice of enrollment in the case where the
notice was served by regular mail.

(d)
The division of child support may use uniform interstate forms adopted by the
United States department of health and human services to take insurance
enrollment actions under this section.

(e)
If the obligor parent's order to provide health insurance coverage does not
order payments through, and has not been submitted to, the Washington state
support registry for enforcement:

(i)
The obligee may, without further notice to the obligor send a certified copy of
the order requiring health insurance coverage to the obligor's employer or
union by certified mail, return receipt requested; and

(ii)
The obligee shall attach a notarized statement to the order declaring that the
order is the latest order addressing coverage entered by the court and require
the employer or union to enroll the child in the health insurance plan as
provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(3)
Upon receipt of an order that provides for health insurance coverage, or a
notice of enrollment:

(a)
The obligor's employer or union shall answer the party who sent the order or
notice within ((thirty-five)) twenty days and confirm that the
child:

(i)
Has been enrolled in the health insurance plan;

(ii)
Will be enrolled; or

(iii)
Cannot be covered, stating the reasons why such coverage cannot be provided;

(b)
The employer or union shall withhold any required premium from the obligor's
income or wages;

(c)
If more than one plan is offered by the employer or union, and each plan may be
extended to cover the child, then the child shall be enrolled in the obligor's
plan. If the obligor's plan does not provide coverage which is accessible to
the child, the child shall be enrolled in the least expensive plan otherwise
available to the obligor parent;

(d)
The employer or union shall provide information about the name of the health
insurance coverage provider or issuer and the extent of coverage available to
the obligee or the department and shall make available any necessary claim
forms or enrollment membership cards.

(4)
If the order for coverage contains no language notifying the obligor that
failure to provide health insurance coverage or proof that such coverage is
unavailable may result in direct enforcement of the order, the department or
the obligee may serve a written notice of intent to enforce the order on the
obligor by certified mail, return receipt requested, or by personal service.
If the obligor fails to provide written proof that such coverage has been
obtained or applied for or fails to provide proof that such coverage is
unavailable within twenty days of service of the notice, the department or the
obligee may proceed to enforce the order directly as provided in subsection (2)
of this section.

(5)
If the obligor ordered to provide health insurance coverage elects to provide
coverage that will not be accessible to the child because of geographic or
other limitations when accessible coverage is otherwise available, the
department or the obligee may serve a written notice of intent to purchase
health insurance coverage on the obligor by certified mail, return receipt
requested. The notice shall also specify the type and cost of coverage.

(6)
If the department serves a notice under subsection (5) of this section the
obligor shall, within twenty days of the date of service:

(a)
File an application for an adjudicative proceeding; or

(b)
Provide written proof to the department that the obligor has either applied for,
or obtained, coverage accessible to the child.

(7)
If the obligee serves a notice under subsection (5) of this section, within
twenty days of the date of service the obligor shall provide written proof to
the obligee that the obligor has either applied for, or obtained, coverage
accessible to the child.

(8)
If the obligor fails to respond to a notice served under subsection (5) of this
section to the party who served the notice, the party who served the notice may
purchase the health insurance coverage specified in the notice directly. The
amount of the monthly premium shall be added to the support debt and be
collectible without further notice. The amount of the monthly premium may be
collected or accrued until the obligor provides proof of the required coverage.

(9)
The signature of the obligee or of a department employee shall be a valid
authorization to the coverage provider or issuer for purposes of processing a
payment to the child's health services provider. An order for health insurance
coverage shall operate as an assignment of all benefit rights to the obligee or
to the child's health services provider, and in any claim against the coverage
provider or issuer, the obligee or the obligee's assignee shall be subrogated
to the rights of the obligor. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section
regarding assignment of benefits, this section shall not require a health care
service contractor authorized under chapter 48.44 RCW or a health maintenance
organization authorized under chapter 48.46 RCW to deviate from their
contractual provisions and restrictions regarding reimbursement for covered
services. If the coverage is terminated, the employer shall mail a notice of
termination to the department or the obligee at the obligee's last known address
within thirty days of the termination date.

(10)
This section shall not be construed to limit the right of the obligor or the
obligee to bring an action in superior court at any time to enforce, modify, or
clarify the original support order.

(11)
Where a child does not reside in the issuer's service area, an issuer shall
cover no less than urgent and emergent care. Where the issuer offers broader
coverage, whether by policy or reciprocal agreement, the issuer shall provide
such coverage to any child otherwise covered that does not reside in the
issuer's service area.

(12)
If an obligor fails to pay his or her portion of any deductible required under
the health insurance coverage or fails to pay his or her portion of medical
expenses incurred in excess of the coverage provided under the plan, the
department or the obligee may enforce collection of the obligor's portion of
the deductible or the additional medical expenses through a wage assignment
order. The amount of the deductible or additional medical expenses shall be
added to the support debt and be collectible without further notice if the
obligor's share of the amount of the deductible or additional expenses is
reduced to a sum certain in a court order.

Sec.
3. RCW
26.18.180 and 1989 c 416 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
An obligated parent's employer or union shall be liable for a fine of up to one
thousand dollars per occurrence, if the employer or union fails or refuses,
within ((thirty-five)) twenty days of receiving the order or
notice for health insurance coverage to:

(a)
Promptly enroll the obligated parent's child in the health insurance plan; or

(b)
Make a written answer to the person or entity who sent the order or notice for
health insurance coverage stating that the child:

(i)
Will be enrolled in the next available open enrollment period; or

(ii)
Cannot be covered and explaining the reasons why coverage cannot be provided.

(2)
Liability may be established and the fine may be collected by the office of
support enforcement under chapter 74.20A or 26.23 RCW using any of the remedies
contained in those chapters.

(3)
Any employer or union who enrolls a child in a health insurance plan in
compliance with chapter 26.18 RCW shall be exempt from liability resulting from
such enrollment.

Sec.
4. RCW
26.23.060 and 1998 c 160 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The division of child support may issue a notice of payroll deduction:

(a)
As authorized by a support order that contains a notice clearly stating that
child support may be collected by withholding from earnings, wages, or benefits
without further notice to the obligated parent; or

(b)
After service of a notice containing an income-withholding provision under this
chapter or chapter 74.20A RCW.

(2)
The division of child support shall serve a notice of payroll deduction upon a
responsible parent's employer or upon the employment security department for
the state in possession of or owing any benefits from the unemployment
compensation fund to the responsible parent pursuant to Title 50 RCW:

(a)
In the manner prescribed for the service of a summons in a civil action;

(b)
By certified mail, return receipt requested;

(c)
By electronic means if there is an agreement between the secretary and the
person, firm, corporation, association, political subdivision, department of
the state, or agency, subdivision, or instrumentality of the United States to
accept service by electronic means; or

(d)
By regular mail to a responsible parent's employer unless the division of child
support reasonably believes that service of process in the manner prescribed in
(a) or (b) of this subsection is required for initiating an action to ensure
employer compliance with the withholding requirement.

(3)
Service of a notice of payroll deduction upon an employer or employment
security department requires the employer or employment security department to
immediately make a mandatory payroll deduction from the responsible parent's
unpaid disposable earnings or unemployment compensation benefits. The employer
or employment security department shall thereafter deduct each pay period the
amount stated in the notice divided by the number of pay periods per month.
The payroll deduction each pay period shall not exceed fifty percent of the
responsible parent's disposable earnings.

(4)
A notice of payroll deduction for support shall have priority over any wage
assignment, garnishment, attachment, or other legal process.

(5)
The notice of payroll deduction shall be in writing and include:

(a)
The name and social security number of the responsible parent;

(b)
The amount to be deducted from the responsible parent's disposable earnings
each month, or alternate amounts and frequencies as may be necessary to
facilitate processing of the payroll deduction;

(c)
A statement that the total amount withheld shall not exceed fifty percent of
the responsible parent's disposable earnings;

(d)
The address to which the payments are to be mailed or delivered; and

(e)
A notice to the responsible parent warning the responsible parent that, despite
the payroll deduction, the responsible parent's privileges to obtain and
maintain a license, as defined in RCW 74.20A.320, may not be renewed, or may be
suspended if the parent is not in compliance with a support order as defined in
RCW 74.20A.320.

(6)
An informational copy of the notice of payroll deduction shall be mailed to the
last known address of the responsible parent by regular mail.

(7)
An employer or employment security department that receives a notice of payroll
deduction shall make immediate deductions from the responsible parent's unpaid
disposable earnings and remit proper amounts to the Washington state support
registry within seven working days of the date the earnings are payable to the
responsible parent.

(8)
An employer, or the employment security department, upon whom a notice of
payroll deduction is served, shall make an answer to the division of child
support within twenty days after the date of service. The answer shall confirm
compliance and institution of the payroll deduction or explain the circumstances
if no payroll deduction is in effect. The answer shall also state whether the
responsible parent is employed by or receives earnings from the employer or
receives unemployment compensation benefits from the employment security
department, whether the employer or employment security department anticipates
paying earnings or unemployment compensation benefits and the amount of
earnings. If the responsible parent is no longer employed, or receiving
earnings from the employer, the answer shall state the present employer's name
and address, if known. If the responsible parent is no longer receiving
unemployment compensation benefits from the employment security department, the
answer shall state the present employer's name and address, if known.

The
returned answer or a payment remitted to the division of child support by the
employer constitutes proof of service of the notice of payroll deduction in the
case where the notice was served by regular mail.

(9)
The employer or employment security department may deduct a processing fee from
the remainder of the responsible parent's earnings after withholding under the
notice of payroll deduction, even if the remainder is exempt under RCW
26.18.090. The processing fee may not exceed: (a) Ten dollars for the first
disbursement made to the Washington state support registry; and (b) one dollar
for each subsequent disbursement to the registry.

(10)
The notice of payroll deduction shall remain in effect until released by the
division of child support, the court enters an order terminating the notice and
approving an alternate arrangement under RCW 26.23.050, or until the employer
no longer employs the responsible parent and is no longer in possession of or
owing any earnings to the responsible parent. The employer shall promptly
notify the office of support enforcement when the employer no longer employs
the parent subject to the notice. For the employment security department, the
notice of payroll deduction shall remain in effect until released by the
division of child support or until the court enters an order terminating the
notice.

(11)
The division of child support may use uniform interstate withholding forms
adopted by the United States department of health and human services to take
withholding actions under this section ((when)) whether the
responsible parent is receiving earnings or unemployment compensation in
this state or in another state.

Sec.
5. RCW
67.16.020 and 1989 c 385 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
It shall be the duty of the commission, as soon as it is possible after its
organization, to prepare and promulgate a complete set of rules and regulations
to govern the race meets in this state. It shall determine and announce the
place, time and duration of race meets for which license fees are exacted; and
it shall be the duty of each person holding a license under the authority of
this chapter, and every owner, trainer, jockey, and attendant at any race
course in this state, to comply with all rules and regulations promulgated and
all orders issued by the commission. It shall be unlawful for any person to
hold any race meet without having first obtained and having in force and effect
a license issued by the commission as in this chapter provided; and it shall be
unlawful for any owner, trainer or jockey to participate in race meets in this
state without first securing a license therefor from the state racing
commission, the fee for which shall be set by the commission which shall offset
the cost of administration and shall not be for a period exceeding one year.

(2)
The commission shall immediately suspend the license of a person who has been
certified under RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services
as a person who is not in compliance with a support order. If the person has
continued to meet all other requirements for a license under this chapter
during the suspension, reissuance of the license shall be automatic upon the
department's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health
services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the support order.
The procedure in RCW 74.20A.320 is the exclusive administrative remedy for
contesting the establishment of noncompliance with a child support order, and
suspension of a license under this subsection, and satisfies the requirements
of RCW 34.05.422.

Sec.
6. RCW
74.20.330 and 1997 c 58 s 936 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Whenever public assistance is paid under a state program funded under Title
IV-A of the federal social security act as amended by the personal
responsibility and work opportunity reconciliation act of 1996, each applicant
or recipient is deemed to have made assignment to the department of any rights
to a support obligation from any other person the applicant or recipient may
have in his or her own behalf or in behalf of any other family member for whom
the applicant or recipient is applying for or receiving public assistance,
including any unpaid support obligation or support debt which has accrued at
the time the assignment is made.

(2)
Payment of public assistance under a ((state)) state-funded program,
or a program funded under Title IV-A or IV-E of the federal social
security act as amended by the personal responsibility and work opportunity
reconciliation act of 1996 shall:

(a)
Operate as an assignment by operation of law; and

(b)
Constitute an authorization to the department to provide the assistance
recipient with support enforcement services.

Sec.
7. RCW
74.20A.030 and 1997 c 58 s 934 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall be subrogated to the right of any dependent child or
children or person having the care, custody, and control of said child or children,
if public assistance money is paid to or for the benefit of the child under a
((state)) state-funded program, or a program funded under Title
IV-A or IV-E of the federal social security act as amended by the
personal responsibility and work opportunity reconciliation act of 1996, to
prosecute or maintain any support action or execute any administrative remedy
existing under the laws of the state of Washington to obtain reimbursement of
moneys expended, based on the support obligation of the responsible parent
established by a ((superior court)) child support order ((or
RCW 74.20A.055)). Distribution of any support moneys shall be made in
accordance with RCW 26.23.035.

(2)
The department may initiate, continue, maintain, or execute an action to
establish, enforce, and collect a support obligation, including establishing
paternity and performing related services, under this chapter and chapter 74.20
RCW, or through the attorney general or prosecuting attorney under chapter
26.09, 26.18, 26.20, 26.21, 26.23, or 26.26 RCW or other appropriate statutes
or the common law of this state, for so long as and under such conditions as
the department may establish by regulation.

(3)
Public assistance moneys shall be exempt from collection action under this
chapter except as provided in RCW 74.20A.270.

(4)
No collection action shall be taken against parents of children eligible for
admission to, or children who have been discharged from a residential
habilitation center as defined by RCW 71A.10.020(((7))) (8). For
the period July 1, 1993, through June 30, 1995, a collection action may be
taken against parents of children with developmental disabilities who are
placed in community-based residential care. The amount of support the
department may collect from the parents shall not exceed one-half of the parents'
support obligation accrued while the child was in community-based residential
care. The child support obligation shall be calculated pursuant to chapter
26.19 RCW.

Sec.
8. RCW
74.20A.080 and 1998 c 160 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The secretary may issue to any person, firm, corporation, association,
political subdivision, department of the state, or agency, subdivision, or
instrumentality of the United States, an order to withhold and deliver property
of any kind, including but not restricted to earnings which are or might become
due, owing, or belonging to the debtor, when the secretary has reason to
believe that there is in the possession of such person, firm, corporation,
association, political subdivision, department of the state, or agency,
subdivision, or instrumentality of the United States property which is or might
become due, owing, or belonging to said debtor. Such order to withhold and
deliver may be issued:

(a)
At any time, if a responsible parent's support order:

(i)
Contains notice that withholding action may be taken against earnings, wages,
or assets without further notice to the parent; or

(ii)
Includes a statement that other income-withholding action under this chapter
may be taken without further notice to the responsible parent;

(b)
Twenty-one days after service of a notice of support debt under RCW 74.20A.040;

(c)
Twenty-one days after service of a notice and finding of parental
responsibility under RCW 74.20A.056;

(d)
Twenty-one days after service of a notice of support owed under RCW 26.23.110;

(e)
Twenty-one days after service of a notice and finding of financial
responsibility under RCW 74.20A.055; or

(f)
When appropriate under RCW 74.20A.270.

(2)
The order to withhold and deliver shall:

(a)
State the amount to be withheld on a periodic basis if the order to withhold
and deliver is being served to secure payment of monthly current support;

(b)
State the amount of the support debt accrued;

(c)
State in summary the terms of RCW 74.20A.090 and 74.20A.100;

(d)
Be served:

(i)
In the manner prescribed for the service of a summons in a civil action;

(ii)
By certified mail, return receipt requested;

(iii)
By electronic means if there is an agreement between the secretary and the
person, firm, corporation, association, political subdivision, department of
the state, or agency, subdivision, or instrumentality of the United States to
accept service by electronic means; or

(iv)
By regular mail to a responsible parent's employer unless the division of child
support reasonably believes that service of process in the manner prescribed in
(d)(i) or (ii) of this subsection is required for initiating an action to
ensure employer compliance with the withholding requirement.

(3)
The division of child support may use uniform interstate withholding forms
adopted by the United States department of health and human services to take
withholding actions under this section when the responsible parent is owed
money or property that is located in this state or in another state.

(4)
Any person, firm, corporation, association, political subdivision, department
of the state, or agency, subdivision, or instrumentality of the United States
upon whom service has been made is hereby required to:

(a)
Answer said order to withhold and deliver within twenty days, exclusive of the
day of service, under oath and in writing, and shall make true answers to the
matters inquired of therein; and

(b)
Provide further and additional answers when requested by the secretary.

(5)
The returned answer or a payment remitted to the division of child support by
the employer constitutes proof of service of the ((notice of payroll
deduction)) order to withhold and deliver in the case where the ((notice))
order was served by regular mail.

(6)
Any such person, firm, corporation, association, political subdivision,
department of the state, or agency, subdivision, or instrumentality of the
United States in possession of any property which may be subject to the claim
of the department shall:

(a)(i)
Immediately withhold such property upon receipt of the order to withhold and
deliver; and

(ii)
Within seven working days deliver the property to the secretary;

(iii)
Continue to withhold earnings payable to the debtor at each succeeding
disbursement interval as provided for in RCW 74.20A.090, and deliver amounts
withheld from earnings to the secretary within seven working days of the date
earnings are payable to the debtor;

(iv)
Deliver amounts withheld from periodic payments to the secretary within seven
working days of the date the payments are payable to the debtor;

(v)
Inform the secretary of the date the amounts were withheld as requested under
this section; or

(b)
Furnish to the secretary a good and sufficient bond, satisfactory to the
secretary, conditioned upon final determination of liability.

(7)
An order to withhold and deliver served under this section shall not expire
until:

(a)
Released in writing by the division of child support;

(b)
Terminated by court order; ((or))

(c)
((The)) A person or entity ((receiving)), other than an
employer as defined in Title 50 RCW, who has received the order to withhold
and deliver does not possess property of or owe money to the debtor; or

(d)
An employer who has received the order to withhold and deliver no longer
employs, contracts, or owes money to the debtor under a contract of employment,
express or implied.

(8)
Where money is due and owing under any contract of employment, express or
implied, or is held by any person, firm, corporation, or association, political
subdivision, or department of the state, or agency, subdivision, or
instrumentality of the United States subject to withdrawal by the debtor, such
money shall be delivered by remittance payable to the order of the secretary.

(9)
Delivery to the secretary of the money or other property held or claimed shall
satisfy the requirement and serve as full acquittance of the order to withhold
and deliver.

(10)
A person, firm, corporation, or association, political subdivision, department
of the state, or agency, subdivision, or instrumentality of the United States
that complies with the order to withhold and deliver under this chapter is not
civilly liable to the debtor for complying with the order to withhold and
deliver under this chapter.

(11)
The secretary may hold the money or property delivered under this section in
trust for application on the indebtedness involved or for return, without
interest, in accordance with final determination of liability or nonliability.

(12)
Exemptions contained in RCW 74.20A.090 apply to orders to withhold and deliver
issued under this section.

(13)
The secretary shall also, on or before the date of service of the order to withhold
and deliver, mail or cause to be mailed a copy of the order to withhold and
deliver to the debtor at the debtor's last known post office address, or, in
the alternative, a copy of the order to withhold and deliver shall be served on
the debtor in the same manner as a summons in a civil action on or before the
date of service of the order or within two days thereafter. The copy of the
order shall be mailed or served together with a concise explanation of the
right to petition for judicial review. This requirement is not jurisdictional,
but, if the copy is not mailed or served as in this section provided, or if any
irregularity appears with respect to the mailing or service, the superior
court, in its discretion on motion of the debtor promptly made and supported by
affidavit showing that the debtor has suffered substantial injury due to the
failure to mail the copy, may set aside the order to withhold and deliver and
award to the debtor an amount equal to the damages resulting from the
secretary's failure to serve on or mail to the debtor the copy.

(14)
An order to withhold and deliver issued in accordance with this section has
priority over any other wage assignment, garnishment, attachment, or other
legal process.

(15)
The division of child support shall notify any person, firm, corporation,
association, or political subdivision, department of the state, or agency,
subdivision, or instrumentality of the United States required to withhold and
deliver the earnings of a debtor under this action that they may deduct a
processing fee from the remainder of the debtor's earnings, even if the
remainder would otherwise be exempt under RCW 74.20A.090. The processing fee
shall not exceed ten dollars for the first disbursement to the department and
one dollar for each subsequent disbursement under the order to withhold and
deliver.

Sec.
9. RCW
74.20A.095 and 1991 c 367 s 48 are each amended to read as follows:

When
providing support enforcement services, the office of support enforcement may
take action, under this chapter and chapter 26.23 RCW, against a responsible
parent's earnings or assets, located in, or subject to the jurisdiction
of, the state of Washington regardless of the presence or residence of the
responsible parent. If the responsible parent resides in another state or
country, the office of support enforcement shall, unless otherwise
authorized by state or federal law, serve a notice under RCW 74.20A.040
more than sixty days before taking collection action.

Sec.
10. RCW
74.20A.180 and 1985 c 276 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

If
the secretary finds that the collection of any support debt, accrued under a ((superior
court)) support order, based upon subrogation or an authorization to
enforce and collect under RCW 74.20A.030, or assignment of, or a request for
support enforcement services to enforce and collect the amount of support
ordered by any ((superior court)) support order is in jeopardy,
the secretary may make a written demand under RCW 74.20A.040 for immediate
payment of the support debt and, upon failure or refusal immediately to pay
said support debt, may file and serve liens pursuant to RCW 74.20A.060 and
74.20A.070, without regard to the twenty day period provided for in RCW
74.20A.040: PROVIDED, That no further action under RCW 74.20A.080, 74.20A.130,
and 74.20A.140 may be taken until the notice requirements of RCW 74.20A.040 are
met.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11. A
new section is added to chapter 74.20A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Before the state may assist another state or jurisdiction with a high-volume
automated administrative enforcement of an interstate case, the requesting
state must certify that:

(a)
The requesting state has met all due process requirements for the establishment
of the support order;

(b)
The requesting state has met all due process requirements for the enforcement
of the support order, including that the obligor has been notified that another
state may take action against the obligor's wages, earnings, assets, or
benefits, and may enforce against the obligor's real and personal property
under the child support statutes of this state or any other state without
further notice; and

(c)
The amount of arrears transmitted by the requesting state is due under the
support order.

(2) Receipt of a request for assistance on automated enforcement of
an interstate case by the state constitutes certification under this section.

---
END ---