BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
3.66.020 and 1997 c 246 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

If
the value of the claim or the amount at issue does not exceed ((thirty-five))
fifty thousand dollars, exclusive of interest, costs, and attorneys'
fees, the district court shall have jurisdiction and cognizance of the
following civil actions and proceedings:

(1)
Actions arising on contract for the recovery of money;

(2)
Actions for damages for injuries to the person, or for taking or detaining
personal property, or for injuring personal property, or for an injury to real
property when no issue raised by the answer involves the plaintiff's title to
or possession of the same and actions to recover the possession of personal
property;

(3)
Actions for a penalty;

(4)
Actions upon a bond conditioned for the payment of money, when the amount
claimed does not exceed ((thirty-five)) fifty thousand dollars,
though the penalty of the bond exceeds that sum, the judgment to be given for
the sum actually due, not exceeding the amount claimed in the complaint;

(5)
Actions on an undertaking or surety bond taken by the court;

(6)
Actions for damages for fraud in the sale, purchase, or exchange of personal
property;

(7)
Proceedings to take and enter judgment on confession of a defendant;

(8)
Proceedings to issue writs of attachment, garnishment and replevin upon goods,
chattels, moneys, and effects; and

(9)
All other actions and proceedings of which jurisdiction is specially conferred
by statute, when the title to, or right of possession of real property is not
involved.

Sec.
2. RCW
36.18.016 and 1999 c 397 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Revenue collected under this section is not subject to division under RCW
36.18.025 or 27.24.070.

(2)
For the filing of a petition for modification of a decree of dissolution or
paternity, within the same case as the original action, a fee of twenty dollars
must be paid.

(3)(a)
The party making a demand for a jury of six in a civil action shall pay, at the
time, a fee of one hundred twenty-five dollars; if the demand is for a jury of
twelve, a fee of two hundred fifty dollars. If, after the party demands a jury
of six and pays the required fee, any other party to the action requests a jury
of twelve, an additional one hundred twenty-five dollar fee will be required of
the party demanding the increased number of jurors.

(b)
Upon conviction in criminal cases a jury demand charge of fifty dollars for a
jury of six, or one hundred dollars for a jury of twelve may be imposed as
costs under RCW 10.46.190.

(4)
For preparing, transcribing, or certifying an instrument on file or of record
in the clerk's office, with or without seal, for the first page or portion of
the first page, a fee of two dollars, and for each additional page or portion
of a page, a fee of one dollar must be charged. For authenticating or
exemplifying an instrument, a fee of one dollar for each additional seal
affixed must be charged.

(5)
For executing a certificate, with or without a seal, a fee of two dollars must
be charged.

(6)
For a garnishee defendant named in an affidavit for garnishment and for a writ
of attachment, a fee of twenty dollars must be charged.

(7)
For approving a bond, including justification on the bond, in other than civil
actions and probate proceedings, a fee of two dollars must be charged.

(8)
For the issuance of a certificate of qualification and a certified copy of
letters of administration, letters testamentary, or letters of guardianship,
there must be a fee of two dollars.

(9)
For the preparation of a passport application, the clerk may collect an
execution fee as authorized by the federal government.

(10)
For clerk's special services such as processing ex parte orders by mail,
performing historical searches, compiling statistical reports, and conducting
exceptional record searches, the clerk may collect a fee not to exceed twenty
dollars per hour or portion of an hour.

(11)
For duplicated recordings of court's proceedings there must be a fee of ten
dollars for each audio tape and twenty-five dollars for each video tape.

(12)
For the filing of oaths and affirmations under chapter 5.28 RCW, a fee of twenty
dollars must be charged.

(13)
For filing a disclaimer of interest under RCW 11.86.031(4), a fee of two
dollars must be charged.

(14)
For registration of land titles, Torrens Act, under RCW 65.12.780, a fee of
five dollars must be charged.

(15)
For the issuance of extension of judgment under RCW 6.17.020 and chapter 9.94A
RCW, a fee of one hundred ten dollars must be charged.

(16)
A facilitator surcharge of ten dollars must be charged as authorized under RCW
26.12.240.

(17)
For filing a water rights statement under RCW 90.03.180, a fee of twenty-five
dollars must be charged.

(18)
For filing a warrant for overpayment of state retirement systems benefits under
chapter 41.50 RCW, a fee of five dollars shall be charged pursuant to RCW
41.50.136.

(19)
A service fee of three dollars for the first page and one dollar for each
additional page must be charged for receiving faxed documents, pursuant to
Washington state rules of court, general rule 17.

(20)
For preparation of clerk's papers under RAP 9.7, a fee of fifty cents per page
must be charged.

(21)
For copies and reports produced at the local level as permitted by RCW 2.68.020
and supreme court policy, a variable fee must be charged.

(22)
Investment service charge and earnings under RCW 36.48.090 must be charged.

(23)
Costs for nonstatutory services rendered by clerk by authority of local
ordinance or policy must be charged.

(24)
For filing a request for mandatory arbitration, a fee may be assessed
against the party filing a statement of arbitrability not to exceed one hundred
twenty dollars as established by authority of local ordinance. This charge
shall be used to offset the cost of the mandatory arbitration program.

(25)
For filing a request for trial de novo of an arbitration award, a fee not to
exceed two hundred fifty dollars as established by authority of local ordinance
must be charged.

Sec.
3. RCW
3.62.060 and 1992 c 62 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

Clerks
of the district courts shall collect the following fees for their official
services:

(1)
In any civil action commenced before or transferred to a district court, the
plaintiff shall, at the time of such commencement or transfer, pay to such
court a filing fee of thirty-one dollars plus any surcharge authorized by RCW
7.75.035. No party shall be compelled to pay to the court any other fees or
charges up to and including the rendition of judgment in the action other than
those listed.

(2)
For issuing a writ of garnishment or other writ a fee of six dollars.

(3)
For filing a supplemental proceeding a fee of twelve dollars.

(4)
For demanding a jury in a civil case a fee of fifty dollars to be paid by the
person demanding a jury.

(5)
For preparing a transcript of a judgment a fee of six dollars.

(6)
For certifying any document on file or of record in the clerk's office a fee of
five dollars.

(7)
For preparing the record of a case for appeal to superior court a fee of forty
dollars including any costs of tape duplication as governed by the rules of
appeal for courts of limited jurisdiction (RALJ).

(8)
For duplication of part or all of the electronic tape or tapes of a proceeding
ten dollars per tape.

(9)
For filing a request for mandatory arbitration if authorized by court rule, a
fee may be assessed against the party filing a statement of arbitrability not
to exceed thirty-one dollars as established by authority of local ordinance.
This charge shall be used to offset the cost of the mandatory arbitration
program. Revenue collected under this subsection is not subject to division
under RCW 36.18.025 or 27.24.070.

The
fees or charges imposed under this section shall be allowed as court costs
whenever a judgment for costs is awarded.

Sec.
4. RCW
7.06.020 and 1987 c 212 s 101 and 1987 c 202 s 127 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:

(1)
All civil actions, except for appeals from municipal or district courts, which
are at issue in the superior court in counties which have authorized
arbitration, where the sole relief sought is a money judgment, and where no
party asserts a claim in excess of fifteen thousand dollars, or if approved by
the superior court of a county by two-thirds or greater vote of the judges
thereof, up to thirty-five thousand dollars, exclusive of interest and costs,
are subject to mandatory arbitration. Court rules may provide for the
transfer of specified types of cases to district court.

(2) If approved by majority vote of the superior court judges of a
county which has authorized arbitration, all civil actions which are at issue
in the superior court in which the sole relief sought is the establishment,
termination or modification of maintenance or child support payments are
subject to mandatory arbitration. The arbitrability of any such action shall
not be affected by the amount or number of payments involved.

---
END ---