BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
67.28.1815 and 1997 c 452 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All revenue from taxes imposed under this chapter shall be credited to a special
fund in the treasury of the municipality imposing such tax and used solely for
the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of tourism promotion, the
cost of acquisition of tourism-related facilities, ((or)) the
cost of operation of tourism-related facilities, or the costs, such as
salaries and equipment acquisition or maintenance, of law enforcement or fire
protection activity directed towards tourism areas.

(2) Municipalities may, under chapter 39.34 RCW, agree to
the utilization of revenue from taxes imposed under this chapter for the
purposes of funding a multijurisdictional tourism-related facility.

---
END ---