BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
36.70A.103 and 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
State agencies shall comply with the local comprehensive plans and development
regulations and amendments thereto adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(2)
Special purpose districts shall comply with local comprehensive plans and
development regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(3)
Special purpose districts may appeal an adopted or amended county-wide planning
policy to the growth management hearings board within sixty days of the
adoption or amendment of the county-wide planning policy.

Sec.
2. RCW
36.70A.210 and 1998 c 171 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature recognizes that counties are regional governments within their
boundaries, and cities are primary providers of urban governmental services
within urban growth areas. For the purposes of this section, a
"county-wide planning policy" is a written policy statement or
statements used solely for establishing a county-wide framework from which
county and city comprehensive plans are developed and adopted pursuant to this
chapter. This framework shall ensure that city and county comprehensive plans
are consistent as required in RCW 36.70A.100. Nothing in this section shall be
construed to alter the land-use powers of cities.

(2)
The legislative authority of a county that plans under RCW 36.70A.040 shall
adopt a county-wide planning policy in cooperation with the cities located in
whole or in part within the county as follows:

(a)
No later than sixty calendar days from July 16, 1991, the legislative authority
of each county that as of June 1, 1991, was required or chose to plan under RCW
36.70A.040 shall convene a meeting with representatives of each city located within
the county for the purpose of establishing a collaborative process that will
provide a framework for the adoption of a county-wide planning policy. In
other counties that are required or choose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040, this
meeting shall be convened no later than sixty days after the date the county
adopts its resolution of intention or was certified by the office of financial
management.

(b)
The process and framework for adoption of a county-wide planning policy
specified in (a) of this subsection shall determine the manner in which the
county and the cities agree to all procedures and provisions including but not
limited to desired planning policies, deadlines, ratification of final
agreements and demonstration thereof, and financing, if any, of all activities
associated therewith.

(c)
If a county fails for any reason to convene a meeting with representatives of
cities as required in (a) of this subsection, the governor may immediately
impose any appropriate sanction or sanctions on the county from those specified
under RCW 36.70A.340.

(d)
If there is no agreement by October 1, 1991, in a county that was required or
chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 as of June 1, 1991, or if there is no
agreement within one hundred twenty days of the date the county adopted its
resolution of intention or was certified by the office of financial management
in any other county that is required or chooses to plan under RCW 36.70A.040,
the governor shall first inquire of the jurisdictions as to the reason or reasons
for failure to reach an agreement. If the governor deems it appropriate, the
governor may immediately request the assistance of the department of community,
trade, and economic development to mediate any disputes that preclude
agreement. If mediation is unsuccessful in resolving all disputes that will
lead to agreement, the governor may impose appropriate sanctions from those
specified under RCW 36.70A.340 on the county, city, or cities for failure to
reach an agreement as provided in this section. The governor shall specify the
reason or reasons for the imposition of any sanction.

(e)
No later than July 1, 1992, the legislative authority of each county that was
required or chose to plan under RCW 36.70A.040 as of June 1, 1991, or no later
than fourteen months after the date the county adopted its resolution of
intention or was certified by the office of financial management the county
legislative authority of any other county that is required or chooses to plan
under RCW 36.70A.040, shall adopt a county-wide planning policy according to
the process provided under this section and that is consistent with the
agreement pursuant to (b) of this subsection, and after holding a public
hearing or hearings on the proposed county-wide planning policy.

(3)
A county-wide planning policy shall at a minimum, address the following:

(a)
Policies to implement RCW 36.70A.110;

(b)
Policies for promotion of contiguous and orderly development and provision of
urban services to such development;

(c)
Policies for siting public capital facilities of a county-wide or state-wide
nature, including transportation facilities of state-wide significance as
defined in RCW 47.06.140;

(d)
Policies for county-wide transportation facilities and strategies;

(e)
Policies that consider the need for affordable housing, such as housing for all
economic segments of the population and parameters for its distribution;

(f)
Policies for joint county and city planning within urban growth areas;

(g)
Policies for county-wide economic development and employment; ((and))

(h)
An analysis of the fiscal impact; and

(i)
Policies to determine that adequate domestic water supplies exist or will be
available to serve the projected population as determined by the office of
financial management.

(4)
Federal agencies and Indian tribes may participate in and cooperate with the
county-wide planning policy adoption process. Adopted county-wide planning
policies shall be adhered to by state agencies.

(5)
Failure to adopt a county-wide planning policy that meets the requirements of
this section may result in the imposition of a sanction or sanctions on a
county or city within the county, as specified in RCW 36.70A.340. In imposing
a sanction or sanctions, the governor shall specify the reasons for failure to
adopt a county-wide planning policy in order that any imposed sanction or
sanctions are fairly and equitably related to the failure to adopt a
county-wide planning policy.

(6)
Cities and the governor may appeal an adopted county-wide planning policy to
the growth management hearings board within sixty days of the adoption of the
county-wide planning policy.

(7)
Multicounty planning policies shall be adopted by two or more counties, each
with a population of four hundred fifty thousand or more, with contiguous urban
areas and may be adopted by other counties, according to the process
established under this section or other processes agreed to among the counties
and cities within the affected counties throughout the multicounty region.

(8)
Not later than July 1, 2002, a county planning under this chapter shall convene
a committee for the development of a county-wide planning policy for
coordinated planning and delivery of the urban governmental services defined in
RCW 36.70A.030. This committee shall consist of representatives from the
county, the cities located in part or in whole within the county, and each
special purpose district that is responsible for planning or delivering school
facilities, park and recreational facilities, libraries, or urban governmental
services.

The
policy developed under this subsection shall ensure that urban governmental
services are in place at the time of development, or for transportation
facilities that a financial commitment is in place to provide the urban governmental
services within the time frame specified by the applicable city or county
concurrency requirements.

Cities, special districts that plan or deliver urban
governmental services, and the governor may appeal to the growth management
hearings board on the county-wide policy for coordinated planning and delivery
of urban governmental services developed under this subsection.

---
END ---