BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
42.52.140 and 1994 c 154 s 114 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No state officer or state employee may receive, accept, take, seek, or solicit,
directly or indirectly, any thing of economic value as a gift, gratuity, or
favor from a person if it could be reasonably expected that the gift, gratuity,
or favor would influence the vote, action, or judgment of the officer or
employee, or be considered as part of a reward for action or inaction.

(2)(a)
For the purposes of this section, a donation made to a nonprofit corporation
exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue
code is not a gift to a state officer or employee if the purpose of the
501(c)(3) corporation is to benefit a state officer or employee or a family
member as the result of a catastrophic event or condition either involving that
state officer's or state employee's family or primary place of residence.

(b)
As used in this subsection (2), "family member" means an
individual's spouse, child, stepchild, grandchild, parent, stepparent,
grandparent, brother, half brother, sister, or half sister.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 42.17 RCW to read as follows:

Every
501(c)(3) corporation that receives donations as permitted under RCW
42.52.140(2) shall, after January 1st and before April 15th of each year, file
with the commission a statement of all donations with a value greater than
fifty dollars from one source for the preceding calendar year.

Sec.
3. RCW
42.17.170 and 1995 c 397 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any lobbyist registered under RCW 42.17.150 and any person who lobbies shall
file with the commission periodic reports of his or her activities signed by
the lobbyist. The reports shall be made in the form and manner prescribed by
the commission. They shall be due monthly and shall be filed within fifteen
days after the last day of the calendar month covered by the report.

(2)
Each such monthly periodic report shall contain:

(a)
The totals of all expenditures for lobbying activities made or incurred by such
lobbyist or on behalf of such lobbyist by the lobbyist's employer during the
period covered by the report. Such totals for lobbying activities shall be
segregated according to financial category, including compensation; food and
refreshments; living accommodations; advertising; travel; contributions; and
other expenses or services. Each individual expenditure of more than
twenty-five dollars for entertainment shall be identified by date, place,
amount, and the names of all persons in the group partaking in or of such
entertainment including any portion thereof attributable to the lobbyist's
participation therein, and shall include amounts actually expended on each
person where calculable, or allocating any portion of the expenditure to
individual participants.

Notwithstanding
the foregoing, lobbyists are not required to report the following:

(i)
Unreimbursed personal living and travel expenses not incurred directly for
lobbying;

(ii)
Any expenses incurred for his or her own living accommodations;

(iii)
Any expenses incurred for his or her own travel to and from hearings of the
legislature;

(iv)
Any expenses incurred for telephone, and any office expenses, including rent
and salaries and wages paid for staff and secretarial assistance.

(b)
In the case of a lobbyist employed by more than one employer, the proportionate
amount of such expenditures in each category incurred on behalf of each of his
employers.

(c)
An itemized listing of each such expenditure, whether contributed by the
lobbyist personally or delivered or transmitted by the lobbyist, in the nature
of a contribution of money or of tangible or intangible personal property to
any candidate, elected official, or officer or employee of any agency, or any
political committee supporting or opposing any ballot proposition, or for or on
behalf of any candidate, elected official, or officer or employee of any
agency, or any political committee supporting or opposing any ballot
proposition. All contributions made to, or for the benefit of, any candidate,
elected official, or officer or employee of any agency, or any political
committee supporting or opposing any ballot proposition shall be identified by
date, amount, and the name of the candidate, elected official, or officer or
employee of any agency, or any political committee supporting or opposing any
ballot proposition receiving, or to be benefited by each such contribution.

(d)
The subject matter of proposed legislation or other legislative activity or
rule-making under chapter 34.05 RCW, the state Administrative Procedure Act,
and the state agency considering the same, which the lobbyist has been engaged
in supporting or opposing during the reporting period, unless exempt under RCW
42.17.160(2).

(e)
Such other information relevant to lobbying activities as the commission shall
by rule prescribe. Information supporting such activities as are required to
be reported is subject to audit by the commission.

(f)
A listing of each payment for an item specified in RCW 42.52.150(5) in excess
of fifty dollars and each item specified in RCW 42.52.010(9) (d) and (f) made
to a state elected official, state officer, or state employee. Each item shall
be identified by recipient, date, and approximate value of the item.

(g)
The total expenditures made during the reporting period by the lobbyist for
lobbying purposes, whether through or on behalf of a lobbyist or otherwise. As
used in this subsection, "expenditures" includes amounts paid or
incurred during the reporting period for (i) political advertising as defined
in RCW 42.17.020; and (ii) public relations, telemarketing, polling, or similar
activities if such activities, directly or indirectly, are intended, designed,
or calculated to influence legislation or the adoption or rejection of a rule,
standard, or rate by an agency under the administrative procedure act. The report
shall specify the amount, the person to whom the amount was paid, and a brief
description of the activity.

(h)
Any donation to a nonprofit corporation under RCW 42.52.140(2).

(3)
If a state elected official or a member of such an official's immediate family
is identified by a lobbyist in such a report as having received from the
lobbyist an item specified in RCW 42.52.150(5) or 42.52.010(9) (d) or (f), the
lobbyist shall transmit to the official a copy of the completed form used to
identify the item in the report at the same time the report is filed with the
commission.

(4)
The commission may adopt rules to vary the content of lobbyist reports to
address specific circumstances, consistent with this section.

Sec.
4. RCW
42.17.180 and 1993 c 2 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Every employer of a lobbyist registered under this chapter during the preceding
calendar year and every person other than an individual that made contributions
aggregating to more than ten thousand dollars or independent expenditures
aggregating to more than five hundred dollars during the preceding calendar
year shall file with the commission on or before the last day of February of
each year a statement disclosing for the preceding calendar year the following
information:

(a)
The name of each state elected official and the name of each candidate for
state office who was elected to the office and any member of the immediate
family of those persons to whom the person reporting has paid any compensation
in the amount of five hundred dollars or more during the preceding calendar
year for personal employment or professional services, including professional
services rendered by a corporation, partnership, joint venture, association, union,
or other entity in which the person holds any office, directorship, or any
general partnership interest, or an ownership interest of ten percent or more,
the value of the compensation in accordance with the reporting provisions set
out in RCW 42.17.241(2), and the consideration given or performed in exchange
for the compensation.

(b)
The name of each state elected official, successful candidate for state office,
or members of his immediate family to whom the person reporting made
expenditures, directly or indirectly, either through a lobbyist or otherwise,
the amount of the expenditures and the purpose for the expenditures. For the
purposes of this subsection, the term expenditure shall not include any
expenditure made by the employer in the ordinary course of business if the
expenditure is not made for the purpose of influencing, honoring, or benefiting
the elected official, successful candidate, or member of his immediate family,
as an elected official or candidate.

(c)
The total expenditures made by the person reporting for lobbying purposes,
whether through or on behalf of a registered lobbyist or otherwise.

(d)
All contributions made to a political committee supporting or opposing a
candidate for state office, or to a political committee supporting or opposing
a state-wide ballot proposition. Such contributions shall be identified by the
name and the address of the recipient and the aggregate amount contributed to
each such recipient.

(e)
The name and address of each registered lobbyist employed by the person
reporting and the total expenditures made by such person for each such lobbyist
for lobbying purposes.

(f)
The names, offices sought, and party affiliations of candidates for state
offices supported or opposed by independent expenditures of the person
reporting and the amount of each such expenditure.

(g)
The identifying proposition number and a brief description of any state-wide
ballot proposition supported or opposed by expenditures not reported under (d)
of this subsection and the amount of each such expenditure.

(h)
Such other information as the commission prescribes by rule.

(i)
Any donation to a nonprofit corporation under RCW 42.52.140(2).

(2)(a)
Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, an employer of a lobbyist
registered under this chapter shall file a special report with the commission
if the employer makes a contribution or contributions aggregating more than one
hundred dollars in a calendar month to any one of the following: A candidate,
elected official, officer or employee of an agency, or political committee.
The report shall identify the date and amount of each such contribution and the
name of the candidate, elected official, agency officer or employee, or
political committee receiving the contribution or to be benefited by the
contribution. The report shall be filed on a form prescribed by the commission
and shall be filed within fifteen days after the last day of the calendar month
during which the contribution was made.

(b) The provisions of (a) of this subsection do not apply to a
contribution which is made through a registered lobbyist and reportable under
RCW 42.17.170.

---
END ---