BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.95.215 and 1985 c 436 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
By July 1, 1987, each holder or applicant of a permit for a landfill disposal
facility issued under this chapter shall establish a reserve account to cover
the costs of closing the facility in accordance with state and federal
regulations. The account shall be designed to ensure that there will be
adequate revenue available by the projected date of closure. A landfill
disposal ((facilities)) facility maintained on private property
for the sole use of the entity owning the site and a landfill disposal facility
maintained by a government shall not be required to establish a reserve
account if, to the satisfaction of the department, ((they)) the
entity or government provides another form of financial assurance
adequate to comply with the requirements of this section.

(2)
By July 1, 1986, the department shall adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW to
implement subsection (1) of this section. The department is not required to
adopt rules pertaining to other approved forms of financial assurance to cover
the costs of closing a landfill disposal facility. The rules shall include
but not be limited to:

(a)
Methods to estimate closure costs, including postclosure monitoring, pollution
prevention measures, and any other procedures required under state and federal
regulations;

(b)
Methods to ensure that reserve accounts receive adequate funds, including:

(i)
Requirements that the reserve account be generated by user fees. However, the
department may waive this requirement for existing landfills if user fees would
be prohibitively high;

(ii)
Requirements that moneys be placed in the reserve account on a regular basis
and that the reserve account be kept separate from all other accounts; and

(iii)
Procedures for the department to verify that adequate sums are deposited in the
reserve account; and

(c) Methods to ensure that other types of financial assurance
provided in accordance with subsection (1) of this section are adequate to
cover the costs of closing the facility.

---
END ---