BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. In
order to help reduce the current backlog of applications for changes or
transfers of existing water rights, the legislature intends to allow the
processing of applications for changes or transfers of existing water rights
without regard to possible impairment of pending applications for new water
rights and to confirm that the order in which applications are processed may be
established administratively.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
legislature finds that information provided by the public helps to assure
compliance with the requirements of current law that decisions on applications
for changes or transfers of existing water rights must not impair existing
water rights and must be in the public interest.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Applications for changes or transfers of water rights may be processed and
decisions on them rendered independently of pending applications for new water
rights for the same source of supply and independently of any applications for
other sources of supply, without regard to the date on which the applications
were filed. The order in which applications are processed and decisions on
them rendered may continue to be established according to criteria adopted by
rule. For purposes of this section, "independently" refers both to the
order of processing and to possible impairment of pending applications for new
water rights.

(2) For purposes of receiving public comment, notice of the
commencement of processing of applications for changes or transfers of existing
water rights includes publication on the department's web page, and any public
comments received in the course of processing must be considered.

---
END ---