BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the quality of education is improved when school
district employees, including teachers, other certificated staff, and
classified employees, are able to work and live in the same community. The
legislature finds that many school district employees cannot afford to live in
the areas in which they work making it more difficult for those employees to
maintain vital links with the school community including participation in after
school activities. Housing assistance for school district employees would help
school districts recruit and retain qualified employees and improve the quality
of education by helping those employees to live in the same communities as do
the students.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The department of community, trade, and economic development, in cooperation
with the housing finance commission, shall establish a state-wide pilot program
to provide down payment assistance loans from the housing trust fund to
eligible employees of school districts. To be eligible, the employee's median
family income shall be less than one hundred percent of the area median family
income or the state median family income, whichever is higher, and the loan
shall be to purchase the employee's primary residence located in the school
district where the employee is employed.

(2)
The department and the commission shall report to the legislature by December
15, 2000, regarding the results of the program including information about the
number of borrowers assisted, the average amount of the down payment
assistance, and the number of loans in each school district.

(3)
This section expires June 30, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 43.185 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The eligibility provisions of RCW 43.185.050 do not apply to the pilot program
in section 2 of this act.

(2)
This section expires June 30, 2002.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
sum of five hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof may be necessary, is
appropriated from the housing trust fund to the department of community, trade,
and economic development for the biennium ending June 30, 2001, to be used by
the department of community, trade, and economic development to work in
cooperation with the housing finance commission to develop a state-wide pilot
program to provide down payment assistance loans to eligible employees of
school districts.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. Any
funds from the appropriation in section 4 of this act which are held in escrow
or as a guaranty or collateral account and are remaining unexpended following
the term of the loan repayments under the pilot program established in section
2 of this act, or at any prior time as determined by the housing finance
commission, shall be returned along with accrued interest to the state general
fund.

---
END ---