BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.400 RCW to read as follows:

School district boards of directors shall grant leaves of absence
without pay for at least two years to any full-time certificated or classified
employee who serves as a volunteer in the peace corps who volunteers for the
peace corps at the time the person is a full-time employee. Upon expiration of
the leave, the certificated or classified employee shall have the right to be
reinstated to the position held before the leave was granted at the salary rate
prevailing for that position when the employee resumes duty, without loss of
seniority or sick leave. This section does not apply to employees who fail to
report back to their districts within ninety days after termination of service
with the peace corps.

---
END ---