BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that the current compensation system for educational
employees does not recognize variations in the cost of living throughout the
state.

(2) The legislative evaluation and accountability program committee
shall develop a model or models for calculating and updating a compensation
system for educational employees based upon regional differences in the cost of
living. In the model or models, the state shall be divided into not more than
six different geographic regions based upon differences in the cost of living.
In developing the model or models, the committee may study issues including but
not limited to: Verifying and updating cost-of-living factors presently
offered by state and federal agencies, examining and verifying regional
differences in cost of living, evaluating other compensation models and studies
from outside Washington, and providing an analysis and recommendations
including cost estimates for implementing a compensation system for educational
employees based upon regional differences in the cost of living. The model or
models shall be presented to the legislature by January 15, 2001.

---
END ---