BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
41.35.630 and 1998 c 341 s 204 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Anyone who requests to transfer under RCW 41.35.510 before March 1, 2001, and
establishes service credit for January 2001, shall have their member account
increased by ((sixty-five)) one hundred thirty percent of:

(a)
The member's public employees' retirement system plan 2 accumulated
contributions as of January 1, 2000, less fifty percent of any payments made
pursuant to RCW 41.50.165(2); or

(b)
All amounts withdrawn after January 1, 2000, which are completely restored
before March 1, 2001.

(2)
If a member who requests to transfer dies before January 1, 2001, the
additional payment provided by this section shall be paid to the member's
estate, or the person or persons, trust, or organization the member nominated
by written designation duly executed and filed with the department.

(3)
The legislature reserves the right to modify or discontinue the right to an
additional payment under this section for any plan 2 members who have not
previously transferred to plan 3.

Sec.
2. RCW
41.45.061 and 1998 c 341 s 405 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The required contribution rate for members of the plan 2 teachers' retirement
system shall be fixed at the rates in effect on July 1, 1996, subject to the
following:

(a)
Beginning September 1, 1997, except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the
employee contribution rate shall not exceed the employer plan 2 and 3 rates
adopted under RCW 41.45.060 and 41.45.070 for the teachers' retirement system;

(b)
In addition, the employee contribution rate for plan 2 shall be increased by
fifty percent of the contribution rate increase caused by any plan 2 benefit
increase passed after July 1, 1996;

(c)
In addition, the employee contribution rate for plan 2 shall not be increased
as a result of any distributions pursuant to section 309, chapter 341, Laws of
1998 and RCW 41.31A.020.

(2)
The required contribution rate for members of the school employees' retirement system
plan 2 shall ((be fixed at the rates in effect on September 1, 2000, for
members of the public employees' retirement system plan 2, subject to the
following:

(a)
Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the member contribution rate
shall not exceed)) equal the school employees' retirement
system employer plan 2 and 3 contribution rate adopted under RCW 41.45.060 and
41.45.070((;

(b)
The member contribution rate for the school employees' retirement system plan 2
shall be increased by fifty percent of the contribution rate increase caused by
any plan 2 benefit increase passed after September 1, 2000)),
except as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

(3)
The employee contribution rate for plan 2 shall not be increased as a result of
any distributions pursuant to RCW 41.31A.020 and 41.31A.030.

(4)
The required plan 2 and 3 contribution rates for employers shall be adopted in
the manner described in RCW 41.45.060.

Sec.
3. RCW
41.05.011 and 1998 c 341 s 706 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section shall
apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Administrator" means the administrator of the authority.

(2)
"State purchased health care" or "health care" means
medical and health care, pharmaceuticals, and medical equipment purchased with
state and federal funds by the department of social and health services, the
department of health, the basic health plan, the state health care authority,
the department of labor and industries, the department of corrections, the
department of veterans affairs, and local school districts.

(3)
"Authority" means the Washington state health care authority.

(4)
"Insuring entity" means an insurer as defined in chapter 48.01 RCW, a
health care service contractor as defined in chapter 48.44 RCW, or a health
maintenance organization as defined in chapter 48.46 RCW.

(5)
"Flexible benefit plan" means a benefit plan that allows employees to
choose the level of health care coverage provided and the amount of employee
contributions from among a range of choices offered by the authority.

(6)
"Employee" includes all full-time and career seasonal employees of
the state, whether or not covered by civil service; elected and appointed
officials of the executive branch of government, including full-time members of
boards, commissions, or committees; and includes any or all part-time and
temporary employees under the terms and conditions established under this
chapter by the authority; justices of the supreme court and judges of the court
of appeals and the superior courts; and members of the state legislature or of
the legislative authority of any county, city, or town who are elected to
office after February 20, 1970. "Employee" also includes: (a)
Employees of a county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the
state if the legislative authority of the county, municipality, or other
political subdivision of the state seeks and receives the approval of the
authority to provide any of its insurance programs by contract with the
authority, as provided in RCW 41.04.205; (b) employees of employee
organizations representing state civil service employees, at the option of each
such employee organization, and, effective October 1, 1995, employees of
employee organizations currently pooled with employees of school districts for
the purpose of purchasing insurance benefits, at the option of each such
employee organization; and (c) employees of a school district if the authority
agrees to provide any of the school districts' insurance programs by contract
with the authority as provided in RCW 28A.400.350.

(7)
"Board" means the public employees' benefits board established under
RCW 41.05.055.

(8)
"Retired or disabled school employee" means:

(a)
Persons who separated from employment with a school district or educational
service district and are receiving a retirement allowance under chapter 41.32
or 41.40 RCW as of September 30, 1993;

(b)
Persons who separate from employment with a school district or educational
service district on or after October 1, 1993, and immediately upon separation
receive a retirement allowance under chapter 41.32, 41.35, or 41.40 RCW;

(c)
Persons who separate from employment with a school district or educational
service district due to a total and permanent disability, and are eligible to
receive a deferred retirement allowance under chapter 41.32, 41.35, or
41.40 RCW.

(9)
"Benefits contribution plan" means a premium only contribution plan,
a medical flexible spending arrangement, or a cafeteria plan whereby state and
public employees may agree to a contribution to benefit costs which will allow
the employee to participate in benefits offered pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125
or other sections of the internal revenue code.

(10)
"Salary" means a state employee's monthly salary or wages.

(11)
"Participant" means an individual who fulfills the eligibility and
enrollment requirements under the benefits contribution plan.

(12)
"Plan year" means the time period established by the authority.

(13)
"Separated employees" means persons who separate from employment with
an employer as defined in:

(a)
RCW 41.32.010(11) on or after July 1, 1996; or

(b)
RCW 41.35.010 on or after September 1, 2000;

and who
are at least age fifty-five and have at least ten years of service under the
teachers' retirement system plan III as defined in RCW 41.32.010(40) or the
Washington school employees' retirement system plan III as defined in RCW
41.35.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act takes effect September 1, 2000.

---
END ---