BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.43.300 and 1965 c 8 s 43.43.300 are each amended to read as follows:

Beginning
on July 1, ((1963)) 2000, every Washington state patrol employee
who is a member of the retirement fund shall contribute ((seven)) three
percent of his or her monthly salary, which shall be deducted from the
compensation of each member on each and every payroll.

In
event a member severs his or her connection with the Washington state
patrol or is dismissed, the amount paid by the state of Washington shall remain
in the retirement fund.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2.
Section 1 of this act expires June 30, 2001.

---
END ---