BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the intent of the legislature to articulate the responsibilities of the pension
oversight board and to further the study of issues in the state retirement
systems. It is also the intent of the legislature to improve upon the
coordination of and the reports from the department of retirement systems, the
state investment board, and the office of the state actuary to make them more
concise and user-friendly, to further the disclosure of the financial and
actuarial status of the systems, and to empower interested parties in assessing
accountability.

Sec.
2. RCW
41.50.075 and 1998 c 341 s 503 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Two funds are hereby created and established in the state treasury to be known
as the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1
retirement fund, and the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' system plan 2 retirement fund which shall consist of all moneys paid
into them in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and chapter 41.26
RCW, whether such moneys take the form of cash, securities, or other assets.
The plan 1 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits
provided to members of the law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
retirement system plan 1, and the plan 2 fund shall consist of all moneys paid
to finance the benefits provided to members of the law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' retirement system plan 2.

(2)
All of the assets of the Washington state teachers' retirement system shall be
credited according to the purposes for which they are held, to two funds to be
maintained in the state treasury, namely, the teachers' retirement system plan
1 fund and the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund. The
plan 1 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided
to members of the Washington state teachers' retirement system plan 1, and the
combined plan 2 and 3 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the
benefits provided to members of the Washington state teachers' retirement
system plan 2 and 3.

(3)
There is hereby established in the state treasury two separate funds, namely
the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund and the public employees'
retirement system plan 2 fund. The plan 1 fund shall consist of all moneys
paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the public employees'
retirement system plan 1, and the plan 2 fund shall consist of all moneys paid
to finance the benefits provided to members of the public employees' retirement
system plan 2.

(4)
There is hereby established in the state treasury the school employees'
retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund. The combined plan 2 and 3 fund
shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of
the school employees' retirement system plan 2 and plan 3.

(5)
The legislature shall expend from the funds created in this section only to
satisfy the liabilities, if any, of each of the respective systems.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 41.50 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a)
The state pension oversight board is created and consists of the following
members:

(i)
Four active members or representatives from organizations of active members of
the state retirement system appointed by the governor for staggered three-year
terms;

(ii)
Four retired members or representatives of retired members' organizations of
the state retirement system appointed by the governor for staggered three-year
terms, with no two members from the same system;

(iii)
Five employer representatives appointed by the governor for staggered
three-year terms;

(iv)
The director of the department, the director of financial management, and the
executive director of the state investment board; and

(v)
Four members of the legislature, with one member representing each of the two
largest caucuses in the senate and the house of representatives, appointed by
the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives.
The legislators shall be nonvoting members of the board.

(b)
The board shall establish policies and procedures for its internal management.

(2)
The board shall provide open and balanced review of pension policy issues and
advise and recommend changes on pension policy issues; contribution rates;
long-term assumptions used in developing those rates; and legislation to the
legislature, the governor, the pension funding council, and the joint committee
on pension policy.

(3)
The board shall from time to time make written recommendations to the
legislature concerning deficiencies, conflicts, or obsolete provisions in, and
need for reorganization or revision of, the statutes governing pension policy,
and shall prepare for submission to the legislature, legislation for the
correction or removal of those deficiencies, conflicts, or obsolete provisions,
or to otherwise improve the form or substance of any portion of the statute law
of this state as the public interest or the administration of pension policy
may require.

(4)
The board shall discharge its duties in the interest of the public employers,
participants, and beneficiaries.

(5)
The department shall provide staff and actuarial services to the board.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 41.50 RCW to read as follows:

The
department is to produce a summary level and consolidated annual financial
report with the focus of presenting information about the status of the various
retirement plans to active and retired members, policy makers, and other
interested parties. Information included in the report is to be provided by
the office of the state actuary, the state investment board, and the
department. The department shall consult with the state investment board and
the office of the state actuary during the preparation of this report. The
department shall meet with the department's advisory board in order to ensure
the usability of the report. In addition, the department shall give annual
notice of report review and then accept and consider input on the style and
substance of the report from interested parties.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 41.50 RCW to read as follows:

Beginning
in 2001 and every four years thereafter, the department shall convene a task
force comprised of representatives of the department, the office of the state
actuary, the state investment board, the office of financial management, the
office of the state auditor, and the advisory committee to the department.
This task force shall review all the major reports prepared by state agencies
concerning the state retirement systems and examine the best practices from
other states. The goals of the task force are to determine what information
needs to be reported and to seek ways to: Promote more effective monitoring of
the public retirement systems, streamline reporting, become more efficient in
the production and distribution of the information, minimize redundancies and
confusion, and maximize the public's investment in these reports. The task force
shall report by the end of October in each year the task force is convened to
the state pension oversight board with their recommendations for changing and
consolidating these reports. Any changes in current state law that may be
required to accomplish these recommendations shall be noted.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7.
Section 2 of this act takes effect September 1, 2000.

---
END ---