BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.08.020 and 1998 c 321 s 36 (Referendum Bill No. 49) are each amended to read
as follows:

(1)
There is levied and there shall be collected a tax on each retail sale in this
state equal to six and five-tenths percent of the selling price.

(2)
There is levied and there shall be collected an additional tax on each retail
car rental, regardless of whether the vehicle is licensed in this state, equal
to five and nine-tenths percent of the selling price. The revenue collected
under this subsection shall be deposited ((and distributed in the same
manner as motor vehicle excise tax revenue collected under RCW 82.44.020(1)))
into the state highway construction congestion relief account under section
2 of this act.

(3)
The taxes imposed under this chapter shall apply to successive retail sales of
the same property.

(4)
The rates provided in this section apply to taxes imposed under chapter 82.12
RCW as provided in RCW 82.12.020.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

The
state highway construction congestion relief account is created in the treasury
within the transportation fund. All receipts from RCW 82.08.020(2) must be
deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after
appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for projects
designed to reduce state highway congestion.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The
sum of forty-five million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the biennium ending June 30, 2001, from the state patrol
account to the state highway construction congestion relief account created
under section 2 of this act, for the purposes of section 2 of this act.

---
END ---