BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that establishing a clear state-wide strategy for
successful economic development will best prepare the state of Washington to
respond to the challenges and take advantage of future economic cycles. The
legislature further finds that without a state-wide economic development plan
the state's budget and election cycles make it difficult for government to
adhere to consistent, long-term economic development priorities that are
essential to successful, enhanced economic development. The legislature further
finds that the purpose of economic development is to increase the standard of
living and enhance the quality of life of the citizens of this state.

(2)
It is the intent of the legislature that a strategic state-wide economic
development plan be created that reflects the following goals and objectives:

(a)
To create and maintain jobs and income that would not otherwise be created or
maintained, and to increase wealth rather than to redistribute it;

(b)
To add value to private sector economic activity; and

(c)
To assist businesses in developing their business strategies, increasing the
skills of their workers and managers, applying advanced technologies,
developing infrastructure, accessing capital, and enhancing social capital.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. For
the purposes of this chapter "department" means the department of
community, trade, and economic development, or its successor agency or
agencies. "The plan" or "state plan" means a state-wide
economic development plan, as developed under sections 3 and 4 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The legislative committee on economic development shall take the lead
responsibility for creating a state‑wide strategic plan for economic
development in conjunction with the department, and an advisory group of
business, labor, and other interests. The advisory group shall be appointed by
the lieutenant governor and shall consist of no more than twelve members.

(2)
In preparing the state plan, the legislative committee on economic development
and the department shall recognize:

(a)
Regional economic, political, and cultural differences, and acknowledge the
special challenges facing urban and rural communities; and

(b)
Special contributions of, and challenges facing, women and minority-owned
businesses.

(3)
The plan should set priorities and concentrate resources on those priorities.

(4)
The plan should include specific implementation steps and establish a process
for institutionalizing economic development planning.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
legislative committee on economic development and the department shall develop
and include the following elements in the plan:

(1)
New strategies that seek to improve the overall competitiveness of groups of
similar businesses, usually termed clusters, and entire industries or sectors
rather than traditional strategies that focus on individualized assistance.
These strategies should foster interfirm cooperation and learning, technology
adaptation, and work-based learning to improve work force skills. Under these
strategies the state acts as a broker of available private and public
development resources, or contracts for such broker services;

(2)
Direction to the department to develop programs consistent with the state plan,
and that are characterized by outcome-based performance management systems and
decentralized decision making;

(3)
Direction to the department to assist local governments and other interested
parties in the creation of regional economic development plans consistent with
the state plan; and

(4)
Direction to the department to develop a professional research capacity to keep
the state's trade assistance operation regularly appraised of opportunities and
updated on performance.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
legislature recognizes the urgent need for having a plan in place as soon as is
reasonably possible. The legislative committee on economic development and the
department are directed to immediately develop a work plan and take other steps
necessary to implement this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6.
Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

---
END ---