BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28C.04.420 and 1999 c 121 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
college board may, subject to appropriation from the legislature or from funds
made available from any other public or private source and pursuant to rules
adopted by the college board with the advice of the work force training
customer advisory committee established in RCW 28C.04.390, provide job skills
grants to educational institutions. The job skills grants shall be used
exclusively for programs which are consistent with the job skills program. The
college board shall work in collaboration with the work force training customer
advisory committee established in RCW 28C.04.390 to assure that:

(1)
The program is within the scope of the job skills program under this chapter
and may reasonably be expected to succeed and thereby increase employment
within the state;

(2)
Provision has been made to use any available alternative funding from local,
state, and federal sources;

(3)
The job skills grant will only be used to cover the costs associated with the
program;

(4)
The program will not unnecessarily duplicate existing programs and could not be
provided by another educational institution more effectively or efficiently;

(5)
The program involves an area of skills training and education for which there
is a demonstrable need;

(6)
The applicant has made provisions for the use of existing federal and state
resources for student financial assistance;

(7)
The job skills grant is essential to the success of the program as the
resources of the applicant are inadequate to attract the technical assistance
and financial support necessary for the program from business and industry;

(8)
The program represents a collaborative partnership between business, industry,
labor, educational institutions, and other partners, as appropriate;

(9)
The commitment of financial support from business and industry shall be equal
to or greater than the amount of the requested job skills grant;

(10)
Binding commitments have been made to the commission by the applicant for
adequate reporting of information and data regarding the program to the
commission, particularly information concerning the recruitment and employment
of trainees and students, and including a requirement for an annual or other
periodic audit of the books of the applicant directly related to the program,
and for such control on the part of the commission as it considers prudent over
the management of the program, so as to protect the use of public funds,
including, in the discretion of the commission and without limitation, right of
access to financial and other records of the applicant directly related to the
programs; and

(11)
A provision has been made by the applicant to work, in cooperation with the
employment security department, to identify and screen potential trainees, and
that provision has been made by the applicant for the participation as trainees
of low-income persons including temporary assistance for needy families
recipients, dislocated workers, and persons from minority and economically
disadvantaged groups to participate in the program.

In
administering the job skills grants, the college board shall solicit the
involvement of businesses employing current or recent WorkFirst participants.
The college board shall, in conjunction with local educational institutions,
provide information about the operation and benefits of the job skills program
to such employers and encourage their participation.

Beginning October 1, 1999, and every two years thereafter, the
college board shall provide the legislature and the governor with a report describing
the activities and outcomes of the state job skills program.

---
END ---