BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 77.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
It is the intent of the legislature to prevent suffering and mortality of
cetaceans (dolphins, porpoises, and whales) and sirenians (manatees and
dugongs) by prohibiting their capture when applicable to Washington territorial
waters, transport, breeding, holding, and display in the state of Washington.

(2)
No animal of the taxonomic orders cetacea and sirenia shall be held, displayed,
bred, captured, or transported in or through Washington state and its
territorial waters unless specifically exempted in this section.

(3)
The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.

(a)
"Order" means all species, subspecies, and hybrids of the following
taxonomic groups:

(i)
Order cetacea: All whales, dolphins, and porpoises whether wild caught or
captive bred; and

(ii)
Order sirenia: All dugong and manatee whether wild caught or captive bred.

(b)
"Held" means confinement whether in an artificial pool or pen in a
natural body of water.

(c)
"Display" means to make a public or private show or exhibit for
recreational, allegedly therapeutic, or any commercial and noncommercial
purpose and includes any public viewing.

(d)
"Capture" means to seize or take physical possession, control, or
ownership of the covered species, either wild caught or captive bred, by force
or other effort by any means.

(e)
"Transport" means the movement by any conveyance of any of these
species to or through Washington state unless exempted by this section. This
prohibition includes stops made at airports by transport airplanes except for
veterinary emergency care.

(4)
Exemptions:

(a)
All cetaceans and sirenians held in captivity before January 1, 2000, are:

(i)
Exempt from the provisions of this section regarding holding and displaying
only; and

(ii)
Exempt from transport restrictions for outbound travel only. Once an exempt
individual animal leaves Washington state, the animal loses its exempt status.

(b)
Any covered species suffering, stranded, injured, or unable to survive without
human intervention is exempted from the provisions of this section temporarily
until such time as the animal is rehabilitated to the wild state. At no time
may such animals be displayed. If any stranded cetacean is neither euthanized
nor releasable into the wild, then a suitable sea pen in Washington marine
waters is required for long-term care.

(c)
Any covered species enrolled in a rehabilitation program intended to secure
release into the wild from a captive status is exempt. If this effort fails to
achieve a complete return to the wild, only a sea pen in suitable Washington
marine waters will satisfy the exemption from captivity.

(d)
To qualify for exempt status as described in (a) of this subsection, the legal
owner must register each individual member of the covered species within ninety
days of the effective date of this act. The registrant shall provide a
complete description including an identifying photograph to the department of
fish and wildlife.

(5)
Penalties:

(a)
A person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor for each infraction
and for each animal described in this section.

(b) Nothing in this section affects existing remedies and penalties
under current law.

---
END ---