BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
74.41.020 and 1987 c 409 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

It
is the intent of the legislature to provide ((for both)) a
comprehensive program of long-term care information and support, including
in-home and out-of-home respite care services ((which are provided by a
range of service providers)), for family and other unpaid caregivers who
provide the daily services required when caring for adults with functional
disabilities. The ((respite care)) family caregiver long-term
care information and support services shall:

(1)
Provide information, relief, and support to family or other
unpaid caregivers of ((disabled)) adults with functional disabilities;

(2)
Encourage family and other nonpaid individuals to provide care for ((disabled))
adults with functional disabilities at home, and thus offer a viable
alternative to ((institutionalization)) placement in a long-term care
facility;

(3)
Ensure that respite care is made generally available on a sliding-fee basis to
eligible participants in the program according to priorities established by the
department;

(4)
Be provided in the least restrictive setting available consistent with the
individually assessed needs of the ((functionally disabled)) adults
with functional disabilities; ((and))

(5)
Include services appropriate to the needs of persons caring for individuals
with dementing illnesses; and

(6)
Provide family and other unpaid caregivers with long-term care information
including but not limited to making care plans, locating long-term care
resources, and solving day-to-day caregiving problems.

Sec.
2. RCW
74.41.030 and 1987 c 409 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly indicates otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Family caregiver long-term care information and support services"
means providing long-term care information and support services to unpaid
family and other unpaid caregivers of adults with functional disabilities,
including but not limited to providing: (a) Information about available public
and private long-term care support services; (b) assistance in gaining access
to an array of appropriate long-term care family caregiver services; (c)
individual counseling, and promoting and implementing support groups; (d)
caregiver training to assist the nonpaid caregivers in making decisions and
solving challenges relating to their caregiving roles; (e) respite care
services; and (f) additional supportive long-term care services that may
include but not be limited to translating/interpreter services, specialized
transportation, coordination of medical care services, and other forms of
information and support necessary to maintain the unpaid caregiving activity.

(2)
"Respite care services" means relief care for families or other
caregivers of ((disabled)) adults with functional disabilities,
eligibility for which shall be determined by the department by rule. The
services provide temporary care or supervision of ((disabled)) adults with
functional disabilities in substitution for the caregiver. The term
includes ((social)) adult day ((care)) services.

(((2)))
(3) "Eligible participant for family caregiver long-term care
information and support services" means an adult (((a))) who
needs substantially continuous care or supervision by reason of his or her
functional disability((, and (b) who is)).

(4)
"Eligible participant for respite care services" means an adult who
meets the criteria for family caregiver long-term care information and support
services and is also assessed as requiring ((institutionalization)) placement
into a long-term care facility in the absence of ((a)) an unpaid
family or other unpaid caregiver assisted by home and community support
services, including respite care.

(((3)))
(5) "Caregiver" means a spouse, relative, or friend who has
primary responsibility for the care of ((a functionally disabled adult,))
an adult with a functional disability and who does not receive financial
compensation for the care((, and who is)). To be eligible for
respite care services, the caregiver is considered the client, and must also be
assessed as ((being)) at risk of placing ((the eligible participant))
an adult with functional disabilities in a long-term care facility if
respite care ((is)) and family caregiver long-term care information
and support services are not available.

(((4)
"Institutionalization" means placement in a long-term care facility.

(5))) (6)
"((Social)) Adult day ((care)) services"
means nonmedical services to persons who live with their families, cannot be
left unsupervised, and are at risk of being placed in a twenty-four-hour care
facility if their families do not receive some relief from constant care.

(((6)))
(7) "Department" means the department of social and health
services.

Sec.
3. RCW
74.41.050 and 1989 c 427 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department shall contract with area agencies on aging or other appropriate
agencies to conduct ((respite care projects)) family caregiver
long-term care information and support services to the extent of available
funding. The responsibilities of the agencies shall include but not be limited
to: (1) Administering a program of family caregiver long-term care
information and support services; and (2) negotiating rates of payment,
administering sliding-fee scales to enable eligible participants to participate
in paying for respite care, and arranging for respite care information,
training, and other support services. ((Rates of payment to respite
care service providers shall not exceed, and may be less than, rates paid by
the department to providers for the same level of service.)) In evaluating
the need for respite services, consideration shall be given to the mental and
physical ability of the caregiver to perform necessary caregiver functions.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 74.41 RCW to read as follows:

The family caregiver long-term care information and support
services administered by the respective area agencies on aging may include:
(1) Information about an array of private and public long-term care support
services available; (2) assistance in gaining access to appropriate long-term
care services; (3) family and individual counseling, including promoting and
implementing family support groups; (4) family caregiver training to assist the
caregivers in making decisions and solving problems relating to their
caregiving roles; (5) respite care to enable eligible caregivers to be
temporarily relieved from their caregiving responsibilities; and (6)
supplemental services, on a limited basis, to complement the care provided by
caregivers that may include but not be limited to: (a) Translating/interpreter
services; (b) specialized transportation; (c) assistance purchasing necessary
supplies, durable goods, or equipment; and (d) client advocacy.

Sec.
5. RCW
74.41.070 and 1998 c 245 s 151 are each amended to read as follows:

The area agencies on aging administering ((respite care
programs)) family caregiver long-term care information and support
services shall maintain data which indicates demand for ((respite care,
and which includes information on in-home and out-of-home day care and in-home
and out-of-home overnight care demand)) family caregiver long-term care
information and support services.

---
END ---