BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.70.028 and 1989 c 337 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

Dealers who transact dealer business by consignment shall obtain a
consignment contract for sale and shall comply with applicable provisions of
chapter 46.70 RCW. The dealer shall place all funds received from the sale of
the consigned vehicle in a trust account until the sale is completed, except
that the dealer shall pay any outstanding liens against the vehicle from these
funds. Where title has been delivered to the purchaser, the dealer shall pay
the amount due a consignor within ten days after the sale. However, in the
case of a consignment from a licensed vehicle dealer from any state, the
wholesale auto auction shall pay the consignor within twenty days.

---
END ---