BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
81.44.091 (Cabooses--Size--Equipment--Application) and 1969 ex.s.
c 116 s 1;

(2) RCW
81.44.092 (Cabooses--Minimum
length--Construction--Insulation--Cupola) and 1969 ex.s. c 116 s 2;

(3) RCW
81.44.093 (Cabooses--Trucks, riding qualities, wheels--Draft
gears, minimum travel, minimum capacity) and 1969 ex.s. c 116 s 3;

(4) RCW
81.44.094 (Cabooses--Electric lighting--Markers) and 1969 ex.s. c
116 s 4;

(5) RCW
81.44.095 (Cabooses--Glass, glazing materials of safety glass
type) and 1969 ex.s. c 116 s 5;

(6) RCW
81.44.096 (Cabooses--Stanchions, grab handles, or bars, installation--Edges
and protrusions rounded--Seat backs, standard) and 1969 ex.s. c 116 s 6;

(7) RCW
81.44.097 (Cabooses--Drinking water facilities) and 1969 ex.s. c
116 s 7;

(8) RCW
81.44.0971 (Cabooses--Facilities for washing hands and face) and
1969 ex.s. c 116 s 8;

(9) RCW
81.44.0972 (Cabooses--Fire extinguisher--Type, location, and
maintenance) and 1969 ex.s. c 116 s 9;

(10) RCW
81.44.098 (Cabooses--No violation when move in service if
correction made at first available point--Temporary exemption, procedure,
limitations) and 1969 ex.s. c 116 s 10;

(11) RCW
81.44.0981 (Cabooses--Register for report of failures--Regulations
for use of) and 1969 ex.s. c 116 s 11;

(12) RCW
81.44.0982 (Cabooses--Compliance, when--Standard for compliance)
and 1969 ex.s. c 116 s 12;

(13) RCW
81.44.099 (Cabooses--Regulation and enforcement--Regulations for)
and 1969 ex.s. c 116 s 13;

(14) RCW
81.44.100 (Penalty) and 1969 ex.s. c 116 s 14 & 1961 c 14 s
81.44.100;

(15) RCW
81.56.010 (Distribution of cars) and 1961 c 14 s 81.56.010;

(16) RCW
81.56.020 (Distributing book must be kept) and 1961 c 14 s
81.56.020;

(17) RCW
81.56.030 (Discrimination prohibited--Connecting lines) and 1961
c 14 s 81.56.030;

(18) RCW
81.56.040 (Equal privileges) and 1961 c 14 s 81.56.040;

(19) RCW
81.56.050 (Joint rates and through routes) and 1961 c 14 s
81.56.050;

(20) RCW
81.56.060 (Forest products--Scales at junctions) and 1961 c 14 s
81.56.060;

(21) RCW
81.56.070 (Forest products--Charges, how based) and 1961 c 14 s
81.56.070;

(22) RCW
81.56.080 (Forest products--Shipper's count and weight) and 1961
c 14 s 81.56.080;

(23) RCW
81.56.100 (Forest products--Penalty) and 1961 c 14 s 81.56.100;

(24) RCW
81.56.110 (Forest products--Special contracts regarding weights)
and 1961 c 14 s 81.56.110;

(25) RCW
81.56.120 (Cruelty to stock in transit--Penalty) and 1994 c 261 s
19 & 1961 c 14 s 81.56.120;

(26) RCW
81.56.130 (Commission rules to expedite traffic) and 1961 c 14 s
81.56.130;

(27) RCW 81.56.140
(Agent--Fixed place of business) and 1961 c 14 s 81.56.140;

(28) RCW
81.56.150 (Regulating sale of passenger tickets) and 1961 c 14 s
81.56.150;

(29) RCW
81.56.160 (Redemption of unused tickets) and 1961 c 14 s
81.56.160;

(30) RCW
81.64.010 (Grant of franchise) and 1961 c 14 s 81.64.010;

(31) RCW
81.64.020 (Application to county legislative authority--Notice--Hearing--Order)
and 1985 c 469 s 63 & 1961 c 14 s 81.64.020;

(32) RCW
81.64.030 (May cross public road) and 1961 c 14 s 81.64.030;

(33) RCW
81.64.040 (Eminent domain) and 1961 c 14 s 81.64.040;

(34) RCW
81.64.050 (Right of entry) and 1961 c 14 s 81.64.050;

(35) RCW
81.64.060 (Purchase or lease of street railway property) and 1961
c 14 s 81.64.060;

(36) RCW
81.64.070 (Consolidation of companies) and 1961 c 14 s 81.64.070;

(37) RCW
81.64.080 (Fares and transfers) and 1961 c 14 s 81.64.080;

(38) RCW
81.64.090 (Competent employees required) and 1961 c 14 s
81.64.090;

(39) RCW
81.64.100 ("Competent" defined) and 1961 c 14 s
81.64.100;

(40) RCW
81.64.110 (Penalty) and 1961 c 14 s 81.64.110;

(41) RCW
81.64.120 (Car equipment specified) and 1961 c 14 s 81.64.120;

(42) RCW
81.64.130 (Penalty) and 1961 c 14 s 81.64.130;

(43) RCW
81.64.140 (Weather guards) and 1961 c 14 s 81.64.140;

(44) RCW
81.64.150 (Penalty) and 1961 c 14 s 81.64.150;

(45) RCW
81.64.160 (Hours of labor) and 1961 c 14 s 81.64.160; and

(46) RCW
81.64.170 (Penalty) and 1961 c 14 s 81.64.170.

---
END ---