BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
59.18.180 and 1998 c 276 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
((If the tenant fails to comply with any portion of RCW 59.18.130 or
59.18.140, and such noncompliance can substantially affect the health and
safety of the tenant or other tenants, or substantially increase the hazards of
fire or accident that can be remedied by repair, replacement of a damaged item,
or cleaning, the tenant shall comply within thirty days after written notice by
the landlord specifying the noncompliance, or, in the case of emergency as
promptly as conditions require. If the tenant fails to remedy the
noncompliance within that period the landlord may enter the dwelling unit and
cause the work to be done and submit an itemized bill of the actual and
reasonable cost of repair, to be payable on the next date when periodic rent is
due, or on terms mutually agreed to by the landlord and tenant, or immediately
if the rental agreement has terminated. Any substantial noncompliance by the
tenant of RCW 59.18.130 or 59.18.140 shall constitute a ground for commencing
an action in unlawful detainer in accordance with the provisions of chapter
59.12 RCW, and a landlord may commence such action at any time after written
notice pursuant to such chapter.)) A landlord shall not terminate or
fail to renew a tenancy of a tenant or the occupancy of an occupant, of
whatever duration, except for one or more of the following reasons:

(a)
Substantial violation, or repeated or periodic violations, of the rental
agreement, as established by the landlord at the inception of the tenancy or as
assumed subsequently with the consent of the tenant, or for violation of the
tenant's duties as provided in RCW 59.18.130. The tenant must be given written
notice to cease the violation immediately. The notice must state that failure
to cease the violation or any subsequent violation of that or any other term of
the lease will result in termination of the tenancy, and that the tenant shall
vacate the premises within fifteen days. For a periodic violation, the notice
must also specify that repetition of the same violation will result in
termination.

(b)
Nonpayment of rent or other charges specified in the rental agreement, upon
five days' written notice to pay rent and/or other charges or to vacate;

(c)
Conviction of the tenant of a crime, commission of which threatens the health, safety,
or welfare of the other tenants. The tenant must be given written notice of a
fifteen-day period in which to vacate;

(d)
Engaging in criminal activity. "Criminal activity" means a criminal
act defined by statute or ordinance that threatens the health, safety, or
welfare of the tenants. A landlord seeking to evict a tenant or occupant under
this subsection need not produce evidence of a criminal conviction even if the
alleged misconduct constitutes a criminal offense. Notice from a law enforcement
agency of criminal activity constitutes sufficient grounds, but not the only
grounds, for an eviction under this subsection. Notification of the seizure of
illegal drugs under RCW 59.20.155 is evidence of criminal activity and is
grounds for an eviction under this subsection. The requirement that any tenant
or occupant register as a sex offender under RCW 9A.44.130 is grounds for
eviction under this subsection. If criminal activity is alleged to be a basis
of termination, the landlord may proceed directly to an unlawful detainer
action;

(e)
The tenant's application for tenancy contained a material misstatement that
induced the landlord to approve the tenant, and the landlord discovers and acts
upon the misstatement within one year of the time the resident began paying
rent;

(f)
If the landlord serves a tenant three fifteen‑day notices within a twelve‑month
period to comply or vacate for failure to comply with the material terms of the
rental agreement. The applicable twelve‑month period commences on the
date of the first violation;

(g)
The tenant engages in disorderly or substantially annoying conduct upon the
premises that results in the destruction of the rights of others to the
peaceful enjoyment and use of the premises. The landlord shall give the tenant
written notice to comply immediately. The notice must state that failure to
comply will result in termination of the tenancy, and that the tenant shall
vacate the premises within fifteen days;

(h)
The tenant creates a nuisance that materially affects the health, safety, and
welfare of other residents. The landlord shall give the tenant written notice
to cease the conduct that constitutes a nuisance immediately. The notice must
state that failure to cease the conduct will result in termination of the
tenancy, and that the tenant shall vacate the premises in five days;

(i)
Any other substantial, just cause that materially affects the health, safety,
and welfare of other tenants. The landlord shall give the tenant written
notice to comply immediately. The notice must state that failure to comply
will result in termination of the tenancy, and that the tenant shall vacate the
premises within fifteen days; or

(j)
Failure to pay rent by the due date provided for in the rental agreement three
or more times in a twelve‑month period, commencing with the date of the
first violation, after service of a five‑day notice to comply or vacate.

(2)
The tenant shall have a defense to an unlawful detainer action filed solely ((on))
under this ((ground)) section if it is determined at the
hearing authorized under the provisions of chapter 59.12 RCW that the tenant is
in substantial compliance with the provisions of this section, or if the tenant
remedies the noncomplying condition within the ((thirty day)) applicable
time period provided for above or any shorter period determined at the
hearing to have been required because of an emergency: PROVIDED, That if the
defective condition is remedied after the commencement of an unlawful detainer
action, the tenant may be liable to the landlord for statutory costs and
reasonable attorney's fees.

(((2)))
(3) If drug-related activity is alleged to be a basis for termination of
tenancy under RCW 59.18.130(6), 59.12.030(5), or 59.20.140(5), the compliance
provisions of this section do not apply and the landlord may proceed directly
to an unlawful detainer action.

(((3)))
(4) If activity on the premises that creates an imminent hazard to the
physical safety of other persons on the premises as defined in RCW 59.18.130(8)
is alleged to be the basis for termination of the tenancy, and the tenant is
arrested as a result of this activity, then the compliance provisions of this
section do not apply and the landlord may proceed directly to an unlawful
detainer action against the tenant who was arrested for this activity.

(((4)))
(5) If gang-related activity, as prohibited under RCW 59.18.130(9), is
alleged to be the basis for termination of the tenancy, then the compliance
provisions of this section do not apply and the landlord may proceed directly
to an unlawful detainer action in accordance with chapter 59.12 RCW, and a
landlord may commence such an action at any time after written notice under
chapter 59.12 RCW.

(((5))) (6) A landlord may not be held liable in any
cause of action for bringing an unlawful detainer action against a tenant for
drug-related activity, for creating an imminent hazard to the physical safety
of others, or for engaging in gang-related activity that renders people in at
least two or more dwelling units or residences insecure in life or the use of
property or that injures or endangers the safety or health of people in at
least two or more dwelling units or residences under this section, if the
unlawful detainer action was brought in good faith. Nothing in this section
shall affect a landlord's liability under RCW 59.18.380 to pay all damages
sustained by the tenant should the writ of restitution be wrongfully sued out.

---
END ---