BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the population of the Puget Sound region will grow by
more than a million and a half by 2020, and that current and new residents will
seek greater opportunities for outdoor recreation within a reasonable distance
from their homes. Changing demographics, healthier and more active lifestyles,
and improvements in recreation technology will all lead to growing public
demand for areas and facilities in which to recreate. The west slope Cascade
foothills, from the international border south through Thurston county, provide
a wealth of existing and potential outdoor recreation areas that are close to
the great majority of the urbanized areas of Puget Sound. Within this area are
many public lands, including state park units, that may provide the nucleus for
a network of lands accessible for diverse recreational uses by people of all
ages, physical capacities, and recreational preferences.

The
legislature further finds that the Cascade foothills are home to many permanent
residents who benefit from the natural resource and lifestyle amenities of the
foothills, and that expanding recreational opportunities in the foothills must
be consistent with the long-term sustainability of the local economies. The
west slope Cascade foothills also are an integral part of the "mountains
to sound" region and provide significant benefits to the entire region,
including watershed protection, wildlife habitat, flood damage reduction, and
scenic values. A review of outdoor recreational needs and opportunities in the
foothills should include consideration of these benefits and the need for
protection of these functions and values.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
As used in this section and section 1 of this act, "Cascade
foothills," "west slope Cascade foothills," and "Cascade
foothills area" means the generally nonurbanized area within the Cascade
mountain range and drainages lying between three hundred and three thousand
feet above mean sea level, and located within the counties of Whatcom, Skagit,
Snohomish, King, Pierce, and Thurston. Lands lying at lower elevations that
are in the immediate vicinity of the foothills area, such as lower drainages,
are also included within this term. These lands include public lands that are
devoted to developed, nonrecreational uses. This definition is provided solely
to guide the parks and recreation commission in the geographic scope of its
study responsibilities and confers no authority upon any entity other than the
commission for the study purposes of this section.

(2)
The Washington state parks and recreation commission shall review and make
recommendations to the legislature and governor on the existing and future
outdoor recreational needs and opportunities in the west slope Cascade foothills,
recognizing the important functions and values that are provided by these
lands. These include wildlife habitat, watershed protection, flood damage
protection, scenic enjoyment, and economic uses, as well as the means by which
more effective use of existing public lands in the foothills, assisted by
willing private providers of outdoor recreation facilities, may serve to meet
these needs. To this end the study should include:

(a)
An assessment of the existing and the twenty-year growth projection for
recreational demand of the population residing within one-hour driving time
from the Cascade foothills. This assessment shall include the types of
recreational uses anticipated, demographic projections of recreational users,
and developed facilities needed to serve such uses;

(b)
An inventory of existing facilities and lands accessible for recreational use
within the Cascade foothills;

(c)
A review of existing local, regional, state, federal, private, and
nongovernmental nonprofit entities providing outdoor recreation opportunities
within the Cascade foothills and their coordination in meeting public outdoor
recreation demand, as well as the role of public education of recreational
users to avoid land damage;

(d)
A review of state lands within the Cascade foothills that may be managed
principally or in part for outdoor recreation uses as a unit of a Cascade
foothills state park, and recommendations for transitioning to such management;

(e)
A compilation of materials, obtained at no cost by the commission from other
government agencies and private entities, of existing wildlife and conservation
functions and values, which could be used in future evaluations of the
compatibility of proposed recreational uses and activities;

(f)
Recommendations for regional coordination among public and private outdoor
recreation providers to promote expanded outdoor recreation opportunities
within the Cascade foothills; and

(g)
Methods to fund local, regional, and state outdoor recreation programs and
facilities within the Cascade foothills.

(3)
In conducting the study, the Washington state parks and recreation commission
should consult with the counties and cities within the Cascade foothills area,
with other public and private land managers providing outdoor recreation
opportunities to the public, and with organizations having an interest in the
management, conservation, and use of public lands in the Cascade foothills.

(4)
The Washington state parks and recreation commission may accept contributions
of funds or services to assist in conducting the study.

(5)
The Washington state parks and recreation commission shall provide its report
and recommendations to the governor and the parks committees of the senate and
house of representatives no later than December 15, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect April 15, 2000.

---
END ---