BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.37.020 and 1994 c 92 s 505 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, the following words and terms have the following
meanings, unless the context indicates or requires another or different meaning
or intent and the singular of any term shall encompass the plural and the
plural the singular unless the context indicates otherwise:

(1)
"Authority" means the Washington health care facilities authority
created by RCW 70.37.030 or any board, body, commission, department or officer
succeeding to the principal functions thereof or to whom the powers conferred
upon the authority shall be given by law.

(2)
"Bonds" mean bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness of the
authority issued pursuant hereto.

(3)
"Health care facility" means any land, structure, system, machinery,
equipment or other real or personal property or appurtenances useful for or
associated with the promotion and maintenance of public health as defined in
RCW 70.38.025(12), the delivery of inpatient or outpatient health care
service or support for such care or any combination thereof which is operated
or undertaken in connection with hospital, clinic, health maintenance
organization, diagnostic or treatment center, extended care facility, or any
facility providing or designed to provide therapeutic, convalescent or
preventive health care or public health services, and shall include
research and support facilities of a comprehensive cancer center, but excluding,
however, any facility which is maintained by a participant primarily for rental
or lease to self-employed health care professionals or as an independent
nursing home or other facility primarily offering domiciliary care.

(4)
"Participant" means any city, county or other municipal corporation
or agency or political subdivision of the state or any corporation, hospital,
comprehensive cancer center, or health maintenance organization authorized by
law to operate nonprofit health care facilities, or any affiliate, as defined
by regulations promulgated by the director of the department of financial
institutions pursuant to RCW 21.20.450, which is a nonprofit corporation acting
for the benefit of any entity described in this subsection.

(5) "Project" means a specific health care facility or
any combination of health care facilities, constructed, purchased, acquired,
leased, used, owned or operated by a participant, and alterations, additions
to, renovations, enlargements, betterments and reconstructions thereof.

---
END ---