BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
71.05.285 and 1997 c 112 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

((For the purposes of continued)) In determining whether
an inpatient or less restrictive alternative commitment under the process
provided in RCW 71.05.280 and 71.05.320(2) is appropriate, ((in
determining whether or not the person is gravely disabled,)) great weight
shall be given to evidence of a prior history or pattern of decompensation and
discontinuation of treatment resulting in: (1) Repeated hospitalizations; or
(2) repeated peace officer interventions resulting in juvenile offenses,
criminal charges, diversion programs, or jail admissions. Such evidence may be
used to provide a factual basis for concluding that the individual would not
receive, if released, such care as is essential for his or her health or
safety.

---
END ---