BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
39.10.020 and 1997 c 376 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Alternative public works contracting procedure" means the
design-build and the general contractor/construction manager contracting
procedures authorized in RCW 39.10.050 and 39.10.060, respectively.

(2)
"Public body" means the state department of general administration;
the University of Washington; Washington State University; every city with a
population greater than one hundred ((fifty)) thousand; every city
authorized to use the design-build procedure for a water system demonstration
project under RCW 39.10.065(3); every county with a population greater than
four hundred fifty thousand; and every port district with a population greater
than five hundred thousand.

(3)
"Public works project" means any work for a public body within the
definition of the term public work in RCW 39.04.010.

Sec.
2. RCW
39.10.050 and 1997 c 376 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and after complying with RCW
39.10.030, the following public bodies may utilize the design-build procedure
of public works contracting for public works projects authorized under this
section: The state department of general administration; the University of
Washington; Washington State University; every city with a population greater
than one hundred ((fifty)) thousand; every county with a population
greater than four hundred fifty thousand; and every port district with a
population greater than five hundred thousand. The authority granted to port
districts in this section is in addition to and does not affect existing
contracting authority under RCW 53.08.120 and 53.08.130. For the purposes of
this section, "design-build procedure" means a contract between a
public body and another party in which the party agrees to both design and
build the facility, portion of the facility, or other item specified in the
contract.

(2)
Public bodies authorized under this section may utilize the design-build
procedure for public works projects valued over ten million dollars where:

(a)
The construction activities or technologies to be used are highly specialized
and a design-build approach is critical in developing the construction
methodology or implementing the proposed technology;

(b)
The project design is repetitive in nature and is an incidental part of the
installation or construction; or

(c)
Regular interaction with and feedback from facilities users and operators
during design is not critical to an effective facility design.

(3)
Public bodies authorized under this section may also use the design-build
procedure for the following projects that meet the criteria in subsection
(2)(b) and (c) of this section:

(a)
The construction or erection of preengineered metal buildings or prefabricated
modular buildings, regardless of cost; or

(b)
The construction of new student housing projects valued over five million
dollars.

(4)
Contracts for design-build services shall be awarded through a competitive
process utilizing public solicitation of proposals for design-build services.
The public body shall publish at least once in a legal newspaper of general
circulation published in or as near as possible to that part of the county in
which the public work will be done, a notice of its request for proposals for
design-build services and the availability and location of the request for
proposal documents. The request for proposal documents shall include:

(a)
A detailed description of the project including programmatic, performance, and
technical requirements and specifications, functional and operational elements,
minimum and maximum net and gross areas of any building, and, at the discretion
of the public body, preliminary engineering and architectural drawings;

(b)
The reasons for using the design-build procedure;

(c)
A description of the qualifications to be required of the proposer including,
but not limited to, submission of the proposer's accident prevention program;

(d)
A description of the process the public body will use to evaluate
qualifications and proposals, including evaluation factors and the relative
weight of factors. Evaluation factors shall include, but not be limited to:
Proposal price; ability of professional personnel; past performance on similar
projects; ability to meet time and budget requirements; ability to provide a
performance and payment bond for the project; recent, current, and projected
work loads of the firm; location; and the concept of the proposal;

(e)
The form of the contract to be awarded;

(f)
The maximum allowable construction cost and minority and women enterprise total
project goals;

(g)
The amount to be paid to finalists submitting best and final proposals who are
not awarded a design-build contract; and

(h)
Other information relevant to the project.

(5)
The public body shall establish a committee to evaluate the proposals based on the
factors, weighting, and process identified in the request for proposals. Based
on its evaluation, the public body shall select not fewer than three nor more
than five finalists to submit best and final proposals. The public body may,
in its sole discretion, reject all proposals. Design-build contracts shall be
awarded using the procedures in (a) or (b) of this subsection.

(a)
Best and final proposals shall be evaluated and scored based on the factors,
weighting, and process identified in the initial request for proposals. The
public body may score the proposals using a system that measures the quality
and technical merits of the proposal on a unit price basis. Final proposals
may not be considered if the proposal cost is greater than the maximum allowable
construction cost identified in the initial request for proposals. The public
body shall initiate negotiations with the firm submitting the highest scored
best and final proposal. If the public body is unable to execute a contract
with the firm submitting the highest scored best and final proposal,
negotiations with that firm may be suspended or terminated and the public body
may proceed to negotiate with the next highest scored firm. Public bodies
shall continue in accordance with this procedure until a contract agreement is
reached or the selection process is terminated.

(b)
If the public body determines that all finalists are capable of producing plans
and specifications that adequately meet project requirements, the public body
may award the contract to the firm that submits the responsive best and final
proposal with the lowest price.

(6) The firm awarded the contract shall provide a performance and
payment bond for the contracted amount. The public body shall provide
appropriate honorarium payments to finalists submitting best and final
proposals who are not awarded a design-build contract. Honorarium payments
shall be sufficient to generate meaningful competition among potential
proposers on design-build projects.

Sec.
3. RCW
39.10.060 and 1997 c 376 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and after complying with RCW
39.10.030, the following public bodies may utilize the general
contractor/construction manager procedure of public works contracting for
public works projects authorized under subsection (2) of this section: The
state department of general administration; the University of Washington;
Washington State University; every city with a population greater than one
hundred ((fifty)) thousand; every county with a population greater than
four hundred fifty thousand; and every port district with a population greater
than five hundred thousand. For the purposes of this section, "general
contractor/construction manager" means a firm with which a public body has
selected and negotiated a maximum allowable construction cost to be guaranteed
by the firm, after competitive selection through formal advertisement and
competitive bids, to provide services during the design phase that may include
life-cycle cost design considerations, value engineering, scheduling, cost
estimating, constructability, alternative construction options for cost
savings, and sequencing of work, and to act as the construction manager and general
contractor during the construction phase.

(2)
Public bodies authorized under this section may utilize the general
contractor/construction manager procedure for public works projects valued over
ten million dollars where:

(a)
Implementation of the project involves complex scheduling requirements;

(b)
The project involves construction at an existing facility which must continue
to operate during construction; or

(c)
The involvement of the general contractor/construction manager during the
design stage is critical to the success of the project.

(3)
Public bodies should select general contractor/construction managers early in
the life of public works projects, and in most situations no later than the
completion of schematic design.

(4)
Contracts for the services of a general contractor/construction manager under
this section shall be awarded through a competitive process requiring the
public solicitation of proposals for general contractor/construction manager
services. The public solicitation of proposals shall include: A description
of the project, including programmatic, performance, and technical requirements
and specifications when available; the reasons for using the general
contractor/construction manager procedure; a description of the qualifications
to be required of the proposer, including submission of the proposer's accident
prevention program; a description of the process the public body will use to
evaluate qualifications and proposals, including evaluation factors and the
relative weight of factors; the form of the contract to be awarded; the
estimated maximum allowable construction cost; minority and women business
enterprise total project goals, where applicable; and the bid instructions to
be used by the general contractor/construction manager finalists. Evaluation
factors shall include, but not be limited to: Ability of professional
personnel, past performance in negotiated and complex projects, and ability to
meet time and budget requirements; location; recent, current, and projected
work loads of the firm; and the concept of their proposal. A public body shall
establish a committee to evaluate the proposals. After the committee has
selected the most qualified finalists, these finalists shall submit final
proposals, including sealed bids for the percent fee, which is the percentage
amount to be earned by the general contractor/construction manager as overhead
and profit, on the estimated maximum allowable construction cost and the fixed
amount for the detailed specified general conditions work. The public body
shall select the firm submitting the highest scored final proposal using the
evaluation factors and the relative weight of factors published in the public
solicitation of proposals.

(5)
The maximum allowable construction cost may be negotiated between the public
body and the selected firm after the scope of the project is adequately
determined to establish a guaranteed contract cost for which the general
contractor/construction manager will provide a performance and payment bond.
The guaranteed contract cost includes the fixed amount for the detailed
specified general conditions work, the negotiated maximum allowable
construction cost, the percent fee on the negotiated maximum allowable
construction cost, and sales tax. If the public body is unable to negotiate a
satisfactory maximum allowable construction cost with the firm selected that
the public body determines to be fair, reasonable, and within the available
funds, negotiations with that firm shall be formally terminated and the public
body shall negotiate with the next highest scored firm and continue until an
agreement is reached or the process is terminated. If the maximum allowable
construction cost varies more than fifteen percent from the bid estimated
maximum allowable construction cost due to requested and approved changes in
the scope by the public body, the percent fee shall be renegotiated.

(6)
All subcontract work shall be competitively bid with public bid openings.
Subcontract work shall not be issued for bid until the public body has
approved, in consultation with the office of minority and women's business
enterprises or the equivalent local agency, a plan prepared by the general
contractor/construction manager for attaining applicable minority and women
business enterprise total project goals that equitably spreads women and
minority enterprise opportunities to as many firms in as many bid packages as
is practicable. When critical to the successful completion of a subcontractor
bid package the owner and general contractor/construction manager may evaluate
for bidding eligibility a subcontractor's ability, time, budget, and
specification requirements based on the subcontractor's performance of those
items on previous projects. Subcontract bid packages shall be awarded to the
responsible bidder submitting the low responsive bid. The requirements of RCW
39.30.060 apply to each subcontract bid package. All subcontractors who bid
work over three hundred thousand dollars shall post a bid bond and all
subcontractors who are awarded a contract over three hundred thousand dollars
shall provide a performance and payment bond for their contract amount. All
other subcontractors shall provide a performance and payment bond if required
by the general contractor/construction manager. A low bidder who claims error
and fails to enter into a contract is prohibited from bidding on the same
project if a second or subsequent call for bids is made for the project.
Except as provided for under subsection (7) of this section, bidding on
subcontract work by the general contractor/construction manager or its
subsidiaries is prohibited. The general contractor/construction manager may
negotiate with the low-responsive bidder in accordance with RCW 39.10.080 or,
if unsuccessful in such negotiations, rebid.

(7)
The general contractor/construction manager, or its subsidiaries, may bid on
subcontract work on projects valued over twenty million dollars if:

(a)
The work within the subcontract bid package is customarily performed by the
general contractor/construction manager;

(b)
The bid opening is managed by the public body; and

(c)
Notification of the general contractor/construction manager's intention to bid
is included in the public solicitation of bids for the bid package.

In
no event may the value of subcontract work performed by the general
contractor/construction manager exceed twenty percent of the negotiated maximum
allowable construction cost.

(8) A public body may include an incentive clause in any contract
awarded under this section for savings of either time or cost or both from that
originally negotiated. No incentives granted may exceed five percent of the
maximum allowable construction cost. If the project is completed for less than
the agreed upon maximum allowable construction cost, any savings not otherwise
negotiated as part of an incentive clause shall accrue to the public body. If
the project is completed for more than the agreed upon maximum allowable
construction cost, excepting increases due to any contract change orders
approved by the public body, the additional cost shall be the responsibility of
the general contractor/construction manager.

---
END ---