BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.46.0209 and 1987 c 4 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

"Bona
fide charitable or nonprofit organization," as used in this chapter,
means: (1) Any organization duly existing under the provisions of chapter((s))
24.12, 24.20, or 24.28 RCW, any agricultural fair authorized under the
provisions of chapters 15.76 or 36.37 RCW, or any nonprofit corporation duly
existing under the provisions of chapter 24.03 RCW for charitable, benevolent,
eleemosynary, educational, civic, patriotic, political, social, fraternal,
athletic or agricultural purposes only, or any nonprofit organization, whether
incorporated or otherwise, when found by the commission to be organized and
operating for one or more of the aforesaid purposes only, all of which in the
opinion of the commission have been organized and are operated primarily for
purposes other than the operation of gambling activities authorized under this
chapter; or (2) any corporation which has been incorporated under Title 36
U.S.C. and whose principal purposes are to furnish volunteer aid to members of
the armed forces of the United States and also to carry on a system of national
and international relief and to apply the same in mitigating the sufferings
caused by pestilence, famine, fire, floods, and other national calamities and
to devise and carry on measures for preventing the same. Such an organization
must have been organized and continuously operating for at least twelve
calendar months immediately preceding making application for any license to
operate a gambling activity, or the operation of any gambling activity
authorized by this chapter for which no license is required. It must have not
less than fifteen bona fide active members each with the right to an equal vote
in the election of the officers, or board members, if any, who determine the
policies of the organization in order to receive a gambling license. An
organization must demonstrate to the commission that it has made significant
progress toward the accomplishment of the purposes of the organization during
the twelve consecutive month period preceding the date of application for a
license or license renewal. The fact that contributions to an organization do
not qualify for charitable contribution deduction purposes or that the
organization is not otherwise exempt from payment of federal income taxes
pursuant to the internal revenue code of 1954, as amended, shall constitute
prima facie evidence that the organization is not a bona fide charitable or
nonprofit organization for the purposes of this section.

Any
person, association or organization which pays its employees, including
members, compensation other than is reasonable therefor under the local
prevailing wage scale shall be deemed paying compensation based in part or
whole upon receipts relating to gambling activities authorized under this
chapter and shall not be a bona fide charitable or nonprofit organization for
the purposes of this chapter.

For the purposes of RCW 9.46.0315 and 9.46.110, a bona fide
nonprofit organization also includes a credit union organized and operating
under state or federal law.

---
END ---