BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
74.08A.250 and 1997 c 58 s 311 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, as used in this chapter, "work
activity" means:

(1)
Unsubsidized paid employment in the private or public sector;

(2)
Subsidized paid employment in the private or public sector, including
employment through a work-study program for a period not to exceed twenty-four
months;

(3)
Work experience, including work associated with the refurbishing of publicly
assisted housing, if sufficient paid employment is not available, and including
internships, that shall be paid or unpaid work experience performed by an
intern in a business, industry, or public setting;

(4)
On-the-job training, including practicums, which include any educational
program in which a student is working under the close supervision of a
professional in an agency, clinic, or other professional practice setting for
purposes of advancing the student's skills and knowledge, and which are
required to complete a course of vocational training or to obtain a license or
certificate to practice;

(5)
Job search and job readiness assistance;

(6)
Community service programs;

(7)
Vocational educational training, not to exceed twelve months with respect to
any individual;

(8)
Job skills training directly related to employment;

(9)
Education directly related to employment, in the case of a recipient who has
not received a high school diploma or a GED;

(10)
Satisfactory attendance at secondary school or in a course of study leading to
a GED, in the case of a recipient who has not completed secondary school or
received such a certificate;

(11)
The provision of child care services to an individual who is participating in a
community service program; and

(12) Services required by the recipient under RCW 74.08.025(3) and
74.08A.010(3) to become employable.

---
END ---