BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Beginning with the 2000-01 school year, the superintendent of public
instruction shall notify high schools of the names and contact information of
public and private entities offering programs leading to college credit, if the
superintendent has knowledge of such entities and if the cost of reporting
these entities is minimal.

(2)
Beginning with the 2000-01 school year, each high school shall publish annually
and deliver to each parent with children enrolled in the school, information
concerning the entrance requirements and the availability in the school of
programs leading to college credit, such as advanced placement and
international baccalaureate programs. In addition, each high school shall
enclose information of the names and contact information of other public or
private entities offering such programs, including on-line advanced placement
programs, to high school students in the district if the high school has
knowledge of such entities and if the cost of reporting these entities is
minimal.

---
END ---