BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.17.150 and 1986 c 246 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each state agency is authorized to receive property or money made available by
the attorney general of the United States under section 881(e) of Title 21 of
the United States Code and, except as required to the contrary under subsection
(2) of this section, to use the property or spend the money for such purposes
as are permitted under both federal law and the state law specifying the powers
and duties of the agency.

(2)
Unless precluded by federal law, all funds received by a state agency under
section 881(e) of Title 21 of the United States Code shall be promptly
deposited into the public safety and education account established in RCW
43.08.250.

(3)
For the limited and specific purpose only, of receiving property or money made
available by the attorney general of the United States under section 881(e) of
Title 21 of the United States Code, the Washington national guard shall be
considered a law enforcement agency. The Washington national guard shall keep
a record of property or money received under this subsection. The record must
include, consistent with 21 U.S.C. Sec. 881, the following: Whether the
national guard retained or disposed of the property; the amount of money
received directly; a description of property received and the amount of money
realized from disposition of the property; a description and record of the
national guard's use of the money or property; and any additional information
the national guard deems appropriate. The Washington national guard shall file
an annual report with the legislature and governor setting forth the
information required to be recorded under this subsection. Nothing in this
subsection creates any new law enforcement powers, duties, or obligations for
the Washington national guard. Nothing in this subsection with respect to the
Washington national guard creates any new obligation for pensions, funding, or
liabilities afforded existing law enforcement agencies.

---
END ---