BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the intent of the legislature to facilitate a conditional opportunity for
community members, including business and retired persons, to bring their
expertise and work experiences into the classrooms in Washington to enrich the
learning experience of students.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) A
school district on behalf of an individual candidate may apply to the superintendent
of public instruction for the issuance of an alternate teacher certificate.

(2)
The superintendent of public instruction shall issue the alternate teacher
certificate if the following requirements are met and documented:

(a)
The individual holds a baccalaureate degree from a regionally accredited
institution of higher education;

(b)
The individual has at least five years' work experience relevant to the subject
area or areas the school district desires the individual to teach;

(c)
The school district superintendent has determined that the individual has
sufficient knowledge or experience to teach a particular subject or subjects
and has recommended the individual to the school board of directors for
approval. The school district superintendent shall recommend to the school
board of directors for approval individuals he or she determines has sufficient
knowledge or experience to teach a particular subject or subjects;

(d)
The individual meets the age and character requirements established by the
state board of education for all certificated staff, including compliance with
the background check through the Washington state patrol criminal investigation
system and the federal bureau of investigation as required under RCW
28A.410.010;

(e)
The individual passes the state certification assessment of basic skills in
reading, writing, communications, and mathematics when it becomes available;

(f)
The individual possesses a contract specifying the terms and conditions of
employment in a school district of the state; and

(g)
The individual takes the certification assessment of teaching knowledge when it
becomes available, and the results are used in the development of the written
plan of assistance required under subsection (4) of this section.

(3)
Until the state certification assessment of basic skills under subsection
(2)(e) of this section is available, the individual shall complete a test of
basic skills recommended by the state board of education. The passing scores
shall be determined by the local school board until such time as the state
board of education has by rule adopted minimum passing scores.

(4)(a)
Prior to beginning teaching under the alternate teacher certificate, the
individual shall develop with the employing school district a written plan for
training, supervision, guidance, and support which shall be provided by the
district to the individual while he or she holds the alternate teacher
certificate.

(b)
During the first ten weeks of employment, the school district shall provide direct
supervision or observation of the teacher with an alternate certificate to
assure the teacher's instructional effectiveness and identify any professional
development needs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The alternate teacher certificate allows the holder full authority to serve as
a part-time or full-time teacher. The certificate shall be valid for not more
than two years of full-time or part-time teaching or its equivalent.

(2)
The alternate teacher certificate shall allow the holder to provide
instructional services to students in any of the grades in middle school,
junior high, and high school and teach only the subject or subjects approved by
the local school board of directors and designated on the alternate teacher certificate.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
An individual desiring to teach beyond the expiration date of the alternate
teacher certificate may apply to the superintendent of public instruction for
an initial or residency teaching certificate. The state superintendent shall
issue the individual an initial or residency certificate if the following
requirements are met and documented:

(a)
The individual has completed at least two school years of successful teaching
experience based on the recommendations of the supervising principal and
district superintendent and approved by the school board of directors;

(b)
The individual has successfully passed the state certification assessments of
subject knowledge when they become available; and

(c)
The individual has successfully passed the state certification assessments of
teaching knowledge when they become available.

(2)
The state board of education may not require any other conditions than those
specified under subsection (1) of this section to meet initial or residency
certification requirements.

Sec.
5. RCW
28A.410.025 and 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.67.010 are each amended to read as
follows:

No
person shall be accounted as a qualified teacher within the meaning of the
school law who is not the holder of a valid teacher's certificate, alternate
certificate issued under section 2 of this act, or permit or other
limited certificate issued by ((lawful authority of this state)) the
superintendent of public instruction pursuant to state law or the state board
of education rules.

Through
its authority under RCW 28A.305.130 to approve professional preparation
programs in institutions of higher education, the state board of education
shall ensure that prospective candidates for the alternative certification
process under sections 1 through 4 of this act are permitted to challenge
required college courses in the professional preparation program.

Sec.
6. RCW
28A.150.410 and 1997 c 141 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The legislature shall establish for each school year in the appropriations act
a state-wide salary allocation schedule, for allocation purposes only, to be
used to distribute funds for basic education certificated instructional staff
salaries under RCW 28A.150.260.

(2)
The superintendent of public instruction shall calculate salary allocations for
state funded basic education certificated instructional staff by determining
the district average salary for basic education and special education
instructional staff using the salary allocation schedule established pursuant
to this section.

(3)
Beginning January 1, 1992, no more than ninety college quarter-hour credits
received by any employee after the baccalaureate degree may be used to
determine compensation allocations under the state salary allocation schedule
and LEAP documents referenced in the biennial appropriations act, or any
replacement schedules and documents, unless:

(a)
The employee has a masters degree; or

(b)
The credits were used in generating state salary allocations before January 1,
1992.

(4)
In determining state allocations and salaries for individuals participating in
the alternate certification program under section 2 of this act, an
individual's salary shall be based on the state-wide salary allocation schedule
for individuals with zero years of service and the individual's degree.
Calculation of certificated years of service shall start from the date the
individual is issued an initial or residency certificate and begins
accumulating full-time or part-time professional educational employment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
Sections 2 through 4 of this act are each added to chapter 28A.410 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. The
alternative teacher certificate shall be available beginning the 2000-01 school
year.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---