BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
For the purpose of acquisition, construction, remodeling, equipping, repairing,
maintaining, and operating a public zoo, aquarium, other parks, and open space,
the legislative authority of a city with a population of over one hundred fifty
thousand that is not in a metropolitan park district may, subject to section 2
of this act, levy an annual regular property tax not exceeding fifty cents per
thousand dollars of assessed valuation in the city.

(2)
The levy under this section is in addition to the levy of a city under RCW
84.52.043 and 41.16.060.

(3)
The limitation in RCW 84.55.010 does not apply to the first levy imposed under
this section.

(4)
Proceeds of the taxes levied under this section may not be applied to the
payment of principal of or interest on bonds with maturities greater than ten
years.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) A
city shall have no authority to levy taxes under section 1 of this act until
that power is activated by vote of the city's voters at a regular election or a
special election called for that purpose. The ballot proposition whether to
activate the city's regular taxing power under this act shall propose an
initial regular tax rate or amount and shall also propose a maximum regular tax
rate or amount. If the voters approve a regular tax rate or amount, that
approval shall serve as the voter approval required by Initiative Measure No.
695 for all increases in general regular taxes under this act up to the maximum
approved tax rate or amount.

(2)
Any city placing on the ballot a proposition to authorize the levy of taxes
under this act shall, in the ballot ordinance, agree to continue, for so long
as the city levies general taxes under this act, to appropriate annually for
park and recreation purposes, from sources other than general taxes levied
under this act, at least the same dollar amount the city appropriated for park
and recreation purposes in the last annual budget adopted before the effective
date of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. In
the ordinance placing on the ballot the proposition called for by section 2 of
this act, the city legislative authority shall specify the minimum or maximum
shares, as percentages or dollar amounts or both, of revenue from taxes under
section 1 of this act that shall, annually or cumulatively, be devoted during
the first ten years those taxes are collected to each of the following: (1) A
public zoo, (2) a public aquarium, and (3) other parks and open space.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. All
instances in which voter approval is called for under sections 1 and 2 of this
act shall require an affirmative vote of a sixty percent majority of the voters
of the city voting on the proposition at a general election held within the
city or at a special election called by the city held in conjunction with a
state general or primary election.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
If the legislative authority of a city whose voters have authorized taxes under
section 1 of this act contracts with one or more nonprofit corporations or
other public organizations for the overall management and operation of a zoo,
an aquarium, or both, that contract shall be subject to this section. No such
contract for the overall management and operation of zoo or aquarium facilities
by a nonprofit corporation or other public organization shall have an initial
term or any renewal term longer than thirty years, but may be renewed by the
legislative authority of the city upon the expiration of an initial term or any
renewal term.

(2)
A nonprofit corporation or other public organization that contracts with the
legislative authority of a city for the overall management and operation of a
zoo, aquarium, or both under chapter . . ., Laws of 2000 (this act)
must comply with chapters 42.23 and 42.30 RCW and RCW 42.17.250 through
42.17.348.

(3)
Before approving each initial and any renewal contract with a nonprofit
corporation or other public organization for the overall management and
operation of any facilities, the city legislative authority shall hold a public
hearing on the proposed management and operation by the nonprofit corporation
or other public organization. At least thirty days prior to the hearing, a
public notice setting forth the date, time, and place of the hearing must be
published at least once in a local newspaper of general circulation. Notice of
the hearing shall also be mailed or otherwise delivered to all who would be
entitled to notice of a special meeting of the city legislative authority under
RCW 42.30.080. The notice shall identify the facilities involved and the
nonprofit corporation or other public organization proposed for management and
operation under the contract with the city. The terms and conditions under
which the city proposes to contract with the nonprofit corporation or other
public organization for management and operation shall be available upon
request from and after the date of publication of the hearing notice and at the
hearing, but after the public hearing the city legislative authority may amend
the proposed terms and conditions at open public meetings.

(4)
As part of the management and operation contract, the legislative authority of
the city may authorize the managing and operating entity to grant to any
nonprofit corporation or public or private organization franchises or
concessions that further the public use and enjoyment of the zoo or aquarium,
as the case may be, and may authorize the managing and operating entity to
contract with any public or private organization for any specific services as
are routinely so procured by the city.

(5)
Notwithstanding any provision in the charter of the city so contracting for the
overall management and operation of a zoo or an aquarium, or any other
provision of law, the nonprofit corporation or other public organization with
responsibility for overall management or operation of any such facilities
pursuant to a contract under this section may, in carrying out that
responsibility under such contract, manage, supervise, and control those
employees of the city employed in connection with the zoo or aquarium and may
hire, fire, and otherwise discipline those employees. Notwithstanding any
provision in the charter of the city so contracting for the overall management
and operation of a zoo or an aquarium, or any other provision of law, the civil
service system of any such city shall provide for the nonprofit corporation or
other public organization to manage, supervise, control, hire, fire, and
otherwise discipline those employees of the city employed in connection with
the zoo or aquarium.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6.
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to affect any terms, conditions, or
practices contained in a collective bargaining agreement in effect on the
effective date of this act.

Sec.
7. RCW
84.52.010 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as is permitted under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes shall be levied or voted in
specific amounts.

The
rate percent of all taxes for state and county purposes, and purposes of taxing
districts coextensive with the county, shall be determined, calculated and
fixed by the county assessors of the respective counties, within the
limitations provided by law, upon the assessed valuation of the property of the
county, as shown by the completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent
of all taxes levied for purposes of taxing districts within any county shall be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the respective
counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the assessed valuation of
the property of the taxing districts respectively.

When
a county assessor finds that the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property,
that is subject to the limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.043 or 84.52.050,
exceeds the limitations provided in either of these sections, the assessor
shall recompute and establish a consolidated levy in the following manner:

(1)
The full certified rates of tax levy for state, county, county road district,
and city or town purposes shall be extended on the tax rolls in amounts not
exceeding the limitations established by law; however any state levy shall take
precedence over all other levies and shall not be reduced for any purpose other
than that required by RCW 84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed
under RCW 84.52.069, 84.34.230, the portion of the levy by a metropolitan park
district that was protected under RCW 84.52.120, and 84.52.105, the combined
rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent
limitation exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then
these levies shall be reduced as follows: (a) The portion of the levy by a
metropolitan park district that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 shall be
reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and
fair value of any property or shall be eliminated; (b) if the combined rate
of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation
still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then the
levy by a city under section 1 of this act shall be reduced until the combined
rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property
or shall be eliminated; (c) if the combined rate of regular property tax
levies that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent
of the true and fair value of any property, then the levies imposed under RCW
84.34.230, 84.52.105, and any portion of the levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069
that is in excess of thirty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value, shall
be reduced on a pro rata basis until the combined rate no longer exceeds one
percent of the true and fair value of any property or shall be eliminated; and
(((c))) (d) if the combined rate of regular property tax levies
that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the
true and fair value of any property, then the thirty cents per thousand dollars
of assessed value of tax levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 shall be reduced
until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair
value of any property or eliminated.

(2)
The certified rates of tax levy subject to these limitations by cities
levying under section 1 of this act and by all junior taxing districts
imposing taxes on such property shall be reduced or eliminated as follows to
bring the consolidated levy of taxes on such property within the provisions of
these limitations:

(a)
First, the levy of a city under section 1 of this act shall be reduced or
eliminated;

(b)
Second, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations,
the certified property tax levy rates of those junior taxing districts
authorized under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, and 67.38.130 shall be reduced on a
pro rata basis or eliminated;

(((b)
Second)) (c) Third, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds
these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of flood control zone
districts shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;

(((c)
Third)) (d) Fourth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds
these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of all other junior
taxing districts, other than fire protection districts, library districts, the
first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan
park districts, and the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levies for public hospital districts, shall be reduced on a pro rata
basis or eliminated;

(((d)
Fourth)) (e) Fifth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds
these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized to fire
protection districts under RCW 52.16.140 and 52.16.160 shall be reduced on a
pro rata basis or eliminated; and

(((e)
Fifth)) (f) Sixth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds
these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized for fire
protection districts under RCW 52.16.130, library districts, metropolitan park
districts under their first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed
valuation levy, and public hospital districts under their first fifty cent per
thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, shall be reduced on a pro rata
basis or eliminated.

In
determining whether the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property, that is
subject to the limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations
provided in that section, the assessor shall use the hypothetical state levy,
as apportioned to the county under RCW 84.48.080, that was computed under RCW
84.48.080 without regard to the reduction under RCW 84.55.012.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 35 RCW.

---
END ---