BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that maintaining the purity of the state's public water
systems is critical to the health and safety of the public and the environment,
and that prohibiting any additives that compromise that purity is good public
policy. The legislature further finds that ingesting fluoride through water
fluoridation imposes dangers on the public and on wildlife that are not widely
understood. Some studies have found that fluoride accumulation in bones over
time can cause increased susceptibility to osteoporosis, while other studies
have linked fluoride to increased incidences of cancer, damage to the human
immune system, worsening of arthritis, and dental fluorosis in children. The
legislature declares that fluoride additives to water are toxic and that an
immediate moratorium be placed on adding any fluoride to additional public
water systems.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.119A.060 and 1995 c 376 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In order to assure safe and reliable public drinking water and to protect the
public health, public water systems shall:

(a)
Protect the water sources used for drinking water, including imposing a
moratorium on fluoridation in any form in public water systems that do not
currently have fluoride additives;

(b)
Provide treatment adequate to assure that the public health is protected;

(c)
Provide and effectively operate and maintain public water system facilities;

(d)
Plan for future growth and assure the availability of safe and reliable drinking
water;

(e)
Provide the department with the current names, addresses, and telephone numbers
of the owners, operators, and emergency contact persons for the system,
including any changes to this information, and provide to users the name and
twenty-four hour telephone number of an emergency contact person; and

(f)
Take whatever investigative or corrective action is necessary to assure that a
safe and reliable drinking water supply is continuously available to users.

(2)
No new public water system may be approved or created unless: (a) It is owned
or operated by a satellite system management agency established under RCW
70.116.134 and the satellite system management system complies with financial
viability requirements of the department; or (b) a satellite management system
is not available and it is determined that the new system has sufficient
management and financial resources to provide safe and reliable service. The
approval of any new system that is not owned by a satellite system management
agency shall be conditioned upon future management or ownership by a satellite
system management agency, if such management or ownership can be made with
reasonable economy and efficiency, or upon periodic review of the system's
operational history to determine its ability to meet the department's financial
viability and other operating requirements. The department and local health
jurisdictions shall enforce this requirement under authority provided under
this chapter, chapter 70.116, or 70.05 RCW, or other authority governing the
approval of new water systems by the department or a local jurisdiction.

(3) The department and local health jurisdictions shall carry out
the rules and regulations of the state board of health adopted pursuant to RCW
43.20.050(2)(a) and other rules adopted by the department relating to public
water systems.

---
END ---