BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28A.525.168 and 1990 c 33 s 458 are each amended to read as follows:

After January 1, 1998, whenever the voters of a school
district authorize the issuance of bonds and/or the levying of excess taxes in
an amount sufficient to meet the requirements of RCW 28A.525.162 respecting
eligibility for state assistance in providing school facilities, the taxable
valuation of the district and the percentage of state assistance in providing
school facilities prevailing at the time of such authorization shall be the
valuation and the percentage used for the purpose of determining the eligibility
of the district for an allotment of state funds and the amount or amounts of
such allotments, respectively, for all projects for which the voters authorize
capital funds as aforesaid, unless a higher percentage of state assistance
prevails during the preceding calendar year or on the date that state
funds for assistance in financing a project are allotted by the state board of
education in which case the percentage prevailing on the date of allotment by
the state board of funds for each project shall govern: PROVIDED, That if the
state board of education determines at any time that there has been undue or
unwarranted delay on the part of school district authorities in advancing a
project to the point of readiness for an allotment of state funds, the taxable
valuation of the school district and the percentage of state assistance
prevailing on the date that the allotment is made shall be used for the
purposes aforesaid: PROVIDED, FURTHER, That the date herein specified as
applicable in determining the eligibility of an individual school district for
state assistance and in determining the amount of such assistance shall be
applicable also to cases where it is necessary in administering chapter 28A.540
RCW to determine eligibility for and the amount of state assistance for a group
of school districts considered as a single school administrative unit.

---
END ---