BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the intent of the legislature to recognize the dedication of the men and women
of Washington state who served or were wounded, killed, or missing in action
during World War II by making a contribution towards the construction of a
national World War II memorial to be located in Washington, D.C. The national
World War II memorial will be the first national memorial dedicated to all who
served during World War II. All military veterans of the war, the citizens on
the home front, the nation at-large, and the high moral purpose and idealism
that motivated the nation's call to arms will be honored with this memorial.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 73.40 RCW to read as follows:

The national World War II memorial account is created in the
custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from appropriations and other
sources must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may
be used only for the national World War II memorial in Washington, D.C. Only
the director of the department of veterans' affairs or the director's designee
may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to
allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.

---
END ---