BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
84.34.020 and 1998 c 320 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is required by the context:

(1)
"Open space land" means (a) any land area so designated by an
official comprehensive land use plan adopted by any city or county and zoned
accordingly, or (b) any land area, the preservation of which in its present use
would (i) conserve and enhance natural or scenic resources, or (ii) protect
streams or water supply, or (iii) promote conservation of soils, wetlands,
beaches or tidal marshes, or (iv) enhance the value to the public of abutting
or neighboring parks, forests, wildlife preserves, nature reservations or
sanctuaries or other open space, or (v) enhance recreation opportunities, or
(vi) preserve historic sites, or (vii) preserve visual quality along highway,
road, and street corridors or scenic vistas, or (viii) retain in its natural
state tracts of land not less than one acre situated in an urban area and open
to public use on such conditions as may be reasonably required by the
legislative body granting the open space classification, or (ix) protect or
enhance aquatic habitat, or (c) any land meeting the definition of farm and
agricultural conservation land under subsection (8) of this section, or (d)
any shoreland area, as defined in RCW 90.58.030, that has no dwellings and that
is used in a manner that will protect or enhance aquatic habitat as certified
by the department of wildlife or a conservation district. As a condition
of granting open space classification, the legislative body may not require
public access on land classified under (b)(iii) of this subsection for the
purpose of promoting conservation of wetlands.

(2)
"Farm and agricultural land" means:

(a)
Any parcel of land that is twenty or more acres or multiple parcels of land
that are contiguous and total twenty or more acres:

(i)
Devoted primarily to the production of livestock or agricultural commodities
for commercial purposes;

(ii)
Enrolled in the federal conservation reserve program or its successor
administered by the United States department of agriculture; or

(iii)
Other similar commercial activities as may be established by rule;

(b)
Any parcel of land that is five acres or more but less than twenty acres
devoted primarily to agricultural uses, which has produced a gross income from
agricultural uses equivalent to, as of January 1, 1993:

(i)
One hundred dollars or more per acre per year for three of the five calendar
years preceding the date of application for classification under this chapter
for all parcels of land that are classified under this subsection or all
parcels of land for which an application for classification under this
subsection is made with the granting authority prior to January 1, 1993; and

(ii)
On or after January 1, 1993, two hundred dollars or more per acre per year for
three of the five calendar years preceding the date of application for
classification under this chapter;

(c)
Any parcel of land of less than five acres devoted primarily to agricultural
uses which has produced a gross income as of January 1, 1993, of:

(i)
One thousand dollars or more per year for three of the five calendar years preceding
the date of application for classification under this chapter for all parcels
of land that are classified under this subsection or all parcels of land for
which an application for classification under this subsection is made with the
granting authority prior to January 1, 1993; and

(ii)
On or after January 1, 1993, fifteen hundred dollars or more per year for three
of the five calendar years preceding the date of application for classification
under this chapter.

Parcels
of land described in (b)(i) and (c)(i) of this subsection shall, upon any
transfer of the property excluding a transfer to a surviving spouse, be subject
to the limits of (b)(ii) and (c)(ii) of this subsection.

Agricultural
lands shall also include such incidental uses as are compatible with
agricultural purposes, including wetlands preservation, provided such
incidental use does not exceed twenty percent of the classified land and the
land on which appurtenances necessary to the production, preparation, or sale
of the agricultural products exist in conjunction with the lands producing such
products. Agricultural lands shall also include any parcel of land of one to
five acres, which is not contiguous, but which otherwise constitutes an
integral part of farming operations being conducted on land qualifying under
this section as "farm and agricultural lands"; or

(d)
The land on which housing for employees and the principal place of residence of
the farm operator or owner of land classified pursuant to (a) of this
subsection is sited if: The housing or residence is on or contiguous to the
classified parcel; and the use of the housing or the residence is integral to
the use of the classified land for agricultural purposes.

(3)
"Timber land" means any parcel of land that is five or more acres or
multiple parcels of land that are contiguous and total five or more acres which
is or are devoted primarily to the growth and harvest of forest crops for
commercial purposes. A timber management plan shall be filed with the county
legislative authority at the time (a) an application is made for classification
as timber land pursuant to this chapter or (b) when a sale or transfer of
timber land occurs and a notice of classification continuance is signed.
Timber land means the land only.

(4)
"Current" or "currently" means as of the date on which
property is to be listed and valued by the assessor.

(5)
"Owner" means the party or parties having the fee interest in land,
except that where land is subject to real estate contract "owner"
shall mean the contract vendee.

(6)
"Contiguous" means land adjoining and touching other property held by
the same ownership. Land divided by a public road, but otherwise an integral
part of a farming operation, shall be considered contiguous.

(7)
"Granting authority" means the appropriate agency or official who
acts on an application for classification of land pursuant to this chapter.

(8)
"Farm and agricultural conservation land" means either:

(a)
Land that was previously classified under subsection (2) of this section, that
no longer meets the criteria of subsection (2) of this section, and that is
reclassified under subsection (1) of this section; or

(b) Land that is traditional farmland that is not classified under
chapter 84.33 or 84.34 RCW, that has not been irrevocably devoted to a use
inconsistent with agricultural uses, and that has a high potential for
returning to commercial agriculture.

Sec.
2. RCW
84.34.055 and 1994 c 264 s 76 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The county legislative authority may direct the county planning commission to
set open space priorities and adopt, after a public hearing, an open space plan
and public benefit rating system for the county. The plan shall consist of
criteria for determining eligibility of lands, the process for establishing a
public benefit rating system, and an assessed valuation schedule. Criteria
for determining eligibility of land shall include aquatic habitat protection
and enhancement, and in determining eligibility of land under this criteria,
the lack of eligibility under other criteria shall not be considered. The
assessed valuation schedule shall be developed by the county assessor and shall
be a percentage of market value based upon the public benefit rating system.
The open space plan, the public benefit rating system, and the assessed
valuations schedule shall not be effective until approved by the county
legislative authority after at least one public hearing: PROVIDED, That any
county which has complied with the procedural requisites of chapter 393, Laws
of 1985, prior to July 28, 1985, need not repeat those procedures in order to
adopt an open space plan pursuant to chapter 393, Laws of 1985.

(2)
In adopting an open space plan, recognized sources shall be used unless the
county does its own survey of important open space priorities or features, or
both. Recognized sources include but are not limited to the natural heritage
data base; the state office of historic preservation; the interagency committee
for outdoor recreation inventory of dry accretion beach and shoreline features;
state, national, county, or city registers of historic places; the shoreline
master program; or studies by the parks and recreation commission and by the
departments of fish and wildlife and natural resources. Features and sites may
be verified by an outside expert in the field and approved by the appropriate
state or local agency to be sent to the county legislative authority for final
approval as open space.

(3)
When the county open space plan is adopted, owners of open space lands then
classified under this chapter shall be notified in the same manner as is
provided in RCW 84.40.045 of their new assessed value. These lands may be
removed from classification, upon request of owner, without penalty within
thirty days of notification of value.

(4) The open space plan and public benefit rating system under this
section may be adopted for taxes payable in 1986 and thereafter.

---
END ---