BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the practice of harvesting roe from threatened or
endangered salmon and steelhead occurs, and that the survival of some stocks of
anadromous fish may be jeopardized by this activity.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 77.15 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Roe harvesting is the practice of catching a threatened or endangered female anadromous
salmon or steelhead, removing and retaining the eggs, and discarding the
carcass.

(2)
It is unlawful to practice roe harvesting.

(3) A violation of this section is a class C felony.

---
END ---