BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that protection of threatened and endangered species requires
review of state and local land use planning efforts. The governor's salmon
plan addresses this issue by relying on updates of the state shoreline master
plan guidelines, local shoreline master plans, and updates to critical areas
ordinances. While the shoreline management act and the growth management act
form the legal foundation for these actions, federal agencies may be heavily
involved in developing specific solutions for species protection. The
legislature finds that conflicts may arise from local government and state
agency efforts to coordinate requirements under the shoreline management act
and the growth management act with the federal endangered species act. These
conflicts should appropriately be reviewed by the legislature.

The
legislature further finds that incentives may be appropriate to enhance
protection of critical habitat for fish and wildlife species.

Therefore,
the legislature finds that there is a need to evaluate the effectiveness and
efficiency of state and local land use planning protecting threatened and
endangered species and to delay rule making for rules that will have an adverse
affect on local government budgets for a period of one year beginning on the
effective date of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 90.58 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The joint task force on shoreline planning is created to consist of the
following twenty-seven members or their designees:

(a)
The following eight members of the house of representatives: (i) The co-chairs
of the committee on appropriations; (ii) the co-chairs of the committee on
local government; (iii) the co-chairs of the committee on natural resources;
and (iv) the co-chairs of the committee on agriculture and ecology;

(b)
The following eight members of the senate: (i) The chair and ranking minority
of the committee on ways and means; (ii) the chair and ranking minority of the
committee on state and local government; (iii) the chair and ranking minority
of the committee on natural resources; and (iv) the chair and ranking minority
of the committee on water resources;

(c)
Three members shall be appointed by the governor, representing the citizens of
the state;

(d)
Two members shall be appointed by the association of Washington cities;

(e)
Two members shall be appointed by the Washington state association of counties;

(f)
Two members shall be appointed by the governor from nominations by environmental
groups;

(g)
Two members shall be appointed by the governor from nominations by the business
community.

(2)
The nonlegislative members of the task force on shoreline planning shall serve
without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided
in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Legislative members of the joint task force on
shoreline planning shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW
44.04.120. The staff of senate committee services and the office of program
research of the house of representatives shall provide administrative and
clerical assistance to the joint task force on shoreline planning.

(3)
The joint task force on shoreline planning shall be co-chaired by one senator,
chosen by the task force, and one state representative, chosen by the task
force, from opposite parties. A quorum for any meeting or hearing shall be six
members. The co-chairs may appoint experts and advisors as nonvoting members
of the joint task force on shoreline planning to provide input on various
subjects. Any final findings, conclusions, or recommendations of the joint
task force on shoreline planning must be agreed to by at least eight members,
however, minority findings, conclusions, or recommendations may be included that
are submitted by any member or group of members. The open public meetings act
shall apply to all meetings and hearings of the joint task force on shoreline
planning. Rules of procedure shall be established at the first meeting of the
joint task force on shoreline planning.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 90.58 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The joint task force on shoreline planning shall review and make
recommendations for legislation and policy regarding: (a) The use of the
shoreline management act planning and permitting process to establish the
measures necessary and appropriate to avoid harm to and protect and preserve
threatened and endangered species and their habitat while preserving economic growth
and development; (b) the integration of multiple land use laws, planning
activities, and permitting systems to enhance the efficiency and effectiveness
of regulatory programs for public and private property owners and lessen the
costs associated with measures necessary and appropriate to avoid harm to and
to protect and preserve fish and wildlife species and their habitat; (c) an
accurate evaluation of the immediate and ongoing costs to local governments of
implementing revised guidelines; (d) identification of necessary funding for
local governments to implement such changes as may be recommended; (e)
regulatory flexibility that allows shoreline planning to reflect the value and
use of habitat, geographic and economic diversity, existing patterns of development,
and individual community circumstances and concerns; (f) mechanisms for
prioritizing shoreline regulation to focus on areas where there is a
demonstrated need for added protection; (g) incentives for landowners and local
governments to enhance protection of shorelines; and (h) opportunities for the
development of programmatic approaches for permitting programs.

(2)
The joint task force on shoreline planning shall coordinate, to the extent
possible, with the national marine fisheries service and the United States fish
and wildlife service to ensure that species protection provided under the
shoreline management act meets federal protection requirements under the
endangered species act.

(3)
The joint task force on shoreline planning shall commence July 1, 2000,
periodically report its findings and any recommendations to the legislature,
and present a final report and a legislative bill addressing the
recommendations of the joint task force on shoreline planning to the
legislature by December 31, 2001.

Sec.
4. RCW
90.58.060 and 1995 c 347 s 304 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall periodically review and adopt guidelines consistent with
RCW 90.58.020, containing the elements specified in RCW 90.58.100 for:

(a)
Development of master programs for regulation of the uses of shorelines; and

(b)
Development of master programs for regulation of the uses of shorelines of
state-wide significance.

(2)
Before adopting or amending guidelines under this section, the department shall
provide an opportunity for public review and comment as follows:

(a)
The department shall mail copies of the proposal to all cities, counties, and
federally recognized Indian tribes, and to any other person who has requested a
copy, and shall publish the proposed guidelines in the Washington state
register. Comments shall be submitted in writing to the department within
sixty days from the date the proposal has been published in the register.

(b)
The department shall hold at least four public hearings on the proposal in
different locations throughout the state to provide a reasonable opportunity
for residents in all parts of the state to present statements and views on the
proposed guidelines. Notice of the hearings shall be published at least once
in each of the three weeks immediately preceding the hearing in one or more
newspapers of general circulation in each county of the state. If an amendment
to the guidelines addresses an issue limited to one geographic area, the number
and location of hearings may be adjusted consistent with the intent of this
subsection to assure all parties a reasonable opportunity to comment on the
proposed amendment. The department shall accept written comments on the
proposal during the sixty-day public comment period and for seven days after
the final public hearing.

(c)
At the conclusion of the public comment period, the department shall review the
comments received and modify the proposal consistent with the provisions of
this chapter. The proposal shall then be published for adoption pursuant to
the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.

(3)
The department may propose amendments to the guidelines not more than once each
year. At least once every ((five)) seven years the department
shall conduct a review of the guidelines pursuant to the procedures outlined in
subsection (2) of this section.

Sec.
5. RCW
90.58.080 and 1995 c 347 s 305 are each amended to read as follows:

Local
governments shall develop or amend, within ((twenty-four)) sixty
months after the adoption of guidelines as provided in RCW 90.58.060, a master
program for regulation of uses of the shorelines of the state consistent with
the required elements of the guidelines adopted by the department.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. A
new section is added to chapter 90.58 RCW to read as follows:

The
department of ecology shall not propose or adopt any rule or engage in any
programmatic activity for the programs authorized under this chapter for a
period of one year from the effective date of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 1 through 3 and 6 of this act expire December 31, 2001.

---
END ---