BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
39.12.020 and 1989 c 12 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the hourly wages to
be paid to laborers, workers, or mechanics, upon all public works and under all
public building service maintenance contracts of the state or any county,
municipality or political subdivision created by its laws, shall be not less
than the prevailing rate of wage for an hour's work in the same trade or
occupation in the locality within the state where such labor is performed.

(2)
For a contract in excess of ten thousand dollars, a contractor required to pay
the prevailing rate of wage shall post in a location readily visible to workers
at the job site: PROVIDED, That on road construction, sewer line, pipeline,
transmission line, street, or alley improvement projects for which no field
office is needed or established, a contractor may post the prevailing rate of
wage statement at the contractor's local office, gravel crushing, concrete, or
asphalt batch plant as long as the contractor provides a copy of the wage
statement to any employee on request:

(((1)))
(a) A copy of a statement of intent to pay prevailing wages approved by
the industrial statistician of the department of labor and industries under RCW
39.12.040; and

(((2)))
(b) The address and telephone number of the industrial statistician of
the department of labor and industries where a complaint or inquiry concerning
prevailing wages may be made.

(3)
This chapter shall not apply to:

(a)
Workers or other persons regularly employed on monthly or per diem salary
by the state, or any county, municipality, or political subdivision created by
its laws; or

(b) Workers or other persons employed on federally funded
projects subject to the federal prevailing wage laws.

---
END ---