BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
39.12.010 and 1989 c 12 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The "prevailing rate of wage", for the intents and purposes of this
chapter, shall be the rate of hourly wage, usual benefits, and overtime paid in
the locality, as hereinafter defined, to the majority of workers, laborers, or
mechanics, in the same trade or occupation. In the event that there is not a
majority in the same trade or occupation paid at the same rate, then the
average rate of hourly wage and overtime paid to such laborers, workers, or
mechanics in the same trade or occupation shall be the prevailing rate. If the
wage paid by any contractor or subcontractor to laborers, workers, or mechanics
on any public work is based on some period of time other than an hour, the
hourly wage for the purposes of this chapter shall be mathematically determined
by the number of hours worked in such period of time.

(2)
The "locality" for the purposes of this chapter shall be the ((largest
city in the)) county wherein the physical work is being performed.

(3)
The "usual benefits" for the purposes of this chapter shall include
the amount of:

(a)
The rate of contribution irrevocably made by a contractor or subcontractor to a
trustee or to a third person pursuant to a fund, plan, or program; and

(b)
The rate of costs to the contractor or subcontractor which may be reasonably
anticipated in providing benefits to workers, laborers, and mechanics pursuant
to an enforcible commitment to carry out a financially responsible plan or
program which was communicated in writing to the workers, laborers, and
mechanics affected, for medical or hospital care, pensions on retirement or
death, compensation for injuries or illness resulting from occupational
activity, or insurance to provide any of the foregoing, for unemployment
benefits, life insurance, disability and sickness insurance, or accident
insurance, for vacation and holiday pay, for defraying costs of apprenticeship
or other similar programs, or for other bona fide fringe benefits, but only
where the contractor or subcontractor is not required by other federal, state,
or local law to provide any of such benefits.

(4) An "interested party" for the purposes of this
chapter shall include a contractor, subcontractor, an employee of a contractor
or subcontractor, an organization whose members' wages, benefits, and conditions
of employment are affected by this chapter, and the director of labor and
industries or the director's designee.

---
END ---