BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.06.010 and 1994 c 223 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

In
addition to those prescribed by the Constitution, the governor may exercise the
powers and perform the duties prescribed in this and the following sections:

(1)
The governor shall supervise the conduct of all executive and ministerial
offices;

(2)
The governor shall see that all offices are filled, including as provided in
RCW 42.12.070, and the duties thereof performed, or in default thereof, apply
such remedy as the law allows; and if the remedy is imperfect, acquaint the
legislature therewith at its next session;

(3)
The governor shall make the appointments and supply the vacancies mentioned in
this title;

(4)
The governor is the sole official organ of communication between the government
of this state and the government of any other state or territory, or of the
United States;

(5)
Whenever any suit or legal proceeding is pending against this state, or which
may affect the title of this state to any property, or which may result in any
claim against the state, the governor may direct the attorney general to appear
on behalf of the state, and report the same to the governor, or to any grand
jury designated by the governor, or to the legislature when next in session;

(6)
The governor may require the attorney general or any prosecuting attorney to
inquire into the affairs or management of any corporation existing under the
laws of this state, or doing business in this state, and report the same to the
governor, or to any grand jury designated by the governor, or to the
legislature when next in session;

(7)
The governor may require the attorney general to aid any prosecuting attorney
in the discharge of the prosecutor's duties;

(8)
The governor may offer rewards, not exceeding one thousand dollars in each
case, payable out of the state treasury, for information leading to the
apprehension of any person convicted of a felony who has escaped from a state
correctional institution or for information leading to the arrest of any person
who has committed or is charged with the commission of a felony;

(9)
The governor shall perform such duties respecting fugitives from justice as are
prescribed by law;

(10)
The governor shall issue and transmit election proclamations as prescribed by
law;

(11)
The governor may require any officer or board to make, upon demand, special
reports to the governor, in writing;

(12)(a)
The governor may, after finding that a public disorder, disaster, energy
emergency, or riot exists within this state or any part thereof which affects
life, health, property, or the public peace, proclaim a state of emergency in
the area affected, and the powers granted the governor during a state of
emergency shall be effective only within the area described in the
proclamation;

(b)
The governor may after finding that a county has suffered a budget reduction of
forty percent or more from the previous budget year and that this reduction may
cause adverse affects to life, health, property, or the public peace, proclaim
a state of administrative emergency in the affected county, and the powers
granted the governor during a state of administrative emergency are effective
only within the county and for the time period described in the proclamation.
Under the governor's powers of administrative emergency the governor may make,
amend, or rescind the necessary orders, rules, and regulations of all executive
agencies and offices.

(13)
The governor may, after finding that there exists within this state an imminent
danger of infestation of plant pests as defined in RCW 17.24.007 or plant
diseases which seriously endangers the agricultural or horticultural industries
of the state of Washington, or which seriously threatens life, health, or
economic well-being, order emergency measures to prevent or abate the
infestation or disease situation, which measures, after thorough evaluation of
all other alternatives, may include the aerial application of pesticides;

(14)
On all compacts forwarded to the governor pursuant to RCW 9.46.360(6), the
governor is authorized and empowered to execute on behalf of the state compacts
with federally recognized Indian tribes in the state of Washington pursuant to
the federal Indian Gaming Regulatory Act, 25 U.S.C. Sec. 2701 et seq., for
conducting class III gaming, as defined in the Act, on Indian lands.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---