BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.44.037 and 1991 c 143 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Notwithstanding
the provisions of RCW 46.44.036 and subject to such rules and regulations
governing their operation as may be adopted by the state department of
transportation, operation of the following combinations is lawful:

(1)
A combination consisting of a truck tractor, a semitrailer, and another
semitrailer or a full trailer. In this combination a converter gear used to
convert a semitrailer into a full trailer shall be considered to be a part of
the full trailer and not a separate vehicle. A converter gear being pulled
without load and not used to convert a semitrailer into a full trailer may be
substituted in lieu of a full trailer or a semitrailer in any lawful combination;

(2)
A combination not exceeding seventy-five feet in overall length consisting of
four trucks or truck tractors used in driveaway service where three of the
vehicles are towed by the fourth in triple saddlemount position;

(3)
A combination consisting of a truck tractor carrying a freight compartment no
longer than eight feet, a semitrailer, and another semitrailer or full trailer
that meets the legal length requirement for a truck and trailer combination set
forth in RCW 46.44.030;

(4) A combination consisting of a motor vehicle weighing more
than four thousand pounds unladen, a travel trailer not exceeding twenty-two
feet in length, and a trailer designed for hauling a boat with a maximum gross
weight of one thousand pounds. The vehicles in combination must not exceed
sixty-five feet in length and must have a braking capacity in excess of the
gross weight of the combination. The trailers must be connected by hitches
designed and attached in such a manner to be capable of towing the gross weight
of the trailer(s) in tow.

---
END ---