BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
39.12.030 and 1989 c 12 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

The
specifications for every contract for the construction, reconstruction,
maintenance or repair of any public work to which the state or any county,
municipality, or political subdivision created by its laws is a party, shall
contain a provision stating the hourly minimum rate of wage, not less than the
prevailing rate of wage, except as provided in RCW 39.12.040(3), which
may be paid to laborers, workers, or mechanics in each trade or occupation
required for such public work employed in the performance of the contract
either by the contractor, subcontractor or other person doing or contracting to
do the whole or any part of the work contemplated by the contract, and the
contract shall contain a stipulation that such laborers, workers, or mechanics
shall be paid not less than such specified hourly minimum rate of wage.

Sec.
2. RCW
39.12.040 and 1991 c 15 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, before payment is made by
or on behalf of the state, or any county, municipality, or political
subdivision created by its laws, of any sum or sums due on account of a public
works contract, it shall be the duty of the officer or person charged with the
custody and disbursement of public funds to require the contractor and each and
every subcontractor from the contractor or a subcontractor to submit to such
officer a "Statement of Intent to Pay Prevailing Wages". For a
contract in excess of ten thousand dollars, the statement of intent to pay
prevailing wages shall include:

(a)
The contractor's registration certificate number; and

(b)
The prevailing rate of wage for each classification of workers entitled to
prevailing wages under RCW 39.12.020 and the estimated number of workers in
each classification.

Each
statement of intent to pay prevailing wages must be approved by the industrial
statistician of the department of labor and industries before it is submitted
to said officer. Unless otherwise authorized by the department of labor and
industries, each voucher claim submitted by a contractor for payment on a
project estimate shall state that the prevailing wages have been paid in
accordance with the prefiled statement or statements of intent to pay
prevailing wages on file with the public agency. Following the final
acceptance of a public works project, it shall be the duty of the officer
charged with the disbursement of public funds, to require the contractor and
each and every subcontractor from the contractor or a subcontractor to submit
to such officer an "Affidavit of Wages Paid" before the funds
retained according to the provisions of RCW 60.28.010 are released to the
contractor. Each affidavit of wages paid must be certified by the industrial
statistician of the department of labor and industries before it is submitted
to said officer.

(2)
As an alternate to the procedures provided for in subsection (1) of this
section, for public works projects of two thousand five hundred dollars or
less:

(a)
An awarding agency may authorize the contractor or subcontractor to submit the
statement of intent to pay prevailing wages directly to the officer or person
charged with the custody or disbursement of public funds in the awarding agency
without approval by the industrial statistician of the department of labor and
industries. The awarding agency shall retain such statement of intent to pay
prevailing wages for a period of not less than three years.

(b)
Upon final acceptance of the public works project, the awarding agency shall
require the contractor or subcontractor to submit an affidavit of wages paid.
Upon receipt of the affidavit of wages paid, the awarding agency may pay the
contractor or subcontractor in full, including funds that would otherwise be
retained according to the provisions of RCW 60.28.010. Within thirty days of
receipt of the affidavit of wages paid, the awarding agency shall submit the
affidavit of wages paid to the industrial statistician of the department of
labor and industries for approval.

(c)
A statement of intent to pay prevailing wages and an affidavit of wages paid
shall be on forms approved by the department of labor and industries.

(d)
In the event of a wage claim and a finding for the claimant by the department
of labor and industries where the awarding agency has used the alternative
process provided for in subsection (2) of this section, the awarding agency
shall pay the wages due directly to the claimant. If the contractor or
subcontractor did not pay the wages stated in the affidavit of wages paid, the
awarding agency may take action at law to seek reimbursement from the
contractor or subcontractor of wages paid to the claimant, and may prohibit the
contractor or subcontractor from bidding on any public works contract of the
awarding agency for up to one year.

(e)
Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to allow an awarding agency to
subdivide any public works project of more than two thousand five hundred
dollars for the purpose of circumventing the procedures required by RCW
39.12.040(1).

(3) In cities of populations not exceeding five thousand, no
statement of intent to pay prevailing wages is required when the work to be
performed on behalf of the city is contracted through the small works roster.

---
END ---