BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes that significant new developments will increase burdens
on state transportation systems and facilities. In order to improve the
operating efficiency of state transportation systems and facilities, RCW
36.70A.070 requires that concurrent transportation improvements or strategies
be made to accommodate the impacts of new development. The financial burdens
of maintaining existing regional transportation facilities and creating capital
improvements necessitated by new development must be borne equitably, in a
proportional manner by developers, local governments, and the state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. Local
governments that are currently responsible for ensuring that development
proposals are consistent with local comprehensive plans and regional
transportation plans, shall notify the department of transportation regarding
any substantial development proposal that, if approved, would impact
state-owned and operated transportation facilities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. As
used in this chapter, "substantial development proposals" include,
but are not limited to, the siting of industrial parks, shopping malls and
other retail centers, large residential complexes, sports arenas, entertainment
facilities, and convention centers.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
department shall make an assessment of substantial development proposals for
regional impacts they may have on state-owned and operated transportation
facilities. If the department determines that the substantial development
proposal will impact state-owned and operated transportation facilities, the
department shall recommend to the appropriate local governments, in
consultation with the relevant regional transportation planning organizations,
a fee that must be assessed by the local government upon the developer to
defray the cost of mitigating regional impacts to state-owned and operated
transportation facilities. The amount of this suggested fee must not exceed
the amount that the department can demonstrate is reasonably necessary as a
direct result of the proposed development. The amount of this suggested fee
must reflect a proportional share of the costs of system improvements that are
reasonably related to the new development, and will reasonably benefit, the new
development. When assessing mitigation fees, local governments shall also
impose the department's suggested fee.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5.
Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 47 RCW.

---
END ---