BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
47.06.140 and 1998 c 171 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature declares the following transportation facilities and services to be
of state-wide significance: The interstate highway system excluding on and
off-ramps, interregional state principal arterials including ferry
connections that serve state-wide travel, intercity passenger rail services,
intercity high-speed ground transportation, major passenger intermodal
terminals excluding all airport facilities and services, the freight railroad
system, the Columbia/Snake navigable river system, marine port facilities and
services that are related solely to marine activities affecting international
and interstate trade, and high-capacity transportation systems serving regions
as defined in RCW 81.104.015. The department, in cooperation with regional
transportation planning organizations, counties, cities, transit agencies,
public ports, private railroad operators, and private transportation providers,
as appropriate, shall plan for improvements to transportation facilities and
services of state-wide significance in the state-wide multimodal plan.
Improvements to facilities and services of state-wide significance identified
in the state-wide multimodal plan are essential state public facilities under
RCW 36.70A.200.

The department of transportation, in consultation with local
governments, shall set level of service standards for state highways and state
ferry routes of state-wide significance. Although the department shall consult
with local governments when setting level of service standards, the department
retains authority to make final decisions regarding level of service standards
for state highways and state ferry routes of state-wide significance. In
establishing level of service standards for state highways and state ferry
routes of state-wide significance, the department shall consider the necessary
balance between providing for the free interjurisdictional movement of people
and goods and the needs of local communities using these facilities.

---
END ---