BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.27.040 and 1997 c 314 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each applicant shall file with the department a surety bond issued by a surety
insurer who meets the requirements of chapter 48.28 RCW in the sum of ((six))
fifteen thousand dollars if the applicant is a general contractor and ((four))
eight thousand dollars if the applicant is a specialty contractor. If
no valid bond is already on file with the department at the time the
application is filed, a bond must accompany the registration application. The
bond shall have the state of Washington named as obligee with good and
sufficient surety in a form to be approved by the department. The bond shall
be continuous and may be canceled by the surety upon the surety giving written
notice to the director of its intent to cancel the bond. A cancellation or revocation
of the bond or withdrawal of the surety from the bond suspends the registration
issued to the registrant until a new bond or reinstatement notice has been
filed and approved as provided in this section. The bond shall be conditioned
that the applicant will pay all persons performing labor, including employee
benefits, for the contractor, will pay all taxes and contributions due to the
state of Washington, and will pay all persons furnishing labor or material or
renting or supplying equipment to the contractor and will pay all amounts that
may be adjudged against the contractor by reason of breach of contract
including negligent or improper work in the conduct of the contracting
business. A change in the name of a business or a change in the type of business
entity shall not impair a bond for the purposes of this section so long as one
of the original applicants for such bond maintains partial ownership in the
business covered by the bond.

(2)
Any contractor registered as of July 1, 1997, who maintains such registration
in accordance with this chapter shall be in compliance with this chapter until
the next annual renewal of the contractor's certificate of registration. At
that time, the contractor shall provide a bond, cash deposit, or other security
deposit as required by this chapter and comply with all of the other provisions
of this chapter before the department shall renew the contractor's certificate
of registration.

(3)
Any person, firm, or corporation having a claim against the contractor for any
of the items referred to in this section may bring suit upon the bond or
deposit in the superior court of the county in which the work was done or of
any county in which jurisdiction of the contractor may be had. The surety
issuing the bond shall be named as a party to any suit upon the bond. Action
upon the bond or deposit shall be commenced by filing the summons and complaint
with the clerk of the appropriate superior court within one year from the date
of expiration of the certificate of registration in force at the time the
claimed labor was performed and benefits accrued, taxes and contributions owing
the state of Washington became due, materials and equipment were furnished, or
the claimed contract work was completed or abandoned. Service of process in an
action against the contractor, the contractor's bond, or the deposit shall be
exclusively by service upon the department. Three copies of the summons and
complaint and a fee of ten dollars to cover the handling costs shall be served
by registered or certified mail upon the department at the time suit is started
and the department shall maintain a record, available for public inspection, of
all suits so commenced. Service is not complete until the department receives
the ten-dollar fee and three copies of the summons and complaint. The service
shall constitute service on the registrant and the surety for suit upon the
bond or deposit and the department shall transmit the summons and complaint or
a copy thereof to the registrant at the address listed in the registrant's
application and to the surety within forty-eight hours after it shall have been
received.

(4)
The surety upon the bond shall not be liable in an aggregate amount in excess
of the amount named in the bond nor for any monetary penalty assessed pursuant
to this chapter for an infraction. The liability of the surety shall not
cumulate where the bond has been renewed, continued, reinstated, reissued,
or otherwise extended. The surety upon the bond may, upon notice to the
department and the parties, tender to the clerk of the court having
jurisdiction of the action an amount equal to the claims thereunder or the
amount of the bond less the amount of judgments, if any, previously satisfied
therefrom and to the extent of such tender the surety upon the bond shall be
exonerated but if the actions commenced and pending at any one time exceed the
amount of the bond then unimpaired, claims shall be satisfied from the bond in
the following order:

(a)
Employee labor and claims of laborers, including employee benefits((;

(b))) and
claims for breach of contract by a party to the construction contract;

(((c)))
(b) Registered or licensed subcontractors, material, and equipment;

(((d)))
(c) Taxes and contributions due the state of Washington;

(((e)))
(d) Any court costs, interest, and ((attorney's)) attorneys'
fees plaintiff may be entitled to recover. The surety is not liable for any
amount in excess of the penal limit of its bond.

A
payment made by the surety in good faith exonerates the bond to the extent of
any payment made by the surety.

(5)
If a final judgment impairs the liability of the surety upon the bond so
furnished that there shall not be in effect a bond undertaking in the full
amount prescribed in this section, the department shall suspend the
registration of the contractor until the bond liability in the required amount
unimpaired by unsatisfied judgment claims is furnished. If the bond becomes
fully impaired, a new bond must be furnished at the rates prescribed by this
section.

(6)
In lieu of the surety bond required by this section the contractor may file
with the department a deposit consisting of cash or other security acceptable
to the department.

(7)
Any person having filed and served a summons and complaint as required by this
section having an unsatisfied final judgment against the registrant for any
items referred to in this section may execute upon the security held by the
department by serving a certified copy of the unsatisfied final judgment by
registered or certified mail upon the department within one year of the date of
entry of such judgment. Upon the receipt of service of such certified copy the
department shall pay or order paid from the deposit, through the registry of
the superior court which rendered judgment, towards the amount of the
unsatisfied judgment. The priority of payment by the department shall be the
order of receipt by the department, but the department shall have no liability
for payment in excess of the amount of the deposit.

(8) The director may adopt rules necessary for the proper
administration of the security.

---
END ---