BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
PURPOSE AND INTENT. The legislature concludes that pyramid
schemes, chain letters, and related schemes constitute a threat to the health,
welfare, and safety of our citizens and their communities. These schemes are
fertile ground for deception and, in the end, can lead to serious financial
loss, destroyed relationships, and breach of the peace. Flexible regulation
resulting in prohibition of such schemes is necessary in order to:

(1)
Protect the unsuspecting citizen from falling prey to these schemes; and

(2)
Ensure certainty for law enforcement and affected agencies, that must protect
our citizens and educate the public on the risks and threats posed by
involvement in these fraudulent schemes and illegal acts.

Therefore,
it is the intent of the legislature to enact a comprehensive prohibition of
pyramid schemes and related activities to protect the public's strong interest
in their eradication and provide for a balance of public and private remedies
to ensure that such schemes do not obtain a foothold in the state of
Washington.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
DEFINITIONS. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Compensation" means payment of money, anything of value, or
financial benefit. Compensation does not include:

(a)
Payment to participants based upon sales of products purchased for actual use
and consumption; or

(b)
Payment to participants under reasonable commercial terms.

(2)
"Consideration" means anything of value including in circumstances
where no bona fide product or service is offered for sale by participants, an
agreement or promise to abide by the plan's rules or policies, except it shall
not include: (a) The purchase of goods or services furnished at cost for use
in making sales, but not for resale; (b) the purchase of products where the
seller offers to repurchase the participant's products under reasonable
commercial terms; or (c) time and effort spent in the pursuit of sales or
recruiting activities.

(3)
"Consumers" are those persons who are not participants in the plan,
and those who are not purchasing in order to participate in the plan.

(4)
"Participant" means a person who contributes anything of value into a
pyramid scheme.

(5)
"Person" means an individual, a corporation, a partnership, or any
association or unincorporated organization.

(6)
"Promote" means:

(a)
To contrive, prepare, establish, plan, operate, advertise, or organize; or

(b)
To induce or attempt to induce other persons to be a participant.

(7)
"Pyramid scheme" means any gift, sales, or marketing plan or
operation, including chain letters and gifting clubs, by whatever means
communicated, that includes the recruitment of additional participants,
regardless of number, to participate in the same or related gift, sales, or
marketing plan or operation, whereby a participant:

(a)
Pays, gives, or promises a consideration of any kind, including anything of
value, or makes an investment of any kind or value; and

(b)
Acquires the chance or opportunity to receive compensation that is derived
primarily from the person's introduction of other persons into the plan or
operation rather than from the sale of goods, services, or other property sold
in bona fide sales to consumers or participants under reasonable commercial
terms.

(8)
"Reasonable commercial terms" means repurchase by the seller, at the
participant's request, and upon termination of the business relationship or
contract with the seller, of all unencumbered products purchased by the
participant from the seller within the previous twelve months that are unused
and in commercially resalable condition, provided that repurchase by the seller
shall be for not less than ninety percent of the actual amount paid by the
participant to the seller of the products, less any consideration received by
the participant for purchase of the products that are being returned. A
product shall not be deemed nonresalable solely because the product is no
longer marketed by the seller, unless it is clearly disclosed to the
participant at the time of the sale, that the product is seasonal,
discontinued, or a special promotional product, and not subject to the
repurchase obligation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
PROMOTING PYRAMID SCHEMES, CHAIN LETTERS, OR RELATED SCHEMES--PROHIBITED AS
ILLEGAL LOTTERIES--PENALTY. Pyramid schemes are deemed illegal lotteries.
Whoever shall participate in any such pyramid scheme by organizing, becoming a
participant of, or affiliating with any such group or organization, or who
shall solicit any person for participation or affiliation in any such group or
organization, shall be deemed to be engaged in professional gambling as defined
in RCW 9.46.0269 and subject to the penalties set forth in chapter 9.46 RCW for
such conduct.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
MISREPRESENTATION OF LEGALITY--INTEGRATED SCHEMES. (1) Any person who, while
participating in any such pyramid scheme, as described in sections 2 and 3 of
this act, misrepresents the legality of such a scheme, or represents that it
has been approved, reviewed, screened by, or in any way sanctioned by any
governmental authority, or misrepresents the benefits attending participation
or the longevity or durability of such a plan or scheme, shall be guilty of a
gross misdemeanor.

(2)
All pyramid schemes offered by the same person, or agents or employees thereof,
or any person controlled by or affiliated with such person, for the same type
of consideration, at substantially the same period of time and for the same
general purpose, shall be deemed to be one integrated pyramid scheme, even
though such pyramid schemes may be given different names or other designations.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. CIVIL
ACTION--CONSUMER PROTECTION VIOLATION. The legislature finds that the
prohibition of pyramid schemes as defined in this chapter are matters vitally
affecting the public interest for purposes of applying the consumer protection
act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this act is not reasonable in relation
to the development and preservation of business. A violation of this act is an
unfair or deceptive act or practice in trade or commerce and an unfair method
of competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter
19.86 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
19.102.010 (Definitions) and 1973 1st ex.s. c 33 s 1; and

(2) RCW
19.102.020 (Chain distributor schemes prohibited--Unfair practice)
and 1973 1st ex.s. c 33 s 2.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7.
Captions used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 1 through 5 and 7 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 9A
RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---