BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 9.46 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Notwithstanding RCW 9.46.070, the commission may not issue any new bingo
licenses under RCW 9.46.070(1) until July 1, 2005.

(2) The commission may allow existing bingo licensees to share
facilities at one location operating six days a week.

---
END ---