BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
66.24.170 and 1997 c 321 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There shall be a license for domestic wineries; fee to be computed only on the
liters manufactured: Less than two hundred fifty thousand liters per year, one
hundred dollars per year; and two hundred fifty thousand liters or more per
year, four hundred dollars per year.

(2)
The license allows for the manufacture of wine in Washington state from grapes
or other agricultural products.

(3)
Any domestic winery licensed under this section may also act as a distributor
and/or retailer of wine of its own production. Any winery operating as a
distributor and/or retailer under this subsection shall comply with the
applicable laws and rules relating to distributors and/or retailers.

(4)
A domestic winery licensed under this section, at locations separate from
any of its production or manufacturing sites, may serve samples of its own
products, with or without charge, and sell wine of its own production at retail
for off-premise consumption, provided that: (a) Each additional location has
been approved by the board under RCW 66.24.010; (b) the total number of
additional locations does not exceed two; and (c) a winery may not act as a
distributor at any such additional location. Each additional location is
deemed to be part of the winery license for the purpose of this title. Nothing
in this subsection shall be construed to prevent a domestic winery from holding
multiple domestic winery licenses.

(5) Wine produced in Washington state by a domestic winery
licensee may be shipped out-of-state for the purpose of making it into
sparkling wine and then returned to such licensee for resale. Such wine shall
be deemed wine manufactured in the state of Washington for the purposes of RCW
66.24.206, and shall not require a special license.

---
END ---