BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that:

(a)
Sport fishing is an enjoyable, healthy, lifelong activity that is enjoyed by
many families;

(b)
Anadromous salmonids are a treasure of the state of Washington that provide
unparalleled sport fishing opportunities;

(c)
Without proper care and consideration, Washington's anadromous salmonids and
their spawning grounds can be unintentionally hurt by sport fishers, with
long-term consequences for the survival of the species;

(d)
Every effort that is made to help preserve the precious resource of anadromous
salmonids in Washington, no matter how small, is important;

(e)
It can often be difficult to distinguish between species of anadromous
salmonids and sport fishers may unintentionally take a scarce fish that is
needed for species protection;

(f)
Catch and release fishing is beneficial to both sport fishers and fish but must
be done properly to prevent harm to the fish;

(g)
The state's fishing laws and rules are useful for preserving our fishing
resources but, without study, can be difficult for sport fishers to locate and
follow;

(h)
There is a need for sport fishers to be educated as to what they can do to
enjoy their sport while helping to preserve the fish and environment;

(i)
It is in the state's best interests to educate sport fishers, young and old;

(j)
It is necessary for the preservation of the species that all young sport
fishers who engage in sport fishing in Washington are educated about anadromous
salmonids; and

(k)
Education and outreach are vital components of a long-term protection and
recovery strategy for the state.

(2)
The legislature therefore declares that all sport fishers should be educated
about identification of anadromous salmonid types, catch and release
techniques, spawning bed and stream bank identification and protection, and the
location and knowledge of fishing rules.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
definitions in this section apply throughout sections 2 and 3 of this act
unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Anadromous salmonid" and its derivatives means any of the following
types of fish: Salmon of any variety, steelhead trout, and searun cutthroat
trout.

(2)
"To fish" and its derivatives means an effort to kill, injure,
harass, or catch a game fish.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
All anglers should be offered a voluntary, state-approved course of instruction
addressing identification of salmon types, catch and release techniques,
spawning bed and stream bank identification and protection, and location and
knowledge of fishing laws and rules.

(2)
The director shall establish a program for training persons in the
identification of:

(a)
Salmon types;

(b)
Catch and release reasoning, equipment, and techniques;

(c)
Spawning bed and stream bank identification and protection; and

(d)
The location and knowledge of fishing laws and rules.

(3)
The director may cooperate with organized fishing or sporting groups and other
public or private organizations in order to administer the program at the
lowest possible cost. The director may apply for funding from alternate
sources, both governmental and nongovernmental, in order to lower the cost of
the program to the participants.

(4)
Upon successful completion of the course, a trainee shall receive a fisher
education certificate signed by an authorized instructor.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4.
Sections 2 and 3 of this act are each added to chapter 77.12 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. The
sum of twenty thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated from the general fund to the department of fish and wildlife for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, to carry out the purposes of this act.

---
END ---