BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
48.18.100 and 1997 c 428 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No insurance policy form other than surety bond forms, forms exempt under RCW
48.18.103, or application form where written application is required and is to
be attached to the policy, or printed life or disability rider or endorsement
form shall be issued, delivered, or used unless it has been filed with and
approved by the commissioner. This section shall not apply to policies, riders
or endorsements of unique character designed for and used with relation to
insurance upon a particular subject.

(2)
Every such filing containing a certification, in a form approved by the
commissioner, by either the chief executive officer of the insurer or by an
actuary who is a member of the American academy of actuaries, attesting that
the filing complies with Title 48 RCW and Title 284 of the Washington
Administrative Code, may be used by such insurer immediately after filing with
the commissioner. The commissioner may order an insurer to cease using a
certified form upon the grounds set forth in RCW 48.18.110. This subsection
shall not apply to certain types of policy forms designated by the commissioner
by rule.

(3)
Except as provided in RCW 48.18.103, every filing that does not contain a
certification pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall be made not less
than thirty days in advance of any such issuance, delivery, or use. At the
expiration of such thirty days the form so filed shall be deemed approved
unless prior thereto it has been affirmatively approved or disapproved by order
of the commissioner. The commissioner may extend by not more than an
additional fifteen days the period within which he or she may so affirmatively
approve or disapprove any such form, by giving notice of such extension before
expiration of the initial thirty-day period. At the expiration of any such
period as so extended, and in the absence of such prior affirmative approval or
disapproval, any such form shall be deemed approved. The commissioner may
withdraw any such approval at any time for cause. By approval of any such form
for immediate use, the commissioner may waive any unexpired portion of such
initial thirty-day waiting period.

(4)
The commissioner's order disapproving any such form or withdrawing a previous
approval shall state the grounds therefor.

(5)
No such form shall knowingly be so issued or delivered as to which the
commissioner's approval does not then exist.

(6)
The commissioner may, by order or rule, exempt from the filing
requirements of this ((section)) chapter for so long as he or she
deems proper, any insurance document or form or type thereof as specified in
such order or rule, to which in his or her opinion the filing
requirements of this ((section)) chapter may not practicably
be applied, or the filing and approval of which are, in his or her opinion, not
desirable or necessary for the protection of the public.

(7) Every member or subscriber to a rating organization shall
adhere to the form filings made on its behalf by the organization. Deviations
from such organization are permitted only when filed with the commissioner in
accordance with this chapter.

---
END ---