BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.16.233 and 1997 c 291 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Except for those license plates issued under RCW 46.16.305(1)
before January 1, 1987, under RCW 46.16.305(3), and to commercial vehicles with
a gross weight in excess of twenty-six thousand pounds, effective with vehicle
registrations due or to become due on January 1, 2001, all vehicle license
plates must be issued on a standard background, as designated by the
department. ((Additionally, to ensure maximum legibility and reflectivity,
the department shall periodically provide for the replacement of license
plates. Frequency of replacement shall be established in accordance with
empirical studies documenting the longevity of the reflective materials used to
make license plates.))

---
END ---