BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
81.104.160 and 1998 c 321 s 35 (Referendum Bill No. 49) are each amended to
read as follows:

(1)
Cities that operate transit systems, county transportation authorities,
metropolitan municipal corporations, public transportation benefit areas, and
regional transit authorities may submit an authorizing proposition to the
voters, and if approved, may levy and collect an excise tax, at a rate approved
by the voters, but not exceeding eighty one-hundredths of one percent on the
value((, under chapter 82.44 RCW,)) of every motor vehicle owned by a
resident of the taxing district, solely for the purpose of providing high
capacity transportation service. In any county imposing a motor vehicle excise
tax surcharge pursuant to RCW 81.100.060, the maximum tax rate under this
section shall be reduced to a rate equal to eighty one-hundredths of one
percent on the value less the equivalent motor vehicle excise tax rate of the surcharge
imposed pursuant to RCW 81.100.060. This rate shall not apply to vehicles
licensed under RCW 46.16.070 except vehicles with an unladen weight of six
thousand pounds or less, RCW 46.16.079, 46.16.085, or 46.16.090. The
department of licensing shall deduct a percentage amount, as provided by
contract, not to exceed two percent of the taxes collected for the
administration and collection expenses incurred by the department.

(2) An agency imposing a tax under subsection (1) of this section
may also impose a sales and use tax solely for the purpose of providing high
capacity transportation service, in addition to the tax authorized by RCW
82.14.030, upon retail car rentals within the agency's jurisdiction that are
taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW. The rate of tax shall
not exceed 2.172 percent. The rate of tax imposed under this subsection shall
bear the same ratio to the 2.172 percent rate authorized that the rate imposed
under subsection (1) of this section bears to the rate authorized under
subsection (1) of this section. The base of the tax shall be the selling price
in the case of a sales tax or the rental value of the vehicle used in the case
of a use tax. The revenue collected under this subsection shall be used in the
same manner as excise taxes under subsection (1) of this section.

---
END ---