BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. 1999
c 309 s 601 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

The
appropriations in sections 603 through 609 of this act are subject to the
following conditions and limitations:

(1)
"Institutions" means the institutions of higher education receiving
appropriations under sections 603 through 609 of this act.

(2)(a)
The salary increases provided or referenced in this subsection shall be the
only allowable salary increases provided at institutions of higher education,
excluding increases associated with normally occurring promotions and increases
related to faculty and professional staff retention, and excluding increases
associated with employees under the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW pursuant
to the provisions of RCW 28B.16.015.

(b)
Each institution of higher education shall provide to each classified staff
employee as defined by the office of financial management a salary increase of
3.0 percent on July 1, 1999, and a salary increase of 3.0 percent on July 1,
2000. The July 1, 2000, salary increase under this subsection shall not be
granted to any employee who is compensated on June 30, 2000, at an annual rate
that exceeds $40,000.

(c)
Each institution of higher education shall provide to instructional and
research faculty, exempt professional staff, academic administrators, academic
librarians, counselors, teaching and research assistants as classified by the
office of financial management, and all other nonclassified staff, including
those employees under RCW 28B.16.015, an average salary increase of 3.0 percent
on July 1, 1999, and an average salary increase of 3.0 percent on July 1,
2000. The July 1, 2000, salary increase under this subsection shall not be
granted to any employee who is compensated on June 30, 2000, at an annual rate
that exceeds $40,000.

(d)
For employees under the jurisdiction of chapter 41.56 RCW pursuant to the
provisions of RCW 28B.16.015, distribution of the salary increases will be in
accordance with the applicable collective bargaining agreement. However, an
increase shall not be provided to any classified employee whose salary is above
the approved salary range maximum for the class to which the employee's
position is allocated.

(e)
Each institution of higher education receiving appropriations under sections
604 through 609 of this act may provide additional salary increases to
instructional and research faculty, exempt professional staff, academic
administrators, academic librarians, counselors, teaching and research
assistants, as classified by the office of financial management, and all other
nonclassified staff, but not including employees under RCW 28B.16.015. Any
salary increase granted under the authority of this subsection (2)(e) shall not
be included in an institution's salary base. It is the intent of the legislature
that general fund--state support for an institution shall not increase during
the current or any future biennium as a result of any salary increases
authorized under this subsection (2)(e).

(f)
Each institution of higher education may also provide additional salary
increases to instructional and research faculty funded from reductions in the
maximum level of employer contributions to retirement plans offered pursuant to
RCW 28B.10.400. Any salary increase granted under the authority of this
subsection (2)(f) shall not be included in an institution's salary base. It is
the intent of the legislature that general fund‑‑state support for
an institution shall not increase during the current or any future biennium as
a result of any salary increases authorized under this subsection (2)(f).

(g)
To collect consistent data for use by the legislature, the office of financial
management, and other state agencies for policy and planning purposes,
institutions of higher education shall report personnel data to be used in the
department of personnel's human resource data warehouse in compliance with
uniform reporting procedures established by the department of personnel.

(h)
Specific salary increases authorized in sections 603 through 609 of this act
are in addition to any salary increase provided in this subsection.

(i)
From the general fund‑‑state appropriations for fiscal year 2001 in
sections 603 through 609 of this act, the office of financial management shall
place in reserve status $17,402,000 to reflect the savings resulting from the
limitation on the July 1, 2000, salary increases in (b) and (c) of this
subsection.

(3)
The tuition fees, as defined in chapter 28B.15 RCW, charged to full-time
students at the state's institutions of higher education for the 1999-00 and
2000-01 academic years, other than the summer term, may be adjusted by the
governing boards of the state universities, regional universities, The
Evergreen State College, and the state board for community and technical
colleges as provided in this subsection.

(a)
For the 1999-00 academic year, the governing boards and the state board may
implement an increase no greater than four and six-tenths percent over tuition
fees charged to full-time students for the 1998-99 academic year.

(b)
For the 2000-01 academic year, the governing boards and the state board may
implement an increase no greater than three and six-tenths percent over the
tuition fees charged to full-time students for the 1999-00 academic year.

(c)
For the 1999-01 biennium, the governing boards and the state board may adjust
full-time operating fees for factors that may include time of day and day of
week, as well as delivery method and campus, to encourage full use of the
state's educational facilities and resources.

(d)
The tuition increases adopted under (a), (b) and (c) of this subsection need
not apply uniformly across student categories as defined in chapter 28B.15 RCW
so long as the increase for each student category does not exceed the
percentages specified in this subsection.

(e)
In addition to waivers granted under the authority of RCW 28B.15.910, the
governing boards and the state board may waive all or a portion of the
operating fees for any student. State general fund appropriations shall not be
provided to replace tuition and fee revenue foregone as a result of waivers
granted under this subsection.

(4)
Pursuant to RCW 43.15.055, institutions of higher education receiving
appropriations under sections 603 through 609 of this act are authorized to
increase summer term tuition in excess of the fiscal growth factor during the
1999-01 biennium. Tuition levels increased pursuant to this subsection shall
not exceed the per credit hour rate calculated from the academic year tuition
levels adopted under this act.

(5)
Community colleges may increase services and activities fee charges in excess
of the fiscal growth factor up to the maximum level authorized in RCW
28B.15.069.

(6)
Each institution receiving appropriations under sections 604 through 609 of
this act shall submit a biennial plan to achieve measurable and specific
improvements each academic year as part of a continuing effort to make
meaningful and substantial progress towards the achievement of the following
long-term performance goals:

Goal

(a)
Undergraduate graduation efficiency index: A

measure
of how efficiently students complete

their
degrees that takes into consideration the

total
number of credits earned, dropped, repeated,

transferred
and required for graduation:

For
students beginning as freshmen 95%

For
transfer students 90%

(b)
Undergraduate student retention: Defined as

a
percentage of all undergraduate students who

return
for the next year at the same institution,

measured
from fall to fall:

Research
universities 95%

Comprehensive
universities and college 90%

(c)
Graduation rates: Defined as the percentage

of an
entering freshman class at each institution

that
graduates within five years:

Research
universities 65%

Comprehensive
universities and college 55%

The
plans, to be prepared at the direction of the higher education coordinating
board, shall be submitted by August 15, 1999. The higher education
coordinating board shall set biennial performance targets for each institution
and shall review actual achievements annually. Institutions shall track their
actual performance on the state-wide measures as well as faculty productivity,
the goals and targets for which may be unique to each institution. A report on
progress towards state-wide and institution-specific goals, with
recommendations for the ensuing biennium, shall be submitted to the fiscal and
higher education committees of the legislature by November 15, 2000.

(7)
The state board for community and technical colleges shall develop a biennial
plan to achieve measurable and specific improvements each academic year as part
of a continuing effort to make meaningful and substantial progress to achieve
the following long-term performance goals:

Goal

(a)
Academic students prepared to transfer

to
baccalaureate institutions based on minimum

transferrable
credit hours and minimum required

grade
point average. 50,000 per year

(b)
Basic skill students who demonstrate

substantive
skill gain as a result of their

adult
basic education (ABE), English as a second

language
(ESL), and general education diploma

(GED)
instruction. 80%

(c)
Students prepared for work as measured

by
vocational degrees and related certificates

awarded,
including achievement of industry

skill
standards. 25,000 per year

The
board shall set biennial performance targets for each college or district,
where appropriate, and shall review actual achievements annually. Colleges
shall track their actual performance on the state-wide measures. A report on
progress towards the state-wide goals, with recommendations for the ensuing
biennium, shall be submitted to the fiscal and higher education committees of
the legislature by November 15, 2000.

(8)
Institutions receiving appropriations under sections 603 through 609 of this
act shall provide enrollment data for students engaged in distance learning to
the office of financial management as part of the distance learning enrollment
information project.

Sec.
2. 1999
c 309 s 723 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:

SALARY
COST OF LIVING ADJUSTMENT

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2000).... $ 33,614,000

General
Fund‑-State Appropriation (FY 2001).... $ ((68,186,000))

50,396,000

General
Fund‑-Federal Appropriation............. $.................................. ((31,436,000))

25,956,000

General
Fund‑-Private/Local Appropriation...... $ ((2,001,000))

1,631,000

Salary
and Insurance Increase Revolving Account

Appropriation.............................. $ ((72,609,000))

59,944,000

TOTAL
APPROPRIATION................. $ ((207,846,000))

171,541,000

The
appropriations in this section shall be expended solely for the purposes
designated in this section and are subject to the following conditions and
limitations:

(1)
In addition to the purposes set forth in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section, appropriations in this section are provided solely for a 3.0 percent
salary increase effective July 1, 1999, and a 3.0 percent salary increase
effective July 1, 2000, for all classified employees, including those employees
in the Washington management service, and exempt employees under the
jurisdiction of the personnel resources board. The July 1, 2000, salary
increase under this subsection shall not be granted to any employee who is
compensated on June 30, 2000, at an annual rate that exceeds $40,000.

(2)
The appropriations in this section are sufficient to fund a 3.0 percent salary
increase effective July 1, 1999, and a 3.0 percent increase effective July 1,
2000, for general government, legislative, and judicial employees exempt from
merit system rules whose maximum salaries are not set by the commission on
salaries for elected officials. The July 1, 2000, salary increase under
this subsection shall not be granted to any employee who is compensated on June
30, 2000, at an annual rate that exceeds $40,000.

(3)
The salary and insurance increase revolving account appropriation in this
section includes funds sufficient to fund a 3.0 percent salary increase
effective July 1, 1999, and a 3.0 percent salary increase effective July 1,
2000, for ferry workers consistent with the 1999-01 transportation
appropriations act. The July 1, 2000, salary increase under this subsection
shall not be granted to any employee who is compensated on June 30, 2000, at an
annual rate that exceeds $40,000.

(4)(a)
No salary increase may be paid under this section to any person whose salary
has been Y-rated pursuant to rules adopted by the personnel resources board.

(b)
The average salary increases paid under this section and section 724 of this
act to agency officials whose maximum salaries are established by the committee
on agency official salaries shall not exceed the average increases provided by
subsection (2) of this section.

(5)
The appropriations in this section include $1,498,000 general fund‑-state
for fiscal year 2000, $1,765,000 general fund‑-state for fiscal year
2001, and a reduction of $3,263,000 general fund‑-federal for the
department of social and health services to adjust employer pension funding
levels to reflect historical fund source ratios.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---