BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
9.41.280 and 1999 c 167 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
It is unlawful for a person to carry onto, or to possess on, public or private
elementary or secondary school premises, school-provided transportation, or
areas of facilities while being used exclusively by public or private schools:

(a)
Any firearm;

(b)
Any other dangerous weapon as defined in RCW 9.41.250;

(c)
Any device commonly known as "nun-chu-ka sticks", consisting of two
or more lengths of wood, metal, plastic, or similar substance connected with
wire, rope, or other means;

(d)
Any device, commonly known as "throwing stars", which are
multi-pointed, metal objects designed to embed upon impact from any aspect; or

(e)
Any air gun, including any air pistol or air rifle, designed to propel a BB,
pellet, or other projectile by the discharge of compressed air, carbon dioxide,
or other gas.

(2)
Any such person violating subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a gross
misdemeanor. If any person is convicted of a violation of subsection (1)(a) of
this section, the person shall have his or her concealed pistol license, if any
revoked for a period of three years. Anyone convicted under this subsection is
prohibited from applying for a concealed pistol license for a period of three
years. The court shall send notice of the revocation to the department of
licensing, and the city, town, or county which issued the license.

Any
violation of subsection (1) of this section by elementary or secondary school
students constitutes grounds for expulsion from the state's public schools in
accordance with RCW 28A.600.010. An appropriate school authority shall
promptly notify law enforcement and the student's parent or guardian regarding
any allegation or indication of such violation.

Upon
the arrest of a person at least twelve years of age and not more than twenty-one
years of age for violating subsection (1)(a) of this section, the person shall
be detained or confined in a juvenile or adult facility for up to seventy-two
hours. The person shall not be released within the seventy-two hours until
after the person has been examined and evaluated by the county-designated
mental health professional unless the court in its discretion releases the
person sooner after a determination regarding probable cause or on probation
bond or bail.

Within
twenty-four hours of the arrest, the arresting law enforcement agency shall
refer the person to the county-designated mental health professional for
examination and evaluation under chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW and inform a parent
or guardian of the person of the arrest, detention, and examination. The
county-designated mental health professional shall examine and evaluate the
person subject to the provisions of chapter 71.05 or 71.34 RCW. The
examination shall occur at the facility in which the person is detained or
confined. If the person has been released on probation, bond, or bail, the
examination shall occur wherever is appropriate.

The
county-designated mental health professional may determine whether to refer the
person to the county-designated chemical dependency specialist for examination
and evaluation in accordance with chapter 70.96A RCW. The county-designated
chemical dependency specialist shall examine the person subject to the
provisions of chapter 70.96A RCW. The examination shall occur at the facility
in which the person is detained or confined. If the person has been released
on probation, bond, or bail, the examination shall occur wherever is
appropriate.

Upon
completion of any examination by the county-designated mental health
professional or the county-designated chemical dependency specialist, the
results of the examination shall be sent to the court, and the court shall
consider those results in making any determination about the person.

The
county-designated mental health professional and county-designated chemical
dependency specialist shall, to the extent permitted by law, notify a parent or
guardian of the person that an examination and evaluation has taken place and
the results of the examination. Nothing in this subsection prohibits the
delivery of additional, appropriate mental health examinations to the person
while the person is detained or confined.

If
the county-designated mental health professional determines it is appropriate,
the county-designated mental health professional may refer the person to the
local regional support network for follow-up services or the department of
social and health services or other community providers for other services to
the family and individual.

(3)
Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:

(a)
Any student or employee of a private military academy when on the property of
the academy;

(b)
Any person engaged in military, law enforcement, or school district security
activities;

(c)
Any person who is involved in a convention, showing, demonstration, lecture, or
firearms safety course authorized by school authorities in which the firearms
of collectors or instructors are handled or displayed;

(d)
Any person while the person is participating in a firearms or air gun
competition approved by the school or school district;

(e)
Any person in possession of a pistol who has been issued a license under RCW
9.41.070, or is exempt from the licensing requirement by RCW 9.41.060, while
picking up or dropping off a student;

(f)
Any nonstudent at least eighteen years of age legally in possession of a
firearm or dangerous weapon that is secured within an attended vehicle or
concealed from view within a locked unattended vehicle while conducting
legitimate business at the school;

(g)
Any nonstudent at least eighteen years of age who is in lawful possession of an
unloaded firearm, secured in a vehicle while conducting legitimate business at
the school; or

(h)
Any law enforcement officer of the federal, state, or local government agency.

(4)
Subsections (1)(c) and (d) of this section do not apply to any person who
possesses nun-chu-ka sticks, throwing stars, or other dangerous weapons to be
used in martial arts classes authorized to be conducted on the school premises.

(5)
Except as provided in subsection (3)(b), (c), (f), and (h) of this section,
firearms are not permitted in a public or private school building.

(6) "GUN-FREE ZONE" signs shall be posted around school
facilities giving warning of the prohibition of the possession of firearms on
school grounds. These signs shall include the statement "Thou shall
not kill."

---
END ---