BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 29.79 RCW to read as follows:

After
certification of sufficiency by the secretary of state and no less than thirty
days before the initiatives and referendum measures are submitted to a vote of
the people, the legislature shall hold hearings on each initiative and
referendum.

The
standing committees of the senate and house of representatives to which the
matter, if it had been made the subject of a bill introduced in the legislature
and by the same process used by the legislature to refer bills to standing
committees, would have been referred, shall hold the hearings.

Nothing
in this section may be held to diminish the constitutional rights of any person
or to limit or repeal any other requirements imposed by statute or otherwise
recognized by law. In no event may any initiative or referendum measure be
subject to any claim of invalidity made under this section.

Sec.
2. RCW
42.17.130 and 1979 ex.s. c 265 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

No
elective official nor any employee of his office nor any person appointed to or
employed by any public office or agency may use or authorize the use of any of
the facilities of a public office or agency, directly or indirectly, for the
purpose of assisting a campaign for election of any person to any office or for
the promotion of or opposition to any ballot proposition. Facilities of public
office or agency include, but are not limited to, use of stationery, postage,
machines, and equipment, use of employees of the office or agency during
working hours, vehicles, office space, publications of the office or agency,
and clientele lists of persons served by the office or agency: PROVIDED, That
the foregoing provisions of this section shall not apply to the following
activities:

(1)
Action taken at an open public meeting by members of an elected legislative
body to express a collective decision, or to actually vote upon a motion,
proposal, resolution, order, or ordinance, or to support or oppose a ballot
proposition so long as (a) any required notice of the meeting includes the
title and number of the ballot proposition, and (b) members of the legislative
body or members of the public are afforded an approximately equal opportunity
for the expression of an opposing view;

(2)
A statement by an elected official in support of or in opposition to any ballot
proposition at an open press conference or in response to a specific inquiry;

(3)
Activities which are part of the normal and regular conduct of the office or
agency;

(4)
Activities of the legislature in compliance with section 1 of this act.

Sec.
3. RCW
42.52.180 and 1995 c 397 s 30 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
No state officer or state employee may use or authorize the use of facilities
of an agency, directly or indirectly, for the purpose of assisting a campaign
for election of a person to an office or for the promotion of or opposition to
a ballot proposition. Knowing acquiescence by a person with authority to
direct, control, or influence the actions of the state officer or state
employee using public resources in violation of this section constitutes a
violation of this section. Facilities of an agency include, but are not
limited to, use of stationery, postage, machines, and equipment, use of state
employees of the agency during working hours, vehicles, office space,
publications of the agency, and clientele lists of persons served by the
agency.

(2)
This section shall not apply to the following activities:

(a)
Action taken at an open public meeting by members of an elected legislative
body to express a collective decision, or to actually vote upon a motion,
proposal, resolution, order, or ordinance, or to support or oppose a ballot
proposition as long as (i) required notice of the meeting includes the title
and number of the ballot proposition, and (ii) members of the legislative body
or members of the public are afforded an approximately equal opportunity for
the expression of an opposing view;

(b)
A statement by an elected official in support of or in opposition to any ballot
proposition at an open press conference or in response to a specific inquiry.
For the purposes of this subsection, it is not a violation of this section for
an elected official to respond to an inquiry regarding a ballot proposition, to
make incidental remarks concerning a ballot proposition in an official
communication, or otherwise comment on a ballot proposition without an actual,
measurable expenditure of public funds. The ethics boards shall adopt by rule
a definition of measurable expenditure;

(c)
Activities that are part of the normal and regular conduct of the office or
agency; ((and))

(d)
De minimis use of public facilities by state-wide elected officials and
legislators incidental to the preparation or delivery of permissible
communications, including written and verbal communications initiated by them
of their views on ballot propositions that foreseeably may affect a matter that
falls within their constitutional or statutory responsibilities; and

(e)
Activities of the legislature in compliance with section 1 of this act.

(3) As to state officers and employees, this section operates to
the exclusion of RCW 42.17.130.

---
END ---