BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. It is
the intent of the legislature that individuals with developmental disabilities
who rely upon public funding receive quality services and supports. Quality
services and supports promote independence and self-sufficiency, as well as
healthy and safe environments. The legislature intends that people with
developmental disabilities be free of abuse, neglect, and exploitation, and
that the state take all measures possible to certify and train providers of supports
and services in order to accomplish that goal.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 71A.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
By June 30, 2003, the department of social and health services, division of
developmental disabilities shall independently certify each contracted
provider, including independent providers, of supports and services and shall
annually certify each contracted provider thereafter.

(a)
Agencies providing residential supports shall be certified according to the
residential services guidelines as updated and published by the division of
developmental disabilities.

(b)
Agencies providing employment and day programs shall be certified according to
the county guidelines as updated and published by the division of developmental
disabilities.

(c)
Independent providers and individuals contracted to provide direct care shall
be certified according to guidelines established by the division of
developmental disabilities by December 29, 2000.

(2)
The division of developmental disabilities shall take enforcement action on
those failing to meet certification, as determined by rule.

(3)
Certification shall include the following training standards:

(a)
All direct care workers shall be required to complete thirty-two hours of
training within one year from the implementation of these training standards,
unless a direct care worker has worked in the field for a minimum of seven
years and the department waives this requirement. New direct care workers are
required to complete thirty-two hours of training within six months of
employment, with ten hours occurring before employment.

(b)
Annually thereafter, each direct care provider shall be required to complete
ten hours of approved continuing education and training.

(4)
The division of developmental disabilities shall develop and approve initial
training and continuing education and training programs with input from an
advisory committee composed of self-advocates receiving services, family
members, providers, a representative of the Arc of Washington, and a
representative of the developmental disabilities council.

(5)
The division of developmental disabilities shall use its existing training and
technical assistance funds for the development and provision of the initial and
continuing education and training. In addition, if financial impact is greater
than existing training and technical assistance funds available, provider rates
may be adjusted by the department to include the costs of training and replacement
staff time.

(6)
The training standards shall take effect beginning December 31, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
division of developmental disabilities shall review all of its contracted
providers to determine consistency of certification and licensing across
different settings and shall report to the appropriate committees of the
legislature by December 1, 2000.

The
review shall include recommendations to strengthen quality improvements,
establish consistency, and increase enforcement authority.

The review shall include the participation of a representative of
the developmental disabilities council, the Washington protection and advocacy
system, the Arc of Washington, self-advocates and family members receiving
services in different service settings, and providers.

---
END ---