BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 29.27 RCW to immediately follow RCW 29.27.050
to read as follows:

In
a year in which the president and vice-president of the United States are to be
elected, the secretary of state shall include in the certification prepared
under RCW 29.27.050 the names of all candidates for president and
vice-president who, at least forty-five days but not more than one hundred
eighty days before the general election, have certified a slate of electors to
the secretary of state under RCW 29.71.020 and have been nominated either (1)
by a major political party, as certified by the appropriate authority under
party rules, or (2) by a minor party or as independent candidates under chapter
29.24 RCW. Major or minor political parties or independent presidential
candidates may substitute a different candidate for vice-president for the one
whose name appears on the party's certification or nominating petition at least
forty-five days before the election, by certifying the change to the secretary
of state.

Sec.
2. RCW
29.24.020 and 1989 c 215 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Any
nomination of a candidate for partisan public office, except president and
vice-president of the United States, by other than a major political party
shall only be made either: (1) In a convention held not earlier than the last
Saturday in June and not later than the first Saturday in July or during any of
the seven days immediately preceding the first day for filing declarations of
candidacy as fixed in accordance with RCW 29.68.080; or (2) as provided by RCW
((29.51.170)) 29.62.180. A minor political party may hold more
than one convention but in no case shall any such party nominate more than one
candidate for any one partisan public office or position. For the purpose of
nominating candidates for the offices of president and vice-president, United
States senator, or a state-wide office, a minor party or independent candidate
holding multiple conventions may add together the number of signatures of
different individuals from each convention obtained in support of the candidate
or candidates in order to obtain the number required by RCW 29.24.030. For all
other offices for which nominations are made, signatures of the requisite
number of registered voters must be obtained at a single convention.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 29.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Independent candidates, or nominees of a minor political party, for president
and vice-president must qualify to appear on the general election ballot in
this state by filing the following documents with the secretary of state,
within the time described in section 1 of this act:

(a)
Nominating petitions bearing the signatures of at least two hundred registered
voters of this state;

(b)
A sworn statement signed by the candidates attesting to their consent to appear
on the ballot, and bearing a mailing address and telephone number at which the
campaign may be contacted; and

(c)
Documentation of the slate of presidential electors pledged to support those
candidates under RCW 29.71.020.

(2)
No person may sign more than one nominating petition under this section for a
particular election. Petitions may be circulated at a minor party convention
held under RCW 29.24.020, or may be circulated separately from the convention,
or both. Only one slate of candidates may appear on the ballot as nominees of
the same political party.

(3)
The petitions must:

(a)
Clearly identify the minor party, or state that the petitions support an
independent candidacy;

(b)
Name the candidates for both president and vice-president on whose behalf the
petitions are submitted;

(c)
Contain a statement that the person signing the petition is a registered voter
of the state of Washington; and

(d)
Have a place for the voter to sign his or her name and to print his or her name
and address.

Sec.
4. RCW
29.24.030 and 1989 c 215 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
To be valid, a convention must be attended by at least twenty-five registered
voters.

(2)
In order to nominate candidates for the offices of ((president and
vice-president of the United States,)) United States senator, or any
state-wide office, a nominating convention shall obtain and submit to the
filing officer the signatures of at least two hundred registered voters of the
state of Washington. In order to nominate candidates for any other office, a
nominating convention shall obtain and submit to the filing officer the
signatures of twenty-five persons who are registered to vote in the
jurisdiction of the office for which the nominations are made.

Sec.
5. RCW
29.24.035 and 1989 c 215 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

A
nominating petition submitted under this chapter shall clearly identify the
name of the minor party or independent candidate convention as it appears on
the certificate of nomination as required by RCW ((29.24.030(3))) 29.24.040(3).
The petition shall also contain a statement that the person signing the
petition is a registered voter of the state of Washington and shall have a
space for the voter to sign his or her name and to print his or her name and
address. No person may sign more than one nominating petition under this
chapter for an office for a primary or election, except that a voter may
sign both a petition relating to a nominating convention under RCW 29.24.020
and a separate nominating petition for candidates for president and
vice-president under section 3 of this act.

Sec.
6. RCW
29.24.040 and 1989 c 215 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

A
certificate evidencing nominations made at a convention must:

(1)
Be in writing;

(2)
Contain the name of each person nominated, his or her residence, and the
office for which he or she is named((, and if the nomination is for
the offices of president and vice-president of the United States, a sworn
statement from both nominees giving their consent to the nomination));

(3)
Identify the minor political party or the independent candidate on whose behalf
the convention was held;

(4)
Be verified by the oath of the presiding officer and secretary;

(5)
Be accompanied by a nominating petition or petitions bearing the signatures and
addresses of registered voters equal in number to that required by RCW
29.24.030;

(6)
Contain proof of publication of the notice of calling the convention; and

(7)
Be submitted to the appropriate filing officer not later than one week
following the adjournment of the convention at which the nominations were
made. If the nominations are made only for offices whose jurisdiction is
entirely within one county, the certificate and nominating petitions must be
filed with the county auditor. If a minor party or independent candidate
convention nominates any candidates for offices whose jurisdiction encompasses
more than one county, all nominating petitions and the convention certificates
must be filed with the secretary of state.

Sec.
7. RCW
29.24.060 and 1989 c 215 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

Upon
the receipt of the certificate of nomination under RCW 29.24.040 or
nominating petition under section 3 of this act, the officer with whom it
is filed shall check the certificate and canvass the signatures on the ((accompanying))
nominating petitions to determine if the requirements of ((RCW 29.24.030))
this chapter have been met. Once the determination has been made, the
filing officer shall notify the presiding officer of the convention, the
person or persons submitting the presidential and vice-presidential nominating
petitions, and any other persons requesting the notification, of his or her
decision regarding the sufficiency of the certificate or the nominating
petitions. Any appeal regarding the filing officer's determination must be
filed with the superior court of the county in which the certificate or
petitions were filed not later than five days from the date the determination
is made, and shall be heard and finally disposed of by the court within five
days of the filing. Nominating petitions shall not be available for public
inspection or copying.

Sec.
8. RCW
29.71.020 and 1990 c 59 s 69 are each amended to read as follows:

In
the year in which a presidential election is held, each major and each minor
political party ((and each minor political party or independent candidate
convention held under chapter 29.24 RCW)) that nominates candidates for
president and vice-president of the United States, and each independent
slate of candidates for president and vice-president, shall nominate
presidential electors for this state. The party ((or)),
convention, or campaign shall file with the secretary of state a
certificate ((signed by the presiding officer of the convention at which the
presidential electors were chosen,)) listing the names and addresses of the
presidential electors. Each presidential elector shall execute and file with
the secretary of state a pledge that, as an elector, he or she will vote for
the candidates nominated by that party. The names of presidential electors
shall not appear on the ballots. The votes cast for candidates for president
and vice-president of each political party shall be counted for the candidates
for presidential electors of that political party.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. RCW
29.24.055 (Presidential electors--Selection at convention) and
1989 c 215 s 6 are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---