BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
13.34.160 and 1997 c 58 s 505 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In an action brought under this chapter, the court may inquire into the ability
of the parent or parents of the child to pay child support and may enter an
order of child support as set forth in chapter 26.19 RCW. However, payments
shall not be required of a parent who, in good faith and not solely to avoid
the support obligation under this chapter, has opposed the child's placement,
continuously sought reconciliation with, and the return of, the child, and has
not been reconciled with the child because the services specified in the agency
plan under RCW 13.34.130(4)(b)(i) have not been offered. The court may
enforce the same by execution, or in any way in which a court of equity may
enforce its decrees. All child support orders entered pursuant to this chapter
shall be in compliance with the provisions of RCW 26.23.050.

(2) For purposes of this section, if a dependent child's parent is
an unmarried minor parent or pregnant minor applicant, then the parent or
parents of the minor shall also be deemed a parent or parents of the dependent
child. However, liability for child support under this subsection only exists
if the parent or parents of the unmarried minor parent or pregnant minor
applicant are provided the opportunity for a hearing on their ability to
provide support. Any child support order requiring such a parent or parents to
provide support for the minor parent's child may be effective only until the
minor parent reaches eighteen years of age.

---
END ---