BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
41.26.110 and 1988 c 164 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
All claims for disability shall be acted upon and either approved or
disapproved by either type of disability board hereafter authorized to be
created.

(a)
Each city having a population of twenty thousand or more shall establish a
disability board having jurisdiction over all members employed by said cities
and composed of the following five members: Two members of the city
legislative body to be appointed by the mayor, one active or retired fire
fighter to be elected by the fire fighters employed by or retired from the
city, one active or retired law enforcement officer to be elected by the law
enforcement officers employed by or retired from the city and one member from
the public at large who resides within the city to be appointed by the other
four members heretofore designated in this subsection. Retired members who are
subject to the jurisdiction of the board have both the right to elect and the
right to be elected under this section. Each of the elected members shall
serve a two year term. The members appointed pursuant to this subsection shall
serve for two year terms: PROVIDED, That cities of the first class only, shall
retain existing firemen's pension boards established pursuant to RCW 41.16.020
and existing boards of trustees of the relief and pension fund of the police
department as established pursuant to RCW 41.20.010 which such boards shall
have authority to act upon and approve or disapprove claims for disability by
fire fighters or law enforcement officers as provided under the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' retirement system act.

(b)
Each county shall establish a disability board having jurisdiction over all
members residing in the county and not employed by a city in which a disability
board is established. The county disability board so created shall be composed
of five members to be chosen as follows: One member of the legislative body of
the county to be appointed by the county legislative body, one member of a city
or town legislative body located within the county which does not contain a
city disability board established pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section
to be chosen by a majority of the mayors of such cities and towns within the
county which does not contain a city disability board, one fire fighter or
retired fire fighter to be elected by the fire fighters employed or retired in
the county who are not employed by or retired from a city in which a disability
board is established, one law enforcement officer or retired law enforcement
officer to be elected by the law enforcement officers employed in or retired
from the county who are not employed by or retired from a city in which a
disability board is established, and one member from the public at large who
resides within the county but does not reside within a city in which a city
disability board is established, to be appointed by the other four members
heretofore designated in this subsection. However, in counties with a
population less than sixty thousand, the member of the disability board
appointed by a majority of the mayors of the cities and towns within the county
that do not contain a city disability board must be a resident of one of the
cities and towns but need not be a member of a city or town legislative body.
Retired members who are subject to the jurisdiction of the board have both the
right to elect and the right to be elected under this section. All members
appointed or elected pursuant to this subsection shall serve for two year
terms.

(2)
The members of both the county and city disability boards shall not receive
compensation for their service upon the boards but said members shall be
reimbursed by their respective county or city for all expenses incidental to
such service as to the amount authorized by law.

(3) The disability boards authorized for establishment by this
section shall perform all functions, exercise all powers, and make all such
determinations as specified in this chapter.

---
END ---