BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
90.14.140 and 1998 c 258 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The definitions in this section apply for the purposes of RCW 90.14.130
through 90.14.180((,)):

(a)
"Sufficient cause" ((shall be defined as)) means
the nonuse of all or a portion of the water by the owner of a water right for a
period of ((five)) twenty-five or more consecutive years where
such nonuse occurs as a result of:

(((a)))
(i) Drought, or other unavailability of water;

(((b)))
(ii) Active service in the armed forces of the United States during
military crisis;

(((c)))
(iii) Nonvoluntary service in the armed forces of the United States;

(((d)))
(iv) The operation of legal proceedings;

(((e)))
(v) Federal or state agency leases of or options to purchase lands or
water rights which preclude or reduce the use of the right by the owner of the
water right;

(((f)))
(vi) Federal laws imposing land or water use restrictions either
directly or through the voluntary enrollment of a landowner in a federal
program implementing those laws, or acreage limitations, or production quotas.

(b)
"Voluntarily fails" means the nonuse of all or a portion of the water
by the owner of a water right for a period of twenty-five or more consecutive
years where such nonuse occurs as a result of factors within the control of the
water user. A failure to use water is involuntary when the exercise of such
right is in response to factors beyond the control of the water user, such as
cyclical weather patterns or the unintended presence of water from a source not
within the control of the water user.

(2)
Notwithstanding any other provisions of RCW 90.14.130 through 90.14.180, there
shall be no relinquishment of any water right:

(a)
If such right is claimed for power development purposes under chapter 90.16 RCW
and annual license fees are paid in accordance with chapter 90.16 RCW;

(b)
If such right is used for a standby or reserve water supply to be used in time
of drought or other low flow period so long as withdrawal or diversion
facilities are maintained in good operating condition for the use of such
reserve or standby water supply;

(c)
If such right is claimed for a determined future development to take place
either within fifteen years of July 1, 1967, or the most recent beneficial use
of the water right, whichever date is later;

(d)
If such right is claimed for municipal water supply purposes under chapter
90.03 RCW;

(e)
If such waters are not subject to appropriation under the applicable provisions
of RCW 90.40.030; or

(f) If such right or portion of the right is leased to another
person for use on land other than the land to which the right is appurtenant as
long as the lessee makes beneficial use of the right in accordance with this
chapter and a transfer or change of the right has been approved by the
department in accordance with RCW 90.03.380, 90.03.383, 90.03.390, or
90.44.100.

---
END ---