BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The department of ecology shall conduct a preconstruction analysis of the Roza
irrigation district off-stream storage project at Washout canyon, regarding its
suitability as a site for the construction of a retainment dam and water
storage reservoir and the reservoir site's potential to create a warm water
fishery, provide recreational opportunities, and enhance agriculture.

(2)
The analysis shall include, but is not limited to, an analysis of the geology
and hydrology of the site and appropriate dam design and dynamics, and its
impact on water-related issues. The department shall conduct its analysis
through contracts with the Roza irrigation district. The department shall
consult with the Yakama Indian Nation, Yakima county, and the upper Columbia
area office of the United States bureau of reclamation regarding the scope of
issues to be addressed in this preconstruction analysis.

(3)
The preconstruction analysis in this section shall be completed by June 30,
2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. The
sum of three hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary,
is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the general fund
to the department of ecology for the purposes of section 1 of this act.

---
END ---