BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
87.03.845 and 1998 c 84 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

This
section and RCW 87.03.847 through 87.03.855 provide the procedures by which a
minor irrigation district may be merged into a major irrigation district as
authorized by RCW 87.03.530(2).

To
institute proceedings for such a merger, the board of directors of the minor
district shall adopt a resolution requesting the board of directors of the
major district to consider the merger, or proceedings for such a merger may be
instituted by a petition requesting the board of directors of the major
district to consider the merger, signed by ten owners of land within the minor
district or five percent of the total number of landowners within the minor
district, whichever is greater. However, if there are fewer than twenty owners
of land within the minor irrigation district, the petition shall be signed by a
majority of the landowners and filed with the board of directors of the major
irrigation district.

For
the purpose of determining the number of landowners required to initiate merger
proceedings under this section, a husband and wife owning property as community
property shall be considered a single landowner; two or more persons or
entities holding title to property as tenants in common, joint tenants, tenants
in partnership, or other form of joint ownership shall be considered a single
landowner; and the petition requesting the merger shall be considered by the
board of directors of the major irrigation district may be signed by either the
husband or wife and by any one of the co-owners of jointly owned property.

The
board of directors of the major irrigation district shall consider the request
at the next regularly scheduled meeting of the board of directors of the major
district following its receipt of the minor district's request or at a special
meeting called for the purpose of considering the request. If the board of the
major district denies the request of the minor district, no further action on
the request shall be taken.

If
the board of the major district does not deny the request, it shall conduct a
public hearing on the request and shall give notice regarding the hearing. The
notice shall describe the proposed merger and shall be published once a week
for two consecutive weeks preceding the date of the hearing and the last
publication shall be not more than seven days before the date of the hearing.
The notice shall contain a statement that unless the holders of title or
evidence of title to at least twenty percent of the assessed lands within the
major district file a protest opposing the merger with the board of the major
district at or before the hearing, the board is free to approve the request for
the merger without an election being conducted in the major district on the
request. If the board of the major district is considering requests from more
than one minor district, the hearing shall be conducted on all such requests.

Sec.
2. RCW
85.08.850 and 1996 c 313 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
petition requesting the merger shall be signed by the board of supervisors of,
or by ten ((owners of land)) landowners located within, the
drainage improvement district, joint drainage improvement district, or
consolidated drainage improvement district and presented to the clerk or clerks
of the appropriate county legislative authority or authorities, at a regular or
special meeting. For the purpose of determining the number of landowners
required to initiate merger proceedings under this section, a husband and wife
owning property as community property shall be considered a single landowner,
two or more persons or entities holding title to property as tenants in common,
joint tenants, tenants in partnership, or other form of joint ownership shall
be considered a single landowner, and the petition requesting the merger may be
signed by either the husband or wife and by any one of the co-owners of jointly
owned property. The petition requesting the merger shall be considered by the
county legislative authority or authorities.

---
END ---