BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature intends to provide additional accountability and efficiencies in
the delivery of social, economic, and treatment services by clarifying the
ability of legislators to require the mandated delivery of such services by the
department of social and health services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 7.16 RCW to read as follows:

For
the purposes of this section and section 3 of this act, the following
definitions apply:

(1)
"Human services" means those programs and services, operated or
funded by the department, that are designed to: (a) Address one or more of the
factors set forth in RCW 70.190.130(1)(h), other than the provision of basic
education; (b) provide basic economic or social services to qualifying
individuals; or (c) provide medical diagnostic or treatment services to
individuals.

(2)
"Department" means the department of social and health services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 7.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a)
A writ of mandate is an available remedy and may be issued in cases when the
department fails to provide a statutorily mandated report to the legislature at
the date the report is due.

(b)
A writ of mandate is an available remedy and may be issued in cases when the
department fails to meet a statutory mandate or does not implement a statute
that requires performance of duties on the part of the department.

(2) For purposes of this section, a legislator is a party of
interest and has standing to seek the writ in his or her capacity as a
legislator.

---
END ---