BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature intends to provide additional accountability and efficiencies in
the delivery of social, economic, and treatment services by clarifying the
ability of legislators to require the mandated delivery of such services by
state agencies.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 7.16 RCW to read as follows:

For
the purposes of this section and section 3 of this act, the following
definitions apply:

(1)
"Human services" means those programs and services, operated or
funded by a state human services agency, that are designed to: (a) Address one
or more of the factors set forth in RCW 70.190.130(1)(h), other than the
provision of basic education; (b) provide basic economic or social services to
qualifying individuals; or (c) provide medical diagnostic or treatment services
to individuals.

(2)
"State human services agency" means the department of social and
health services; the department of health; the employment security department;
the department of community, trade, and economic development; and the office of
the superintendent of public instruction.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 7.16 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a)
A writ of mandate is an available remedy and may be issued in cases when a
state human services agency fails to provide a statutorily mandated report to
the legislature at the date the report is due.

(b)
A writ of mandate is an available remedy and may be issued in cases when a
state human services agency fails to meet a statutory mandate or does not
implement a statute that requires performance of duties on the part of the
agency.

(2) For purposes of this section, a legislator is a party of interest
and has standing to seek the writ in his or her capacity as a legislator.

---
END ---