BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.04.4333 and 1996 c 1 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
There may be credited against the tax imposed by this chapter, the value of
state-approved, employer-provided or sponsored job training services designed
to enhance the job-related performance of employees((, for those businesses
eligible for a tax deferral under chapter 82.60 RCW)).

(2)
The value of the state-approved, job training services provided by the employer
to the employee, without charge, shall be determined by the allocation of the
cost method using generally accepted accounting standards.

(3)
To receive the credit allowed under this section ((shall be limited
to an amount equal to twenty percent of the value of the)) an employer
must have increased the amount spent on state-approved, job training
services ((determined under subsection (2) of this section)) by a
minimum of fifteen percent over the previous year. The credit allowed under
this section shall be limited to an amount equal to fifty percent of the increase
in the value of the services as determined under subsection (2) of this section.
The total credits allowed under this section for a business shall not exceed
five thousand dollars per calendar year or the amount of tax that would
otherwise be due under this chapter, whichever is lesser. The credit must be
claimed by the due date of the last tax return for the calendar year in which
the payment is made. The credit may not be carried over to subsequent calendar
years.

(4)
A person taking the credit under this section must keep records necessary
for the department of revenue to verify eligibility for the credit.

(5)
Prior to claiming the credit under this section, the business must obtain
approval of the proposed job training service from the employment security
department. The employer's request for approval must include a description of
the proposed job training service, how the job training will enhance the
employee's performance, and the cost of the proposed job training.

(((5))) (6) This section only applies to expenditures
for training ((in respect to eligible business projects for which an
application is approved)) made on or after January 1, ((1996))
2000.

---
END ---