BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that antifreeze containing ethylene glycol poses a threat to
the health and well-being of children and animals. According to the American
association of poison control centers, about three thousand four hundred
poisonings related to ethylene glycol occur each year with about twenty percent
of these involving children under age six. The legislature further finds that
a phased-in ban on the use of ethylene glycol in antifreeze will improve the
general welfare of children and animals in the state.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
After January 1, 2001, an antifreeze product sold in this state may not contain
more than sixty-seven percent ethylene glycol.

(2)
After January 1, 2003, an antifreeze product sold in this state may not contain
more than thirty-three percent ethylene glycol.

(3)
After January 1, 2004, an antifreeze product sold in this state may not contain
ethylene glycol.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 70.54 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The secretary of health is authorized to forbid the sale, and order the removal
from retail space, of any product the secretary believes to be in violation of
section 1 of this act.

(2)
The secretary of health is authorized to adopt rules concerning the sale of
antifreeze products under this section and section 1 of this act.

(3) A violation of this section or section 1 of this act, or the
rules adopted under this section or section 1 of this act, is a misdemeanor.

---
END ---