BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.80.070 and 1991 c 141 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The proceeds collected pursuant to the exercise of the local option authority
of RCW 82.80.010, 82.80.020, 82.80.030, and 82.80.050 (hereafter called
"local option transportation revenues") shall be used for
transportation purposes only, including but not limited to the following: The
operation and preservation of roads, streets, and other transportation
improvements; new construction, reconstruction, and expansion of city streets,
county roads, and state highways and other transportation improvements including
but not limited to public parking garages; development and implementation
of public transportation and high-capacity transit improvements and programs;
and planning, design, and acquisition of right of way and sites for such
transportation purposes. The proceeds collected from excise taxes on the sale,
distribution, or use of motor vehicle fuel and special fuel under RCW 82.80.010
shall be used exclusively for "highway purposes" as that term is
construed in Article II, section 40 of the state Constitution.

(2)
The local option transportation revenues shall be expended for transportation
uses consistent with the adopted transportation and land use plans of the
jurisdiction expending the funds and consistent with any applicable and adopted
regional transportation plan for metropolitan planning areas.

(3)
Each local government with a population greater than eight thousand that levies
or expends local option transportation funds, is also required to develop and
adopt a specific transportation program that contains the following elements:

(a)
The program shall identify the geographic boundaries of the entire area or
areas within which local option transportation revenues will be levied and
expended.

(b)
The program shall be based on an adopted transportation plan for the geographic
areas covered and shall identify the proposed operation and construction of
transportation improvements and services in the designated plan area intended
to be funded in whole or in part by local option transportation revenues and
shall identify the annual costs applicable to the program.

(c)
The program shall indicate how the local transportation plan is coordinated
with applicable transportation plans for the region and for adjacent
jurisdictions.

(d)
The program shall include at least a six-year funding plan, updated annually,
identifying the specific public and private sources and amounts of revenue
necessary to fund the program. The program shall include a proposed schedule
for construction of projects and expenditure of revenues. The funding plan
shall consider the additional local tax revenue estimated to be generated by
new development within the plan area if all or a portion of the additional
revenue is proposed to be earmarked as future appropriations for transportation
improvements in the program.

(4)
Local governments with a population greater than eight thousand exercising the
authority for local option transportation funds shall periodically review and
update their transportation program to ensure that it is consistent with
applicable local and regional transportation and land use plans and within the
means of estimated public and private revenue available.

(5)
In the case of expenditure for new or expanded transportation facilities,
improvements, and services, priorities in the use of local option
transportation revenues shall be identified in the transportation program and
expenditures shall be made based upon the following criteria, which are stated
in descending order of weight to be attributed:

(a)
First, the project serves a multijurisdictional function;

(b)
Second, it is necessitated by existing or reasonably foreseeable congestion;

(c)
Third, it has the greatest person-carrying capacity;

(d)
Fourth, it is partially funded by other government funds, such as from the
state transportation improvement board, or by private sector contributions,
such as those from the local transportation act, chapter 39.92 RCW; and

(e)
Fifth, it meets such other criteria as the local government determines is
appropriate.

(6)
It is the intent of the legislature that as a condition of levying, receiving,
and expending local option transportation revenues, no local government agency
use the revenues to replace, divert, or loan any revenues currently being used
for transportation purposes to nontransportation purposes. The association of
Washington cities and the Washington state association of counties, in
consultation with the legislative transportation committee, shall study the
issue of nondiversion and make recommendations to the legislative
transportation committee for language implementing the intent of this section
by December 1, 1990.

(7)
Local governments are encouraged to enter into interlocal agreements to jointly
develop and adopt with other local governments the transportation programs
required by this section for the purpose of accomplishing regional
transportation planning and development.

(8) Local governments may use all or a part of the local option
transportation revenues for the amortization of local government general
obligation and revenue bonds issued for transportation purposes consistent with
the requirements of this section.

---
END ---