BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
74.15.030 and 1997 c 386 s 33 are each amended to read as follows:

The
secretary shall have the power and it shall be the secretary's duty:

(1)
In consultation with the children's services advisory committee, and with the
advice and assistance of persons representative of the various type agencies to
be licensed, to designate categories of facilities for which separate or
different requirements shall be developed as may be appropriate whether because
of variations in the ages, sex and other characteristics of persons served,
variations in the purposes and services offered or size or structure of the
agencies to be licensed hereunder, or because of any other factor relevant thereto;

(2)
In consultation with the children's services advisory committee, and with the
advice and assistance of persons representative of the various type agencies to
be licensed, to adopt and publish minimum requirements for licensing applicable
to each of the various categories of agencies to be licensed.

The
minimum requirements shall be limited to:

(a)
The size and suitability of a facility and the plan of operation for carrying
out the purpose for which an applicant seeks a license;

(b)
The character, suitability and competence of an agency and other persons
associated with an agency directly responsible for the care and treatment of
children, expectant mothers or developmentally disabled persons. In
consultation with law enforcement personnel, the secretary shall investigate
the conviction record or pending charges and dependency record information
under chapter 43.43 RCW of each agency and its staff seeking licensure or
relicensure. In order to determine the character, suitability, and
competence of applicants for an agency license, licensees, their employees,
and other persons who have unsupervised access to children in care, the
department shall:

(i)
In consultation with law enforcement personnel, investigate the conviction
record or pending charges and dependency record information under chapter 43.43
RCW of any such person; and

(ii)
Require that any such person who ((have)) has not resided in
the state of Washington during the three-year period before being authorized to
care for children shall be fingerprinted. The requirement for fingerprints
does not include those individuals or businesses or organizations named in RCW
43.43.832(4)(c). The fingerprints shall be forwarded to the Washington
state patrol and federal bureau of investigation for a criminal history records
check. To investigate criminal history information, the department may
reasonably rely on a criminal history records check of the Washington state
patrol criminal identification system and, where a federal bureau of
investigation check is required, a federal bureau of investigation check by
another governmental agency or the United States military if the check is less
than one year old. The fingerprint criminal history records checks will be
at the expense of the licensee except that in the case of a foster family home,
if this expense would work a hardship on the licensee, the department shall pay
the expense. The licensee may not pass this cost on to the employee or
prospective employee, unless the employee is determined to be unsuitable due to
his or her criminal history record. The secretary shall use the information
solely for the purpose of determining eligibility for a license and for
determining the character, suitability, and competence of those persons or
agencies, excluding parents, not required to be licensed who are authorized to
care for children, expectant mothers, and developmentally disabled persons. The
department shall share the conviction record, pending charges, and dependency
record information with the child placing agency that is responsible for
certifying the licensee or applicant. Criminal justice agencies shall
provide the secretary such information as they may have and that the secretary
may require for such purpose;

(c)
The number of qualified persons required to render the type of care and
treatment for which an agency seeks a license;

(d)
The safety, cleanliness, and general adequacy of the premises to provide for
the comfort, care and well-being of children, expectant mothers or
developmentally disabled persons;

(e)
The provision of necessary care, including food, clothing, supervision and
discipline; physical, mental and social well-being; and educational,
recreational and spiritual opportunities for those served;

(f)
The financial ability of an agency to comply with minimum requirements
established pursuant to this chapter ((74.15 RCW)) and RCW
74.13.031; and

(g)
The maintenance of records pertaining to the admission, progress, health and
discharge of persons served;

(3)
To investigate any person, including relatives by blood or marriage except for
parents, for character, suitability, and competence in the care and treatment
of children, expectant mothers, and developmentally disabled persons prior to
authorizing that person to care for children, expectant mothers, and
developmentally disabled persons. However, if a child is placed with a
relative under RCW 13.34.060 or 13.34.130, and if such relative appears
otherwise suitable and competent to provide care and treatment the criminal
history background check required by this section need not be completed before
placement, but shall be completed as soon as possible after placement;

(4)
On reports of alleged child abuse and neglect, to investigate agencies in
accordance with chapter 26.44 RCW, including child day-care centers and family
day-care homes, to determine whether the alleged abuse or neglect has occurred,
and whether child protective services or referral to a law enforcement agency
is appropriate;

(5)
To issue, revoke, or deny licenses to agencies pursuant to this chapter
((74.15 RCW)) and RCW 74.13.031. Licenses shall specify the category of
care which an agency is authorized to render and the ages, sex and number of
persons to be served;

(6)
To prescribe the procedures and the form and contents of reports necessary for
the administration of this chapter ((74.15 RCW)) and RCW
74.13.031 and to require regular reports from each licensee;

(7)
To inspect agencies periodically to determine whether or not there is
compliance with this chapter ((74.15 RCW)) and RCW 74.13.031 and
the requirements adopted hereunder;

(8)
To review requirements adopted hereunder at least every two years and to adopt
appropriate changes after consultation with the child care coordinating
committee and other affected groups for child day-care requirements and with
the children's services advisory committee for requirements for other agencies;
and

(9) To consult with public and private agencies in order to help
them improve their methods and facilities for the care of children, expectant
mothers and developmentally disabled persons.

---
END ---