BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.330.070 and 1993 c 280 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall work closely with local communities to increase their capacity
to respond to economic, environmental, and social problems and challenges. The
department shall coordinate the delivery of development services and technical
assistance to local communities or regional areas. It shall promote
partnerships between the public and private sectors and between state and local
officials to encourage appropriate economic growth and opportunity in
communities throughout the state, in particular strategies designed to
encourage economic growth and opportunities in community empowerment zones
designated under RCW 43.63A.700. The department shall promote appropriate
local development by: Supporting the ability of communities to develop and
implement strategic development plans; assisting businesses to start up,
maintain, or expand their operations; encouraging public infrastructure
investment and private and public capital investment in local communities;
supporting efforts to manage growth and provide affordable housing and housing
services; providing for the identification and preservation of the state's
historical and cultural resources; and expanding employment opportunities.

(2)
The department shall define a set of services including training and technical
assistance that it will make available to local communities, community-based
nonprofit organizations, regional areas, industry clusters, or
businesses. The department shall simplify access to these programs by
providing more centralized and user-friendly information and referral. The
department shall coordinate community and economic development efforts to
minimize program redundancy and maximize accessibility. The department shall
develop a set of criteria for targeting services to local communities.

(3)
The department shall develop a coordinated and systematic approach to providing
training to community-based nonprofit organizations, local communities, industry
clusters, and businesses. The approach shall be designed to increase the
economic and community development skills available in local communities by
providing training and funding for training for local citizens, nonprofit
organizations, industry clusters, and businesses. The department shall
emphasize providing training in those communities most in need of state
assistance.

(4)
As used in this section, "industry clusters" means a geographic
concentration of interdependent competitive firms that do business with each
other. Clusters also include firms that sell inside and outside of the
geographic region as well as support firms that supply raw materials, components,
and business services.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
legislature finds that economic development, work force training, international
trade, tourism development, housing assistance, assistance to local
governments, and other programs and services provided by the department of
community, trade, and economic development are vital to all regions of the
state. The legislature further finds that program development and service
delivery to the eastern region of the state could be significantly enhanced by
a continuous, full-time physical staff presence in that region.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. For
the purposes of this act:

(1)
"Department" means the department of community, trade, and economic
development, or its successor agency or agencies.

(2)
"Director" means the director of the department.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. In
order to more effectively respond to the needs of eastern Washington
communities, the department shall, as soon as practicable, establish a field
office and a full-time staff presence in eastern Washington. If practicable,
the office shall be colocated with one or more existing state agencies in the
Tri-Cities area to facilitate the urgent economic development needs of
southeastern Washington. This office shall be staffed by the director in the
most efficient manner that is likely to provide improved service to eastern
Washington communities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5.
Program activities and priorities for this office serving eastern Washington
shall be determined by the director, in consultation with local government
officials, business, labor, and educational advisors from the region.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---