BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that encouraging outstanding classified school employees to
enter the teaching profession is of paramount importance to the state of
Washington. By creating the classified employees as future teachers
conditional scholarship program, the legislature intends to assist in the
effort to recruit as future teachers persons who have shown great dedication
and skill working in schools and who have distinguished themselves through
outstanding achievements and service.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Conditional scholarship" means a loan that is forgiven in whole or
in part if the recipient renders service as a teacher in an approved education
program in this state.

(2)
"Institution of higher education" or "institution" means a
college or university in the state of Washington which is accredited by an
accrediting association recognized as such by rule of the higher education
coordinating board.

(3)
"Board" means the higher education coordinating board.

(4)
"Classified employee" means an employee of a school district or
educational service district who does not hold a teaching certificate and has a
declared intention to complete an approved preparation program leading to
initial teacher certification or required for earning an additional
endorsement.

(5)
"Public school" means an elementary school, a middle school, a junior
high school, or a high school within the public school system referred to in
Article IX of the state Constitution.

(6)
"Forgiven" or "to forgive" or "forgiveness" means
to render service as a teacher in an approved education program in the state of
Washington in lieu of monetary repayment.

(7)
"Satisfied" means paid-in-full.

(8)
"Participant" means an eligible classified employee who has received
a conditional scholarship under this chapter.

(9)
"Approved education program" means an education program in the state
of Washington for knowledge and skills generally learned in preschool through
twelfth grade. Approved education programs may include but are not limited to:

(a)
K-12 schools under Title 28A RCW;

(b)
Early childhood education and assistance programs under RCW 28A.215.100 through
28A.215.200 or the federal head start program;

(c)
An approved school under chapter 28A.195 RCW;

(d)
Education centers under chapter 28A.205 RCW;

(e)
English as a second language programs and programs leading to high school
graduation or the equivalency operated by community or technical colleges; and

(f)
Tribal schools in Washington approved by the federal bureau of Indian affairs.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
classified employees as future teachers conditional scholarship program is
established. The program shall be administered by the board. In administering
the program, the board shall have the following powers and duties:

(1)
Select classified employees to receive conditional scholarships, with the
assistance of a screening committee composed of teachers, administrators,
classified employees, and leaders in government, business, and education;

(2)
Adopt necessary rules and guidelines;

(3)
Publicize the program;

(4)
Collect and manage repayments from participants who do not meet their teaching
obligations under this chapter; and

(5)
Solicit and accept grants and donations from public and private sources for the
program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
board shall establish a planning committee to develop criteria for the
screening and selection of recipients of the conditional scholarships. These
criteria shall emphasize factors demonstrating excellence including but not
limited to leadership ability, community contributions, and an ability to act
as a role model for all students. These criteria also may include, for
approximately half of the recipients, requirements that those recipients meet
the definition of "needy student" under RCW 28B.10.802.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
board may waive grade point requirements for an otherwise eligible individual
under special circumstances.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
board may award conditional scholarships to eligible classified employees from
the funds appropriated to the board for this purpose, or from any private
donations, or any other funds given to the board for this program. The amount
of the conditional scholarship awarded an individual shall not exceed three
thousand dollars per academic year. Students are eligible to receive
conditional scholarships for a maximum of five years.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. (1) Participants
in the conditional scholarship program incur an obligation to repay the
conditional scholarship, with interest, unless they teach for two years in an
approved education program for each year of scholarship received, under rules
adopted by the board.

(2)
The interest rate shall be eight percent for the first four years of repayment
and ten percent beginning with the fifth year of repayment.

(3)
The period for repayment shall be ten years, with payments of principal and
interest accruing quarterly commencing nine months from the date the
participant completes or discontinues the course of study. Provisions for
deferral of payment shall be determined by the board.

(4)
The entire principal and interest of each payment shall be forgiven for each payment
period in which the participant teaches in an approved education program until
the entire repayment obligation is satisfied. Should the participant cease to
teach in an approved education program in this state before the participant's
repayment obligation is completed, payments on the unsatisfied portion of the
principal and interest shall begin the next payment period and continue until
the remainder of the participant's repayment obligation is satisfied.

(5)
The board is responsible for collection of repayments made under this section
and shall exercise due diligence in such collection, maintaining all necessary
records to ensure that maximum repayments are made. Collection and servicing
of repayments under this section shall be pursued using the full extent of the
law, including wage garnishment if necessary. The board is responsible to
forgive all or parts of such repayments under the criteria established in this
section and shall maintain all necessary records of forgiven payments.

(6)
Receipts from the payment of principal or interest or any other subsidies to
which the board as administrator is entitled, which are paid by or on behalf of
participants under this section, shall be deposited with the board and shall be
used to cover the costs of granting the conditional scholarships, maintaining
necessary records, and making collections under subsection (5) of this
section. The board shall maintain accurate records of these costs, and all
receipts beyond those necessary to pay such costs shall be used to grant
conditional scholarships to eligible students.

(7)
The board shall temporarily or, in special circumstances, permanently defer the
requirements of this section for eligible students as defined in RCW
28B.10.017.

(8)
The board may cancel a recipient's repayment obligation due to the recipient's
total and permanent disability or death, subject to documentation as required
by the board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 1 through 7 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.

---
END ---