BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that the current probation and parole interstate compact,
which was entered into about sixty years ago, has become seriously outdated and
of diminishing value to the supervision of offenders residing outside
Washington state. The legislature further finds that the quality of
supervision provided by other states varies enormously and constitutes a
potentially significant public safety risk. The legislature intends to
establish a task force to study the recently revised interstate compact for
adult offender supervision and recommend to the legislature whether it is in
the state's interest to adopt it.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The governor shall appoint a task force to study the interstate compact for
adult offender supervision and make recommendations to the legislature by
January 1, 2001, on whether it is in the state's interest to adopt the
compact. The study shall include both positive and negative aspects of
adopting the compact as well as a comparison to the current probation and
parole interstate compact.

(2)
The task force shall consist of the following members:

(a)
Two senators and two representatives, representing both caucuses in each house;

(b)
One superior court judge appointed by the superior court judge's association;

(c)
The attorney general or his or her designee;

(d)
The secretary of the department of corrections or his or her designee;

(e)
The chair of the indeterminate sentence review board or his or her designee;

(f)
The chief of the Washington state patrol or his or her designee;

(g)
One prosecutor designated by the Washington association of prosecuting
attorneys;

(h)
One defense attorney designated by the Washington defender association;

(i)
One sheriff or police chief designated by the Washington association of
sheriffs and police chiefs; and

(j)
Two citizens designated by the Washington coalition of crime victim advocates.

(3) The task force shall use legislative staff from senate
committee services and the office of program research.

---
END ---