BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.117.010 and 1995 c 67 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature declares that the public policy of this state is to insure equal
opportunity for all of its citizens. The legislature finds that Asian Pacific
Americans have unique and special problems. It is the purpose of this chapter
to improve the well-being of Asian Pacific Americans by insuring their access
to participation in the fields of government, business, education, and other
areas. The legislature is particularly concerned with the plight of those
Asian Pacific Americans who, for economic, linguistic, or cultural reasons,
find themselves disadvantaged or isolated from American society and the
benefits of equal opportunity. The legislature aims to help these and all
Asian Pacific Americans achieve full equality and inclusion in American
society. The legislature further finds that it is necessary to aid Asian
Pacific Americans in obtaining governmental services in order to promote the health,
safety, and welfare of all the residents of this state. Therefore the
legislature deems it necessary to create a commission to carry out the purposes
of this chapter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.117 RCW to read as follows:

The
legislature declares that:

(1)
The fourth week of May of each year will be known as Asian Pacific American
Heritage Week;

(2)
The fourth week of May is designated as a time for people of this state to
celebrate the contributions to the state by Asian Pacific Americans including,
but not limited to, the arts, sciences, commerce, and education; and

(3)
Educational institutions, public entities, and private organizations are
encouraged to designate time for appropriate activities in commemoration of the
lives, history, achievements, and contributions of Asian Pacific Americans.

Sec.
3. RCW
43.117.070 and 1995 c 67 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The commission shall examine and define issues pertaining to the rights and
needs of Asian Pacific Americans, and make recommendations to the governor and
state agencies with respect to desirable changes in program and law.

(2)
The commission shall ((further)) advise such state government agencies
on the development and implementation of comprehensive and coordinated
policies, plans, and programs focusing on the special problems and needs of Asian
Pacific Americans.

(3)
The commission shall coordinate and assist with state-wide celebrations
during Asian Pacific American Heritage Week that recognize the contributions to
the state by Asian Pacific Americans including, but not limited to, the arts,
sciences, commerce, and education.

(4)
Each state department and agency shall provide appropriate and reasonable
assistance to the commission as needed in order that the commission may carry
out the purposes of this chapter.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act takes effect April 30, 2000.

---
END ---