BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.61.502 and 1998 c 213 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of driving while under the influence ((of intoxicating
liquor or any drug)) if the person drives a vehicle within this state:

(a)
And the person has, within two hours after driving, an alcohol concentration of
0.08 or higher as shown by analysis of the person's breath or blood made under
RCW 46.61.506; or

(b)
While the person is under the influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor
or any drug; or

(c)
While the person is under the combined influence of or affected by intoxicating
liquor and any drug; or

(d)
While the person is under the influence of any chemical, poison, organic
solvent, or any compound or a combination of these to a degree which renders
the person incapable of driving safely.

(2)
The fact that a person charged with a violation of this section is or has been
entitled to use a drug under the laws of this state shall not constitute a
defense against a charge of violating this section.

(3)
It is an affirmative defense to a violation of subsection (1)(a) of this
section which the defendant must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that
the defendant consumed a sufficient quantity of alcohol after the time of
driving and before the administration of an analysis of the person's breath or
blood to cause the defendant's alcohol concentration to be 0.08 or more within
two hours after driving. The court shall not admit evidence of this defense
unless the defendant notifies the prosecution prior to the omnibus or pretrial
hearing in the case of the defendant's intent to assert the affirmative
defense.

(4)
Analyses of blood or breath samples obtained more than two hours after the
alleged driving may be used as evidence that within two hours of the alleged
driving, a person had an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more in violation of
subsection (1)(a) of this section, and in any case in which the analysis shows an
alcohol concentration above 0.00 may be used as evidence that a person was
under the influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor or any drug in
violation of subsection (1)(b) or (c) of this section.

(5)
A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

Sec.
2. RCW
46.61.503 and 1998 c 213 s 4, 1998 c 207 s 5, and 1998 c 41 s 8 are each
reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, a person is guilty of
driving or being in physical control of a motor vehicle after consuming alcohol
or any chemical, poison, organic solvent, or any compound or a combination
of these to a degree which renders the person incapable of driving safely
if the person operates or is in physical control of a motor vehicle within this
state and the person:

(a)
Is under the age of twenty-one;

(b)
Has, within two hours after operating or being in physical control of the motor
vehicle, an alcohol concentration of at least 0.02 but less than the concentration
specified in RCW 46.61.502, as shown by analysis of the person's breath or
blood made under RCW 46.61.506; or

(c)
Is under the influence of any chemical, poison, organic solvent, or any
compound or a combination of these to a degree which renders the person
incapable of driving safely.

(2)
It is an affirmative defense to a violation of subsection (1) of this section
which the defendant must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the
defendant consumed a sufficient quantity of alcohol after the time of driving
or being in physical control and before the administration of an analysis of
the person's breath or blood to cause the defendant's alcohol concentration to
be in violation of subsection (1) of this section within two hours after driving
or being in physical control. The court shall not admit evidence of this
defense unless the defendant notifies the prosecution prior to the earlier of:
(a) Seven days prior to trial; or (b) the omnibus or pretrial hearing in the
case of the defendant's intent to assert the affirmative defense.

(3)
Analyses of blood or breath samples obtained more than two hours after the
alleged driving or being in physical control may be used as evidence that
within two hours of the alleged driving or being in physical control, a person
had an alcohol concentration in violation of subsection (1) of this section.

(4)
A violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

Sec.
3. RCW
46.61.504 and 1998 c 213 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of being in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while
under the influence ((of intoxicating liquor or any drug)) if the person
has actual physical control of a vehicle within this state:

(a)
And the person has, within two hours after being in actual physical control of
the vehicle, an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or higher as shown by analysis of
the person's breath or blood made under RCW 46.61.506; or

(b)
While the person is under the influence of or affected by intoxicating liquor
or any drug; or

(c)
While the person is under the combined influence of or affected by intoxicating
liquor and any drug; or

(d)
While the person is under the influence of any chemical, poison, organic
solvent, or any compound or a combination of these to a degree which renders
the person incapable of driving safely.

(2)
The fact that a person charged with a violation of this section is or has been
entitled to use a drug under the laws of this state does not constitute a
defense against any charge of violating this section. No person may be
convicted under this section if, prior to being pursued by a law enforcement
officer, the person has moved the vehicle safely off the roadway.

(3)
It is an affirmative defense to a violation of subsection (1)(a) of this
section which the defendant must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that
the defendant consumed a sufficient quantity of alcohol after the time of being
in actual physical control of the vehicle and before the administration of an
analysis of the person's breath or blood to cause the defendant's alcohol
concentration to be 0.08 or more within two hours after being in such control.
The court shall not admit evidence of this defense unless the defendant
notifies the prosecution prior to the omnibus or pretrial hearing in the case
of the defendant's intent to assert the affirmative defense.

(4)
Analyses of blood or breath samples obtained more than two hours after the
alleged being in actual physical control of a vehicle may be used as evidence
that within two hours of the alleged being in such control, a person had an
alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more in violation of subsection (1)(a) of this
section, and in any case in which the analysis shows an alcohol concentration
above 0.00 may be used as evidence that a person was under the influence of or
affected by intoxicating liquor or any drug in violation of subsection (1)(b)
or (c) of this section.

(5) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

---
END ---