BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
46.61.165 and 1999 c 206 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The state department of transportation and the local authorities
are authorized to reserve all or any portion of any highway under their
respective jurisdictions as high-occupancy vehicle lanes, including any
designated lane or ramp, for the exclusive or preferential use of public
transportation vehicles or private motor vehicles carrying no fewer than a
specified number of passengers when ((such)) the limitation will
increase the efficient utilization of the highway or will aid in the
conservation of energy resources. Regulations authorizing ((such))
exclusive or preferential use of a highway facility ((may be declared to be
effective at all times or at specified times of day or on specified days)) are
authorized only when the department of transportation determines that the level
of traffic traveling on a high-occupancy vehicle lane is the same or greater
than the level of traffic on an adjacent general purpose lane. Violation
of a restriction of highway usage prescribed by the appropriate authority under
this section is a traffic infraction.

---
END ---