BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.600 RCW to read as follows:

Any
student who expresses an objection to the performance of or witnessing the
dissection of an animal shall not be required to participate in or observe the
dissection. Alternative projects shall be provided for the student. The
student shall not be penalized for the refusal.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.320 RCW to read as follows:

Each
school district board of directors shall adopt policies requiring any live
animals on the premises of a public school to be housed and cared for in a safe
and humane manner including but not limited to:

(1)
Maintaining the animal under the best possible conditions of health, comfort,
and well-being with sufficient food, water, and shelter with considerable
likeness to the animal's natural habitat, enough space to get adequate
exercise, and appropriate and comfortable temperatures;

(2)
Permitting experimentation with animals only to the extent permitted under
chapter 16.52 RCW and if qualifying as a properly conducted scientific
experiment under RCW 16.52.180; and

(3) Providing for any interaction with animals under the personal
direction of an educational employee of the school district who is familiar
with the requirements of the laws requiring the humane treatment of animals and
the prevention of cruelty to animals.

---
END ---