BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that:

(1)
Egg-laying hens are frequently subjected to cramped living quarters;

(2)
These cramped cages often lead to needless suffering for the hens;

(3)
The cramped conditions may cause health problems for the hens;

(4)
Cramped living conditions for egg-laying hens, in battery systems of cages, are
cruel and should be improved; and

(5)
Egg-laying hens should live in cages of adequate size to accommodate their
behavioral needs and allow them to move about within the cage.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 69.25 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
No egg handler nor dealer shall, as of July 1, 2005, keep any egg-laying hen in
a cage with less than eighty-six square inches of floor space per hen.

(2) The director shall adopt necessary rules to implement and
enforce this section.

---
END ---