BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that methamphetamine use has increased dramatically in recent
years. The legislature further finds the drug is often manufactured by private
citizens, some of whom are parents of young children. These children have been
found by authorities in situations dangerous to their health and safety either
because they are unsupervised by their parents or openly exposed to drug manufacturing
paraphernalia. The legislature intends that state intervention is necessary in
these situations to the extent necessary to protect the health, safety, and
welfare of the children involved.

Sec.
2. RCW
26.44.020 and 1999 c 176 s 29 are each amended to read as follows:

The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Court" means the superior court of the state of Washington, juvenile
department.

(2)
"Law enforcement agency" means the police department, the prosecuting
attorney, the state patrol, the director of public safety, or the office of the
sheriff.

(3)
"Practitioner of the healing arts" or "practitioner" means
a person licensed by this state to practice podiatric medicine and surgery,
optometry, chiropractic, nursing, dentistry, osteopathic medicine and surgery,
or medicine and surgery or to provide other health services. The term
"practitioner" includes a duly accredited Christian Science practitioner:
PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That a person who is being furnished Christian Science
treatment by a duly accredited Christian Science practitioner will not be
considered, for that reason alone, a neglected person for the purposes of this
chapter.

(4)
"Institution" means a private or public hospital or any other
facility providing medical diagnosis, treatment or care.

(5)
"Department" means the state department of social and health
services.

(6)
"Child" or "children" means any person under the age of eighteen
years of age.

(7)
"Professional school personnel" include, but are not limited to,
teachers, counselors, administrators, child care facility personnel, and school
nurses.

(8)
"Social service counselor" means anyone engaged in a professional
capacity during the regular course of employment in encouraging or promoting
the health, welfare, support or education of children, or providing social
services to adults or families, including mental health, drug and alcohol
treatment, and domestic violence programs, whether in an individual capacity,
or as an employee or agent of any public or private organization or
institution.

(9)
"Psychologist" means any person licensed to practice psychology under
chapter 18.83 RCW, whether acting in an individual capacity or as an employee
or agent of any public or private organization or institution.

(10)
"Pharmacist" means any registered pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW,
whether acting in an individual capacity or as an employee or agent of any
public or private organization or institution.

(11)
"Clergy" means any regularly licensed or ordained minister, priest,
or rabbi of any church or religious denomination, whether acting in an
individual capacity or as an employee or agent of any public or private
organization or institution.

(12)
"Abuse or neglect" means the injury, sexual abuse, sexual
exploitation, negligent treatment, or maltreatment of a child by any person
under circumstances which indicate that the child's health, welfare, and safety
is harmed, excluding conduct permitted under RCW 9A.16.100. An abused child is
a child who has been subjected to child abuse or neglect as defined in this
section.

(13)
"Child protective services section" means the child protective
services section of the department.

(14)
"Sexual exploitation" includes: (a) Allowing, permitting, or
encouraging a child to engage in prostitution by any person; or (b) allowing,
permitting, encouraging, or engaging in the obscene or pornographic
photographing, filming, or depicting of a child by any person.

(15)
"Negligent treatment or maltreatment" means an act or omission that
evidences a serious disregard of consequences of such magnitude as to
constitute a clear and present danger to the child's health, welfare, and
safety. The fact that siblings share a bedroom is not, in and of itself,
negligent treatment or maltreatment.

A
rebuttable presumption that a child has suffered negligent treatment or
maltreatment shall exist if, during investigation conducted by the department
under this chapter or by law enforcement, a child is found in a place where
methamphetamine is being manufactured or found at a site where methamphetamine
paraphernalia is openly accessible to the child.

(16)
"Child protective services" means those services provided by the
department designed to protect children from child abuse and neglect and
safeguard such children from future abuse and neglect, and conduct
investigations of child abuse and neglect reports. Investigations may be
conducted regardless of the location of the alleged abuse or neglect. Child
protective services includes referral to services to ameliorate conditions that
endanger the welfare of children, the coordination of necessary programs and
services relevant to the prevention, intervention, and treatment of child abuse
and neglect, and services to children to ensure that each child has a permanent
home. In determining whether protective services should be provided, the
department shall not decline to provide such services solely because of the child's
unwillingness or developmental inability to describe the nature and severity of
the abuse or neglect.

(17)
"Malice" or "maliciously" means an evil intent, wish, or
design to vex, annoy, or injure another person. Such malice may be inferred
from an act done in willful disregard of the rights of another, or an act
wrongfully done without just cause or excuse, or an act or omission of duty
betraying a willful disregard of social duty.

(18)
"Sexually aggressive youth" means a child who is defined in RCW
74.13.075(1)(b) as being a sexually aggressive youth.

(19) "Unfounded" means available information indicates
that, more likely than not, child abuse or neglect did not occur.

---
END ---