BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
35A.47.040 and 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.47.040 are each amended to read as
follows:

Every
code city shall have authority to permit and regulate under such restrictions
and conditions as it may set by charter or ordinance and to grant nonexclusive
franchises for the use of public streets, bridges or other public ways,
structures or places above or below the surface of the ground for railroads and
other routes and facilities for public conveyances, for poles, conduits,
tunnels, towers and structures, pipes and wires and appurtenances thereof for
transmission and distribution of electrical energy, signals and other methods
of communication, for gas, steam and liquid fuels, for water, sewer and other
private and publicly owned and operated facilities for public service,
including those operated by a county. The power hereby granted shall be in
addition to the franchise authority granted by general law to cities.

No
ordinance or resolution granting any franchise in a code city for any purpose
shall be adopted or passed by the city's legislative body on the day of its
introduction nor for five days thereafter, nor at any other than a regular
meeting nor without first being submitted to the city attorney, nor without
having been granted by the approving vote of at least a majority of the entire
legislative body, nor without being published at least once in a newspaper of
general circulation in the city before becoming effective.

The
city council may require a bond in a reasonable amount for any person or corporation
obtaining a franchise from the city conditioned upon the faithful performance
of the conditions and terms of the franchise and providing a recovery on the
bond in case of failure to perform the terms and conditions of the franchise.

A code city may exercise the authority hereby granted,
notwithstanding a contrary limitation of any preexisting charter provision.

---
END ---