BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
61.16.020 and 1995 c 62 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

Whenever
the amount due on any mortgage is paid, the mortgagee or the mortgagee's legal
representatives or assigns shall, ((at the request of any person interested
in the property mortgaged)) within sixty days, execute an instrument
in writing referring to the mortgage by the volume and page of the record or
otherwise sufficiently describing it and acknowledging satisfaction in full
thereof. ((Said)) The instrument shall be duly acknowledged, and
((upon request)) shall be recorded in the county wherein the mortgaged
property is situated. Every instrument of writing ((heretofore))
recorded before the effective date of this act and purporting to be a
satisfaction of mortgage, which sufficiently describes the mortgage which it
purports to satisfy so that the same may be readily identified, and which has
been duly acknowledged before an officer authorized by law to take
acknowledgments or oaths, is hereby declared legal and valid, and a certified
copy of the record thereof is hereby constituted prima facie evidence of such
satisfaction.

Sec.
2. RCW
61.16.030 and 1999 c 233 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

If the mortgagee fails to acknowledge satisfaction of the mortgage
as provided in RCW 61.16.020 sixty days from the date ((of such request or
demand)) paid, the mortgagee shall forfeit and pay to the mortgagor
damages and a reasonable attorneys' fee, to be recovered in any court having
competent jurisdiction, and ((said)) the court, when convinced
that ((said)) the mortgage has been fully satisfied, shall issue
an order in writing, directing the auditor to immediately record the order.

Sec.
3. RCW
61.24.110 and 1998 c 295 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

The trustee shall reconvey all or any part of the property
encumbered by the deed of trust to the person entitled thereto ((on written
request of the beneficiary, or upon)) within sixty days of
satisfaction of the obligation secured ((and written request for
reconveyance made by the beneficiary or the person entitled thereto)). The
reconveyance shall be recorded in the county where the property is located.

---
END ---