BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.04.4456 and 1999 c 311 s 302 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to the limits and provisions of this section, a credit is authorized against
the tax otherwise due under this chapter for persons engaged in a rural county
in the business of manufacturing software or programming, as those terms are
defined in this section.

(2)
A person who partially or totally relocates a business from one rural county to
another rural county is eligible for any qualifying new jobs created as a
result of the relocation but is not eligible to receive credit for the jobs
moved from one county to the other.

(3)(a)
To qualify for the credit, the qualifying activity of the person must be
conducted in a rural county and the qualified employment position must be
located in the rural county.

(b)
If an activity is conducted both from a rural county and outside of a rural
county, the credit is available if at least ninety percent of the qualifying
activity takes place within a rural county. If the qualifying activity is a
service taxable activity, the place where the work is performed is the place at
which the activity is conducted.

(4)(a)
The credit under this section shall equal one thousand dollars for each
qualified employment position created after July 1, 1999, in an eligible area.
A credit is earned for the calendar year the person is hired to fill the
position. Additionally a credit is earned for each year the position is
maintained over the subsequent consecutive years, up to four years. The county
must meet the definition of a rural county at the time the position is filled.
If the county does not have a rural county status the following year or years,
the position is still eligible for the remaining years if all other conditions
are met.

(b)
Credit may not be taken for hiring of persons into positions that exist before
July 1, 1999. Credit is authorized for new employees hired for new positions
created on or after July 1, 1999. New positions filled by existing employees
are eligible for the credit under this section only if the position vacated by
the existing employee is filled by a new hire. A business that is a sole
proprietorship without any employees is equivalent to one employee position and
this type of business is eligible to receive credit for one position.

(c)
If a position is filled before July 1st, this position is eligible for the full
yearly credit. If it is filled after June 30th, this position is eligible for
half of the credit.

(d)
A person that has engaged in qualifying activities in the rural county before
August 1, 1999, qualifies for the credit under this section for positions
created and filled after August 1, 1999.

(5)
No application is necessary for the tax credit. The person must keep records
necessary for the department to verify eligibility under this section. This
information includes information relating to description of qualifying activity
engaged in the rural county and outside the rural county by the person as well
as detailed records on positions and employees. The department shall, in
consultation with a representative group of affected taxpayers, develop a
method of segregating activity and related income so that those persons who
engage in multiple activities can determine eligibility for credit under this
section.

(6)
If at any time the department finds that a person is not eligible for tax
credit under this section, the amount of taxes for which a credit has been
claimed shall be immediately due. The department shall assess interest, but
not penalties, on the taxes for which the person is not eligible. The interest
shall be assessed at the rate provided for delinquent excise taxes under
chapter 82.32 RCW, shall be assessed retroactively to the date the tax credit
was taken, and shall accrue until the taxes for which a credit has been used
are repaid.

(7)
The credit under this section may be used against any tax due under this
chapter, but in no case may a credit earned during one calendar year be carried
over to be credited against taxes incurred in a subsequent calendar year. A
person is not eligible to receive a credit under this section if the person is
receiving credit for the same position under chapter 82.62 RCW or RCW
82.04.44525 or is taking the credit under RCW 82.04.4457. No refunds may be
granted for credits under this section.

(8)
A person taking tax credits under this section shall make an annual report to
the department. The report shall be in a letter form and shall include the
following information: Number of positions for which credit is being claimed,
type of position for which credit is being claimed, type of activity in which
the person is engaged in the county, and how long the person has been located
in the county. The report must be filed by January 30th of each year for which
credit was claimed during the previous year.

(9)
Transfer of ownership does not affect credit eligibility; however, the credit
is available to the successor for remaining periods in the five years only if
the eligibility conditions of this section are met.

(10)
A rural county may transfer its status as a rural county for the purposes of
this section to one adjacent county. If a rural county transfers its status as
a rural county, no qualified employment position that exists or is created in
the rural county after the transfer of status, that otherwise qualifies under
the provisions of this section, shall receive the credit under this section.
Persons in an adjacent county that is eligible for the credit under this
section must comply with all the requirements of this section, except for the
designation as a rural county.

(11)
As used in this section:

(a)
"Manufacturing" means the same as "to manufacture" under
RCW 82.04.120. Manufacturing includes the activities of both manufacturers and
processors for hire.

(b)
"Programming" means the activities that involve the creation or
modification of software, as that term is defined in this chapter, and that are
taxable as a service under RCW 82.04.290(2) or as a retail sale under RCW
82.04.050.

(c)
"Qualifying activity" means manufacturing of software or programming.

(d)
"Qualified employment position" means a permanent full-time position
doing programming of software or manufacturing of software. This excludes
administrative, professional, service, executive, and other similar positions.
If an employee is either voluntarily or involuntarily separated from
employment, the employment position is considered filled on a full-time basis
if the employer is either training or actively recruiting a replacement
employee. Full-time means a position for at least thirty-five hours a week.

(e)
"Rural county" means a county with a population density of less than
one hundred persons per square mile as determined by the office of financial
management and published each year by the department for the period July 1st to
June 30th.

(f)
"Software" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 82.04.215.

(g)
"Adjacent county" means a county having a common boundary with a
rural county.

(((11)))
(12) No credit may be taken or accrued under this section on or after
January 1, 2004.

(((12))) (13) This section expires December 31, 2003.

---
END ---