BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 82.08 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
For the period December 1st through December 7th, the tax levied by RCW
82.08.020 does not apply to sales of clothing and footwear for human use.

(2)
The exemption under this section includes fabric, thread, yarn, buttons, snaps,
hooks, zippers, and other items used or consumed to make or repair clothing if
the item becomes a physical component part of such clothing.

(3)
The exemption under this section does not apply to costumes or rented formal
wear; items made from real or imitation pearls, precious or semiprecious
stones, jewels, or metals; athletic equipment; or protective devices such as
motorcycle helmets.

(4)
The department may adopt rules to implement this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.12 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
For the period December 1st through December 7th, the provisions of this
chapter do not apply with respect to the use of clothing and footwear for human
use.

(2)
The exemption under this section includes fabric, thread, yarn, buttons, snaps,
hooks, zippers, and other items used or consumed to make or repair clothing if
the item becomes a physical component part of such clothing.

(3)
The exemption under this section does not apply to costumes or rented formal
wear; items made from real or imitation pearls, precious or semiprecious
stones, jewels, or metals; athletic equipment; or protective devices such as
motorcycle helmets.

(4) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.

---
END ---