BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
48.22.005 and 1993 c 242 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Automobile" means a passenger car as defined in RCW 46.04.382
registered or principally garaged in this state other than:

(a)
A farm-type tractor or other self-propelled equipment designed for use
principally off public roads;

(b)
A vehicle operated on rails or crawler-treads;

(c)
A vehicle located for use as a residence;

(d)
A motor home as defined in RCW 46.04.305; or

(e)
A moped as defined in RCW 46.04.304.

(2)
"Automobile liability insurance policy" means a policy insuring
against loss resulting from liability imposed by law for bodily injury, death,
or property damage suffered by any person and arising out of the ownership,
maintenance, or use of an insured automobile.

(3)
"Bodily injury" means bodily injury, sickness, or disease, including
death at any time resulting from the injury, sickness, or disease.

(((3)))
(4) "Income continuation benefits" means payments of at least
eighty-five percent of the insured's loss of income from work, because of
bodily injury sustained by him or her in the accident, less income earned
during the benefit payment period. The benefit payment period begins fourteen
days after the date of the accident and ends at the earliest of the following:

(a)
The date on which the insured is reasonably able to perform the duties of his
or her usual occupation;

(b)
The expiration of not more than fifty-two weeks from the fourteenth day; or

(c)
The date of the insured's death.

(((4)))
(5) "Insured automobile" means an automobile described on the
declarations page of the policy.

(((5)))
(6) "Insured" means:

(a)
The named insured or a person who is a resident of the named insured's
household and is either related to the named insured by blood, marriage, or
adoption, or is the named insured's ward, foster child, or stepchild; or

(b)
A person who sustains bodily injury caused by accident while: (i) Occupying or
using the insured automobile with the permission of the named insured; or (ii)
a pedestrian accidentally struck by the insured automobile.

(((6)))
(7) "Loss of services benefits" means reimbursement for
payment to others, not members of the insured's household, for expenses
reasonably incurred for services in lieu of those the insured would usually
have performed for his or her household without compensation, provided the services
are actually rendered, and ending the earliest of the following:

(a)
The date on which the insured person is reasonably able to perform those
services;

(b)
The expiration of fifty-two weeks; or

(c)
The date of the insured's death.

(((7)))
(8) "Low-income" means a person at or below two hundred percent
but above one hundred percent of the federal poverty level as established by
the United States department of health and human services.

(9)
"Medical and hospital benefits" means payments for all reasonable and
necessary expenses incurred by or on behalf of the insured for injuries
sustained as a result of an automobile accident for health care services
provided by persons licensed under Title 18 RCW, including pharmaceuticals,
prosthetic devices and eye glasses, and necessary ambulance, hospital, and
professional nursing service.

(((8)
"Automobile liability insurance policy" means a policy insuring
against loss resulting from liability imposed by law for bodily injury, death,
or property damage suffered by any person and arising out of the ownership,
maintenance, or use of an insured automobile.

(9))) (10)
"Named insured" means the individual named in the declarations of the
policy and includes his or her spouse if a resident of the same household.

(((10)))
(11) "Occupying" means in or upon or entering into or
alighting from.

(((11)))
(12) "Pedestrian" means a natural person not occupying a motor
vehicle as defined in RCW 46.04.320.

(((12)))
(13) "Personal injury protection" means the benefits described
in this section and RCW 48.22.085 through 48.22.100.

(14)
"Very low-income" means a person at or below one hundred percent of
the federal poverty level as established by the United States department of
health and human services.

Sec.
2. RCW
48.22.020 and 1947 c 79 s .22.02 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The commissioner shall after consultation with the insurers licensed to write
motor vehicle liability insurance in this state, approve a reasonable plan or
plans for the equitable apportionment among such insurers of applicants for
such insurance who are in good faith entitled to but are unable to procure
insurance through ordinary methods and, when such plan has been approved, all
such insurers shall subscribe thereto and shall participate therein. Any
applicant for such insurance, any person insured under such plan and any
insurer affected may appeal to the commissioner from any ruling or decision of
the manager or committee designated to operate such plan.

(2)(a)
The commissioner, in consultation with insurers authorized to write motor
vehicle liability insurance in this state, shall establish an assigned risk
plan to assist low-income persons obtain the mandatory minimum motor vehicle
liability insurance coverage. The purpose of the plan is to enable low-income
persons to avoid breaking the law because they cannot afford the mandatory
motor vehicle liability insurance but must drive to work, to take their
children to health care providers, and to conduct other necessary errands. The
commissioner shall ensure that the plan provides the minimum liability
requirements under chapter 46.30 RCW without cost to very low-income persons
and requires a contribution based on income for low-income persons. The
commissioner shall ensure that the plan is comprised of all insurers licensed
to write motor vehicle liability insurance in this state.

(b)
The commissioner shall ensure that the plan assists as many low-income persons
as funds allow and prioritizes assistance based on income, good driving record,
lack of availability of public transit, transportation needs, and other
criteria established by the commissioner.

(c)
The commissioner shall report each December to the insurance committees of the
legislature on the assigned risk plan created by this subsection (2).

(d)
This subsection expires June 30, 2005.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 48.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Of the premium taxes collected under RCW 48.14.020, beginning in 2000, the
state treasurer shall deposit 98.5 percent of the amount collected in the
general fund and 1.5 percent in the mandatory vehicle liability insurance
assistance account created in section 4 of this act.

(2)
This section expires December 31, 2004.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 48.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The mandatory vehicle liability insurance assistance account is created in the
state treasury. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the assigned risk plan
created in RCW 48.22.020(2).

(2)
This section expires June 30, 2005.

Sec.
5. RCW
46.30.020 and 1991 sp.s. c 25 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
No person may operate a motor vehicle subject to registration under chapter
46.16 RCW in this state unless the person is insured under a motor vehicle
liability policy with liability limits of at least the amounts provided in RCW
46.29.090, is self-insured as provided in RCW 46.29.630, is covered by a
certificate of deposit in conformance with RCW 46.29.550, or is covered by a
liability bond of at least the amounts provided in RCW 46.29.090. Written
proof of financial responsibility for motor vehicle operation must be provided
on the request of a law enforcement officer in the format specified under RCW
46.30.030.

(b)
A person who drives a motor vehicle that is required to be registered in
another state that requires drivers and owners of vehicles in that state to
maintain insurance or financial responsibility shall, when requested by a law
enforcement officer, provide evidence of financial responsibility or insurance
as is required by the laws of the state in which the vehicle is registered.

(c)
When asked to do so by a law enforcement officer, failure to display an
insurance identification card as specified under RCW 46.30.030 creates a
presumption that the person does not have motor vehicle insurance.

(d)
Failure to provide proof of motor vehicle insurance is a traffic infraction and
is subject to penalties as set by the supreme court under RCW 46.63.110 or
community service.

(2)
If a person cited for a violation of subsection (1) of this section appears in
person before the court and provides written evidence that at the time the
person was cited, he or she was in compliance with the financial responsibility
requirements of subsection (1) of this section, the citation shall be dismissed.
If a person cited for a violation of subsection (1) of this section appears
in person before the court and within thirty days provides written evidence of
having obtained motor vehicle insurance in conformance with subsection (1) of
this section, the citation may be dismissed. In lieu of personal
appearance, a person cited for a violation of subsection (1) of this section
may, before the date scheduled for the person's appearance before the court,
submit by mail to the court written evidence that at the time the person was
cited, he or she was in compliance with the financial responsibility
requirements of subsection (1) of this section, in which case the citation
shall be dismissed without cost, except that the court may assess court
administrative costs of twenty-five dollars at the time of dismissal.

(3)
The provisions of this chapter shall not govern:

(a)
The operation of a motor vehicle registered under RCW 46.16.305(1), governed by
RCW 46.16.020, or registered with the Washington utilities and transportation
commission as common or contract carriers; or

(b)
The operation of a motorcycle as defined in RCW 46.04.330, a motor-driven cycle
as defined in RCW 46.04.332, or a moped as defined in RCW 46.04.304.

(4)
RCW 46.29.490 shall not be deemed to govern all motor vehicle liability
policies required by this chapter but only those certified for the purposes
stated in chapter 46.29 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. The
sum of one million three hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the
account created under section 4 of this act to the office of the insurance
commissioner for the purposes of the assigned risk plan created under RCW
48.22.020(2).

---
END ---