BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The sum of seventy-five thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be
necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, from the
general fund to the gambling commission for the purposes of youth education
awareness on problem gambling.

(2) The sum of seventy-five thousand dollars, or as much thereof as
may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001,
from the general fund to the gambling commission for the purposes of youth
education awareness on problem gambling.

---
END ---