BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 84.52 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A school district may impose an annual regular property tax not exceeding the
difference between three dollars and sixty cents per thousand dollars of
assessed valuation and the dollar rate of tax levied by the state under RCW
84.52.065 for that year. If a school district imposes a regular property tax
under this section which, in combination with the regular property taxes
imposed by other taxing districts, will result in property taxes in excess of
the limitation on regular property taxes contained in RCW 84.52.050, the
regular property tax levy of the school district under this section shall be
reduced or eliminated before the regular property tax levies of the other
taxing districts are reduced.

(2)
No tax may be imposed under this section by a school district unless the
maximum dollar rate to be levied under this section is authorized by a
proposition approved by a majority of the voters of the district voting on the
proposition at a general election held within the district or at a special
election within the district called by the district for the purpose of
submitting such proposition to the voters.

(3)
No school district may increase the dollar rate of tax levied under this
section over the rate authorized under subsection (2) of this section unless
the higher rate is also authorized under subsection (2) of this section.

(4)
Any tax imposed under this section shall only be used for the maintenance and
operation support of the school district.

Sec.
2. RCW
84.52.010 and 1995 2nd sp.s. c 13 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as is permitted under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes shall be levied or voted in
specific amounts.

The
rate percent of all taxes for state and county purposes, and purposes of taxing
districts coextensive with the county, shall be determined, calculated and
fixed by the county assessors of the respective counties, within the
limitations provided by law, upon the assessed valuation of the property of the
county, as shown by the completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent
of all taxes levied for purposes of taxing districts within any county shall be
determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the respective
counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the assessed valuation
of the property of the taxing districts respectively.

When
a county assessor finds that the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property,
that is subject to the limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.043 or 84.52.050,
exceeds the limitations provided in either of these sections, the assessor
shall recompute and establish a consolidated levy in the following manner:

(1)
The full certified rates of tax levy for state, county, county road district,
and city or town purposes shall be extended on the tax rolls in amounts not
exceeding the limitations established by law; however any state levy shall take
precedence over all other levies and shall not be reduced for any purpose other
than that required by RCW 84.55.010.

(2)
If, as a result of the levies imposed under section 1 of this act, the combined
rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent
limitation exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then
the levy under section 1 of this act shall be reduced until the combined rate
no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or
shall be eliminated.

(3)
If, as a result of the levies imposed under RCW 84.52.069, 84.34.230, the
portion of the levy by a metropolitan park district that was protected under
RCW 84.52.120, and 84.52.105, the combined rate of regular property tax levies
that are subject to the one percent limitation exceeds one percent of the true
and fair value of any property, then these levies shall be reduced as follows:
(a) The portion of the levy by a metropolitan park district that is protected
under RCW 84.52.120 shall be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds
one percent of the true and fair value of any property or shall be eliminated;
(b) if the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the
one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of
any property, then the levies imposed under RCW 84.34.230, 84.52.105, and any
portion of the levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 that is in excess of thirty
cents per thousand dollars of assessed value, shall be reduced on a pro rata
basis until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and
fair value of any property or shall be eliminated; and (c) if the combined rate
of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation
still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then the
thirty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of tax levy imposed under
RCW 84.52.069 shall be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent
of the true and fair value of any property or eliminated.

(((2)))
(4) The certified rates of tax levy subject to these limitations by all
junior taxing districts imposing taxes on such property shall be reduced or
eliminated as follows to bring the consolidated levy of taxes on such property
within the provisions of these limitations:

(a)
First, the certified property tax levy rates of those junior taxing districts
authorized under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, and 67.38.130 shall be reduced on a
pro rata basis or eliminated;

(b)
Second, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the
certified property tax levy rates of flood control zone districts shall be
reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;

(c)
Third, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the
certified property tax levy rates of all other junior taxing districts, other
than fire protection districts, library districts, the first fifty cent per
thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park districts,
and the first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levies for
public hospital districts, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;

(d)
Fourth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the
certified property tax levy rates authorized to fire protection districts under
RCW 52.16.140 and 52.16.160 shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;
and

(e)
Fifth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the
certified property tax levy rates authorized for fire protection districts
under RCW 52.16.130, library districts, metropolitan park districts under their
first fifty cent per thousand dollars of assessed valuation levy, and public
hospital districts under their first fifty cent per thousand dollars of
assessed valuation levy, shall be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated.

((In
determining whether the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property, that is
subject to the limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations
provided in that section, the assessor shall use the hypothetical state levy,
as apportioned to the county under RCW 84.48.080, that was computed under RCW
84.48.080 without regard to the reduction under RCW 84.55.012.))

Sec.
3. RCW
84.52.043 and 1995 c 99 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Within
and subject to the limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 as amended, the regular
ad valorem tax levies upon real and personal property by the taxing districts
hereafter named shall be as follows:

(1)
Levies of the senior taxing districts shall be as follows: (a) The levy by the
state shall not exceed three dollars and sixty cents per thousand dollars of
assessed value adjusted to the state equalized value in accordance with the
indicated ratio fixed by the state department of revenue to be used exclusively
for the support of the common schools; (b) the levy by any county shall not
exceed one dollar and eighty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value; (c)
the levy by any road district shall not exceed two dollars and twenty-five
cents per thousand dollars of assessed value; and (d) the levy by any city or
town shall not exceed three dollars and thirty-seven and one-half cents per
thousand dollars of assessed value. However any county is hereby authorized to
increase its levy from one dollar and eighty cents to a rate not to exceed two
dollars and forty-seven and one-half cents per thousand dollars of assessed
value for general county purposes if the total levies for both the county and
any road district within the county do not exceed four dollars and five cents
per thousand dollars of assessed value, and no other taxing district has its
levy reduced as a result of the increased county levy.

(2)
The aggregate levies of junior taxing districts and senior taxing districts,
other than the state, shall not exceed five dollars and ninety cents per
thousand dollars of assessed valuation. The term "junior taxing
districts" includes all taxing districts other than the state, counties,
road districts, cities, towns, port districts, and public utility districts.
The limitations provided in this subsection shall not apply to: (a) Levies at
the rates provided by existing law by or for any port or public utility
district; (b) excess property tax levies authorized in Article VII, section 2
of the state Constitution; (c) levies for acquiring conservation futures as
authorized under RCW 84.34.230; (d) levies for emergency medical care or
emergency medical services imposed under RCW 84.52.069; (e) levies to finance
affordable housing for very low-income housing imposed under RCW 84.52.105; ((and))
(f) the portions of levies by metropolitan park districts that are protected
under RCW 84.52.120; and (g) levies by school districts under section 1 of
this act.

Sec.
4. RCW
28A.500.030 and 1999 c 317 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Allocation
of state matching funds to eligible districts for local effort assistance shall
be determined as follows:

(1)
Funds raised by the district through maintenance and operation levies under
RCW 84.52.053 and section 1 of this act shall be matched with state funds
using the following ratio of state funds to levy funds:

(a)
The difference between the district's twelve percent levy rate and the
state-wide average twelve percent levy rate; to

(b)
The state-wide average twelve percent levy rate.

(2)
The maximum amount of state matching funds for districts eligible for local
effort assistance shall be the district's twelve percent levy amount,
multiplied by the following percentage:

(a)
The difference between the district's twelve percent levy rate and the
state-wide average twelve percent levy rate; divided by

(b)
The district's twelve percent levy rate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. The
secretary of state shall submit this act to the people for their adoption and
ratification, or rejection, at the next general election to be held in this
state, in accordance with Article II, section 1 of the state Constitution and
the laws adopted to facilitate its operation.

---
END ---