BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
36.70A.040 and 1998 c 171 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Each county that has both a population of fifty thousand or more and, until May
16, 1995, has had its population increase by more than ten percent in the
previous ten years or, on or after May 16, 1995, has had its population
increase by more than seventeen percent in the previous ten years, and the
cities located within such county, and any other county regardless of its
population that has had its population increase by more than twenty percent in
the previous ten years, and the cities located within such county, shall
conform with all of the requirements of this chapter. However, the county
legislative authority of such a county with a population of less than fifty
thousand population may adopt a resolution removing the county, and the cities
located within the county, from the requirements of adopting comprehensive land
use plans and development regulations under this chapter if this resolution is
adopted and filed with the department by December 31, 1990, for counties
initially meeting this set of criteria, or within sixty days of the date the
office of financial management certifies that a county meets this set of
criteria under subsection (5) of this section. For the purposes of this
subsection, a county not currently planning under this chapter is not required
to include in its population count those persons confined in a correctional
facility under the jurisdiction of the department of corrections that is
located in the county.

Once
a county meets either of these sets of criteria, the requirement to conform
with all of the requirements of this chapter remains in effect, even if the
county no longer meets one of these sets of criteria.

(2)
The county legislative authority of any county that does not meet either of the
sets of criteria established under subsection (1) of this section may adopt a
resolution indicating its intention to have subsection (1) of this section
apply to the county. Each city, located in a county that chooses to plan under
this subsection, shall conform with all of the requirements of this chapter.
Once such a resolution has been adopted, the county and the cities located
within the county remain subject to all of the requirements of this chapter.

(3)
Any county or city that is initially required to conform with all of the
requirements of this chapter under subsection (1) of this section shall take
actions under this chapter as follows: (a) The county legislative authority
shall adopt a county-wide planning policy under RCW 36.70A.210; (b) the county
and each city located within the county shall designate critical areas,
agricultural lands, forest lands, and mineral resource lands, and adopt
development regulations conserving these designated agricultural lands, forest
lands, and mineral resource lands and protecting these designated critical
areas, under RCW 36.70A.170 and 36.70A.060; (c) the county shall designate and
take other actions related to urban growth areas under RCW 36.70A.110; (d) if
the county has a population of fifty thousand or more, the county and each city
located within the county shall adopt a comprehensive plan under this chapter
and development regulations that are consistent with and implement the comprehensive
plan on or before July 1, 1994, and if the county has a population of less than
fifty thousand, the county and each city located within the county shall adopt
a comprehensive plan under this chapter and development regulations that are
consistent with and implement the comprehensive plan by January 1, 1995, but if
the governor makes written findings that a county with a population of less
than fifty thousand or a city located within such a county is not making
reasonable progress toward adopting a comprehensive plan and development
regulations the governor may reduce this deadline for such actions to be taken
by no more than one hundred eighty days. Any county or city subject to this
subsection may obtain an additional six months before it is required to have
adopted its development regulations by submitting a letter notifying the
department of community, trade, and economic development of its need prior to
the deadline for adopting both a comprehensive plan and development
regulations.

(4)
Any county or city that is required to conform with all the requirements of
this chapter, as a result of the county legislative authority adopting its
resolution of intention under subsection (2) of this section, shall take
actions under this chapter as follows: (a) The county legislative authority
shall adopt a county-wide planning policy under RCW 36.70A.210; (b) the county
and each city that is located within the county shall adopt development
regulations conserving agricultural lands, forest lands, and mineral resource
lands it designated under RCW 36.70A.060 within one year of the date the county
legislative authority adopts its resolution of intention; (c) the county shall
designate and take other actions related to urban growth areas under RCW
36.70A.110; and (d) the county and each city that is located within the county
shall adopt a comprehensive plan and development regulations that are
consistent with and implement the comprehensive plan not later than four years
from the date the county legislative authority adopts its resolution of
intention, but a county or city may obtain an additional six months before it
is required to have adopted its development regulations by submitting a letter
notifying the department of community, trade, and economic development of its
need prior to the deadline for adopting both a comprehensive plan and
development regulations.

(5)
If the office of financial management certifies that the population of a county
that previously had not been required to plan under subsection (1) or (2) of
this section has changed sufficiently to meet either of the sets of criteria
specified under subsection (1) of this section, and where applicable, the
county legislative authority has not adopted a resolution removing the county
from these requirements as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the
county and each city within such county shall take actions under this chapter
as follows: (a) The county legislative authority shall adopt a county-wide
planning policy under RCW 36.70A.210; (b) the county and each city located
within the county shall adopt development regulations under RCW 36.70A.060
conserving agricultural lands, forest lands, and mineral resource lands it
designated within one year of the certification by the office of financial
management; (c) the county shall designate and take other actions related to
urban growth areas under RCW 36.70A.110; and (d) the county and each city
located within the county shall adopt a comprehensive land use plan and
development regulations that are consistent with and implement the
comprehensive plan within four years of the certification by the office of
financial management, but a county or city may obtain an additional six months
before it is required to have adopted its development regulations by submitting
a letter notifying the department of community, trade, and economic development
of its need prior to the deadline for adopting both a comprehensive plan and
development regulations.

(6)
A copy of each document that is required under this section shall be submitted
to the department at the time of its adoption.

(7) Cities and counties planning under this chapter must amend the
transportation element of the comprehensive plan to be in compliance with this
chapter and chapter 47.80 RCW no later than December 31, 2000.

---
END ---