BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
48.50.020 and 1995 c 369 s 36 and 1995 c 285 s 21 are each reenacted to read as
follows:

As
used in this chapter the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Authorized agency" means a public agency or its official
representative having legal authority to investigate criminal activity or the
cause of a fire or to initiate criminal proceedings, including the following
persons and agencies:

(a)
The chief of the Washington state patrol and the director of fire protection;

(b)
The prosecuting attorney of the county where the criminal activity occurred;

(c)
State, county, and local law enforcement agencies;

(d)
The state attorney general;

(e)
The Federal Bureau of Investigation, or any other federal law enforcement
agency;

(f)
The United States attorney's office; and

(g)
The office of the insurance commissioner.

(2)
"Insurer" means any insurer, as defined in RCW 48.01.050 and any
self-insurer.

(3) "Relevant information" means information having any
tendency to make the existence of any fact that is of consequence to the
investigation or determination of criminal activity or the cause of any fire
more probable or less probable than it would be without the information.

Sec.
2. RCW
48.50.040 and 1995 c 369 s 37 and 1995 c 285 s 23 are each reenacted to read as
follows:

(1)
When an insurer has reason to believe that a fire loss reported to the insurer
may be of other than accidental cause, the insurer shall notify the chief of
the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, in the
manner prescribed under RCW 48.05.320 concerning the circumstances of the fire
loss, including any and all relevant material developed from the insurer's
inquiry into the fire loss.

(2)
Notification of the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director
of fire protection, under subsection (1) of this section does not relieve the
insurer of the duty to respond to a request for information from any other
authorized agency and does not bar an insurer from other reporting under RCW
48.50.030(2).

Sec.
3. RCW
48.50.050 and 1979 ex.s. c 80 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

An
authorized agency receiving information under RCW 48.50.030 ((or)),
48.50.040, or section 4 of this act may release or provide such
information to any other authorized agencies.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 48.50 RCW to read as follows:

An
insurer providing information to an authorized agency or agencies under RCW
48.50.030 or 48.50.040 may request that an authorized agency furnish to the
insurer any or all relevant information possessed by the agency relating to the
particular fire loss. At their discretion, and unless prohibited by any other
provision of law, the agency or agencies may release or provide information to
the requesting insurer.

Sec.
5. RCW
48.50.070 and 1980 c 102 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

Any licensed insurance agent, any licensed insurance broker, or any
insurer or person acting in the insurer's behalf or any authorized agency which
releases information, whether oral or written, under RCW 48.50.030, 48.50.040,
48.50.050, or ((48.50.060 shall be)) section 4 of this act is
immune from liability in any civil or criminal action, suit, or prosecution
arising from the release of the information, unless actual malice on the part
of the agent, broker, insurer, or authorized agency against the insured is
shown.

---
END ---