BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28B.102.010 and 1987 c 437 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that encouraging outstanding students and classified
employees to enter the teaching profession is of paramount importance to
the state of Washington. By creating the future teachers conditional
scholarship program, the legislature intends to assist in the effort to recruit
as future teachers, students who have distinguished themselves through
outstanding academic achievement, individuals who have demonstrated their
commitment to children and education as classified employees, and ((students))
individuals who can act as role models for children ((including those
from targeted ethnic minorities)). The legislature urges business,
industry, and philanthropic community organizations to join with state
government in making this program successful.

Sec.
2. RCW
28B.102.020 and 1996 c 53 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

Unless
the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply
throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Conditional scholarship" means a loan that is forgiven in whole or
in part if the recipient renders service as a teacher in an approved education
program in this state.

(2)
"Institution of higher education" or "institution" means a
college or university in the state of Washington which is accredited by an
accrediting association recognized as such by rule of the higher education
coordinating board.

(3)
"Board" means the higher education coordinating board.

(4)
"Classified employee" means an employee of a school district or
educational service district who does not hold a Washington teaching
certificate.

(5)
"Eligible student" means a student who is registered for at least ten
credit hours or the equivalent, demonstrates achievement of at least a 3.30
grade point average for students entering an institution of higher education
directly from high school or maintains at least a 3.00 grade point average or
the equivalent for each academic year in an institution of higher education, is
a resident student as defined by RCW 28B.15.012 and 28B.15.013, and has a
declared intention to complete an approved preparation program leading to
initial teacher certification or required for earning an additional
endorsement, or a college or university graduate who meets the same credit hour
requirements and is seeking an additional teaching endorsement or initial
teacher certification. Resident students defined in RCW 28B.15.012(2)(e) are
not eligible students under this chapter.

(((5)))
(6) "Public school" means an elementary school, a middle
school, junior high school, or high school within the public school system
referred to in Article IX of the state Constitution.

(((6)))
(7) "Forgiven" or "to forgive" or
"forgiveness" means to render service as a teacher in an approved
education program in the state of Washington in lieu of monetary repayment.

(((7)))
(8) "Satisfied" means paid-in-full.

(((8)))
(9) "Participant" means an eligible student or classified
employee who has received a conditional scholarship under this chapter.

(((9)
"Targeted ethnic minority")) (10) "Historically
underrepresented populations" means ((a)) groups of
Americans ((with a common ethnic or racial heritage selected)) identified
by the board ((for program consideration due to societal concerns such as
high dropout rates or low rates of college participation by members of the
group)) because their participation in college has been significantly
lower than their representation in the overall population.

(((10)))
(11) "Approved education program" means an education program
in the state of Washington for knowledge and skills generally learned in
preschool through twelfth grade. Approved education programs may include but
are not limited to:

(a)
K-12 schools under Title 28A RCW;

(b)
Early childhood education and assistance programs under RCW 28A.215.100 through
28A.215.200 or the federal head start program;

(c)
An approved school under chapter 28A.195 RCW;

(d)
Education centers under chapter 28A.205 RCW;

(e)
English as a second language programs and programs leading to high school
graduation or the equivalency operated by community or technical colleges; and

(f)
Tribal schools in Washington approved by the federal bureau of Indian affairs.

(12)
"Equalization charge" means the additional amount added to the
principle of the loan in order to equate the debt to that which the participant
would have incurred if the loan had been received through the federal
subsidized Stafford student loan program. The equalization charge is only
applied to those participants who fail to satisfy their teaching obligation and
are required to repay all or part of the conditional scholarship.

(13)
"Teacher shortage area" means an area where there is a shortage of
preschool, elementary, or secondary school teachers and can be designated in a
specific subject matter, discipline classification, or geographic area as
identified by the office of superintendent of public instruction.

Sec.
3. RCW
28B.102.030 and 1987 c 437 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
future teachers conditional scholarship program is established. The program
shall include scholarships for eligible students and classified employees.
The program shall be administered by the higher education coordinating board.
In administering the program, the board shall have the following powers and
duties:

(1)
Select students and classified employees to receive conditional
scholarships, with the assistance of a screening committee composed of teachers,
representatives of classified employees, and leaders in government,
business, and education;

(2)
Adopt necessary rules and guidelines;

(3)
Publicize the program, including special efforts to recruit historically
underrepresented populations to apply for the program;

(4)
Collect and manage repayments from ((students)) participants who
do not meet their teaching obligations under this chapter; and

(5)
Solicit and accept grants and donations from public and private sources for the
program.

Sec.
4. RCW
28B.102.040 and 1987 c 437 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

The higher education coordinating board shall establish a planning
committee to develop criteria for the screening and selection of recipients of
the conditional scholarships. These criteria shall emphasize factors
demonstrating excellence including but not limited to superior scholastic
achievement, leadership ability, community contributions, and an ability to act
as a role model for ((targeted ethnic minority)) students. These
criteria also may include, for approximately half of the recipients,
requirements that those recipients meet the definition of "needy
student" under RCW 28B.10.802.

Sec.
5. RCW
28B.102.050 and 1987 c 437 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board may award conditional scholarships to classified employees and
eligible students from the funds appropriated to the board for this purpose, or
from any private donations, or any other funds given to the board for this program.
The amount of the conditional scholarship awarded an individual shall not
exceed ((three thousand dollars per academic year)) four thousand
dollars in the 2000-01 academic year. The board may adjust the annual award by
the rate of undergraduate, resident tuition increases at the public four-year
research universities. ((Students)) Participants are
eligible to receive conditional scholarships for a maximum of five years.

Sec.
6. RCW
28B.102.060 and 1996 c 53 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Participants in the conditional scholarship program incur an obligation to
repay the conditional scholarship, with interest and with an equalization
charge, unless they teach for two years in an approved education program
for each year of scholarship received, under rules adopted by the board. Participants
who teach in a designated teacher shortage area shall have one year of loan
forgiven for each year they teach in the shortage area.

(2)
The interest rate on new loans shall be ((eight percent for the first
four years of repayment and ten percent beginning with the fifth year of
repayment)) determined annually by the board. The annual interest rate
should generally parallel the current rate for new loans in the primary federal
student loan program for undergraduate students. Participants who fail to
complete the teaching service shall incur an equalization charge of not more
than three percent of the remaining unforgiven balance. The equalization
charge shall be added to the remaining balance and repaid by the participant.

(3)
The minimum payment shall be set by the board, but shall not be less than
fifty dollars per month. The maximum period for repayment shall be ten
years, with payments of principal and interest accruing quarterly commencing
nine months from the date the participant completes or discontinues the course
of study. Provisions for deferral of payment shall be determined by the board.

(4)
The entire principal and interest of each payment shall be forgiven for each
payment period in which the participant teaches in an approved education
program until the entire repayment obligation is satisfied. Should the
participant cease to teach in an approved education program in this state
before the participant's repayment obligation is completed, payments on the
unsatisfied portion of the principal and interest shall begin the next payment
period and continue until the remainder of the participant's repayment
obligation is satisfied.

(5)
The board is responsible for collection of repayments made under this section
and shall exercise due diligence in such collection, maintaining all necessary
records to insure that maximum repayments are made. Collection and servicing
of repayments under this section shall be pursued using the full extent of the
law, including wage garnishment if necessary. The board is responsible to
forgive all or parts of such repayments under the criteria established in this
section and shall maintain all necessary records of forgiven payments.

(6)
Receipts from the payment of principal or interest or any other subsidies to
which the board as administrator is entitled, which are paid by or on behalf of
participants under this section, shall be deposited with the higher education
coordinating board and shall be used to cover the costs of granting the
conditional scholarships, maintaining necessary records, and making collections
under subsection (5) of this section. The board shall maintain accurate
records of these costs, and all receipts beyond those necessary to pay such
costs shall be used to grant conditional scholarships to classified
employees and eligible students.

(7)
The board shall temporarily or, in special circumstances, permanently defer the
requirements of this section for classified employees and eligible
students as defined in RCW 28B.10.017.

(8)
The board may cancel a recipient's repayment obligation due to the recipient's
total and permanent disability or death, subject to documentation as required
by the board.

(9)
This section applies to recipients of conditional scholarships awarded before
or after July 1, 1996.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A
new section is added to chapter 28B.102 RCW to read as follows:

The
future teachers conditional scholarship account is created in the custody of
the state treasurer. All receipts from moneys appropriated from the
legislature for the future teachers conditional scholarship program, private
contributions to the program, and receipts from participant repayments must be
deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for
conditional loans to participants and for the board's administrative costs
associated with the awarding, tracking, and collection of the loans. Only the
executive director of the higher education coordinating board or the executive
director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account
is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation
is not required for expenditures. With the exception of operating costs
associated with the management of the account by the treasurer's office as
authorized in chapter 43.79A RCW, the account shall be credited with all
investment income earned by the account.

Sec.
8. RCW
43.79A.040 and 1999 c 384 s 8 and 1999 c 182 s 2 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
Money in the treasurer's trust fund may be deposited, invested, and reinvested
by the state treasurer in accordance with RCW 43.84.080 in the same manner and
to the same extent as if the money were in the state treasury.

(2)
All income received from investment of the treasurer's trust fund shall be set
aside in an account in the treasury trust fund to be known as the investment
income account.

(3)
The investment income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased
banking services on behalf of treasurer's trust funds including, but not
limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state
treasurer or affected state agencies. The investment income account is subject
in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for
payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution
of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4)(a)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
investment income account to the state general fund except under (b) and (c) of
this subsection.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the
period: The future teachers conditional scholarship account, the
Washington advanced college tuition payment program account, the agricultural
local fund, the American Indian scholarship endowment fund, the Washington
international exchange scholarship endowment fund, the developmental
disabilities endowment trust fund, the energy account, the fair fund, the game
farm alternative account, the grain inspection revolving fund, the juvenile
accountability incentive account, the rural rehabilitation account, the stadium
and exhibition center account, the youth athletic facility grant account, the
self-insurance revolving fund, the sulfur dioxide abatement account, and the
children's trust fund. However, the earnings to be distributed shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.

(c)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The advanced right of way revolving fund, the
advanced environmental mitigation revolving account, the federal narcotics
asset forfeitures account, the high occupancy vehicle account, the local rail
service assistance account, and the miscellaneous transportation programs
account.

(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state
Constitution, no trust accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without
the specific affirmative directive of this section.

---
END ---