BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 3.66 RCW to read as follows:

All
court-ordered financial obligations that are ordered as a result of a
conviction for a criminal offense in a court of limited jurisdiction may be
enforced in the same manner as a judgment in a civil action by the party or
entity to whom the legal financial obligation is owed. The judgment and
sentence must identify the party or entity to whom restitution is owed so that
the state, party, or entity may enforce the judgment.

All
court-ordered financial obligations may be enforced at any time during the
ten-year period following the offender's release from total confinement or
within ten years of entry of the judgment and sentence, whichever period is
longer. Prior to the expiration of the initial ten-year period, the court may
extend the criminal judgment an additional ten years for payment of
court-ordered financial obligations.

The
party or entity to whom the court-ordered financial obligation is owed has the
authority to utilize any other remedies available to the party or entity to
collect the court-ordered financial obligation.

Nothing in this section is to be construed to deprive the court of
determining whether the offender's failure to pay the legal financial
obligation constitutes a violation of a condition of probation or imposing a
sanction upon the offender if such a violation is found.

---
END ---