BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
3.42.030 and 1984 c 258 s 32 are each amended to read as follows:

Any party may have a case transferred from a district court
commissioner to a judge of the same district for hearing, by filing a motion
for transfer as long as the motion is filed and called to the attention of
the commissioner before any discretionary ruling has been made. The following
are not considered discretionary rulings: (1) The arrangement of the calendar;
(2) the setting of an action, motion, or proceeding for hearing or trial; (3)
the arraignment of the accused; or (4) the fixing of bail. The
commissioner shall forthwith transfer the case to the judge.

---
END ---