BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The legislature finds that the "Becca Bill" and subsequent amendments
were enacted in 1995 with the intent of providing parents with legal support to
provide appropriate control and custody of their children, and assisting
parents and children with family conflict.

(2)
The Washington state institute for public policy shall conduct a study that
examines the effectiveness of the mandatory treatment and secure residential
placement provisions of the at-risk youth or child in need of services petition
process. The study shall include a review of the reasons for filing the
petitions, options ordered by the court, and services received for a
representative sample of cases. The study shall examine criminal and
delinquent activity of the youth subject to petitions, substance abuse issues
for those youth, and school retention. The study shall also include an
assessment of the fiscal impact of the services received as a result of the
filed petition.

(3)
The office of the administrator for the courts, the department of social and
health services, the superintendent of public instruction, and all other state
and local governments shall provide access to any data necessary for the
completion of this study.

(4) The institute shall report to the legislature on the findings
of its study by January 1, 2001.

---
END ---