BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that constraints on capital spending and competition for
scarce resources require that capital expenditures be fully utilized for
construction. In order to increase the amount of appropriations available for
the actual construction of projects, it is the intent of the legislature to
enact a moratorium on the allocation of capital appropriations for the
acquisition of works of art. The moratorium shall apply to capital project appropriations
made from January 1, 2000, through June 30, 2003.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.17.200 and 1983 c 204 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Until the effective date of this act, all state agencies including all
state departments, boards, councils, commissions, and quasi public corporations
shall allocate, as a nondeductible item, out of any moneys appropriated for the
original construction of any public building, an amount of one-half of one
percent of the appropriation to be expended by the Washington state arts
commission for the acquisition of works of art. The works of art may be placed
on public lands, integral to or attached to a public building or structure,
detached within or outside a public building or structure, part of a portable
exhibition or collection, part of a temporary exhibition, or loaned or
exhibited in other public facilities. In addition to the cost of the works of
art the one-half of one percent of the appropriation as provided herein shall
be used to provide for the administration of the visual arts program by the
Washington state arts commission and all costs for installation of the works of
art. For the purpose of this section building shall not include highway
construction sheds, warehouses or other buildings of a temporary nature.

(2)
After July 1, 2003, the legislature may, by statute, reauthorize this
allocation for works of art.

Sec.
3. RCW
28A.335.210 and 1983 c 204 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Until the effective date of this act, the state board of education and
superintendent of public instruction shall allocate, as a nondeductible item,
out of any moneys appropriated for state assistance to school districts for the
original construction of any school plant facility the amount of one-half of
one percent of the appropriation to be expended by the Washington state arts
commission for the acquisition of works of art. The works of art may be placed
in accordance with Article IX, sections 2 and 3 of the state Constitution on
public lands, integral to or attached to a public building or structure,
detached within or outside a public building or structure, part of a portable
exhibition or collection, part of a temporary exhibition, or loaned or
exhibited in other public facilities. The Washington state arts commission
shall, in consultation with the superintendent of public instruction, determine
the amount to be made available for the purchase of works of art under this
section, and payments therefor shall be made in accordance with law. The
designation of projects and sites, selection, contracting, purchase,
commissioning, reviewing of design, execution and placement, acceptance,
maintenance, and sale, exchange, or disposition of works of art shall be the
responsibility of the Washington state arts commission in consultation with the
superintendent of public instruction and representatives of school district
boards of directors. However, the costs to carry out the Washington state arts
commission's responsibility for maintenance shall not be funded from the moneys
referred to under this section, RCW 43.17.200, 43.19.455, or 28B.10.025, but
shall be contingent upon adequate appropriations being made for that purpose:
PROVIDED, That the superintendent of public instruction and the school district
board of directors of the districts where the sites are selected shall have the
right to:

(((1)))
(a) Waive its use of the one-half of one percent of the appropriation
for the acquisition of works of art before the selection process by the
Washington state arts commission;

(((2)))
(b) Appoint a representative to the body established by the Washington
state arts commission to be part of the selection process with full voting
rights;

(((3)))
(c) Reject the results of the selection process;

(((4)))
(d) Reject the placement of a completed work or works of art on school
district premises if such works are portable.

Rejection
at any point before or after the selection process shall not cause the loss of
or otherwise endanger state construction funds available to the local school
district. Any works of art rejected under this section shall be applied to the
provision of works of art under this chapter, at the discretion of the
Washington state arts commission, notwithstanding any contract or agreement
between the affected school district and the artist involved. In addition to
the cost of the works of art the one-half of one percent of the appropriation
as provided herein shall be used to provide for the administration by the
Washington state arts commission and all costs for installation of the work of
art. For the purpose of this section building shall not include sheds,
warehouses or other buildings of a temporary nature.

The
executive director of the arts commission, the superintendent of public
instruction and the Washington state school directors association shall appoint
a study group to review the operations of the one-half of one percent for works
of art under this section.

(2)
After July 1, 2003, the legislature may, by statute, reauthorize this
allocation for works of art.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act does not affect any existing appropriation or right acquired or liability
or obligation incurred under the sections amended in this act or under any rule
or order adopted under those sections, nor does it affect any proceeding or
project instituted under those sections.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 5. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---