BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 71A.20 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The residential habilitation governing board is created. All duties and
responsibilities formerly held under this title for the purposes of managing
services in the state's residential habilitation centers are transferred to the
residential habilitation governing board.

(2)
The governor shall appoint the members of the residential habilitation
governing board which will be composed of seven members, of which five will
represent each of the five currently operating residential habilitation
centers. Two members will be at large, one of whom will be designated as chair
of the governing board.

(3)
Members shall serve four-year terms. Of the initial members, one must be
appointed for a one-year term, one must be appointed for a two-year term, one
must be appointed for a three-year term, and the remainder must be appointed
for four-year terms. Thereafter, members must be appointed for four-year
terms. Members may not serve more than two consecutive terms.

(4)
On the effective date of this section, the department of social and health
services shall transfer to the residential habilitation governing board any
appropriations made to the department for carrying out the powers, functions,
and duties transferred by this section.

(5)
The department shall deliver to the residential habilitation governing board
all reports, documents, records, data, and any other written material
pertaining to the operation of residential habilitation centers.

(6)
The transfer of powers, functions, duties, and employees mandated by this
section, will not affect the validity of any act performed by the department of
social and health services before the effective date of this section.

(7)
Nothing in this section alters any existing collective bargaining unit or the
provisions of any existing collective bargaining agreement until the agreement
expires or until the bargaining unit is modified by action of the personnel
board as provided by law.

(8)
The department of social and health services, under agreements with the
residential habilitation governing board, shall continue to offer community
placements to individuals deemed appropriate to leave residential habilitation
centers, and to facilitate reimbursement for residential habilitation centers
under the federal medicaid program.

(9)
The residential habilitation governing board will establish a screening and
admissions process for people who are eligible for services to apply directly
to the governing board for admission to a residential habilitation center.
This process will include referrals from the courts, schools, or other entities
which may have clients who could take advantage of the resources of a
residential habilitation center.

(10)
All rules relating to the residential habilitation centers will remain in
effect.

Sec.
2. RCW
71A.20.060 and 1988 c 176 s 706 are each amended to read as follows:

The
((secretary)) residential habilitation governing board shall have
authority to engage the residents of a residential habilitation center in beneficial
work programs, including expanded vocational and training programs, but
the ((secretary)) residential habilitation governing board shall
not engage residents in excessive hours of work or work for disciplinary
purposes. The residential habilitation governing board shall establish a
development program which will be set up to accept donations to the
institutions for the purposes of offering scholarships to students who are
OCF/MR eligible and want to take advantage of training and vocational programs at
the residential habilitation centers. Money from this fund would also be
available to improve the quality of services at residential habilitation
centers.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
office of the code reviser is directed to prepare a bill deleting all
references to the secretary of the department of social and health services
regarding residential habilitation centers in the Revised Code of Washington
and substituting them with the residential habilitation governing board.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---