BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

As a condition of being a provider for the medical assistance
program under this chapter, any pharmacy, upon presentation of a valid medicare
card, may charge a medicare beneficiary a price no greater than the medical
assistance reimbursement rate for any prescription medication, including the
ingredient cost and dispensing fee. This does not apply to over-the-counter
medications or compounded prescriptions.

---
END ---