BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The department shall conduct the Washington low‑cost prescription drug
program. The intent of the program is to provide low‑cost prescription
drugs to qualifying residents of the state.

(2)
The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.

(a)
"Program" means the Washington low-cost prescription drug program, as
created in this section.

(b)
"Resident" means a legal resident of the state who is over fifty-five
years old or disabled, and whose annual income is no greater than two hundred
percent of the federal poverty level, as determined annually by the United
States department of health and human services.

(c)
"Retail pharmacy" means a retail pharmacy located in the state, or
another business licensed to dispense prescription drugs in the state, that
voluntarily elects to participate in the program and that provides discounts to
residents as provided in subsection (5) of this section.

(3)
A drug manufacturer that sells prescription drugs in the state may voluntarily
elect to enter into a rebate agreement with the department. The agreement must
be modeled after section 1927 of the United States social security act and must
include the requirement that the manufacturer make rebate payments to the state
each calendar quarter or according to a schedule established by the department.

(4)
The rebate amount required from a manufacturer to the state is equivalent to
the rebate amount calculated under the medicaid rebate program pursuant to 42
U.S.C. Sec. 1396r‑8.

(5)
A retail pharmacy that sells drugs covered by an agreement under subsection (3)
of this section shall discount the retail price of those drugs sold to a
resident. The department shall adopt rules to establish discounts for covered
drugs and rules that promote the use of efficacious and lower‑cost
drugs. The amount of the discount for covered drugs must be determined by
considering an average of all rebates provided under subsection (4) of this
section, weighted by sales of drugs subject to these rebates over the most
recent twelve-month period for which the information is available. The total
aggregate discount amount for all covered drugs must be equivalent to the total
aggregate rebate amount for all covered drugs sold, less the administrative costs
of the program under subsection (8) of this section.

(6)
Retail pharmacies shall submit claims to the department to verify the amount of
discount due the resident. The department may not impose charges on retail
pharmacies that submit claims or receive payments under the program. The
retail pharmacies shall charge residents the current retail price charged by
each retail pharmacy for that prescription drug to persons purchasing that drug
who are not covered by insurance or third-party payor plans, less the discount
amount, under subsection (5) of this section. The amount of the discount must
be indicated on the resident's receipt. On a weekly or biweekly basis, the
retail pharmacy must be reimbursed by the department for drug discounts
provided to residents. The department shall collect the necessary utilization
data from the retail pharmacies submitting claims in order to comply with
U.S.C. Sec. 1396r‑8. The department shall protect the confidentiality of
all information as required by state and federal laws, rules, or regulations.

(7)
Discrepancies in rebate amounts must be resolved using the process established
in this subsection.

(a)
If there is a discrepancy in the manufacturer's favor between the amount
claimed by a pharmacy and the amount rebated by the manufacturer, the
department, at the department's expense, may hire a mutually agreed‑upon
independent auditor. Following the audit, if a discrepancy still
exists, the manufacturer shall justify the reason for the discrepancy or make
payment to the department for any additional amount due.

(b)
If there is a discrepancy against the interest of the manufacturer in the
information provided by the department to the manufacturer regarding the
manufacturer's rebate, the manufacturer, at the manufacturer's expense, may
hire a mutually agreed‑upon independent auditor to verify the accuracy of
the data supplied to the department. Following the audit, if a discrepancy
still exists, the department shall justify the reason for the discrepancy or
refund to the manufacturer any excess payment made by the manufacturer.

(c)
Following the procedures established in (a) or (b) of this subsection, either
the department or the manufacturer may request a hearing under chapter 34.05
RCW. Supporting documentation must accompany the request for a hearing.

(8)
Administrative and computer costs for the program must be funded solely from
the rebates received from the pharmaceutical manufacturers.

(9)
The obligation of retail pharmacies to discount drugs to qualifying residents
begins three months after the drug manufacturer begins to pay the rebate to the
department.

(10)
The department shall report on the status of the program to the legislature
annually. The report must include information on changes in third-party
prescription drug coverage and the financial status of the program.

(11)
The department shall adopt rules to implement this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

The
prescription drug dedicated account is created in the custody of the state
treasurer. All receipts from revenues received from rebates paid by
pharmaceutical manufacturers under section 1 of this act must be deposited into
the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the
reimbursement of retail pharmacies for discounts provided to residents under
the plan created in section 1 of this act and to reimburse the department for
administrative expenses and associated computer costs incurred by the plan
created under section 1 of this act. Only the secretary of the department or
the secretary's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. Surplus
moneys in the account must be used to increase the amount of discounts given to
residents under the program created in section 1 of this act. The account is
subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation
is not required for expenditures.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. A
new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

The
department is authorized to receive rebates from drug manufacturers under the
Washington low‑cost prescription drug program created in section 1 of
this act, beginning July 1, 2000, or as soon thereafter as rules are adopted to
implement the program.

Sec.
4. RCW
43.84.092 and 1999 c 380 s 8, 1999 c 309 s 928, 1999 c 268 s 4, and 1999 c 94 s
2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations
shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4)
of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education
construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest revolving
account, the health services account, the public health services account, the
health system capacity account, the personal health services account, the state
higher education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local
leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the
local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal
sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit account,
the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the prescription drug
dedicated account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account,
the public employees' retirement system plan 2 account, the Puyallup tribal
settlement account, the resource management cost account, the site closure
account, the special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account,
the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board
expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the
supplemental pension account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account,
the teachers' retirement system plan 2 account, the tobacco prevention and
control account, the tobacco settlement account, the transportation
infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the University of
Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account,
the volunteer fire fighters' ((relief and pension principal account, the
volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension administrative account)) and
reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer fire
fighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington
judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers'
and fire fighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law
enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the
Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University
building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the
water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University
capital projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent
common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university
permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All
earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced
by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the county arterial preservation account, the department of
licensing services account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry
bond retirement fund, the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity
transportation account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety
account, the marine operating fund, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle
safety education account, the pilotage account, the public transportation
systems account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound
ferry operations account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial
trust account, the safety and education account, the special category C
account, the state patrol highway account, the transportation equipment fund,
the transportation fund, the transportation improvement account, the
transportation improvement board bond retirement account, and the urban
arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

Sec.
5. RCW
43.84.092 and 1999 c 380 s 8, 1999 c 309 s 928, 1999 c 268 s 4, 1999 c 94 s 3,
and 1999 c 94 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall
occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds
including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest revolving
account, the health services account, the public health services account, the
health system capacity account, the personal health services account, the state
higher education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local
leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the
local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit
account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the
prescription drug dedicated account, the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system plan 2 account,
the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource management cost account,
the site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state
investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust
fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the teachers' retirement
system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system plan 2 account, the
tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the
University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington
building account, the volunteer fire fighters' ((relief and pension
principal account, the volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension
administrative account)) and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1
retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State
University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund,
and the Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal
school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific
permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to
their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under
this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the county arterial preservation account, the department of
licensing services account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry
bond retirement fund, the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity
transportation account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety
account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget Sound
capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the
recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust account, the safety and
education account, the special category C account, the state patrol highway
account, the transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the
transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond
retirement account, and the urban arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

Sec.
6. RCW
43.84.092 and 1999 c 380 s 9, 1999 c 309 s 929, 1999 c 268 s 5, and 1999 c 94 s
4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation.
The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from
the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The
office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts
as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management
improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior
to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the state higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial
insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account,
the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the
mobile home park relocation fund, the municipal criminal justice assistance
account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural
resources deposit account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the
prescription drug dedicated account, the public employees' retirement
system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system plan 2 account,
the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource management cost account,
the site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state employees'
insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state
investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust
fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the teachers' retirement
system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan
3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement
account, the transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust
fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of
Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' ((relief and
pension principal account, the volunteer fire fighters' relief and pension
administrative account)) and reserve officers' relief and pension
principal fund, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
administrative fund, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the
Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters' system plan 1
retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire fighters'
system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement
system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement
account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State
University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving fund,
and the Western Washington University capital projects account. Earnings
derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal
school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific
permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to
their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to be distributed under
this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the allocation to the state
treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the county arterial preservation account, the department of
licensing services account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry
bond retirement fund, the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity
transportation account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety
account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget Sound
capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the
recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust account, the safety and
education account, the special category C account, the state patrol highway
account, the transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the
transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond
retirement account, and the urban arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury
accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative
directive of this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. (1)
Section 5 of this act takes effect July 1, 2000.

(2)
Section 6 of this act takes effect September 1, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 4 and 5 of this act expire September 1, 2000.

---
END ---