BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 74.09 RCW to read as follows:

The
department shall apply to the federal health care financing administration for
a waiver under section 1115 of the federal social security act to provide
medicaid prescription drug benefits to qualified persons who are sixty-two
years of age or older or who are nineteen years of age or older and determined
by the department to be disabled under the standards of the federal social
security program and who have household income up to and including one hundred
eighty-five percent of the federal poverty level. If sufficient funds are not
appropriated to provide prescription drug coverage under this section to all
eligible persons with household income up to and including one hundred
eighty-five percent of the federal poverty level, the department shall provide
coverage under this section up to the maximum income eligibility limit that can
be achieved within the funds appropriated. The waiver must include the full
range of prescription drugs provided under the current medicaid program. It
may not include an asset limit. Copayments for participants must be comparable
to copayments in the current medicaid program. Coverage under this section
must commence July 1, 2001, or as soon thereafter as possible.

Sec.
2. RCW
74.09.510 and 1997 c 59 s 14 and 1997 c 58 s 201 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

Medical assistance may be provided in accordance with eligibility
requirements established by the department, as defined in the social security
Title XIX state plan for mandatory categorically needy persons and: (1)
Individuals who would be eligible for cash assistance except for their
institutional status; (2) individuals who are under twenty-one years of age,
who would be eligible for temporary assistance for needy families or
medicaid, but do not qualify as dependent children and who are in (a)
foster care, (b) subsidized adoption, (c) a nursing facility or an intermediate
care facility for the mentally retarded, or (d) inpatient psychiatric
facilities; (3) the aged, blind, and disabled who: (a) Receive only a state
supplement, or (b) would not be eligible for cash assistance if they were not
institutionalized; (4) categorically eligible individuals who meet the income
and resource requirements of the cash assistance programs; (5) individuals who
are enrolled in managed health care systems, who have otherwise lost
eligibility for medical assistance, but who have not completed a current
six-month enrollment in a managed health care system, and who are eligible for
federal financial participation under Title XIX of the social security act; (6)
children and pregnant women allowed by federal statute for whom funding is
appropriated; (7) other individuals eligible for medical services under RCW
74.09.035 ((and)), 74.09.700, and section 1 of this act
for whom federal financial participation is available under Title XIX of the
social security act; and (8) persons allowed by section 1931 of the social
security act for whom funding is appropriated.

---
END ---