BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Department" means the department of social and health services.

(2)
"Eligible person" means a person eligible for the Washington
prescription drug payment assistance program, created under section 2 of this
act.

(3)
"Prescription drugs" means drugs and supplies that have been approved
as safe and effective by the federal food and drug administration or are
otherwise legally marketed in the United States, including items related to
diabetes management, if not covered by medicare, that a lawful prescriber has
deemed medically necessary for either the diagnosis, or treatment, or both, of
the patient. "Prescription drugs" do not include experimental drugs
and drugs used for lifestyle modification, but may include cost-effective
over-the-counter pharmaceutical products if prescribed by a health care
provider as an alternative to more costly drugs. Prescription drugs covered
under this chapter are limited by and subject to section 3 of this act, and the
rules adopted under that section.

(4)
"Program" means the Washington prescription drug payment assistance
program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. To be
eligible for assistance under the program, a person must:

(1)
Be a United States citizen or lawfully admitted alien;

(2)
Have an annual household income that is less than two hundred percent of the
federal poverty level or have prescription drug expenses that exceed forty
percent of his or her annual household income;

(3)
Be a resident of the state of Washington;

(4)
Be ineligible for medicaid prescription benefits;

(5)
Be either ineligible for, or not receiving, or both, a prescription drug
benefit under a medicare supplemental policy or any other third-party payer
prescription benefit; and

(6)
Be at least sixty-five years old or be an individual between the ages of
nineteen and sixty-four who is otherwise eligible for benefits under Title II
of the social security act (federal old age, survivors, and disability
insurance benefits).

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. (1)
The program shall be administered by the department. The department shall
adopt rules necessary to implement the program in a cost-effective manner and
to ensure that the program is the payer of last resort for prescription drugs.
The rules shall include the following:

(a)
Payment assistance shall not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars per
calendar year to assist each eligible person in the purchase of prescription
drugs;

(b)
Prescription drugs covered under the program are restricted to those
manufactured by pharmaceutical companies that agree to provide manufacturer
rebates. The department shall establish the state rebate program to collect
rebates to offset the cost of the program;

(c)
A copayment requirement which shall not exceed twenty-five percent of the
acquisition cost, but shall be no less than five dollars. Copayment amounts
may vary to promote the purchase of generic or therapeutic substitutes by
eligible persons in the program;

(d)
The department shall provide a clear, written explanation defining the scope of
the program's coverage, the amount of the cost-sharing requirements, and any
limitations on access to covered prescription drugs. The department shall
provide notice at least forty-five days prior to any dollar cap being reached.
The department will also notify persons of the process to appeal a decision
denying reimbursement for prescription drugs or denying a person's eligibility
for the program. Services shall begin on the first day of the month, following
the month that eligibility is determined. Eligible individuals will receive an
identification card for the program;

(e)
No drug prescription may exceed one hundred dosing units, or a thirty-four day
supply;

(f)
No system of administration shall make a direct cash payment to any eligible
person; and

(g)
The department shall require a mandatory point‑of‑sale claims
submission within fourteen days unless extenuating circumstances, as defined by
the department, exist.

(2)
The department may adopt rules consistent with the following:

(a)
Limiting application to the program to a specific open‑enrollment period,
with coverage effective as of the date the application is approved;

(b)
Imposing an annual enrollment fee in an amount not to exceed twenty dollars to
be paid by all eligible persons in the program to defray administrative expenses.
Payment of the fee shall be credited to a special account to be designated as
the prescription assistance account, created in section 5 of this act. For
each fiscal year, the maximum unencumbered balance that remains in the
prescription assistance account at the end of any fiscal year shall be no more
than the administrative cost of the program in the subsequent fiscal year;

(c)
Determining income eligibility of a person by any reasonable means, including
but not limited to a review of the person's most recent federal and state
income tax returns and copies of income checks. Residency and age/disability
eligibility may be verified by submission of those documents the department
deems reasonable; and

(d)
Any other rules deemed necessary to implement the program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
department shall maintain data to evaluate the cost and effectiveness of the
program and shall produce an annual report to the legislature summarizing
participant demographics, utilization, utilization review results, and other
available information as may be needed to evaluate the costs and benefits of
the program.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
prescription assistance account is created in the state treasury. All receipts
from fees received under section 3(2)(b) of this act must be deposited into the
account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.
Expenditures from the account may be used only for the administrative costs of
the program.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6.
Sections 1 through 5 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 74 RCW.

---
END ---