BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that it is necessary to complete the rehabilitation of the
state legislative building, to extend the useful life of the building, and to
construct a new capitol addition adjacent to the state legislative building for
the permanent relocation of offices displaced by the rehabilitation and create
new space for public uses.

Furthermore,
it is the intent of the legislature to fund the majority of the rehabilitation
and capitol addition construction using bonds repaid by the capitol building
construction account, as provided for in the enabling act and dedicated by the
federal government for the sole purpose of establishing a state capitol, to
fund the cash elements of the project using capital project surcharge revenues
in the Thurston county capital facilities account, and to support the
establishment of a private foundation to engage the public in the preservation
of the state legislative building and raise private funds for restoration and
educational efforts.

The
legislature finds that the inclusion of legislative leadership in the ongoing
policy level decision making related to the planning, design, and construction
of the rehabilitation and capitol addition will provide continuity of policy
intent, and that the inclusion of a professional preservation expert is
necessary to ensure that standards and guidelines for treatment of historic
buildings are used appropriately, and that the inclusion of a citizen
representative will further engage the public in preservation of the legislative
building.

The
legislature adopts and authorizes the implementation of the legislative
building rehabilitation and capitol addition plan as proposed by the commission
on the preservation and renovation of the legislative building in their report
to the legislature, January 20, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. For
the purpose of providing funds for the planning, design, construction, and
other necessary costs for the rehabilitation of the state legislative building
and construction of the capitol addition, the state finance committee is
authorized to issue general obligation bonds of the state of Washington in the
sum of one hundred one million four hundred forty-five thousand dollars or as
much as may be required to finance the improvements defined in the legislative
building rehabilitation and capitol addition plan and all costs incidental
thereto. Bonds authorized in this section shall not constitute indebtedness
for purposes of the limitations set forth in RCW 39.42.060. Bonds authorized
in this section may be sold at a price the state finance committee determines.
No bonds authorized in this section may be offered for sale without prior
legislative appropriation of the net proceeds of the sale of the bonds. The
proceeds of the sale of the bonds issued for the purposes of this subsection
shall be deposited in the capitol historic district construction account hereby
created in the state treasury.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3.
Ninety-nine million four hundred thousand dollars is appropriated in the
1999-2001 biennium from the capitol historic district construction
account to the department of general administration for expenses related to the
planning, design, construction, and other necessary costs for the
rehabilitation of the state legislative building and capitol addition
construction. Of this appropriation, up to two hundred thousand dollars is
authorized for the purpose of conducting a feasibility study to identify the
potential depth and breadth of private financial support, and for the
administrative costs of establishing a private foundation.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. (1)
The nondebt-limit reimbursable bond retirement account must be used for the
payment of the principal and interest on the bonds authorized in section 2 of
this act.

(2)(a)
The state finance committee must, on or before June 30th of each year, certify
to the state treasurer the amount needed in the ensuing twelve months to meet
the bond retirement and interest requirements on the bonds authorized in
section 2 of this act.

(b)
On or before the date on which any interest or principal and interest is due,
the state treasurer shall transfer from the capitol building construction
account for deposit into the nondebt-limit reimbursable bond retirement
account, the amount computed in (a) of this subsection for bonds issued for the
purposes of section 2 of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. (1)
Bonds issued under section 1 of this act must state that they are a general
obligation of the state of Washington, must pledge the full faith and credit of
the state to the payment of the principal and interest, and must contain an
unconditional promise to pay the principal and interest as it becomes due.

(2)
The owner and holder of each of the bonds or the trustee for the owner and
holder of any of the bonds may by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding
require the transfer and payment of funds as directed in this section.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
legislature may provide additional means for raising moneys for the payment of
the principal and interest on the bonds authorized in section 1 of this act,
and sections 2 through 6 of this act shall not be deemed to provide an
exclusive method for their payment.

Sec.
7. RCW
39.42.060 and 1999 c 273 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:

No
bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness for borrowed money shall be
issued by the state which will cause the aggregate debt contracted by the state
to exceed that amount for which payments of principal and interest in any
fiscal year would require the state to expend more than seven percent of the
arithmetic mean of its general state revenues, as defined in section 1(c) of
Article VIII of the Washington state Constitution for the three immediately
preceding fiscal years as certified by the treasurer in accordance with RCW
39.42.070. It shall be the duty of the state finance committee to compute annually
the amount required to pay principal of and interest on outstanding debt. In
making such computation, the state finance committee shall include all borrowed
money represented by bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness which are
secured by the full faith and credit of the state or are required to be paid,
directly or indirectly, from general state revenues and which are incurred by
the state, any department, authority, public corporation or quasi public
corporation of the state, any state university or college, or any other public
agency created by the state but not by counties, cities, towns, school
districts, or other municipal corporations, and shall include debt incurred
pursuant to section 3 of Article VIII of the Washington state Constitution, but
shall exclude the following:

(1)
Obligations for the payment of current expenses of state government;

(2)
Indebtedness incurred pursuant to RCW 39.42.080 or 39.42.090;

(3)
Principal of and interest on bond anticipation notes;

(4)
Any indebtedness which has been refunded;

(5)
Financing contracts entered into under chapter 39.94 RCW;

(6)
Indebtedness authorized or incurred before July 1, 1993, pursuant to statute
which requires that the state treasury be reimbursed, in the amount of the
principal of and the interest on such indebtedness, from money other than
general state revenues or from the special excise tax imposed pursuant to
chapter 67.40 RCW;

(7)
Indebtedness authorized and incurred after July 1, 1993, pursuant to statute
that requires that the state treasury be reimbursed, in the amount of the
principal of and the interest on such indebtedness, from (a) moneys outside the
state treasury, except higher education operating fees, (b) higher education
building fees, (c) indirect costs recovered from federal grants and contracts,
and (d) fees and charges associated with hospitals operated or managed by
institutions of higher education;

(8)
Any agreement, promissory note, or other instrument entered into by the state
finance committee under RCW 39.42.030 in connection with its acquisition of
bond insurance, letters of credit, or other credit support instruments for the
purpose of guaranteeing the payment or enhancing the marketability, or both, of
any state bonds, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness;

(9)
Indebtedness incurred for the purposes identified in RCW 43.99N.020; ((and))

(10)
Indebtedness incurred for the purposes of the school district bond guaranty
established by chapter 39.98 RCW; and

(11)
Indebtedness incurred for the purposes of the state legislative building
rehabilitation and capitol addition construction pursuant to section 2 of this
act.

To
the extent necessary because of the constitutional or statutory debt
limitation, priorities with respect to the issuance or guaranteeing of bonds,
notes, or other evidences of indebtedness by the state shall be determined by
the state finance committee.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 43 RCW.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 9. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---