BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
7.68.060 and 1996 c 122 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
For the purposes of applying for benefits under this chapter, the rights,
privileges, responsibilities, duties, limitations and procedures contained in
RCW 51.28.020, 51.28.030, 51.28.040 and 51.28.060 shall apply: PROVIDED, That except
for applications received pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, no
compensation of any kind shall be available under this chapter if:

(a)
An application for benefits is not received by the department within two years
after the date the criminal act was reported to a ((local police department
or sheriff's office)) law enforcement agency or, in cases of abuse or
neglect of children or adult dependent persons, the agency providing child or
adult protective services, or the date the rights of dependents or
beneficiaries accrued, unless the director has determined that "good
cause" exists to expand the time permitted to receive the application.
"Good cause" shall be determined by the department on a case-by-case
basis and may extend the period of time in which an application can be received
for up to five years after the date the criminal act was reported ((to a
local police department or sheriff's office)) or the date the rights of
dependents or beneficiaries accrued; or

(b)
The criminal act is not reported by the victim or someone on his or her behalf
to a ((local police department or sheriff's office)) law enforcement
agency or, in cases of abuse or neglect of children or adult dependent persons,
the agency providing child or adult protective services, within twelve months
of its occurrence or, if it could not reasonably have been reported within that
period, within twelve months of the time when a report could reasonably have
been made. In making determinations as to reasonable time limits, the
department shall give greatest weight to the needs of the victims.

(2)
This section shall apply only to criminal acts reported after December 31,
1985.

(3)
Because victims of childhood criminal acts may repress conscious memory of such
criminal acts far beyond the age of eighteen, the rights of adult victims of
childhood criminal acts shall accrue at the time the victim discovers or
reasonably should have discovered the elements of the crime. In making
determinations as to reasonable time limits, the department shall give greatest
weight to the needs of the victim.

(4)
A right to benefits under this chapter shall be available to any victim of a
person against whom the state initiates proceedings under chapter 71.09 RCW.
The right created under this subsection shall accrue when the victim is
notified of proceedings under chapter 71.09 RCW or the victim is interviewed,
deposed, or named as a witness in connection with the proceedings. An
application for benefits under this subsection must be received by the
department within two years after the date the victim's right accrued unless
the director determines that good cause exists to expand the time to receive
the application. "Good cause" shall be determined by the director on
a case-by-case basis and may extend the period of time in which an application
can be received for up to five years after the date the right of the victim
accrued. Benefits under this subsection shall be limited to compensation for
costs or losses incurred on or after the date the victim's right accrues for a
claim allowed under this subsection. Benefits paid under RCW 7.68.070 shall
take precedence over those paid under this section.

Sec.
2. RCW
7.68.035 and 1999 c 86 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
((Whenever)) When any person is found guilty in any superior
court of having committed a crime, except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, there shall be imposed by the court upon such convicted person a
penalty assessment. The assessment shall be in addition to any other penalty
or fine imposed by law and shall be five hundred dollars for each case or cause
of action that includes one or more convictions of a felony or gross
misdemeanor and two hundred fifty dollars for any case or cause of action that
includes convictions of only one or more misdemeanors.

(b)
((Whenever)) When any juvenile is adjudicated of any offense in
any juvenile offense disposition under Title 13 RCW, except as provided in
subsection (2) of this section, there shall be imposed upon the juvenile
offender a penalty assessment. The assessment shall be in addition to any
other penalty or fine imposed by law and shall be one hundred dollars for each
case or cause of action that includes one or more adjudications for a felony or
gross misdemeanor and seventy-five dollars for each case or cause of action
that includes adjudications of only one or more misdemeanors.

(2)
The assessment imposed by subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to
motor vehicle crimes defined in Title 46 RCW except those defined in the
following sections: RCW 46.61.520, 46.61.522, 46.61.024, 46.52.090, 46.70.140,
46.61.502, 46.61.504, 46.52.101, 46.20.410, 46.52.020, 46.10.130, 46.09.130,
46.61.5249, 46.61.525, 46.61.685, 46.61.530, 46.61.500, 46.61.015, 46.52.010,
46.44.180, 46.10.090(2), and 46.09.120(2).

(3)
((Whenever)) When any person accused of having committed a crime
posts bail in superior court pursuant to the provisions of chapter 10.19 RCW
and such bail is forfeited, there shall be deducted from the proceeds of such
forfeited bail a penalty assessment, in addition to any other penalty or fine
imposed by law, equal to the assessment which would be applicable under
subsection (1) of this section if the person had been convicted of the crime.

(4)
Such penalty assessments shall be paid by the clerk of the superior court to
the county treasurer who shall monthly transmit the money as provided in RCW
10.82.070. Each county shall deposit fifty percent of the money it receives
per case or cause of action under subsection (1) of this section and retains
under RCW 10.82.070, not less than one and seventy-five one-hundredths percent
of the remaining money it retains under RCW 10.82.070 and the money it retains
under chapter 3.62 RCW, and all money it receives under subsection (7) of this
section into a fund maintained exclusively for the support of comprehensive
programs to encourage and facilitate testimony by the victims of crimes and
witnesses to crimes. A program shall be considered "comprehensive"
only after approval of the department upon application by the county
prosecuting attorney. The department shall approve as comprehensive only
programs which:

(a)
Provide comprehensive services to victims and witnesses of all types of crime
with particular emphasis on serious crimes against persons and property. It is
the intent of the legislature to make funds available only to programs which do
not restrict services to victims or witnesses of a particular type or types of
crime and that such funds supplement, not supplant, existing local funding
levels;

(b)
Are administered by the county prosecuting attorney either directly through the
prosecuting attorney's office or by contract between the county and agencies
providing services to victims of crime;

(c)
Make a reasonable effort to inform the known victim or his surviving dependents
of the existence of this chapter and the procedure for making application for
benefits;

(d)
Assist victims in the restitution and adjudication process; and

(e)
Assist victims of violent crimes in the preparation and presentation of their
claims to the department of labor and industries under this chapter.

Before
a program in any county west of the Cascade mountains is submitted to the
department for approval, it shall be submitted for review and comment to each
city within the county with a population of more than one hundred fifty
thousand. The department will consider if the county's proposed comprehensive
plan meets the needs of crime victims in cases adjudicated in municipal,
district or superior courts and of crime victims located within the city and
county.

(5)
Upon submission to the department of a letter of intent to adopt a
comprehensive program, the prosecuting attorney shall retain the money
deposited by the county under subsection (4) of this section until such time as
the county prosecuting attorney has obtained approval of a program from the
department. Approval of the comprehensive plan by the department must be
obtained within one year of the date of the letter of intent to adopt a
comprehensive program. The county prosecuting attorney shall not make any
expenditures from the money deposited under subsection (4) of this section
until approval of a comprehensive plan by the department. If a county prosecuting
attorney has failed to obtain approval of a program from the department under
subsection (4) of this section or failed to obtain approval of a comprehensive
program within one year after submission of a letter of intent under this
section, the county treasurer shall monthly transmit one hundred percent of the
money deposited by the county under subsection (4) of this section to the state
treasurer for deposit in the public safety and education account established
under RCW 43.08.250.

(6)
County prosecuting attorneys are responsible to make every reasonable effort to
insure that the penalty assessments of this chapter are imposed and collected.

(7) Every city and town shall transmit monthly one and seventy-five
one-hundredths percent of all money, other than money received for parking
infractions, retained under RCW 3.46.120, 3.50.100, and 35.20.220 to the county
treasurer for deposit as provided in subsection (4) of this section.

---
END ---