BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that dental disease is an infectious disease affecting
children and adults. Tooth decay is, by far, the most common and costly oral
health problem in all age groups. Yet, it is one of the most preventable
diseases. It is one of the principle causes of tooth loss from early childhood
through middle age. The legislature also finds that vulnerable populations
with lower incomes suffer disproportionately from dental infections.
Baby-bottle tooth decay is a severe type of early childhood decay that affects
babies and toddlers from low-income populations. A state survey by the
department of health found that baby-bottle decay was experienced by thirteen
percent of children in Washington's head start and early childhood assistance
programs. These dental infections cause extreme pain and discomfort as well as
interfering with an individual's ability to eat and to function effectively,
causing children to miss school and interfering with adults' job productivity.

The
legislature finds that fluoride is a naturally occurring element present in all
water, and that fluoridation is simply the adjustment of the fluoride levels to
the optimal level for fighting tooth decay. Fluoridation is a common community
health measure that benefits children and adults. Fluoride helps prevent
dental infections and tooth decay. Community water fluoridation is the safest,
most cost-effective, and most equitable method of reducing tooth decay in
communities throughout the country and in Washington state. The legislature
declares that this act is necessary to protect public health and safety.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.119A.060 and 1995 c 376 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In order to assure safe and reliable public drinking water and to protect the
public health, public water systems shall:

(a)
Protect the water sources used for drinking water;

(b)
Provide treatment adequate to assure that the public health is protected;

(c)
Provide and effectively operate and maintain public water system facilities;

(d)
Plan for future growth and assure the availability of safe and reliable
drinking water;

(e)
Provide the department with the current names, addresses, and telephone numbers
of the owners, operators, and emergency contact persons for the system,
including any changes to this information, and provide to users the name and
twenty-four hour telephone number of an emergency contact person; and

(f)
Take whatever investigative or corrective action is necessary to assure that a
safe and reliable drinking water supply is continuously available to users.

(2)
Wherever the content of public water supplies serving more than one thousand
residential connections contains fluoride levels less than the amount recommended
for decay prevention, the person, firm, corporation, or municipality having
jurisdiction over the supply shall adjust the fluoride level of the water to
the level recommended for optimal dental health. However, any city, county,
public utility district, or water district and its water system are not
required to make such adjustments upon the adoption of an ordinance or
resolution called by a petition of twenty-five percent of the registered voters
of the city, county, public utility district, or water district who voted in
the last general election. No such ordinance or resolution may be adopted by a
city, county, public utility district, or water district that receives or has
contracted to receive its water supply or any part of its water supply from
another political subdivision, or public or private entity, which adds fluoride
to its water supply in compliance with this subsection or which has only
fluoridated water to supply such political subdivision or private entity.

(3)
The department of health shall adopt rules for the implementation of this act.

(4)
No new public water system may be approved or created unless: (a) It is owned
or operated by a satellite system management agency established under RCW
70.116.134 and the satellite system management system complies with financial
viability requirements of the department; or (b) a satellite management system
is not available and it is determined that the new system has sufficient
management and financial resources to provide safe and reliable service. The
approval of any new system that is not owned by a satellite system management
agency shall be conditioned upon future management or ownership by a satellite
system management agency, if such management or ownership can be made with
reasonable economy and efficiency, or upon periodic review of the system's
operational history to determine its ability to meet the department's financial
viability and other operating requirements. The department and local health
jurisdictions shall enforce this requirement under authority provided under
this chapter, chapter 70.116, or 70.05 RCW, or other authority governing the
approval of new water systems by the department or a local jurisdiction.

(((3)))
(5) The department and local health jurisdictions shall carry out the
rules and regulations of the state board of health adopted pursuant to RCW
43.20.050(2)(a) and other rules adopted by the department relating to public
water systems.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. RCW
57.08.012 (Fluoridation of water authorized) and 1988 c 11 s 2
are each repealed.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---