BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
business of operating as a household goods carrier for compensation along the
highways of this state is declared to be a business affected with the public
interest. The unlawful advertisement, use of telecommunications services, and
provision of household goods moving services by unlicensed household goods
carriers constitutes an unfair trade practice and unfair competitive advantage
over properly licensed and regulated household goods carriers and exposes
unsuspecting consumers to the risk of theft, fraud, deception, and other forms
of dishonesty. The legislature declares that the termination, alteration, or
refusal of telecommunications services utilized by unlicensed household goods
carriers is essential to ensure the public safety and welfare.

Therefore,
the commission should take enforcement action in compliance with this act to
refuse or discontinue telecommunications services, including the use of specific
telephone numbers, of unlicensed household goods carriers when other available
enforcement remedies of the commission have failed to terminate unlawful
activities detrimental to the public safety and welfare.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
superior court of a county has the power, upon petition of the commission, to
order any entity providing telecommunication services, including wireless
telecommunications service, to refuse or terminate telecommunications services,
or to change or terminate a telephone number with no call forwarding from the
previous telephone number, of an entity advertising for or providing household
goods moving services in violation of the laws requiring a household goods
permit. The court shall issue such order, with or without hearing, if it finds
that:

(1)
The telecommunications subscriber is advertising or holding out to the public
to perform, or is performing, household goods carrier services without having
in force a permit issued by the commission;

(2)
The telecommunications service, or telephone number, is being used or is to be
used as an instrumentality, directly or indirectly, to violate or to assist in
violation of the laws requiring a household goods carrier permit;

(3)
The commission has made a good faith effort through other enforcement remedies
to terminate unlawful household goods carrier services including, at a minimum,
issuance of a cease and desist order;

(4)
The order is necessary for public safety and welfare.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. In
the event the court orders termination of the use of a telephone number by a
subscriber or orders a changed telephone number, the original number may not be
reused by any entity providing telecommunications services, including wireless
telecommunications service, in this state for a period of one year unless a
lesser period of time is specified by the court or if further order of the
court releases the number for reuse.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. Any
entity providing telecommunications services that has been ordered to refuse or
terminate telecommunications services, or to change or terminate a telephone
number, shall notify the subscriber in writing within five business days that
such action was implemented and shall provide a copy of the court's order to
the subscriber.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. Any
entity that believes that it has been negatively affected by court action taken
under sections 1 through 6 of this act has the right to petition the court for
reconsideration of its order or, alternatively, to file a complaint with the
commission. If filed with the commission, the commission shall schedule a
public hearing on the complaint to be held within twenty-one calendar days of
the filing and assignment of a docket number to the complaint.

The
commission hearing shall be held in accordance with its rules of practice and
procedure and is subject to judicial appeal consistent with other general
matters that come before the commission for adjudication.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. No
action at law or in equity shall accrue against any entity providing
telecommunications services in this state because of, or as a result of, any
lawful act related to action under sections 1 through 6 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 7.
Sections 1 through 6 of this act are each added to chapter 81.80 RCW.

---
END ---