BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE
OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART
1

PROFESSIONAL EDUCATOR STANDARDS
BOARD

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 101.
INTENT. The legislature finds and declares:

(1)
Creation of a public, rule-making body whose focus is educator assessment would
be likely to bring greater focus and attention to the profession;

(2)
Professional educator standards boards are consumer protection boards,
establishing assessment policies to ensure the public that its practitioners
are competent;

(3)
The highest possible standards for all educators are essential in ensuring
attainment of high academic standards by all students;

(4)
Teacher assessment for certification can guard against admission to the
teaching profession of persons who have not demonstrated that they are
knowledgeable in the subjects they will be assigned to teach; and

(5)
Teacher assessment for certification should be implemented as an additional
element to the system of teacher preparation and certification.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 102. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.410 RCW to read as follows:

WASHINGTON
PROFESSIONAL EDUCATOR STANDARDS BOARD. (1) The Washington professional educator
standards board is created, consisting of twenty members to be appointed by the
governor to four-year terms. No person may serve as a member of the board for
more than two consecutive full terms. The governor shall annually appoint the
chair of the board from among the teachers and administrators on the board. No
board member may serve as chair for more than two consecutive years.

(2)
Seven of the members shall be public school teachers, one shall be a private
school teacher, three shall represent higher education educator preparation
programs, four shall be school administrators, two shall be educational staff
associates, one shall be a parent, and one shall be a member of the public.
The superintendent of public instruction shall be an ex officio, nonvoting
member.

(3)
Public school teachers appointed to the board must:

(a)
Have at least three years of teaching experience in a Washington public school;

(b)
Be currently certificated and actively employed in a teaching position; and

(c)
Include one teacher currently teaching at the elementary school level, one at
the middle school level, one at the high school level, and one vocationally
certificated.

(4)
Private school teachers appointed to the board must:

(a)
Have at least three years of teaching experience in a Washington private
school; and

(b)
Be currently certificated and actively employed in a teaching position.

(5)
Appointees from higher education educator preparation programs must include one
representative from an institution of higher education as defined in RCW
28B.10.016 and one representative from a Washington private institution of
higher education.

(6)
School administrators appointed to the board must:

(a)
Have at least three years of administrative experience in a Washington public
school district;

(b)
Be currently certificated and actively employed in a school administrator
position; and

(c)
Include two public school principals, one private school principal, and one
superintendent.

(7)
Educational staff associates appointed to the board must:

(a)
Have at least three years of educational staff associate experience in a
Washington public school district; and

(b)
Be currently certificated and actively employed in an educational staff
associate position.

(8)
The governor shall appoint the members of the board from a list of qualified
nominees submitted to the governor by organizations representative of the
constituencies of the board, from applications from other qualified
individuals, or from both nominees and applicants.

(9)
All appointments to the board made by the governor shall be subject to
confirmation by the senate.

(10)
The governor shall appoint the members of the initial board no later than June
1, 2000.

(11)
Board members shall represent the racial, geographic, and gender diversity of
the state.

(12)
Each member of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240
and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in carrying out the duties
of the board in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(13)
The governor may remove a member of the board for neglect of duty, misconduct,
malfeasance or misfeasance in office, or for incompetency or unprofessional
conduct as defined in chapter 18.130 RCW. In such a case, the governor shall
file with the secretary of state a statement of the causes for and the order of
removal from office, and the secretary of state shall send a certified copy of
the statement of causes and order of removal to the last known post office
address of the member.

(14)
If a vacancy occurs on the board, the governor shall appoint a replacement
member from the nominees as specified in subsection (8) of this section to fill
the remainder of the unexpired term.

(15)
Members of the board shall hire an executive director and an administrative
assistant to reside in the office of the superintendent of public instruction
for administrative purposes only.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 103. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.410 RCW to read as follows:

POWERS
AND DUTIES OF THE BOARD. The Washington professional educator standards board
shall:

(1)
Serve as the sole advisory body to the state board of education on issues
related to educator recruitment, hiring, preparation, certification including
high quality alternate routes to certification, mentoring and support,
professional growth, retention, and governance; and

(2)
Submit annual reports, beginning December 1, 2000, to the governor and the
legislature concerning duties and activities within the board's advisory
capacity. The Washington professional educator standards board shall submit a
separate report by December 1, 2000, to the governor and the legislature,
providing recommendations for at least two high quality alternate routes to
teacher certification.

PART
2

TEACHER
ASSESSMENT

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 201. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.410 RCW to read as follows:

(1)(a)
Beginning not later than September 1, 2001, the Washington professional
educator standards board shall make available a means of assessing an
applicant's knowledge in the basic skills. For the purposes of this section,
"basic skills" means the subjects of at least reading, writing, and
mathematics. Beginning August 1, 2002, passing this assessment shall be
required for admission to approved teacher preparation programs and for persons
from out-of-state applying for a Washington state residency teaching
certificate.

(b)
On an individual student basis, approved teacher preparation programs may admit
into their programs a candidate who has not achieved the minimum basic skills
assessment score established by the Washington professional educator standards
board. Individuals so admitted may not receive residency certification without
passing the basic skills assessment under this section.

(c)
The Washington professional educator standards board by rule shall establish
criteria to ensure that persons from out-of-state who are applying for
residency certification can demonstrate to the board's satisfaction that they
have the requisite basic skills based upon having completed another basic
skills assessment acceptable to the Washington professional educator standards
board or by some other alternative approved by the Washington professional
educator standards board.

(2)
Beginning not later than September 1, 2002, the Washington professional
educator standards board shall provide for the initial implementation of a
means of assessing an applicant's knowledge in the subjects for which the
applicant has applied for an endorsement to his or her residency or
professional certificate. The assessment of subject knowledge shall not
include instructional methodology. Beginning May 1, 2003, passing this
assessment for the applicable endorsements shall be required to receive a
residency certificate and for candidates desiring to add an endorsement to
their residency or professional teaching certificate.

(3)
On each of the assessments under subsections (1) and (2) of this section, an
applicant must achieve a minimum assessment score or scores established by the
Washington professional educator standards board.

(4)
The Washington professional educator standards board and superintendent of
public instruction, as determined by the Washington professional educator
standards board, may contract with one or more third parties for:

(a)
The development, purchase, administration, scoring, and reporting of scores of
the assessments established by the Washington professional educator standards
board under subsections (1) and (2) of this section;

(b)
Related clerical and administrative activities; or

(c)
Any combination of the purposes in this subsection.

(5)
Unless funds are appropriated for the costs associated with any of the
assessments under this section, applicants for admission to a Washington
teacher preparation program and applicants for residency teaching certificates
shall pay fees established by the Washington professional educator standards
board for initial assessments, reassessments, scoring of assessments, reporting
of assessment scores, and clerical and administrative activities related
thereto. Such fees shall be reasonably related to the direct and indirect
costs of the Washington professional educator standards board and
superintendent of public instruction in implementing subsections (1) and (2) of
this section, including contractual costs.

(6)
Fee revenues received by the superintendent of public instruction under this
section shall be deposited in the teacher assessment account hereby created in
the custody of the state treasurer. Moneys deposited in the account shall be
expended exclusively for the direct and indirect costs of implementing this
section. Only the superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's
designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject
to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is
required for disbursement.

(7)
The superintendent of public instruction is responsible for supervision and
providing support services to administer this section.

(8)
The Washington professional educator standards board shall collaboratively
select or develop and implement the assessments and minimum assessment scores
required under this section with the superintendent of public instruction and
shall provide opportunities for representatives of other interested educational
organizations to participate in the selection or development and implementation
of such assessments in a manner deemed appropriate by the Washington
professional educator standards board.

(9)
The Washington professional educator standards board shall adopt rules under
chapter 34.05 RCW that it determines are reasonably necessary for the effective
and efficient implementation of this section. The board may adopt rules allowing
exceptions from taking any of the assessments under this section on a
case-by-case basis. Appropriate accommodations shall be made for individuals
who have learning or other disabilities.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 202. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.410 RCW to read as follows:

The
Washington professional educator standards board shall report the proposed
assessments to the legislative education committees for review and comment
prior to implementing the assessments by contractual agreement with the
selected vendor or vendors.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 203. A
new section is added to chapter 28A.410 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
By December 1, 2003, and annually thereafter, the Washington professional
educator standards board shall prepare a report that includes the following
information:

(a)
The range of scores on the basic skills assessment under section 201(1) of this
act for persons who passed the assessment and were admitted to a Washington
preparation program; and

(b)
The range of scores on the subject assessments under section 201(2) of this act
for persons who passed the assessments and earned an endorsement.

(2)
The information under subsection (1) of this section shall be reported for the
individual public and private colleges and universities in Washington, as well
as reported on an aggregate basis. The report shall also include results
disaggregated demographically. The report shall include information on the
number and percentage of candidates exempted from assessments, demographic
information on candidates exempted, institutions attended and endorsements
sought by exempted candidates, and reasons for exclusion from the required
assessments. The report shall be made available through the state library, on
the website of the office of superintendent of public instruction, and placed
on the legislative alert list.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 204. RCW
28A.410.020 (Requirements for admission to teacher preparation
programs--Rules) and 1996 c 309 s 1, 1991 c 116 s 20, 1988 c 251 s 4, &
1987 c 525 s 202, as now or hereafter amended, are each repealed, effective
September 1, 2002.

PART
3

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 301. PART
HEADINGS AND SECTION CAPTIONS NOT LAW. Part headings and section
captions used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 302. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---