BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
80.36.090 and 1985 c 450 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Every telecommunications company operating in this state shall provide and
maintain suitable and adequate buildings and facilities therein, or connected
therewith, for the accommodation, comfort and convenience of its patrons and
employees.

(2)
Every telecommunications company shall, upon reasonable notice, furnish to all
persons and corporations who may apply therefor and be reasonably entitled
thereto suitable and proper facilities and connections for telephonic
communication and furnish telephone service as demanded.

(3)
Whenever a person or corporation establishes or relocates a business in an
existing commercial space and submits to a local exchange carrier an
application for primary exchange access service that provides at least seven
calendar days' advance notice of the date when service is needed, the local
exchange carrier shall furnish the service as ordered by the date requested.
If, prior to any requested date, it becomes apparent to the local exchange
carrier that primary exchange access service cannot be supplied as ordered by
the date requested, the carrier shall promptly notify the customer in writing
prior to the requested date that there will be a delay, the reason or reasons
for the delay, and the revised date by which the service will be supplied. The
carrier shall also provide the customer, beginning on the day service was
expected to begin, with cellular service or cellular service credits for the
same number of access lines as the customer has ordered.

(4)
Whenever a person or corporation establishes or relocates a business in an
existing commercial space and submits to a telecommunications company an
application for telecommunications services other than primary exchange access
service that provides at least thirty calendar days' advance notice of the date
when service is needed, the telecommunications company shall furnish the
service as ordered by the date requested. If, prior to any requested date, it
becomes apparent to the telecommunications company that the telecommunications
services cannot be supplied as ordered by the date requested, the company shall
promptly notify the customer in writing prior to the requested date that there
will be a delay, the reason or reasons for the delay, and the revised date by
which the service will be supplied. When the delay is anticipated to last, or
in fact lasts, longer than three days, the company shall also provide the
customer credit against future charges to be calculated as follows: A prorated
amount of the monthly charges for the delayed service multiplied by the number
of days service was delayed, based on charges for the first full month service
is active.

(5) In lieu of any other remedy available at law or equity, a
customer affected by a local exchange carrier's failure to comply with the
requirements of subsection (3) of this section is entitled to liquidated
damages in the amount of five hundred dollars per violation and reasonable
attorneys' fees and other costs of litigation. In lieu of any other remedy
available at law or equity, a customer affected by a telecommunications
company's failure to comply with the requirements of subsection (4) of this
section is entitled to liquidated damages in the amount of one thousand dollars
per violation and reasonable attorneys' fees and other costs of litigation.

---
END ---