BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
41.32.4986 and 1999 c 362 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

A
member may make the irrevocable election under this section no later than six
months after attaining thirty years of service. The election shall become
effective at the beginning of the calendar month following department receipt
of employee notification.

(1)
The sum of both the member contributions made ((for periods of
service after the effective date of the election plus seven and one-half
percent interest)) after the thirtieth year of service plus all interest
credited after the thirtieth year of service on all of the member's
contributions shall be paid to the member at retirement without a reduction
in the member's monthly retirement benefit as determined under RCW 41.32.498.

(2)
Upon retirement, the member's benefit shall be calculated using only the
earnable compensation credited prior to the effective date of the member's
election. Calculation of the member's average earnable compensation shall
include eligible cash outs of annual leave based on the member's salary and
leave accumulations at the time of retirement, except that the amount of a
member's average earnable compensation cannot be higher than if the member had
not taken advantage of the election offered under this section.

(3)
Members who have already earned thirty years of service credit prior to July
25, 1999, may participate in the election by notifying the department in
writing of their intention by December 31, 1999.

The
department shall continue to collect employer contributions as required in RCW
41.45.060.

Sec.
2. RCW
41.40.191 and 1999 c 362 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

A
member may make the irrevocable election under this section no later than six
months after attaining thirty years of service. The election shall become
effective at the beginning of the calendar month following department receipt
of employee notification.

(1)
The sum of both the member contributions made ((for periods of
service after the effective date of the election plus seven and one-half
percent interest)) after the thirtieth year of service plus all interest
credited after the thirtieth year of service on all of the member's
contributions shall be paid to the member at retirement without a reduction
in the member's monthly retirement benefit as determined under RCW 41.40.185.

(2)
Upon retirement, the member's benefit shall be calculated using only the
compensation earnable credited prior to the effective date of the member's
election. Calculation of the member's average final compensation shall include
eligible cash outs of sick and annual leave based on the member's salary and
leave accumulations at the time of retirement, except that the amount of a
member's average final compensation cannot be higher than if the member had not
taken advantage of the election offered under this section.

(3)
Members who have already earned thirty years of service credit prior to July
25, 1999, may participate in the election by notifying the department in
writing of their intention by December 31, 1999.

The department shall continue to collect employer contributions as
required in RCW 41.45.060.

---
END ---