BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.330.092 and 1997 c 220 s 222 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The film and video promotion account is created in the state treasury. All
receipts from RCW 36.102.060(14) must be deposited into the account. Moneys in
the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the
account may be used by the department of community, trade, and economic
development only for the purposes of promotion of the film and video production
industry in the state of Washington.

(2)(a)
Any commercial or advertisement that is produced by or on behalf of a state
agency, and that uses film, video, or other form of live action media, must be
filmed in Washington state.

(b) If a state agency determines that it is not possible to
comply with (a) of this subsection, then the state agency must receive express
written permission from the governor's office prior to filming any form of live
action media outside of the state.

---
END ---