BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that clinical depression is a serious problem in America,
undermining the ability of those afflicted to deal with work, family, and life
issues. The majority of those diagnosed as clinically depressed are women, as
are the majority of adult recipients of temporary assistance for needy
families. The legislature finds that some studies indicate a relationship
between severe depression and poverty, with the possibility that each condition
potentiates the other. Furthermore, some major depression appears to have a
biochemical cause.

The
legislature finds that, in recent years, a pharmaceutical approach to the
management of clinical depression has proven successful for many of those with
middle class access to health care professionals. The legislature intends to
provide access to pharmaceutical treatment for clinical depression, under
medical supervision, for a study group of temporary assistance for needy
families recipients for whom depression is a barrier to employment. The
legislature intends that the Washington state clinical depression in poverty
study be conducted, to estimate the extent of serious, disabling depression in
the temporary assistance for needy families population, and to determine whether
medication is effective in freeing an unknown number of those in poverty to
live productive and self-sufficient lives while caring for their families.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
The department of health shall perform or contract for the performance of the
Washington state clinical depression in poverty study to be conducted on the
Washington state temporary assistance for needy families adult recipient
population. The goal of the study is to estimate to what extent the subject
population is experiencing major clinical depression as a barrier to
self-sufficiency, and to examine the utility of appropriately administered and
medically supervised pharmaceutical treatment for depression.

(2)
The study shall, at a minimum, consist of the following elements:

(a)
Initial screening of volunteers for the study, by administration of a simple
screening device, such as the center for epidemiological studies depression
scale (CES-D) or other scale;

(b)
Final screening and selection of volunteers by clinical assessment and
diagnosis, in accordance with the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental
Disorders, third edition revised (DSM-III-R), performed by professionals
licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.83 RCW;

(c)
Performance of an appropriate human subjects review;

(d)
Division of the study population into a group to receive selective seratonin
reuptake inhibitors under medical supervision and a control group; and

(e)
Analysis and comparison of the study population to assess whether or not
clinical depression is a present barrier to self-sufficiency and undermines the
ability to achieve economic independence and exit temporary assistance for
needy families, and whether or not a pharmaceutical approach to resolution of
the depressive condition offers sufficient therapeutic effect to enable and
assist the recipient's progress to welfare-independence.

(3)
The department of social and health services and the employment security
department shall cooperate with the department of health, and shall provide
access to data and to study volunteers. Personal data and the identities of
individual volunteers is protected by confidentiality requirements, to the
extent necessary.

(4)
The results of the study shall be reported to the legislature on or before
September 1, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. The
sum of one hundred thousand dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is
appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2001, from the general fund to
the department of health for the purposes of this act.

---
END ---