BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
43.131.395 (Parimutuel taxes and redistributions--Review) and 1998
c 345 s 8;

(2) RCW
43.131.396 (Parimutuel taxes and redistributions--Repeal) and 1998
c 345 s 9;

(3) RCW
67.16.095 (Sums paid to commission--Disposition--Retainage) and
1998 c 345 s 10;

(4) RCW
67.16.106 (Gross receipts--Commission's percentage--Nonprofit
race meets) and 1998 c 345 s 11; and

(5) RCW
67.16.171 (Gross receipts--Retention of percentage by licensees)
and 1998 c 345 s 12.

---
END ---