BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes that local governments are empowered to grant franchises
to cable operators and that changes in federal law governing cable services
have increased the importance of state action to ensure that consumer interests
are protected in the development and approval of franchise agreements between
local governments and cable operators. It is the intent of this chapter to
require certain provisions applicable to subscribers' billing, quotes for cable
services, and responsiveness to cable subscribers' complaints.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2.
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section
apply throughout this chapter.

(1)
"Cable operator" means any person or group of persons who provides
cable service over a cable system and directly or through one or more
affiliates owns a significant interest in such cable system, or who otherwise
controls or is responsible for, through any arrangement, the management and
operation of such a cable system.

(2)
"Cable service" means programming, in any combination, or any other
service provided by a cable operator on or in connection with a cable system.

(3)
"Cable system" means all or part of the facilities owned, rented,
leased, or otherwise controlled by a cable operator. This includes plant,
facilities, equipment, and closed signal transmission paths; switches,
software, hardware, and other processing equipment; antennas, cables,
amplifiers, towers, microwave links, studios, and real and personal property;
and any and all conductors, home terminals, converters, remote control units,
and all associated equipment or facilities, the purposes of which include distributing
cable service or programming or producing, receiving, amplifying, storing,
processing, or distributing video signals.

(4)
"Programming" means video material or programs prepared for or
capable of transmission on a cable system.

(5)
"Subscriber" means any person who is lawfully receiving, for any
purpose or reason, any cable service whether or not a fee is paid.

(6)
"Local government" means any county, city, or town that has entered
into a franchise agreement with a cable operator.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. Cable
subscribers have the following rights in their dealings with a cable operator:

(1)
The right to a clear and concise monthly billing for cable services, including
all applicable charges, fees, and taxes;

(2)
When requesting information about programming packages or options offered by
the cable operator, the right to a quoted price for services and necessary
equipment that includes all applicable charges, fees, and taxes; and

(3)
Following an inquiry or complaint to a cable operator about a billing or quoted
price for a service, the right to a prompt response from the operator.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
cable operator shall provide subscribers with a clear and concise monthly
billing that reflects all applicable charges, fees, and taxes for the service
provided. When information about programming packages or options offered by
the cable operator is requested, the operator shall provide a price for
services and necessary equipment that includes all applicable charges, fees,
and taxes.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
cable operator representative shall provide a prompt response to a subscriber
inquiry or complaint about a billing or quoted price for a service as provided
in this chapter. The operator shall respond to an inquiry or complaint made by
telephone within forty-eight hours, and to a written inquiry or complaint
within two weeks after receiving it.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
legislature finds that the practices covered by this chapter are matters
vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer
protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of this chapter is not
reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business and is
an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of
competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter
19.86 RCW.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. A franchise
agreement between a local government and a cable operator must require that a
written summary of the rights in sections 3 through 6 of this act must be
provided to each subscriber at the time of initial agreement with the cable
operator and to all subscribers at least once per year.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8.
Franchise agreements entered into between a local government and a cable
operator after the effective date of this act must include provisions
consistent with this chapter. Nothing in this chapter preempts provisions in
any other franchise agreement.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. This
act takes effect January 1, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 10.
Sections 1 through 9 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 19 RCW.

---
END ---