BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that fairs and youth shows provide communities with many
tangible and intangible benefits including providing responsible and productive
educational opportunities for youth and providing an annual community festivity
that brings together people of all ages.

The
legislature finds that fairs and youth shows are a rich tradition and that
state funds have been distributed to many fairs and youth shows for several
decades. However, the traditional source of funding that fairs and youth shows
have relied upon has become undependable.

The
purpose of this act is to establish a task force to develop recommendations for
long-term funding of community, county, and area fairs and youth shows.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1)
There is hereby created the task force on funding of fairs and youth shows.
The task force shall be comprised of the following members:

(a)
One member of the office of financial management appointed by the governor;

(b)
Two members of the house of representatives, one from each major caucus,
appointed by the co-speakers of the house of representatives;

(c)
Two members of the senate, one from each major caucus, appointed by the
president of the senate;

(d)
One representative of the department of agriculture, appointed by the director
of the department of agriculture;

(e)
One representative of the horse racing commission, appointed by the chair of
the horse racing commission;

(f)
Three representatives of fairs, appointed by the president of the state fairs
association, one to represent each of the following: Community fairs, large
county and area fairs, and small county and area fairs;

(g)
One representative of youth livestock shows, appointed by the dean of the
college of agriculture and home economics at Washington State University;

(h)
One representative of the horse racing industry appointed by agreement of the
co-speakers of the house of representatives and president of the senate; and

(i)
One representative of county governments, appointed by the Washington
association of counties.

(2)
The task force shall conduct an inquiry to become knowledgeable about the
following:

(a)
The December 1, 1999, report by the joint legislative audit and review
committee;

(b)
The operations of fairs and youth shows, and how state funding assistance has
been used in recent decades to support these events;

(c)
How fairs and youth shows are administered, and the nature of revenues and
expenditures that support these events;

(d)
How the state fair fund has been administered, and whether there are efficiency
improvements to reduce the cost of administering the state fair fund; and

(e)
Whether there are efficiency improvements to reduce the cost of administration
of the horse racing commission.

(3)
By November 15, 2000, the task force shall develop recommendations on the
amount and source or sources of funding needed to encourage fairs and youth
shows and any legislative proposals needed to implement the task force
recommendations.

(4)
The task force shall convene as soon as possible upon appointment of its
members. Members shall be appointed by May 1, 2000. The task force shall
elect a chair and agree upon rules for conducting the business of the task
force. Staff support for the task force shall be provided by the office of
financial management.

(5)
This section expires December 31, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---