BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Beginning May 1, 2000, the Washington state patrol shall collect, and report
semiannually to the criminal justice training commission, the following
information:

(a)
The number of individuals stopped for routine traffic enforcement, whether or
not a citation or warning was issued;

(b)
Identifying characteristics of the individual stopped, including the race or
ethnicity, approximate age, and gender;

(c)
The nature of the alleged violation that led to the stop;

(d)
Whether a search was instituted as a result of the stop; and

(e)
Whether an arrest was made, or a written citation issued, as a result of either
the stop or the search.

(2)
The criminal justice training commission and the Washington state patrol shall
compile the information required under subsection (1) of this section and make
a report to the legislature no later than December 1, 2000.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 43.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The Washington state patrol shall work with the criminal justice training
commission and the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to
develop (a) further criteria for collection and evaluation of the data
collected under section 1 of this act, and (b) training materials for use by
the state patrol and local law enforcement agencies on the issue of racial
profiling.

(2)
The Washington state patrol, criminal justice training commission, and
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall encourage local law
enforcement agencies to voluntarily collect the data set forth under section
1(1) of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall report to the
legislature by December 1, 2000, the following information:

(1)
The names and number of local law enforcement agencies voluntarily collecting
data on potential racial profiling;

(2)
The type of data being collected by each participating agency; and

(3)
The manner in which the agencies are using the data collected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or
safety, or support of the state government and its existing public
institutions, and takes effect immediately.

---
END ---