BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
70.02.020 and 1993 c 448 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Except
as authorized in RCW 70.02.050, ((a health care provider, an individual who
assists a health care provider in the delivery of health care, or an agent and
employee of a health care provider)) no person may ((not))
disclose health care information about a patient to any other person without
the patient's written authorization. A disclosure made under a patient's
written authorization must conform to the authorization.

Health care providers or facilities shall chart all disclosures((,
except to third-party payors,)) of health care information, such chartings
to become part of the health care information.

Sec.
2. RCW
70.02.050 and 1998 c 158 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A health care provider may disclose health care information about a patient
without the patient's authorization to the extent a recipient needs to know the
information, if the disclosure is:

(a)
To a person who the provider reasonably believes is providing health care to
the patient;

(b)
To any other person who requires health care information for health care
education, or to provide planning, quality assurance, peer review, or
administrative, legal, financial, or actuarial services to the health care
provider; or for assisting the health care provider in the delivery of health
care and the health care provider reasonably believes that the person:

(i)
Will not use or disclose the health care information for any other purpose; and

(ii)
Will take appropriate steps to protect the health care information;

(c)
To any other health care provider reasonably believed to have previously
provided health care to the patient, to the extent necessary to provide health
care to the patient, unless the patient has instructed the health care provider
in writing not to make the disclosure;

(d)
To any person if the health care provider reasonably believes that disclosure
will avoid or minimize an imminent danger to the health or safety of the
patient or any other individual, however there is no obligation under this
chapter on the part of the provider to so disclose;

(e)
Oral, and made to immediate family members of the patient, or any other
individual with whom the patient is known to have a close personal
relationship, if made in accordance with good medical or other professional
practice, unless the patient has instructed the health care provider in writing
not to make the disclosure;

(f)
To a health care provider who is the successor in interest to the health care
provider maintaining the health care information;

(g)
For use in a research project that an institutional review board has
determined:

(i)
Is of sufficient importance to outweigh the intrusion into the privacy of the
patient that would result from the disclosure;

(ii)
Is impracticable without the use or disclosure of the health care information
in individually identifiable form;

(iii)
Contains reasonable safeguards to protect the information from redisclosure;

(iv)
Contains reasonable safeguards to protect against identifying, directly or
indirectly, any patient in any report of the research project; and

(v)
Contains procedures to remove or destroy at the earliest opportunity,
consistent with the purposes of the project, information that would enable the
patient to be identified, unless an institutional review board authorizes
retention of identifying information for purposes of another research project;

(h)
To a person who obtains information for purposes of an audit, if that person
agrees in writing to:

(i)
Remove or destroy, at the earliest opportunity consistent with the purpose of
the audit, information that would enable the patient to be identified; and

(ii)
Not to disclose the information further, except to accomplish the audit or
report unlawful or improper conduct involving fraud in payment for health care
by a health care provider or patient, or other unlawful conduct by the health
care provider;

(i)
To an official of a penal or other custodial institution in which the patient
is detained;

(j)
To provide directory information, unless the patient has instructed the health
care provider not to make the disclosure;

(k)
In the case of a hospital or health care provider to provide, in cases reported
by fire, police, sheriff, or other public authority, name, ((residence,))
sex, age, occupation, ((condition, diagnosis,)) or extent and location
of injuries as determined by a physician, and whether the patient was conscious
when admitted.

(2)
A health care provider shall disclose health care information about a patient
without the patient's authorization if the disclosure is:

(a)
To federal, state, or local public health authorities, to the extent the health
care provider is required by law to report health care information((;)),
or when needed to determine compliance with state or federal licensure,
certification or registration rules or laws((; or when needed to protect the
public health));

(b)
To federal, state, or local law enforcement authorities to the extent the
health care provider is required by law;

(c)
To county coroners and medical examiners for the investigations of deaths of
patients whose health care information is disclosed;

(d)
Pursuant to compulsory process in accordance with RCW 70.02.060.

(3) All state or local agencies obtaining patient health care
information pursuant to this section shall adopt rules establishing their
record acquisition, retention, and security policies that are consistent with
this chapter.

Sec.
3. RCW
70.02.170 and 1991 c 335 s 801 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A person who has complied with this chapter may maintain an action for the
relief provided in this section against a ((health care provider or facility))
person who has not complied with this chapter.

(2)
The court may order the ((health care provider or other)) noncomplying
person to comply with this chapter. Such relief may include:

(a)
One thousand dollars, or actual damages, ((but shall not include
consequential or incidental damages. The court shall award)) whichever
is greater, for each violation;

(b)
Reasonable attorneys' fees and all other expenses reasonably incurred to
the prevailing party; and

(c)
Such other relief, including an injunction, as the court may deem appropriate.

(3)
Any action under this chapter is barred unless the action is commenced within
two years after the cause of action is discovered.

(4)
A violation of this chapter shall not be deemed a violation of the consumer protection
act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

(5) Nothing in this chapter limits the right of a person to
recover damages or other relief under any other applicable law.

---
END ---