BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
13.34.803 and 1998 c 314 s 40 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The departments of health and social and health services shall develop a
comprehensive plan for providing services to mothers who (a) have delivered a
drug or alcohol exposed or affected infant, and (b) meet the definition of at-risk
eligible persons in RCW 74.09.790 and who have a child up to three years of
age. The services to be provided by the plan will include those defined in RCW
74.09.790. The plan shall provide for the coordination of services through
community-based programs and among: (i) The departments; (ii) the departments'
divisions; and (iii) other state agencies. The plan shall include
recommendations to the legislature for implementing the plan and any
alternative methods for addressing the needs of these mothers and their
children.

(2)
In developing the plan, the department of health shall inventory the
community-based programs that may be accessed to provide services to these
mothers and their children; evaluate implementing services for these mothers
through extension of the maternity care access system; and evaluate the fiscal
impact of the plan. In performing the fiscal evaluation, the department shall
calculate potential long-term cost savings to the state resulting from reduced
use of the medical, juvenile justice, public assistance, and dependency systems
by children and mothers receiving services under the plan.

(((3)
The department shall submit a report describing the plan to the appropriate
committees of the house of representatives and senate by November 1, 1998.))

Sec.
2. RCW
13.40.430 and 1993 c 373 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department shall within existing funds collect such data as may be necessary to
monitor any disparity in processing or disposing of cases involving juvenile
offenders due to economic, gender, geographic, or racial factors that may
result from implementation of section 1, chapter 373, Laws of 1993. ((Beginning
December 1, 1993, the department shall report annually to the legislature on
economic, gender, geographic, or racial disproportionality in the rates of
arrest, detention, trial, treatment, and disposition in the state's juvenile
justice system. The report shall cover the preceding calendar year. The
annual report shall identify the causes of such disproportionality and shall
specifically point out any economic, gender, geographic, or racial
disproportionality resulting from implementation of section 1, chapter 373,
Laws of 1993.))

Sec.
3. RCW
26.44.030 and 1999 c 267 s 20 and 1999 c 176 s 30 are each reenacted and
amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
When any practitioner, county coroner or medical examiner, law enforcement
officer, professional school personnel, registered or licensed nurse, social
service counselor, psychologist, pharmacist, licensed or certified child care
providers or their employees, employee of the department, juvenile probation
officer, placement and liaison specialist, responsible living skills program
staff, HOPE center staff, or state family and children's ombudsman or any
volunteer in the ombudsman's office has reasonable cause to believe that a
child has suffered abuse or neglect, he or she shall report such incident, or
cause a report to be made, to the proper law enforcement agency or to the
department as provided in RCW 26.44.040.

(b)
The reporting requirement also applies to department of corrections personnel
who, in the course of their employment, observe offenders or the children with
whom the offenders are in contact. If, as a result of observations or
information received in the course of his or her employment, any department of
corrections personnel has reasonable cause to believe that a child has suffered
abuse or neglect, he or she shall report the incident, or cause a report to be
made, to the proper law enforcement agency or to the department as provided in
RCW 26.44.040.

(c)
The reporting requirement shall also apply to any adult who has reasonable
cause to believe that a child who resides with them, has suffered severe abuse,
and is able or capable of making a report. For the purposes of this
subsection, "severe abuse" means any of the following: Any single
act of abuse that causes physical trauma of sufficient severity that, if left
untreated, could cause death; any single act of sexual abuse that causes
significant bleeding, deep bruising, or significant external or internal
swelling; or more than one act of physical abuse, each of which causes
bleeding, deep bruising, significant external or internal swelling, bone
fracture, or unconsciousness.

(d)
The report must be made at the first opportunity, but in no case longer than
forty-eight hours after there is reasonable cause to believe that the child has
suffered abuse or neglect. The report must include the identity of the accused
if known.

(2)
The reporting requirement of subsection (1) of this section does not apply to
the discovery of abuse or neglect that occurred during childhood if it is
discovered after the child has become an adult. However, if there is
reasonable cause to believe other children are or may be at risk of abuse or
neglect by the accused, the reporting requirement of subsection (1) of this
section does apply.

(3)
Any other person who has reasonable cause to believe that a child has suffered
abuse or neglect may report such incident to the proper law enforcement agency
or to the department of social and health services as provided in RCW
26.44.040.

(4)
The department, upon receiving a report of an incident of alleged abuse or
neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child who has died or has had
physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him or her other than by accidental
means or who has been subjected to alleged sexual abuse, shall report such
incident to the proper law enforcement agency. In emergency cases, where the
child's welfare is endangered, the department shall notify the proper law
enforcement agency within twenty-four hours after a report is received by the
department. In all other cases, the department shall notify the law
enforcement agency within seventy-two hours after a report is received by the
department. If the department makes an oral report, a written report must also
be made to the proper law enforcement agency within five days thereafter.

(5)
Any law enforcement agency receiving a report of an incident of alleged abuse
or neglect pursuant to this chapter, involving a child who has died or has had
physical injury or injuries inflicted upon him or her other than by accidental
means, or who has been subjected to alleged sexual abuse, shall report such
incident in writing as provided in RCW 26.44.040 to the proper county
prosecutor or city attorney for appropriate action whenever the law enforcement
agency's investigation reveals that a crime may have been committed. The law
enforcement agency shall also notify the department of all reports received and
the law enforcement agency's disposition of them. In emergency cases, where
the child's welfare is endangered, the law enforcement agency shall notify the
department within twenty-four hours. In all other cases, the law enforcement
agency shall notify the department within seventy-two hours after a report is
received by the law enforcement agency.

(6)
Any county prosecutor or city attorney receiving a report under subsection (5)
of this section shall notify the victim, any persons the victim requests, and
the local office of the department, of the decision to charge or decline to
charge a crime, within five days of making the decision.

(7)
The department may conduct ongoing case planning and consultation with those
persons or agencies required to report under this section, with consultants
designated by the department, and with designated representatives of Washington
Indian tribes if the client information exchanged is pertinent to cases
currently receiving child protective services. Upon request, the department
shall conduct such planning and consultation with those persons required to
report under this section if the department determines it is in the best
interests of the child. Information considered privileged by statute and not
directly related to reports required by this section must not be divulged
without a valid written waiver of the privilege.

(8)
Any case referred to the department by a physician licensed under chapter 18.57
or 18.71 RCW on the basis of an expert medical opinion that child abuse,
neglect, or sexual assault has occurred and that the child's safety will be seriously
endangered if returned home, the department shall file a dependency petition
unless a second licensed physician of the parents' choice believes that such
expert medical opinion is incorrect. If the parents fail to designate a second
physician, the department may make the selection. If a physician finds that a
child has suffered abuse or neglect but that such abuse or neglect does not
constitute imminent danger to the child's health or safety, and the department
agrees with the physician's assessment, the child may be left in the parents'
home while the department proceeds with reasonable efforts to remedy parenting
deficiencies.

(9)
Persons or agencies exchanging information under subsection (7) of this section
shall not further disseminate or release the information except as authorized
by state or federal statute. Violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor.

(10)
Upon receiving reports of alleged abuse or neglect, the department or law
enforcement agency may interview children. The interviews may be conducted on
school premises, at day-care facilities, at the child's home, or at other
suitable locations outside of the presence of parents. Parental notification
of the interview must occur at the earliest possible point in the investigation
that will not jeopardize the safety or protection of the child or the course of
the investigation. Prior to commencing the interview the department or law
enforcement agency shall determine whether the child wishes a third party to be
present for the interview and, if so, shall make reasonable efforts to
accommodate the child's wishes. Unless the child objects, the department or
law enforcement agency shall make reasonable efforts to include a third party
in any interview so long as the presence of the third party will not jeopardize
the course of the investigation.

(11)
Upon receiving a report of alleged child abuse and neglect, the department or
investigating law enforcement agency shall have access to all relevant records
of the child in the possession of mandated reporters and their employees.

(12)
The department shall maintain investigation records and conduct timely and
periodic reviews of all cases constituting abuse and neglect. The department
shall maintain a log of screened-out nonabusive cases.

(13)
The department shall use a risk assessment process when investigating alleged
child abuse and neglect referrals. The department shall present the risk
factors at all hearings in which the placement of a dependent child is an
issue. Substance abuse must be a risk factor. The department shall, within
funds appropriated for this purpose, offer enhanced community-based services to
persons who are determined not to require further state intervention.

((The
department shall provide annual reports to the legislature on the effectiveness
of the risk assessment process.))

(14)
Upon receipt of a report of alleged abuse or neglect the law enforcement agency
may arrange to interview the person making the report and any collateral
sources to determine if any malice is involved in the reporting.

(15)
The department shall make reasonable efforts to learn the name, address, and
telephone number of each person making a report of abuse or neglect under this
section. The department shall provide assurances of appropriate
confidentiality of the identification of persons reporting under this section.
If the department is unable to learn the information required under this
subsection, the department shall only investigate cases in which: (a) The
department believes there is a serious threat of substantial harm to the child;
(b) the report indicates conduct involving a criminal offense that has, or is
about to occur, in which the child is the victim; or (c) the department has,
after investigation, a report of abuse or neglect that has been founded with
regard to a member of the household within three years of receipt of the
referral.

Sec.
4. RCW
34.05.328 and 1997 c 430 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Before adopting a rule described in subsection (5) of this section, an agency
shall:

(a)
Clearly state in detail the general goals and specific objectives of the
statute that the rule implements;

(b)
Determine that the rule is needed to achieve the general goals and specific
objectives stated under (a) of this subsection, and analyze alternatives to
rule making and the consequences of not adopting the rule;

(c)
Determine that the probable benefits of the rule are greater than its probable
costs, taking into account both the qualitative and quantitative benefits and
costs and the specific directives of the statute being implemented;

(d)
Determine, after considering alternative versions of the rule and the analysis
required under (b) and (c) of this subsection, that the rule being adopted is
the least burdensome alternative for those required to comply with it that will
achieve the general goals and specific objectives stated under (a) of this
subsection;

(e)
Determine that the rule does not require those to whom it applies to take an
action that violates requirements of another federal or state law;

(f)
Determine that the rule does not impose more stringent performance requirements
on private entities than on public entities unless required to do so by federal
or state law;

(g)
Determine if the rule differs from any federal regulation or statute applicable
to the same activity or subject matter and, if so, determine that the
difference is justified by the following:

(i)
A state statute that explicitly allows the agency to differ from federal
standards; or

(ii)
Substantial evidence that the difference is necessary to achieve the general
goals and specific objectives stated under (a) of this subsection; and

(h)
Coordinate the rule, to the maximum extent practicable, with other federal,
state, and local laws applicable to the same activity or subject matter.

(2)
In making its determinations pursuant to subsection (1)(b) through (g) of this
section, the agency shall place in the rule-making file documentation of
sufficient quantity and quality so as to persuade a reasonable person that the
determinations are justified.

(3)
Before adopting rules described in subsection (5) of this section, an agency
shall place in the rule-making file a rule implementation plan for rules filed
under each adopting order. The plan shall describe how the agency intends to:

(a)
Implement and enforce the rule, including a description of the resources the
agency intends to use;

(b)
Inform and educate affected persons about the rule;

(c)
Promote and assist voluntary compliance; and

(d)
Evaluate whether the rule achieves the purpose for which it was adopted,
including, to the maximum extent practicable, the use of interim milestones to
assess progress and the use of objectively measurable outcomes.

(4)
After adopting a rule described in subsection (5) of this section regulating
the same activity or subject matter as another provision of federal or state
law, an agency shall do all of the following:

(a)
Provide to the business assistance center a list citing by reference the other
federal and state laws that regulate the same activity or subject matter;

(b)
Coordinate implementation and enforcement of the rule with the other federal
and state entities regulating the same activity or subject matter by making
every effort to do one or more of the following:

(i)
Deferring to the other entity;

(ii)
Designating a lead agency; or

(iii)
Entering into an agreement with the other entities specifying how the agency
and entities will coordinate implementation and enforcement.

If
the agency is unable to comply with this subsection (4)(b), the agency shall
report to the legislature pursuant to (c) of this subsection;

(c)
Report to the joint administrative rules review committee:

(i)
The existence of any overlap or duplication of other federal or state laws, any
differences from federal law, and any known overlap, duplication, or conflict
with local laws; and

(ii)
Make recommendations for any legislation that may be necessary to eliminate or
mitigate any adverse effects of such overlap, duplication, or difference.

(5)(a)
Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, this section applies to:

(i)
Significant legislative rules of the departments of ecology, labor and
industries, health, revenue, social and health services, and natural resources,
the employment security department, the forest practices board, the office of
the insurance commissioner, and to the legislative rules of the department of
fish and wildlife implementing chapter 75.20 RCW; and

(ii)
Any rule of any agency, if this section is voluntarily made applicable to the
rule by the agency, or is made applicable to the rule by a majority vote of the
joint administrative rules review committee within forty-five days of receiving
the notice of proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320.

(b)
This section does not apply to:

(i)
Emergency rules adopted under RCW 34.05.350;

(ii)
Rules relating only to internal governmental operations that are not subject to
violation by a nongovernment party;

(iii)
Rules adopting or incorporating by reference without material change federal
statutes or regulations, Washington state statutes, rules of other Washington
state agencies, shoreline master programs other than those programs governing
shorelines of state-wide significance, or, as referenced by Washington state
law, national consensus codes that generally establish industry standards, if
the material adopted or incorporated regulates the same subject matter and
conduct as the adopting or incorporating rule;

(iv)
Rules that only correct typographical errors, make address or name changes, or
clarify language of a rule without changing its effect;

(v)
Rules the content of which is explicitly and specifically dictated by statute;

(vi)
Rules that set or adjust fees or rates pursuant to legislative standards; or

(vii)
Rules of the department of social and health services relating only to client
medical or financial eligibility and rules concerning liability for care of
dependents.

(c)
For purposes of this subsection:

(i)
A "procedural rule" is a rule that adopts, amends, or repeals (A) any
procedure, practice, or requirement relating to any agency hearings; (B) any
filing or related process requirement for making application to an agency for a
license or permit; or (C) any policy statement pertaining to the consistent
internal operations of an agency.

(ii)
An "interpretive rule" is a rule, the violation of which does not
subject a person to a penalty or sanction, that sets forth the agency’s
interpretation of statutory provisions it administers.

(iii)
A "significant legislative rule" is a rule other than a procedural or
interpretive rule that (A) adopts substantive provisions of law pursuant to
delegated legislative authority, the violation of which subjects a violator of
such rule to a penalty or sanction; (B) establishes, alters, or revokes any
qualification or standard for the issuance, suspension, or revocation of a
license or permit; or (C) adopts a new, or makes significant amendments to, a
policy or regulatory program.

(d)
In the notice of proposed rule making under RCW 34.05.320, an agency shall
state whether this section applies to the proposed rule pursuant to (a)(i) of
this subsection, or if the agency will apply this section voluntarily.

(((6)
By January 31, 1996, and by January 31st of each even-numbered year thereafter,
the office of financial management, after consulting with state agencies,
counties, and cities, and business, labor, and environmental organizations,
shall report to the governor and the legislature regarding the effects of this
section on the regulatory system in this state. The report shall document:

(a)
The rules proposed to which this section applied and to the extent possible,
how compliance with this section affected the substance of the rule, if any,
that the agency ultimately adopted;

(b)
The costs incurred by state agencies in complying with this section;

(c)
Any legal action maintained based upon the alleged failure of any agency to
comply with this section, the costs to the state of such action, and the
result;

(d)
The extent to which this section has adversely affected the capacity of
agencies to fulfill their legislatively prescribed mission;

(e)
The extent to which this section has improved the acceptability of state rules
to those regulated; and

(f)
Any other information considered by the office of financial management to be
useful in evaluating the effect of this section.))

Sec.
5. RCW
43.20B.030 and 1997 c 130 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as otherwise provided by law, there will be no collection of
overpayments and other debts due the department after the expiration of six
years from the date of notice of such overpayment or other debt unless the
department has commenced recovery action in a court of law or unless an
administrative remedy authorized by statute is in place. However, any amount
due in a case thus extended shall cease to be a debt due the department at the
expiration of ten years from the date of the notice of the overpayment or other
debt unless a court-ordered remedy would be in effect for a longer period.

(2)(((a)))
The department, at any time, may accept offers of compromise of disputed claims
or may grant partial or total write-off of any debt due the department if it is
no longer cost-effective to pursue. The department shall adopt rules
establishing the considerations to be made in the granting or denial of a
partial or total write-off of debts.

(((b)
Beginning December 1, 1997, the department shall report by December 1 each year
to the commerce and labor committees of the senate and house of
representatives, the senate ways and means committee, and the house
appropriations committee, or successor committees, the following information:

(i)
The cumulative amount of debt due the department;

(ii)
The cumulative amount of debt that has been written off by the department as no
longer cost-effective to pursue;

(iii)
The amount of debt due the department that has accrued in each of the previous
five fiscal years; and

(iv)
The amount of debt that has been written off in each of the previous five
fiscal years as no longer cost-effective to pursue.))

Sec.
6. RCW
43.63A.230 and 1993 c 280 s 63 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of community, trade, and economic development shall integrate an
employee ownership program within its existing technical assistance programs.
The employee ownership program shall provide technical assistance to
cooperatives authorized under chapter 23.78 RCW and conduct educational
programs on employee ownership and self-management. The department shall
include information on the option of employee ownership wherever appropriate in
its various programs.

(2)
The department shall maintain a list of firms and individuals with expertise in
the field of employee ownership and utilize such firms and individuals, as
appropriate, in delivering and coordinating the delivery of technical,
managerial, and educational services. In addition, the department shall work
with and rely on the services of the employment security department and state
institutions of higher education to promote employee ownership.

(3)
((The department shall report to the governor, the appropriate economic
development committees of the senate and the house of representatives, and the
ways and means committees of each house by December 1 of 1988, and each year
thereafter, on the accomplishments of the employee-ownership program. Such
reports shall include the number and types of firms assisted, the number of
jobs created by such firms, the types of services, the number of workshops
presented, the number of employees trained, and the results of client
satisfaction surveys distributed to those using the services of the program.

(4))) For
purposes of this section, an employee stock ownership plan qualifies as a
cooperative if at least fifty percent, plus one share, of its voting shares of
stock are voted on a one-person-one-vote basis.

Sec.
7. RCW 70.119A.170
and 1997 c 218 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
A drinking water assistance account is created in the state treasury. Such
subaccounts as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter are
permitted to be established within the account. The purpose of the account is
to allow the state to use any federal funds that become available to states
from congress to fund a state revolving loan fund program as part of the
reauthorization of the federal safe drinking water act. Expenditures from the
account may only be made by the secretary, the public works board, or the
department of community, trade, and economic development, after appropriation.
Moneys in the account may only be used, consistent with federal law, to assist
water systems to provide safe drinking water through a program administered
through the department of health, the public works board, and the department of
community, trade, and economic development and for other activities authorized
under federal law. Money may be placed in the account from the proceeds of
bonds when authorized by the legislature, transfers from other state funds or
accounts, federal capitalization grants or other financial assistance, all
repayments of moneys borrowed from the account, all interest payments made by
borrowers from the account or otherwise earned on the account, or any other
lawful source. All interest earned on moneys deposited in the account,
including repayments, shall remain in the account and may be used for any
eligible purpose. Moneys in the account may only be used to assist local
governments and water systems to provide safe and reliable drinking water, for
other services and assistance authorized by federal law to be funded from these
federal funds, and to administer the program.

(2)
The department and the public works board shall establish and maintain a
program to use the moneys in the drinking water assistance account as provided
by the federal government under the safe drinking water act. The department
and the public works board, in consultation with purveyors, local governments,
local health jurisdictions, financial institutions, commercial construction
interests, other state agencies, and other affected and interested parties,
shall by January 1, 1999, adopt final joint rules and requirements for the
provision of financial assistance to public water systems as authorized under
federal law. Prior to the effective date of the final rules, the department
and the public works board may establish and utilize guidelines for the sole
purpose of ensuring the timely procurement of financial assistance from the
federal government under the safe drinking water act, but such guidelines shall
be converted to rules by January 1, 1999. The department and the public works board
shall make every reasonable effort to ensure the state's receipt and
disbursement of federal funds to eligible public water systems as quickly as
possible after the federal government has made them available. ((By
December 15, 1997, the department and the public works board shall provide a
report to the appropriate committees of the legislature reflecting the input
from the affected interests and parties on the status of the program. The
report shall include significant issues and concerns, the status of rule making
and guidelines, and a plan for the adoption of final rules.))

(3)
If the department, public works board, or any other department, agency, board,
or commission of state government participates in providing service under this
section, the administering entity shall endeavor to provide cost-effective and
timely services. Mechanisms to provide cost-effective and timely services
include: (a) Adopting federal guidelines by reference into administrative
rules; (b) using existing management mechanisms rather than creating new
administrative structures; (c) investigating the use of service contracts,
either with other governmental entities or with nongovernmental service
providers; (d) the use of joint or combined financial assistance applications;
and (e) any other method or practice designed to streamline and expedite the
delivery of services and financial assistance.

(4)
The department shall have the authority to establish assistance priorities and
carry out oversight and related activities, other than financial
administration, with respect to assistance provided with federal funds. The
department, the public works board, and the department of community, trade, and
economic development shall jointly develop, with the assistance of water purveyors
and other affected and interested parties, a memorandum of understanding
setting forth responsibilities and duties for each of the parties. The
memorandum of understanding at a minimum, shall include:

(a)
Responsibility for developing guidelines for providing assistance to public
water systems and related oversight prioritization and oversight
responsibilities including requirements for prioritization of loans or other
financial assistance to public water systems;

(b)
Department submittal of preapplication information to the public works board
for review and comment;

(c)
Department submittal of a prioritized list of projects to the public works
board for determination of:

(i)
Financial capability of the applicant; and

(ii)
Readiness to proceed, or the ability of the applicant to promptly commence the
project;

(d)
A process for determining consistency with existing water resource planning and
management, including coordinated water supply plans, regional water resource
plans, and comprehensive plans under the growth management act, chapter 36.70A
RCW;

(e)
A determination of:

(i)
Least-cost solutions, including consolidation and restructuring of small
systems, where appropriate, into more economical units;

(ii)
The provision of regional facilities;

(iii)
Projects and activities that facilitate compliance with the federal safe
drinking water act; and

(iv)
Projects and activities that are intended to achieve the public health
objectives of federal and state drinking water laws;

(f)
Implementation of water conservation and other demand management measures
consistent with state guidelines for water utilities;

(g)
Assistance for the necessary planning and engineering to assure that
consistency, coordination, and proper professional review are incorporated into
projects or activities proposed for funding;

(h)
Minimum standards for water system capacity, financial viability, and water
system planning;

(i)
Testing and evaluation of the water quality of the state's public water system
to assure that priority for financial assistance is provided to systems and
areas with threats to public health from contaminated supplies and reduce in
appropriate cases the substantial increases in costs and rates that customers
of small systems would otherwise incur under the monitoring and testing
requirements of the federal safe drinking water act;

(j)
Coordination, to the maximum extent possible, with other state programs that
provide financial assistance to public water systems and state programs that
address existing or potential water quality or drinking contamination problems;

(k)
Definitions of "affordability" and "disadvantaged
community" that are consistent with these and similar terms in use by
other state or federal assistance programs;

(l)
Criteria for the financial assistance program for public water systems, which
shall include, but are not limited to:

(i)
Determining projects addressing the most serious risk to human health;

(ii)
Determining the capacity of the system to effectively manage its resources,
including meeting state financial viability criteria; and

(iii)
Determining the relative benefit to the community served; and

(m)
Ensure that each agency fulfills the audit, accounting, and reporting
requirements under federal law for its portion of the administration of this
program.

(5)
The department and the public works board shall begin the process to disburse
funds no later than October 1, 1997, and shall adopt such rules as are necessary
under chapter 34.05 RCW to administer the program by January 1, 1999.

Sec.
8. RCW
74.09.310 and 1998 c 314 s 34 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department may make available, or cause to be made available, pharmaceutical
birth control services, information, and counseling to any person who enters
chemical dependency treatment under section 20 or 21 of this act. Within
available funds, the department may pay for any tubal ligations requested under
section 19 of this act if the mother's income is less than two hundred percent
of the federal poverty level. ((The department shall report by December 1st
of each year to the governor and legislature: (1) The number of tubal
ligations performed as a result of chapter 314, Laws of 1998; (2) the number of
women who decline to undergo the surgery; (3) the number of women who obtain
pharmaceutical birth control, by type of birth control; and (4) the number of
women who are reported to the department.))

Sec.
9. RCW
74.09.320 and 1998 c 314 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department may make available, or cause to be made available, pharmaceutical
birth control services, information, and counseling to any person who enters
chemical dependency treatment under section 27 of this act. Within available
funds, the department may pay for any tubal ligations requested under section
26 of this act if the mother's income is less than two hundred percent of the
federal poverty level. ((The department shall report by December 1st of
each year to the governor and legislature: (1) The number of tubal ligations
performed as a result of chapter 314, Laws of 1998; (2) the number of women who
decline to undergo the surgery; (3) the number of women who obtain
pharmaceutical birth control, by type of birth control; and (4) the number of
women who are reported to the department.))

Sec.
10. RCW
74.13.031 and 1999 c 267 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department shall have the duty to provide child welfare services and shall:

(1)
Develop, administer, supervise, and monitor a coordinated and comprehensive
plan that establishes, aids, and strengthens services for the protection and
care of runaway, dependent, or neglected children.

(2)
Within available resources, recruit an adequate number of prospective adoptive
and foster homes, both regular and specialized, i.e. homes for children of
ethnic minority, including Indian homes for Indian children, sibling groups, handicapped
and emotionally disturbed, teens, and pregnant and parenting teens((,
and annually report to the governor and the legislature concerning the
department's success in: (a) Meeting the need for adoptive and foster home
placements; (b) reducing the foster parent turnover rate; (c) completing home
studies for legally free children; and (d) implementing and operating the
passport program required by RCW 74.13.285. The report shall include a section
entitled "Foster Home Turn-Over, Causes and Recommendations.")).

(3)
Investigate complaints of any recent act or failure to act on the part of a
parent or caretaker that results in death, serious physical or emotional harm,
or sexual abuse or exploitation, or that presents an imminent risk of serious
harm, and on the basis of the findings of such investigation, offer child
welfare services in relation to the problem to such parents, legal custodians,
or persons serving in loco parentis, and/or bring the situation to the
attention of an appropriate court, or another community agency: PROVIDED, That
an investigation is not required of nonaccidental injuries which are clearly
not the result of a lack of care or supervision by the child's parents, legal
custodians, or persons serving in loco parentis. If the investigation reveals
that a crime against a child may have been committed, the department shall
notify the appropriate law enforcement agency.

(4)
Offer, on a voluntary basis, family reconciliation services to families who are
in conflict.

(5)
Monitor out-of-home placements, on a timely and routine basis, to assure the
safety, well-being, and quality of care being provided is within the scope of
the intent of the legislature as defined in RCW 74.13.010 and 74.15.010, and
annually submit a report measuring the extent to which the department achieved
the specified goals to the governor and the legislature.

(6)
Have authority to accept custody of children from parents and to accept custody
of children from juvenile courts, where authorized to do so under law, to
provide child welfare services including placement for adoption, and to provide
for the physical care of such children and make payment of maintenance costs if
needed. Except where required by Public Law 95-608 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1915), no
private adoption agency which receives children for adoption from the
department shall discriminate on the basis of race, creed, or color when
considering applications in their placement for adoption.

(7)
Have authority to provide temporary shelter to children who have run away from
home and who are admitted to crisis residential centers.

(8)
Have authority to purchase care for children; and shall follow in general the
policy of using properly approved private agency services for the actual care
and supervision of such children insofar as they are available, paying for care
of such children as are accepted by the department as eligible for support at
reasonable rates established by the department.

(9)
Establish a children's services advisory committee which shall assist the
secretary in the development of a partnership plan for utilizing resources of
the public and private sectors, and advise on all matters pertaining to child
welfare, licensing of child care agencies, adoption, and services related
thereto. At least one member shall represent the adoption community.

(10)
Have authority to provide continued foster care or group care for individuals
from eighteen through twenty years of age to enable them to complete their high
school or vocational school program.

(11)
Have authority within funds appropriated for foster care services to purchase
care for Indian children who are in the custody of a federally recognized
Indian tribe or tribally licensed child-placing agency pursuant to parental
consent, tribal court order, or state juvenile court order; and the purchase of
such care shall be subject to the same eligibility standards and rates of
support applicable to other children for whom the department purchases care.

Notwithstanding
any other provision of RCW 13.32A.170 through 13.32A.200 and 74.13.032 through
74.13.036, or of this section all services to be provided by the department of
social and health services under subsections (4), (6), and (7) of this section,
subject to the limitations of these subsections, may be provided by any program
offering such services funded pursuant to Titles II and III of the federal
juvenile justice and delinquency prevention act of 1974.

(12)
Within amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, provide preventive
services to families with children that prevent or shorten the duration of an
out-of-home placement.

Sec.
11. RCW
74.13.036 and 1996 c 133 s 37 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The department of social and health services shall oversee implementation of
chapter 13.34 RCW and chapter 13.32A RCW. The oversight shall be comprised of
working with affected parts of the criminal justice and child care systems as
well as with local government, legislative, and executive authorities to
effectively carry out these chapters. The department shall work with all such
entities to ensure that chapters 13.32A and 13.34 RCW are implemented in a
uniform manner throughout the state.

(2)
The department shall develop a plan and procedures, in cooperation with the
state-wide advisory committee, to ((insure)) ensure the full
implementation of the provisions of chapter 13.32A RCW. Such plan and
procedures shall include but are not limited to:

(a)
Procedures defining and delineating the role of the department and juvenile
court with regard to the execution of the child in need of services placement
process;

(b)
Procedures for designating department staff responsible for family
reconciliation services;

(c)
Procedures assuring enforcement of contempt proceedings in accordance with RCW
13.32A.170 and 13.32A.250; and

(d)
Procedures for the continued education of all individuals in the criminal
juvenile justice and child care systems who are affected by chapter 13.32A RCW,
as well as members of the legislative and executive branches of government.

There
shall be uniform application of the procedures developed by the department and
juvenile court personnel, to the extent practicable. Local and regional
differences shall be taken into consideration in the development of procedures
required under this subsection.

(3)
In addition to its other oversight duties, the department shall:

(a)
Identify and evaluate resource needs in each region of the state;

(b)
Disseminate information collected as part of the oversight process to affected
groups and the general public;

(c)
Educate affected entities within the juvenile justice and child care systems,
local government, and the legislative branch regarding the implementation of
chapters 13.32A and 13.34 RCW;

(d)
Review complaints concerning the services, policies, and procedures of those
entities charged with implementing chapters 13.32A and 13.34 RCW; and

(e)
Report any violations and misunderstandings regarding the implementation of
chapters 13.32A and 13.34 RCW.

(4)
The secretary shall submit a quarterly report to the appropriate local
government entities.

(((5)
The department shall provide an annual report to the legislature not later than
December 1, indicating the number of times it has declined to accept custody of
a child from a law enforcement agency under chapter 13.32A RCW and the number
of times it has received a report of a child being released without placement
under RCW 13.32A.060(1)(c). The report shall include the dates, places, and
reasons the department declined to accept custody and the dates and places
children are released without placement.))

Sec.
12. RCW
74.14C.070 and 1995 c 311 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

The
secretary of social and health services, or the secretary's regional designee,
may transfer funds appropriated for foster care services to purchase
preservation services and other preventive services for children at imminent
risk of out-of-home placement or who face a substantial likelihood of
out-of-home placement. This transfer may be made in those regions that lower
foster care expenditures through efficient use of preservation services and
permanency planning efforts. The transfer shall be equivalent to the amount of
reduced foster care expenditures and shall be made in accordance with the
provisions of this chapter and with the approval of the office of financial
management. ((The secretary shall present an annual report to the
legislature regarding any transfers under this section. The secretary shall
include caseload, expenditure, cost avoidance, identified improvements to the
out-of-home care system, and outcome data related to the transfer in the
report. The secretary shall also include in the report information regarding:
(1) The percent of cases where a child is placed in out-of-home care after the
provision of intensive family preservation services or family preservation
services; (2) the average length of time before such child is placed
out-of-home; (3) the average length of time such child is placed out-of-home;
and (4) the number of families that refused the offer of either family
preservation services or intensive family preservation services.))

Sec.
13. RCW
74.20A.035 and 1987 c 441 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of social and health services shall augment its present paternity
establishment services through the hiring of additional assistant attorneys
general, or contracting with prosecutors or private attorneys licensed in the
state of Washington in those judicial districts experiencing delay or an
accumulation of unserved paternity cases. The employment of private attorneys
shall be limited in scope to renewable six-month periods in judicial districts
where the prosecutor or the attorney general cannot provide adequate,
cost-effective service. ((The department of social and health services
shall provide a written report of the circumstances requiring employment of
private attorneys to the judiciary committees of the senate and house of
representatives and provide copies of such reports to the office of the
attorney general and to the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys.))

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 14. The
following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:

(1) RCW
18.20.230 (Training standards review--Proposed enhancements) and
1999 c 372 s 3 & 1998 c 272 s 2;

(2) RCW
43.20A.870 (Children's services--Annual quality assurance report)
and 1999 c 372 s 7 & 1997 c 386 s 47;

(3) RCW
70.128.210 (Training standards review--Delivery system--Issues
reviewed--Report to the legislature) and 1998 c 272 s 3;

(4) RCW
71.36.020 (Inventory of mental health programs for children--Plan
for early periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment services) and 1991 c 326
s 13;

(5) RCW
74.14C.080 (Data collection--Reports to the legislature) and 1995
c 311 s 5;

(6) RCW
74.20A.340 (License suspension program--Annual report) and 1997 c
58 s 804;

(7) RCW
75.50.030 (Salmon enhancement plan--Enhancement projects) and
1995 1st sp.s. c 2 s 35 & 1985 c 458 s 3;

(8) RCW
75.08.410 (Director's determination of salmon production costs)
and 1989 c 336 s 2; and

(9) RCW
75.08.530 (Annual report--Salmon and steelhead harvest) and 1997
c 414 s 1.

---
END ---