BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
52.18.050 and 1998 c 16 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Any benefit charge authorized by this chapter shall not be effective unless a
proposition to impose the benefit charge is approved by a sixty percent
majority of the voters of the district voting at a general election or at a
special election called by the district for that purpose, held within the fire
protection district. An election held pursuant to this section shall be held
not more than twelve months prior to the date on which the first such charge is
to be assessed((: PROVIDED, That)). The benefit charge shall be
imposed (a) each year for six consecutive years, (b) each year for ten
consecutive years, or (c) permanently. A benefit charge approved at an
election shall not remain in effect for ((a period of more than six years
nor)) more than the number of years authorized by the voters if ((fewer
than six years)) a six or ten-year charge is authorized unless
subsequently reapproved by the voters.

(2)
The ballot shall be submitted so as to enable the voters favoring the
authorization of a fire protection district benefit charge to vote
"Yes" and those opposed thereto to vote "No((," and))."

(a)
The ballot proposition authorizing a six-year benefit charge or a
ten-year benefit charge shall be:

"Shall . . . . . . county
fire protection district No. . . . . be authorized to impose
benefit charges each year for . . . . (insert the maximum
number of years ((not to exceed six)) allowable) years, not to
exceed an amount equal to sixty percent of its operating budget, and be
prohibited from imposing an additional property tax under RCW 52.16.160?

YES NO

G G"

(((3)))
(b) Districts renewing ((the)) a six-year benefit charge or a
ten-year benefit charge may elect to use the following alternative ballot:

"Shall
. . . . . . county fire protection district No.
. . . . be authorized to continue voter-authorized benefit
charges each year for . . . . (insert the maximum number
of years ((not to exceed six)) allowable) years, not to exceed an
amount equal to sixty percent of its operating budget, and be prohibited from
imposing an additional property tax under RCW 52.16.160?

YES NO

G G"

(c) The ballot proposition authorizing a permanent benefit
charge shall be:

"Shall
. . . . . . county fire protection district No.
. . . . be authorized to impose PERMANENT benefit charges, not
to exceed an amount equal to sixty percent of its operating budget, and be
prohibited from imposing an additional property tax under RCW 52.16.160?

YES NO

G G"

(3)
A district imposing a permanent benefit charge under this chapter shall provide
for separate accounting of expenditures of the revenues generated by the
charge. The district shall maintain a statement of the accounting which shall
be updated at least every two years and shall be available to the public upon
request at no charge.

(4)
A district imposing a permanent benefit charge under this chapter shall provide
for a referendum procedure to apply to the resolution imposing the charge.
This referendum procedure shall specify that a referendum petition may be filed
at any time with a filing officer, as identified in the resolution. Within ten
days, the filing officer shall confer with the petitioner concerning form and
style of the petition, issue the petition an identification number, and secure
an accurate, concise, and positive ballot title from the designated local
official. The petitioner shall have thirty days in which to secure the
signatures of not less than fifteen percent of the registered voters of the
district, as of the last general election, upon petition forms which contain
the ballot title and the full text of the measure to be referred. The filing
officer shall verify the sufficiency of the signatures on the petition and, if
sufficient valid signatures are properly submitted, shall certify the
referendum measure to the next election within the district if one is to be
held within one hundred eighty days from the date of filing of the referendum
petition, or at a special election to be called for that purpose in accordance
with RCW 29.13.020.

The referendum procedure provided in this subsection shall be
exclusive in all instances for any district imposing the benefit charge under
this chapter and shall supersede the procedures provided under all other
provisions for initiative or referendum which might otherwise apply.

---
END ---