BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 41.05 RCW to read as follows:

The uniform medical plan trust account is created in the custody of
the state treasurer. Receipts from amounts due from or on behalf of uniform
medical plan enrollees including moneys disbursed from the public employees'
and retirees' insurance account shall be deposited into the account. Moneys in
the account shall be used exclusively for the purposes of operating the uniform
medical plan as established under RCW 41.05.140. The administrative expenditures
supported by this account are subject to allotment procedures under chapter
43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures from this
account. For the 1999-2001 biennium, deposits into the account are limited to
funds necessary to pay administrative expenses.

---
END ---