BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 80.28 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Before any customer of an electrical company transfers electric service from an
electrical company to another electric utility or a federal power marketing
authority, the customer shall enter into a special contract with the electrical
company that requires the customer to retain its obligations under the terms of
a tariff rider that funds electric efficiency measures. For the provisions of
this section to apply, the tariff rider must have been previously approved by
the commission and be presently applicable. A special contract entered into
under this section is subject to approval by the commission to ensure consistency
with the terms of the tariff rider.

(2)
Nothing in this section is to be construed as affecting any other authority of
the commission under this chapter.

(3)
For the purposes of this section, "electric utility" has the same
meaning as that term is defined under RCW 19.29A.010.

Sec.
2. RCW
80.28.110 and 1990 c 132 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

Every
gas company, electrical company or water company, engaged in the sale and
distribution of gas, electricity or water, shall, upon reasonable notice,
furnish to all persons and corporations who may apply therefor and be
reasonably entitled thereto, suitable facilities for furnishing and furnish all
available gas, electricity and water as demanded, except that a water company
shall not furnish water contrary to the provisions of water system plans
approved under chapter 43.20 or 70.116 RCW. This section does not apply to
electric service requested by a person or corporation when such electric
service has previously been transferred from an electrical company to another
electric utility or federal power marketing authority. Nothing in this section
is to be construed to prohibit an electrical company from offering electric
service to any person or corporation, provided that once electric service is
offered and initiated, the provisions of this section apply to the person or
corporation receiving such service. For the purposes of this section,
"electric utility" has the same meaning as that term is defined under
RCW 19.29A.010.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---