BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 47.04 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(a)
"Repair" means any activity that restores or mends to a sound or good
condition by replacing or fixing after decay, injury, dilapidation, or partial
destruction has occurred.

(b)
"Maintenance" means to preserve or retain in a condition of good
repair or efficiency.

(c)
"Traffic services" means maintenance activities such as, but not
limited to, pavement striping; pavement marking; raised pavement markers;
repairing and replacing highway signage, guideposts, and guardrails; traffic
signal maintenance; and highway lighting.

(2)
The department of transportation may purchase maintenance services by contract
with individuals or business entities. Maintenance services that may be
contracted out include, but are not limited to, roadway maintenance and repair,
drainage maintenance and slope repair, roadside and landscape maintenance,
bridge and urban tunnel maintenance, snow and ice control, traffic services,
and rest area maintenance. As prescribed in RCW 41.06.150(13), a discretionary
decision by the department to purchase maintenance services by contract is not
a bargainable issue.

(3)
If the department intends to purchase maintenance services, the department
shall notify any exclusive bargaining representative who represents any
employee whose employment status will be directly affected by such a contract.
The exclusive bargaining representative may offer a competing bid, and the
department must consider this bid in making the final decision to contract out.

Sec.
2. RCW
41.06.150 and 1999 c 297 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
board shall adopt rules, consistent with the purposes and provisions of this
chapter, as now or hereafter amended, and with the best standards of personnel
administration, regarding the basis and procedures to be followed for:

(1)
The reduction, dismissal, suspension, or demotion of an employee;

(2)
Certification of names for vacancies, including departmental promotions, with
the number of names equal to six more names than there are vacancies to be
filled, such names representing applicants rated highest on eligibility lists:
PROVIDED, That when other applicants have scores equal to the lowest score
among the names certified, their names shall also be certified;

(3)
Examinations for all positions in the competitive and noncompetitive service;

(4)
Appointments;

(5)
Training and career development;

(6)
Probationary periods of six to twelve months and rejections of probationary
employees, depending on the job requirements of the class, except that entry
level state park rangers shall serve a probationary period of twelve months;

(7)
Transfers;

(8)
Sick leaves and vacations;

(9)
Hours of work;

(10)
Layoffs when necessary and subsequent reemployment, both according to
seniority;

(11)
Determination of appropriate bargaining units within any agency: PROVIDED,
That in making such determination the board shall consider the duties, skills,
and working conditions of the employees, the history of collective bargaining
by the employees and their bargaining representatives, the extent of
organization among the employees, and the desires of the employees;

(12)
Certification and decertification of exclusive bargaining representatives:
PROVIDED, That after certification of an exclusive bargaining representative
and upon the representative's request, the director shall hold an election
among employees in a bargaining unit to determine by a majority whether to
require as a condition of employment membership in the certified exclusive
bargaining representative on or after the thirtieth day following the beginning
of employment or the date of such election, whichever is the later, and the
failure of an employee to comply with such a condition of employment
constitutes cause for dismissal: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no more often than
once in each twelve-month period after expiration of twelve months following
the date of the original election in a bargaining unit and upon petition of
thirty percent of the members of a bargaining unit the director shall hold an
election to determine whether a majority wish to rescind such condition of
employment: PROVIDED FURTHER, That for purposes of this clause, membership in
the certified exclusive bargaining representative is satisfied by the payment
of monthly or other periodic dues and does not require payment of initiation,
reinstatement, or any other fees or fines and includes full and complete
membership rights: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That in order to safeguard the right
of nonassociation of public employees, based on bona fide religious tenets or
teachings of a church or religious body of which such public employee is a
member, such public employee shall pay to the union, for purposes within the
program of the union as designated by such employee that would be in harmony
with his or her individual conscience, an amount of money equivalent to regular
union dues minus any included monthly premiums for union-sponsored insurance
programs, and such employee shall not be a member of the union but is entitled
to all the representation rights of a union member;

(13)
Agreements between agencies and certified exclusive bargaining representatives
providing for grievance procedures and collective negotiations on all personnel
matters over which the appointing authority of the appropriate bargaining unit
of such agency may lawfully exercise discretion. Discretionary decisions to
purchase maintenance services by contract by the department of transportation
are not subject to this subsection;

(14)
Written agreements may contain provisions for payroll deductions of employee
organization dues upon authorization by the employee member and for the
cancellation of such payroll deduction by the filing of a proper prior notice
by the employee with the appointing authority and the employee organization:
PROVIDED, That nothing contained herein permits or grants to any employee the
right to strike or refuse to perform his or her official duties;

(15)
Adoption and revision of a comprehensive classification plan for all positions
in the classified service, based on investigation and analysis of the duties
and responsibilities of each such position.

(a)
The board shall not adopt job classification revisions or class studies unless
implementation of the proposed revision or study will result in net cost
savings, increased efficiencies, or improved management of personnel or
services, and the proposed revision or study has been approved by the director
of financial management in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW.

(b)
((Beginning July 1, 1995, through June 30, 1997, in addition to the
requirements of (a) of this subsection:

(i)
The board may approve the implementation of salary increases resulting from
adjustments to the classification plan during the 1995-97 fiscal biennium only
if:

(A)
The implementation will not result in additional net costs and the proposed
implementation has been approved by the director of financial management in
accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW;

(B)
The implementation will take effect on July 1, 1996, and the total net cost of
all such actions approved by the board for implementation during the 1995-97
fiscal biennium does not exceed the amounts specified by the legislature
specifically for this purpose; or

(C)
The implementation is a result of emergent conditions. Emergent conditions are
defined as emergency situations requiring the establishment of positions
necessary for the preservation of the public health, safety, or general
welfare, which do not exceed $250,000 of the moneys identified in section
718(2), chapter 18, Laws of 1995 2nd sp. sess.

(ii)
The board shall approve only those salary increases resulting from adjustments
to the classification plan if they are due to documented recruitment and
retention difficulties, salary compression or inversion, increased duties and
responsibilities, or inequities. For these purposes, inequities are defined as
similar work assigned to different job classes with a salary disparity greater
than 7.5 percent.

(iii)
Adjustments made to the higher education hospital special pay plan are exempt
from (b)(i) through (ii) of this subsection.

(c)))
Reclassifications, class studies, and salary adjustments to be implemented
during the 1997-99 and subsequent fiscal biennia are governed by (a) of this
subsection and RCW 41.06.152;

(16)
Allocation and reallocation of positions within the classification plan;

(17)
Adoption and revision of a state salary schedule to reflect the prevailing
rates in Washington state private industries and other governmental units but
the rates in the salary schedules or plans shall be increased if necessary to
attain comparable worth under an implementation plan under RCW 41.06.155 and
that, for institutions of higher education and related boards, shall be
competitive for positions of a similar nature in the state or the locality in
which an institution of higher education or related board is located, such
adoption and revision subject to approval by the director of financial
management in accordance with the provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW;

(18)
Increment increases within the series of steps for each pay grade based on
length of service for all employees whose standards of performance are such as
to permit them to retain job status in the classified service;

(19)
Optional lump sum relocation compensation approved by the agency director,
whenever it is reasonably necessary that a person make a domiciliary move in
accepting a transfer or other employment with the state. An agency must
provide lump sum compensation within existing resources. If the person
receiving the relocation payment terminates or causes termination with the
state, for reasons other than layoff, disability separation, or other good
cause as determined by an agency director, within one year of the date of the
employment, the state is entitled to reimbursement of the lump sum compensation
from the person;

(20)
Providing for veteran's preference as required by existing statutes, with
recognition of preference in regard to layoffs and subsequent reemployment for
veterans and their surviving spouses by giving such eligible veterans and their
surviving spouses additional credit in computing their seniority by adding to
their unbroken state service, as defined by the board, the veteran's service in
the military not to exceed five years. For the purposes of this section,
"veteran" means any person who has one or more years of active
military service in any branch of the armed forces of the United States or who
has less than one year's service and is discharged with a disability incurred
in the line of duty or is discharged at the convenience of the government and
who, upon termination of such service has received an honorable discharge, a
discharge for physical reasons with an honorable record, or a release from
active military service with evidence of service other than that for which an
undesirable, bad conduct, or dishonorable discharge shall be given: PROVIDED,
HOWEVER, That the surviving spouse of a veteran is entitled to the benefits of
this section regardless of the veteran's length of active military service:
PROVIDED FURTHER, That for the purposes of this section "veteran"
does not include any person who has voluntarily retired with twenty or more
years of active military service and whose military retirement pay is in excess
of five hundred dollars per month;

(21)
Permitting agency heads to delegate the authority to appoint, reduce, dismiss,
suspend, or demote employees within their agencies if such agency heads do not
have specific statutory authority to so delegate: PROVIDED, That the board may
not authorize such delegation to any position lower than the head of a major
subdivision of the agency;

(22)
Assuring persons who are or have been employed in classified positions before
July 1, 1993, will be eligible for employment, reemployment, transfer, and
promotion in respect to classified positions covered by this chapter;

(23)
Affirmative action in appointment, promotion, transfer, recruitment, training,
and career development; development and implementation of affirmative action
goals and timetables; and monitoring of progress against those goals and
timetables.

The
board shall consult with the human rights commission in the development of
rules pertaining to affirmative action. The department of personnel shall
transmit a report annually to the human rights commission which states the
progress each state agency has made in meeting affirmative action goals and
timetables.

Sec.
3. RCW
41.06.380 and 1979 ex.s. c 46 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

Nothing
contained in this chapter shall prohibit any department, as defined in RCW
41.06.020, from purchasing services by contract with individuals or business
entities if such services were regularly purchased by valid contract by such
department prior to April 23, 1979: PROVIDED, That no such contract may be
executed or renewed if it would have the effect of terminating classified
employees or classified employee positions existing at the time of the
execution or renewal of the contract. This section does not apply to
maintenance activities of the department of transportation as defined by
section 1 of this act.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. This
act takes effect July 1, 2000.

---
END ---