BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

PART
I

SHORT TITLE

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 101. This
act may be known and cited as the property tax reform and relief act.

PART
II

INTENT

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 201. (1)
The legislature finds and declares that:

(a)
The rising property tax burden places undue financial pressures on working
families and prevents some citizens from attaining the American dream of
homeownership.

(b)
Our state currently has over one billion dollars of excess tax revenues that
have been collected from the people and should be returned to the people
without jeopardizing funds necessary for emergencies.

(c)
Many local jurisdictions have ignored the people's will in Referendum 47 and
have increased the property tax burden well above the rate of inflation.

(d)
Large increases in taxes on residential property, usually attributable to rapid
increases in property values, cause undue and excessive hardships for many homeowners.
These increased tax burdens put many homeowners at risk of being unable to
remain in their residences and maintain their property. Temporary financial
hardships, such as unemployment or medical costs, may leave some homeowners
with insufficient resources to pay property tax bills.

(2)
It is therefore the intent of the legislature to:

(a)
Provide immediate relief from the state portion of the property tax and then,
after ensuring a fiscally sound reserve, use all surplus state revenues to
fully eliminate the state property tax levy over time;

(b)
Require voter approval for all regular property tax increases that exceed the
rate of inflation; and

(c)
Create a property tax deferral program that allows taxpayers with financial
hardships to defer property taxes due in order to remain in their homes while
still paying an equitable share of the overall property tax burden.

PART
III

ADDITIONAL
PERMANENT STATE LEVY REDUCTION

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 301. A
new section is added to chapter 84.55 RCW to read as follows:

In
addition to the reductions in RCW 84.55.012 and 84.55.0121, the state property
tax levy for collection in 2001 shall be reduced by 7.55 percent of the levy
amount that would otherwise be allowed under this chapter without regard to
this section.

PART
IV

USING SURPLUSES TO PHASE
OUT THE STATE PROPERTY TAX LEVY

Sec.
401. RCW
43.135.045 and 1994 c 2 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The emergency reserve fund ((is)), the property tax reduction fund,
and the education construction fund are established in the state treasury.
((During))

(2)(a)
On July 1st of each ((fiscal)) year, the state treasurer shall ((deposit
in)) transfer to the emergency reserve fund ((all general fund‑-state
revenues)) any unobligated fund balance in excess of ((the)) general
fund‑-state expenditures ((limit)) for ((that)) the
immediately preceding fiscal year. ((Deposits shall be made at the end
of each fiscal quarter based on projections of state revenues and the state
expenditure limit.

(2))) (b)
The legislature may appropriate moneys from the emergency reserve fund only
with approval of at least two-thirds of the members of each house of the
legislature, and then only if the appropriation does not cause total
expenditures to exceed the state expenditure limit under this chapter.

(((3)))
(c) The emergency reserve fund balance shall not exceed five percent of
biennial general fund‑-state ((revenues as projected by the official
state revenue forecast)) expenditures made during the immediately
preceding fiscal year. Any balance in excess of five percent shall be
transferred ((on a quarterly basis)) by the state treasurer to the ((education
construction fund hereby created in the treasury)) property tax
reduction fund.

(3)(a)
Moneys transferred into the property tax reduction fund are subject in the next
fiscal year to transfer to the general fund for purposes of reducing the state
property tax levy.

(b)
The budget document submitted to the legislature by the governor under RCW
43.88.030 shall include a transfer to the general fund equivalent to the
amounts deposited in the property tax reduction fund. These amounts are to be
used solely for the purpose of reducing the state property tax levy.

(c)
Moneys transferred to the general fund under (b) of this subsection shall be
credited against the levy under RCW 84.52.065 for collection in the calendar
year following the fiscal year in which the transfer is made.

(d)
The property tax reduction fund may not exceed the amount of tax that would
otherwise be levied by the state under RCW 84.52.065 in the second calendar
year following the end of the fiscal year. Any balance in excess of that
necessary to reduce the state levy under this subsection shall be transferred
by the state treasurer to the education construction fund.

(4)(a)
((Funds)) Moneys transferred to the education construction fund
may be appropriated ((from the education construction fund)) exclusively
for common school construction or higher education construction.

(b)
((Funds)) Moneys transferred to the education construction fund
may be appropriated for any other purpose only if approved by a two-thirds vote
of each house of the legislature and if approved by a vote of the people at the
next general election. An appropriation approved by the people under this
subsection shall result in an adjustment to the state expenditure limit only
for the fiscal period for which the appropriation is made and shall not affect
any subsequent fiscal period.

Sec.
402. RCW
43.84.092 and 1999 c 380 s 8, 1999 c 309 s 928, 1999 c 268 s 4, and 1999 c 94 s
2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations
shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4)
of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the state higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial
insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account,
the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile
home park relocation fund, the municipal criminal justice assistance account,
the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources
deposit account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the
property tax reduction fund, the public employees' retirement system plan 1
account, the public employees' retirement system plan 2 account, the Puyallup
tribal settlement account, the resource management cost account, the site
closure account, the special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance
account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment
board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund
accounts, the supplemental pension account, the teachers' retirement system
plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system plan 2 account, the tobacco
prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the
University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington
building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
relief and pension principal ((account)) fund, the volunteer fire
fighters' ((relief and pension)) and reserve officers'
administrative ((account)) fund, the Washington judicial
retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington state
patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account,
the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution
control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital projects
account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural
permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school
fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to
be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their proportionate
share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for
the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and rescue account,
the county arterial preservation account, the department of licensing services
account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry bond retirement fund,
the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity transportation account,
the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety account, the marine
operating fund, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education
account, the pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the
Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations
account, the recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust account,
the safety and education account, the special category C account, the state
patrol highway account, the transportation equipment fund, the transportation
fund, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement
board bond retirement account, and the urban arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

Sec.
403. RCW
43.84.092 and 1999 c 380 s 8, 1999 c 309 s 928, 1999 c 268 s 4, 1999 c 94 s 3,
and 1999 c 94 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall
occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the
education construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest
revolving account, the health services account, the public health services
account, the health system capacity account, the personal health services
account, the state higher education construction account, the higher education
construction account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial
insurance premium refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial
retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account,
the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax
account, the local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the
mobile home park relocation fund, the municipal criminal justice assistance
account, the municipal sales and use tax equalization account, the natural
resources deposit account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the
property tax reduction fund, the public employees' retirement system plan 1
account, the public employees' retirement system plan 2 account, the Puyallup
tribal settlement account, the resource management cost account, the site
closure account, the special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance
account, the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment
board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund
accounts, the supplemental pension account, the teachers' retirement system
plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system plan 2 account, the tobacco
prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the
University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington
building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
relief and pension principal ((account)) fund, the volunteer fire
fighters' ((relief and pension)) and reserve officers'
administrative ((account)) fund, the Washington judicial
retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington
state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building
account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water
pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University capital
projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural
permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school
fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund
shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts. All earnings to
be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be reduced by the
allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW 43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the county arterial preservation account, the department of
licensing services account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry
bond retirement fund, the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity
transportation account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety
account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget Sound
capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the
recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust account, the safety and
education account, the special category C account, the state patrol highway
account, the transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the transportation
improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement
account, and the urban arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

Sec.
404. RCW
43.84.092 and 1999 c 380 s 9, 1999 c 309 s 929, 1999 c 268 s 5, and 1999 c 94 s
4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations
shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4)
of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation
administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the
department of retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance
account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education
construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest revolving
account, the health services account, the public health services account, the
health system capacity account, the personal health services account, the state
higher education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local
leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the
local sales and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park
relocation fund, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal
sales and use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit account,
the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the property tax
reduction fund, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the
public employees' retirement system plan 2 account, the Puyallup tribal
settlement account, the resource management cost account, the site closure
account, the special wildlife account, the state employees' insurance account,
the state employees' insurance reserve account, the state investment board
expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the
supplemental pension account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account,
the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco
prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the
transportation infrastructure account, the tuition recovery trust fund, the
University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington
building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and reserve officers'
relief and pension principal ((account)) fund, the volunteer fire
fighters' ((relief and pension)) and reserve officers'
administrative ((account)) fund, the Washington judicial
retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington
school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the
Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University
building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the
water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University
capital projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent
common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university
permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.
All earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the county arterial preservation account, the department of
licensing services account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry
bond retirement fund, the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity
transportation account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety
account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget Sound
capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the
recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust account, the safety and
education account, the special category C account, the state patrol highway
account, the transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the
transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond
retirement account, and the urban arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

PART
V

STRENGTHENING
PROPERTY TAX GROWTH RESTRICTIONS

Sec.
501. RCW
84.55.005 and 1997 c 393 s 20 and 1997 c 3 s 201 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter:

(1)
"Inflation" means the percentage change in the implicit price
deflator for personal consumption expenditures for the United States as
published for the most recent twelve-month period by the bureau of economic
analysis of the federal department of commerce in September of the year before
the taxes are payable;

(2)
"Limit factor" means:

(a)
((For taxing districts with a population of less than ten thousand in the
calendar year prior to the assessment year, one hundred six percent;)) For
the state, one hundred percent.

(b)
((For taxing districts for which a limit factor is authorized under RCW
84.55.0101, the lesser of the limit factor authorized under that section or one
hundred six percent;

(c))) For
all ((other)) districts((, the lesser of one hundred six percent or))
other than the state, one hundred percent plus inflation; and

(3)
"Regular property taxes" has the meaning given it in RCW 84.04.140.

Sec.
502. RCW
84.55.050 and 1989 c 287 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Subject to any otherwise applicable statutory dollar rate limitations, regular
property taxes may be levied by or for a taxing district other than the
state in an amount exceeding the limitations provided for in this chapter
if such levy is authorized by a proposition approved by a majority of the
voters of the taxing district voting on the proposition at a general election
held within the district or at a special election within the taxing district
called by the district for the purpose of submitting such proposition to the
voters. Any election held pursuant to this section shall be held not more than
twelve months prior to the date on which the proposed levy is to be made. The
ballot of the proposition shall state the dollar rate proposed and shall clearly
state ((any conditions which are applicable under subsection (3) of this
section)) the purpose or purposes of the levy.

(2)
After a levy authorized pursuant to this section is made, the dollar amount of
such levy shall be used for the purpose of computing the limitations for
subsequent levies provided for in this chapter, except as provided in
subsection (((4))) (3) of this section. A levy authorized
pursuant to this section may not exceed a period of three years. Once a levy
is authorized under this section for a one-year through three-year period, no
additional tax levies for that period may be authorized.

(3)
((A proposition placed before the voters under this section may:

(a)
Limit the period for which the increased levy is to be made;

(b)
Limit the purpose for which the increased levy is to be made, but if the
limited purpose includes making redemption payments on bonds, the period for
which the increased levies are made shall not exceed nine years;

(c)
Set the levy at a rate less than the maximum rate allowed for the district; or

(d)
Include any combination of the conditions in this subsection.

(4)))
After the expiration of ((a limited)) the period ((or the
satisfaction of a limited purpose, whichever comes first,)) of the levy
authorized pursuant to this section, subsequent levies shall be computed as
if:

(a)
The ((limited)) proposition under subsection (((3))) (1)
of this section had not been approved; and

(b)
The taxing district had made levies at the maximum rates which would otherwise
have been allowed under this chapter during the years levies were made under
the ((limited)) proposition.

Sec.
503. RCW
84.55.010 and 1997 c 3 s 202 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in this chapter, the levy for a taxing district other
than the state in any year shall be set so that the regular property taxes
payable in the following year shall not exceed the limit factor multiplied by
the amount of regular property taxes lawfully levied for such district in the
highest of the three most recent years in which such taxes were levied for such
district plus an additional dollar amount calculated by multiplying the
increase in assessed value in that district resulting from new construction,
improvements to property, and any increase in the assessed value of
state-assessed property by the regular property tax levy rate of that district
for the preceding year.

(2)
Except as provided in this chapter, the levy for the state in any year shall be
set so that:

(a)
The regular property taxes payable in the following year shall not exceed the
limit factor multiplied by the amount of regular property taxes lawfully levied
for the state in the immediately preceding year, plus

(b)
An additional dollar amount calculated by multiplying the increase in assessed
value in the state resulting from new construction, improvements to property,
and any increase in the assessed value of state-assessed property by the
regular property tax levy rate of the state for the preceding year.

Sec.
504. RCW
84.52.067 and 1967 ex.s. c 133 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, all property taxes
levied by the state for the support of common schools shall be paid into the
general fund of the state treasury as provided in RCW 84.56.280.

(2)
The levy amount provided for in RCW 84.55.010(2)(b) shall be paid into the
education construction fund.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 505. RCW
84.55.0101 (Limit factor--Authorization for taxing district to use
one hundred six percent or less--Ordinance or resolution) and 1997 c 3 s 204
are each repealed.

PART
VI

CREATING A FINANCIAL
HARDSHIP PROPERTY TAX DEFERRAL PROGRAM

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 601. A
new section is added to chapter 84.38 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A claimant may defer payment of that amount of real property taxes that exceeds
six percent of the claimant's combined disposable income, but not to exceed two
thousand five hundred dollars per year.

(2)
Deferral of taxes under this chapter is subject to the following conditions:

(a)
The claimant must have owned, at the time of filing, the residence on which the
real property taxes have been imposed. For purposes of this subsection, a
residence owned by a marital community or owned by cotenants shall be deemed to
be owned by each spouse or cotenant. A claimant who has only a share ownership
in cooperative housing, a life estate, a lease for life, or a revocable trust
does not satisfy the ownership requirement.

(b)
The property taxes must have been imposed upon a residence that was occupied by
the claimant as a principal place of residence.

(c)
A deferral is not allowed for taxes levied in the first full calendar year in
which the person owns the residence.

(d)
The claimant must have and keep in force fire and casualty insurance in
sufficient amount to protect the interest of the state in the claimant's equity
value. If the claimant fails to keep fire and casualty insurance in force to
the extent of the state's interest in the claimant's equity value, the amount
deferred shall not exceed one hundred percent of the claimant's equity value in
the land or lot only.

(e)
The total amount of taxes deferred, including interest thereon, must not exceed
eighty percent of the claimant's equity value in the residence.

Sec.
602. RCW
84.38.010 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 291 s 26 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds that savings once deemed adequate for retirement living
have been rendered inadequate by increased tax rates, increased property
values, and the failure of pension systems to adequately reflect such factors.
It is therefore deemed necessary that the legislature, in addition to that tax
exemption as provided for in RCW 84.36.381 through 84.36.389 as now or
hereafter amended, allow retired persons to defer payment of special
assessments on their residences, and to defer their real property tax
obligations on their residences, an amount of up to eighty percent of their
equity in said property. ((This deferral program)) The deferral
provided under RCW 84.38.030 is intended to assist retired persons in
maintaining their dignity and a reasonable standard of living by residing in
their own homes, providing for their own needs, and managing their own affairs
without requiring assistance from public welfare programs.

Sec.
603. RCW
84.38.050 and 1979 ex.s. c 214 s 8 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)(a)
Declarations to defer property taxes for all years following the first year under
RCW 84.38.030 may be made by filing with the county assessor no later than
thirty days before the tax is due a renewal form in duplicate, prescribed by
the department of revenue and supplied by the county assessor, which affirms
the continued eligibility of the claimant.

(b)
In January of each year, the county assessor shall send to each claimant who
has been granted deferral of ad valorem taxes for the previous year under
RCW 84.38.030 renewal forms and notice to renew.

(2)
Declarations to defer special assessments shall be made by filing with the
assessor no later than thirty days before the special assessment is due on a
form to be prescribed by the department of revenue and supplied by the county
assessor. Upon approval, the full amount of special assessments upon such
claimant's residence shall be deferred but not to exceed an amount equal to
eighty percent of the claimant's equity value in said property.

PART
VII

MISCELLANEOUS

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 701. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 702. Part
headings used in this act are not any part of the law.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 703. This
act applies to taxes levied for collection in 2001 and thereafter.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 704. (1)
Section 403 of this act takes effect July 1, 2000.

(2)
Section 404 of this act takes effect September 1, 2000.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 705.
Sections 402 and 403 of this act expire September 1, 2000.

---
END ---