BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes that some citizens have difficulty accessing political
processes that rely on public hearings held at locations that are distant from
their residence or workplace. To increase public participation in the
political process, the legislature intends to establish a self-funding pilot
process by which citizens can receive information about public issues and
provide feedback to elected officials in a convenient, local setting.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. (1) The
office of citizen councilor is created in accordance with section 10 of this
act. According to Webster's dictionary, "councilor" means an
official advisor to a sovereign or chief magistrate. Any citizen registered to
vote who volunteers to act as an official government advisor may become a
citizen councilor on request by sending a letter to the department of
community, trade, and economic development or calling a special toll-free
number and paying a nominal fee as set by the steering committee. Citizen
councilors shall act collectively as official advisors and a sounding board for
public officials and agencies, legislative study committees, and the department
of community, trade, and economic development on issues of public interest or
concern. Conveners of citizen councilor groups shall be those designated by
the citizen councilor coordinator or deputy citizen councilor coordinator under
section 4 of this act from among citizen councilors who volunteer to host a
group. Every effort shall be made to assign citizen councilors to a group that
meets at a convenient time and place. Meetings will usually be in residence or
work area zip codes.

(2)
Citizen councilors may participate:

(a)
In a citizen councilor organizational group under section 7 of this act;

(b)
In a citizen councilor group usually organized by residence or work area zip
code with the assistance of the citizen councilor coordinator; or

(c)
As an individual if the individual is unable to attend meetings in groups due
to age, disability, or remote location.

(3)
Citizen councilors will be reassigned a group on request to assure that their
group meeting place, time, and makeup is convenient and compatible.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
department of community, trade, and economic development:

(1)
Shall determine suggested issues for public discussion approximately quarterly
but not more than monthly from suggestions received from public officials,
agencies, legislators, and individual citizen councilors and recommend an
appropriate issue or issues for consideration by citizen councilors to a
steering committee. The steering committee shall be composed of four voting
members: One member of the minority and one member of the majority party from
each house of the legislature. Other nonvoting members of the steering
committee shall be: (a) A representative from the governor's office, (b) a
representative from any organization participating with over fifty groups of
eight to twelve persons under section 5(7) of this act, and (c) the citizen
councilor coordinator and deputy citizen councilor coordinator selected as
provided in section 4 of this act except that the citizen councilor coordinator
or deputy citizen councilor coordinator may vote on the steering committee in
case of a tie;

(2)
After approval by the legislative members of the steering committee, shall
assign the issue or issues approved for discussion to the volunteer citizen
councilor coordinator for preparation and implementation by value reporters and
others. Value reporters assigned to gather information on issues shall be
careful to present all issues as evenhandedly as possible, taking care to
present the generally prevailing viewpoints surrounding an issue or issues from
experts, officials, and others in an effort to provide the public with
information needed for discussion. Value reporters shall conduct interviews of
experts, officials, and others to solicit their various viewpoints and record
such interviews on audio or video tape for later reproduction and distribution
to citizen councilor groups. Before any materials are released to citizen
councilor groups, however, persons interviewed and taped shall approve their
taped interview for release or complete another interview to their
satisfaction, otherwise their statement shall not be included in materials sent
to citizens;

(3)
Shall approve the public information materials prepared by the citizen
councilor coordinator, deputy citizen councilor coordinator, and staffs and
authorize its distribution to citizen councilors to the steering committee for
final approval before distribution.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. The
offices of citizen councilor coordinator and deputy citizen councilor
coordinator are created within the department of community, trade, and economic
development. The director of community, trade, and economic development shall
appoint the citizen councilor coordinator and deputy citizen councilor
coordinator with the advice and consent of the steering committee. The citizen
councilor coordinator and deputy citizen councilor coordinator shall serve at
the pleasure of the director of community, trade, and economic development,
until terminated with the approval of the steering committee, and shall be
volunteers and serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for actual
expenses incurred in carrying out their duties under sections 1 through 10 of
this act as funds are available.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. The
citizen councilor coordinator and deputy citizen councilor coordinator shall:

(1)
Promote to the citizens of the state the citizen councilor program and its
contribution to public and private planning processes;

(2)
Oversee preparation, tabulation, summarization, and dissemination of data and
information by the volunteer staff;

(3)
Receive, on behalf of the citizen councilor revolving fund, gifts and donations
of real or personal property, including cash and in-kind services;

(4)
Hire a value reporter and other paid staff to assist the volunteer staff if
funds are available;

(5)
Contract for any services including without limitation toll-free telephone
number and answering services, keypunch, computer, scanning, recording,
reporting, research, consulting, printing, and mailing to carry out this
chapter as long as the providers of these services either work without
financial compensation or are unrelated to the citizen councilor coordinator or
deputy citizen councilor coordinator;

(6)
Solicit volunteers to assist in administering the program from community
service, educational, civic, business, religious, and other organizations;

(7)
Solicit citizen councilor groups from existing organizations;

(8)
Solicit individual citizen councilors to participate in local groups organized
by mutual convenience usually within the same residence or work zip code area;

(9)
Assign value reporters to interview scholars, experts, public officials,
planners, leaders, and others on tape concerning topics of discussion assigned
by the department of community, trade, and economic development;

(10)
Produce audio or video cassette tapes, or both, and printed materials
evenhandedly;

(11)
Mail public information materials to citizen councilor conveners or individual
citizen councilors, or both;

(12)
Provide, at cost, group mailing labels of its own conveners on request of an
organization participating or to a county, municipality, or school district if
a private iteration of their own constituents is desired at their own time and
expense;

(13)
Scan or tabulate, or both, citizen councilor response sheets using, as
appropriate, the "Fast Forum" computer program that is available
without cost to the citizen councilor program and the University of Washington
academic computing services as a nonprofit, external user;

(14)
Mail organizational, community, school, business, or church profiles to the
leaders of such participating organizations for their information and without
cost when they have over fifty groups responding state-wide;

(15)
Prepare summary reports of data generated and press releases;

(16)
Mail summary reports and other information to all citizen councilors,
conveners, participating organizations, and to those public officials who have
indicated to the citizen councilor coordinator that they are interested; and

(17)
Maintain data generated for public and media reference in the department of
community, trade, and economic development.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 6. The
citizen councilor coordinator shall actively encourage citizen councilor groups
to form throughout the state. Citizen councilor groups shall usually consist
of a minimum of eight and a maximum of twelve regularly assigned members and
meet on call of their convener at times and places they deem most appropriate
during a thirty-day or other designated time period. Citizen councilor groups
shall normally meet three or four times per year on state issues. They shall
have the opportunity to listen to audio or video tapes articulating an issue of
public interest or concern and study other materials prepared or authorized as
described in section 3 of this act. Citizen councilors shall have the
opportunity to respond anonymously making their opinions known on individual
mark-sense response sheets for return to the citizen councilor coordinator for
keypunching or optical scanning, tabulation, and analysis.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 7. Eight
through twelve citizens from organizations such as, but not limited to,
community, civic, associations, cooperatives, unions, church, business, or
school district groups may enroll as an organizational group with their own
convener designated. An organizational profile report shall be provided the
leaders of organizations with fifty or more groups without cost to inform them
of how their members responded to public issues posed or approved by the
department of community, trade, and economic development and shall be open to
public inspection in the offices of the department of community, trade, and
economic development. If additional profiles or services are requested by an
organization of its own constituents, the policy, rules, and fees to cover such
costs shall be as determined by the citizen councilor coordinator.
Organizations with fifty or more groups may purchase mailing labels of their
group conveners at cost and prepare and mail their own group materials for tabulation
at their own effort and expense. This data shall not be tabulated by the
citizen councilor coordinator and shall not be combined with the public data
nor available for public inspection at the department of community, trade, and
economic development.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 8. Each
citizen councilor shall be asked to make donations from time to time to help
cover the costs of the citizen councilor program estimated at ten to fifteen
dollars per person per year at 1995 costs. It is also the intention of the
legislature that donations and gifts be solicited from public-spirited
individuals, businesses, and foundations for the purpose of funding the
program. However, since all costs of this program are provided by donations with
no funds from public sources, the citizen councilor coordinator shall use his
or her discretion in determining the scale and the scope of the program so that
expenses do not exceed available funds.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 9. A citizen
councilor revolving fund is created and shall consist of donations collected
under this chapter and any moneys appropriated to it by law for specific
purposes. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the revolving fund.
Disbursements from the revolving fund shall be on authorization of the citizen
councilor coordinator. In order to maintain an effective expenditure and
revenue control, the citizen councilor revolving fund shall be subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required to permit
expenditures and payment of obligations from the fund.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 10. (1)
The department of community, trade, and economic development may provide the
citizen councilor coordinator and his or her volunteer staff with space in
existing offices and with clerical services from existing staff to assist in
establishing and conducting the citizen councilor program. Appropriations are
not required, but the director of community, trade, and economic development
may consider the services provided under this section in submitting the
department's budget.

(2)
The citizen councilor coordinator shall seek to obtain donations from citizen
councilor organizational groups, citizen councilors, and public-spirited
individuals, community service organizations, businesses, and foundations to
cover the costs of the program. When ten thousand dollars in donations have
been received, the department of community, trade, and economic development
shall authorize the citizen councilor coordinator to establish a toll-free
telephone number and answering service and to develop a list of the names,
addresses, and telephone numbers of persons and groups interested in serving as
citizen councilors, citizen councilor conveners, or citizen councilor
organizational groups, or in making donations. When forty thousand dollars in
donations have been received, the citizen councilor coordinator may initiate
the new communication process contemplated in sections 1 through 10 of this act
and continue it at a scope and scale that is supportable by the resources
available.

(3)
In the event the program under this chapter fails to support itself and is
necessary to be terminated by the department of community, trade, and economic
development or expires, funds remaining after payment of all outstanding
expenses and disposal of equipment and supplies owned shall be deposited in the
general fund.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 11.
Sections 1 through 10 of this act expire June 30, 2004.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 12.
Sections 1 through 10 of this act are each added to chapter 43.63A RCW.

---
END ---