BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
48.110.015 and 1999 c 112 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The following are exempt from this title:

(a)
Warranties;

(b)
Maintenance agreements; and

(c)
Service contracts on tangible property which when new either:

(i)
Has a manufacturer's suggested retail price or an actual sales price of
fifteen thousand dollars or more, exclusive of sales tax; or

(ii)(A)
Is paid for with separate and additional consideration;

(((ii)))
(B) Is issued at the point of sale, or within sixty days of the original
purchase date of the property; and

(((iii)
On tangible property when the tangible property for which the service contract
is sold)) (C) Has a purchase price of fifty dollars or less,
exclusive of sales tax.

(2)
This chapter does not apply to:

(a)
Vehicle service contracts which are governed under chapter 48.96 RCW; and

(b) Vehicle mechanical breakdown insurance.

---
END ---