BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW to read as follows:

The
definitions in this section apply throughout this act unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(1)
"Economic loss" means any pecuniary loss resulting from harm,
including the loss of earnings or other benefits related to employment, medical
expense loss, replacement services loss, loss due to death, burial costs, and
loss of business or employment opportunities.

(2)
"Harm" includes physical, nonphysical, economic, and noneconomic
losses.

(3)
"Noneconomic loss" means loss for physical and emotional pain,
suffering, inconvenience, physical impairment, mental anguish, disfigurement,
loss of enjoyment of life, loss of society and companionship, loss of
consortium other than loss of domestic service, hedonic damages, injury to
reputation, and all other nonpecuniary losses of any kind or nature.

(4)
"Nonprofit organization" means: (a) Any organization described in
section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. Sec.
501(c)(3)) and exempt from tax under section 501(a) of the internal revenue
code; or (b) any not-for-profit organization that is organized and conducted
for public benefit and operated primarily for charitable, civic, educational,
religious, welfare, or health purposes.

(5)
"Volunteer" means an individual performing services for a nonprofit
organization or a governmental entity who does not receive compensation, other
than reasonable reimbursement or allowance for expenses actually incurred, or
any other thing of value, in excess of five hundred dollars per year.
"Volunteer" includes a volunteer serving as a director, officer,
trustee, or direct service volunteer.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 4.24 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a volunteer of a
nonprofit organization or governmental entity shall not be liable for harm
caused by an act or omission of the volunteer on behalf of the organization or
entity if:

(a)
The volunteer was acting within the scope of the volunteer's responsibilities
in the nonprofit organization or governmental entity at the time of the act or
omission;

(b)
If appropriate or required, the volunteer was properly licensed, certified, or
authorized by the appropriate authorities for the activities or practice, where
the activities were or practice was undertaken within the scope of the
volunteer's responsibilities in the nonprofit organization or governmental
entity;

(c)
The harm was not caused by willful or criminal misconduct, gross negligence,
reckless misconduct, or a conscious, flagrant indifference to the rights or
safety of the individual harmed by the volunteer; and

(d)
The harm was not caused by the volunteer operating a motor vehicle, vessel,
aircraft, or other vehicle for which the state requires the operator or the
owner of the vehicle, craft, or vessel to either possess an operator's license
or maintain insurance.

(2)
Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect any civil action brought
by any nonprofit organization or any governmental entity against any volunteer
of the organization or entity.

(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the
liability of any nonprofit organization or governmental entity with respect to
harm caused to any person.

---
END ---