BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 43.135 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Any tax increase imposed by the state requires voter approval.

(2)
For the purposes of this section, "tax" includes, but is not
necessarily limited to, sales and use taxes, property taxes, business and occupation
taxes, excise taxes, fuel taxes, impact fees, license fees, permit fees, and
any monetary charge by government.

(3)
For the purposes of this section, "tax" does not include:

(a)
Higher education tuition; and

(b)
Civil and criminal fines and other charges collected in cases of restitution or
violation of law or contract.

(4)
For the purposes of this section, "tax increase" includes, but is not
necessarily limited to, a new tax, a monetary increase in an existing tax, a
tax rate increase, an expansion in the legal definition of a tax base, and an
extension of an expiring tax.

(5)
For the purposes of this section, "state" includes, but is not
necessarily limited to, the state itself and all its departments and agencies,
any city, county, special district, and other political subdivision or
governmental instrumentality of or within the state.

(6)
This section does not apply to any specific emergency measure authorized by
vote of two-thirds of the members of each house of the legislature and expiring
not later than twelve months from the effective date of the emergency act.

(7)
This section is intended to add to, and not replace, the requirements for tax
increases set forth in Initiative 601, the Taxpayer Protection Act, RCW
43.135.035.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. The
provisions of this act are to be liberally construed to effectuate the policies
and purposes of this act.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act takes effect if the proposed amendment to Article VII, section 1 of the
state Constitution, which requires voter approval for any tax increase
(S-3315/00), is validly submitted to and is approved and ratified by the voters
at a general election held in November 2000. If the proposed amendment is not
approved and ratified, this act is null and void in its entirety.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---