BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
42.17.710 and 1993 c 2 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

During the period beginning on the thirtieth day before the date a
regular legislative session convenes and continuing thirty days past the date
of final adjournment, and during the period beginning on the date a special
legislative session convenes and continuing through the date that session
adjourns, no ((state official)) candidate or a person employed by
or acting on behalf of a ((state official or state legislator)) candidate
may solicit or accept contributions to a public office fund, to a candidate or
authorized committee, or to retire a campaign debt.

---
END ---