BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
82.14.030 and 1989 c 384 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The governing body of any county or city while not required by legislative
mandate to do so, may, by resolution or ordinance for the purposes authorized
by this chapter, fix and impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the
terms of this chapter. Such tax shall be collected from those persons who are
taxable by the state pursuant to chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW, upon the
occurrence of any taxable event within the county or city as the case may be:
PROVIDED, That except as provided in RCW 82.14.230, this sales and use tax
shall not apply to natural or manufactured gas. The rate of such tax imposed
by a county shall be five-tenths of one percent of the selling price (in the
case of a sales tax) or value of the article used (in the case of a use tax).
The rate of such tax imposed by a city shall not exceed five-tenths of one
percent of the selling price (in the case of a sales tax) or value of the
article used (in the case of a use tax): PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That in the event
a county shall impose a sales and use tax under this subsection, the rate of
such tax imposed under this subsection by any city therein shall not exceed
four hundred and twenty-five one-thousandths of one percent. No city may
impose a tax under this section unless the city agrees to contribute ten
percent of the tax collected under this subsection to the municipal sales and
use tax equalization account under RCW 82.14.210. No county may impose a tax
under this section unless the county agrees to contribute eight percent of the tax
collected under this subsection to the county sales and use tax equalization
account under RCW 82.14.200. Continuing to collect a tax under this subsection
after the effective date of this section constitutes agreement.

(2)
((Subject to the enactment into law of the 1982 amendment to RCW 82.02.020
by section 5, chapter 49, Laws of 1982 1st ex. sess.,)) In addition
to the tax authorized in subsection (1) of this section, the governing body of
any county or city may by resolution or ordinance impose an additional sales
and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. Such additional tax
shall be collected upon the same taxable events upon which the tax imposed
under subsection (1) of this section is levied. The rate of such additional
tax imposed by a county shall be up to five-tenths of one percent of the
selling price (in the case of a sales tax) or value of the article used (in the
case of a use tax). The rate of such additional tax imposed by a city shall be
up to five-tenths of one percent of the selling price (in the case of a sales
tax) or value of the article used (in the case of a use tax): PROVIDED
HOWEVER, That in the event a county shall impose a sales and use tax under this
subsection at a rate equal to or greater than the rate imposed under this
subsection by a city within the county, the county shall receive fifteen
percent of the city tax: PROVIDED FURTHER, That in the event that the county
shall impose a sales and use tax under this subsection at a rate which is less
than the rate imposed under this subsection by a city within the county, the
county shall receive that amount of revenues from the city tax equal to fifteen
percent of the rate of tax imposed by the county under this subsection. The
authority to impose a tax under this subsection is intended in part to
compensate local government for any losses from the phase-out of the property
tax on business inventories.

Sec.
2. RCW
82.14.050 and 1999 c 165 s 14 are each amended to read as follows:

The
counties, cities, and transportation authorities under RCW 82.14.045 and public
facilities districts under chapter 36.100 and 35.57 RCW shall contract, prior
to the effective date of a resolution or ordinance imposing a sales and use
tax, the administration and collection to the state department of revenue,
which shall deduct a percentage amount, as provided by contract, not to exceed
two percent of the taxes collected for administration and collection expenses
incurred by the department. Of the remaining portion of any tax collected
on behalf of cities under RCW 82.14.030(1), ten percent shall be deposited by
the department of revenue into the municipal sales and use tax equalization
account under RCW 82.14.210. Of the remaining portion of any tax collected on
behalf of counties under RCW 82.14.030(1), eight percent shall be deposited by
the department of revenue into the county sales and use tax equalization
account under RCW 82.14.200. The remainder of any portion of any tax
authorized by this chapter which is collected by the department of revenue
shall be deposited by the state department of revenue in the local sales and
use tax account hereby created in the state treasury. Moneys in the local
sales and use tax account may be spent only for distribution to counties,
cities, transportation authorities, and public facilities districts imposing a
sales and use tax. All administrative provisions in chapters 82.03, 82.08,
82.12, and 82.32 RCW, as they now exist or may hereafter be amended, shall, insofar
as they are applicable to state sales and use taxes, be applicable to taxes
imposed pursuant to this chapter. Except as provided in RCW 43.08.190, all
earnings of investments of balances in the local sales and use tax account
shall be credited to the local sales and use tax account and distributed to the
counties, cities, transportation authorities, and public facilities districts
monthly.

Sec.
3. RCW
82.14.060 and 1991 c 207 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Monthly
the state treasurer shall make distribution from the local sales and use tax
account to the counties, cities, transportation authorities, and public
facilities districts the amount of tax collected on behalf of each taxing
authority, less the deductions provided for in RCW 82.14.050. The state
treasurer shall make the distribution under this section without appropriation.

In
the event that any ordinance or resolution imposes a sales and use tax at a
rate in excess of the applicable limits contained herein, such ordinance or
resolution shall not be considered void in toto, but only with respect to that
portion of the rate which is in excess of the applicable limits contained
herein.

Sec.
4. RCW
82.14.200 and 1998 c 321 s 8 (Referendum Bill No. 49) are each amended to read
as follows:

There
is created in the state treasury a special account to be known as the
"county sales and use tax equalization account." ((Into this
account shall be placed a portion of all motor vehicle excise tax receipts as
provided in RCW 82.44.110.)) In calendar year 2000, the state treasurer
shall transfer into the county sales and use tax equalization account from the
general fund the sum of four million nine hundred thousand dollars divided into
two equal deposits occurring on the first day of the months of July and
October. In calendar year 2001, the state treasurer shall transfer into the
county sales and use tax equalization account from the general fund the sum of
eight million one hundred thousand dollars divided into four equal deposits
occurring on the first day of the months of January, April, July, and October.
For each calendar year thereafter, the state treasurer shall increase the total
transfer by the fiscal growth factor, as defined in RCW 43.135.025, forecast
for that fiscal year by the office of financial management in November of the
preceding year. Funds in this account shall be allocated by the state
treasurer according to the following procedure:

(1)
Prior to April 1st of each year the director of revenue shall inform the state
treasurer of the total and the per capita levels of revenues for the
unincorporated area of each county and the state-wide weighted average per
capita level of revenues for the unincorporated areas of all counties imposing
the sales and use tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) for the previous
calendar year.

(2)
((At such times as distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150)) On
the first day of the months of January, April, July, and October of each year,
the state treasurer shall apportion to each county imposing the sales and use
tax under RCW 82.14.030(1) at the maximum rate and receiving less than one
hundred fifty thousand dollars from the tax for the previous calendar year, an
amount from the county sales and use tax equalization account sufficient, when
added to the amount of revenues received the previous calendar year by the
county, to equal one hundred fifty thousand dollars.

The
department of revenue shall establish a governmental price index as provided in
this subsection. The base year for the index shall be the end of the third
quarter of 1982. Prior to November 1, 1983, and prior to each November 1st
thereafter, the department of revenue shall establish another index figure for
the third quarter of that year. The department of revenue may use the implicit
price deflators for state and local government purchases of goods and services
calculated by the United States department of commerce to establish the
governmental price index. Beginning on January 1, 1984, and each January 1st
thereafter, the one hundred fifty thousand dollar base figure in this
subsection shall be adjusted in direct proportion to the percentage change in
the governmental price index from 1982 until the year before the adjustment.
Distributions made under this subsection for 1984 and thereafter shall use this
adjusted base amount figure.

(3)
Subsequent to the distributions under subsection (2) of this section and at
such times as distributions are made under ((RCW 82.44.150)) subsection
(2) of this section, the state treasurer shall apportion to each county
imposing the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(1) at the maximum rate and
receiving less than seventy percent of the state-wide weighted average per
capita level of revenues for the unincorporated areas of all counties as
determined by the department of revenue under subsection (1) of this section,
an amount from the county sales and use tax equalization account sufficient,
when added to the per capita level of revenues for the unincorporated area
received the previous calendar year by the county, to equal seventy percent of
the state-wide weighted average per capita level of revenues for the
unincorporated areas of all counties determined under subsection (1) of this
section, subject to reduction under subsections (6) and (7) of this section.
When computing distributions under this section, any distribution under
subsection (2) of this section shall be considered revenues received from the
tax imposed under RCW 82.14.030(1) for the previous calendar year.

(4)
Subsequent to the distributions under subsection (3) of this section and at
such times as distributions are made under ((RCW 82.44.150)) subsection
(2) of this section, the state treasurer shall apportion to each county
imposing the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate and
receiving a distribution under subsection (2) of this section, a third
distribution from the county sales and use tax equalization account. The
distribution to each qualifying county shall be equal to the distribution to
the county under subsection (2) of this section, subject to the reduction under
subsections (6) and (7) of this section. To qualify for the total distribution
under this subsection, the county must impose the tax under RCW 82.14.030(2)
for the entire calendar year. Counties imposing the tax for less than the full
year shall qualify for prorated allocations under this subsection proportionate
to the number of months of the year during which the tax is imposed.

(5)
Subsequent to the distributions under subsection (4) of this section and at
such times as distributions are made under ((RCW 82.44.150)) subsection
(2) of this section, the state treasurer shall apportion to each county
imposing the sales and use tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate and
receiving a distribution under subsection (3) of this section, a fourth
distribution from the county sales and use tax equalization account. The
distribution to each qualifying county shall be equal to the distribution to
the county under subsection (3) of this section, subject to the reduction under
subsections (6) and (7) of this section. To qualify for the distributions
under this subsection, the county must impose the tax under RCW 82.14.030(2)
for the entire calendar year. Counties imposing the tax for less than the full
year shall qualify for prorated allocations under this subsection proportionate
to the number of months of the year during which the tax is imposed.

(6)
Revenues distributed under subsections (2) through (5) of this section in any
calendar year shall not exceed an amount equal to seventy percent of the
state-wide weighted average per capita level of revenues for the unincorporated
areas of all counties during the previous calendar year. If distributions
under subsections (3) through (5) of this section cannot be made because of
this limitation, then distributions under subsections (3) through (5) of this
section shall be reduced ratably among the qualifying counties.

(7)
If inadequate revenues exist in the county sales and use tax equalization
account to make the distributions under subsections (3) through (5) of this
section, then the distributions under subsections (3) through (5) of this
section shall be reduced ratably among the qualifying counties. At such time
during the year as additional funds accrue to the county sales and use tax
equalization account, additional distributions shall be made under subsections
(3) through (5) of this section to the counties.

(8)
If the level of revenues in the county sales and use tax equalization account
exceeds the amount necessary to make the distributions under subsections (2)
through (5) of this section, at such times as distributions are made under ((RCW
82.44.150)) subsection (2) of this section, the state treasurer
shall apportion an amount to the county public health account created in RCW
70.05.125 equal to the adjustment under RCW 70.05.125(2)(b).

(9)
If the level of revenues in the county sales and use tax equalization account
exceeds the amount necessary to make the distributions under subsections (2)
through (5) and (8) of this section, then the additional revenues shall be
credited and transferred as follows:

(a)
Fifty percent to the public facilities construction loan revolving account
under RCW 43.160.080; and

(b)
Fifty percent to the distressed county public facilities construction loan
account under RCW 43.160.220, or so much thereof as will not cause the balance
in the account to exceed twenty-five million dollars. Any remaining funds
shall be deposited into the public facilities construction loan revolving
account.

Sec.
5. RCW
82.14.210 and 1996 c 64 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

There
is created in the state treasury a special account to be known as the
"municipal sales and use tax equalization account." ((Into this
account shall be placed such revenues as are provided under RCW
82.44.110(1)(e).)) In calendar year 2000, the state treasurer shall
transfer into the municipal sales and use tax equalization account from the
general fund the sum of fifteen million seven hundred thousand dollars divided
into two equal deposits occurring on the first day of the months of July and
October. In calendar year 2001, the state treasurer shall transfer into the
municipal sales and use tax equalization account from the general fund the sum
of twenty-two million two hundred thousand dollars divided into four equal
deposits occurring on the first day of the months of January, April, July, and
October. For each calendar year thereafter, the state treasurer shall increase
the total transfer by the fiscal growth factor, as defined in RCW 43.135.025,
forecast for that fiscal year by the office of financial management in November
of the preceding year. Funds in this account shall be allocated by the
state treasurer according to the following procedure:

(1)
Prior to January 1st of each year the department of revenue shall determine the
total and the per capita levels of revenues for each city and the state-wide
weighted average per capita level of revenues for all cities imposing the sales
and use tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) for the previous calendar year.

(2)
((At such times as distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150, the state
treasurer shall apportion to each city not imposing the sales and use tax under
RCW 82.14.030(2) an amount from the municipal sales and use tax equalization
account equal to the amount distributed to the city under RCW 82.44.155,
multiplied by forty‑five fifty‑fifths.

(3)
Subsequent to the distributions under subsection (2) of this section, and at
such times as distributions are made under RCW 82.44.150)) On
the first day of the months of January, April, July, and October of each year,
the state treasurer shall apportion to each city imposing the sales and use tax
under RCW 82.14.030(1) at the maximum rate and receiving less than seventy
percent of the state-wide weighted average per capita level of revenues for all
cities as determined by the department of revenue under subsection (1) of this
section, an amount from the municipal sales and use tax equalization account
sufficient, when added to the per capita level of revenues received the
previous calendar year by the city, to equal seventy percent of the state-wide
weighted average per capita level of revenues for all cities determined under
subsection (1) of this section, subject to reduction under subsection (((6)))
(5) of this section.

(((4)))
(3) Subsequent to the distributions under subsection (((3))) (2)
of this section, and at such times as distributions are made under ((RCW
82.44.150)) subsection (2) of this section, the state treasurer
shall apportion to each city imposing the sales and use tax under RCW
82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate and receiving a distribution under subsection
(((3))) (2) of this section, a ((third)) second
distribution from the municipal sales and use tax equalization account. The
distribution to each qualifying city shall be equal to the distribution to the
city under subsection (((3))) (2) of this section, subject to the
reduction under subsection (((6))) (5) of this section. To
qualify for the distributions under this subsection, the city must impose the
tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) for the entire calendar year. Cities imposing the
tax for less than the full year shall qualify for prorated allocations under
this subsection proportionate to the number of months of the year during which
the tax is imposed.

(((5)))
(4) For a city with an official incorporation date after January 1,
1990, municipal sales and use tax equalization distributions shall be made
according to the procedures in this subsection. Municipal sales and use tax
equalization distributions to eligible new cities shall be made at the same
time as distributions are made under subsections (2) and (3) ((and
(4))) of this section. The department of revenue shall follow the estimating
procedures outlined in this subsection until the new city has received a full
year's worth of revenues under RCW 82.14.030(1) as of the January municipal
sales and use tax equalization distribution.

(a)
Whether a newly incorporated city determined to receive funds under this
subsection receives its first equalization payment at the January, April, July,
or October municipal sales and use tax equalization distribution shall depend
on the date the city first imposes the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1).

(i)
A newly incorporated city imposing the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1)
effective as of January 1st shall be eligible to receive funds under this
subsection beginning with the April municipal sales and use tax equalization
distribution of that year.

(ii)
A newly incorporated city imposing the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1)
effective as of February 1st, March 1st, or April 1st shall be eligible to
receive funds under this subsection beginning with the July municipal sales and
use tax equalization distribution of that year.

(iii)
A newly incorporated city imposing the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1)
effective as of May 1st, June 1st, or July 1st shall be eligible to receive
funds under this subsection beginning with the October municipal sales and use
tax equalization distribution of that year.

(iv)
A newly incorporated city imposing the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1)
effective as of August 1st, September 1st, or October 1st shall be eligible to
receive funds under this subsection beginning with the January municipal sales
and use tax equalization distribution of the next year.

(v)
A newly incorporated city imposing the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1)
effective as of November 1st or December 1st shall be eligible to receive funds
under this subsection beginning with the April municipal sales and use tax
equalization distribution of the next year.

(b)
For purposes of calculating the amount of funds the new city should receive
under this subsection, the department of revenue shall:

(i)
Estimate the per capita amount of revenues from the tax authorized under RCW
82.14.030(1) that the new city would have received had the city received
revenues from the tax the entire calendar year;

(ii)
Calculate the amount provided under subsection (((3))) (2) of
this section based on the per capita revenues determined under (b)(i) of this
subsection;

(iii)
Prorate the amount determined under (b)(ii) of this subsection by the number of
months the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(1) is imposed.

(c)
A new city imposing the tax under RCW 82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate and
receiving a distribution calculated under (b) of this subsection shall receive
another distribution from the municipal sales and use tax equalization
account. This distribution shall be equal to the calculation made under
(b)(ii) of this subsection, prorated by the number of months the city imposes
the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.030(2) at the full rate.

(d)
The department of revenue shall advise the state treasurer of the amounts
calculated under (b) and (c) of this subsection and the state treasurer shall
distribute these amounts to the new city from the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account subject to the limitations imposed in subsection (((6)))
(5) of this section.

(e)
Revenues estimated under this subsection shall not affect the calculation of
the state-wide weighted average per capita level of revenues for all cities
made under subsection (1) of this section.

(((6)))
(5) If inadequate revenues exist in the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account to make the distributions under subsection (2),
(3), or (4)((, or (5))) of this section, then the distributions
under subsections (2), (3), and (4)((, and (5))) of this
section shall be reduced ratably among the qualifying cities. At such time
during the year as additional funds accrue to the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account, additional distributions shall be made under subsections (2),
(3), and (4)((, and (5))) of this section to the cities.

(((7)))
(6) If the level of revenues in the municipal sales and use tax
equalization account exceeds the amount necessary to make the distributions
under subsections (2) through (((5))) (4) of this section, then
the additional revenues shall be apportioned ratably on the basis of
population as last determined by the office of financial management among
the several cities within the state ((ratably on the basis of population as
last determined by the office of financial management: PROVIDED, That no such
distribution shall be made to those cities receiving a distribution under
subsection (2) of this section)) imposing the sales and use tax under
RCW 82.14.030(2) at the maximum rate.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 6. Sections
1 through 3 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the
public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, and take effect April 1, 2000.

---
END ---