BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
28B.80.620 and 1999 c 177 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The higher education coordinating board, in consultation with the state board
of education has the following powers and duties in administering the pilot
program established in RCW 28B.80.622:

(a)
To adopt rules necessary to carry out the program;

(b)
To establish one or more review committees to assist in the evaluation of
proposals for funding. The review committee shall include individuals with significant
experience in higher education in areas relevant to one or more of the funding
period priorities and shall include representatives from elementary, two-year,
and four-year sectors of education;

(c)
To award grants no later than September 1st in those years when funding is
available by June 30th;

(d)
To establish each biennium specific guidelines for submitting grant proposals
consistent with the overall goals of the program. During the 1999-2001
biennium, the guidelines shall be consistent with the following desired
outcomes of:

(i)
Designing a college-level course for enrollment of selected high school seniors
interested in teaching careers and students enrolled in a school-based future
teachers academy;

(ii)
Designing discipline-based lower division courses that are thematically linked
to state student learning goals, essential academic learning requirements, and
upper division courses in the interdisciplinary arts and science curriculum and
supportive of teaching areas appropriate for prospective teachers;

(iii)
Designing a preprofessional educational studies minor that would be pursued by
prospective kindergarten through eighth grade teachers in conjunction with an
interdisciplinary arts and science major;

(iv)
Designing mentoring and service learning activities at the community college
level that would provide prospective teachers with an orientation to
professional education; ((and))

(v)
Designing a process for satisfying certification requirements that encompasses
pedagogical coursework and school-based internships cognizant of the financial
constraints of working students; and

(vi)
Establishing uniform core curricula for each teacher preparation program
composed of reading, writing, communications, and math combined with an
emphasis or a degree major in the subject area in which the prospective teacher
intends to teach.

(2)
The pilot project in this section shall conclude no later than January 1, 2005.

(3)
Beginning on December 31, 2001, the higher education coordinating board shall submit
an annual written report to the education and higher education committees of
the legislature, the state board of education, and the office of the
superintendent of public instruction on the status of the pilot project.

(4)
This section expires January 30, 2005.

Sec.
2. RCW
28B.80.622 and 1999 c 177 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

The
Washington teacher training pilot program is established. The higher education
coordinating board shall administer the program. Through this program the
board may award, on a competitive basis, grants to public institutions of
higher education or consortia of institutions to encourage high quality and
effective teacher training programs. Grants shall not exceed a two-year period.
Strong priority shall be given to proposals that involve shared facilities,
shared resources, increasingly intensive field training and site-based
internships, and cocurricular planning to establish the teacher training
program, and to proposals that involve participants from the interdisciplinary
arts and science curriculum and professional education faculty as well as
classroom teachers from school districts. Institutions of higher education are
encouraged to solicit nonstate funds to support this coordinated approach to
teacher training.

This section expires January 30, 2005.

---
END ---