BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Equipment used on farm and agricultural land that is located within a distressed
area is exempt from the state property tax under RCW 84.52.065.

(2)
For the purposes of this section:

(a)
"Farm equipment" means the machinery and equipment used in the
commercial production of farm products;

(b)
"Farm and agricultural land" has the same meaning as defined in RCW
84.34.020; and

(c) "Distressed area" has the same meaning as defined in
RCW 43.165.010.

---
END ---