BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The utilities and transportation commission and the department of
transportation shall study and make recommendations on the following issues
relating to railroad rights of way in the Spokane Valley:

(a)
Examine the costs and issues associated with combining two railroads on a
single right of way; and

(b)
Compare and analyze the expenses associated with building overpasses in various
locations throughout the Spokane Valley.

(2)
The utilities and transportation commission and the department of transportation
shall complete the study and submit a report to the governor and the
appropriate standing committees of the legislature by December 1, 2000.

This section expires June 30, 2001.

---
END ---