BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.89.140 and 1997 c 334 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:

Licenses shall be renewed according to administrative procedures,
administrative requirements, continuing education requirements, and fees
determined by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. A minimum of
thirty hours of continuing education approved by the secretary must be
completed every two years to meet the continuing education requirements under
this section.

---
END ---