BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. (1)
The department of general administration shall work with construction industry
organizations to develop guidelines for on-site construction waste management
planning. The topics addressed in the planning guidelines shall include, but
shall not be limited to:

(a)
Standards for identifying the type of wastes generated during construction;

(b)
Methods for analyzing the availability and cost-effectiveness of recycling
services for each type of waste;

(c)
Methods for evaluating construction waste management alternatives given limited
recycling services in rural areas of the state;

(d)
Strategies to maximize reuse and recycling of wastes and minimize landfill
disposal; and

(e)
Standardized formats for on-site construction waste management reporting.

(2)
By December 15, 2000, the department of general administration shall provide a
report to the legislature on the development of the guidelines required by
subsection (1) of this section. The report shall include recommendations for
incorporating job-site waste management planning and recycling into standard
construction industry practice.

Sec.
2. RCW
43.19A.020 and 1996 c 198 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The ((USEPA)) federal product standards, ((as now or hereafter
amended)) adopted under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 6962(e) as it exists on the
effective date of this act, are adopted as the minimum standards for the
state of Washington. These standards shall be implemented for at least the
products listed in (((a) and (b) of)) this subsection ((by the dates
indicated,)) unless the director finds that a different standard would
significantly increase recycled product availability or competition.

(a)
((By July 1, 1997:

(i)))
Paper and paper products;

(((ii)))
(b) Organic recovered materials; ((and

(iii))) (c)
Latex paint products;

(((b)
By July 1, 1997:

(i))) (d)
Products for lower value uses containing recycled plastics;

(((ii)))
(e) Retread and remanufactured tires;

(((iii)))
(f) Lubricating oils;

(((iv)))
(g) Automotive batteries;

(((v)))
(h) Building ((insulation)) products and materials;

(((vi)))
(i) Panelboard; and

(((vii)))
(j) Compost products.

(2)
The standards required by this section shall be applied to recycled product
purchasing by the department ((and)), other state agencies,
and state postsecondary education institutions. The standards may be
adopted or applied by any other local government in product procurement. The
standards shall provide for exceptions under appropriate circumstances to allow
purchases of recycled products that do not meet the minimum content
requirements of the standards.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 3. The
legislature encourages city, county, and state governments, the private sector,
and consumers to collaborate in sharing information and becoming informed about
opportunities for increasing voluntary product stewardship to support the
state's recycling goals. For purposes of this section, "product
stewardship" means a principle that directs all actors in the life cycle
of a product to minimize impacts of that product on the environment.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 4. A
new section is added to chapter 39.04 RCW to read as follows:

If
a construction project receives state public funding, the product standards, as
provided in RCW 43.19A.020, shall apply on the recycled content products used
in the project.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 5. A
new section is added to chapter 81.77 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The commission shall allow a solid waste collection company collecting
recyclable materials from residential customers to retain up to thirty percent
of the revenue paid to the company for the material if the company submits a
plan to the commission that is certified by the appropriate local government
authority as being consistent with the local government solid waste plan and
that demonstrates how the revenues will be used to increase recycling. The
remaining seventy percent of the revenue shall be passed to residential
customers served by the company.

(2)
By December 2, 2003, the commission shall provide a report to the legislature
that evaluates:

(a)
The effectiveness of revenue sharing as an incentive to increase recycling in
the state; and

(b)
The effect of revenue sharing on costs to customers.

Sec.
6. RCW
70.95.010 and 1989 c 431 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

The
legislature finds:

(1)
Continuing technological changes in methods of manufacture, packaging, and
marketing of consumer products, together with the economic and population
growth of this state, the rising affluence of its citizens, and its expanding
industrial activity have created new and ever-mounting problems involving
disposal of garbage, refuse, and solid waste materials resulting from domestic,
agricultural, and industrial activities.

(2)
Traditional methods of disposing of solid wastes in this state are no longer
adequate to meet the ever-increasing problem. Improper methods and practices
of handling and disposal of solid wastes pollute our land, air and water
resources, blight our countryside, adversely affect land values, and damage the
overall quality of our environment.

(3)
Considerations of natural resource limitations, energy shortages, economics and
the environment make necessary the development and implementation of solid
waste recovery and/or recycling plans and programs.

(4)
Waste reduction must become a fundamental strategy of solid waste management.
It is therefore necessary to change manufacturing and purchasing practices and
waste generation behaviors to reduce the amount of waste that becomes a
governmental responsibility.

(5)
Source separation of waste must become a fundamental strategy of solid waste
management. Collection and handling strategies should have, as an ultimate
goal, the source separation of all materials with resource value or
environmental hazard.

(6)(a)
It is the responsibility of every person to minimize his or her production of
wastes and to separate recyclable or hazardous materials from mixed waste.

(b)
It is the responsibility of state, county, and city governments to provide for
a waste management infrastructure to fully implement waste reduction and source
separation strategies and to process and dispose of remaining wastes in a
manner that is environmentally safe and economically sound. It is further the
responsibility of state, county, and city governments to monitor the cost-effectiveness
and environmental safety of combusting separated waste, processing mixed waste,
and recycling programs.

(c)
It is the responsibility of county and city governments to assume primary
responsibility for solid waste management and to develop and implement
aggressive and effective waste reduction and source separation strategies.

(d)
It is the responsibility of state government to ensure that local governments
are providing adequate source reduction and separation opportunities and
incentives to all, including persons in both rural and urban areas, and
nonresidential waste generators such as commercial, industrial, and
institutional entities, recognizing the need to provide flexibility to
accommodate differing population densities, distances to and availability of
recycling markets, and collection and disposal costs in each community; and to
provide county and city governments with adequate technical resources to
accomplish this responsibility.

(7)
Environmental and economic considerations in solving the state's solid waste
management problems requires strong consideration by local governments of
regional solutions and intergovernmental cooperation.

(8)
The following priorities for the collection, handling, and management of solid
waste are necessary and should be followed in descending order as applicable:

(a)
Waste reduction;

(b)
Recycling, with source separation of recyclable materials as the preferred
method;

(c)
Energy recovery, incineration, or landfill of separated waste;

(d)
Energy recovery, incineration, or landfilling of mixed wastes.

(9)
It is the state's goal to achieve a fifty percent recycling rate by ((1995))
2005.

(10)
It is the state's goal that no residential or commercial yard debris be
disposed of in landfills by 2010.

(11)
Steps should be taken to make recycling at least as affordable and convenient
to the ratepayer as mixed waste disposal.

(((11)))
(12) It is necessary to compile and maintain adequate data on the types
and quantities of solid waste that are being generated and to monitor how the
various types of solid waste are being managed.

(((12)))
(13) Vehicle batteries should be recycled and the disposal of vehicle
batteries into landfills or incinerators should be discontinued.

(((13)))
(14) Excessive and nonrecyclable packaging of products should be
avoided.

(((14)))
(15) Comprehensive education should be conducted throughout the state so
that people are informed of the need to reduce, source separate, and recycle
solid waste.

(((15)))
(16) All governmental entities in the state should set an example by
implementing aggressive waste reduction and recycling programs at their
workplaces and by purchasing products that are made from recycled materials and
are recyclable.

(((16)))
(17) To ensure the safe and efficient operations of solid waste disposal
facilities, it is necessary for operators and regulators of landfills and
incinerators to receive training and certification.

(((17)))
(18) It is necessary to provide adequate funding to all levels of
government so that successful waste reduction and recycling programs can be
implemented.

(((18)))
(19) The development of stable and expanding markets for recyclable
materials is critical to the long-term success of the state's recycling goals.
Market development must be encouraged on a state, regional, and national basis
to maximize its effectiveness. The state shall assume primary responsibility
for the development of a multifaceted market development program to carry out
the purposes of this act.

(((19)))
(20) There is an imperative need to anticipate, plan for, and accomplish
effective storage, control, recovery, and recycling of discarded tires and
other problem wastes with the subsequent conservation of resources and energy.

Sec.
7. RCW
70.95.030 and 1998 c 36 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:

As
used in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise:

(1)
"City" means every incorporated city and town.

(2)
"Commission" means the utilities and transportation commission.

(3)
"Committee" means the state solid waste advisory committee.

(4)
"Composted material" means organic solid waste that has been
subjected to controlled aerobic degradation at a solid waste facility in
compliance with the requirements of this chapter. Natural decay of organic
solid waste under uncontrolled conditions does not result in composted
material.

(5)
"Department" means the department of ecology.

(6)
"Director" means the director of the department of ecology.

(7)
"Disposal site" means the location where any final treatment,
utilization, processing, or deposit of solid waste occurs.

(8)
"Energy recovery" means a process operating under federal and state
environmental laws and regulations for converting solid waste into usable
energy and for reducing the volume of solid waste.

(9)
"Functional standards" means criteria for solid waste handling
expressed in terms of expected performance or solid waste handling functions.

(10)
"Incineration" means a process of reducing the volume of solid waste
operating under federal and state environmental laws and regulations by use of
an enclosed device using controlled flame combustion.

(11)
"Jurisdictional health department" means city, county, city-county,
or district public health department.

(12)
"Landfill" means a disposal facility or part of a facility at which
solid waste is placed in or on land and which is not a land treatment facility.

(13)
"Local government" means a city, town, or county.

(14)
"Modify" means to substantially change the design or operational
plans including, but not limited to, removal of a design element previously set
forth in a permit application or the addition of a disposal or processing
activity that is not approved in the permit.

(15)
"Multiple family residence" means any structure housing two or more
dwelling units.

(16)
"Person" means individual, firm, association, copartnership,
political subdivision, government agency, municipality, industry, public or
private corporation, or any other entity whatsoever.

(17)
"Recyclable materials" means those solid wastes that are separated
for recycling or reuse, such as papers, metals, and glass, that are identified
as recyclable material pursuant to a local comprehensive solid waste plan.
Prior to the adoption of the local comprehensive solid waste plan, adopted
pursuant to RCW 70.95.110(2), local governments may identify recyclable
materials by ordinance from July 23, 1989.

(18)
"Recycling" means transforming or remanufacturing waste materials
into usable or marketable materials for use other than landfill disposal or
incineration.

(19)
"Residence" means the regular dwelling place of an individual or
individuals.

(20)
"Sewage sludge" means a semisolid substance consisting of settled
sewage solids combined with varying amounts of water and dissolved materials,
generated from a wastewater treatment system, that does not meet the
requirements of chapter 70.95J RCW.

(21)
"Soil amendment" means any substance that is intended to improve the
physical characteristics of the soil, except composted material, commercial
fertilizers, agricultural liming agents, unmanipulated animal manures,
unmanipulated vegetable manures, food wastes, food processing wastes, and
materials exempted by rule of the department, such as biosolids as defined in
chapter 70.95J RCW and wastewater as regulated in chapter 90.48 RCW.

(22)
"Solid waste" or "wastes" means all putrescible and
nonputrescible solid and semisolid wastes including, but not limited to,
garbage, rubbish, ashes, industrial wastes, swill, sewage sludge, demolition
and construction wastes, abandoned vehicles or parts thereof, and recyclable
materials.

(23)
"Solid waste handling" means the management, storage, collection,
transportation, treatment, utilization, processing, and final disposal of solid
wastes, including the recovery and recycling of materials from solid wastes,
the recovery of energy resources from solid wastes or the conversion of the
energy in solid wastes to more useful forms or combinations thereof.

(24)
"Source separation" means the separation of different kinds of solid
waste at the place where the waste originates.

(25)
"Vehicle" includes every device physically capable of being moved
upon a public or private highway, road, street, or watercourse and in, upon, or
by which any person or property is or may be transported or drawn upon a public
or private highway, road, street, or watercourse, except devices moved by human
or animal power or used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks.

(26)
"Waste-derived soil amendment" means any soil amendment as defined in
this chapter that is derived from solid waste as defined in RCW 70.95.030, but
does not include biosolids or biosolids products regulated under chapter 70.95J
RCW or wastewaters regulated under chapter 90.48 RCW.

(27)
"Waste reduction" means reducing the amount or toxicity of waste
generated or reusing materials.

(28)
"Yard debris" means plant material commonly created in the course of
maintaining yards and gardens, and through horticulture, gardening,
landscaping, or similar activities. Yard debris includes but is not limited to
grass clippings, leaves, branches, brush, weeds, flowers, roots, windfall
fruit, vegetable garden debris, holiday trees, and tree prunings four inches or
less in diameter.

Sec.
8. RCW
70.95.090 and 1991 c 298 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

Each
county and city comprehensive solid waste management plan shall include the
following:

(1)
A detailed inventory and description of all existing solid waste handling
facilities including an inventory of any deficiencies in meeting current solid
waste handling needs.

(2)
The estimated long-range needs for solid waste handling facilities projected
twenty years into the future.

(3)
A program for the orderly development of solid waste handling facilities in a
manner consistent with the plans for the entire county which shall:

(a)
Meet the minimum functional standards for solid waste handling adopted by the
department and all laws and regulations relating to air and water pollution,
fire prevention, flood control, and protection of public health;

(b)
Take into account the comprehensive land use plan of each jurisdiction;

(c)
Contain a six year construction and capital acquisition program for solid waste
handling facilities; and

(d)
Contain a plan for financing both capital costs and operational expenditures of
the proposed solid waste management system.

(4)
A program for surveillance and control.

(5)
A current inventory and description of solid waste collection needs and
operations within each respective jurisdiction which shall include:

(a)
Any franchise for solid waste collection granted by the utilities and
transportation commission in the respective jurisdictions including the name of
the holder of the franchise and the address of his or her place of business and
the area covered by the franchise;

(b)
Any city solid waste operation within the county and the boundaries of such
operation;

(c)
The population density of each area serviced by a city operation or by a
franchised operation within the respective jurisdictions;

(d)
The projected solid waste collection needs for the respective jurisdictions for
the next six years.

(6)
A comprehensive waste reduction and recycling element that, in accordance with
the priorities established in RCW 70.95.010, provides programs that (a) reduce
the amount of waste generated, (b) provide incentives and mechanisms for source
separation, and (c) establish recycling opportunities for the source separated
waste.

(7)
The waste reduction and recycling element shall include the following:

(a)
Waste reduction strategies;

(b)
Source separation strategies, including:

(i)
Programs for the collection of source separated materials from residences in
urban and rural areas. In urban areas, these programs shall include collection
of source separated recyclable materials from single and multiple family
residences, unless the department approves an alternative program, according to
the criteria in the planning guidelines. Such criteria shall include:
Anticipated recovery rates and levels of public participation, availability of
environmentally sound disposal capacity, access to markets for recyclable
materials, unreasonable cost impacts on the ratepayer over the six-year
planning period, utilization of environmentally sound waste reduction and
recycling technologies, and other factors as appropriate. In rural areas,
these programs shall include but not be limited to drop-off boxes, buy-back
centers, or a combination of both, at each solid waste transfer, processing, or
disposal site, or at locations convenient to the residents of the county. The
drop-off boxes and buy-back centers may be owned or operated by public,
nonprofit, or private persons;

(ii)
Programs to monitor the collection of source separated waste at nonresidential
sites where there is sufficient density to sustain a program;

(iii)
Programs to ((collect)) manage yard ((waste, if the county or
city submitting the plan finds that there are)) debris, including
strategies to:

(A)
Develop collection programs or alternative means for managing yard debris;

(B)
Eliminate disposal of yard debris in landfills; and

(C)
Encourage adequate markets or capacity for composted yard ((waste)) debris
within or near the service area to consume ((the majority of)) the
material collected; and

(iv)
Programs to educate and promote the concepts of waste reduction and recycling;

(c)
Recycling strategies, including a description of markets for recyclables, a
review of waste generation trends, a description of waste composition, a
discussion and description of existing programs and any additional programs
needed to assist public and private sector recycling, and an implementation
schedule for the designation of specific materials to be collected for
recycling, and for the provision of recycling collection services; and

(d)
Other information the county or city submitting the plan determines is
necessary.

(8)
County and city comprehensive solid waste management plans may provide for
the establishment of residential collection rate structures that provide
economic incentives for customers to reduce their level of solid waste
collection service and encourage participation in waste reduction, recycling,
and yard debris collection programs. All jurisdictions that are signatories to
comprehensive solid waste management plans that adopt residential incentive
rates shall adopt ordinances to implement rate structures that are consistent
with the guidelines in the comprehensive plans. The utilities and
transportation commission is authorized to issue rules to implement this
section for solid waste collection companies regulated under Title 81 RCW.

(9)
An assessment of the plan's impact on the costs of solid waste collection. The
assessment shall be prepared in conformance with guidelines established by the
utilities and transportation commission. The commission shall cooperate with
the Washington state association of counties and the association of Washington
cities in establishing such guidelines.

(((9)))
(10) A review of potential areas that meet the criteria as outlined in
RCW 70.95.165.

Sec.
9. RCW
70.95.280 and 1989 c 431 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:

The
department of ecology shall determine the best management practices for
categories of solid waste in accordance with the priority solid waste
management methods established in RCW 70.95.010. In order to make this
determination, the department shall conduct a comprehensive solid waste stream
analysis and evaluation. Following establishment of baseline data resulting
from an initial in-depth analysis of the waste stream, the department shall
develop a less intensive method of monitoring the disposed waste stream
including, but not limited to, changes in the amount of waste generated and
waste type. The department shall monitor curbside collection programs and
other waste segregation and disposal technologies to determine, to the extent
possible, the effectiveness of these programs in terms of cost and
participation, their applicability to other locations, and their implications
regarding rules adopted under this chapter. Persons who collect solid waste
shall annually report to the department the types and quantities of solid waste
that are collected and where it is delivered. The department shall adopt
guidelines for reporting and for ((keeping proprietary information
confidential)) maintaining the confidentiality of proprietary
information included in the report. By March 1st of each year, entities that
collect recycled material shall report their activity from the previous
calendar year on a form provided by the department. The department may impose
a penalty of one hundred dollars on any entity that fails to submit the
required report to the department. The department may impose an additional
penalty of one hundred dollars for each day after March 1st that a firm fails
to submit the required report. The total penalties for failure to report shall
not exceed one thousand dollars. By May 1st of each year, the department may
arrange for the publication in recycling and solid waste industry trade
publications the names of those entities failing to file the required report.
The department shall structure penalties and other sanctions so as to encourage
compliance with the annual reporting requirement.

Sec.
10. RCW
70.95.290 and 1988 c 184 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
The evaluation of the solid waste stream required in RCW 70.95.280 shall
include the following elements:

(a)
The department shall determine which management method for each category of
solid waste will have the least environmental impact; and

(b)
The department shall evaluate the costs of various management options for each
category of solid waste, including a review of market availability, and shall
take into consideration the economic impact on affected parties;

(c)
Based on the results of (a) and (b) of this subsection, the department shall
determine the best management for each category of solid waste. Different
management methods for the same categories of waste may be developed for
different parts of the state.

(2)
The department shall give priority to evaluating categories of solid waste
that, in relation to other categories of solid waste, comprise a large volume
of the solid waste stream or present a high potential of harm to human health.
At a minimum the following categories of waste shall be evaluated:

(a)
By January 1, 1989, yard ((waste)) debris and other biodegradable
materials, paper products, disposable diapers, and batteries; ((and))

(b)
By January 1, 1990, metals, glass, plastics, styrofoam or rigid lightweight
cellular polystyrene, and tires; and

(c)
By January 1, 2004, construction, demolition, and land-clearing debris,
biosolids, manure, and major food-processing wastes.

(3)
The department is prohibited from adopting rules that mandate best management
practices for the categories of solid waste indentified in subsection (2) of
this section.

Sec.
11. RCW 70.95.810
and 1998 c 245 s 132 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
In order to establish the feasibility of composting food and yard ((wastes))
debris, the department shall provide funds, as available, to local
governments submitting a proposal to compost such wastes.

(2)
The department, in cooperation with the department of community, trade, and
economic development, may approve an application if the project can demonstrate
the essential parameters for successful composting, including, but not limited
to, cost-effectiveness, handling and safety requirements, and current and
potential markets.

---
END ---