BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature finds that population growth in many areas of the state requires
new, improved, or additional infrastructure to accommodate growth. The
legislature further finds that the needed infrastructure identified in the
capital facilities elements of comprehensive plans adopted by counties and
cities far exceed the existing funding available to county, city, or state
agencies responsible for constructing or operating the needed infrastructure.
The legislature therefore establishes the growth management infrastructure
account to assist counties and cities in financing and constructing those
infrastructure projects identified in the capital facilities elements of growth
management plans.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 36.70A RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The growth management infrastructure account is created in the state treasury.
Moneys may be placed in the account from the proceeds of bonds when authorized
by the legislature or from any other lawful source. The public works board
shall use appropriated moneys from the account to provide financial assistance
to qualifying local governments for capital costs directly related to providing
basic service for growth infrastructure projects necessary to accommodate
residential, commercial, and industrial growth.

(2)
The public works board, established in chapter 43.155 RCW, shall manage
appropriated funds from the account. The board shall have all responsibilities
granted to it under RCW 43.155.040, 43.155.080, and 43.155.090 in carrying out
the purposes of this section.

(3)
For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(a)
"Basic service" means that level of service necessary to meet only
the minimum level of service sufficient to accommodate growth.

(b)
"Financial assistance" means loans or loan guarantees.

(c)
"Growth infrastructure projects" means the costs of acquisition,
construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, and improvement of those bridges;
roads; and domestic water, sanitary sewer, storm sewer, and solid
waste/recycling projects necessary to meet the requirement of this chapter.

(d)
"General purpose local government" means counties, cities, and towns.

(e)
"Special purpose local government" means all local governments as
defined in RCW 43.155.020, except counties, cities, and towns.

(4)
To qualify for financial assistance local governments must meet the following
standards:

(a)
For general purpose local governments:

(i)
Be in compliance with the provisions of this chapter;

(ii)
Demonstrate that the growth infrastructure project is necessary to attract or
accommodate the planned population and employment growth;

(iii)
Demonstrate that the comprehensive land use plan, the zoning designations, the
development regulations and the capital facilities plan are sufficient to
accommodate projected growth; and

(iv)
Other criteria the board deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this
chapter.

(b)
For special purpose local governments:

(i)
Demonstrate that the local government has a capital facilities plan meeting
standards established by the board;

(ii)
Demonstrate that the growth infrastructure project is necessary to attract or
accommodate the planned population and employment growth;

(iii)
Demonstrate that the capital facilities plan is compatible with the
comprehensive land use plan, zoning designations, and the development
regulations of the overlying general purpose local government or governments;
and

(iv)
Other criteria the board deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this act.

(5)
Existing debt or financial obligations of local governments shall not be
refinanced under this chapter. Each local government applicant shall provide
documentation of attempts to secure additional local or other sources of
funding for projects for which financial assistance is sought under this
chapter.

Sec.
3. RCW
43.84.092 and 1999 c 380 s 9, 1999 c 309 s 929, 1999 c 268 s 5, and 1999 c 94 s
4 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:

(1)
All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be
deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established
in the state treasury.

(2)
The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds
associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management
improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all
respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or
allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement
act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash
management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require
appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts
due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management
improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of
funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the
cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations
shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4)
of this section.

(3)
Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be
utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury
funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement
functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury
income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no
appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments
shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of
this section.

(4)
Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the
treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund
with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a)
The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of
earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the
period: The capitol building construction account, the Cedar River channel
construction and operation account, the Central Washington University capital
projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory
institutions account, the common school construction fund, the county criminal
justice assistance account, the county sales and use tax equalization account,
the data processing building construction account, the deferred compensation administrative
account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of
retirement systems expense account, the drinking water assistance account, the
Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education
construction fund, the emergency reserve fund, the federal forest revolving
account, the health services account, the public health services account, the
health system capacity account, the personal health services account, the state
higher education construction account, the higher education construction
account, the highway infrastructure account, the industrial insurance premium
refund account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement
administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the local leasehold
excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales
and use tax account, the medical aid account, the mobile home park relocation
fund, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the municipal sales
and use tax equalization account, the natural resources deposit account, the
perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the public employees'
retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system plan
2 account, the Puyallup tribal settlement account, the resource management cost
account, the site closure account, the special wildlife account, the state
employees' insurance account, the state employees' insurance reserve account,
the state investment board expense account, the state investment board
commingled trust fund accounts, the supplemental pension account, the teachers'
retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan
2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco
settlement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the tuition
recovery trust fund, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the
University of Washington building account, the volunteer fire fighters' and
reserve officers' relief and pension principal ((account)) fund,
the volunteer fire fighters' ((relief and pension administrative account))
and reserve officers' administrative fund, the Washington judicial
retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and fire
fighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement
officers' and fire fighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington
school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the
Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University
building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the
water pollution control revolving fund, and the Western Washington University
capital projects account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the
agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent
common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university
permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.
All earnings to be distributed under this subsection (4)(a) shall first be
reduced by the allocation to the state treasurer's service fund pursuant to RCW
43.08.190.

(b)
The following accounts and funds shall receive eighty percent of their
proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average
daily balance for the period: The aeronautics account, the aircraft search and
rescue account, the county arterial preservation account, the department of
licensing services account, the essential rail assistance account, the ferry
bond retirement fund, the grade crossing protective fund, the high capacity
transportation account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway safety
account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the
pilotage account, the public transportation systems account, the Puget Sound
capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the
recreational vehicle account, the rural arterial trust account, the safety and
education account, the special category C account, the state patrol highway
account, the transportation equipment fund, the transportation fund, the
transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond
retirement account, and the urban arterial trust account.

(5)
In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no
treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific
affirmative directive of this section.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 4.
Section 3 of this act takes effect September 1, 2000.

---
END ---