BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
49.46.020 and 1999 c 1 s 1 (Initiative Measure No. 688) are each amended to
read as follows:

(1)
Until January 1, 1999, every employer shall pay to each of his or her employees
who has reached the age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less than four
dollars and ninety cents per hour.

(2)
Beginning January 1, 1999, and until January 1, 2000, every employer shall pay
to each of his or her employees who has reached the age of eighteen years wages
at a rate of not less than five dollars and seventy cents per hour.

(3)
Beginning January 1, 2000, and until January 1, 2001, every employer shall pay
to each of his or her employees who has reached the age of eighteen years wages
at a rate of not less than six dollars and fifty cents per hour.

(4)(a)
Beginning on January 1, 2001, and each following January 1st as set forth under
(b) of this subsection, every employer shall pay to each of his or her
employees who has reached the age of eighteen years wages at a rate of not less
than the amount established under (b) of this subsection.

(b)
On September 30, 2000, and on each following September 30th, the department of
labor and industries shall calculate an adjusted minimum wage rate to maintain
employee purchasing power by increasing the current year's minimum wage rate by
the rate of inflation. The adjusted minimum wage rate shall be calculated to
the nearest cent using the consumer price index for urban wage earners and
clerical workers, CPI-W, or a successor index, for the twelve months prior to
each September 1st as calculated by the United States department of labor.
Each adjusted minimum wage rate calculated under this subsection (4)(b) takes
effect on the following January 1st.

(5)
The director shall by regulation establish the minimum wage for employees under
the age of eighteen years.

(6) If, prior to performing any work, an employee fails a
substance abuse test conducted in accordance with chapter 49.82 RCW, an
employer is not obligated to pay the employee.

---
END ---