BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
legislature recognizes that existing transportation facilities in the central
Puget Sound region are inadequate to address mobility needs of the area. The
geography of the region, growth in demand for travel, and public resistance to
new roadways combine to further necessitate the rapid development of
alternative modes of travel.

The
legislature has found and declared in RCW 47.06.140 that transportation
facilities and services of high-capacity transportation systems are of
state-wide significance. Pursuant to RCW 81.104.140, the legislature has also
declared that agencies authorized to provide high-capacity transportation
service, including regional transit authorities, should seek other funds in
addition to dedicated funding sources, including federal, state, local, and
private sector assistance.

The
imposition of state taxes on the purchase of the goods, services, and
activities necessary to construct a multicounty high-capacity transportation
system reduces the revenues available to successfully implement such a system.
The credit provided by section 2 of this act would facilitate the expansion of
high-capacity transportation services by offsetting the taxes paid by regional
transit authorities.

The
legislature intends that the savings resulting from the credit provided in
section 2 of this act will provide additional funds for the planning and
construction of high-capacity transportation systems.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The legislative authority of a regional transit authority may impose a sales
and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The tax is in
addition to other taxes authorized by law and shall be collected from those
persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon
the occurrence of any taxable event within the regional transit authority
district. The rate of the amount shall not exceed 0.065 percent of the selling
price in the case of a sales tax or value of the article used in the case of a
use tax.

(2)
The tax imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be deducted from the
amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or paid over to the department
of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department of revenue shall
perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the regional transit
authority at no cost to the regional transit authority.

(3)
Moneys collected under this section shall only be used for the purpose of
planning and constructing a high-capacity transportation system.

(4)
As used in this section:

(a)
"Regional transit authority" means an authority authorized under
chapter 81.112 RCW; and

(b)
"High-capacity transportation system" has the same meaning as
provided in RCW 81.104.015.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3. This
act expires when the high-capacity transportation system has been completed, or
January 1, 2007, whichever occurs first.

---
END ---