BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
13.50.100 and 1999 c 390 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
This section governs records not covered by RCW 13.50.050.

(2)
Records covered by this section shall be confidential and shall be released
only pursuant to this section and RCW 13.50.010.

(3)
Records retained or produced by any juvenile justice or care agency may be
released to other participants in the juvenile justice or care system only when
an investigation or case involving the juvenile in question is being pursued by
the other participant or when that other participant is assigned the
responsibility of supervising the juvenile. Records covered under this section
and maintained by the juvenile courts which relate to the official actions of
the agency may be entered in the state-wide juvenile court information system.

(4)
A contracting agency or service provider of the department of social and health
services that provides counseling, psychological, psychiatric, or medical
services may release to the office of the family and children's ombudsman
information or records relating to services provided to a juvenile who is
dependent under chapter 13.34 RCW without the consent of the parent or guardian
of the juvenile, or of the juvenile if the juvenile is under the age of
thirteen years, unless such release is otherwise specifically prohibited by
law.

(5)
A juvenile, his or her parents, the juvenile's attorney and the juvenile's
parent's attorney, shall, upon request, be given access to all records and information
collected or retained by a juvenile justice or care agency which pertain to the
juvenile except:

(a)
If it is determined by the agency that release of this information is likely to
cause severe psychological or physical harm to the juvenile or his or her
parents the agency may withhold the information subject to other order of the
court: PROVIDED, That if the court determines that limited release of the
information is appropriate, the court may specify terms and conditions for the
release of the information; or

(b)
If the information or record has been obtained by a juvenile justice or care
agency in connection with the provision of counseling, psychological,
psychiatric, or medical services to the juvenile, when the services have been
sought voluntarily by the juvenile, and the juvenile has a legal right to
receive those services without the consent of any person or agency, then the
information or record may not be disclosed to the juvenile's parents without
the informed consent of the juvenile unless otherwise authorized by law; or

(c)
That the department of social and health services may delete the name and
identifying information regarding persons or organizations who have reported
alleged child abuse or neglect.

(6)
A juvenile or his or her parent denied access to any records following an
agency determination under subsection (5) of this section may file a motion in
juvenile court requesting access to the records. The court shall grant the
motion unless it finds access may not be permitted according to the standards
found in subsections (5)(a) and (b) of this section.

(7)
The person making a motion under subsection (6) of this section shall give
reasonable notice of the motion to all parties to the original action and to
any agency whose records will be affected by the motion.

(8)
Subject to the rules of discovery in civil cases, any party to a proceeding
seeking a declaration of dependency or a termination of the parent-child
relationship and any party's counsel and the guardian ad litem of any party,
shall have access to the records of any natural or adoptive child of the
parent, subject to the limitations in subsection (5) of this section. A party
denied access to records may request judicial review of the denial. If the
party prevails, he or she shall be awarded attorneys' fees, costs, and an
amount not less than five dollars and not more than one hundred dollars for
each day the records were wrongfully denied.

(9) No unfounded allegation of child abuse or neglect as defined
in RCW 26.44.020(12) may be disclosed to a child-placing agency, private
adoption agency, or any other licensed provider.

---
END ---