BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
72.01.045 and 1990 c 153 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
For purposes of this section only, "assault" means an unauthorized
touching of an employee by a resident, patient, or juvenile offender resulting
in physical injury to the employee.

(2)
In recognition of the hazardous nature of employment in state institutions and
community residential settings, the legislature hereby provides a
supplementary program to reimburse employees of the department of social and
health services and the department of veterans affairs for some of their costs
attributable to their being the victims of assault by residents, patients, or
juvenile offenders. This program shall be limited to the reimbursement
provided in this section.

(3)
An employee is only entitled to receive the reimbursement provided in this
section if the secretary of social and health services or the director of the
department of veterans affairs, or the secretary's or director's designee,
finds that each of the following has occurred:

(a)
A resident or patient has assaulted the employee and as a result thereof the
employee has sustained demonstrated physical injuries which have required the
employee to miss days of work;

(b)
The assault cannot be attributable to any extent to the employee's negligence,
misconduct, or failure to comply with any rules or conditions of employment;
and

(c)
The department of labor and industries has approved the employee's workers'
compensation application pursuant to chapter 51.32 RCW.

(4)
The reimbursement authorized under this section shall be as follows:

(a)
The employee's accumulated sick leave days shall not be reduced for the
workdays missed;

(b)
For each workday missed for which the employee is not eligible to receive
compensation under chapter 51.32 RCW, the employee shall receive full pay; and

(c)
In respect to workdays missed for which the employee will receive or has
received compensation under chapter 51.32 RCW, the employee shall be reimbursed
in an amount which, when added to that compensation, will result in the
employee receiving full pay for the workdays missed.

(5)
Reimbursement under this section may not last longer than three hundred
sixty-five consecutive days after the date of the injury.

(6)
The employee shall not be entitled to the reimbursement provided in subsection
(4) of this section for any workday for which the secretary, director, or
applicable designee, finds that the employee has not diligently pursued his or
her compensation remedies under chapter 51.32 RCW.

(7)
The reimbursement shall only be made for absences which the secretary,
director, or applicable designee believes are justified.

(8)
While the employee is receiving reimbursement under this section, he or she
shall continue to be classified as a state employee and the reimbursement
amount shall be considered as salary or wages.

(9)
All reimbursement payments required to be made to employees under this section
shall be made by the employing department. The payments shall be considered as
a salary or wage expense and shall be paid by the department in the same manner
and from the same appropriations as other salary and wage expenses of the
department.

(10) Should the legislature revoke the reimbursement authorized
under this section or repeal this section, no affected employee is entitled
thereafter to receive the reimbursement as a matter of contractual right.

---
END ---