BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 84.36 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
Beginning with taxes levied for collection in calendar year 2006, all personal
property located on land owned by the United States, or an instrumentality of
the United States, at the Hanford reservation that is used exclusively in the
performance of a contract to pretreat, treat, vitrify, and immobilize tank
waste under subsection (2) of this section is exempt from taxation.

(2)
To qualify for this exemption, the personal property must be owned by a person
that has a privatization contract to pretreat, treat, vitrify, and immobilize
tank waste located at the Hanford reservation. A privatization contract, for
purposes of this section, means a contract in which the United States, or an
instrumentality of the United States, has designated the other contracting
party as a party responsible for carrying out tank waste clean-up operations at
the Hanford reservation.

(3) An inadvertent use of property, which otherwise qualifies for
an exemption under this section, in a manner inconsistent with the purpose for
which the exemption is granted does not nullify the exemption if the
inadvertent use is not part of a pattern of use. A pattern of use is presumed
when an inadvertent use is repeated in the same assessment year or in two or
more successive assessment years.

---
END ---