BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 90.03 RCW to read as follows:

An
application for a change or transfer of an existing water right is to be
processed without regard for the potential impairment such a change or transfer
might have on any pending applications for new water rights for the same source
of supply.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 90.44 RCW to read as follows:

An application for a change or transfer of an existing water right
is to be processed without regard for the potential impairment such a change or
transfer might have on any pending applications for new water rights for the
same source of supply.

---
END ---