BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. The
Lake Whatcom landscape management pilot project is created.

The
department of natural resources shall develop a landscape plan regarding
state-owned forest lands in the Lake Whatcom watershed area. Where
appropriate, the department will consult with other major forest landowners in
the watershed and shall involve watershed residents in management activities.
The department shall consult with the Lake Whatcom management committee on
proposed timber harvest and road management activities. The department shall
establish an interjurisdictional committee to review the site-specific activities
and make recommendations. The interjurisdictional committee shall include two
members of the public who have an interest in these activities. The landscape
plan shall address at least the following topics:

(1)
Establishing riparian management zones along all streams, as classified under
chapter 5, Laws of 1999 sp. sess. The department shall manage lands within
such zones to protect water quality and riparian habitat, and interdisciplinary
technical teams may recommend to the department restrictions upon timber
harvest and yarding activities on a case-by-case basis;

(2)
Harvest and road construction upon unstable slopes should be carefully
regulated, including limiting new road construction and old road reconstruction
on unstable slopes, including windthrow buffers during harvest, as necessary;

(3)
Creating and implementing a sustainable yield model specific to the Lake
Whatcom watershed that encompasses the revised management standards and that is
consistent with the sustained yield established by the board of natural
resources;

(4)
The department should build on the existing draft Lake Whatcom landscape plan
and incorporate both new information from the community and new scientific
information when available; and

(5)
The development of a road management plan for the watershed.

The landscape plan shall be completed and implementation initiated
by June 30, 2001. Timber harvest and all road construction in the watershed on
state land shall be delayed until the plan is completed.

---
END ---