BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1.
Nothing in chapter 452, Laws of 1997, or chapter 35, Laws of 1998, is intended
to disallow any use or purpose permitted under section 1, chapter 290, Laws of
1994 as long as the use or purpose was proposed by the local government, but
not implemented by May 20, 1997.

---
END ---