BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 46.61 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
A person is guilty of refusing to submit to a breathalyzer test if the person
is requested to take a breathalyzer test after arrest by a law enforcement
officer having reasonable grounds to believe the person to have been driving or
in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state or operating a
vessel while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug and the person
refuses to submit to a test or tests of his or her breath or blood after being
informed by the officer of the warnings in RCW 46.20.308(2). A person is
guilty of refusing to submit to a breathalyzer test if the person is requested
to take a breathalyzer test after arrest by a law enforcement officer having
reasonable grounds to believe the person to have been driving or in actual
physical control of a motor vehicle while having alcohol in a concentration in
violation of RCW 46.61.503 in his or her system and being under the age of
twenty-one and the person refuses to submit to a test or tests of his or her
breath or blood after being informed by the officer of the warnings in RCW
46.20.308(2).

(2)
A person convicted of a violation of this section who has no prior offense
within seven years is guilty of a misdemeanor. A person convicted of a
violation of this section who has at least one such prior conviction within
seven years is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(3)
A violation of this section may be prosecuted in the jurisdiction where the
defendant drove, was in physical control of the motor vehicle, or operated the
vessel, or in the jurisdiction where the refusal occurred.

Sec.
2. RCW
46.20.308 and 1999 c 331 s 2 and 1999 c 274 s 2 are each reenacted and amended
to read as follows:

(1)
Any person who operates a motor vehicle within this state is deemed to have
given consent, subject to the provisions of RCW 46.61.506 and this section,
to a test or tests of his or her breath or blood for the purpose of determining
the alcohol concentration or presence of any drug in his or her breath or blood
if arrested for any offense where, at the time of the arrest, the arresting
officer has reasonable grounds to believe the person had been driving or was in
actual physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug or was in violation of RCW 46.61.503.

(2)
The test or tests of breath shall be administered at the direction of a law
enforcement officer having reasonable grounds to believe the person to have
been driving or in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug or the person to
have been driving or in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while having
alcohol in a concentration in violation of RCW 46.61.503 in his or her system
and being under the age of twenty-one. However, in those instances where the
person is incapable due to physical injury, physical incapacity, or other
physical limitation, of providing a breath sample or where the person is being
treated in a hospital, clinic, doctor's office, emergency medical vehicle,
ambulance, or other similar facility in which a breath testing instrument is not
present or where the officer has reasonable grounds to believe that the person
is under the influence of a drug, a blood test shall be administered by a
qualified person as provided in RCW 46.61.506(4). ((The officer shall
inform the person of his or her right to refuse the breath or blood test, and
of his or her right to have additional tests administered by any qualified
person of his or her choosing as provided in RCW 46.61.506.)) The officer
shall warn the driver, verbally or in writing, that:

(a)
His or her license, permit, or privilege to drive will be revoked or denied if
he or she refuses to submit to the test;

(b)
His or her license, permit, or privilege to drive will be suspended, revoked,
or denied if the test is administered and the test indicates the alcohol
concentration of the person's breath or blood is 0.08 or more, in the case of a
person age twenty-one or over, or in violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.503, or
46.61.504 in the case of a person under age twenty-one; ((and))

(c)
His or her refusal to take the test may be used in a criminal trial;

(d)
Washington law requires the person to take a test or tests of the person's
breath or blood to determine if the person is under the influence of or
affected by alcohol or any drug, or a combination thereof;

(e)
Refusal to take the test or tests of the person's breath or blood is a crime;
and

(f)
He or she has the right to have additional tests administered by any qualified
person of his or her choosing as provided in RCW 46.61.506.

(3)
Except as provided in this section, the test administered shall be of the
breath only. If an individual is unconscious or is under arrest for the crime
of vehicular homicide as provided in RCW 46.61.520 or vehicular assault as
provided in RCW 46.61.522, or if an individual is under arrest for the crime of
driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs as provided
in RCW 46.61.502, which arrest results from an accident in which there has been
serious bodily injury to another person, a breath or blood test may be
administered without the consent of the individual so arrested.

(4)
Any person who is dead, unconscious, or who is otherwise in a condition
rendering him or her incapable of refusal, shall be deemed not to have
withdrawn the consent provided by subsection (1) of this section and the test
or tests may be administered, subject to the provisions of RCW 46.61.506, and
the person shall be deemed to have received the warnings required under
subsection (2) of this section.

(5)
If, following his or her arrest and receipt of warnings under subsection (2) of
this section, the person arrested refuses upon the request of a law enforcement
officer to submit to a test or tests of his or her breath or blood, no test
shall be given except as authorized under subsection (3) or (4) of this
section.

(6)
If, after arrest and after the other applicable conditions and requirements of
this section have been satisfied, a test or tests of the person's blood or
breath is administered and the test results indicate that the alcohol
concentration of the person's breath or blood is 0.08 or more if the person is
age twenty-one or over, or is in violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.503, or
46.61.504 if the person is under the age of twenty-one, or the person refuses
to submit to a test, the arresting officer or other law enforcement officer at
whose direction any test has been given, or the department, where applicable,
if the arrest results in a test of the person's blood, shall:

(a)
Serve notice in writing on the person on behalf of the department of its
intention to suspend, revoke, or deny the person's license, permit, or
privilege to drive as required by subsection (7) of this section;

(b)
Serve notice in writing on the person on behalf of the department of his or her
right to a hearing, specifying the steps he or she must take to obtain a
hearing as provided by subsection (8) of this section;

(c)
Mark the person's Washington state driver's license or permit to drive, if any,
in a manner authorized by the department;

(d)
Serve notice in writing that the marked license or permit, if any, is a
temporary license that is valid for sixty days from the date of arrest or from
the date notice has been given in the event notice is given by the department
following a blood test, or until the suspension, revocation, or denial of the
person's license, permit, or privilege to drive is sustained at a hearing
pursuant to subsection (8) of this section, whichever occurs first. No
temporary license is valid to any greater degree than the license or permit
that it replaces; and

(e)
Immediately notify the department of the arrest and transmit to the department
within seventy-two hours, except as delayed as the result of a blood test, a
sworn report or report under a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 that
states:

(i)
That the officer had reasonable grounds to believe the arrested person had been
driving or was in actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state
while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs, or both, or was
under the age of twenty-one years and had been driving or was in actual
physical control of a motor vehicle while having an alcohol concentration in
violation of RCW 46.61.503;

(ii)
That after receipt of the warnings required by subsection (2) of this section
the person refused to submit to a test of his or her blood or breath, or a test
was administered and the results indicated that the alcohol concentration of
the person's breath or blood was 0.08 or more if the person is age twenty-one
or over, or was in violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.503, or 46.61.504 if the
person is under the age of twenty-one; and

(iii)
Any other information that the director may require by rule.

(7)
The department of licensing, upon the receipt of a sworn report or report under
a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 under subsection (6)(e) of this
section, shall suspend, revoke, or deny the person's license, permit, or
privilege to drive or any nonresident operating privilege, as provided in RCW
46.20.3101, such suspension, revocation, or denial to be effective beginning
sixty days from the date of arrest or from the date notice has been given in
the event notice is given by the department following a blood test, or when
sustained at a hearing pursuant to subsection (8) of this section, whichever
occurs first.

(8)
A person receiving notification under subsection (6)(b) of this section may,
within thirty days after the notice has been given, request in writing a formal
hearing before the department. The person shall pay a fee of one hundred
dollars as part of the request. If the request is mailed, it must be
postmarked within thirty days after receipt of the notification. Upon timely
receipt of such a request for a formal hearing, including receipt of the
required one hundred dollar fee, the department shall afford the person an
opportunity for a hearing. The department may waive the required one hundred
dollar fee if the person is an indigent as defined in RCW 10.101.010. Except
as otherwise provided in this section, the hearing is subject to and shall be
scheduled and conducted in accordance with RCW 46.20.329 and 46.20.332. The
hearing shall be conducted in the county of the arrest, except that all or part
of the hearing may, at the discretion of the department, be conducted by
telephone or other electronic means. The hearing shall be held within sixty
days following the arrest or following the date notice has been given in the
event notice is given by the department following a blood test, unless
otherwise agreed to by the department and the person, in which case the action
by the department shall be stayed, and any valid temporary license marked under
subsection (6)(c) of this section extended, if the person is otherwise eligible
for licensing. For the purposes of this section, the scope of the hearing
shall cover the issues of whether a law enforcement officer had reasonable
grounds to believe the person had been driving or was in actual physical
control of a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or any drug or had been driving or was in actual physical
control of a motor vehicle within this state while having alcohol in his or her
system in a concentration in violation of RCW 46.61.503 and was under the age
of twenty-one, whether the person was placed under arrest, and (a) whether the
person refused to submit to the test or tests upon request of the officer after
having been informed that such refusal would result in the revocation of the
person's license, permit, or privilege to drive, or (b) if a test or tests were
administered, whether the applicable requirements of this section were
satisfied before the administration of the test or tests, whether the person
submitted to the test or tests, or whether a test was administered without
express consent as permitted under this section, and whether the test or tests
indicated that the alcohol concentration of the person's breath or blood was
0.08 or more if the person was age twenty-one or over at the time of the
arrest, or was in violation of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.503, or 46.61.504 if the
person was under the age of twenty-one at the time of the arrest. The sworn
report or report under a declaration authorized by RCW 9A.72.085 submitted by a
law enforcement officer is prima facie evidence that the officer had reasonable
grounds to believe the person had been driving or was in actual physical
control of a motor vehicle within this state while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or drugs, or both, or the person had been driving or was in
actual physical control of a motor vehicle within this state while having
alcohol in his or her system in a concentration in violation of RCW 46.61.503
and was under the age of twenty-one and that the officer complied with the
requirements of this section.

A
hearing officer shall conduct the hearing, may issue subpoenas for the
attendance of witnesses and the production of documents, and shall administer
oaths to witnesses. The hearing officer shall not issue a subpoena for the
attendance of a witness at the request of the person unless the request is
accompanied by the fee required by RCW 5.56.010 for a witness in district
court. The sworn report or report under a declaration authorized by RCW
9A.72.085 of the law enforcement officer and any other evidence accompanying the
report shall be admissible without further evidentiary foundation and the
certifications authorized by the criminal rules for courts of limited
jurisdiction shall be admissible without further evidentiary foundation. The
person may be represented by counsel, may question witnesses, may present
evidence, and may testify. The department shall order that the suspension,
revocation, or denial either be rescinded or sustained.

(9)
If the suspension, revocation, or denial is sustained after such a hearing, the
person whose license, privilege, or permit is suspended, revoked, or denied has
the right to file a petition in the superior court of the county of arrest to
review the final order of revocation by the department in the same manner as an
appeal from a decision of a court of limited jurisdiction. Notice of appeal
must be filed within thirty days after the date the final order is served or
the right to appeal is waived. Notwithstanding RCW 46.20.334, RALJ 1.1, or
other statutes or rules referencing de novo review, the appeal shall be limited
to a review of the record of the administrative hearing. The appellant must
pay the costs associated with obtaining the record of the hearing before the
hearing officer. The filing of the appeal does not stay the effective date of
the suspension, revocation, or denial. A petition filed under this subsection
must include the petitioner's grounds for requesting review. Upon granting
petitioner's request for review, the court shall review the department's final
order of suspension, revocation, or denial as expeditiously as possible. The
review must be limited to a determination of whether the department has
committed any errors of law. The superior court shall accept those factual
determinations supported by substantial evidence in the record: (a) That were
expressly made by the department; or (b) that may reasonably be inferred from
the final order of the department. The superior court may reverse, affirm, or
modify the decision of the department or remand the case back to the department
for further proceedings. The decision of the superior court must be in writing
and filed in the clerk's office with the other papers in the case. The court
shall state the reasons for the decision. If judicial relief is sought for a
stay or other temporary remedy from the department's action, the court shall
not grant such relief unless the court finds that the appellant is likely to
prevail in the appeal and that without a stay the appellant will suffer
irreparable injury. If the court stays the suspension, revocation, or denial
it may impose conditions on such stay.

(10)
If a person whose driver's license, permit, or privilege to drive has been or
will be suspended, revoked, or denied under subsection (7) of this section,
other than as a result of a breath or blood test refusal, and who has not
committed an offense for which he or she was granted a deferred prosecution
under chapter 10.05 RCW, petitions a court for a deferred prosecution on
criminal charges arising out of the arrest for which action has been or will be
taken under subsection (7) of this section, the court may direct the department
to stay any actual or proposed suspension, revocation, or denial for at least
forty-five days but not more than ninety days. If the court stays the
suspension, revocation, or denial, it may impose conditions on such stay. If
the person is otherwise eligible for licensing, the department shall issue a
temporary license, or extend any valid temporary license marked under
subsection (6) of this section, for the period of the stay. If a deferred
prosecution treatment plan is not recommended in the report made under RCW
10.05.050, or if treatment is rejected by the court, or if the person declines
to accept an offered treatment plan, or if the person violates any condition
imposed by the court, then the court shall immediately direct the department to
cancel the stay and any temporary marked license or extension of a temporary
license issued under this subsection.

A
suspension, revocation, or denial imposed under this section, other than as a
result of a breath or blood test refusal, shall be stayed if the person is
accepted for deferred prosecution as provided in chapter 10.05 RCW for the
incident upon which the suspension, revocation, or denial is based. If the
deferred prosecution is terminated, the stay shall be lifted and the
suspension, revocation, or denial reinstated. If the deferred prosecution is
completed, the stay shall be lifted and the suspension, revocation, or denial
canceled.

(11)
When it has been finally determined under the procedures of this section that a
nonresident's privilege to operate a motor vehicle in this state has been
suspended, revoked, or denied, the department shall give information in writing
of the action taken to the motor vehicle administrator of the state of the
person's residence and of any state in which he or she has a license.

Sec.
3. RCW
46.63.020 and 1999 c 86 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:

Failure
to perform any act required or the performance of any act prohibited by this
title or an equivalent administrative regulation or local law, ordinance,
regulation, or resolution relating to traffic including parking, standing,
stopping, and pedestrian offenses, is designated as a traffic infraction and
may not be classified as a criminal offense, except for an offense contained in
the following provisions of this title or a violation of an equivalent
administrative regulation or local law, ordinance, regulation, or resolution:

(1)
RCW 46.09.120(2) relating to the operation of a nonhighway vehicle while under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance;

(2)
RCW 46.09.130 relating to operation of nonhighway vehicles;

(3)
RCW 46.10.090(2) relating to the operation of a snowmobile while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or narcotics or habit‑forming drugs or
in a manner endangering the person of another;

(4)
RCW 46.10.130 relating to the operation of snowmobiles;

(5)
Chapter 46.12 RCW relating to certificates of ownership and registration and
markings indicating that a vehicle has been destroyed or declared a total loss;

(6)
RCW 46.16.010 relating to initial registration of motor vehicles;

(7)
RCW 46.16.011 relating to permitting unauthorized persons to drive;

(8)
RCW 46.16.160 relating to vehicle trip permits;

(9)
RCW 46.16.381(2) relating to knowingly providing false information in
conjunction with an application for a special placard or license plate for
disabled persons' parking;

(10)
RCW 46.20.005 relating to driving without a valid driver's license;

(11)
RCW 46.20.091 relating to false statements regarding a driver's license or
instruction permit;

(12)
RCW ((46.20.336)) 46.20.0921 relating to the unlawful possession
and use of a driver's license;

(13)
RCW 46.20.342 relating to driving with a suspended or revoked license or
status;

(14)
RCW 46.20.410 relating to the violation of restrictions of an occupational
driver's license;

(15)
RCW ((46.20.420)) 46.20.345 relating to the operation of a motor
vehicle with a suspended or revoked license;

(16)
RCW 46.20.740 relating to operation of a motor vehicle without an ignition
interlock device in violation of a license notation that the device is
required;

(17)
RCW 46.20.750 relating to assisting another person to start a vehicle equipped
with an ignition interlock device;

(18)
RCW 46.25.170 relating to commercial driver's licenses;

(19)
Chapter 46.29 RCW relating to financial responsibility;

(20)
RCW 46.30.040 relating to providing false evidence of financial responsibility;

(21)
RCW 46.37.435 relating to wrongful installation of sunscreening material;

(22)
RCW 46.44.180 relating to operation of mobile home pilot vehicles;

(23)
RCW 46.48.175 relating to the transportation of dangerous articles;

(24)
RCW 46.52.010 relating to duty on striking an unattended car or other property;

(25)
RCW 46.52.020 relating to duty in case of injury to or death of a person or
damage to an attended vehicle;

(26)
RCW 46.52.090 relating to reports by repairmen, storagemen, and appraisers;

(27)
RCW 46.52.130 relating to confidentiality of the driving record to be furnished
to an insurance company, an employer, and an alcohol/drug assessment or
treatment agency;

(28)
RCW 46.55.020 relating to engaging in the activities of a registered tow truck
operator without a registration certificate;

(29)
RCW 46.55.035 relating to prohibited practices by tow truck operators;

(30)
RCW 46.61.015 relating to obedience to police officers, flagmen, or fire
fighters;

(31)
RCW 46.61.020 relating to refusal to give information to or cooperate with an
officer;

(32)
RCW 46.61.022 relating to failure to stop and give identification to an
officer;

(33)
RCW 46.61.024 relating to attempting to elude pursuing police vehicles;

(34)
RCW 46.61.500 relating to reckless driving;

(35)
RCW 46.61.502 and 46.61.504 relating to persons under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or drugs;

(36)
RCW 46.61.503 relating to a person under age twenty-one driving a motor vehicle
after consuming alcohol;

(37)
Section 1 of this act relating to refusing to submit to a breathalyzer test;

(38)
RCW 46.61.520 relating to vehicular homicide by motor vehicle;

(((38)))
(39) RCW 46.61.522 relating to vehicular assault;

(((39)))
(40) RCW 46.61.5249 relating to first degree negligent driving;

(((40)))
(41) RCW 46.61.527(4) relating to reckless endangerment of roadway
workers;

(((41)))
(42) RCW 46.61.530 relating to racing of vehicles on highways;

(((42)))
(43) RCW 46.61.685 relating to leaving children in an unattended vehicle
with the motor running;

(((43)))
(44) RCW 46.64.010 relating to unlawful cancellation of or attempt to
cancel a traffic citation;

(((44)))
(45) RCW 46.64.048 relating to attempting, aiding, abetting, coercing,
and committing crimes;

(((45)))
(46) Chapter 46.65 RCW relating to habitual traffic offenders;

(((46)))
(47) RCW 46.68.010 relating to false statements made to obtain a refund;

(((47)))
(48) Chapter 46.70 RCW relating to unfair motor vehicle business
practices, except where that chapter provides for the assessment of monetary
penalties of a civil nature;

(((48)))
(49) Chapter 46.72 RCW relating to the transportation of passengers in
for hire vehicles;

(((49)))
(50) RCW 46.72A.060 relating to limousine carrier insurance;

(((50)))
(51) RCW 46.72A.070 relating to operation of a limousine without a
vehicle certificate;

(((51)))
(52) RCW 46.72A.080 relating to false advertising by a limousine
carrier;

(((52)))
(53) Chapter 46.80 RCW relating to motor vehicle wreckers;

(((53)))
(54) Chapter 46.82 RCW relating to driver's training schools;

(((54)))
(55) RCW 46.87.260 relating to alteration or forgery of a cab card,
letter of authority, or other temporary authority issued under chapter 46.87
RCW;

(((55))) (56) RCW 46.87.290 relating to operation of
an unregistered or unlicensed vehicle under chapter 46.87 RCW.

---
END ---