BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the
context clearly requires otherwise.

(a)
"Cooperative group" means a formal network of facilities that
collaborate on research projects and have an established national institutes of
health-approved peer review program operating within the group.
"Cooperative group" includes:

(i)
The national cancer institute clinical cooperative group;

(ii)
The national cancer institute community clinical oncology program;

(iii)
The AIDS clinical trials group; and

(iv)
The community programs for clinical research in AIDS.

(b)
"Multiple project assurance contract" means a contract between an
institution and the federal department of health and human services that
defines the relationship of the institution to the federal department of health
and human services and sets out the responsibilities of the institution and the
procedures that will be used by the institution to protect human subjects.

(c)
"Patient cost" means the cost of a medically necessary health care
service that is incurred as a result of the treatment being provided to the
enrollee for purposes of the clinical trial. "Patient cost" does not
include:

(i)
The cost of an investigational drug or device;

(ii)
The cost of nonhealth care services that a patient may be required to receive
as a result of the treatment being provided for purposes of the clinical trial;

(iii)
Costs associated with managing the research associated with the clinical trial;
or

(iv)
Costs that would not be covered under the patient's health plan for
noninvestigational treatments.

(2)
A carrier shall provide coverage for patient costs to an enrollee in a clinical
trial, as a result of treatment provided for a life-threatening condition, or
prevention, early detection, and treatment studies on cancer.

(3)
The coverage under subsection (2) of this section shall be required if:

(a)
The treatment is being provided or the studies are being conducted in a phase
I, phase II, phase III, or phase IV clinical trial for cancer; or the treatment
is being provided in a phase II, phase III, or phase IV clinical trial for any
other life-threatening condition;

(b)
The treatment is being provided in a clinical trial approved by:

(i)
One of the national institutes of health;

(ii)
A national institutes of health cooperative group or a national institutes of
health center;

(iii)
The federal food and drug administration in the form of an investigational new
drug application;

(iv)
The federal department of veterans affairs; or

(v)
An institutional review board of an institution in the state which has a
multiple project assurance contract approved by the national institutes of
health;

(c)
The facility and personnel providing the treatment are capable of doing so by
virtue of their experience, training, and volume of patients treated to
maintain expertise;

(d)
There is no clearly superior, noninvestigational treatment alternative; and

(e)
The available clinical or preclinical data provide a reasonable expectation
that the treatment will be at least as effective as the noninvestigational
alternative.

(4)
The coverage under subsection (3) of this section may be provided on a
case-by-case basis if the treatment is being provided in a phase I clinical
trial for any life-threatening condition other than cancer.

(5)
In conjunction with the provisions of subsection (3) of this section, a health
plan shall provide coverage for patient cost incurred for drugs and devices
that have been approved for sale by the federal food and drug administration
whether or not it has approved the drug or device for use in treating the
enrollee's particular condition, to the extent that the drugs or devices are
not paid for by the manufacturer, distributor, or provider of that drug or
device.

(6)(a)
An entity seeking coverage for treatment in a clinical trial approved by an
institutional review board under subsection (3)(b)(v) of this section shall
post electronically and keep up-to-date a list of the clinical trials meeting
the requirements of subsections (2) and (3) of this section.

(b)
The list shall include, for each clinical trial:

(i)
The phase for which the trial is approved;

(ii)
The entity approving the trial;

(iii)
Whether the trial is for treatment of cancer or another life-threatening
disease and, if not cancer, the particular disease; and

(iv)
The estimated number of participants in the trial.

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 2. A
new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The insurance commissioner shall create a workgroup on health plan coverage for
patient care cost in clinical trials.

(2)
The purpose of the workgroup is to assess the costs and benefits of insurance
coverage for patient care cost incurred in clinical trials.

(3)
At a minimum, the workgroup shall:

(a)
Develop a methodology for assessing the economic and clinical impact of the
coverage required by section 1 of this act for patient care cost in clinical
trials;

(b)
Request and collect from health care providers and payers pertinent aggregate
clinical and financial data on patient treatment to assess differences in
patient care costs and clinical outcomes between patients treated in clinical
trials and patients treated outside of clinical trials; and

(c)
Review any other issues the workgroup considers appropriate to make
recommendations pertaining to coverage for patient care cost in clinical
trials.

(4)
The workgroup shall be comprised of eleven members, appointed by the
commissioner. The members of the workgroup shall include representatives of
universities in the state engaged in health research, the Washington state
medical association, carriers, the general public, and the commissioner. The
workgroup shall select a chairman from among its members. Staffing for the
workgroup shall be provided by the office of the insurance commissioner and the
department of health.

(5)
The workgroup shall present a preliminary report on the results of its study,
including findings and recommendations, to the appropriate policy committees of
the senate and the house of representatives on or before October 1, 2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 3.
Section 1 of this act applies to new health plan contracts issued on or after
July 1, 2001, and to contracts renewing after June 30, 2001.

---
END ---