BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

NEW
SECTION. Sec. 1. A
new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:

(1)
The definitions in this subsection apply to this section, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise.

(a)
"Pregnancy-related benefits" means benefits that cover any medical
condition that may be associated with pregnancy, including complications of
pregnancy.

(b)
"Infertility" means a disease or condition affecting the reproductive
system that interferes with the ability of a man or a woman to achieve a
pregnancy or of a woman to carry a pregnancy to live birth. The duration of
the failure to conceive must be twelve or more months before an investigation
is undertaken unless medical history and physical findings dictate earlier
evaluation and treatment.

(c)
"Nonexperimental procedure" means any clinical treatment or procedure
whose safety and efficacy is recognized as such by the American society for
reproductive medicine or the American college of obstetricians and
gynecologists.

(2)
A health plan issued to individuals or groups that provides benefits for
pregnancy-related services shall not exclude coverage for the diagnosis or
treatment of infertility, including all nonexperimental assisted reproductive
technology procedures.

(3)
Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a health carrier shall
not create or impose disincentives for utilization of the benefits required by
subsection (2) of this section.

(4)
Nothing in this section shall be construed as:

(a)
Preventing a health carrier from imposing deductibles, coinsurance, other
cost-sharing requirements, or other limitations in relation to providing
infertility services, provided that such deductible, coinsurance, other
cost-sharing requirement, or other limitation is not greater than or different
from the deductible, coinsurance, other cost-sharing requirement, or other
limitation for pregnancy-related services covered under the plan;

(b)
Requiring a health carrier to cover experimental fertility treatment; or

(c)
Requiring coverage for procedures for in vitro fertilization, gamete
intrafallopian transfer, or zygote intrafallopian transfer unless:

(i)
The covered person has been unable to bring a pregnancy to live birth through
less costly, medically appropriate infertility treatments for which coverage is
available under the health plan;

(ii)
The covered individual has not undergone four completed oocyte retrievals,
except that if a live birth followed a completed oocyte retrieval, then two
more completed oocyte retrievals shall be covered, with a lifetime cap of six
retrievals;

(iii)
The procedures are performed at medical facilities that conform to the
standards of the American society for reproductive medicine, the society for
assisted reproductive technology, or the American college of obstetricians and
gynecologists; and

(iv)
The laboratory or facility has received accreditation from the college of
American pathologists' reproductive laboratory accreditation program.

(5)
This section applies to health plans issued or renewed on or after January 1,
2001.

NEW SECTION. Sec. 2. If
any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to
other persons or circumstances is not affected.

---
END ---