BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
68.50.330 and 1984 c 17 s 19 are each amended to read as follows:

If
the county coroner or county medical examiner investigating a death is unable
to establish the identity of a body or human remains by visual means,
fingerprints, or other identifying data, he or she shall have a qualified
dentist, as determined by the county coroner or county medical examiner, carry
out a dental examination of the body or human remains. If the county coroner
or county medical examiner with the aid of the dental examination and other
identifying findings is still unable to establish the identity of the body or
human remains, he or she shall prepare and forward such dental examination
records within thirty days of the date the body or human remains were found
to the dental identification system of the state patrol identification,
child abuse, vulnerable adult abuse, and criminal history section on forms
supplied by the state patrol for such purposes.

The dental identification system shall act as a repository or
computer center or both with respect to such dental examination records. It
shall compare such dental examination records with dental records filed with it
and shall determine which scoring probabilities are the highest for the
purposes of identification. It shall then submit such information to the
county coroner or county medical examiner who prepared and forwarded the dental
examination records.

---
END ---