BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
18.160.030 and 1992 c 116 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
This chapter shall be administered by the state director of fire protection.

(2)
The state director of fire protection shall have the authority, and it shall be
his or her duty to:

(a)
Issue such administrative regulations as necessary for the administration of
this chapter;

(b)(i)
Set reasonable fees for licenses, certificates, testing, and other aspects of
the administration of this chapter. However, the license fee for fire
protection sprinkler system contractors engaged solely in the installation,
inspection, maintenance, or servicing of NFPA 13-D fire protection sprinkler
systems shall not exceed one hundred dollars, and the license fee for fire
protection sprinkler system contractors engaged solely in the installation,
inspection, maintenance, or servicing of NFPA 13-R fire protection sprinkler
systems shall not exceed three hundred dollars;

(ii)
Adopt rules establishing a special category restricted to contractors registered
under chapter 18.27 RCW who install underground systems that service fire
protection sprinkler systems((. The rules shall be adopted within ninety
days of March 31, 1992));

(c)
Enforce the provisions of this chapter;

(d)
Conduct investigations of complaints to determine if any infractions of this
chapter or the regulations developed under this chapter have occurred;

(e)
((Work with the fire sprinkler advisory committee consisting of fire
protection sprinkler system contractors and other related officials;

(f)))
Assign a certificate number to each certificate of competency holder; ((and

(g))) (f)
Adopt rules necessary to implement and administer a program which requires the
affixation of a seal any time a fire protection sprinkler system is installed,
which seal shall include the certificate number of any certificate of
competency holder who installs, in whole or in part, the fire protection
sprinkler system;

(g)
Adopt rules necessary for the collection of fees established in the uniform
building code for conducting plan reviews and inspections when requested by
local jurisdictions, subject to available funds and resources; and

(h)
Adopt rules necessary to assess monetary penalties of a civil nature for the
violation of the provisions of this chapter.

Sec.
2. RCW
18.160.040 and 1990 c 177 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:

(1)
To become a certificate of competency holder under this chapter, an applicant
must have satisfactorily passed an examination administered by the state
director of fire protection. A certificate of competency holder can satisfy
this examination requirement by presenting a copy of a current certificate of
competency from the national institute for certification in engineering
technologies showing that the applicant has achieved the classification of
engineering technician level 3 or senior engineering technician level 4 in the
field of fire protection, automatic sprinkler system layout. ((The state
director of fire protection may accept equivalent proof of qualification in
lieu of examination, as recommended by the fire sprinkler advisory committee.))
This examination requirement is mandatory except as otherwise provided in this
chapter.

(2)
Every applicant for a certificate of competency shall fulfill the requirements
established by the state director of fire protection ((and the fire
protection sprinkler system technical advisory committee under chapter 34.05
RCW)).

(3)
Every applicant for a certificate of competency shall make application to the
state director of fire protection and pay the fees required.

(4)
Provided the application for the certificate of competency is made prior to
ninety days after May 1, 1991, the state director of fire protection, in lieu
of the examination requirements of the applicant for a certificate of
competency, may accept as satisfactory evidence of competency and
qualification, affidavits attesting that the applicant has had a minimum of
three years' experience.

(5)
The state director of fire protection may((, after consultation with the
fire sprinkler advisory committee,)) issue a temporary certificate of
competency to an applicant who, in his or her judgment, will satisfactorily
perform as a certificate of competency holder under the provisions of this chapter.
The temporary certificate of competency shall remain in effect for a period of
up to three years. The temporary certificate of competency holder shall,
within the three-year period, complete the examination requirements specified
in subsection (1) of this section. There shall be no examination exemption for
an individual issued a temporary certificate of competency. Prior to the
expiration of the three-year period, the temporary certificate of competency
holder shall make application for a regular certificate of competency. The
procedures and qualifications for issuance of a regular certificate of
competency shall be applicable to the temporary certificate of competency
holder. When a temporary certificate of competency expires, the holder shall cease
all activities associated with the holding of a temporary certificate of
competency, subject to the penalties contained in this chapter.

(6)
To become a licensed fire protection sprinkler system contractor under this
chapter, a person or firm must comply with the following:

(a)
Must be or have in his or her full-time employ a holder of a valid certificate
of competency;

(b)
Comply with the minimum insurance requirements of this chapter; and

(c)
Make application to the state director of fire protection for a license and pay
the fees required.

(7)
Each license and certificate of competency issued under this chapter must be
posted in a conspicuous place in the fire protection sprinkler system contractor's
place of business.

(8)
All bids, advertisements, proposals, offers, and installation drawings for fire
protection sprinkler systems must prominently display the fire protection
sprinkler system contractor's license number.

(9)
A certificate of competency or license issued under this chapter is not
transferable.

(10) In no case shall a certificate of competency holder be
employed full time by more than one fire protection sprinkler system contractor
at the same time. If the certificate of competency holder should leave the
employment of the fire protection sprinkler system contractor, he or she must
notify the state director of fire protection within thirty days. If the
certificate of competency holder should leave the employment of the fire protection
sprinkler system contractor, the contractor shall have six months or until the
expiration of the current license, whichever occurs last, to submit a new
application identifying another certificate of competency holder who is at the
time of application an owner of the fire protection sprinkler system business
or a full-time employee of the fire protection sprinkler system contractor, in
order to be issued a new license. If such application is not received and a
new license issued within the allotted time, the state director of fire
protection shall revoke the license of the fire protection sprinkler system
contractor.

---
END ---