BE IT ENACTED BY THE
LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:

Sec.
1. RCW
43.43.858 and 1987 c 65 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:

There
is hereby created the organized crime advisory board of the state of
Washington. The board shall consist of ((thirteen)) fourteen
voting and two nonvoting members.

The
lieutenant governor shall appoint four members of the senate to the board, no
more than two of whom shall be from the same political party.

The
governor shall appoint ((five)) six members to the board. Two
members shall be county prosecuting attorneys and shall be appointed from a
list of four county prosecutors agreed upon and submitted to the governor by
the elected county prosecutors. One member shall be a municipal police chief,
and one member shall be a county sheriff, both of whom shall be appointed from
a list of three police chiefs and three sheriffs agreed upon and submitted to
the governor by the association of sheriffs and police chiefs (RCW
36.28A.010). One member shall be a retired judge of a court of record. One
member shall be the secretary of corrections or the secretary's designee.

The
United States attorneys for the western and eastern districts of Washington
shall be requested to serve on the board as nonvoting members and shall not be
eligible to serve as chairperson.

The
speaker of the house shall appoint four members of the house of representatives
to the board, no more than two of whom shall be from the same political party.

The members of the board shall be qualified on the basis of
knowledge and experience in matters relating to crime prevention and security
or with such other abilities as may be expected to contribute to the effective
performance of the board's duties. The members of the board shall meet with
the chief of the Washington state patrol at least four times a year to perform
the duties enumerated in RCW 43.43.862 and to discuss any other matters related
to organized crime. Additional meetings of the board may be convened at the
call of the chairperson or by a majority of the members. The board shall elect
its own chairperson from among its members. Legislative members shall receive
reimbursement for travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties
in accordance with RCW 44.04.120 ((as now existing or hereafter amended)),
and the other members in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060((, as
now existing or hereafter amended)).

---
END ---